3||Recent evidence has demonstrated that acquired uniparental disomy (aUPD) is a novel mechanism by which pathogenetic mutations in cancer may be reduced to homozygosity. To help identify novel mutations in myeloproliferative neoplasms (MPNs), we performed a genome-wide single nucleotide polymorphism (SNP) screen to identify aUPD in 58 patients with atypical chronic myeloid leukemia (aCML; n = 30), JAK2 mutation–negative myelofibrosis (MF; n = 18), or JAK2 mutation–negative polycythemia vera (PV; n = 10). Stretches of homozygous, copy neutral SNP calls greater than 20Mb were seen in 10 (33%) aCML and 1 (6%) MF, but were absent in PV. In total, 7 different chromosomes were involved with 7q and 11q each affected in 10% of aCML cases. CBL mutations were identified in all 3 cases with 11q aUPD and analysis of 574 additional MPNs revealed a total of 27 CBL variants in 26 patients with aCML, myelofibrosis or chronic myelomonocytic leukemia. Most variants were missense substitutions in the RING or linker domains that abrogated CBL ubiquitin ligase activity and conferred a proliferative advantage to 32D cells overexpressing FLT3. We conclude that acquired, transforming CBL mutations are a novel and widespread pathogenetic abnormality in morphologically related, clinically aggressive MPNs.  Introduction  Myeloproliferative neoplasms (MPNs) are clonal hematopoietic stem cell disorders characterized by overproliferation of one or more myeloid cell lineages in the bone marrow and increased numbers of mature and immature myeloid cells in the peripheral blood. Excess proliferation is frequently associated with splenomegaly and cardiovascular complications as well as increased risk of transformation to acute leukemia. MPNs are categorized into subtypes based on specific morphologic, hematologic, and laboratory parameters, the best characterized being the 4 so-called classic MPNs: polycythemia vera (PV), essential thrombocythemia (ET), primary myelofibrosis (MF), and chronic myeloid leukemia (CML).1 In addition, several atypical MPNs are recognized, some of which show both dysplastic and proliferative features, such as atypical, BCR-ABL negative CML (aCML).2  MPNs are associated with acquired, activating mutations or gene fusions of tyrosine kinases, abnormalities that are believed to be critical drivers of excess proliferation as a result of deregulated or constitutive signaling.3 The 2 most prominent examples are BCR-ABL in CML4 and the V617F JAK2 mutation in PV, ET, and MF,5⇓⇓–8 but more than 40 variant tyrosine kinase fusions have been identified in MPNs as well as other mutations in JAK2 and FLT3.2 Activating mutations have been described in components that signal upstream (eg, MPL) or downstream (eg, NRAS) of tyrosine kinases9,10; however, the molecular pathogenesis of the majority of atypical MPNs and approximately 50% of ET and MF cases remains obscure.  V617F JAK2 was initially identified by several different routes, one of which was based on the observation that many PV patients show evidence of acquired uniparental disomy (aUPD) at chromosome 9p.11,12 Regions of aUPD exhibit loss of heterozygosity (LOH) compared with constitutional DNA without change of copy number and arise by mitotic recombination followed by selection for one of the products. After the initial observations in PV, it has emerged that aUPD is common in both hematologic and epithelial malignancies, and is associated with known oncogenic changes in a variety of genes within the affected regions.13 In this study we set out to determine whether aUPD characterizes MPNs of unknown molecular etiology and, if so, whether it could be used as a tool to help identify novel driver mutations.  Methods  Patients  Peripheral blood or bone marrow samples were received from patients diagnosed with an MPN or other hematologic malignancy according to standard morphologic, hematologic, and laboratory criteria. Clinical data were available from a subset of these cases. The study was approved by the Internal Review Boards from participating institutions and informed consent was obtained in accordance with the Declaration of Helsinki.  SNP array analysis  DNA labeling and hybridization to Affymetrix 50k XbaI chips was performed at the Deutsches Ressourcenzentrum für Genomforschung (RZPD, Berlin, Germany). Raw data were imported into the Affymetrix GeneChip Operating Software, analyzed using Affymetrix (High Wycombe, United Kingdom) GeneChip Genotyping Analysis Software (GTYPE 4.1) and copy number analysis tool (CNAT). Data were exported to custom-designed spreadsheets that display loss of heterozygosity and copy number changes in ideogram format. Data were also analyzed using Affymetrix Genotyping Console (version 2.1). Overall, a median of 98.2% (range, 91.5%-99.6%) of SNPs gave readable calls.  Mutation analysis  Detection of mutations by high resolution melting (HRM) analysis was performed as described14 using a Rotor-Gene 6000 (Corbett Life Sciences, St Neots, United Kingdom). Direct sequencing of polymerase chain reaction (PCR) products was performed by standard techniques on an ABI 3130 Genetic Analyzer (Applied Biosystems, Warrington, United Kingdom) and analyzed using Mutation Surveyor (SoftGenetics, State College, PA). CBL mutations are numbered relative to the ATG (A = 1) in the Ensembl cDNA sequence ENSG00000110395. A dropping factor (relative intensity drop of the wild-type allele peak relative to that seen in a concurrently run normal sample) of 60% or more was considered indicative of a biallelic mutation whereas a dropping factor of less than 60% was considered as monoallelic. Primer sequences for CBL exon 8 were CBL_i7f (5′-tgtggtttcactttaaaccctgga-3′) and CBL_i8r (5′-gccaggccaccccttgtatc-3′) and for CBL exon 9 were CBL_i8f (5′-ggcctggcttttgggttagg-3′) and CBL_i9r (5′-cacaatggattttgccagtctcc-3′). CBL reverse-transcriptase PCR (RT-PCR) was performed on random hexamer–reverse transcribed RNA using primers CBLe7F: 5′-gaatcctgatctgactggcttatg-3′ and CBLe10R 5′-gctgcggcagaaggtcaagt-3′. Other primer sequences are available on request.  Microsatellite analysis  DNA samples were amplified with a series of fluorescently labeled primer pairs flanking highly polymorphic microsatellite markers on chromosome 11q as described.10 aUPD was scored if 4 or more consecutive markers encompassing CBL were homozygous without change in allelic copy number (P < .05 of this occurring in the absence of aUPD based on published rates of heterozygosity). Copy number at 11q was estimated by multiplex ligation probe amplification (MLPA) using the Marfan probeset 1 (P065; MRC Holland, Amsterdam, The Netherlands), a kit that contains four 11q control probes including one at 11q23.3.  Constructs  pMY-wtCBL and pMY-CBLR420Q express wild-type and R420Q CBL, respectively, along with green fluorescent protein (GFP).15 Other CBL mutant constructs were derived from pMY-wtCBL using the QuikChange Site-Directed Mutagenesis Kit (Stratagene, La Jolla, CA). pAL/FLT3 and pCMV–HA ubiquitin have also been described previously.15  Cell lines  The IL-3–dependent murine myeloid cell 32Dcl3 (32D) was purchased from the Deutsche Sammlung von Mikroorganismen und Zellkulturen (Braunschweig, Germany) and was maintained in 90% RPMI 1640 medium with 10% fetal bovine serum (FBS) and 10% WEHI-3B conditioned medium (WEHI). All cells were maintained in a humidified incubator at 37°C and 5% carbon dioxide. 32D cells were stably transduced by electroporation with wt-FLT3 in a pAL vector as previously described16 and maintained in 15 ng/mL blastocidin (Invitrogen, Paisley United Kingdom). The Platinum-E (Plat-E) retrovirus packaging cell line17 was transfected using the calcium phosphate method with 5 μg CBL construct DNA: 106 32D/wtFLT3 cells were cocultivated with the Plat-E cells for 48 hours in a volume of 2 mL (50% RPMI, 50% DMEM, 10% FBS, 5% WEHI). GFP positive cells were flow sorted to highest possible purity using a BD FACSAria cell sorter (Becton Dickinson, Stanford, CA). If insufficient cells were obtained for experiments after flow sorting, the cells were maintained in culture and resorted to greater than 95% purity.  Growth factor withdrawal assays  Cell growth was compared with wt-FLT3, vector-only transfected cells and the parental 32D line in stably transfected cells. Cells (105/mL) were grown over 3 days in triplicate for each CBL mutant and a wt-CBL control in 96-well plates. Cultures were analyzed daily for proliferation using the Aqueous One Solution Cell Proliferation Assay kit (MTS assay; Promega, Southampton, United Kingdom). All experiments were performed at least 3 times independently and results were analyzed using GraphPad Prism 4 software (GraphPad Software, San Diego, CA).  Ubiquitin ligase activity  The ubiquitin ligase activity of CBL mutants in comparison to wild-type CBL was determined by transiently transfecting 107 32D/wtFLT3 cells expressing wild-type or CBL mutants by electroporation with 20 μg pCMV-HA ubiquitin. Cells were maintained in culture with WEHI for 12 hours after transfection before being washed, serum deprived overnight, exposed to FLT3 ligand for 10 minutes, and lysed in buffer as described.18 Lysates were incubated with a FLT3-specific polyclonal antibody overnight at 4°C. Protein G agarose beads (100 μL) were added and incubated at 4°C for 4 hours. The beads were washed 4 times in ice-cold radioimmunoprecipitation assay (RIPA) lysis buffer. The supernatant was mixed with sodium dodecyl sulphate (SDS) sample loading buffer before immunoblot analyses with antibodies against HA-ubiquitin (sc-805; Santa Cruz Biotechnology, Santa Cruz, CA), CBL (2111C3a; Abcam, Cambridge, United Kingdom), and FLT3 (sc-479; Cell Signaling Technology, Danvers, MA).  Results  SNP array analysis  We performed genome-wide SNP analysis on leukocyte DNA extracted from 58 MPD patients: aCML (n = 30), V617F JAK2 negative MF (n = 18), and JAK2 mutation negative PV/idiopathic erythrocytosis (n = 10). As comparators, we also analyzed cases of CML in transformation to blast crisis (n = 30, of which 20 were myeloid and 10 lymphoid) and chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL; n = 20). We conservatively defined likely regions of aUPD as at least 20 Mb of absent or significantly reduced heterozygous SNP calls (ie, < 5% SNPs called as heterozygous) running to a telomere without change in copy number (Figure 1A). Such large regions are uncommon in healthy individuals.19 Strikingly, we found that aUPD was common in aCML with 10 (33%) of cases affected. In contrast, aUPD was only seen in a single case of MF and was not seen in other patient subgroups. In total, 7 different chromosomes were affected, with abnormalities at 7q and 11q each seen recurrently in 10% of aCML cases. The affected regions ranged in size from 29 Mb to a complete copy of chromosome 13 (Table 1).  Figure 1 Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 1 Single nucleotide polymorphism array results and initial mutation analysis. (A) Array analysis of 2 control patients showing copy number (CN) and loss of heterozygosity (LOH) outputs. The x-axis for the CN plots show (copy number)−2 as determined by CNAT, with values approaching or exceeding −1 indicating deletions and greater than +1 indicating amplifications. The x-axis for LOH shows log10 P values (ie, 20 indicates 10−20). The 2 panels on the left are from a polycythemia vera (PV) case with a homozygous V617F JAK2 mutation. There is no gross copy number change (individual datapoints spread around the zero line), but a large block of homozygous SNP calls at 9p indicative of aUPD. The 2 panels on the right are from a chronic myeloid leukemia (CML) blast crisis case and show LOH accompanied by a 20q deletion. (B) For case UPN 5, a large block of 11q aUPD is apparent on analysis of granulocytes but almost completely absent from mononuclear cells (MNCs) extracted from the same sample. (C) Chromosome 1p aUPD in case UPN 27 is associated with a biallelic G>T MPL mutation that is predicted to result in a W515L substitution. (D) Whole chromosome 13 isodisomy in case UPN 28 associated with a homozygous FLT3 ITD. Two controls are shown: an acute myeloid leukemia (AML) patient previously known to have a heterozygous FLT3 ITD and a healthy individual. View inlineView popup Table 1 Chromosomal regions and cases affected by aUPD Association between aUPD and known acquired oncogenic mutations  Although we did not have constitutional DNA to formally confirm that the regions of homozygosity were acquired, in 1 individual we found a marked reduction in the proportion of 11q aUPD positive cells on comparison of mononuclear cells and granulocytes, consistent with an acquired abnormality (Figure 1B). Some of the affected regions harbor genes known to be relevant to hematologic malignancies and therefore we assessed their mutational status. Sequencing of the MPL gene in the case UPN 27 with 1p aUPD revealed a homozygous G>T change (Figure 1C) that results in the previously reported W515L substitution.9 Case UPN 28 with whole chromosome 13 UPD had a homozygous FLT3 internal tandem duplication (ITD; Figure 1D). Candidate genes for the abnormalities at 17q and 21q include NF1 and RUNX1, respectively; however, these were not investigated.  11q aUPD is associated with CBL mutations  Next, we focused our analysis on the 2 recurrent regions of aUPD at 7q and 11q. Because of the strong association between MPNs and aberrant tyrosine kinase signaling, we analyzed genes encoding tyrosine kinases and associated signaling components. The minimally affected region at chromosome 7q contains 3 tyrosine kinases: MET, EPHA1, and EPHB6. We fully sequenced the coding exons of these genes in the 3 cases with 7q aUPD and 2 normal controls but found no abnormalities. Similarly, we found no sequence changes in exons 11 through 17 of BRAF, a gene encoding a downstream component of RAS signaling that is mutated in malignant melanoma and other cancers.20 There are no tyrosine kinase genes on chromosome 11q, and although there are several genes encoding signal transduction components, CBL stood out as a known oncogene that negatively regulates tyrosine kinase signaling.21 Sequencing of CBL in the three 11q aUPD cases revealed that UPN 2 and UPN 5 each had a T>C change at nucleotide 1277 in exon 8 that predicts a L380P substitution. Case UPN 3 had a C>G missense change in exon 9 at nucleotide 1387 that predicts a P417A change (Figure 2). Consistent with the array results, the mutations in cases UPN 3 and UPN 5 were predominant with the residual wild-type alleles only weakly visible. For case UPN 2 both the mutation and level of aUPD was less prominent, presumably due to a greater background of normal cells.  Figure 2 Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 2 CBL mutations in the 3 cases with 11q aUPD. (A) Genotyping Console output indicating homozygous SNP calls in green, copy number state as estimated by a Hidden Markov Model in blue, and smoothed copy number log(2) ratio values in red. (B) Ideograms showing lack of large copy number changes and blocks of homozygosity at 11q. Abbreviations are as in Figure 1. (C) Sequence changes indicated by ↓ in each case compared with normal controls. UPN 2 and UPN 5 each have the c.1139T>C: L380P mutation whereas UPN 3 has c.1249C>G: P417A. Prevalence and nature of CBL mutations  To determine the prevalence of CBL mutations, we sequenced exons 8 and 9 (that encode amino acids 366 through 409 and 410 through 477, respectively) in an additional 574 MPN cases. A total of 27 sequence variants were identified in 26 patients, of whom 3 had MF, 10 had chronic myelomonocytic leukemia (CMML), 12 had aCML and 1 had hypereosinophilic syndrome/chronic eosinophilic leukemia (HES/CEL; Tables 2 and 3). To ensure that we were not missing mutations elsewhere in the gene we analyzed all coding exons in 70 CBL mutation negative aCML or unclassified, CML-like MPN cases by high resolution melt (HRM) analysis but failed to detect any further sequence changes apart from known polymorphisms. Similarly, no mutations in CBLB exons 9 or 10 or CBLC exons 7 and 8 (the exons that correspond to CBL exons 8 and 9) were identified. The activity of BCR-ABL is known to increase during progression of CML from chronic phase to blast crisis22 and we speculated that abrogation of CBL activity might be at least partially responsible for this increase. HRM analysis of CBL exons 8 and 9 in blast crisis cases (n = 31), however, failed to reveal any mutations.  View inlineView popup Table 2 Cases analyzed for CBL mutations View inlineView popup Table 3 List of CBL sequence variants Of the 27 CBL variants, 21 (78%) were missense substitutions affecting 12 amino acids (15 different substitutions), 5 (19%) were candidate splicing abnormalities, and 1 (3%) produced a stop codon (Table 3). Most of the changes were novel, although 4 cases had R420Q as previously identified in a single case of AML.15 Apart from N454D, all residues affected by missense mutations were completely conserved in CBL orthologues as well as the 2 other human CBL family members (Figure 3). The mutation to a stop codon was found in a patient (UPN 9) who also had the Y371H variant; PCR across the affected regions and sequencing indicated that the 2 changes were on different alleles.  Figure 3 Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 3 Location of missense mutations. (Top panel) Schematic representation of the CBL protein showing the tyrosine kinase binding (TKB), linker, RING, proline-rich (P-rich), and ubiquitin-associated/leucine zipper (UBA/LZ) domains. (Bottom panel) ClustalW alignment of the entire linker and RING domains plus part of the distal sequence. The RING domain is shaded in gray with the defining C and H residues shaded pale blue. Residues affected by missense mutations found in this study are indicated by ▼. CBL mutations are acquired and rarely seen in conjunction with other known mutations  For 2 cases (UPN 5 and UPN 14) we were able to compare the mutational status of leukocytes and T cells or buccal epithelia cells. In both cases the L380P mutation was only present in leukocytes and was therefore acquired (Figure 4A). A third case (UPN 15) originally presented with V617F JAK2 negative ET in 1989 but progressed to MF in 2004. Analysis of DNA extracted from sequential bone marrow slides indicated that the R420Q mutation was absent at the ET phase but acquired on transformation (Figure 4B). The 3 CBL-positive MF cases tested negative for MPL 515 mutations and all CBL mutation positive cases were negative for cytogenetic indicators of tyrosine kinase fusions, FLT3 ITD, activating NRAS mutations and V617F JAK2, with the exception of 1 case (UPN 14) with MF who tested positive for both L380P CBL and V617F JAK2. Analysis of retrospective bone marrow slides for this case indicated the presence of V617F JAK2 at low level initially but absence of L380P CBL. The CBL mutation was detectable 7 years later and completely displaced V617F after a further 3 years, corresponding with a significant rise is peripheral leukocyte counts (Figure 4C). A further case (UPN 21) presented with systemic mastocytosis before evolving to CBL mutation-positive CMML but retrospective samples were unavailable.  Figure 4 Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 4 Acquisition of CBL mutations. (A) Comparison of granulocytes (gran) with buccal epithelial cells (bucc) or T cells (T) demonstrates that the L380P mutations in cases UPN 5 and 14 are acquired. (B) Sequential leukocyte and platelet counts for case, who presented in 1989 with essential thrombocythemia (ET) but progressed to myelofibrosis (MF) in 2004. Homozygous CBL R420Q, indicated by *, was detected on transformation but was undetectable in previous specimens. (C) Clinical course of case UPN 14, who presented with MF in 1998 but experienced elevated leukocyte counts in 2005, concomitant with the appearance of the CBL L380P mutation. The JAK2 V617F mutation, which had been present at low level since diagnosis, was still detectable when CBL L380P first appeared but was undetectable in the 2008 sample, when the CBL mutated clone predominated (* on sequence trace). (D) RT-PCR analysis. All cases and controls show the expected product from CBL exons 7-10. Cases UPN 18 and UPN 20 show smaller bands that result from complete deletion of exon 8. Splicing abnormalities  RNA was available for 3 of the 5 cases with potential splicing mutations. Patients UPN 18 and UPN 20 both exhibited double bands by RT-PCR, sequencing of which showed one to be the normal product and the smaller band to result from the complete deletion of exon 8 in each case (Figure 4D), similar to that described in the cell line MOLM-13.23 Patient UPN 19 showed a single band by RT-PCR that was entirely normal on sequence analysis indicating that the exon 8+4 C>T change does not alter splicing. It seems likely, therefore, that the variant identified in case UPN 6 is also of no consequence. The pathogenicity of the intronic variant seen in case UPN 13 remains unknown.  The association between CBL mutations and UPD  To examine the association between CBL mutations and aUPD in more detail we performed microsatellite analysis on all mutated cases using 9 polymorphic markers spanning chromosome 11q13-qter. Of the 26 cases, 11 displayed patterns that indicated significant tracts of homozygosity, including all 3 with 11q aUPD detected by SNP arrays. Case UPN 9 with 2 mutations was heterozygous for all markers. Of the 11 cases with biallelic CBL mutations as judged by sequence analysis, 5 showed complete homozygosity at all microsatellite loci tested and 6 had at least 4 consecutive homozygous calls encompassing the location of the CBL gene at 11q23.3 (Figure 5). We performed multiplex ligation probe amplification (MLPA) analysis to determine whether the observed homozygosity was a consequence of a deletion but no copy number changes were detected (data not shown) and therefore it is likely that homozygosity arose by aUPD. The number of mutated alleles estimated by sequencing was concordant with the microsatellite analysis in 20 cases (Figure 5). Of those that were discordant, UPN 6 and UPN 25 had significant tracts of 11q homozygosity but had a monoallelic CBL mutation whereas UPN 10 and UPN 16 did not show 11q homozygosity but had clear biallelic CBL mutations. The reason for these discrepant cases is unclear, but it is possible that the aUPD seen in UPN 6 and UPN 25 targeted another gene at 11q before acquisition of the CBL mutation. Homozygosity for the CBL mutations in the absence of 11q aUPD in UPN 10 and UPN 16 might be explained by a subcytogenetic deletion of 1 allele.  Figure 5 Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 5 Microsatellite analysis of CBL mutation positive cases. The number of CBL mutated alleles (1 monoallelic; 2 biallelic) was estimated by sequence analysis as described in “Experimental procedures.” Microsatellites were scored as homozygous (Embedded Image) or heterozygous (□) for each case and their positions on chromosome 11q are indicated. Correlation between CBL mutations and clinical features  We compared clinical and hematologic features in patients with or without CBL mutations, restricting the analysis to cases with aCML, MF and CMML because these were the subgroups in which CBL mutations were most commonly found. Patients with CBL mutations had a shorter overall survival and progression-free survival compared with mutation negative cases (overall survival: 33 months vs 39 months; progression-free survival: 22 months vs 32 months) but the differences were not significant (Figure 6). Similarly there was no significant difference in gender distribution, age and standard hematologic parameters between mutation positive and mutation negative cases and no differences emerged when individual disease entities were considered.  Figure 6 Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 6 Clinical significance of CBL mutations. Overall survival (A) and progression-free survival (B) for atypical chronic myeloid leukemia (aCML), chronic myelomonocytic leukemia (CMML), and MF cases with (n = 19) or without (n = 87) CBL mutations. The differences between mutation positive and negative cases was not significant as determined by Kaplan-Meier analysis. Transforming activities of CBL mutants  We determined whether selected CBL variants had oncogenic activity by testing whether they could transform the interleukin-3 (IL-3)–dependent cell line 32D to growth factor independence in conjunction with overexpression of wild-type FLT3, as has been described previously for R420Q.15 We found that S376F, H398Y, P417A, and R420Q alone each conferred a degree of growth factor independence to 32D cells, but this effect was considerably enhanced in 32Ds that overexpressed wild-type FLT3. In contrast, wild-type CBL conferred no growth advantage either with or without FLT3 overexpression. The N454D change was not transforming, indicating that it is probably a rare polymorphism or a pathogenetically unimportant passenger mutation (Figure 7). Reproducible differences in survival between the different mutants were seen, as illustrated in Figure 8A.  Figure 7 Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 7 Transforming activity of CBL mutants. 32D cells or 32Ds overexpressing wild-type FLT3 were transfected with wild-type or mutant CBL constructs and assayed for IL-3 independent growth over 3 days. Results shown are the mean of at least 3 independent experiments, each of which were performed in triplicate. The y-axis shows proliferation in arbitrary units as determined by MTS assay (Promega) and the x-axis time in days. Figure 8 Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 8 Survival and abrogation of E3 ubiquitin ligase activity. (A) Relative survival/proliferation of 32D cells expressing wild-type or mutant CBL constructs 48 hours after growth factor withdrawal as determined by MTS assay. (B) 32D cells expressing wild-type FLT3 and CBL constructs as indicated were transfected with HA-tagged ubiquitin and stimulated with FLT3 ligand. After lysis, FLT3 was immunoprecipitated, blotted, and probed with anti-HA. Total blots for FLT3 AND CBL are also shown. Abrogation of E3 ubiquitin ligase activity  It has been shown that FLT3 physically associates with CBL and that, upon ligand stimulation, FLT3 is rapidly ubiquitinylated by wild-type but not R420Q CBL.15 We found that transforming activity correlated directly with the ubiquitin ligase activity of the CBL variants, as assayed by their ability to transfer HA-tagged ubiquitin to FLT3 after stimulation with FLT3 ligand. The S376F, H398Y, P417A and R420Q mutants showed loss of ubiquitin ligase activity, whereas N454D was comparable to wild-type CBL (Figure 8B).  Discussion  The initial aim of our study was to identify large regions of aUPD and therefore we undertook a relatively low resolution genome scan using 50k SNP arrays. Because we did not have constitutional DNA available from most of our cases, we were not able to unambiguously determine whether the extended blocks of homozygosity that we observed were a consequence of aUPD, constitutional UPD or autozygosity due to consaguinity, however we used a very conservative definition of candidate aUPD regions (at least 20 Mb homozygous SNPs calls running to a telomere) and therefore expected that most or all would be acquired. We found that aUPD was relatively common in aCML, but was uncommon in other MPNs that were negative for known mutations, plus also CML blast crisis and CLL. Six distinct regions of aUPD were identified in aCML, indicating substantial genetic heterogeneity in the genesis of this disorder. However, we identified 2 recurrent regions of aUPD at 7q and 11q that were each seen in 10% of cases indicating the presence of common molecular abnormalities.  Our mutation screening focused primarily on tyrosine kinases and associated signal transduction components because of the known association between deregulated tyrosine kinase signaling and MPNs.3 Although we failed thus far to identify any abnormality on chromosome 7q, we found missense CBL mutations in all three 11q aUPD cases. Screening of further MPNs revealed a total of 27 CBL variants in 26 patients who had been diagnosed with aCML (n = 12; 8%), MF (n = 3, 6%), CMML (n = 10, 13%), or HES/CEL (n = 1, 1%); that is, morphologically and clinically related diseases that generally exhibit a poor prognosis. We were unable to discern, however, any specific clinical or prognostic features specifically associated with CBL mutated cases.  Casitas B-lineage lymphoma (CBL) is a well characterized protein that plays both positive and negative regulatory roles in tyrosine kinase signaling. In its positive role, CBL binds to activated receptor tyrosine kinases via its N-terminal tyrosine kinase binding (TKB) domain and serves as an adaptor by recruiting downstream signal transduction components such as SHP2 and P13K. However the RING domain of CBL has E3 ligase activity and ubiquitinylates activated receptor tyrosine kinases on lysine residues, a signal that triggers internalization of the receptor/ligand complex and subsequent recycling or degradation.21,24,25 CBL was originally identified after the characterization of v-Cbl, the transforming component of the Cas NS-1 retrovirus, and thus its association with neoplasia is well established26; however, it is only very recently that CBL mutations were first identified in a human malignancy, specifically occasional cases of AML.15,23,27 We have found that CBL mutations are much more common in MPNs, and previous reports of 11q aUPD in MDS28 suggest that CBL mutations will also prove to be common in this disease. Indeed, 7 of 12 MDS cases with aUPD at 11q were recently shown to harbor CBL mutations.29 There are 2 other human CBL family members, CBLB and CBLC, but we did not identify aUPD in the regions containing these genes and did not detect any mutations of the linker/RING domain of CBLB.  We identified a total of 15 different CBL missense mutations affecting 12 residues (Table 2; Figure 3). Mutations of some of these residues (eg, Y371, C381, H398 and W408) have been analyzed previously in a study that concluded that loss of E3 ubiquitin ligase activity and concomitant impairment of EGFR internalization by RING finger mutations was insufficient for oncogenicity, as assayed in NIH3T3 cells. However mutations of key residues within the α-helix of the linker region abolished ubiquitin ligase activity and were transforming.30 Although the precise amino acid substitutions we identified were different from those studied, we found that mutations in both the RING finger and linker regions conferred autonomous growth to 32D/wt-FLT3 cells, consistent with a causal relationship to the MPN phenotype. The fact that one mutation (N454D) was not transforming emphasizes the importance of functional analysis to distinguish driver mutations from irrelevant passengers or infrequent polymorphisms.31 Notably, this mutation was only weakly conserved between species, in contrast to all other missense mutations that affected highly conserved residues and are therefore likely to be functionally significant.  Enhanced autonomous growth in the presence of CBL mutations and overexpression of wild-type FLT3 may simply reflect the paucity of receptor tyrosine kinase gene expression in 32D cells or, alternatively, may indicate that the mutants are only weakly transforming and require the cooperation of other events to give rise to clinically manifest disease. Consistent with the latter hypothesis, we identified 2 cases in which CBL mutations were acquired during progression of a preexisting MPN (Figure 4). In both cases the identity of the cooperating change is unknown: although one presented with a (relatively low level) V617F JAK2 mutation, this disappeared on progression to CBL L380P positive disease, indicating that the 2 mutations must have arisen independently in different clones. This is reminiscent of the observation that the leukemic blasts of approximately half of V617F positive MPNs that evolve to AML are negative for the JAK2 mutation.32,33 It remains to be established, however, if CBL mutations are usually secondary events or whether the 2 cases we identified are exceptional.  Further evidence for the requirement for additional cooperating genetic events comes from published mouse studies in which neither complete CBL knockout nor heterozygous knockin of the RING finger inactivating mutant C379A (mouse C379 is equivalent to human C381) resulted in evidence of an MPN or other malignancy.34,35 However, closer analysis revealed subtle hemopoietic perturbations that clearly relate to the pathogenesis of MPNs. Specifically, hemopoietic stem cells (HSCs) from these animals were increased in number, hyperresponsive to thrombopoietin and more potent than wild-type HSCs in repopulating the hemopoietic system. These effects were associated with increased STAT5 accumulation and phosphorylation.34,35 Hyperresponsiveness to growth factors and stem cell involvement are 2 of the cardinal features of MPNs. Furthermore, the association between STAT5 activation and MPNs is well documented.36,37 While it is possible that overt hematologic disease might have been induced by a homozygous knockin mutant, these findings suggest that CBL mutations may not be solely responsible for a full MPN phenotype.  The nature of any cooperating abnormalities remains largely obscure. Our results show that overexpression of a tyrosine kinase can cooperate with CBL mutants to promote transformation, however we failed to identify any kinase that was consistently overexpressed in mutation positive cases by tyrosine kinase expression profiling (data not shown). One CBL mutation positive case, however, also tested positive for 7q UPD by SNP array, suggesting that these 2 abnormalities may complement each other. A CBL mutation resulting in skipping of exon 8 has also been identified in a murine model of NUP98-HOXD13 on progression from MDS to AML,38 further corroborating the theory that acute leukemia arises from complementary mutations, one of which inhibits differentiation, and a second (in this case CBL) that enhances proliferation or inhibits apoptosis.  The fact that many CBL mutations are associated with aUPD strongly suggests that clones with homozygous mutations have a selective advantage over those that are heterozygous. This contrasts with the prevailing view that transforming CBL RING finger and linker region mutants act in a dominant negative fashion. Although it is conceivable that another, unknown locus on 11q is the target of aUPD, the finding of 1 case with a Y371H mutation and a stop codon on opposite alleles strongly suggests that homozygous CBL mutations do indeed confer a direct selective advantage. Because we did not screen the entire gene for mutations, it is possible that other cases with heterozygous mutations may also be functionally homozygous due to premature stop codons on the other allele. Alternatively, heterozygosity in these cases may only be apparent due to variable proportions of background normal cells that are not part of the malignant clone. Although the nontransforming N454D mutant was heterozygous, 2 cases with heterozygous R420Q were observed and thus absence of homozygosity cannot be used to infer the presence of an irrelevant, nontransforming sequence variant.  In summary, we have found that oncogenic CBL mutations are acquired in a subset of hematologically related, poor prognosis MPNs. Our findings further strengthen the notion that MPNs are primarily “tyrosine kinopathies,” that is, diseases caused by aberrant activation of proliferation and survival pathways as a consequence of mutations that either directly or indirectly promote excess tyrosine kinase signaling. In view of the fact that tyrosine kinases are such good drug targets, the possibility that CBL-mutated cases might be amenable to therapeutic inhibition is clearly attractive.  
196||A feature of many gliomas is the amplification of the epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR), resulting in its overexpression. Missense mutations or deletions within the extracellular domain are associated with this amplification and can lead to constitutive activation of the receptor, with the Domain I/II deletion, EGFRvIII, being the most common. These changes have also been associated with increased sensitivity to EGFR inhibition using small molecule inhibitors. We have expressed, in human glioma cells, EGFR containing four glioma-specific EGFR missense mutations within Domain IV (C620Y, C624F, C628Y and C636Y) to analyze their biological properties and sensitivity to EGFR inhibition. One of these mutants, C620Y, exhibited an enhanced basal phosphorylation, which was partially dependent on an EGFR-ligand autocrine loop. All Domain IV mutants responded equally as well as wildtype EGFR (wtEGFR) to ligand stimulation. Biochemical analysis revealed that a pre-formed, disulfide-bonded dimer associated with these mutations was underglycosylated, inactive and cytoplasmically retained. Ligand stimulation resulted in the formation of a tyrosine-phosphorylated, disulfide-bonded dimer for all Domain IV mutants but not for wtEGFR. Following treatment with the next-generation, irreversible pan-ErbB inhibitor dacomitinib, the C620Y, C624F and EGFRvIII mutants were inactivated, covalently dimerized and were retained in the cytoplasm, resulting in cell-surface receptor loss and, for C620Y and C624F, decreased binding of EGF. Dacomitinib treatment significantly reduced the in vivo growth of human glioma xenografts bearing C620Y, but not wtEGFR. Collectively, these data indicate that the unique biochemical traits of Domain IV EGFR cysteine mutants can be exploited for enhanced sensitivity to EGFR small molecule inhibitors, with potential clinical applications.  Top of page Introduction High-grade glioblastoma multiforme (GBM or glioma) is a malignant, lethal neoplasm of the brain that is currently incurable. Glioma is classified into six distinct subtypes on the basis of genotypic and phenotypic profiling, with each subtype possessing distinct molecular hallmarks.1 For classical glioma, that hallmark is epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR) amplification, which leads to overexpression of the receptor. Mutations or deletions that lead to autoactivation of the receptor can also occur. The best characterized of these is EGFRvIII, a basally-phosphorylated, cysteine-bonded dimeric mutant2 that arises as a result of the deletion of amino acids 6–273, leading to the removal of most of Domains I and II. EGFRvIII displays a low level of basal phosphorylation through the recapitulation of the central premise of EGFR activation: formation of a dimeric receptor, leading to an asymmetric association of the two tyrosine kinase (TK) domains and, subsequently, reciprocal activation.3  Missense mutations can also arise in EGFR in glioma and most of these are present in the extracellular domain (ECD), unlike non-small-cell lung cancers in which EGFR missense mutations are more commonly found in the TK domain.4,5 Many of the missense mutants found in glioma, especially those found in Domain IV of the receptor, have not been studied in detail. Domain IV contains sequences that facilitate the molecular tether with Domain II, which holds EGFR in the inactive conformation,6,7 and is thought to be important for inducing the conformational shift that is required after ligand binding to align the TK domains for proper receptor activation.8  Sequencing of EGFR in a large cohort of patient glioma samples has identified over 30 different missense mutations within the ECD, including C620Y, C620W, C624F, C628Y and C636Y, which are present in Domain IV.9, 10, 11, 12 These Domain IV mutations result in at least one of the two highly conserved, paired cysteines being substituted by an amino acid with a bulky aromatic side chain. This then leaves a corresponding unpaired cysteine that might be available to form an intermolecular-disulfide bond, thereby inducing receptor dimerization and possibly receptor activation, similar to the case of EGFRvIII. This phenomenon has been observed for other constitutively active ECD mutants of full-length receptor TKs, including C342X in fibroblast growth factor receptor-2,13,14 R129C in the erythropoietin receptor15,16 and C634R in the c-RET MEN-2 A mutant.17  To understand the biological impact of glioma-specific Domain IV mutations, we mutated wildtype EGFR (wtEGFR) to recreate the missense mutations C620Y, C624F, C628Y and C636Y and expressed these receptors in the U87MG human glioma cell line. We then assessed basal phosphorylation, cell-surface expression, dimerization and response to EGFR inhibition to investigate whether these mutants possessed different properties from wtEGFR in glioma.  Top of page Results Glioma-specific Domain IV EGFR mutants C620Y, C624F and C628Y display ligand-dependent basal phosphorylation and are equipotent to wtEGFR in response to ligand To assess the biological characteristics of EGFR cysteine mutants, U87MG-based cell lines expressing the EGFR mutants were generated by retroviral infection. Cell-surface analysis of EGFR expression with mAb528, which binds Domain III, showed that wtEGFR, EGFRvIII, C620Y and C624F were expressed at very high levels, with C628Y showing high expression (Figure 1a). Conversely, C636Y expression was quite poor. Hence, most of our investigation focussed on the two most highly expressed mutants, C620Y and C624F. To quantify basal-tyrosine phosphorylation, we tested cells treated with vehicle or the reversible EGFR/ErbB2 TK inhibitor (TKI), lapatinib, using a solid-phase, sandwich immunoassay employing europium-labeled pY (Eu-pY) antibody (Figure 1b). We show that the C620Y registered a high-basal Eu-pY signal, which was several fold higher than the wtEGFR (Figure 1b), despite the C620Y expressing less cell-surface receptor (Figure 1a). The EGFRvIII, as expected, displayed enhanced phosphorylation. Correlating the Eu-pY signals against cell-surface receptor levels revealed that the basal level of phosphorylation of C620Y was approximately fivefold higher than that of wtEGFR and approximately equal to that of EGFRvIII. Moreover, C624F and C628Y appeared to have basal phosphorylation readings similar to the wtEGFR when levels were corrected for cell-surface receptor abundance. All basal Eu-pY signals were significantly reduced by treatment with lapatinib as expected. To determine whether this basal phosphorylation was ligand independent, we also treated cells with the high-affinity ligand trap, EGFR-501-Fc18, which binds and neutralizes the biological action of EGF, transforming growth factor alpha (TGF-α), heparin-bound EGF and betacellulin. A large reduction in the basal Eu-pY signal was observed for wtEGFR, EGFRvIII and C620Y (Figure 1b), indicating that the basal phosphorylation of these receptors was induced, in part, by an EGFR-autocrine ligand. A more modest reduction in basal Eu-pY signal was observed for the C624F and C628Y mutants, perhaps not surprising given the low basal phosphorylation recorded. All four mutants responded to a range of EGF concentrations in a manner indistinguishable from the wtEGFR receptor, suggesting that these mutations did not affect the ability of the receptor to respond to ligand (Figure 1c). Further testing of C620Y activation in response to several concentrations of TGF-α, heparin-bound EGF or betacellulin showed that this mutant also responded equally well as wtEGFR (Figure 1c). There was no marked difference in the relative levels of cellular proliferation between any of the cell lines, including the parental U87MG cell line, when grown over 96 h under 2% dialyzed serum conditions (Supplementary Figure 1A). Expression of the Domain IV mutant receptors did not induce differential basal, or EGF-induced, phospho extracellular signal-regulated kinase 1/2 or p-Akt signaling compared with parental, wtEGFR and EGFRvIII controls (Supplementary Figure 1B). Figure 1. Figure 1 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author Biochemical characterization of Domain IV mutants. (a) Representative flow cytometry histograms for cell-surface EGFR expression, as determined by mAb528 binding after viral transduction of U87MG cells with vectors expressing the indicated mutants and subsequent drug selection. No cell sorting was conducted on the Domain IV mutant cell lines. (b) Eu-pY assay for sensitive detection of basal phosphorylation. Each cell line was serum-starved in the presence of vehicle, 1 μm lapatinib or 40 μg/ml EGFR 501-Fc ligand trap overnight before the assay was conducted. Data is presented as the mean time-resolved fluorescence (TRF) obtained for each test group over quadruple-technical replicates±standard error (s.e.). Experiments were repeated three times. (c) Eu-pY assay for determination of global phosphotyrosine status of receptor in response to titration of ligand. Each cell line was serum-starved and treated with titrated concentrations of EGF (first graph), TGF-α (second graph), heparin-bound EGF (third graph) or betacellulin (fourth graph). Basal phosphorylation TRF reads were subtracted from all readings and then readings graphed as a percentage TRF obtained for each ligand concentration compared with the maximum stimulus obtained at 10 or 30 nm±s.e. Experiments were repeated three times.  Full figure and legend (115K)  Ligand stimulation is required for cell-surface dimerization of Domain IV mutants To assess the impact of the Domain IV mutations on ligand-stimulated EGFR dimerization and activation, we first treated cells with EGF and then lyzed the cells in the presence of iodoacetamide to protect any intermolecular-disulfide bonds.2 Nonreducing western blot analyzes for total EGFR (Figures 2a and b, top left panels) showed that pre-formed, covalently-linked dimers were readily detected in vehicle-treated cell lysates from all four Domain IV mutants, as well as EGFRvIII, together with a population, which migrated as a monomeric species. The dimers disappeared under reducing conditions, indicating they were disulfide bonded (Figures 2a and b, top right panels). By contrast, only a minor population of pre-formed disulfide-bonded receptor dimer was found in lysates from cells expressing wtEGFR. In the absence of ligand-induced activation, only a small amount of pre-formed disulfide-bonded dimer for C620Y bound a phosphospecific antibody recognizing pY1173 of EGFR (Figures 2a and b, middle left panels). EGFRvIII, as previously reported, possessed a constitutively active disulfide-bonded dimer.2 While an elevated basal level of tyrosine phosphorylation was detected for C620Y using an Eu-pY antibody (Figure 1b), this was not evident when cell lysates were probed under reducing conditions with the pY1173 site-specific antibody (Figure 2b, middle right panel). Figure 2. Figure 2 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author Ligand-induced covalent dimerization of Domain IV EGFR mutants. (a–c) Nonreducing and reducing western blot analyzes for total EGFR (top panels) and pY1173 EGFR (middle panels). Overlays of the EGFR (red) and pY1173 (green) signal are shown to determine the active species (bottom panels). Dimeric (D) and monomeric (M) species for both wtEGFR, mutant EGFR and EGFRvIII are depicted by arrows. (a) The control cell line (U87MG) and cell lines expressing wtEGFR and EGFRvIII, treated with vehicle or EGF. (b) Cell lines expressing the Domain IV mutants C620Y, C624F, C628Y and C636Y, treated with vehicle or EGF. (c) Nonreducing western blot analyzes for total EGFR (top panels) and pY1173 EGFR (middle panels) in cell lines expressing wtEGFR, C620Y and C624F treated with the indicated ligands. In all figures, a pan-actin loading control is included.  Full figure and legend (154K)  Upon EGF stimulation, robust induction of wtEGFR phosphorylation was observed, the majority of signal being associated with the monomeric species that is detected under both reducing and nonreducing conditions (Figure 2a, top and middle panels). There was a small amount of phosphorylated, disulfide-bonded dimer detectable. EGFRvIII, as expected, did not respond to EGF stimulation. All Domain IV mutants formed a higher molecular weight, active-dimeric species after EGF stimulation, with a concurrent reduction in the amount of monomeric species detectable (Figure 2b). This ligand-induced dimer migrated slower than the constitutively formed, nonphosphorylated dimeric species in the total EGFR blots (Figure 2b, top left panel) and was the main active species observed after EGF stimulation (Figure 2b, middle left panel). The newly formed ligand-induced dimer disappeared under reducing conditions, indicating it was disulfide bonded. (Figure 2b, top right and middle right panels). In contrast to wtEGFR, there was little if any ligand-activated, phosphorylated receptor migrating as a monomeric species under nonreducing conditions for the Domain IV mutant receptors (Figures 2a and b, middle left panels).  To determine whether other EGFR ligands could induce the active, disulfide-bonded dimer in cells expressing the Domain IV mutants, we treated cells with vehicle, EGF, TGF-α, heparin-bound EGF, betacellulin and amphiregulin. Nonreducing western blot analyzes for total EGFR (Figure 2c, top panels) and pY1173 EGFR (Figure 2c, middle panels) showed that all ligands except amphiregulin were able to robustly induce the disulfide-bonded active dimer in C620Y and C624F, with amphiregulin inducing a very weak response. Again, this dimer represented the major tyrosine-phosphorylated receptor recognized by anti-pY1173, with only a small amount of phosphorylated receptor migrating as a monomeric species. wtEGFR was highly phosphorylated in response to all ligands except amphiregulin, which was weaker. The predominantly phosphorylated receptor isoform migrated as a monomeric species under nonreducing conditions.  A mature N-glycosylated, noncovalently bound form of the Domain IV mutant receptor is the ligand-responsive species present on the cell surface To determine which of the dimeric EGFR isoforms associated with the Domain IV mutations were present on the cell surface, we induced the active-EGFR dimer by stimulation with ligand at 4 °C to prevent internalization and then biotinylated the surface of the cells after washing them with iodoacetamide to protect the dimeric species. Under basal conditions, it is clear that the pre-formed, nonphosphorylated disulfide-bonded dimer detected in lysates from cell lines expressing C620Y and C624F is not found on the cell surface, as it was not biotinylated and bound by streptavidin beads (Figure 3a, top panel). However, using sensitive biotinylation–streptavidin detection allowed us to detect a cell-surface dimeric species for C620Y. This species most likely corresponds to the constitutively active form as a faint pY1173 signal, which migrates at identical size to this band was also detected (Figure 3a, bottom panel). The majority of biotinylated receptor was detected as a monomeric species, indicating that this predominated on the cell surface. When EGF was added, a distinct dimeric species appears along with a reduction in the amount of monomeric cell-surface species for C620Y and C624F but not for wtEGFR (Figure 3a). As the experiment was conducted at 4 °C, the monomeric species is not being lost owing to ligand-induced receptor internalization. The reverse experiment, consisting of EGFR immunoprecipitation followed by streptavidin western blotting for biotinylated cell-surface EGFR, demonstrated the same trend of monomer-to-dimer conversion by ligand (Figure 3b). Figure 3. Figure 3 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author Analysis of cell-surface species present on Domain IV mutant cell lines. (a) Cells expressing wtEGFR, C620Y or C624F were treated at 4 °C with vehicle or EGF and the cell surface subsequently biotinylated. Streptavidin immunoprecipitations were performed after which western blot analyzes were performed for total EGFR (top panel) or pY1173 EGFR (middle panel), with overlays of the total EGFR (red) and pY1173 (green) signal shown to determine the active species (bottom panel). Dimeric (D) and monomeric (M) species are depicted by arrows. (b) Reciprocal experiments involving cell-surface biotinylation followed by EGFR immunoprecipitation and then western blot analyzes for streptavidin binding, indicating the total EGFR cell-surface species present. Dimeric (D) and monomeric (M) species are depicted by arrows. (c) wtEGFR, C620Y and C624F cell lines were cultured with or without 2 μg/ml of swainsonine overnight before cell lysis and western blot analyzes for total EGFR using an ECD- (top panel) or C-terminal domain-specific antibodies (middle panel). Dimeric (D) and monomeric (M) species are depicted by arrows. A pan-actin control was included for loading (bottom panel).  Full figure and legend (690K)  The Domain IV mutants displayed a biochemical profile similar to EGFRvIII in that two monomeric bands are present; for EGFRvIII, these represent the mature N-glycosylated isoform (upper band), which is the majority species on the cell surface19 and the high-mannose isoform (lower band), little of which reaches the cell surface.20 To see if this was the case for the C620Y and C624F mutants, we treated cells overnight with swainsonine, which inhibits mature processing of N-linked glycans and locks them into a high-mannose state. Nonreducing western blotting analyzes on cell lysates were then conducted for total EGFR (Figure 3c). Treatment of the mutant EGFR with swainsonine resulted in the disappearance of the fully N-glycosylated cell-surface monomeric species and an increase in the underglycosylated-monomeric species, which is not found on the cell surface. No change in the size or abundance of the pre-formed disulfide-bonded dimer was observed.  Dacomitinib induces covalent dimerization of free-cysteine-mutant receptors, resulting in cytoplasmic retention and decreased binding of ligand Previous studies have established that the reversible EGFR TKI, gefitinib, can induce noncovalent dimerization of wtEGFR.21 As the chemical structure of dacomitinib, a next-generation, irreversible TKI targeting EGFR, ErbB2 and ErbB4, very closely resembles that of gefitinib, we assessed whether dacomitinib could induce irreversible covalent dimerization of C620Y, C624F and EGFRvIII. Treatment of wtEGFR, C620Y, C624F and EGFRvIII cells with either gefitinib or dacomitinib for 24 h resulted in an increase in the formation of disulfide-bonded dimer that was of a similar molecular size to the underglycosylated, pre-formed disulfide-bonded dimer in the vehicle controls (Figure 4a, top panels). This dimer appeared to be formed from both the underglycosylated- and mature-N-glycosylated monomeric species as the abundance of these decreased upon appearance of the dimer in dacomitinib- and gefitinib-treated cells. Dacomitinib appeared to be the most effective at inducing formation of the dimer. The newly formed dimer was not active as it was not bound by pY1173 antibody and was of a lower molecular size than the phosphorylated-disulfide-bonded dimer formed in the EGF-alone controls (Figure 4a). In agreement with previous reports, lapatinib alone did not induce dimerization of any receptor at any time.21 No covalently-linked dimer was found in cells expressing the wtEGFR following inhibitor or EGF treatment. Figure 4. Figure 4 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author Dacomitinib-induced cytoplasmic retention of receptor and loss of ligand binding. (a) Cells expressing wtEGFR, C620Y, C624F or EGFRvIII were treated overnight with vehicle or 1 μm of gefitinib, dacomitinib or lapatinib. The EGF-alone control tests were stimulated the next day and cell lysates probed by nonreducing western blot analyzes for total EGFR (top panels) or pY1173 EGFR (middle panels). An overlay of the total EGFR (red) and pY1173 (green) signal are shown to determine the active species (bottom panels). Dimeric (D) and monomeric (M) species are depicted by arrows. (b) Representative images for cell-surface EGFR immunofluorescence conducted following overnight treatment of cells expressing wtEGFR, C620Y, EGFRvIII or C16S with vehicle (top panels) or 1 μm dacomitinib (bottom panels). Blue, nucleus; green, EGFR. Scale bar, 20 μm. (c) Cell-surface flow cytometry for EGFR status, as determined by panitumumab binding. Cells were treated overnight with vehicle or 1 μm dacomitinib, harvested and fixed before staining with isotype-control antibody or panitumumab. red, isotype staining; blue, panitumumab staining in vehicle-treated cells; green, panitumumab staining in dacomitinib-treated cells. (d) eu-egf binding to cells after overnight treatment with vehicle or 1 μm dacomitinib. trf readings were obtained for quadruple-technical replicates and graphed as a mean percentage of the vehicle in each cell line±s.e. * represents significant differences compared with the respective vehicle control. experiments were repeated three times.  Full figure and legend (986K)  As the majority of the dimer induced by the dacomitinib treatment was of a similar molecular size and appearance to the cytoplasmically retained dimer that is basally expressed by these cells, it was possible that dacomitinib was inducing the formation of an underglycosylated, intracellular form of the receptor and trapping the majority of the receptor pool internally. To test this possibility, we treated wtEGFR, C620Y and EGFRvIII cells with dacomitinib for 24 h followed by cell-surface immunofluorescence for EGFR using mAb528 (Figure 4b). Dacomitinib treatment dramatically decreased the amount of cell-surface receptor in C620Y and EGFRvIII cells, as indicated by a uniform loss of fluorescent signal. The remaining receptor was redistributed to form punctate clusters of signal, which were more numerous in the EGFRvIII cell line. The wtEGFR did not demonstrate a marked loss of fluorescent signal or redistribution of receptor, confirming that the free cysteine was required for the effect. To confirm that this phenomenon was also specific for disulfide-bonded mutant EGFRvIII, we utilized the C16S EGFRvIII variant, which has the free cysteine at position 16 mutated to serine, hence locking EGFRvIII into a monomeric state.2 In agreement with our other observations, C16S showed no discernible decrease in fluorescent signal or redistribution of receptor, similar to the wtEGFR.  The loss of receptor as well as the redistribution of the remaining EGFR pool after dacomitinib treatment of free-cysteine mutant receptors may lead to decreased binding of anti-EGFR therapeutic antibodies, which are now being used in combination with EGFR TKI.22 To quantify the degree of receptor loss, we analyzed dacomitinib-treated cell lines by flow cytometry using the EGFR-specific human antibody, panitumumab (Figure 4c). U87MG parental cells contained a basal amount of endogenous wtEGFR, which was bound by panitumumab; this binding was unaffected by dacomitinib treatment. As expected, wtEGFR and C16S cell lines exhibited high levels of EGFR, which were slightly (10–15%) decreased by dacomitinib treatment. In contrast, binding profiles for C620Y and C624F showed a severe 68–81% reduction in cell-surface receptor after dacomitinib treatment. EGFRvIII also showed a marked 62% reduction in cell-surface receptor after dacomitinib treatment.  If dacomitinib was causing both the loss of cell-surface EGFR and the intracellular retention of the receptor, this would most likely lead to a decrease in cell-surface ligand binding. Treating mutant EGFR-expressing cells for 24 h with dacomitinib, followed by cell fixation and incubation with europium-labeled EGF (Eu-EGF) resulted in a significant 60% decrease in the binding of Eu-EGF in comparison with vehicle controls, for C620Y-expressing cells (P<0.0001) and C624F-expressing cells (P=0.0004) (Figure 4d). The wtEGFR cell line showed no significant decrease in Eu-EGF binding in comparison with vehicle controls (P=0.9556). As expected, EGFRvIII cells did not show any increase in Eu-EGF binding over U87MG parental cells, confirming the lack of ability to bind EGF (Supplementary Figure 2).  The C620Y mutant is tumorigenic and highly sensitive to low dose dacomitinib therapy in vivo Drug-induced downregulation of cell-surface EGFR in glioma cells bearing Domain IV or EGFRvIII mutants indicates that these cells may respond better to dacomitinib therapy than wtEGFR-bearing cells. To explore this possibility further, wtEGFR, C620Y, C624F and EGFRvIII cells were seeded in anchorage-independent colony formation assays and supplemented with vehicle or dacomitinib for 3 weeks (Figure 5a). The cell lines expressing the mutant C620Y and C624F EGFR grew better in soft agar than did the wtEGFR control, suggesting that these mutations may bestow an oncogenic advantage. As previously documented, there was no difference between cell lines expressing wtEGFR and EGFRvIII receptors with respect to colony formation.23 Dacomitinib treatment resulted in a qualitative reduction in colony number and size in all cell lines compared with vehicle-treated controls, with no overt difference in the degree of response to the drug. Figure 5. Figure 5 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author Response of subcutaneous xenografts to dacomitinib therapy. (a) Anchorage-independent colony-forming assays for wtEGFR, C620Y, C624F and EGFRvIII cells treated with vehicle (left panels) or 1 μm dacomitinib (right panels) every 4 days over 3 weeks. Colonies are stained blue with crystal violet. (b) Subcutaneous-xenograft tumor growth curves for wtEGFR and C620Y cells treated each day for 7 days with vehicle or 10 mg/kg of dacomitinib. Arrows indicate days of treatment. Data are presented as the mean tumor volume in mm3 obtained for six mice per treatment group±s.e. The * symbol denotes a P<0.0001 level of statistical significance.  Full figure and legend (166K)  To explore the magnitude of the response of selected cell lines to dacomitinib therapy in vivo, we conducted subcutaneous-xenograft trials of vehicle- or dacomitinib-treated nude mice bearing tumors expressing wtEGFR or the basally phosphorylated mutant C620Y (Figure 5b). C620Y-expressing tumors grew slightly slower than expected, with tumors reaching maximal size 5 days later than those expressing wtEGFR. However, when treated with a low daily dose of dacomitinib, tumors bearing the C620Y mutant were exquisitely sensitive to therapy, with a highly significant reduction in tumor size compared with the vehicle controls (P<0.0001). In contrast, wtEGFR-bearing tumors showed a minor, short-lived response to dacomitinib therapy and continued to grow robustly during the treatment period.  Top of page Discussion The clinical impact of point mutations in the TK domain of the EGFR in influencing non-small-cell lung cancers patient outcomes in response to treatment with TKI-targeted therapy is now well-established.24 In glioma, in addition to the EGFRvIII deletion, the majority of mutations found in the EGFR reside in the ECD, with their prevalence much more common than previously thought.25 Characterization of the most common of these ECD mutations, G598V and A289X, revealed that they were associated with increased- basal phosphorylation, tumorigenicity and increased sensitivity to erlotinib.4  We have now extended this characterization to include four ECD mutations—C620Y, C624F, C628Y and C636Y—found in glioma patients. A common feature of these mutations was that they result in an unpaired cysteine within Domain IV of EGFR. All four mutant EGFRs responded to ligand-induced activation in a pattern that was indistinguishable from that of the wild-type receptor; however, all Domain IV mutants formed a disulfide-linked, covalent-receptor dimer upon ligand stimulation, an isoform that was not detected following ligand-induced activation of wtEGFR. Within the limits of sensitivity of the western blots used to detect phosphorylation of tyrosine 1173, the disulfide-linked dimer represented the major-phosphorylated EGFR isoform generated. This mechanism for ligand-induced covalent dimerization was consistent for all four mutants studied here and utilized EGFR derived from the cell-surface pool of monomeric receptors. We term this species 'monomeric' as the band migrated at a molecular size of 170 kDa expected for an EGFR monomer. However, this population could also represent noncovalently-bound, inactive dimer, which has also been found to reside on the cell surface of wtEGFR-expressing cells and dissociates under denaturing conditions.26,27 Regardless, for the Domain IV mutants, the almost complete absence of phosphorylated-monomeric species after ligand stimulation suggests that the majority of receptor is converted to the covalently bound form, not the noncovalently associated dimer observed for wtEGFR. Although there were no overt differences in Akt and Erk signaling induced by the Domain IV mutants when compared to wtEGFR, it would be interesting to determine the effect of these mutants on other signalling pathways, for example, STAT3, and the duration of this signaling in comparison to wtEGFR. In silico structural simulations of the position of Domain IV in pre-formed-, inactive-EGFR dimers suggest that Domain IV of each receptor are positioned at some distance from one another,8 preventing the alignment of the two free-cysteine residues. Engagement of EGFR with ligand is then predicted to move the two Domain IV into close contact,8 facilitating intermolecular-disulfide bond formation. In the wild-type receptor, the cysteines in question adopt a 1–3, 2–4 pattern.28 The ramifications of the removal of a single cysteine on subsequent intrachain disulfide-bond formation are currently unknown. However, complete removal of the C624-C636, but not the C620-C628, cysteine bond has been shown to ablate high-affinity ligand binding, resulting in reduced signal activation,29 an effect that we did not observe in terms of ligand response after substitution of an existing cysteine in C624F and C636Y. Hence, breakage of these highly conserved bonds, while retaining one of the cysteines, appears to have no effect on the response of the receptor to ligand stimulation.  Three of the four mutants exhibited elevated levels of basal-tyrosine phosphorylation, with C620Y having the highest level. In part, this activation was reliant on an EGFR-ligand autocrine loop, as neutralization of these ligands by EGFR 501-Fc18 reduced the activity of these receptors. This finding is in agreement with two recent reports demonstrating that the activity of EGFRvIII is partially dependent on ligand;23,30 we extend these studies and demonstrate that the same mechanism appears to be involved for the C620Y mutant and the wtEGFR when overexpressed. We suspect that the autocrine ligand involved is most likely heparin-bound EGF and/or TGF-α, as these two growth factors are highly upregulated by the expression of EGFRvIII30,31 and are both neutralized by EGFR 501-Fc.18 Our finding that C624F is equally basally phosphorylated to wtEGFR differs from a previous report that studied the mutation and found that basal C624F phosphorylation was elevated compared with wtEGFR.32 We believe that the expression of this mutant EGFR in keratinocytes, a cell line with a markedly different phenotype from glioma, as well as the lack of correction for differences in the receptor levels present, may account for these differences.  The quinazoline-based irreversible pan-ErbB inhibitor, dacomitinib, is being trialed for pharmacokinetic profile and initial efficacy in phase II trials for glioma patients bearing tumors overexpressing wtEGFR and/or EGFRvIII (NCT01520870). Such quinazoline-based EGFR inhibitors have been shown to induce noncovalent dimerization of wtEGFR.21,33, 34, 35 We have demonstrated for the first time that treatment of tumor-associated, free-cysteine-EGFR mutations with dacomitinib resulted in covalent receptor dimerization, followed by a loss of cell-surface receptor for EGFRvIII, C620Y and C624F. In vivo trials confirmed that C620Y-expressing xenografts were far more sensitive to dacomitinib than were wtEGFR-expressing xenografts, validating our in vitro findings that these mutants should be more vulnerable to dacomitinib therapy. Although we are unsure exactly how dacomitinib is able to induce dimerization for these mutant receptors, we presume that asymmetric dimerization of the TK domain of the two receptors, observed for erlotinib- and gefitinib-induced wtEGFR dimerization, also applies here.21 Regardless, the functional consequences of this process were very clear, with a reduction of cell-surface receptor levels resulting in reduced-ligand binding and severely decreased tumorigenicity.  This work demonstrates that, like the sensitizing TK mutations found in non-small-cell lung cancers,24 the distinct biochemical traits of some mutations found in the ECD of EGFR in glioma may be exploited to increase the efficacy of existing therapies. Our in vivo findings suggest that, if the mechanisms described in this report hold for receptor that is endogenously expressed in primary samples (such as gliomaspheres), the Domain IV mutants, and possibly EGFRvIII, may be far more responsive than wtEGFR-bearing tumors to dacomitinib therapy in glioma patients.  
295||Checkpoint kinase 2 (CHEK2, Chk2) emerges as an important signal transducer of cellular responses to DNA damage and a candidate tumor suppressor whose defects contribute to molecular pathogenesis of diverse types of human malignancies, both sporadic and hereditary. Here, we briefly outline the molecular properties, regulation and physiological role of CHEK2, and review in more detail its defects that predispose to tumors, with particular emphasis on familial breast cancer. The frequency, penetrance and epidemiological as well as clinical significance of the two most studied breast cancerpredisposing variants of the CHEK2 gene, 1100delC and I157T, are highlighted in more depth, and additional CHEK2 mutations and their cancer relevance are discussed as well. These recent findings are considered also froma broader perspective of CHEK2 as the integral component of the ataxia telangiectasia-mutatedCHEK2-p53 pathway within the genome integrity maintenance systemand a barrier against tumor progression. Finally, the potential value of information about the CHEK2 status in family counseling and optimizition of individualized cancer treatment is discussed. Oncogene (2006) 25, 5912–5919. doi:10.1038/sj.onc.1209877 Keywords: CHEK2; Chk2; DNA damage checkpoints; breast cancer; familial; cancer susceptibility CHEK2 gene, Chk2 kinase and its physiological role Checkpoint kinase 2 (CHEK2, Chk2), the protein product of the CHEK2 gene that localizes to human chromosome 22q12.1, represents a phylogenetically conserved signaling component within the cellular network that responds to DNA damage and protects genomicintegrity (Bartek et al., 2001). The human gene spans approximately 50 kilobases (kb) of genomic DNA and consists of 14 exons. The CHEK2 protein structure shows three characteristic domains: an N-terminal SQ/TQ cluster domain (amino-acid residues 20–75), a fork head-associated (FHA) domain (residues 112–175), and a serine/threonine kinase domain (residues 225–490). The SQ/TQ cluster is a regulatory domain containing seven serine or threonine residues followed by glutamine (SQ or TQ motifs), putative phosphorylation sites preferred by the ataxia telangiectasia-mutated (ATM) protein kinase that activates CHEK2 in response to ionizing radiation and other genotoxicinsults that elicit DNA double-strand breaks (Bartek et al., 2001; Kastan and Bartek, 2004). The FHA domain is involved in binding to other phosphorylated proteins, particularly through recognition of phosphothreonine residues. This domain participates in dynamic protein– phosphoprotein interactions of CHEK2 during the activation and signaling of DNA damage, and it may also affect other functional regions of the CHEK2 kinase itself (Li et al., 2002). The catalytic kinase domain occupies almost the entire carboxy-terminal half of CHEK2, and it shows structural homology, including an activation loop, with other serine/threonine kinases. Activation of the CHEK2 kinase in response to DNA damage is a multistep dynamicprocess (Bartek and Lukas, 2003; Ahn et al., 2004), initiated by rapid, ATM-mediated phosphorylations of several SQ/TQ sites, particularly threonine 68, in the N-terminal regulatory domain of CHEK2. This promotes homodimerization and intermolecular phosphorylation of CHEK2 on threonines 383 and 387 within the autoinhibitory loop, and serine 516 of the kinase domain, events that collectively lead to kinase activation towards heterologous substrates. At least the initial, ATM-mediated phosphorylation of CHEK2 occurs exclusively at the sites of DNA damage, after which the activated CHEK2 rapidly moves throughout the nucleoplasm to spread the alert signal from damaged DNA and target its substrates (Lukas et al., 2003). The spectrum of currently known substrates of the CHEK2 kinase includes proteins involved in cell cycle control, such as the Cdc25A and Cdc25C phosphatases, Plk3 kinase and the E2F1 transcription factor, as well as in DNA repair, such as BRCA1, and regulation of cell death, including the p53-mdm2 interplay and PML1 (Bartek and Lukas, 2003; Ahn et al., 2004; Kastan and Bartek, 2004). This reflects the wide, and constantly broadening mediator role of CHEK2 in the signaling pathways that respond to DNA damage, with direct impact on downstream effectors within the cell cycle checkpoints, DNA repair and apoptosis machineries (Ahn et al., 2004; Bartek et al., 2004; Lukas et al., 2004). This is perhaps best documented by cellular phenotypes Correspondence: Dr H Nevanlinna, Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology, Helsinki University Central Hospital, Biomedicum Helsinki, PO Box 700, HUS FIN-00029, Finland. E-mail: heli.nevanlinna@hus.fi Oncogene (2006) 25, 5912–5919 & 2006 Nature Publishing Group All rights reserved 0950-9232/06 $30.00 www.nature.com/onc of cells deficient in CHEK2 function. Such cells fail to delay their DNA replication when irradiated, and hence display the phenomenon known as radiation-resistant DNA synthesis (Falck et al., 2001b). Furthermore, defects in several cell cycle checkpoints, as well as in DNA repair and particularly in DNA-damage induced apoptosis are evident in such cells, while resistance to cell death in various tissues dominates the phenotype of CHEK2 gene knockout mice (reviewed in Bartek and Lukas, 2003). Most relevant to the topicof this review, CHEK2 emerges as a candidate tumor suppressor (Bartek and Lukas, 2003; Kastan and Bartek, 2004), and germline defects of CHEK2 predispose to familial breast cancer and some other types of malignancies, and somaticmutations of CHEK2 have been implicated in pathogenesis of various types of sporadictumors. The molecular basis, epidemiological aspects, biological as well as clinical significance of these cancer-related defects of CHEK2 are highlighted in the following sections of this paper. CHEK2 and inherited breast cancer susceptibility The CHEK2 genetic variation in inherited cancer susceptibility was first indicated in 1999 when Bell et al. (1999) discovered three CHEK2 germline mutations among four classical Li-Fraumeni and 18 LiFraumeni-like families, suggesting that CHEK2 gene could be a new predisposition gene to Li-Fraumeni syndrome. While one of the three identified variants was found to be a polymorphism residing on a homologous sequence on chromosome 15 (Sodha et al., 2000), two others, the 1100delC deletion in the kinase domain in exon 10 and the 470T >C (I157T) missense mutation in the FHA domain in exon 3, have since been widely studied for inherited susceptibility to breast as well as other cancers, and have turned a new page in our understanding and studies of the geneticbackground of familial breast cancer. CHEK2 in Li-Fraumeni syndrome The role of CHEK2 as high-penetrance predisposition gene to Li-Fraumeni syndrome was questioned when the 1100delC and I157T CHEK2 germline variants were identified among breast cancer patients and in the healthy population. The I157T variant was found among familial and unselected breast cancer patients as well as breast cancer patients from LFS/LSL families but also in 2.1–6.5% of healthy Finnish population controls (Allinen et al., 2001; Vahteristo et al., 2001). The 1100delC mutation was also discovered in two breast cancer patients with a cancer family history not typical of LFS or LFL (Vahteristo et al., 2001). Screening of LFS or LFL families (Bougeard et al., 2001; Lee et al., 2001; Vahteristo et al., 2001; Sodha et al., 2002b) has revealed no or very rare individual missense variants in the CHEK2 gene and also the 1100delC variant has been found rare among LFS/LFL patients (Siddiqui et al., 2005). Although some of the variants identified in LFS/LFL families were also shown to have functional effect on CHEK2 (Lee et al., 2001) the evidence from different studies suggests that CHEK2 is not a predisposition gene to Li-Fraumeni syndrome. Recently, by a genome-wide scan for linkage, Bachinski et al. (2005) identified a region of approximately 4 cM in chromosome 1q23 as a candidate locus in Li-Fraumeni kindreds. The possible role of CHEK2 geneticvariants as modifiers of cancer risk in Li-Fraumeni families is still an open question. 1100delC – a low-penetrance breast cancer predisposition allele Based on segregation analysis of data from both a population-based series of breast cancer cases and highrisk families in the UK Antoniou et al. (2002) suggested that several common, low-penetrance genes with multiplicative effects on risk may account for the residual non-BRCA1/2 familial aggregation of breast cancer. Association analysis of the 11000delC allele in two large studies of familial breast cancer patients and populations controls found the 1100delC variant to be the first example of a population variant with association to familial breast cancer and a moderate risk of breast cancer. Based on linkage to chromosome 22, MeijersHeijboer et al. (2002) identified the 1100delC variant in a large breast cancer pedigree and further found the variant in 5.1% of individuals with breast cancer from 718 Western-European and North-American families without BRCA1 or BRCA2 mutations and in 1.1% in healthy individuals. They estimated that the 1100delC variant results in an approximately twofold increase of breast cancer risk in women, accounting for about 1% of all female breast cancer. Carriers of the 11000delC allele from the populations studied shared the same allele at the polymorphicmarker locus D22S275 within CHEK2 gene suggesting a common ancient origin for the mutation. Vahteristo et al. (2001) previously found the 1100delC variant in two Finnish breast cancer patients with a cancer family history, and further analysis of 507 patients with familial breast cancer with no BRCA1 and BRCA2 mutations revealed a signifi- cantly elevated frequency of 1100delC, as compared with the 1.4% frequency in the Finnish population (Vahteristo et al., 2002). A high frequency was also seen in patients with only a single affected first-degree relative (6.2%). The variant did not segregate with cancer in the breast cancer pedigrees in either study, also suggesting a lower-penetrance effect and the presence of other breast cancer susceptibility alleles in the families. A wide variation in the population frequency of 1100delC has been observed in different populations but the variant has been relatively rare in all populations studied. Highest population frequencies have been found in the Netherlands (1.3–1.6%) and in Finland (1.1–1.4%), and lower frequencies in the UK (0.35– 0.5%), Germany (0.15–0.25%), Australia (0.14%) (The CHEK2 Breast Cancer Case–Control Consortium, 2004), Sweden (0.6–1.0%, Einarsdottir et al., 2006; Wagenius et al., 2006), Poland (0.2–0.25%%, Cybulski CHEK2 in familial breast cancer H Nevanlinna and J Bartek 5913 Oncogene et al., 2004a, b), Czech Republic (0.3%, Kleibl et al., 2005), Italy (0.11%, Caligo et al., 2004), USA (0.3– 0.4%, Offit et al., 2003; Friedrichsen et al., 2004) and Canada (0.2%, Bernstein et al., 2006); the variant has not been detected in the Spanish population (Osorio et al., 2004). 1100delC and breast cancer risk The CHEK2 Breast Cancer Case–Control Consortium (2004) studied the 1100delC allele in 10 860 breast cancer cases and 9065 controls from 10 case–control studies in five countries and found the variant in 1.9% of all cases and 0.7% of controls (OR 2.34; 95% CI 1.72–3.20). This large study confirmed that the 1100delC allele confers about twofold elevated breast cancer risk that is seen also in women unselected for family history. A trend for a higher breast cancer odds ratio was also seen for earlier ages of onset (The CHEK2 Breast Cancer Case– Control Consortium, 2004) and carriers in breast cancer families develop breast cancer at an earlier age than noncarriers (Oldenburg et al., 2003). A higher frequency has also been observed among cases with an affected first-degree relative (Meijers-Heijboer et al., 2002; Vahteristo et al., 2002; Oldenburg et al., 2003; The CHEK2 Breast Cancer Case–Control Consortium, 2004), with an increasing frequency with a higher number of affected first-degree relatives (MeijersHeijboer et al., 2002; Oldenburg et al., 2003; The CHEK2 Breast Cancer Case–Control Consortium, 2004; de Jong et al., 2005a). The results were consistent with the hypothesis of a multiplicative effect on breast cancer risk, 1100delC allele acting in concert with susceptibility allele(s) in other genes to increase the risk of breast cancer, in accordance with the model suggested by Antoniou et al. (2002). Based on population frequency in the UK (0.5%), the absolute cumulative risk of breast cancer was estimated to be 13.7% for carriers by the age of 70 years (as compared to 6.1% for noncarriers), with 0.7% of breast cancer and 0.5% of the excess familial risk being attributable to this variant in the UK population (CHEK2 Breast Cancer Case–Control Consortium, 2004). Johnson et al. (2005) estimated a 23.8% cumulative risk for female breast cancer by the age of 80 years for first-degree relatives of bilateral 1100delC carriers, with a higher risk estimated for those first-degree relatives also carrying the 1100delC allele (58.8% by age 80 years, compared with expected cumulative risk of 7.9%). They suggested that the 1100delC carriers with a bilaterally affected first-degree relative have a highly penetrant lifetime risk even of a similar order as that seen in BRCA1 and BRCA2 carriers, although larger patient series are needed to define the risk more precisely (Johnson et al., 2005). The carriers of 1100delC allele also have an elevated risk for bilateral breast cancer. Vahteristo et al. (2002) found bilateral breast cancer patients to be sixfold more likely to be 1100delC carriers than patients with unilateral cancer among an unselected, populationbased series of 1035 breast cancer patients. A similar excess among breast cancer cases with second primary contralateral breast cancer was reported by Broeks et al. (2004). However, no higher frequency of 1100delC was observed among familial breast cancer patients with family history of bilateral disease studied by Dufault et al. (2004). In their study, the carrier status for the bilateral cases was not known, however. de Bock et al. (2004) estimated that patients with the 1100delC variant had a more unfavorable prognosis regarding the occurrence of contralateral breast cancer (RR 5.74; 95% CI 1.67–19.65), distant metastasis-free survival (RR ¼ 2.81; 95% CI 1.20–6.58), and disease-free survival (RR ¼ 3.86; 95% CI 1.91–7.78) while not for overall survival by about 4 years follow-up time. In their analysis, Broeks et al. (2004) detected the highest percentage of carriers among those patients who had received radiation therapy for their first breast cancer, suggesting that ionizing radiation treatment might be a risk factor for breast cancer development among 1100delC carriers. The 1100delC carrier status was also associated with exposure to diagnostic ionizing radiation (excluding mammography) in a populationbased study of 2311 female breast cancer cases and 496 general population controls enrolled in the Ontario and Northern California Breast Cancer Family Registries. The association was strongest among Caucasian women aged >45 years who were exposed >15 years before breast cancer diagnosis (OR, 4.28; 95% CI, 1.50–12.20) (Bernstein et al., 2006). The suggested association between ionizing radiation and breast cancer risk substantiates CHEK2 gene’s role as a checkpoint gene for IR-induced DNA damage. The association with radiation treatment of breast cancer patients, or other IR exposure, with breast cancer risk may thus have clinical significance for management and follow-up of breast cancer patients and the effect of ionizing radiation on breast cancer risk for CHEK2 mutation carriers warrants further studies. An elevated risk for male breast cancer for 1100delC carriers has also been suggested. Meijers-Heijboer et al. (2002) detected the 1100delC variant in 13.5% of individuals from families with male breast cancer, suggesting a 10-fold increase of risk in men and accounting for as much as 9% of all male breast cancer in the population. This association has not been replicated, however. In two population-based series of 109 US and 79 UK male breast cancer cases, none were found to carry the 1100delC allele while 1/138 US and 20/3749 UK controls were carriers (Neuhausen et al., 2004). In a population-based material of 114 Finnish male breast cancer patients, the mutation frequency among male breast cancer cases (1.8%) was similar to that seen in population controls (1.4%) (Syrja¨koski et al., 2004). Sodha et al. (2004) found the 1100delC in one out of 26 familial male breast cancer cases, and no other CHEK2 mutations were identified in these cases either. Although the number of cases have been relatively small in these studies, it is likely that a risk for male breast cancer, if any, is substantially smaller CHEK2 in familial breast cancer H Nevanlinna and J Bartek 5914 Oncogene than initially suggested and the 1100delC mutation does not explain the familial aggregation of male breast cancer or male breast cancer risk in the population. Other CHEK2 variants and breast cancer risk Also other CHEK2 variants have been associated with breast cancer risk. The I157T (470T>C) variant in the FHA domain in exon 3 has been found associated with breast cancer but appears to confer a lower risk than the 1100delC allele. Kilpivaara et al., 2004 reported 5.5% population frequency in Finland but a significantly higher frequency among unselected breast cancer patients (7.4%). They estimated that absolute risk of breast cancer in carriers would be 8.1% by age 70 years, compared with 5.5% for noncarriers, based on incidence rates in Finland. Similar frequencies have also been found in Poland (6.7% in cases vs 4.8% in controls) (Cybulski et al., 2004b) and among German (2.2% in cases vs 0.6% in controls) and Byelo-Russian patients (5.7% in cases vs 1.3% in controls) (Bogdanova et al., 2005). The estimated fraction of breast cancer attributable to this variant is also quite similar in these populations, with 2.2% in Finland, 1.9% in Poland and 1.6% in the German and 4.3% in the Byelorussian populations. In other populations studied, however, the I157T variant has been more rare. In the US, the I157T variant has been reported in 1.2% of (male) population (Dong et al., 2003). Among familial non-BRCA1/2 breast cancer patients in the UK, North America and the Netherlands, the variant was found only in 0.27% of patients and in 0.14% of controls, suggesting a negligible contribution in these populations (Schutte et al., 2003). Overall, lower risks have been observed for I157T than 1100delC and while I157T has been associated with breast cancer risk in the population, it has not exhibited a significant association with familial aggregation of breast cancer in the Finnish or German populations (Dufault et al., 2004; Kilpivaara et al., 2004; Bogdanova et al., 2005). However, among the Byelorussian population, a significantly elevated risk was observed among familial cases as well (Bogdanova et al., 2005), possibly suggesting the presence of other, perhaps population-specific susceptibility alleles, if confirmed in further studies. Both the 1100delC as well as I157T allele show thus variation in population frequencies and even some population specificity, and also other, CHEK2 founder alleles have been identified. The IVS2 þ 1 G>A splicing mutation, found in a US patient with familial prostate cancer (Dong et al., 2003), has been found in the Polish population as a founder mutation with a 0.3% population frequency (Cybulski et al., 2004a), and has been detected also in German (0–0.4%, Dufault et al., 2004; Bogdanova et al., 2005) and Byelorussian populations (0.2%, Bogdanova et al., 2005). The allele associates possibly with a 2- to 4-fold elevated risk for breast cancer (Cybulski et al., 2004a; Bogdanova et al., 2005), while in another study on German familial breast cancer patients the variant was found only in 2/516 familial cases and 2/500 population controls (Dufault et al., 2004). Owing to the rarity of this allele, very large patient cohorts will be needed to evaluate the associated risk reliably. In the Ashkenazi Jewish population, Shaag et al. (2005) identified CHEK2 haplotypes in 30 high-risk families and discovered two novel amino-acid substitutions, S428F (1283C>T) in the kinase domain in exon 11 and P85L (254C>T) in the N-terminal region (exon 1). The S428 is a conserved amino acid and the human variant protein was found unable to complement the lethality of the yeast ortholog Rad53 deletion in Saccharomyces cerevisiae, while the wild type (wt)- CHEK2 and CHEK2-P85L did so. The S428F variant had a 1.37% frequency among 1673 controls and 2.88% among 1632 breast cancer patients. By also comparing the cancer incidence among mothers, sisters and daughters of the S428F carriers about twofold elevated risk was estimated for carriers of this CHEK2 allele. However, frequencies of P85L did not differ between cases (0.92%) and controls (0.85%). Neither variant was found among 768 American breast cancer patients of various non-Jewish ancestries, suggesting both are founder alleles specific for the Ashkenazi population. Walsh et al. (2006) searched for large genomic rearrangements in CHEK2 in a series of 300 high-risk breast cancer families with four or more cases of breast or ovarian cancer. They discovered a novel 5.6-kb genomicdeletion, leading to loss of exons 9 and 10 and predicted protein truncation at codon 381 in two families of Czechoslovakian ancestry. This founder mutation was further found in 1.3% of 631 patients with breast cancer and in none of 367 healthy controls in the Czech and Slovak Republics. Further analyses for genomicrearrangements may reveal additional CHEK2 mutations in other populations as well. Other, rare variants have been found in other studies as well (Ingvarsson et al., 2002; Sodha et al., 2002a; Schutte et al., 2003; Dufault et al., 2004). However, without functional evidence for the missense variants and epidemiological analyses with sufficient statistical power the significance of such variants for breast cancer risk remains uncertain. Overall, they are likely to have small contribution to familial breast cancer predisposition or breast cancer risk in the population. Analyses of common SNPs and haplotype-tagging based approaches have found no increased risk for breast cancer or effect on survival associated with common genetic variation in the CHEK2 gene (Goode et al., 2002; Kuschel et al., 2003; Einarsdottir et al., 2006). Risk for other cancers Unlike BRCA1 and BRCA2 mutations, CHEK2 variants do not appear to cause elevated risk for ovarian cancer. The frequency of 1100delC in breast–ovarian cancer families has not been found elevated as compared to breast cancer families (Meijers-Heijboer et al., 2002; CHEK2 in familial breast cancer H Nevanlinna and J Bartek 5915 Oncogene Vahteristo et al., 2002), and the frequencies of 1100delC allele, I157T or IVS2 þ 1 G>A among ovarian cancer patients do not differ from that among controls (Baysal et al., 2004; Cybulski et al., 2004b). The S428F variant was slightly more frequent among Ashkenazi Jewish breast cancer patients with family history of ovarian cancer than with family history of breast cancer but no significantly elevated risk was observed among ovarian cancer probands (Shaag et al., 2005). CHEK2 variants associate with elevated prostate cancer risk, however (Cybulski et al., 2004a, b; Dong et al., 2003; Seppa¨la¨ et al., 2003). Despite variation in the frequencies in different populations and lack of sufficient statistical power for such rare variants in different studies, the findings have been consistent with an elevated risk for familial as well as unselected prostate cancer associated with the truncating mutations (1100delC and IVS2 þ 1 G>A) as well as the missense variant I157T. The observed risk has been highest for the truncating variants 1100delC and IVS2 þ 1 G>A (with 8- to 9-fold elevated odds ratios for hereditary or familial prostate cancer, as compared to population controls) among the Polish and Finnish populations whereas the I157T allele seems to confer a more modest risk (2- to 4-fold elevated odds ratios for hereditary or familial prostate cancer and 1.5- to 1.7-fold elevated for unselected prostate cancer) (Cybulski et al., 2004a, b; Seppa¨la¨ et al., 2003). However, rarity of the variants in different populations limits their contribution to prostate cancer as well (Wagenius et al., 2006). Also other, very rare variants have been identified in prostate cancer patient samples with a higher overall frequency among patients than among unaffected men (Dong et al., 2003). As in breast cancer, however, such rare, individual variants are likely to have small contribution to prostate cancer. Colorectal cancer (CRC) risk associated with CHEK2 variants has been more controversial. Among Dutch breast cancer families, the 1100delC variant was found more frequently in families with hereditary breast and colorectal cancer phenotype (HBCC) and MeijersHeijboer et al. (2003) suggested that the 1100delC allele acts in synergy with another, unknown susceptibility gene for HBCC. However, no such association was observed among Finnish colorectal or breast cancer families (Kilpivaara et al., 2003) and the 1100delC allele was also found rare among patients with metachronous cancers of the breast and the colorectum (Isinger et al., 2006). The 1100delC allele (or truncating alleles 1100delC and IVS2 þ 1G>A) has not been found significantly associated with CRC risk in populationbased series of 662 Finnish CRC patients (Kilpivaara et al., 2003), 300 Polish colon cancer patients (Cybulski et al., 2004b) or 629 unselected Dutch CRC cases and 105 CRCs diagnosed before age 50 (de Jong et al., 2005b), or with colorectal disease (Lipton et al., 2003). A very low-risk effect cannot be excluded, however, and de Jong et al. (2005b) obtained also some evidence for an increasing frequency after stratifying patients according to age at diagnosis and family history of colorectal and endometrial cancer. Large case–control studies or metaanalyses are required to clarify the role of the CHEK2 1100delC variant for CRC risk. There is more consistent evidence for elevated CRC risk for the I157T variant, however, with a significant association found among both Polish colon cancer patients (Cybulski et al., 2004b) and Finnish CRC cases (Kilpivaara et al., 2006). Both the truncating variants and I157T have been also found to associate with thyroid cancer and I157T with kidney cancer as well (Cybulski et al., 2004b), suggesting that functional disturbance of CHEK2 predisposes cells from a wide distribution of organs for tumorigenic development. For many other cancer sites, the studies have been too small to estimate cancer risks, however, CHEK2 variants have been infrequent or no significant association has been found so far with cancers of the bladder, larynx, lung, pancreas or stomach or with melanoma, Non-Hodgkin lymphoma, myelodysplastic syndromes and acute myeloid leukemias. (Hofmann et al., 2001; Cybulski et al., 2004b). The rarity of the variants in many populations limits the possibilities to reliably estimate cancer risks especially for more rare cancer types in large enough patient series. Tumors from CHEK2 mutation carriers – CHEK2 in tumors The CHEK2 protein expression has been found absent or grossly reduced in tumors from carriers of the 1100delC germline mutation and also in other familial or sporadicbreast tumors (Sullivan et al., 2002; Vahteristo et al., 2002; Oldenburg et al., 2003; Kilpivaara et al., 2004; Honrado et al., 2005). Grossly reduced or absent CHEK2 protein expression has been observed in 80–100% of tumors from the 1100delC carriers (Vahteristo et al., 2002; Oldenburg et al., 2003) but in only 4–14% familial breast tumors from noncarriers (Vahteristo et al., 2002; Oldenburg et al., 2003). On the other hand, the 1100delC germline variant was seen in 19% (4/21) of cases with absent or reduced expression of the CHEK2 protein, whereas none of the 103 cases with normal CHEK2 staining pattern showed mutations (Vahteristo et al., 2002). The CHEK2-1100delC protein is unstable (Vahteristo et al., 2002) and as indicated above, the 1100delC mutation is most often associated with complete loss of the protein expression (Vahteristo et al., 2002; Oldenburg et al., 2003). In cancers from the 1100delC carriers, as well as from carriers of some other CHEK2 mutations, loss of heterozygosity (LOH) has been found in some tumors but the results have not been consistent and in some tumors, the mutant allele has been lost (Lee et al., 2001; Ingvarsson et al., 2002; Sodha et al., 2002a; Oldenburg et al., 2003). Oldenburg et al. (2003) detected LOH in CHEK2 region in 11/88 familial breast tumors with all three 1100delC carrier tumors showing loss of the wt allele. However, while CHEK2 LOH was associated with loss or reduction of protein expression in all the tumors studied, 1100delC was not significantly more frequent in tumors showing LOH at the CHEK2 locus, which suggests that there may be also other mechanisms of inactivation. Methylation of CHEK2 has CHEK2 in familial breast cancer H Nevanlinna and J Bartek 5916 Oncogene not been observed in breast carcinomas with downregulation of CHEK2 mRNA expression (Sullivan et al., 2002), however, epigeneticsilencing of CHEK2 gene has been observed in Non-Hodgkin’s lymphoma cell lines with drasticreduction of CHEK2 expression but no identified mutations (Kato et al., 2004). In breast cancer, Staalesen et al. (2004) has detected a very large number of tumor-specific splice variants, in addition to normal length mRNA, in all stage III breast tumors studied. They suggested that extensive splicing variation of CHEK2 mRNA in breast tumors could be such a mechanisms, where splice variants may lack CHEK2 function or be mislocalized in cytoplasm. Among unselected patients, tumors from 1100delC mutation carriers have been found more often to be hormone receptor positive (de Bock et al., 2004; Kilpivaara et al., 2005), and in one study, also of higher grade than those from noncarriers (Kilpivaara et al., 2005). As the 1100deC mutation is rare, very large materials would be needed to reliably evaluate specific phenotypic characteristics associated with the 1100delC mutation. Genome-level molecular analyses like gene expression profiling or array-CGH analyses may reveal more distinct tumor characteristics and functional downstream effects of the 1100delC allele or other CHEK2 mutations. Such studies could also shed some light on the genes or pathways behind the postulated multiplicative effects on breast cancer risk with the CHEK2 gene. The I157T variant protein is stable and the mutation has a more subtle effect on CHEK2 function than the 1100delC variant. No difference in CHEK2 protein expression has been observed on breast tumors from I157T carriers vs noncarriers (Kilpivaara et al., 2004). Interestingly, Huzarski et al. (2005) suggested a strong association of I157T allele with lobular breast cancer among 482 breast cancer patients in Poland. However, no difference in the histological type (lobular or ductal breast cancer) has been observed among Finnish breast cancer patients and I157T variant was not found associated with other histopathological characteristics either (Kilpivaara et al., unpublished results). Among unselected breast tumors, the reduction of CHEK2 protein expression has been observed in 21.1% (Kilpivaara et al., 2005). The reduced expression correlated with larger primary tumor size but not with other histopathologial characteristics. However, 94% of tumors with aberrant CHEK2 expression were ER positive, as compared to 79% among all tumors, similarly as seen among 1100delC mutation carrier tumors. Interestingly, Honrado et al. (2005) found reduced nuclear CHEK2 expression in 72–78% of sporadicor familial breast tumors but a significantly higher frequency of expression among BRCA2 carriers, and suggested that CHEK2 immunohistochemical analysis, together with RAD51 expression analysis, could distinguish BRCA2 carrier tumors from nonBRCA1/2 tumors. Loss of CHEK2 expression has been observed also in other malignancies. Five percent (29/564) of familial colorectal tumors demonstrated loss of expression for CHEK2, with germline 1100delC mutation found in three cases. No 1100delC mutations were found in patients whose tumors stained positive (van Puijenbroek et al., 2005). A low frequency (17.6%) of the loss of the wt allele has been observed in the CRC tumors of the 1100delC carriers, with also loss of the mutant allele observed (Kilpivaara et al., 2003). Somaticmutations have been relatively rare in CHEK2, detected in various types of cancer, such as in some breast tumors (Sullivan et al., 2002), osteosarcomas, ovarian and lung cancers (Miller et al., 2002), bladder cancer (Bartkova et al., 2004, 2005), and vulval squamous cell carcinomas (Reddy et al., 2002) (reviewed in Bartek and Lukas, 2003). Molecular and biological basis for cancer susceptibility due to CHEK2 mutations As an integral component of the cellular network that responds to DNA damage the CHEK2 kinase helps maintain genomicintegrity and prevent fixation of potentially harmful mutations (Kastan and Bartek, 2004). Accumulating evidence strongly suggests that CHEK2 is a tumor suppressor and its defects can predispose to several types of cancer. At the molecular level, CHEK2 defects lead to either loss of CHEK2 expression, or undermine the function of CHEK2 as a signaling molecule. Mutations in the SQ/TQ regulatory domain prevent proper activation of CHEK2 by the upstream kinase ATM, alterations of the FHA domain, including the I157T breast cancer predisposing variant subvert the protein–protein interactions and cancel proper interactions of such CHEK2 protein with its substrates including BRCA1, p53 and Cdc25A, (Li et al., 2002; Falck et al., 2001a,b) while defects in the kinase domain inhibit the catalytic activity of CHEK2. The latter category includes also the truncated protein resulting from the breast cancer susceptibility variant 1100delC. In addition, this truncated protein, as well as some other mutants of CHEK2, are labile proteins whose level in cancer cells is very low (Bartek and Lukas, 2003). Other types of CHEK2 defects lead to mislocalization of CHEK2 in the cytoplasm (Staalesen et al., 2004), or aberrant splicing of the CHEK2 gene (Bartkova et al., 2005). From the tissue biology point of view, the CHEK2 kinase, unlike its related kinase Chk1, is expressed in the vast majority of human normal tissues including many nonproliferating, terminally differentiated cells (Lukas et al, 2001; Latella et al., 2004). Thus, the ATMCHEK2-p53 pathway operates in almost all cell types of the adult organism. Importantly, recent studies discovered constitutive activation of this pathway in a wide range of human tumors (DiTullio et al., 2002), including large subsets of premalignant lesions (Bartkova et al., 2005; Gorgoulis et al., 2005), suggesting that the process of oncogenic transformation leads to enhanced DNA damage and activates the checkpoint network as an inducible barrier against cancer progression CHEK2 in familial breast cancer H Nevanlinna and J Bartek 5917 Oncogene (Bartkova et al., 2005; Gorgoulis et al., 2005). It follows that individuals with germline mutations in genes involved in this anticancer barrier, such as CHEK2, p53, BRCA1, BRCA2 or ATM for example, would be deficient in their natural protection against cancer, and therefore more susceptible to cancer development. This is also consistent with the fact that all familial breast cancer-predisposing genes identified to date are components of the genome maintenance machinery that responds to DNA damage. Furthermore, it makes a prediction that also other, so far unknown breast cancer-predisposing mutations likely target components of the DNA damage response network. Finally, as the status of the DNA damage response machinery also dictates the cellular response to DNA damaging therapies such as ionizing radiation or many chemotherapeutic drugs, it seems plausible to speculate that knowledge about the status of this cellular network may help select appropriate, taylor-made combinations and doses of such anticancer treatment modalities in the future. This trend is further underscored by global efforts to develop small molecule modulators of various components of the DNA damage response, including the Chk1 and CHEK2 kinases (Zhou and Bartek, 2004), in an effort to predispose cancer cells selectively to such DNA damaging therapies. Currently, the low risks associated with CHEK2 variants should still be interpreted with caution in the context of clinical management of breast cancer families, and diagnostictesting and counseling for these variants is in general considered premature. Defining the interactive networks of genes and genetic variants behind the synergistic risk effects remains a major challenge for more accurate evaluation of breast cancer risks associated with CHEK2 variants at individual level or with specific subgroups of patients, and perhaps even in different populations. Increased risk for contralateral breast cancer, and the possibility of ionizing radiation as a risk factor for breast cancer especially among CHEK2 variant carriers, warrants also more extensive studies and may have more immediate implications for the clinical management of breast cancer patients.  Functional and genomic approaches can be integrated to screen efficiently for pathogenic alleles in founder populations. We applied such approaches to analysis of the cancer-associated cell cycle regulator CHEK2 in the Ashkenazi Jewish population. We first identified two extended haplotypes at CHEK2 that co-segregated with breast cancer in high-risk families. We sequenced CHEK2 in a case representing each haplotype and discovered two novel amino acid substitutions, CHEK2.S428F in the kinase domain and CHEK2.P85L in the N-terminal region. To assay these alleles for loss of CHEK2 function, we tested their capacity to complement Rad53 deletion in Saccharomyces cerevisiae. CHEK2.S428F failed to complement Rad53 and thus largely abrogates normal CHEK2 function, whereas CHEK2.P85L complemented Rad53 as well as did wild-type CHEK2. Epidemiologic analyses were concordant with the functional tests. Frequencies of CHEK2.S428F heterozygotes were 2.88% (47/1632) among female breast cancer patients not selected for family history or age at diagnosis and 1.37% (23/1673) among controls (OR=2.13, 95% CI [1.26, 3.69], P =0.004), whereas frequencies of CHEK2.P85L were 0.92% among cases and 0.83% among controls. On the basis of the experience of mothers, sisters and daughters of probands, breast cancer risk due to CHEK2.S428F was estimated as 0.17 (±0.08) by age 60. We conclude that CHEK2.S428F increases breast cancer risk ∼2-fold among Ashkenazi Jewish women, whereas CHEK2.P85L is a neutral allele. In general, these results suggest that selecting probands with extended haplotypes that co-segregate with disease can improve the efficiency of resequencing efforts and that quantitative complementation tests in yeast can be used to evaluate variants in genes with highly conserved function. Topic: alleles ashkenazi jew genome haplotypes yeasts breast cancer chek2 gene Issue Section: Article INTRODUCTION  Breast cancer is the most common malignancy among women in the US, Canada, western Europe and Israel, with a lifetime risk to American women of >10% ( 1 ). Most breast and ovarian cancers are not inherited, but 5–10% are the result of inherited mutations in the tumor suppressor genes BRCA1 and BRCA2 ( 2 , 3 ). Among women with inherited mutations in these genes, lifetime risk of breast cancer can exceed 80% ( 3 ). However, most families with multiple cases of female breast cancer, but no cases of ovarian cancer, have no detectable inherited mutations in BRCA1 or BRCA2 ( 4 , 5 ). Statistical studies have suggested that genes harboring alleles of lower penetrance may explain breast cancer in such families ( 6 , 7 ).  One such gene is CHEK2 , a serine/threonine protein kinase and the human homolog of Saccharomyces cerevisiae Rad53 and Schizosaccharomyces pombe Cds1 ( 8 , 9 ). In both yeast and mammals, this protein is a cell cycle checkpoint regulator that is rapidly phosphorylated in response to replication blocks and DNA damage ( 10 ). Activated CHEK2 inhibits CDC25C phosphatase, preventing entry into mitosis, and stabilizes p53, leading to cell cycle arrest in G1. CHEK2 and BRCA1 are linked functionally. CHEK2 interacts with and phosphorylates BRCA1, allowing BRCA1 to restore survival after DNA damage ( 11 , 12 ).  The inherited mutation CHEK2.1100delC truncates the kinase domain of the CHEK2 protein and is responsible for a 2-fold increase in breast cancer risk in families of northern and northwestern European ancestry ( 13 – 15 ). In the Ashkenazi Jewish population, CHEK2.1100delC confers similar risks but is very rare ( 3 , 16 ). Other individually rare cancer-associated CHEK2 mutations have been identified in European populations ( 17 – 22 ). The unique historical demography of the Ashkenazi Jewish population led us to hypothesize that a relatively common cancer-associated CHEK2 allele might exist in this community.  In order to identify candidate cancer-associated CHEK2 mutations in the Ashkenazi Jewish population, we first determined extended haplotypes at CHEK2 in Ashkenazi Jewish families multiply affected with breast or ovarian cancer but wild-type for BRCA1 and BRCA2. The purpose of this step was not to carry out a formal linkage analysis, but to select for sequencing those individuals most likely to carry a mutant CHEK2 allele. We identified two CHEK2 haplotypes segregating with breast cancer, in three families and one family, respectively. We sequenced an index case representing each CHEK2 -associated haplotype. Sequencing revealed two novel amino acid substitutions in CHEK2 , one on each haplotype. Because co-segregation of any haplotype or allele with breast cancer in a few families could be due to chance, we evaluated the alleles by a functional test and by epidemiologic analysis. Specifically, we developed a complementation test in yeast to evaluate the consequences of the mutations. In parallel, we compared carrier frequencies of each mutation among breast cancer cases versus population-matched controls, and breast cancer incidence among relatives of breast cancer patients with CHEK2 mutations versus relatives of breast cancer patients without mutations. Finally, we evaluated the haplotype structure at this region of chromosome 22 among mutation carriers versus non-carriers in order to assess the demographic history of these mutations.  RESULTS  Identification of novel CHEK2 variants  From 30 Ashkenazi Jewish families with high incidence of breast and/or ovarian cancer but with wild-type sequences of BRCA1 and BRCA2 , we genotyped probands and relatives for seven markers spanning 645 kb at CHEK2 on chromosome 22q12. We determined haplotypes by direct analysis and identified pedigrees in which probands shared the same haplotype. In four families, a CHEK2 haplotype co-segregated with breast cancer. Nine affected relatives in three families shared the same haplotype and three sisters in a fourth family shared a different haplotype. Genomic DNA from the probands of these four families was fully sequenced for CHEK2 coding and regulatory regions.  Sequencing revealed two previously undetected CHEK2 variants, 1283C>T in exon 11 leading to S428F (in three families) and 254C>T in exon 1 leading to P85L (in the fourth family) (Fig.  1 A). In all families, the variant co-segregated with the shared haplotype. CHEK2 amino acid residues 85 and 428 differ in their evolutionary conservation and in the predicted impact of the observed substitutions. Residue 428 lies in the kinase domain, which is highly conserved from mammals to yeast, and phenylalanine is a non-conservative amino acid substitution of serine. In contrast, residue 85 is located in the much less conserved N-terminal region, and leucine is a more conservative amino acid substitution of proline (Fig.  1 B).  To test the completeness of our haplotype-based approach, we subsequently sequenced all coding and regulatory regions of CHEK2 in genomic DNA from the probands of all 30 high-incidence families. No other cancer-associated CHEK2 variants were present. One proband was heterozygous for a previously unrecorded SNP 1639T>C in the CHEK2 3′-UTR , which did not co-segregate with cancer in her family. Multiple probands were heterozygous for several intronic SNPs and for CHEK2.251A>G ( E45E ), a silent polymorphic substitution (rs1805129).  Complementation tests in yeast  To evaluate the effect of these mutations on normal function of CHEK2 , we tested whether either could complement the lethality of a Rad53 deletion in the yeast S. cerevisiae. The identification of mammalian CHEK2 as the homolog of yeast Rad53 was based on the ability of the wild-type human CHEK2 to complement the deletion of Rad53 in yeast ( 8 ). We expanded this test to determine whether ability to complement the yeast deletion was lost by CHEK2 mutants. As Fig.  2 indicates, wild-type human CHEK2 complements the lethality of the Rad53 deletion in yeast, leading to exponential growth in selective media. Yeast carrying human CHEK2.P85L grew as well as those with the wild-type human CHEK2 gene, suggesting P85L does not abrogate normal CHEK2 function. Yeast carrying the silent polymorphism human CHEK2.E84E grew nearly as well. In contrast, yeast carrying human CHEK2.S428F or CHEK2.1100delC grew no better than the Rad53 null yeast with no complementary human gene. As an additional control, the CHEK2.S428F mutation reverted to wild-type (‘ F428S ’) complemented Rad53 lethality as well as did wild-type human CHEK2. These results suggest that CHEK2.S428F and CHEK2.1100delC have lost a critical normal function of CHEK2.  Genetic epidemiology of CHEK2 variants  In order to test whether CHEK2.S428F and/or CHEK2.P85L were associated with cancer risk in the Ashkenazi Jewish population, we compared carrier frequencies of these two alleles between 1848 Ashkenazi Jewish breast and ovarian cancer patients and 1673 controls. Patients were ascertained at cancer diagnosis regardless of family history or age at diagnosis. The case series did not include the breast cancer families in whom the CHEK2 mutations were originally identified. We also screened 768 breast cancer patients of various other ancestries for these two alleles. All breast cancer patients had wild-type alleles of the Ashkenazi Jewish founder mutations in BRCA1 and BRCA2. We also screened patients and controls for CHEK2.1100delC and CHEK2.ivs2(+1)G>A and excluded individuals heterozygous for these alleles from the case–control comparisons.  Results of the case–control comparisons were consistent with predictions of the functional tests. CHEK2.S428F carrier frequencies were 47/1632 (2.88%) of breast cancer patients and 23/1673 (1.37%) of controls ( P =0.004; Table 1 ). In contrast, frequencies of CHEK2.P85L did not differ between cases (0.92%) and controls (0.85%). Among 768 American breast cancer patients of various non-Jewish ancestries, none carried CHEK2.S428F or CHEK2.P85L.  The increased risk conferred by CHEK2.S428F was ∼2-fold, similar to that of CHEK2.1100delC ( 14 , 15 ). Odds ratios associated with CHEK2.S428F were higher among breast cancer patients with family history of breast cancer, ovarian cancer or male breast cancer (Table 1 ). However, CHEK2.S428F was not significantly more frequent among ovarian cancer patients (4/190, 2.11%) than among controls and none of 26 male breast cancer patients carried CHEK2.S428F. Nor was CHEK2.S428F more frequent among patients with lymphoma (9/415, 2.16%) or colon cancer (3/185, 1.62%) than among controls.  For two patients heterozygous for CHEK2.S428F , primary breast tumor tissue was available. To evaluate loss of heterozygosity in the breast tumors, we genotyped markers D22S275 , D22S1169 and D22S689 spanning 645 kb at CHEK2 (Fig.  3 ). One patient was heterozygous at D22S689 and the other patient was heterozygous at D22S689 and D22S275. Breast tumor cells were hemizygous for markers linked to the mutant allele, indicating loss of the wild-type allele in each tumor.  Proportions of breast cancer patients by decade of diagnosis who carried mutations in BRCA1 , BRCA2 or CHEK2 are shown in Table 2 . Inherited mutations in BRCA1 , and to a lesser extent in BRCA2 , are more frequent among patients with young breast cancer onset. However, among breast cancer patients heterozygous for CHEK2 mutations, ages at diagnosis were only slightly younger than ages at diagnosis among patients with no known mutation (51.5 years±8.5 SD versus 52.3 years±11.0 SD). CHEK2 mutations were most frequently associated with breast cancer in middle age. Among patients diagnosed at age 50 and older, mutations in CHEK2 were as frequent as mutations in BRCA1 or BRCA2 , although the impact of CHEK2 mutations on risk was much less severe.  We also compared breast cancer incidence among mothers, sisters and daughters of patients with CHEK2.S428F mutations versus these relatives of patients heterozygous for CHEK2.P85L or with wild-type sequences at CHEK2 (Fig.  4 ). Because we did not know which relatives carried CHEK2 mutations, cumulative incidence is shown for carrier and non-carrier relatives combined, with the Mendelian expectation that 50% of mothers, sisters and daughters of probands with CHEK2 mutations would also be carriers. Risks of breast cancer among relatives of probands heterozygous for CHEK2.S428F were increased only after age 50. As expected, risks of breast cancer among relatives of probands heterozygous for CHEK2.P85L were not increased at any age. On the basis of the kin–cohort method ( 23 ), the risk of breast cancer due to CHEK2.S428F by age 60 can be estimated as 0.17 (±0.08 SE).  Haplotypes including wild-type and mutant CHEK2 alleles  Haplotypes at a 2.7 Mb region of chromosome 22q12 region flanking CHEK2 were defined by the genotypes of 16 microsatellite markers (Fig.  5 ). Haplotypes were determined for Ashkenazi Jewish individuals with genotypes CHEK2.S428F and CHEK2.P85L and for Ashkenazi Jewish individuals with wild-type sequences of CHEK2 but carrying the D22S275 alleles found on the CHEK2 mutant haplotypes. Conserved haplotypes were defined as those with linkage disequilibrium (LD) values ( D ′) greater than 0.75 between adjacent markers and between D22S275 and each other marker. Haplotypes at mutant alleles CHEK2.S428F and CHEK2.P85L were conserved over 2400–2700 kb, whereas haplotypes for the wild-type alleles ‘seeded’ by the same allele at D22S275 spanned 645–1400 kb. CHEK2.S428F -bearing chromosomes and CHEK2.P85L -bearing chromosomes were similar to each other both in the lengths of conserved haplotypes and in their frequencies in the general Ashkenazi Jewish population. These similarities likely reflect founder influences on both haplotypes in this population and the absence of selective pressure on either haplotypes, given that cancers associated with CHEK2.S428F occur after reproduction. In contrast, the ancestral haplotypes upon which CHEK2.P85L and CHEK2.S428F occurred are shorter, reflecting the older age of the ancestral haplotypes, which are not specific to this population.  DISCUSSION  Distinguishing disease-associated missense mutations from neutral polymorphisms in disease genes is an important problem in human genetics. For genes with highly conserved biological roles, complementation tests in yeast may serve as functional assays for mammalian genes. For the moderate-penetrance breast cancer gene CHEK2 , conservation of gene function from yeast through mammals enabled us to develop an assay for naturally occurring CHEK2 variants on the basis of one of its defining features, the capacity to complement the loss of Rad53 in S. cerevisiae. We applied this functional assay to amino acid substitutions of CHEK2 identified among probands of high-risk Ashkenazi Jewish breast cancer families. Then in Ashkenazi Jewish breast cancer cases and controls, independent of the high-risk families, we confirmed epidemiologically the results predicted by the complementation tests. Biological assays of the consequences of amino acid substitutions are especially valuable for alleles that are individually too rare for epidemiologic analysis. However, the yeast complementation test measures an extreme phenotype, so the result is strong evidence of the functional importance of the CHEK2.S428F variant. Other CHEK2 alleles could have more subtle effects on protein function not measurable in this assay.  The distinctive demographic history of the Ashkenazi Jewish population has led to the discovery of ancient founder mutations responsible for many genetic disorders ( 24 ). The combination of a small number of founders, subsequent rapid demographic expansion, selection and genetic drift resulted in reduced genetic heterogeneity and hence to fewer different pathogenic alleles at disease-associated genes in this population ( 25 ). The population genetics of BRCA1 and BRCA2 is a well-studied example of this phenomenon, with three ancient mutations at relatively high frequency ( 3 , 26 – 28 ) and other mutations extremely rare ( 29 ). However, most Ashkenazi Jewish breast cancer patients, even from high-risk families, do not carry one of these mutations ( 3 ). Therefore, we hypothesized that an ancient founder allele of CHEK2 might also exist in this population and be responsible for inherited predisposition to breast cancer among some Ashkenazi Jewish women without inherited mutations in BRCA1 or BRCA2. The identification and characterization of such a cancer-associated CHEK2 allele would be useful both to the Ashkenazi Jewish women at high risk of breast cancer and to the understanding of the impact of CHEK2 mutations on breast cancer risk among women generally.  CHEK2.S428F increases risk of breast cancer ∼2-fold, with predicted breast cancer risk ∼0.17 (±0.08 SE) by age 60. Breast cancer patients with a family history of female breast cancer, ovarian cancer and/or male breast cancer were more likely to carry CHEK2.S428F. The frequency of CHEK2.S428F carriers among ovarian cancer patients was higher than among controls (2.11% versus 1.37%), but the difference was not significant. It is not clear whether the association with family history of ovarian cancer reflects risk associated with ovarian cancer or family history as an indicator of inherited risk. Family history of male breast cancer appears likely to be simply an indicator of inherited risk in this population ( 30 , 31 ). Other European mutations in CHEK2 are associated with cancers of the thyroid, prostate, colon, and kidney, in addition to breast cancer ( 22 ). The CHEK2.S428F carriers in our series had more severe family histories only of breast cancer and ovarian cancer, not of cancers of other sites. Nor did we detect a significantly increased frequency of CHEK2.S428F among Ashkenazi Jewish patients with lymphoma or colon cancer. On the basis of a population prevalence of CHEK2.S428F heterozygotes of 1.37% and relative risk of 2.13, ∼1% of breast cancer overall in the Ashkenazi Jewish population is attributable to this allele.  In a large series of Dutch patients, CHEK2.1100delC was associated with younger age at breast cancer diagnosis, but did not consistently co-segregate with breast cancer in families, leading to the suggestion that CHEK2 mutations may modify breast cancer risk due to unknown genes, rather than exerting a primary effect ( 32 ). In our study, CHEK2.S428F mutation carriers were diagnosed at only very slightly younger ages than patients without mutations, and the mutation segregated with disease in the three high-incidence families in which it first appeared. However, given a 2-fold relative risk associated with this allele in the population generally, and the high prevalence of breast cancer without any known inherited cause, we would expect many families with CHEK2.S428F mutations to include both phenocopies and carriers of who have remained cancer free. We did not evaluate persons with both CHEK2 and BRCA1 or BRCA2 mutations, so cannot exclude the possibility that CHEK2 interacts with BRCA1 , BRCA2 or with other unknown breast cancer genes to influence risk. In practice, whatever mechanism is involved, the effect of carrying CHEK2.S428F is to increase breast cancer risk ∼2-fold.  Haplotypes at CHEK2 in this population may be instructive in designing the efficient strategies for identifying novel breast cancer genes. In the Ashkenazi Jewish population, LD is significantly increased at markers flanking rare disease alleles ( 25 ). Not surprisingly, therefore, CHEK2.S428F is associated with an extended conserved haplotype. Also not surprisingly, the haplotype on which CHEK2.S428F arose is conserved over a shorter genomic distance than the haplotype with the mutation. However, in this population, the ancestral haplotype is nonetheless conserved over >600 kb, considerably longer than the CHEK2 locus itself (55 kb). Therefore, if CHEK2 were not already known to harbor cancer-associated mutations and were to be identified by an undirected LD strategy, LD differences between cases and controls could only be detected at a considerable distance from the CHEK2 locus. In other words, LD in the >600 kb region including CHEK2 is so highly conserved in this population that no differences would be detected between cases and controls, even with very large sample sizes. Instead, the genomic regions between 500 kb and 1 Mb from CHEK2 (Fig.  5 ) are most likely to differ in LD between cases and controls. Variation in haplotype block size on chromosome 22 is well characterized for a mixed European population ( 33 ). Our experience with one small region of chromosome 22 confirms previous predictions ( 25 ) that LD analyses in founder populations will encounter additional complexities in haplotype block size that will not always be known in advance. In founder populations, a search for disease-associated genes by LD may involve detecting LD signals in cases versus controls at sites hundreds of kilobase pair from an unknown critical gene rather than detecting LD signals within the candidate locus itself.  The identification of inherited breast cancer genes of lower penetrance than BRCA1 or BRCA2 raises new issues for clinical practice. In particular, should genetic testing for medium and low penetrance alleles be recommended for breast cancer patients or their families? The question is difficult because the lower penetrance of CHEK2 mutations leads to imperfect co-segregation of mutations with cancer in many families ( 32 ) and age of onset of breast cancer among carriers that is not particularly young. More genetic information will clarify risk in family members. Unaffected women heterozygous for breast cancer-associated CHEK2 mutations may be good candidates for research protocols of intensive screening strategies such as magnetic resonance imaging ( 34 , 35 ). Stratifying high-risk women by genotype in breast cancer screening and prevention trials will help reveal the utility of a given intervention in a specific-risk population. Until this type of information is available for CHEK2 mutations, it will be difficult to reach consensus on the usefulness of wide-scale testing. The identification of women with BRCA1 and BRCA2 mutations allowed retrospective analyses as well as prospective clinical trials targeted specifically for these women ( 34 – 38 ). Information generated from such studies has in turn increased the clinical utility of testing for BRCA1 and BRCA2 mutations. Testing for other breast cancer susceptibility genes will likely undergo a similar evolution.  MATERIALS AND METHODS  Subjects  Human subjects review committees of all participating institutions approved this study. Participants in this study, all of whom are Ashkenazi Jewish, included 30 families with at least four cases of breast cancer and/or ovarian cancer (the ‘discovery’ series); 1848 unrelated patients with female breast cancer, ovarian cancer or male breast cancer; 792 mothers, sisters and daughters of a subset of these patients (described subsequently) and 1673 controls. Cancer diagnoses were verified by pathology reports and/or hospital records. Probands of the 30 high-risk families had wild-type sequences of BRCA1 and BRCA2 as determined by complete sequencing of both genes. Cases in the subsequent case–control study were hospital registry-based Ashkenazi Jewish cancer patients ascertained regardless of family history or age at diagnosis and wild-type for the three BRCA1 and BRCA2 Ashkenazi founder mutations. The 2488 cases included 1632 patients with female breast cancer, 26 with male breast cancer, 190 with ovarian cancer, 415 with lymphoma and 185 with colon cancer. Patients were ascertained and enrolled, as previously described, by the New York Breast Cancer Study ( 3 ), Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Center ( 16 ) or Share Zedek Medical Center ( 39 ). The series of American breast cancer patients of other ancestries has also been previously described ( 40 ). Controls were 1673 cancer-free Ashkenazi Jewish adults from Israel or New York. One group of controls comprised 725 young adults who underwent pre-marriage counseling in Jerusalem. The second group of controls comprised 948 cancer-free adults who participated in the New York Cancer Project sponsored by the AMDeC Foundation ( 41 ), whose staff kindly made anonymized biological samples available to us. Allele frequencies did not differ among controls from Jerusalem compared to controls from New York.  Sequencing and genotyping  Probands and all surviving relatives in the family study were genotyped by standard methods for haplotypes comprised seven markers spanning 645 kb at the CHEK2 locus: microsatellites D22S1150 , D22S275 and D22S689 , and SNPs rs5762795, rs6005863, rs5762764 and rs743185. To determine extended haplotype structure, unrelated cases and controls were genotyped by standard methods for markers spanning 2.7 Mb at CHEK2. These haplotypes were defined by microsatellite markers D22S1150 , D22S275 , D22S689 , D22S1163 , and the following polymorphic simple tandem repeats developed as markers for this project: GCTC at 28626789, AC at 28544795, AC at 28538947, TG at 28391047, TCTT at 28345343, ATT at 27958798, AAG at 26945911, AAAG at 26557884, CAT at 26493395, GAAG at 26288824, ATGG at 26121818 and TCTT at 25930215. Positions refer to sequence of chromosome 22 on build 35 of the International Human Genome Sequencing Consortium as displayed on the May 2004 UCSC Genome Browser (〈 http://genome.ucsc.edu/ 〉). Primer sequences for the simple tandem repeats are available on request.  For sequencing CHEK2 , genomic DNA isolated from peripheral blood was amplified by PCR using intronic primers flanking exons of the gene. PCR products were then purified and sequenced in both directions with BigDye Terminator 3.1 chemistry and electrophoresed on an ABI3100. This procedure was carried out for CHEK2 exons 1–2 and 4–9. In order to avoid slippage artifacts at poly-A/T tracts flanking exon 3, this exon with sequenced with a nested primer located 3′ of the poly-T tract in intron 2. CHEK2 exons 10–14 are wholly or partially duplicated as pseudogenes eight times in the human genome, with duplications retaining the CHEK2 intron structure ( 42 ). In order to carry out mutation analysis only of the functional copy of CHEK2 on chromosome 22q12, we amplified a long-range PCR product with primers in sequences unique to 22q12 in intron 8 (5′-GGTTGTGTGTATCACGGCTTACGG-3′) and in the 3′-UTR (5′-ATCTAATCACCTCCTACCAGTCTG-3′). A 10 kb fragment was generated and used as template to amplify individual exons 10 through 14 using appropriate primers. These exons were sequenced using the procedure described for exons 1 through 9.  For each variant site in CHEK2 , we developed genotyping assays based on differential restriction enzyme digestion. The CHEK2.P85L allele was genotyped by amplifying with primers 5′-ATTCCAGAGGACCAAGAACGTGAG-3′ and 5′-ACAACAAAGGGTCTTACCAAG-3′, then digesting the amplified product with Dde I. Primer sequences were changed from wild-type to remove two additional Dde I digestion sites. The wild-type CHEK2 allele yields fragment lengths of 82 and 35 bp and the CHEK2.P85L allele yields a product of 117 bp. The CHEK2.S428F allele was genotyped by nested PCR. First primers 5′-GTGTGTATCACGGCTTACGG-3′ and 5′-AAGTAGTAGCAGACCCAGGACC-3′ were used to amplify a 2170 bp product spanning exons 9 to 11 and unique to chromosome 22. This product was amplified with primers 5′-CTGAATGCCACTGAGAATGC-3′ and 5′-CAGTGACACTTGAGTCCTATGCTC-3′ in exon 11, then digesting the amplified product with Hpy 188I. The wild-type allele yields fragment lengths of 82 and 25 bp and the CHEK2.S428F mutation yields a product of 107 bp.  Statistical analyses  Allele and genotype frequencies were compared by two-tailed χ 2 -tests. Cumulative risks of breast cancer among relatives were evaluated by standard Kaplan–Meier methods. LD was calculated as previously described ( 33 , 43 ). Risks due to CHEK2 mutation were estimated by a kin–cohort method, as previously described ( 23 ).  Yeast complementation assay  S. cerevisiae strain Y590 (delRad53::HIS3) and plasmid pMH267(2m LEU2 GAL- CHEK2 ) were kindly provided by S. J. Elledge ( 8 ). Site directed mutagenesis reactions were performed on the pMH267 plasmid using a QuikChange site directed mutagenesis kit (Stratagene, La Jolla, CA, USA) to create mutations S428F , P85L , 1100delC and E84E. The entire coding sequence of the CHEK2 gene in each of the mutated plasmids was determined in order to ensure that only the desired mutation was present. Using the same procedure, reverse mutagenesis was performed on the S428F plasmid to recreate the wild-type sequence plasmid (this plasmid was named ‘ F428S ’). Expression of all alleles was confirmed by RT–PCR of the plasmids (Supplementary Material, Fig. S1). All the mutated plasmids and pMH267 (wild-type CHEK2 ) were transformed into the Y590 yeast strain using YEASTMAKER System 2 (CLONTECH, Palo Alto, CA, USA). Colonies of Y590 and of each transformed strain were chosen and re-plated on an appropriate selective plate; Y590 (His − ) and CHEK2 variants (His − Leu − ). Three colonies from each plate were used to inoculate three tubes with 2 ml of galactose His − liquid media and tubes were incubated 16 h at 30°C with shaking 250 rpm. Each culture was diluted to 0.5 OD 600 and 20 µl of the diluted cultures were used to inoculate 1 ml of fresh galactose His − liquid media in disposable 3 ml spectrophotometer cuvets. The cuvets were incubated at 30°C with shaking 200 rpm. OD 600 was measured approximately every 5 h between 6 and 24 h.  ACKNOWLEDGEMENTS  We thank our participants and acknowledge support of the Breast Cancer Research Foundation, the Israel Cancer Research Foundation, Basker Family Foundation, Koodish Fellowship, Frankel Foundation, Lymphoma Foundation, Spiegel Family Research Fund, an American Cancer Society Research Professorship and NIH grants R01-CA27632 and R01-ES13160 and T32-AG00057.   Figure 1. Identification and characterization of mutations in the cell cycle regulator CHEK2. ( A ) Inherited variants CHEK2.254C > T and CHEK2.1283C > T were identified in constitutional DNA samples from familial breast cancer patients of Ashkenazi Jewish ancestry. ( B ) CHEK2.254C > T leads to the substitution of leucine for proline at codon 85, a site that is not highly conserved across species. CHEK2.1283C > T leads to the substitution of phenylalanine at residue 428, a highly conserved site in the kinase domain.  View largeDownload slide Figure 1. Identification and characterization of mutations in the cell cycle regulator CHEK2. ( A ) Inherited variants CHEK2.254C > T and CHEK2.1283C > T were identified in constitutional DNA samples from familial breast cancer patients of Ashkenazi Jewish ancestry. ( B ) CHEK2.254C > T leads to the substitution of leucine for proline at codon 85, a site that is not highly conserved across species. CHEK2.1283C > T leads to the substitution of phenylalanine at residue 428, a highly conserved site in the kinase domain.  Figure 2. Complementation tests in yeast indicated which variants of human CHEK2 abrogate normal protein function. Wild-type human CHEK2 complements deletion of Rad53 in yeast strain Y590 leading to exponential growth. Similarly, plasmids carrying human sequences CHEK2.E84E or CHEK2.P85L also complement deletion of Rad53 , indicating that these variants do not alter wild-type function of CHEK2. In contrast, plasmids carrying mutations CHEK2.S428F or CHEK2.1100delC do not complement deletion of Rad53 , leading to poor growth that is no better than Rad53 -deleted yeast with no complementary human CHEK2 gene and indicating that CHEK2.S428F and CHEK2.1100delC abrogate normal CHEK2 function.  View largeDownload slide Figure 2. Complementation tests in yeast indicated which variants of human CHEK2 abrogate normal protein function. Wild-type human CHEK2 complements deletion of Rad53 in yeast strain Y590 leading to exponential growth. Similarly, plasmids carrying human sequences CHEK2.E84E or CHEK2.P85L also complement deletion of Rad53 , indicating that these variants do not alter wild-type function of CHEK2. In contrast, plasmids carrying mutations CHEK2.S428F or CHEK2.1100delC do not complement deletion of Rad53 , leading to poor growth that is no better than Rad53 -deleted yeast with no complementary human CHEK2 gene and indicating that CHEK2.S428F and CHEK2.1100delC abrogate normal CHEK2 function.  Figure 3. Loss of the wild-type CHEK2 allele in invasive breast tumors of patients heterozygous for CHEK2.S428F. Patient 1 was heterozygous for D22S689 (alleles 206 and 214 bp) and tumor from this patient was hemizygous for D22S689.214. Patient 2 was heterozygous for D22S689 (alleles 202 and 214 bp) and D22S275 (alleles 271 and 276 bp) and tumor from this patient was hemizygous for D22S689.214 and D22S275.276. D22S689.214 and D22S275.276 are linked to CHEK2.S428F in all patients. In each tumor sample, markers linked to the wild-type allele of CHEK2 are lost.  View largeDownload slide Figure 3. Loss of the wild-type CHEK2 allele in invasive breast tumors of patients heterozygous for CHEK2.S428F. Patient 1 was heterozygous for D22S689 (alleles 206 and 214 bp) and tumor from this patient was hemizygous for D22S689.214. Patient 2 was heterozygous for D22S689 (alleles 202 and 214 bp) and D22S275 (alleles 271 and 276 bp) and tumor from this patient was hemizygous for D22S689.214 and D22S275.276. D22S689.214 and D22S275.276 are linked to CHEK2.S428F in all patients. In each tumor sample, markers linked to the wild-type allele of CHEK2 are lost.  Figure 4. Cumulative breast cancer incidence in relatives. Kaplan–Meier analysis was used to calculate cumulative breast cancer incidence among mothers, sisters and daughters of probands heterozygous for CHEK2.S428F , among the same relatives of probands heterozygous for CHEK2.P85L and among the same relatives of probands with wild-type sequences of CHEK2, BRCA1 and BRCA2. Cumulative risk to relatives of probands heterozygous for CHEK2.S428F was increased after age 50. As expected, risk to relatives of probands heterozygous for CHEK2.P85L was not increased. Breast cancer risk among women heterozygous for CHEK2.S428F was estimated by a kin-cohort method ( 23 ) to be 0.17 (±0.08 SE) by age 60.  View largeDownload slide Figure 4. Cumulative breast cancer incidence in relatives. Kaplan–Meier analysis was used to calculate cumulative breast cancer incidence among mothers, sisters and daughters of probands heterozygous for CHEK2.S428F , among the same relatives of probands heterozygous for CHEK2.P85L and among the same relatives of probands with wild-type sequences of CHEK2, BRCA1 and BRCA2. Cumulative risk to relatives of probands heterozygous for CHEK2.S428F was increased after age 50. As expected, risk to relatives of probands heterozygous for CHEK2.P85L was not increased. Breast cancer risk among women heterozygous for CHEK2.S428F was estimated by a kin-cohort method ( 23 ) to be 0.17 (±0.08 SE) by age 60.  Figure 5. Conserved haplotypes at the CHEK2 region of chromosome 22q12. The haplotype harboring CHEK2.S428F and the ancestral haplotype on which CHEK2.S428F arose are shown in green. The haplotype harboring CHEK2.P85L and the ancestral haplotype on which CHEK2.P85L arose are shown in yellow. Markers spanning 2.7 Mb flanking CHEK2 are indicated at the top of the figure and distances (kb) from CHEK2 are indicated at the bottom of the figure. Conserved alleles were defined by linkage disequilibrium ( D ′)>0.75 between adjacent markers and between each marker and D22S275. Blank entries for each haplotype indicate no conserved allele at that site. Haplotype blocks for a mixed European population ( 33 ) are shown in blue.  View largeDownload slide Figure 5. Conserved haplotypes at the CHEK2 region of chromosome 22q12. The haplotype harboring CHEK2.S428F and the ancestral haplotype on which CHEK2.S428F arose are shown in green. The haplotype harboring CHEK2.P85L and the ancestral haplotype on which CHEK2.P85L arose are shown in yellow. Markers spanning 2.7 Mb flanking CHEK2 are indicated at the top of the figure and distances (kb) from CHEK2 are indicated at the bottom of the figure. Conserved alleles were defined by linkage disequilibrium ( D ′)>0.75 between adjacent markers and between each marker and D22S275. Blank entries for each haplotype indicate no conserved allele at that site. Haplotype blocks for a mixed European population ( 33 ) are shown in blue. Table 1. CHEK2.S428F heterozygotes among Ashkenazi Jewish cases and controls  	N 	CHEK2.S428F carriers (%)  	OR (95% CI) 	P  Female breast cancer probands 	1632 	47 (2.88) 	2.13 (1.25, 3.63) 	0.004   Family history a of breast cancer  	766 	25 (3.26) 	2.42 (1.34, 4.51) 	0.003   Family history a of ovarian cancer  	141 	8 (5.67) 	4.32 (1.74, 10.38) 	0.002   Family history a of male breast cancer  	23 	2 (8.70) 	6.83 (0, 32.88) 	0.044  Ovarian cancer probands 	190 	4 (2.11) 	1.54 (0.45, 4.77) 	0.62  Male breast cancer probands 	26 	0 	0 	  Lymphoma probands 	415 	9 (2.16) 	1.59 (0.68, 3.46) 	0.34  Colon cancer probands 	185 	3 (1.62) 	1.18 (0.28, 4.19) 	0.74  Ashkenazi Jewish population controls 	1673 	23 (1.37) 	 	  Breast cancer patients of other ancestries 	768 	0 	 	  OR is odds ratio for each group of cases compared to population controls. CI is confidence interval.  a Family history is defined as ≥1 relative with cancer at the site indicated among parents, grandparents, siblings, children, aunts or uncles. Table 2. Frequencies of inherited mutations in BRCA1, BRCA2 and CHEK2 among Ashkenazi Jewish breast cancer patients Age at diagnosis (yrs) 	N 	BRCA1 (%) 	BRCA2 (%) 	CHEK2 (%) 	Total (%)  <40 	106 	26 (24.5) 	12 (11.3) 	2 (2.0) 	40 (37.7)  40–49 	322 	24 (7.5) 	14 (4.3) 	9 (2.8) 	47 (14.6)  50–59 	304 	15 (4.9) 	5 (1.6) 	15 (4.9) 	35 (11.5)  60+ 	276 	3 (1.1) 	6 (2.2) 	6 (2.2) 	15 (5.4)  All patients 	1008 	68 (6.7) 	37 (3.7) 	33 (3.3) 	138 (13.7)  Mutations included in the table are BRCA1.185delAG , BRCA1.5382insC , BRCA2.6174delT , CHEK2.1100delC , CHEK2.S428F , CHEK2.ivs2(+1)G > A . The table includes only participants from the New York Breast Cancer Study, because these subjects were screened for all three genes ( 3 ).  
303||The serine protease TMPRSS2 gene expression was studied by in situ hybridization using benign prostatic hyperplasia and prostate cancer tissue samples from 32 patients. Expression of TMPRSS2 gene was higher in cancer cells than that in benign cells in 84% of the specimens containing both benign and malignant tissues. The TMPRSS2 mRNA level was significantly increased in poorly differentiated (p = 0.014, n = 7) and untreated (p = 0.022, n = 13) primary prostate adenocarcinomas compared to benign tissues. In addition, androgen-deprivation therapy significantly decreased the expression of TMPRSS2 in benign prostate tissue (p = 0.07), which is in accordance with the androgen-inducible expression of the gene. The gene copy number of TMPRSS2, analyzed by competitively differential PCR, was duplicated in the malignant cells of about 38% of the prostate cancer patients analyzed. Thus, the increase in the gene copy number is probably not the primary reason for the detected overexpression of the TMPRSS2 gene. Mutations in the TMPRSS2 gene were screened using DNA isolated from paraffin-embedded prostate cancer tissues from 9 patients with aggressive prostate cancer and from 9 patients with nonaggressive disease. Thirteen exons covering the coding region were checked using enzymatic mutation detection and direct sequencing. One patient with aggressive prostate cancer carried a deletion and a stop codon in exon 11, leading to inactivation of the serine protease domain in TMPRSS2. © 2001 Wiley-Liss, Inc. TMPRSS2 is a membrane-bound serine protease.1 It is localized in human prostate luminal epithelium2 and is regulated by androgens.3 The TMPRSS2 gene encodes a type II transmembrane protein with serine protease, scavenger-receptor cysteine-rich (SRCR), LDL-receptor class A (LDLRA) and intracellular domains. Based on its structure, containing intra- and extracellular domains, TMPRSS2 could work as a receptor for specific ligand(s) mediating signals between the environment and the cell. Due to its high expression in prostate and prostate cancer, TMPRSS2 is a potential new marker of the disease. Recent work revealed the autocatalytical cleavage of TMPRSS2, leading to secretion of the protease domain into the sera of prostate-tumor bearing mice.4 Expression of the TMPRSS2 gene is decreased during transformation of LNCaP cells to androgen-independent clones. Furthermore, we have identified overexpression of MxA and MxB genes located close to the TMPRSS2 gene at 21q22.3, indicating that this chromosomal locus is vulnerable to regulatory changes during transformation.5 Nevertheless, this area is not frequently affected by chromosomal rearrangements in prostate cancer.6, 7 However, LNCaP prostate cancer cell line variants do show loss at 21q associated with androgen independence.8  Recently, several new kallikrein family members have been connected to different forms of human cancer. The link between kallikreins and TMPRSS2 is serine protease activity, which is probably involved in malignant processes. For example, prostase (KLK4) is suggested to be associated with prostate cancer,9 and KLK15, one of the most recently discovered kallikrein genes, is upregulated in this disease.10KLK-L4 in turn is downregulated in breast cancer.11 One important task in the future will be to clarify the exact functions of kallikreins and other types of serine proteases during the initiation and progression of cancer.  The aim of our study was to clarify the expression of TMPRSS2 gene in human prostate cancer samples with varying degrees of differentiation using in situ hybridization. Further, screening for mutations in the TMPRSS2 coding region was carried out using an enzymatic mutation detection method and direct sequencing. TMPRSS2 gene copy numbers in the specimens were studied by competitively differential PCR. MATERIAL AND METHODS  Subjects and specimens  For in situ hybridization analyses, 9 patients with benign prostatic hyperplasia (BPH) and 23 patients with adenocarcinoma of the prostate undergoing radical prostatectomy or transurethral resection of the prostate were selected. These patients were separate from those selected for mutation analyses because of limited availability of patient material for this study. The samples of endocrine-treated patients were from local recurrent tumors representing progressive disease, based on local tumor growth and a prostate-specific antigen (PSA) increase (Table II, patient nos. 3, 12–15, 20 and 23) or local tumor growth alone without a remarkable PSA increase (patient nos. 19, 21 and 22). Samples used for in situ hybridization were uniformly processed to paraffin blocks.  Mutation analysis of TMPRSS2 exons was carried out in tissues from 18 prostate cancer patients undergoing radical prostatectomy or transurethral resection of the prostate. All tumor specimens were from primary sites. The patients were classified according to the TNM classification system (T1M0, 4 patients; T3M0, 6 patients; T4M0, 3 patients; T3M1, 2 patients; T4M1, 3 patients).12 The tumor stage was determined as described earlier.13 Four of the patients were operated upon because of recurrent disease after endocrine therapy and the remaining 14 patients in the study had primary tumors. Tumors without local progression or metastases and all grade I tumors were considered clinically to be nonaggressive (9 patients). The disease of 9 of the patients was considered clinically aggressive, i.e., tumors with local metastases or progression and grade II and III tumors. An additional 14 samples from clinically aggressive cases were used for direct sequencing of exon 11. Histopathologic examination was used to confirm that in the tumor specimens used in the study, at least 60% of the cells were malignant. After dissecting the specimens from paraffin blocks, the DNA was extracted using a standard protocol.14 For controls, DNA obtained from benign prostatic tissue or peripheral blood leukocytes was used.  The Ethics Council of the Medical Faculty accepted the original research plan at the University of Oulu. In situ hybridization  In situ hybridization of TMPRSS2 was carried out as described earlier.15 Preservation of RNA in the samples was confirmed by glyceraldehyde-3-phosphate-dehydrogenase (accession number [AC] X02231) antisense probe.2 The epithelial and stromal signal densities of TMPRSS2 expression in the form of silver grains per area were measured from in situ hybridized sections with an MCID M4 3.0 digital image analyzer (Imaging Research, St. Catharines, ON, Canada), using a method similar to that described by Kainu et al.16 In prostate cancer samples, signal density was measured separately in benign and malignant epithelium and stroma from 5 separate, randomly picked, 40× objective fields of specimens without knowledge of tumor grade or treatment. The mean of the 5 values was taken as the transcript level of TMPRSS2 in the sample. The expression values in the stroma represented the background and were subtracted from the respective epithelial signal values in every sample. The sense probe of TMPRSS2 was used as a negative control. Statistical analyses were carried out using SPSS for Windows (SPSS Inc.). Mutation analysis and direct sequencing  The primers used for PCR and sequencing and annealing temperatures for specific primer pairs are presented in Table I. PCR reactions contained 250 ng of template DNA, 100 ng of each of 2 primers, 4 nmol of each deoxynucleotide triphosphate (Amersham Pharmacia Biotech, Little Chalfont, UK), 1× PCR Gold buffer (Applied Biosystems, Foster City, CA), 1.5 mM MgCl2 and 1.9 units of AmpliTaq Gold DNA-polymerase (Applied Biosystems) in a final volume of 50 μl. Forty PCR cycles were carried out (GeneAmp 9600 thermal cycler, Perkin-Elmer, Norwalk, CT). Analysis of TMPRSS2 DNA sequence was then performed, either by enzymatic mutation detection (PASSPORT Mutation Scanning Kit, Amersham Pharmacia Biotech), exactly as recommended by the manufacturer, or by direct sequencing of the PCR products, or by both methods if the mutation was detected by using the PASSPORT kit. For direct sequencing, the PCR products were purified from excess primers and nucleotides by using a single-step ExoI/SAP method.17 Both strands of the PCR products were sequenced.  Table I. Primers for PCR and Sequencing Exon	Nucleotides in AP001610	Primers 5′ to 3′	Annealing temperature (°C) 1	64550–64772	CTGGTATGGAAATATTACAGTCCTG	59 GCGTTCCCTACAAATAGCCC 2	60872–61170	GGAAATAAACACAAAGAGAATCCTAC	59 TGTAACCCTTTAGTGCAAATAAGAG 3	55846–56162	CACTGGGTACATTCTAAATGCTTTA	59 ACGTTGCACTCTCCTCCTTC 4	54906–55221	AGTCCCTTCCCAAGGTTAAGGC	57 GGTGACAGAATGAGACTTCATCTCAAAAAC 5	46968–47246	TGTTTCTGCTGTCTGTTACTGTCAC	63 ATCAGACCACTGCACTTCAGCC 6	45520–45880	CAGCCACTTCCTATGAATAAACC	55 GGATTTGTGTTTGCTTATGCC 7	43098–43269	GGGGACTCCAGATGAACTTAC	54 CAGAAGACAGGAGAGGGAAC 8	39791–40133	GAGACCTGCTCAAGGTCACAGGGT	60 TTGCAGCCTGGGAGACCCTTGG 9	38257–38612	TCTTGCCTCCAGCTTCTGAC	57 CCCTTCCATTTGGCATAGCAC 10	37133–37563	GAACCCAATGCTCCATCTG	57 GGTCACCTGGAGATATGTAATTTTG 11	34850–35199	TCTGCTGACCCCAAGAATG	57 TGGAGAATAGGGCTGTGAC 12	34196–34550	AGCAGAACCACGCCTAACAG	57 CCACACAGTCACTCGTAACTC 13	32612–32866	TCATGCACGGGGAAGCAAAACC	61 ATGCTCAGCCTGACTCTGACCAAC An ABI Prism BigDye Terminator Cycle Sequencing Ready Reaction Kit (Applied Biosystems) was used for sequencing the samples. They were loaded on a 5% Long Ranger gel (FMC Bio Products) and run in an ABI Prism 377 DNA Sequencer (Perkin Elmer). The results were analyzed by using DNA Sequencing Analysis 3.3 software (Applied Biosystems).  The PCR product of exon 11, containing a 7 bp deletion, was further TA-cloned (TOPO TA-cloning Kit, Invitrogen, Carlsbad, CA) and transformants were isolated using standard protocols for sequence confirmation. Gene amplification study  Putative TMPRSS2 amplification was analyzed by competitively differential PCR18 using DNA isolated from benign and malignant tissues of 13 prostate cancer patients. Six of the patients were the same as in expression studies (patients 4, 6–9 and 16), while the rest (patients 24–30) were among the aggressive cases in mutation screenings. The primers 5′-CCTAGTACTGTGAGGCACT-3′ and 5′-CACAACTCCAGTGCCACTA-3′ were used to amplify the TMPRSS2 genomic sequence (AC AP001610) between the nucleotides 65471 and 65107. The composite primers (5′-CCTAGTACTGTGAGGCACTAGGCTCCTGGCATCAGGA-3′ and 5′-CACAACTCCAGTGCCACTACAGGGAAGGGTGCGGTAT-3′) containing the respective TMPRSS2 sequences followed by the reference gene sequences at 3′ parts were used to amplify a single copy reference gene, placental-like alkaline phosphatase (PLAP, AC X66947), between nt 74 and 335. Two hundred nanograms of genomic DNA were used as a template in a 50 μl PCR reaction containing 1× PCR buffer, 1.5 mM MgCl2, 0.08 mM dNTP, 0.4 μM of each of the 2 sets of primers and 2.5 U of the AmpliTaq Gold enzyme (Perkin Elmer). A total of 40 cycles (95°C, 60 sec; 58°C, 60 sec; 72°C, 120 sec) were performed. Equal aliquots of the PCR reactions were run in 2% agarose gel containing ethidium bromide. The gels were photographed and the optical densities of the PCR products with lengths of 262 nt and 365 nt were determined by a laser scanner (Molecular Dynamics, Sunnyvale, CA). The ratio of optical densities for the TMPRSS2 and PLAP PCR products was counted for each specimen. The relative gene copy number was determined by dividing the TMPRSS2/PLAP by the average TMPRSS2/PLAP in benign tissues. The gene copy number was estimated using the relative gene copy number 1.17 (the highest relative gene copy number in the BPH sample) as a cutoff point for duplication of the gene content. RESULTS  Expression studies of TMPRSS2 gene  Our previous studies indicated differential expression of the TMPRSS2 gene in LNCaP cell line variants, reflecting androgen-dependent and -independent states of prostate cancer.5 Here we have extended the expression studies, using in situ hybridization and transcript quantification, to patient samples containing both benign prostate tissue and prostate cancer. Figure 1 shows prostatic expression of TMPRSS2 gene detected by in situ hybridization analysis in endocrine-treated and untreated prostate cancer patients. Hybridization with the sense probe gave only low background signals (data not shown). The mean expression value (silver grains per area) of TMPRSS2 in stroma for all the samples was only 0.01 ± 0.01 (range 0.00–0.05). In 9 BPH patients, the mean value of TMPRSS2 transcripts in the epithelium was 0.18 ± 0.09 (mean ±S.D.), ranging from 0.02 to 0.34. Respective mean values for prostate cancer samples were 0.38 ± 0.26 (range 0.03–0.85) and 0.13 ± 0.09 (range 0.04–0.25) for benign tissue from untreated and endocrine-treated disease, respectively. In untreated prostate cancer tissue, the mean value for TMPRSS2 expression in malignant epithelium was 0.67 ± 0.39 (range 0.18–1.49) and the respective value in endocrine-treated prostate cancer tissue was 0.59 ± 0.50 (range 0.07–1.23). In the prostate cancer specimens where both benign and cancer tissues were present, TMPRSS2 mRNA level (Table II) was higher in malignant areas than that in benign areas in 16 of 19 cases.  Figure 1.  Figure 1.  Open in figure viewer Expression of TMPRSS2 gene in human prostate. In situ hybridization of TMPRSS2 antisense probe in benign (a,c) and malignant (b,d) areas of tissue samples from endocrine-treated (a,b) and untreated (c,d) prostate cancer patients. Panels a,b and c,d represent different areas of the same section from 2 specimens (patients 14 and 17, respectively). Scale bar = 20 μm. Table II. Clinicopathologic Data and Epithelial TMPRSS2 mRNA Levels of Prostate Cancer Patients Patient ID	Tumor grade	Treatment	Cancerous prostate	Benign prostate Expression values were determined as described in Material and Methods. *Patient 3 was treated with a flutamide-LHRH-agonist combination, patient 19 by orchiectomy-polyestradiol phosphate and patient 20 with the antiandrogen bicalutamide. Samples of treated patients were from local recurrent prostate tumors. n/a, not available. 1	I	—	1.50	0.43 2	I	—	1.27	0.62 3	II	*	0.07	0.04 4	II	—	0.43	0.03 5	II	—	0.33	0.21 6	II	—	0.46	0.33 7	II	—	0.56	0.15 8	II	—	0.18	0.23 9	II	—	0.99	0.86 10	II	—	0.81	0.50 11	II	—	0.22	0.86 12	II	Goserelin	0.38	0.10 13	III	Goserelin	1.19	0.08 14	III	Goserelin	0.47	0.11 15	III	Goserelin	0.22	0.26 16	III	—	0.57	0.15 17	III	—	0.81	0.24 18	III	—	0.78	0.52 19	III	*	1.21	n/a 20	III	*	0.79	n/a 21	III	Orchiectomy	1.18	n/a 22	III	Orchiectomy	0.30	n/a 23	III	Orchiectomy	1.26	0.26 Figure 2 shows box plots of the epithelium expression values in BPH tissues and untreated and endocrine-treated prostate cancer. As seen in Figure 2, the expression level of TMPRSS2 in BPH samples and benign areas in prostate cancer was lower than in malignant epithelium. The difference between benign and malignant epithelium was also statistically significant within untreated prostate cancer samples (paired differences, mean 0.29 [95% CI 0.05–0.53], p = 0.022, n = 13). In prostate cancer samples from endocrine-treated patients (surgical or chemical castration), the difference appeared to be even more prominent, but it lacked statistical significance, probably because of the small number of samples (n = 6) and higher benign epithelium expression in the case of patient 15. Patients 19–22 had high expression in malignant epithelium but were excluded from the statistical analyses because of lack of benign tissue in the samples. Expression in benign areas of endocrine-treated samples was lower than in untreated samples (mean difference 0.25 [95% CI 0.08–0.42], p = 0.007). The difference between endocrine-treated and untreated benign samples was also significant when BPH samples were included in the group of untreated cancer samples (mean difference 0.17 [95% CI 0.04–0.29], p = 0.011).  Figure 2.  Figure 2.  Open in figure viewer Box plot of TMPRSS2 mRNA levels in epithelia of benign prostatic hyperplasia (BPH) and prostate cancer (PC) samples. Data from BPH patients and PC patients with untreated and endocrine-treated (surgical or chemical castration) disease are shown separately. *, p = 0.022 (paired t-test) for malignant epithelium vs. benign epithelium in untreated prostate cancer samples; ◊, p = 0.007 for benign epithelium in endocrine-treated samples vs. benign epithelium in untreated prostate cancer samples; ▪, p = 0.011 for benign epithelium in endocrine-treated samples vs. benign epithelium in BPH and untreated prostate cancer samples together. Epithelial values of TMPRSS2 mRNA and their association with tumor grade are shown in Figure 3. Only 2 of the patients had grade I prostate cancer with mean TMPRSS2 expression values of 0.53 in benign and 1.39 in malignant epithelium. Grade II specimens did not show statistical significance between benign and malignant epithelial mRNA levels of TMPRSS2 (paired differences, mean 0.11 [95% CI 0.11–0.33], p = 0.276, n = 10). On the contrary, in poorly differentiated carcinomas (grade III), the expression difference between benign and malignant epithelium was statistically significant (paired differences, mean 0.53 [95% CI 0.15–0.90], p = 0.014, n = 7). In the group of grade III carcinomas, patients 17 and 18 had nonaggressive disease and the remaining 11 patients had aggressive disease.  Figure 3.  Figure 3.  Open in figure viewer Scatter plot of TMPRSS2 mRNA levels in benign (B) and malignant (M) epithelium and association with tumor grade (I–III). Data from all 23 prostate cancer and all 9 prostatic hyperplasia (BPH) patients are shown. Samples from patients without chemical treatment of prostate cancer (o) and from endocrine-treated patients (surgical or chemical castration, or antiandrogen) (+). Mutation analysis of TMPRSS2 gene  Since TMPRSS2 is differentially expressed in prostate cancer, it is a potential gene disturbed during malignant transformation. We therefore studied the coding region of it for the presence of mutations in prostate cancer samples representing both aggressive (9 patients) and nonaggressive (9 patients) disease. Direct sequencing of the TMPRSS2 coding region in prostate cancer samples revealed one 7 bp deletion spanning nucleotides 1228–1234 (AC U75329) in exon 11 in a sample of aggressive prostate cancer. The patient concerned had grade III progressive prostate cancer despite treatment with goserelin, estramustine and fosfestrol, in chronological order. An additional 14 samples from prostate cancer patients with aggressive disease were analyzed for the presence of this deletion (data not shown), but it was not detected in any. Deletion was present in 5 of 6 TA clones representing the pool of PCR products derived from the sample. A control sample of benign prostate tissue from the same individual did not have the deletion on the basis of direct sequencing, indicating the somatic type of the mutation. Deletion starts at the border of an exon-intron splice site, leading to a frame shift and a stop codon in exon 11 and thus the wild-type (wt) GKTSE sequence (amino acid [aa] 391 onwards) is replaced by AQKC. The consequence of the deletion is a truncated protein, containing 394 aa instead of 492 aa in wt protein. This mutant protein has lost a total of 98 aa from the C-terminus at the protease domain.  Polymorphism, in other words nucleotide changes both in normal and malignant DNA samples, was detected in several positions (Table III). Change of CA to TG at nucleotide position 280–281 was detected in 2 of 18 samples. This polymorphism leads to a Thr75→Met75 change. Polymorphism was also detected in nucleotides 824 (C→T) and 833 (T→C) in 14 of 18 and 6 of 18 samples analyzed, respectively. Nucleotide 534 A→G polymorphism leads to Met160→Val160 replacement, which was detected in 16 of 18 samples. One of the 6 benign control samples analyzed was shown to be heterozygous for this position. Polymorphism was also detected at nucleotide 1211 (G→T) in 3 of 18 samples. At nucleotide positions 403 and 1527, C was replaced by G and A by G, respectively, in all samples analyzed (18 of 18), so it is likely to be an error in the published cDNA sequence (AC U75329). It does not, however, affect the amino acid sequence in the case of nucleotide 403. Nucleotide 1527 change, on the other hand, leads to Asn491→Asp491 reposition. In addition, this nucleotide 1527 change A→G was also present in the genomic sequence (AC AP001610).  Table III. Polymorphism Detected in TMPRSS2 Coding Region Nucleotides in TMPRSS2 cDNA (AC U75329)	Nucleotide change	Prevalence	Amino acid change 280–281	CA→TG	2/18	Thr75→Met75 534	A→G	16/18	Met160→Val160 824	C→T	14/18	— 833	T→C	6/18	— 1211	G→T	3/18	— Gene amplification analysis of TMPRSS2  Gene amplification is a common reason for the overexpression of a gene in malignant tissues. We evaluated the possibility of TMPRSS2 amplification by competitively differential PCR18 in 13 prostate cancer patients (Table IV). The gene copy number was found to be duplicated in the malignant cells of 5 patients compared to the respective benign cells in about 38% of the examined cases. Patients 4, 6 and 7 with 14.3- 1.4- and 3.7-fold overexpression of TMPRSS2 in the prostate cancer area (Table II), respectively, all showed duplication of the gene content. However, gene amplification was not evident in, for instance, patient 16, who had 3.8-fold increase in TMPRSS2 expression between benign and malignant prostate tissues (Table II). Interestingly, the patient (27, Table IV) with the deletion in the serine protease domain also had duplication in the gene copy number of TMPRSS2 in prostate cancer tissue.  Table IV. Gene Amplification Study Patient ID	Tissue type	TMPRSS2/PLAP1	Relative gene copy number2	Gene copy number3 1Average ratio ± range of optical densities for competitively differential PCR products of TMPRSS2 and PLAP from 2 to 4 independent experiments. 2TMPRSS2/PLAP divided by the average of TMPRSS2/PLAP for benign tissues (1.39). 3The relative gene copy numbers higher than the cutoff point value of 1.17 represent duplication of the TMPRSS2 gene copy number per haploid genome. 4	BPH	1.45 ± 0.18	1.04	1 Ca	2.19 ± 0.38	1.57	2 6	BPH	1.43 ± 0.17	1.03	1 Ca	2.19 ± 0.02	1.57	2 7	BPH	1.24 ± 0.10	0.89	1 Ca	1.87 ± 0.07	1.34	2 8	BPH	1.62 ± 0.14	1.16	1 Ca	1.62 ± 0.15	1.16	1 9	BPH	1.63 ± 0.23	1.17	1 Ca	1.53 ± 0.76	1.1	1 16	BPH	1.25 ± 0.07	0.9	1 Ca	1.43 ± 0.03	1.03	1 24	BPH	1.38 ± 0.28	0.99	1 Ca	1.48 ± 0.15	1.06	1 25	BPH	1.17 ± 0.14	0.84	1 Ca	1.11 ± 0.15	0.8	1 26	BPH	1.41 ± 0.25	1.01	1 Ca	1.32 ± 0.04	0.95	1 27	BPH	1.24 ± 0.05	0.89	1 Ca	1.90 ± 0.26	1.36	2 28	BPH	1.33 ± 0.01	0.96	1 Ca	1.62 ± 0.08	1.17	1 29	BPH	1.45 ± 0.27	1.04	1 Ca	1.45 ± 0.34	1.04	1 30	BPH	1.51 ± 0.22	1.09	1 Ca	1.84 ± 0.52	1.32	2 DISCUSSION  Our present study shows that TMPRSS2 expression is significantly increased in poorly differentiated (grade III) primary prostate adenocarcinomas. This result is similar to the recent finding of the higher transcript levels of the KLK15 gene usually seen in prostate cancer patients with late-stage disease and tumors of higher grade.11 On the other hand, our results from cell line variants of LNCaP indicated downregulation of TMPRSS2 mRNA in androgen-independent LNCaP cells,5 which is why the results are somewhat contradictory. However, the LNCaP cell line has been derived from a lymph node metastasis of prostate cancer and the changes in expression detected in LNCaP cells are not comparable to the expression in prostate tissue in every case, as shown in our previous study.5 Prostate cancer tissue is usually heterogeneous and the presence of androgen-independent clones with characteristics similar to those seen in androgen-independent LNCaP cells thus cannot be excluded.  Approximately 38% of the prostate cancer patients studied showed duplication of the TMPRSS2 gene copy number in malignant cells. However, the amount of samples with increased gene copy number was expected to be higher if it were the main reason for the overexpression. Thus, other events, such as regulatory actions, are also important for the overexpression of the TMPRSS2 gene in prostate cancer.  It is difficult to show a connection between TMPRSS2 expression and the hormone dependency of prostate cancer. However, in some endocrine-treated samples, e.g., nos. 13 and 23, expression of TMPRSS2 in cancerous areas was exceptionally high, whereas expression in benign areas within the same sample was low. This may have been due to interference in androgen regulation in cancer cells of these samples, because expression of TMPRSS2 has been shown to be downregulated in the absence of androgens,3 as seen in the benign areas of respective samples. It is possible that the androgen-receptor pathway is reactivated through nonligand signaling in the malignant areas of these samples. Also the increase of PSA in the serum of these patients supports the possibility of the androgen-receptor action.  Lately, abundant evidence has indicated the differential expression of serine proteases in several types of malignancy. We were here able to show that mutation is an additional way to disturb the function of serine proteases during prostate cancer progression. The detected deletion of the TMPRSS2 gene leads to remarkable changes in the serine protease domain of the protein. Among the residues deleted are Asp435 and Ser,441,441 known to be important for substrate binding and catalysis. Furthermore, mutation of Ser441 leads to loss of autocatalytic cleavage of TMPRSS2 protein.4 Thus this deletion abolishes the trypsin-like activity of the TMPRSS2 protease domain. For the moment, the physiologic function of TMPRSS2 is unknown, but probably the serine protease domain plays a central role in the function of the protein. Some serine proteases belonging to the kallikrein family, such as PSA and normal epithelial cell-specific-1 (NES1) gene have been connected to prevention of malignant processes of cells. A recent report shows that PSA has antiangiogenic activity,19 while NES1 is suggested to be a tumor suppressor.20 Overexpression of the TMPRSS2 gene, as shown here, together with the fact that genomic rearrangements such as a loss of heterozygosity are uncommon at the locus of this gene, suggest that TMPRSS2 does not fulfill all the criteria of a potential tumor suppressor. However, both an increase and a decrease5 in the expression of this gene and inactivation of the serine protease domain of this protein are events taking place in abnormal biologic conditions. The possible existence of mutations at metastatic sites, as seen, for example, with PTEN/MMAC1,21 remains to be resolved.  Polymorphism leading to amino acid changes was detected in intracellular (Thr75→Met75) and SRCR-like (Met160→Val160) domains. Thr75 is not conserved between human and mouse TMPRSS2,2, 22 and is thus probably not an essential residue for proper function of the protein. The respective residue for Met160 is Val in mouse TMPRSS2, suggesting a neutral role for this replacement also. However, possible modifications in the function of TMPRSS2 due to the reported polymorphism remain to be investigated.  In summary, we found increased TMPRSS2 expression in malignant prostate tissue compared to benign tissue. The results also indicated one mutation in the TMPRSS2 coding region in an aggressive prostate cancer sample. This deletion abolishes the catalytic activity of the serine protease domain in TMPRSS2, but the exact effect of enzyme inactivation on the normal function of the cell remains to be resolved. Differential expression of TMPRSS2 mRNA in benign prostatic hyperplasia and prostate cancer points to the potential significance of this gene in prostate cancer. Further studies, using specific antibodies, are needed to clarify TMPRSS2 expression in the prostate and to illustrate the significance of the reported overexpression for diagnostic purposes.  Prostate cancer has been the second leading cause of cancer-related deaths of men in the USA for the past two decades.[1] In 2007, the incidence of cancer in Japanese men was highest for cancer of the stomach, followed by lung, colon and rectum, prostate, and liver. The incidence and mortality rates of prostate cancer were 29.4 per 100 000 population and 5.2 per 100 000 population based on the world standard population.[2] In 2012, prostate cancer was the seventh leading cause of death in Japanese men, with a mortality rate based on the world standard population of 4.8 per 100 000 population (http://ganjoho.jp/professional/statistics/statistics.html).    Overexpression of ERG (21q22.3) and ETV1 (7p21.2) were first identified in prostate cancer by gene expression microarray. Further studies showed that fusions of TMPRSS2 (21q22.3) to the ERG and ETV1 genes were the cause of the overexpression of these transcripts.[3] TMPRSS2 encodes a protein that belongs to the serine protease family. The encoded protein contains a type II transmembrane domain, a receptor class A domain, a scavenger receptor cysteine-rich domain and a protease domain. TMPRSS2 expression was found to be upregulated by androgenic hormones in prostate cancer cells, and downregulated in androgen-independent prostate cancer tissue (http://genome.ucsc.edu/index.html). ERG and ETV1 encode members of the erythroblast transformation-specific family of transcription factors. All members of this family are proto-oncogenes, as they are key regulators of embryonic development, cell proliferation, differentiation, angiogenesis, inflammation and apoptosis.[4, 5]    The fusion of the androgen-regulated TMPRSS2 gene with the transcription factor ERG gene is a common occurrence in prostate cancer. The fusion gene arises by translocation or interstitial deletion joining the promoter and 5′ portions of the TMPRSS2 gene with the coding sequences of the ERG gene; TMPRSS2-ERG gene fusion can be accompanied by gene duplication. Overexpression of ERG resulting from gene fusion and gene amplification might directly cause increased proliferation, apoptosis, migration and angiogenesis in prostate cancers. Overexpression of ERG could also indirectly modulate the growth of prostate cancer cells by upregulating the C-MYC oncogene, and by abrogating the differentiation of prostate epithelium.[3, 6-8]    The presence of TMPRSS2–ERG in prostate cancers has been associated with more aggressive biological behavior and poorer prognosis.[9, 10] The presence of multiple copies of TMPRSS2-ERG has been associated with decreased prostate cancer survival.[11] The prevalence of TMPRSS2–ERG-associated prostate cancer in Japanese men is lower than that of Caucasian or African American men.[12, 13] Nevertheless, in Japanese men, there is a positive correlation between TMPRSS2-ERG and a Gleason score 7 or less and patient age, but there is no correlation between TMPRSS2-ERG and T stage or PSA level.[13]    The variant T allele of the TMPRSS2 single nucleotide polymorphism, rs12329760, resulting in Met160Val has been reported to be significantly associated with fusion by translocation and the presence of multiple copies of TMPRSS2-ERG fusion.[14] Nevertheless, the association between the TMPRSS2 Met160Val polymorphism and prostate cancer has been inconclusive. Lubieniecka et al. observed no significant differences in the TMPRSS2 Met160Val genotype frequencies between prostate cancer cases and controls (i.e. prostate cancer cases: 60% CC, 35% CT, 6% TT; controls: 59% CC, 35% CT, 6% TT). Furthermore, they did not find any association between the TMPRSS2 Met160Val genotypes and T stage, tumor grade, or tumor aggressiveness.[15] Giri et al. showed that the frequency of Met160Val differed significantly with self-identified race and ethnicity. The genotype frequencies were 67% CC and 33% CT/TT among Caucasian men, whereas 49% CC and 51% CT/TT genotypes among African American men. Furthermore, Giri et al. found no association between the TMPRSS2 Met160Val genotypes and the time interval between enrolment and prostate cancer diagnosis in African American men; however, they observed a statistically significant difference between the TMPRSS2 Met160Val genotypes and the time interval between enrolment and prostate cancer diagnosis in Caucasian men with a family history of prostate cancer.[16] Caucasian men with the CT/TT genotypes compared with the CC genotype had a shorter time interval between enrolment and diagnosis.[16]    The aim of the present study was to determine whether the TMPRSS2 Met160Val polymorphism was associated with the risk of sporadic prostate cancer and latent prostate cancer diagnosed at autopsy in native Japanese men.  Methods    Patients with sporadic prostate cancer    A total of 518 native Japanese male patients with clinically detected sporadic prostate cancer were enrolled. Familial prostate cancer cases were not included in the present study. The details of sporadic prostate cancer samples have been described elsewhere.[17] Briefly, all patients were cases confirmed by pathology to have adenocarcinoma of the prostate, and were treated at the University of Tokyo Hospital or one of its affiliated hospitals in the period between January 1999 and August 2009. Clinicopathological data including age, baseline PSA level, Gleason score, clinical T stage and the presence of distant metastasis were collected. Genomic DNA samples were extracted from peripheral blood specimens of these patients. Timing of blood extraction varied from patient to patient. Usually, we extracted 10 mL peripheral blood from each patient once just after pathological diagnosis of prostate cancer. Some of the patients had 10 mL peripheral blood extracted during the treatment for prostate cancer. Then, we extracted germline DNA samples from patients' blood specimens on the same day. The study was carried out with the approval from the Ethics Committee of the University of Tokyo and from the internal review boards of the affiliated hospitals. Written informed consent was obtained from each patient.  Controls and patients with latent prostate cancer    We also examined 433 residence-matched Japanese men as controls who had no evidence of malignancy throughout their lifetime confirmed by autopsy, as well as 154 Japanese men who were diagnosed as having latent prostate cancer based on autopsy results. Controls and latent prostate cancer subjects are registered in the database of Japanese single nucleotide polymorphisms for geriatric research.[18] Genomic DNA samples of these individuals were extracted from frozen normal kidney tissues. The present study was also reviewed and approved by the Ethics Committee of the Tokyo Metropolitan Geriatric Hospital. Written informed consent was obtained from the patients' family members under the Act of Postmortem Examination.  Genotyping    Genotyping of the TMPRSS2 Met160Val polymorphism (rs12329760, NM_005656.3 c.478C>T) was carried out by allelic discrimination using a fluorescent-based TaqMan assay. The concentration of genomic DNA was adjusted to 100 ng/μL. Real-time polymerase chain reaction analysis was carried out using the TaqMan probe (C_25622353_20; Applied Biosystems, Foster City, CA, USA) as described by Giri et al. and according to the manufacturer's instructions with an ABI PRISM 7300 Real Time PCR system (Applied Biosystems).[16]  Statistical analyses    Statistical analyses were carried out using jmp software, version 9.0.0 (SAS, Cary, NC, USA). The χ2-test was used to examine the Hardy–Weinberg equilibriums, as well as to compare the Gleason scores, the distribution of clinical T stages and the presence of distant metastasis. The Tukey–Kramer test was used to compare the age distributions between patient and control groups. To estimate the OR and 95% CI, logistic regression analyses were carried out using age as a covariate to statistically adjust for its potential confounding effect. anova was used to compare age and baseline PSA levels among cases. Survival was measured from the date of the diagnosis of prostate cancer to the date of death. The end of observation period was November 1, 2012. The prostate cancer-specific survival and overall survival curves were drawn using the Kaplan–Meier method, and statistical significance was analyzed using a log–rank test. The hazard ratios and the 95% CI were estimated using the Cox proportional hazard model. A P-value of less than 0.05 was considered statistically significant.  Results    The characteristics of the control, sporadic prostate cancer and latent prostate cancer groups are summarized in Table 1. The age distributions of the control, sporadic prostate cancer and latent prostate cancer groups were significantly different (P < 0.001). Distributions of Gleason score and clinical T stage among sporadic prostate cancer and latent prostate cancer were also significantly different (P < 0.001).    Table 1. Patient characteristics   	 	Control (n = 433)	Sporadic prostate cancer (n = 518)	Latent prostate cancer (n = 154)	P-value  –, Not applicable.  Age (years)	Median	79	70	81	<0.001  Range	48 to 100	48 to 89	66 to 98  Baseline PSA (ng/mL)	Median	–	16.8	–	–  Range	–	1.1 to 8492	–	–  Gleason score	6 or less	–	123	32	<0.001  7	–	211	93  8 or more	–	184	29  Clinical T stage	T1-T2	–	209	116	<0.001  T3-T4	–	309	38  Distant metastasis	Yes	–	135	–	–  No	–	383	–	–  Table 2 describes the genotype and allele frequencies of the TMPRSS2 Met160Val polymorphism (rs12329760). Genotyping was successful for all participants. The distribution of genotypes in each group did not deviate from the Hardy–Weinberg equilibrium. The T allele frequency of the control group was 0.372, of the sporadic prostate cancer group was 0.435 and of the latent prostate cancer group was 0.370 (P = 0.009). The CT and TT genotypes were significantly associated with the risk of sporadic prostate cancer; age-adjusted OR (95% CI) were 1.418 (1.027−1.960) for CT, 1.907 (1.224−2.990) for TT and 1.524 (1.123−2.072) for CT/TT genotypes. In contrast, the CT and TT genotypes were not significantly associated with the risk of latent prostate cancer; age-adjusted OR (95% CI) were 1.091 (0.732–1.633) for CT, 0.838 (0.445–1.526) for TT and 1.034 (0.706–1.521) for CT/TT genotypes (Table 3).    Table 2. Genotype and allele frequencies of the TMPRSS2 Met160Val polymorphism   	Control (n = 433)	Sporadic prostate cancer (n = 518)	Latent prostate cancer (n = 154)	P-value  n	%	n	%	n	%  Genotype (encoded amino acids)  CC (Val/Val)	170	39.3%	161	31.1%	58	37.7%	P = 0.035  CT (Val/Met)	204	47.1%	263	50.8%	78	50.6%  TT (Met/Met)	59	13.6%	94	18.1%	18	11.7%  Allele  C allele	544	62.8%	585	56.5%	194	63.0%	P = 0.009  T allele	322	37.2%	451	43.5%	114	37.0%  Hardy–Weinberg equilibrium  χ2	0.032	0.555	1.146	   P-value	0.859	0.456	0.284	   Table 3. Genotypic and allelic analyses of prostate cancer risk  Genotype	Control vs sporadic prostate cancer	Control vs latent prostate cancer  Unadjusted	Age-adjusted	Unadjusted	Age-adjusted  OR	95% CI	P-value	OR	95% CI	P-value	OR	95% CI	P-value	OR	95% CI	P-value  CC	1.0	Reference	 	1.0	Reference	 	1.0	Reference	 	1.0	Reference	   CT	1.361	1.026–1.807	0.032	1.418	1.027–1.960	0.034	1.121	0.755–1.670	0.572	1.091	0.732–1.633	0.669  TT	1.682	1.141–2.494	0.008	1.907	1.224–2.990	0.004	0.894	0.478–1.616	0.716	0.838	0.445–1.526	0.570  CT+TT	1.433	1.097–1.875	0.008	1.524	1.123–2.072	0.007	1.070	0.734–1.568	0.726	1.034	0.706–1.521	0.866  Allele	Control vs sporadic prostate cancer	Control vs latent prostate cancer  Unadjusted	Age-adjusted	Unadjusted	Age-adjusted  OR	95% CI	P-value	OR	95% CI	P-value	OR	95% CI	P-value	OR	95% CI	P-value  C	1.0	Reference	 	1.0	Reference	 	1.0	Reference	 	1.0	Reference	   T	1.302	1.083–1.567	0.005	1.382	1.119–1.707	0.003	0.993	0.757–1.298	0.958	0.964	0.733–1.264	0.790  The TMPRSS2 Met160Val polymorphism was not significantly associated with age at diagnosis, baseline PSA level, Gleason score, clinical T stage or presence of distant metastasis at diagnosis (Table 4). Furthermore, neither overall survival (log–rank, P = 0.367) nor cancer-specific survival (log–rank, P = 0.297) was associated with the TMPRSS2 Met160Val polymorphism (Fig. 1).    Table 4. Association between the TMPRSS2 Met160Val polymorphism and clinicopathological features   	TMPRSS2 Met160Val polymorphism	TMPRSS2 Met160Val polymorphism  Sporadic prostate cancer patients (n = 518)	Latent prostate cancer patients (n = 154)  CC (Val/Val) (n = 161)	CT (Val/Met) (n = 263)	TT (Met/Met) (n = 94)	P-value	CC (Val/Val) (n = 58)	CT (Val/Met) (n = 78)	TT (Met/Met) (n = 18)	P-value  –, Not applicable.  Age at diagnosis (years)	 	 	 	0.536	 	 	 	0.803  Median	70	70	71	 	82	81	81	   Range	48 to 89	49 to 89	55 to 86	 	67 to 98	66 to 97	70 to 97	   Baseline PSA (ng/mL)	 	 	 	0.202	 	 	 	–  Median	19.3	14.7	17.3	 	–	–	–	   Range	2.3 to 8492	1.1 to 7265	1.8 to 805	 	–	–	–	   Gleason score	 	 	 	0.568	 	 	 	0.204  7 or less	99 (61.5%)	175 (66.5%)	60 (63.8%)	 	45 (77.6%)	63 (80.8%)	17 (94.4%)	   8 or more	62 (38.5%)	88 (33.5%)	34 (36.2%)	 	13 (22.4%)	15 (19.2%)	1 (5.6%)	   Clinical T to stage	 	 	 	0.659	 	 	 	0.096  T1 to T2, n, (%)	61 (37.9%)	107 (40.7%)	41 (43.6%)	 	48 (82.8%)	53 (67.9%)	15 (83.3%)	   T3 to T4, n, (%)	100 (62.1%)	156 (59.3%)	53 (56.4%)	 	10 (17.2%)	25 (32.1%)	3 (16.7%)	   Distant metastasis	 	 	 	0.653	 	 	 	–  No, n, (%)	118 (73.3%)	192 (73.0%)	73 (77.7%)	 	–	–	–	   Yes, n, (%)	43 (26.7%)	71 (27.0%)	21 (22.3%)	 	–	–	–	   Figure 1.   Figure 1. Open in figure viewerDownload Powerpoint slide  (a) Overall and (b) cancer-specific survival (lower) curves of patients with sporadic prostate cancer by the Kaplan–Meier method are shown. No significant differences were observed among cases. (c) Number of patients under observation. image, CC (Val/Val) genotype; image, CT (Val/Met) genotype; image, TT (Met/Met) genotype.  Discussion    PSA screening for prostate cancer is standard clinical practice in Japan. The European Randomized Study of Screening for Prostate Cancer trial found that PSA-based screening significantly reduced mortality from prostate cancer.[19] In contrast, the US Preventive Services Task Force recommended against PSA-based screening for prostate cancer because the benefit of screening – a small or no reduction in prostate cancer-specific mortality – did not outweigh the potential harm of screening – a high rate of false positive results and overdiagnosis. Biopsies after positive PSA screening also increased the incidence of adverse events including serious infections, hematuria or urinary retention.[20, 21] Given the weaknesses of PSA-based screening, there has been a push to develop a diagnostic tool using biomarkers to complement PSA testing to more reliably predict prostate cancer risk. In the present study, we evaluated whether the TMPRSS2 Met160Val polymorphism would be informative in risk stratification of sporadic prostate cancer and latent prostate cancer.    Our study of Japanese men with sporadic prostate cancer showed that the TMPRSS2 Met160Val genotype frequencies were 31.1% CC, 50.8% CT and 18.1% TT, clearly different from genotype frequencies observed in Caucasians or African Americans.[16] We found the TMPRSS2 Met160Val CT and TT genotypes to be significantly associated with sporadic prostate cancer; however, there was no correlation between the TMPRSS2 Met160Val polymorphism and Gleason score, clinical T stage, presence of distant metastasis at diagnosis, overall survival and cancer-specific survival. In addition, the CT and TT genotypes were not significantly associated with latent prostate cancer risk. Interestingly, the association with sporadic prostate cancer and the lack of association with latent prostate cancer was also observed with three other polymorphisms, which we described previously.[17, 22, 23]    Genetic polymorphisms associated with prostate cancer susceptibility might be specific to race and ethnicity. Takata et al. identified five SNP (rs13385191, rs12653946, rs1983891, rs339331 and rs9600079) by a genome-wide association study of a Japanese population to be associated with prostate cancer susceptibility,[24] but just two of five SNP (rs13385191 and rs1983891) were found to be associated with prostate cancer susceptibility in a Latino population.[25] Currently, there are over 50 variants associated with prostate cancer.[26] Genetic risk prediction for prostate cancer using 16 SNP associated with disease have been carried out with Japanese samples, and have been shown to be reproducible and independent of PSA.[27] Future genetic risk prediction models should also include SNP with a significant association with prostate cancer that were identified by hypothesis-driven research, such as the TMPRSS2 Met160Val.    This is the first case–control study to investigate the association between the TMPRSS2 Met160Val polymorphism and the risk of prostate cancer in native Japanese men. We showed that the rs12329760 polymorphism was significantly associated with the risk of sporadic prostate cancer, but not with latent prostate cancer in Japanese men.    The main limitation of the present study was the small sample size. Additional large-scale confirmatory study populations including other Japanese and/or ethnicity groups are required to validate the present findings. Second, we cannot exclude the possibility of sampling bias, as the present study population included relatively advanced prostate cancer cases. Furthermore, the mechanisms underlying how the TMPRSS2 Met160Val polymorphism influences the TMPRSS2–ERG fusion and carcinogenesis of the prostate should be shown in the future studies.   
305||The serine protease TMPRSS2 gene expression was studied by in situ hybridization using benign prostatic hyperplasia and prostate cancer tissue samples from 32 patients. Expression of TMPRSS2 gene was higher in cancer cells than that in benign cells in 84% of the specimens containing both benign and malignant tissues. The TMPRSS2 mRNA level was significantly increased in poorly differentiated (p = 0.014, n = 7) and untreated (p = 0.022, n = 13) primary prostate adenocarcinomas compared to benign tissues. In addition, androgen-deprivation therapy significantly decreased the expression of TMPRSS2 in benign prostate tissue (p = 0.07), which is in accordance with the androgen-inducible expression of the gene. The gene copy number of TMPRSS2, analyzed by competitively differential PCR, was duplicated in the malignant cells of about 38% of the prostate cancer patients analyzed. Thus, the increase in the gene copy number is probably not the primary reason for the detected overexpression of the TMPRSS2 gene. Mutations in the TMPRSS2 gene were screened using DNA isolated from paraffin-embedded prostate cancer tissues from 9 patients with aggressive prostate cancer and from 9 patients with nonaggressive disease. Thirteen exons covering the coding region were checked using enzymatic mutation detection and direct sequencing. One patient with aggressive prostate cancer carried a deletion and a stop codon in exon 11, leading to inactivation of the serine protease domain in TMPRSS2. © 2001 Wiley-Liss, Inc. TMPRSS2 is a membrane-bound serine protease.1 It is localized in human prostate luminal epithelium2 and is regulated by androgens.3 The TMPRSS2 gene encodes a type II transmembrane protein with serine protease, scavenger-receptor cysteine-rich (SRCR), LDL-receptor class A (LDLRA) and intracellular domains. Based on its structure, containing intra- and extracellular domains, TMPRSS2 could work as a receptor for specific ligand(s) mediating signals between the environment and the cell. Due to its high expression in prostate and prostate cancer, TMPRSS2 is a potential new marker of the disease. Recent work revealed the autocatalytical cleavage of TMPRSS2, leading to secretion of the protease domain into the sera of prostate-tumor bearing mice.4 Expression of the TMPRSS2 gene is decreased during transformation of LNCaP cells to androgen-independent clones. Furthermore, we have identified overexpression of MxA and MxB genes located close to the TMPRSS2 gene at 21q22.3, indicating that this chromosomal locus is vulnerable to regulatory changes during transformation.5 Nevertheless, this area is not frequently affected by chromosomal rearrangements in prostate cancer.6, 7 However, LNCaP prostate cancer cell line variants do show loss at 21q associated with androgen independence.8  Recently, several new kallikrein family members have been connected to different forms of human cancer. The link between kallikreins and TMPRSS2 is serine protease activity, which is probably involved in malignant processes. For example, prostase (KLK4) is suggested to be associated with prostate cancer,9 and KLK15, one of the most recently discovered kallikrein genes, is upregulated in this disease.10KLK-L4 in turn is downregulated in breast cancer.11 One important task in the future will be to clarify the exact functions of kallikreins and other types of serine proteases during the initiation and progression of cancer.  The aim of our study was to clarify the expression of TMPRSS2 gene in human prostate cancer samples with varying degrees of differentiation using in situ hybridization. Further, screening for mutations in the TMPRSS2 coding region was carried out using an enzymatic mutation detection method and direct sequencing. TMPRSS2 gene copy numbers in the specimens were studied by competitively differential PCR. MATERIAL AND METHODS  Subjects and specimens  For in situ hybridization analyses, 9 patients with benign prostatic hyperplasia (BPH) and 23 patients with adenocarcinoma of the prostate undergoing radical prostatectomy or transurethral resection of the prostate were selected. These patients were separate from those selected for mutation analyses because of limited availability of patient material for this study. The samples of endocrine-treated patients were from local recurrent tumors representing progressive disease, based on local tumor growth and a prostate-specific antigen (PSA) increase (Table II, patient nos. 3, 12–15, 20 and 23) or local tumor growth alone without a remarkable PSA increase (patient nos. 19, 21 and 22). Samples used for in situ hybridization were uniformly processed to paraffin blocks.  Mutation analysis of TMPRSS2 exons was carried out in tissues from 18 prostate cancer patients undergoing radical prostatectomy or transurethral resection of the prostate. All tumor specimens were from primary sites. The patients were classified according to the TNM classification system (T1M0, 4 patients; T3M0, 6 patients; T4M0, 3 patients; T3M1, 2 patients; T4M1, 3 patients).12 The tumor stage was determined as described earlier.13 Four of the patients were operated upon because of recurrent disease after endocrine therapy and the remaining 14 patients in the study had primary tumors. Tumors without local progression or metastases and all grade I tumors were considered clinically to be nonaggressive (9 patients). The disease of 9 of the patients was considered clinically aggressive, i.e., tumors with local metastases or progression and grade II and III tumors. An additional 14 samples from clinically aggressive cases were used for direct sequencing of exon 11. Histopathologic examination was used to confirm that in the tumor specimens used in the study, at least 60% of the cells were malignant. After dissecting the specimens from paraffin blocks, the DNA was extracted using a standard protocol.14 For controls, DNA obtained from benign prostatic tissue or peripheral blood leukocytes was used.  The Ethics Council of the Medical Faculty accepted the original research plan at the University of Oulu. In situ hybridization  In situ hybridization of TMPRSS2 was carried out as described earlier.15 Preservation of RNA in the samples was confirmed by glyceraldehyde-3-phosphate-dehydrogenase (accession number [AC] X02231) antisense probe.2 The epithelial and stromal signal densities of TMPRSS2 expression in the form of silver grains per area were measured from in situ hybridized sections with an MCID M4 3.0 digital image analyzer (Imaging Research, St. Catharines, ON, Canada), using a method similar to that described by Kainu et al.16 In prostate cancer samples, signal density was measured separately in benign and malignant epithelium and stroma from 5 separate, randomly picked, 40× objective fields of specimens without knowledge of tumor grade or treatment. The mean of the 5 values was taken as the transcript level of TMPRSS2 in the sample. The expression values in the stroma represented the background and were subtracted from the respective epithelial signal values in every sample. The sense probe of TMPRSS2 was used as a negative control. Statistical analyses were carried out using SPSS for Windows (SPSS Inc.). Mutation analysis and direct sequencing  The primers used for PCR and sequencing and annealing temperatures for specific primer pairs are presented in Table I. PCR reactions contained 250 ng of template DNA, 100 ng of each of 2 primers, 4 nmol of each deoxynucleotide triphosphate (Amersham Pharmacia Biotech, Little Chalfont, UK), 1× PCR Gold buffer (Applied Biosystems, Foster City, CA), 1.5 mM MgCl2 and 1.9 units of AmpliTaq Gold DNA-polymerase (Applied Biosystems) in a final volume of 50 μl. Forty PCR cycles were carried out (GeneAmp 9600 thermal cycler, Perkin-Elmer, Norwalk, CT). Analysis of TMPRSS2 DNA sequence was then performed, either by enzymatic mutation detection (PASSPORT Mutation Scanning Kit, Amersham Pharmacia Biotech), exactly as recommended by the manufacturer, or by direct sequencing of the PCR products, or by both methods if the mutation was detected by using the PASSPORT kit. For direct sequencing, the PCR products were purified from excess primers and nucleotides by using a single-step ExoI/SAP method.17 Both strands of the PCR products were sequenced.  Table I. Primers for PCR and Sequencing Exon	Nucleotides in AP001610	Primers 5′ to 3′	Annealing temperature (°C) 1	64550–64772	CTGGTATGGAAATATTACAGTCCTG	59 GCGTTCCCTACAAATAGCCC 2	60872–61170	GGAAATAAACACAAAGAGAATCCTAC	59 TGTAACCCTTTAGTGCAAATAAGAG 3	55846–56162	CACTGGGTACATTCTAAATGCTTTA	59 ACGTTGCACTCTCCTCCTTC 4	54906–55221	AGTCCCTTCCCAAGGTTAAGGC	57 GGTGACAGAATGAGACTTCATCTCAAAAAC 5	46968–47246	TGTTTCTGCTGTCTGTTACTGTCAC	63 ATCAGACCACTGCACTTCAGCC 6	45520–45880	CAGCCACTTCCTATGAATAAACC	55 GGATTTGTGTTTGCTTATGCC 7	43098–43269	GGGGACTCCAGATGAACTTAC	54 CAGAAGACAGGAGAGGGAAC 8	39791–40133	GAGACCTGCTCAAGGTCACAGGGT	60 TTGCAGCCTGGGAGACCCTTGG 9	38257–38612	TCTTGCCTCCAGCTTCTGAC	57 CCCTTCCATTTGGCATAGCAC 10	37133–37563	GAACCCAATGCTCCATCTG	57 GGTCACCTGGAGATATGTAATTTTG 11	34850–35199	TCTGCTGACCCCAAGAATG	57 TGGAGAATAGGGCTGTGAC 12	34196–34550	AGCAGAACCACGCCTAACAG	57 CCACACAGTCACTCGTAACTC 13	32612–32866	TCATGCACGGGGAAGCAAAACC	61 ATGCTCAGCCTGACTCTGACCAAC An ABI Prism BigDye Terminator Cycle Sequencing Ready Reaction Kit (Applied Biosystems) was used for sequencing the samples. They were loaded on a 5% Long Ranger gel (FMC Bio Products) and run in an ABI Prism 377 DNA Sequencer (Perkin Elmer). The results were analyzed by using DNA Sequencing Analysis 3.3 software (Applied Biosystems).  The PCR product of exon 11, containing a 7 bp deletion, was further TA-cloned (TOPO TA-cloning Kit, Invitrogen, Carlsbad, CA) and transformants were isolated using standard protocols for sequence confirmation. Gene amplification study  Putative TMPRSS2 amplification was analyzed by competitively differential PCR18 using DNA isolated from benign and malignant tissues of 13 prostate cancer patients. Six of the patients were the same as in expression studies (patients 4, 6–9 and 16), while the rest (patients 24–30) were among the aggressive cases in mutation screenings. The primers 5′-CCTAGTACTGTGAGGCACT-3′ and 5′-CACAACTCCAGTGCCACTA-3′ were used to amplify the TMPRSS2 genomic sequence (AC AP001610) between the nucleotides 65471 and 65107. The composite primers (5′-CCTAGTACTGTGAGGCACTAGGCTCCTGGCATCAGGA-3′ and 5′-CACAACTCCAGTGCCACTACAGGGAAGGGTGCGGTAT-3′) containing the respective TMPRSS2 sequences followed by the reference gene sequences at 3′ parts were used to amplify a single copy reference gene, placental-like alkaline phosphatase (PLAP, AC X66947), between nt 74 and 335. Two hundred nanograms of genomic DNA were used as a template in a 50 μl PCR reaction containing 1× PCR buffer, 1.5 mM MgCl2, 0.08 mM dNTP, 0.4 μM of each of the 2 sets of primers and 2.5 U of the AmpliTaq Gold enzyme (Perkin Elmer). A total of 40 cycles (95°C, 60 sec; 58°C, 60 sec; 72°C, 120 sec) were performed. Equal aliquots of the PCR reactions were run in 2% agarose gel containing ethidium bromide. The gels were photographed and the optical densities of the PCR products with lengths of 262 nt and 365 nt were determined by a laser scanner (Molecular Dynamics, Sunnyvale, CA). The ratio of optical densities for the TMPRSS2 and PLAP PCR products was counted for each specimen. The relative gene copy number was determined by dividing the TMPRSS2/PLAP by the average TMPRSS2/PLAP in benign tissues. The gene copy number was estimated using the relative gene copy number 1.17 (the highest relative gene copy number in the BPH sample) as a cutoff point for duplication of the gene content. RESULTS  Expression studies of TMPRSS2 gene  Our previous studies indicated differential expression of the TMPRSS2 gene in LNCaP cell line variants, reflecting androgen-dependent and -independent states of prostate cancer.5 Here we have extended the expression studies, using in situ hybridization and transcript quantification, to patient samples containing both benign prostate tissue and prostate cancer. Figure 1 shows prostatic expression of TMPRSS2 gene detected by in situ hybridization analysis in endocrine-treated and untreated prostate cancer patients. Hybridization with the sense probe gave only low background signals (data not shown). The mean expression value (silver grains per area) of TMPRSS2 in stroma for all the samples was only 0.01 ± 0.01 (range 0.00–0.05). In 9 BPH patients, the mean value of TMPRSS2 transcripts in the epithelium was 0.18 ± 0.09 (mean ±S.D.), ranging from 0.02 to 0.34. Respective mean values for prostate cancer samples were 0.38 ± 0.26 (range 0.03–0.85) and 0.13 ± 0.09 (range 0.04–0.25) for benign tissue from untreated and endocrine-treated disease, respectively. In untreated prostate cancer tissue, the mean value for TMPRSS2 expression in malignant epithelium was 0.67 ± 0.39 (range 0.18–1.49) and the respective value in endocrine-treated prostate cancer tissue was 0.59 ± 0.50 (range 0.07–1.23). In the prostate cancer specimens where both benign and cancer tissues were present, TMPRSS2 mRNA level (Table II) was higher in malignant areas than that in benign areas in 16 of 19 cases.  Figure 1.  Figure 1.  Open in figure viewer Expression of TMPRSS2 gene in human prostate. In situ hybridization of TMPRSS2 antisense probe in benign (a,c) and malignant (b,d) areas of tissue samples from endocrine-treated (a,b) and untreated (c,d) prostate cancer patients. Panels a,b and c,d represent different areas of the same section from 2 specimens (patients 14 and 17, respectively). Scale bar = 20 μm. Table II. Clinicopathologic Data and Epithelial TMPRSS2 mRNA Levels of Prostate Cancer Patients Patient ID	Tumor grade	Treatment	Cancerous prostate	Benign prostate Expression values were determined as described in Material and Methods. *Patient 3 was treated with a flutamide-LHRH-agonist combination, patient 19 by orchiectomy-polyestradiol phosphate and patient 20 with the antiandrogen bicalutamide. Samples of treated patients were from local recurrent prostate tumors. n/a, not available. 1	I	—	1.50	0.43 2	I	—	1.27	0.62 3	II	*	0.07	0.04 4	II	—	0.43	0.03 5	II	—	0.33	0.21 6	II	—	0.46	0.33 7	II	—	0.56	0.15 8	II	—	0.18	0.23 9	II	—	0.99	0.86 10	II	—	0.81	0.50 11	II	—	0.22	0.86 12	II	Goserelin	0.38	0.10 13	III	Goserelin	1.19	0.08 14	III	Goserelin	0.47	0.11 15	III	Goserelin	0.22	0.26 16	III	—	0.57	0.15 17	III	—	0.81	0.24 18	III	—	0.78	0.52 19	III	*	1.21	n/a 20	III	*	0.79	n/a 21	III	Orchiectomy	1.18	n/a 22	III	Orchiectomy	0.30	n/a 23	III	Orchiectomy	1.26	0.26 Figure 2 shows box plots of the epithelium expression values in BPH tissues and untreated and endocrine-treated prostate cancer. As seen in Figure 2, the expression level of TMPRSS2 in BPH samples and benign areas in prostate cancer was lower than in malignant epithelium. The difference between benign and malignant epithelium was also statistically significant within untreated prostate cancer samples (paired differences, mean 0.29 [95% CI 0.05–0.53], p = 0.022, n = 13). In prostate cancer samples from endocrine-treated patients (surgical or chemical castration), the difference appeared to be even more prominent, but it lacked statistical significance, probably because of the small number of samples (n = 6) and higher benign epithelium expression in the case of patient 15. Patients 19–22 had high expression in malignant epithelium but were excluded from the statistical analyses because of lack of benign tissue in the samples. Expression in benign areas of endocrine-treated samples was lower than in untreated samples (mean difference 0.25 [95% CI 0.08–0.42], p = 0.007). The difference between endocrine-treated and untreated benign samples was also significant when BPH samples were included in the group of untreated cancer samples (mean difference 0.17 [95% CI 0.04–0.29], p = 0.011).  Figure 2.  Figure 2.  Open in figure viewer Box plot of TMPRSS2 mRNA levels in epithelia of benign prostatic hyperplasia (BPH) and prostate cancer (PC) samples. Data from BPH patients and PC patients with untreated and endocrine-treated (surgical or chemical castration) disease are shown separately. *, p = 0.022 (paired t-test) for malignant epithelium vs. benign epithelium in untreated prostate cancer samples; ◊, p = 0.007 for benign epithelium in endocrine-treated samples vs. benign epithelium in untreated prostate cancer samples; ▪, p = 0.011 for benign epithelium in endocrine-treated samples vs. benign epithelium in BPH and untreated prostate cancer samples together. Epithelial values of TMPRSS2 mRNA and their association with tumor grade are shown in Figure 3. Only 2 of the patients had grade I prostate cancer with mean TMPRSS2 expression values of 0.53 in benign and 1.39 in malignant epithelium. Grade II specimens did not show statistical significance between benign and malignant epithelial mRNA levels of TMPRSS2 (paired differences, mean 0.11 [95% CI 0.11–0.33], p = 0.276, n = 10). On the contrary, in poorly differentiated carcinomas (grade III), the expression difference between benign and malignant epithelium was statistically significant (paired differences, mean 0.53 [95% CI 0.15–0.90], p = 0.014, n = 7). In the group of grade III carcinomas, patients 17 and 18 had nonaggressive disease and the remaining 11 patients had aggressive disease.  Figure 3.  Figure 3.  Open in figure viewer Scatter plot of TMPRSS2 mRNA levels in benign (B) and malignant (M) epithelium and association with tumor grade (I–III). Data from all 23 prostate cancer and all 9 prostatic hyperplasia (BPH) patients are shown. Samples from patients without chemical treatment of prostate cancer (o) and from endocrine-treated patients (surgical or chemical castration, or antiandrogen) (+). Mutation analysis of TMPRSS2 gene  Since TMPRSS2 is differentially expressed in prostate cancer, it is a potential gene disturbed during malignant transformation. We therefore studied the coding region of it for the presence of mutations in prostate cancer samples representing both aggressive (9 patients) and nonaggressive (9 patients) disease. Direct sequencing of the TMPRSS2 coding region in prostate cancer samples revealed one 7 bp deletion spanning nucleotides 1228–1234 (AC U75329) in exon 11 in a sample of aggressive prostate cancer. The patient concerned had grade III progressive prostate cancer despite treatment with goserelin, estramustine and fosfestrol, in chronological order. An additional 14 samples from prostate cancer patients with aggressive disease were analyzed for the presence of this deletion (data not shown), but it was not detected in any. Deletion was present in 5 of 6 TA clones representing the pool of PCR products derived from the sample. A control sample of benign prostate tissue from the same individual did not have the deletion on the basis of direct sequencing, indicating the somatic type of the mutation. Deletion starts at the border of an exon-intron splice site, leading to a frame shift and a stop codon in exon 11 and thus the wild-type (wt) GKTSE sequence (amino acid [aa] 391 onwards) is replaced by AQKC. The consequence of the deletion is a truncated protein, containing 394 aa instead of 492 aa in wt protein. This mutant protein has lost a total of 98 aa from the C-terminus at the protease domain.  Polymorphism, in other words nucleotide changes both in normal and malignant DNA samples, was detected in several positions (Table III). Change of CA to TG at nucleotide position 280–281 was detected in 2 of 18 samples. This polymorphism leads to a Thr75→Met75 change. Polymorphism was also detected in nucleotides 824 (C→T) and 833 (T→C) in 14 of 18 and 6 of 18 samples analyzed, respectively. Nucleotide 534 A→G polymorphism leads to Met160→Val160 replacement, which was detected in 16 of 18 samples. One of the 6 benign control samples analyzed was shown to be heterozygous for this position. Polymorphism was also detected at nucleotide 1211 (G→T) in 3 of 18 samples. At nucleotide positions 403 and 1527, C was replaced by G and A by G, respectively, in all samples analyzed (18 of 18), so it is likely to be an error in the published cDNA sequence (AC U75329). It does not, however, affect the amino acid sequence in the case of nucleotide 403. Nucleotide 1527 change, on the other hand, leads to Asn491→Asp491 reposition. In addition, this nucleotide 1527 change A→G was also present in the genomic sequence (AC AP001610).  Table III. Polymorphism Detected in TMPRSS2 Coding Region Nucleotides in TMPRSS2 cDNA (AC U75329)	Nucleotide change	Prevalence	Amino acid change 280–281	CA→TG	2/18	Thr75→Met75 534	A→G	16/18	Met160→Val160 824	C→T	14/18	— 833	T→C	6/18	— 1211	G→T	3/18	— Gene amplification analysis of TMPRSS2  Gene amplification is a common reason for the overexpression of a gene in malignant tissues. We evaluated the possibility of TMPRSS2 amplification by competitively differential PCR18 in 13 prostate cancer patients (Table IV). The gene copy number was found to be duplicated in the malignant cells of 5 patients compared to the respective benign cells in about 38% of the examined cases. Patients 4, 6 and 7 with 14.3- 1.4- and 3.7-fold overexpression of TMPRSS2 in the prostate cancer area (Table II), respectively, all showed duplication of the gene content. However, gene amplification was not evident in, for instance, patient 16, who had 3.8-fold increase in TMPRSS2 expression between benign and malignant prostate tissues (Table II). Interestingly, the patient (27, Table IV) with the deletion in the serine protease domain also had duplication in the gene copy number of TMPRSS2 in prostate cancer tissue.  Table IV. Gene Amplification Study Patient ID	Tissue type	TMPRSS2/PLAP1	Relative gene copy number2	Gene copy number3 1Average ratio ± range of optical densities for competitively differential PCR products of TMPRSS2 and PLAP from 2 to 4 independent experiments. 2TMPRSS2/PLAP divided by the average of TMPRSS2/PLAP for benign tissues (1.39). 3The relative gene copy numbers higher than the cutoff point value of 1.17 represent duplication of the TMPRSS2 gene copy number per haploid genome. 4	BPH	1.45 ± 0.18	1.04	1 Ca	2.19 ± 0.38	1.57	2 6	BPH	1.43 ± 0.17	1.03	1 Ca	2.19 ± 0.02	1.57	2 7	BPH	1.24 ± 0.10	0.89	1 Ca	1.87 ± 0.07	1.34	2 8	BPH	1.62 ± 0.14	1.16	1 Ca	1.62 ± 0.15	1.16	1 9	BPH	1.63 ± 0.23	1.17	1 Ca	1.53 ± 0.76	1.1	1 16	BPH	1.25 ± 0.07	0.9	1 Ca	1.43 ± 0.03	1.03	1 24	BPH	1.38 ± 0.28	0.99	1 Ca	1.48 ± 0.15	1.06	1 25	BPH	1.17 ± 0.14	0.84	1 Ca	1.11 ± 0.15	0.8	1 26	BPH	1.41 ± 0.25	1.01	1 Ca	1.32 ± 0.04	0.95	1 27	BPH	1.24 ± 0.05	0.89	1 Ca	1.90 ± 0.26	1.36	2 28	BPH	1.33 ± 0.01	0.96	1 Ca	1.62 ± 0.08	1.17	1 29	BPH	1.45 ± 0.27	1.04	1 Ca	1.45 ± 0.34	1.04	1 30	BPH	1.51 ± 0.22	1.09	1 Ca	1.84 ± 0.52	1.32	2 DISCUSSION  Our present study shows that TMPRSS2 expression is significantly increased in poorly differentiated (grade III) primary prostate adenocarcinomas. This result is similar to the recent finding of the higher transcript levels of the KLK15 gene usually seen in prostate cancer patients with late-stage disease and tumors of higher grade.11 On the other hand, our results from cell line variants of LNCaP indicated downregulation of TMPRSS2 mRNA in androgen-independent LNCaP cells,5 which is why the results are somewhat contradictory. However, the LNCaP cell line has been derived from a lymph node metastasis of prostate cancer and the changes in expression detected in LNCaP cells are not comparable to the expression in prostate tissue in every case, as shown in our previous study.5 Prostate cancer tissue is usually heterogeneous and the presence of androgen-independent clones with characteristics similar to those seen in androgen-independent LNCaP cells thus cannot be excluded.  Approximately 38% of the prostate cancer patients studied showed duplication of the TMPRSS2 gene copy number in malignant cells. However, the amount of samples with increased gene copy number was expected to be higher if it were the main reason for the overexpression. Thus, other events, such as regulatory actions, are also important for the overexpression of the TMPRSS2 gene in prostate cancer.  It is difficult to show a connection between TMPRSS2 expression and the hormone dependency of prostate cancer. However, in some endocrine-treated samples, e.g., nos. 13 and 23, expression of TMPRSS2 in cancerous areas was exceptionally high, whereas expression in benign areas within the same sample was low. This may have been due to interference in androgen regulation in cancer cells of these samples, because expression of TMPRSS2 has been shown to be downregulated in the absence of androgens,3 as seen in the benign areas of respective samples. It is possible that the androgen-receptor pathway is reactivated through nonligand signaling in the malignant areas of these samples. Also the increase of PSA in the serum of these patients supports the possibility of the androgen-receptor action.  Lately, abundant evidence has indicated the differential expression of serine proteases in several types of malignancy. We were here able to show that mutation is an additional way to disturb the function of serine proteases during prostate cancer progression. The detected deletion of the TMPRSS2 gene leads to remarkable changes in the serine protease domain of the protein. Among the residues deleted are Asp435 and Ser,441,441 known to be important for substrate binding and catalysis. Furthermore, mutation of Ser441 leads to loss of autocatalytic cleavage of TMPRSS2 protein.4 Thus this deletion abolishes the trypsin-like activity of the TMPRSS2 protease domain. For the moment, the physiologic function of TMPRSS2 is unknown, but probably the serine protease domain plays a central role in the function of the protein. Some serine proteases belonging to the kallikrein family, such as PSA and normal epithelial cell-specific-1 (NES1) gene have been connected to prevention of malignant processes of cells. A recent report shows that PSA has antiangiogenic activity,19 while NES1 is suggested to be a tumor suppressor.20 Overexpression of the TMPRSS2 gene, as shown here, together with the fact that genomic rearrangements such as a loss of heterozygosity are uncommon at the locus of this gene, suggest that TMPRSS2 does not fulfill all the criteria of a potential tumor suppressor. However, both an increase and a decrease5 in the expression of this gene and inactivation of the serine protease domain of this protein are events taking place in abnormal biologic conditions. The possible existence of mutations at metastatic sites, as seen, for example, with PTEN/MMAC1,21 remains to be resolved.  Polymorphism leading to amino acid changes was detected in intracellular (Thr75→Met75) and SRCR-like (Met160→Val160) domains. Thr75 is not conserved between human and mouse TMPRSS2,2, 22 and is thus probably not an essential residue for proper function of the protein. The respective residue for Met160 is Val in mouse TMPRSS2, suggesting a neutral role for this replacement also. However, possible modifications in the function of TMPRSS2 due to the reported polymorphism remain to be investigated.  In summary, we found increased TMPRSS2 expression in malignant prostate tissue compared to benign tissue. The results also indicated one mutation in the TMPRSS2 coding region in an aggressive prostate cancer sample. This deletion abolishes the catalytic activity of the serine protease domain in TMPRSS2, but the exact effect of enzyme inactivation on the normal function of the cell remains to be resolved. Differential expression of TMPRSS2 mRNA in benign prostatic hyperplasia and prostate cancer points to the potential significance of this gene in prostate cancer. Further studies, using specific antibodies, are needed to clarify TMPRSS2 expression in the prostate and to illustrate the significance of the reported overexpression for diagnostic purposes.  Prostate cancer has been the second leading cause of cancer-related deaths of men in the USA for the past two decades.[1] In 2007, the incidence of cancer in Japanese men was highest for cancer of the stomach, followed by lung, colon and rectum, prostate, and liver. The incidence and mortality rates of prostate cancer were 29.4 per 100 000 population and 5.2 per 100 000 population based on the world standard population.[2] In 2012, prostate cancer was the seventh leading cause of death in Japanese men, with a mortality rate based on the world standard population of 4.8 per 100 000 population (http://ganjoho.jp/professional/statistics/statistics.html).    Overexpression of ERG (21q22.3) and ETV1 (7p21.2) were first identified in prostate cancer by gene expression microarray. Further studies showed that fusions of TMPRSS2 (21q22.3) to the ERG and ETV1 genes were the cause of the overexpression of these transcripts.[3] TMPRSS2 encodes a protein that belongs to the serine protease family. The encoded protein contains a type II transmembrane domain, a receptor class A domain, a scavenger receptor cysteine-rich domain and a protease domain. TMPRSS2 expression was found to be upregulated by androgenic hormones in prostate cancer cells, and downregulated in androgen-independent prostate cancer tissue (http://genome.ucsc.edu/index.html). ERG and ETV1 encode members of the erythroblast transformation-specific family of transcription factors. All members of this family are proto-oncogenes, as they are key regulators of embryonic development, cell proliferation, differentiation, angiogenesis, inflammation and apoptosis.[4, 5]    The fusion of the androgen-regulated TMPRSS2 gene with the transcription factor ERG gene is a common occurrence in prostate cancer. The fusion gene arises by translocation or interstitial deletion joining the promoter and 5′ portions of the TMPRSS2 gene with the coding sequences of the ERG gene; TMPRSS2-ERG gene fusion can be accompanied by gene duplication. Overexpression of ERG resulting from gene fusion and gene amplification might directly cause increased proliferation, apoptosis, migration and angiogenesis in prostate cancers. Overexpression of ERG could also indirectly modulate the growth of prostate cancer cells by upregulating the C-MYC oncogene, and by abrogating the differentiation of prostate epithelium.[3, 6-8]    The presence of TMPRSS2–ERG in prostate cancers has been associated with more aggressive biological behavior and poorer prognosis.[9, 10] The presence of multiple copies of TMPRSS2-ERG has been associated with decreased prostate cancer survival.[11] The prevalence of TMPRSS2–ERG-associated prostate cancer in Japanese men is lower than that of Caucasian or African American men.[12, 13] Nevertheless, in Japanese men, there is a positive correlation between TMPRSS2-ERG and a Gleason score 7 or less and patient age, but there is no correlation between TMPRSS2-ERG and T stage or PSA level.[13]    The variant T allele of the TMPRSS2 single nucleotide polymorphism, rs12329760, resulting in Met160Val has been reported to be significantly associated with fusion by translocation and the presence of multiple copies of TMPRSS2-ERG fusion.[14] Nevertheless, the association between the TMPRSS2 Met160Val polymorphism and prostate cancer has been inconclusive. Lubieniecka et al. observed no significant differences in the TMPRSS2 Met160Val genotype frequencies between prostate cancer cases and controls (i.e. prostate cancer cases: 60% CC, 35% CT, 6% TT; controls: 59% CC, 35% CT, 6% TT). Furthermore, they did not find any association between the TMPRSS2 Met160Val genotypes and T stage, tumor grade, or tumor aggressiveness.[15] Giri et al. showed that the frequency of Met160Val differed significantly with self-identified race and ethnicity. The genotype frequencies were 67% CC and 33% CT/TT among Caucasian men, whereas 49% CC and 51% CT/TT genotypes among African American men. Furthermore, Giri et al. found no association between the TMPRSS2 Met160Val genotypes and the time interval between enrolment and prostate cancer diagnosis in African American men; however, they observed a statistically significant difference between the TMPRSS2 Met160Val genotypes and the time interval between enrolment and prostate cancer diagnosis in Caucasian men with a family history of prostate cancer.[16] Caucasian men with the CT/TT genotypes compared with the CC genotype had a shorter time interval between enrolment and diagnosis.[16]    The aim of the present study was to determine whether the TMPRSS2 Met160Val polymorphism was associated with the risk of sporadic prostate cancer and latent prostate cancer diagnosed at autopsy in native Japanese men.  Methods    Patients with sporadic prostate cancer    A total of 518 native Japanese male patients with clinically detected sporadic prostate cancer were enrolled. Familial prostate cancer cases were not included in the present study. The details of sporadic prostate cancer samples have been described elsewhere.[17] Briefly, all patients were cases confirmed by pathology to have adenocarcinoma of the prostate, and were treated at the University of Tokyo Hospital or one of its affiliated hospitals in the period between January 1999 and August 2009. Clinicopathological data including age, baseline PSA level, Gleason score, clinical T stage and the presence of distant metastasis were collected. Genomic DNA samples were extracted from peripheral blood specimens of these patients. Timing of blood extraction varied from patient to patient. Usually, we extracted 10 mL peripheral blood from each patient once just after pathological diagnosis of prostate cancer. Some of the patients had 10 mL peripheral blood extracted during the treatment for prostate cancer. Then, we extracted germline DNA samples from patients' blood specimens on the same day. The study was carried out with the approval from the Ethics Committee of the University of Tokyo and from the internal review boards of the affiliated hospitals. Written informed consent was obtained from each patient.  Controls and patients with latent prostate cancer    We also examined 433 residence-matched Japanese men as controls who had no evidence of malignancy throughout their lifetime confirmed by autopsy, as well as 154 Japanese men who were diagnosed as having latent prostate cancer based on autopsy results. Controls and latent prostate cancer subjects are registered in the database of Japanese single nucleotide polymorphisms for geriatric research.[18] Genomic DNA samples of these individuals were extracted from frozen normal kidney tissues. The present study was also reviewed and approved by the Ethics Committee of the Tokyo Metropolitan Geriatric Hospital. Written informed consent was obtained from the patients' family members under the Act of Postmortem Examination.  Genotyping    Genotyping of the TMPRSS2 Met160Val polymorphism (rs12329760, NM_005656.3 c.478C>T) was carried out by allelic discrimination using a fluorescent-based TaqMan assay. The concentration of genomic DNA was adjusted to 100 ng/μL. Real-time polymerase chain reaction analysis was carried out using the TaqMan probe (C_25622353_20; Applied Biosystems, Foster City, CA, USA) as described by Giri et al. and according to the manufacturer's instructions with an ABI PRISM 7300 Real Time PCR system (Applied Biosystems).[16]  Statistical analyses    Statistical analyses were carried out using jmp software, version 9.0.0 (SAS, Cary, NC, USA). The χ2-test was used to examine the Hardy–Weinberg equilibriums, as well as to compare the Gleason scores, the distribution of clinical T stages and the presence of distant metastasis. The Tukey–Kramer test was used to compare the age distributions between patient and control groups. To estimate the OR and 95% CI, logistic regression analyses were carried out using age as a covariate to statistically adjust for its potential confounding effect. anova was used to compare age and baseline PSA levels among cases. Survival was measured from the date of the diagnosis of prostate cancer to the date of death. The end of observation period was November 1, 2012. The prostate cancer-specific survival and overall survival curves were drawn using the Kaplan–Meier method, and statistical significance was analyzed using a log–rank test. The hazard ratios and the 95% CI were estimated using the Cox proportional hazard model. A P-value of less than 0.05 was considered statistically significant.  Results    The characteristics of the control, sporadic prostate cancer and latent prostate cancer groups are summarized in Table 1. The age distributions of the control, sporadic prostate cancer and latent prostate cancer groups were significantly different (P < 0.001). Distributions of Gleason score and clinical T stage among sporadic prostate cancer and latent prostate cancer were also significantly different (P < 0.001).    Table 1. Patient characteristics   	 	Control (n = 433)	Sporadic prostate cancer (n = 518)	Latent prostate cancer (n = 154)	P-value  –, Not applicable.  Age (years)	Median	79	70	81	<0.001  Range	48 to 100	48 to 89	66 to 98  Baseline PSA (ng/mL)	Median	–	16.8	–	–  Range	–	1.1 to 8492	–	–  Gleason score	6 or less	–	123	32	<0.001  7	–	211	93  8 or more	–	184	29  Clinical T stage	T1-T2	–	209	116	<0.001  T3-T4	–	309	38  Distant metastasis	Yes	–	135	–	–  No	–	383	–	–  Table 2 describes the genotype and allele frequencies of the TMPRSS2 Met160Val polymorphism (rs12329760). Genotyping was successful for all participants. The distribution of genotypes in each group did not deviate from the Hardy–Weinberg equilibrium. The T allele frequency of the control group was 0.372, of the sporadic prostate cancer group was 0.435 and of the latent prostate cancer group was 0.370 (P = 0.009). The CT and TT genotypes were significantly associated with the risk of sporadic prostate cancer; age-adjusted OR (95% CI) were 1.418 (1.027−1.960) for CT, 1.907 (1.224−2.990) for TT and 1.524 (1.123−2.072) for CT/TT genotypes. In contrast, the CT and TT genotypes were not significantly associated with the risk of latent prostate cancer; age-adjusted OR (95% CI) were 1.091 (0.732–1.633) for CT, 0.838 (0.445–1.526) for TT and 1.034 (0.706–1.521) for CT/TT genotypes (Table 3).    Table 2. Genotype and allele frequencies of the TMPRSS2 Met160Val polymorphism   	Control (n = 433)	Sporadic prostate cancer (n = 518)	Latent prostate cancer (n = 154)	P-value  n	%	n	%	n	%  Genotype (encoded amino acids)  CC (Val/Val)	170	39.3%	161	31.1%	58	37.7%	P = 0.035  CT (Val/Met)	204	47.1%	263	50.8%	78	50.6%  TT (Met/Met)	59	13.6%	94	18.1%	18	11.7%  Allele  C allele	544	62.8%	585	56.5%	194	63.0%	P = 0.009  T allele	322	37.2%	451	43.5%	114	37.0%  Hardy–Weinberg equilibrium  χ2	0.032	0.555	1.146	   P-value	0.859	0.456	0.284	   Table 3. Genotypic and allelic analyses of prostate cancer risk  Genotype	Control vs sporadic prostate cancer	Control vs latent prostate cancer  Unadjusted	Age-adjusted	Unadjusted	Age-adjusted  OR	95% CI	P-value	OR	95% CI	P-value	OR	95% CI	P-value	OR	95% CI	P-value  CC	1.0	Reference	 	1.0	Reference	 	1.0	Reference	 	1.0	Reference	   CT	1.361	1.026–1.807	0.032	1.418	1.027–1.960	0.034	1.121	0.755–1.670	0.572	1.091	0.732–1.633	0.669  TT	1.682	1.141–2.494	0.008	1.907	1.224–2.990	0.004	0.894	0.478–1.616	0.716	0.838	0.445–1.526	0.570  CT+TT	1.433	1.097–1.875	0.008	1.524	1.123–2.072	0.007	1.070	0.734–1.568	0.726	1.034	0.706–1.521	0.866  Allele	Control vs sporadic prostate cancer	Control vs latent prostate cancer  Unadjusted	Age-adjusted	Unadjusted	Age-adjusted  OR	95% CI	P-value	OR	95% CI	P-value	OR	95% CI	P-value	OR	95% CI	P-value  C	1.0	Reference	 	1.0	Reference	 	1.0	Reference	 	1.0	Reference	   T	1.302	1.083–1.567	0.005	1.382	1.119–1.707	0.003	0.993	0.757–1.298	0.958	0.964	0.733–1.264	0.790  The TMPRSS2 Met160Val polymorphism was not significantly associated with age at diagnosis, baseline PSA level, Gleason score, clinical T stage or presence of distant metastasis at diagnosis (Table 4). Furthermore, neither overall survival (log–rank, P = 0.367) nor cancer-specific survival (log–rank, P = 0.297) was associated with the TMPRSS2 Met160Val polymorphism (Fig. 1).    Table 4. Association between the TMPRSS2 Met160Val polymorphism and clinicopathological features   	TMPRSS2 Met160Val polymorphism	TMPRSS2 Met160Val polymorphism  Sporadic prostate cancer patients (n = 518)	Latent prostate cancer patients (n = 154)  CC (Val/Val) (n = 161)	CT (Val/Met) (n = 263)	TT (Met/Met) (n = 94)	P-value	CC (Val/Val) (n = 58)	CT (Val/Met) (n = 78)	TT (Met/Met) (n = 18)	P-value  –, Not applicable.  Age at diagnosis (years)	 	 	 	0.536	 	 	 	0.803  Median	70	70	71	 	82	81	81	   Range	48 to 89	49 to 89	55 to 86	 	67 to 98	66 to 97	70 to 97	   Baseline PSA (ng/mL)	 	 	 	0.202	 	 	 	–  Median	19.3	14.7	17.3	 	–	–	–	   Range	2.3 to 8492	1.1 to 7265	1.8 to 805	 	–	–	–	   Gleason score	 	 	 	0.568	 	 	 	0.204  7 or less	99 (61.5%)	175 (66.5%)	60 (63.8%)	 	45 (77.6%)	63 (80.8%)	17 (94.4%)	   8 or more	62 (38.5%)	88 (33.5%)	34 (36.2%)	 	13 (22.4%)	15 (19.2%)	1 (5.6%)	   Clinical T to stage	 	 	 	0.659	 	 	 	0.096  T1 to T2, n, (%)	61 (37.9%)	107 (40.7%)	41 (43.6%)	 	48 (82.8%)	53 (67.9%)	15 (83.3%)	   T3 to T4, n, (%)	100 (62.1%)	156 (59.3%)	53 (56.4%)	 	10 (17.2%)	25 (32.1%)	3 (16.7%)	   Distant metastasis	 	 	 	0.653	 	 	 	–  No, n, (%)	118 (73.3%)	192 (73.0%)	73 (77.7%)	 	–	–	–	   Yes, n, (%)	43 (26.7%)	71 (27.0%)	21 (22.3%)	 	–	–	–	   Figure 1.   Figure 1. Open in figure viewerDownload Powerpoint slide  (a) Overall and (b) cancer-specific survival (lower) curves of patients with sporadic prostate cancer by the Kaplan–Meier method are shown. No significant differences were observed among cases. (c) Number of patients under observation. image, CC (Val/Val) genotype; image, CT (Val/Met) genotype; image, TT (Met/Met) genotype.  Discussion    PSA screening for prostate cancer is standard clinical practice in Japan. The European Randomized Study of Screening for Prostate Cancer trial found that PSA-based screening significantly reduced mortality from prostate cancer.[19] In contrast, the US Preventive Services Task Force recommended against PSA-based screening for prostate cancer because the benefit of screening – a small or no reduction in prostate cancer-specific mortality – did not outweigh the potential harm of screening – a high rate of false positive results and overdiagnosis. Biopsies after positive PSA screening also increased the incidence of adverse events including serious infections, hematuria or urinary retention.[20, 21] Given the weaknesses of PSA-based screening, there has been a push to develop a diagnostic tool using biomarkers to complement PSA testing to more reliably predict prostate cancer risk. In the present study, we evaluated whether the TMPRSS2 Met160Val polymorphism would be informative in risk stratification of sporadic prostate cancer and latent prostate cancer.    Our study of Japanese men with sporadic prostate cancer showed that the TMPRSS2 Met160Val genotype frequencies were 31.1% CC, 50.8% CT and 18.1% TT, clearly different from genotype frequencies observed in Caucasians or African Americans.[16] We found the TMPRSS2 Met160Val CT and TT genotypes to be significantly associated with sporadic prostate cancer; however, there was no correlation between the TMPRSS2 Met160Val polymorphism and Gleason score, clinical T stage, presence of distant metastasis at diagnosis, overall survival and cancer-specific survival. In addition, the CT and TT genotypes were not significantly associated with latent prostate cancer risk. Interestingly, the association with sporadic prostate cancer and the lack of association with latent prostate cancer was also observed with three other polymorphisms, which we described previously.[17, 22, 23]    Genetic polymorphisms associated with prostate cancer susceptibility might be specific to race and ethnicity. Takata et al. identified five SNP (rs13385191, rs12653946, rs1983891, rs339331 and rs9600079) by a genome-wide association study of a Japanese population to be associated with prostate cancer susceptibility,[24] but just two of five SNP (rs13385191 and rs1983891) were found to be associated with prostate cancer susceptibility in a Latino population.[25] Currently, there are over 50 variants associated with prostate cancer.[26] Genetic risk prediction for prostate cancer using 16 SNP associated with disease have been carried out with Japanese samples, and have been shown to be reproducible and independent of PSA.[27] Future genetic risk prediction models should also include SNP with a significant association with prostate cancer that were identified by hypothesis-driven research, such as the TMPRSS2 Met160Val.    This is the first case–control study to investigate the association between the TMPRSS2 Met160Val polymorphism and the risk of prostate cancer in native Japanese men. We showed that the rs12329760 polymorphism was significantly associated with the risk of sporadic prostate cancer, but not with latent prostate cancer in Japanese men.    The main limitation of the present study was the small sample size. Additional large-scale confirmatory study populations including other Japanese and/or ethnicity groups are required to validate the present findings. Second, we cannot exclude the possibility of sampling bias, as the present study population included relatively advanced prostate cancer cases. Furthermore, the mechanisms underlying how the TMPRSS2 Met160Val polymorphism influences the TMPRSS2–ERG fusion and carcinogenesis of the prostate should be shown in the future studies.   
482|| Abstract Purpose  Adrenocortical carcinoma (ACC) is a rare pediatric malignancy. It occurs in excess among individuals with the Li-Fraumeni syndrome, which results primarily from germline mutations in the TP53 gene. Prior series exploring frequencies of germline TP53 mutation among children with ACC have been small, geographically limited, or subject to referral bias. The functional consequence of mutations has not been related to phenotype. We provide a genotype-phenotype analysis of TP53 mutations in pediatric ACC and propose a model for tissue-specific effects based on adrenocortical ontogeny.  Patients and Methods  Eighty-eight consecutive, unrelated children with ACC, unselected for family history, underwent germline TP53 sequencing. Rate and distribution of mutations were identified. Functional analysis was performed for novel TP53 variants. Correlation with the International Agency for Research on Cancer p53 database further delineated mutational distribution, association with family history, and risk for multiple primary malignancies (MPMs).  Results  Germline mutations were present in 50% of children. These mutations did not correspond to the conventional hotspot mutations. There was a wide range of mutant protein function. Patients bearing alleles encoding protein with higher functionality were less likely to have a strong family cancer history, whereas those with greater loss of function had MPMs and/or positive family history. In patients with MPMs, ACC was the most frequent initial malignancy. Finally, we demonstrated age-dependent rates of TP53 mutation positivity.  Conclusion  TP53 mutations are prevalent in children with ACC but decline with age. Mutations result in a broad spectrum of functional loss. Effect of individual mutations may predict carrier and familial disease penetrance with potentially broad implications for clinical surveillance and counseling.  Go to: INTRODUCTION Adrenocortical carcinoma (ACC) is diagnosed at a rate of 0.3 to 0.4 per million children annually.1,2 Advancing age, large tumors, and metastatic disease predict poorer prognosis. For patients with metastatic disease, survival rates are extremely poor (5-year overall survival of approximately 20%),2 and treatments have significant toxicities. Although treatment guidelines are largely based on knowledge of disease and trials in adults, a recent Children's Oncology Group trial assessed the outcome of combination chemotherapy and retroperitoneal lymph node dissection. In addition, this study documented the rate of TP53 germline alterations among North American and Brazilian children.  Given the rarity of this diagnosis, reports describing demographics, morphology, and outcomes of children with ACC had been primarily reflective of small case series. A registry comprising 254 children with adrenocortical tumors (International Pediatric Adrenocortical Tumor Registry) contributed substantially to understanding the landscape of this disease.2 Even this series, however, was limited by geographic bias, because 79.5% of the patients came from a region in southern Brazil. It is now recognized that these patients carry a common genetic aberration, the R337H allele of the TP53 tumor-suppressor gene.3 This allele exhibits unique biochemical properties, including pH-dependent loss of function and apparent wild-type activity in vitro,4 in contrast to the loss of function observed with other common alleles.3,5 Thus, it is possible that data derived from this population may not be truly reflective of the natural history of pediatric ACC, despite no apparent differences in clinical presentation between patients in this cohort and patients in a subsequent study.6  A fundamental role for TP53 in ACC was first recognized when ACC was identified as a component tumor of the Li-Fraumeni syndrome (LFS).7 LFS results, in most cases, from germline TP53 mutations.8 Among all families with germline TP53 mutations, the six most common alleles (R175H, G245S, R248Q, R248W, R273H, and R282W) occur in 20% of pedigrees and are collectively referred to as hotspot mutations. Germline TP53 testing is advocated for anyone diagnosed with ACC, regardless of age or family cancer history, in recognition of an excess of ACC among families with LFS and a high rate of TP53 mutations among individuals with ACC.9  Small series have reported that 50% to 80% of children with ACC carry germline TP53 mutations. Wagner et al10 demonstrated that three of six children with ACC carried mutations. Subsequently, Varley et al11 identified mutations in 10 of 12 children with ACC. This series was enriched for two alleles, P152L (n = 5) and R158H (n = 3), a finding that is not replicated when examining the overall distribution of TP53 alleles in patients with ACC.12 Both series reported small numbers of children from geographically limited catchments. A more recent study found that 12 (80%) of 15 children with a diagnosis of ACC carried germline mutations.13 However, patients in this study were identified on the basis of referral to a TP53 reference laboratory; thus, enrichment for patients with a positive family history may have skewed these findings.  Striking among TP53 mutation carriers who are relatives of children with ACC has been the existence of apparent low-penetrance alleles. Several reports have identified unaffected carriers of TP53 mutations, including P152L,11 R175L,14 and R337H,3,4 where penetrance may be as low as 2.4%.15 Although these cancer rates are high for the general population, among carriers of TP53 mutations, for whom lifetime risk of cancer is between 70% and 100%,16,17 the cancer penetrance is relatively low. These findings suggest that affected individuals may have additional genetic or environmental exposures that promote tumorigenesis. Because TP53 mutation carriers have a high lifetime risk of developing multiple primary malignancies (MPMs),18 lifelong surveillance for subsequent malignancies decreases morbidity and improves short-term survival.19  Previous studies have suggested tissue specificity of mutations in certain TP53 domains.20,21 Olivier et al22 demonstrated that ACCs were preferentially associated with mutations located in loops opposing protein-DNA contact. Other series, including those describing the Brazilian R337H cohort and the Manchester pediatric cohort,11 have shown a paucity of nonadrenal tumors among pedigrees with certain TP53 alleles.3,11 Given the unique biochemical properties of the R337H mutation, a mechanism for tissue specificity based on perinatal remodeling within the adrenal cortex was proposed.4,20  We sought to characterize the TP53 mutations associated with childhood ACC and to determine whether, in a large cohort, the conventional hotspot alleles were represented or whether adrenal-specific hotspots existed. We undertook functional characterization of novel alleles and integrated these findings with characteristics of disease presentation, family history, and tissue specificity of ACC alleles into a framework for adrenocortical tumorigenesis based on a fetal-origin hypothesis.  Go to: PATIENTS AND METHODS Patients  The Children's Oncology Group study ARAR0332 investigated incidence and functional characteristics of germline TP53 mutations in children with ACC. Fifty-five patients were eligible for analysis in this study. In addition, patients ≤ 20 years old referred to The Hospital for Sick Children with a histologically confirmed diagnosis of ACC were invited to submit blood samples for testing (n = 34) as per current recommendations.9 Four patients have been previously described.10,23  Samples were analyzed regardless of family history of cancers or identifiable genetic syndromes. This study was approved by the institutional research ethics board. All participants provided informed consent.  Sequencing of exons 2 to 11 and multiplex ligation-dependent probe amplification analysis for gene dosage were performed as described in the Appendix (online only). Plasmids expressing TP53 variants were generated using site-directed mutagenesis (Appendix and Appendix Table A1, online only), and functional analysis was performed as described in the Appendix.  Database Query  The International Agency for Research on Cancer (IARC) p53 database (http://p53.iarc.fr)12,24 is a relational database based on all published reports and personal communications regarding individuals with germline and somatic TP53 mutations. This study was based on Revision 15 of the database.  Go to: RESULTS We identified 88 children with ACC derived from a broad geographic catchment, unselected for family history. Demographics (Table 1) overlap closely with those described previously.2,6  Table 1. Table 1. Descriptive Analysis of Patients Included in the Current Study After excluding carriers of the TP53R337H allele (see Appendix), 34 (50%) of 68 children carried TP53 mutations. The distribution of mutation type is similar to that found among all patients with ACC, as well as that found among all individuals with germline TP53-associated tumors (Fig 1). It is distinct from distributions among other tumor-suppressor genes such as Rb, APC, and PRKAR1a, which are more commonly subject to frameshift and nonsense substitutions.25,26  Fig 1. Fig 1. Distribution of germline TP53 mutation type in (A) the current cohort, (B) all reported pedigrees with adrenocortical carcinoma (ACC) in the International Agency for Research on Cancer (IARC) database, and (C) all pedigrees (all tumor types) in the IARC ... Only two of 34 variants in our cohort corresponded to a TP53 hotspot mutation, versus 20% among LFS patients overall (χ2 = 4.008, P = .045). There was no clustering of mutations in this series. Three mutations were present in more than one unrelated individual (c.375G>A, n = 327–29; C229R, n = 3; and a deletion of exons 10 to 11, n = 2). This stands in contrast to a previous report wherein two alleles predominated.11 Although the prior study, in isolation, suggests a mutational selectivity for ACC (an adrenal hotspot), based on our current findings, it more likely represents geographic clustering of the mutation and may suggest a common ancestor of the patients, despite none having been identified by the authors.  The scarcity of conventional hotspot mutations in families with ACC was recapitulated when reviewing the IARC p53 database,12 wherein only 12 (16%) of 75 families affected by ACC carried a hotspot allele. This rate is substantially lower than among families with other LFS-component tumors, including brain tumors (15 [26%] of 57 families) and bone cancers (11 [35%] of 31 families), suggesting that ACC may result from a distinct spectrum of TP53 mutations. Indeed, tumor-specific TP53 mutation spectra have previously been described.21,22  There was no significant difference between groups with germline TP53 wild-type and TP53 variant alleles with respect to sex or tumor stage (Table 1), whereas diagnosis before age 12 years was more likely associated with germline TP53 mutation than diagnosis in adolescence (Fisher's exact test, P = .043).  Several polymorphisms have been associated with altering the TP53 phenotype. We found no association between polymorphisms in codon 72 (PEX4), intron 3 (PIN3), or MDM2SNP309 and age or stage at presentation30,31 (Appendix Table A2, online only).  ACC-Associated TP53 Alleles Demonstrate a Spectrum of Functional Activity  Although hotspot mutations result in near-complete loss of TP53 activity,12 many of the variants identified in this study lacked prior functional characterization in mammalian cells. To determine whether the paucity of hotspot mutations had biologic significance, functional analysis was performed.  TP53-variant proteins were expressed in TP53 functionally null cells to determine protein function based on transactivation of a TP53-dependent luciferase reporter. By virtue of their identification among children with an LFS-component tumor, we anticipated that these variants would result in significant diminution of TP53 function. Remarkably, several variants retained significant levels of wild-type function in three independent cell lines, H1299, SaOS-2, and HAC1532 (Fig 2 and Data Supplement). In addition, several mutants demonstrated dominant-negative activity (Data Supplement).  Fig 2. Fig 2. (A) Functional activity of TP53 variants expressed in H1299 cells as determined by transactivation of TP53-responsive luciferase reporter (or a control reporter with point mutations in the response element which abolish TP53 binding [MutBS], Data Supplement). ... As a subsequent assay of TP53 function, variants were introduced into TP53-null cells in vitro, and their ability to interfere with colony formation was determined (Figs 3A to ​to3C).3C). As with luciferase assays, a spectrum of functionality was observed (Fig 3D).  Fig 3. Fig 3. Colony reduction assays. Fourteen days after transfection, plates were stained with crystal violet and the remaining colony numbers were quantified manually. Representative plates of (A) vector, (B) wild-type (WT) TP53-transfected, or (C) TP53R273H-transfected ... Residual TP53 Activity May Underlie Low-Penetrance Alleles  Loss of TP53 activity is associated with a family history of multiple malignancies. We were struck by the paucity of pedigrees with a strong history of cancer in this cohort, despite recognized associations of ACC with LFS. A family pedigree of three or more generations was available for 32 children. No patients with ACC harboring wild-type TP53 had a significant family history of cancer. Of 19 patients with germline TP53 mutations, 11 (58%) met classic, Birch, or Eeles definitions of LFS or Li-Fraumeni–like syndrome (LFLS; summarized by Gonzalez et al13). Of the remaining eight children with TP53 variants and no family cancer history, four patients had de novo mutations (Y163C, H193P, C275X, and E285V), two patients had a mutation carrier parent unaffected by cancer at age 42 years (G334R) and 51 years (F134Y), and parental DNA was unavailable for two patients (C229R and N235D), although extended four-generation family histories for these two patients failed to reveal early or multiple malignancies.  We compared TP53 function among those alleles with and without criteria for LFS/LFLS. For this analysis, we derived activity from extant data based on transactivation of TP53 target genes in Saccharomyces cerevisiae.33 Median TP53 function across eight different TP53 target genes was determined and classified according to presence of familial cancer (Table 2). Patients meeting LFS/LFLS criteria or with de novo mutations had lower activity alleles than those without a significant cancer history. In this analysis, the R337H allele, with previously estimated adrenocortical tumor penetrance of 2.6% to 9.9%,15,34 demonstrates a predicted activity of 69% of wild type. Thus, penetrance of cancer seems to be linked, at least partially, to the magnitude of residual TP53 function. ACC may present despite near-normal TP53 function, whereas other LFS-related cancers are uncommon in such circumstances.  Table 2. Table 2. Mutational Activity Among Individuals With and Without a Family History Consistent With Li-Fraumeni Syndrome/Li-Fraumeni–Like Syndrome ACC Is the Most Common Initial Tumor in Multiply Affected Individuals and Families  Harboring a germline TP53 mutation places individuals at high lifetime risk for MPMs. The cumulative probability of a second cancer at 30 years is estimated at 57%.18 Thus, we asked whether ACC was commonly an early or a late tumor among individuals with MPMs.  Given our small sample size (six patients with MPMs), we reviewed all instances of individuals with TP53 mutations and MPMs (including ACC as one of the malignancies) in both the IARC database and in our own series (Appendix Table A3, online only). Of 33 individuals, 26 (79%) presented with ACC as their first cancer, either singly or synchronously with other tumors.  Among all families that include a member with ACC, ACC again seems to be the earliest presenting tumor. Chompret et al35 identified 13 families with TP53 mutation, and ACC was present in at least one family member in four families. In all four families, the individual with ACC was the youngest to present with malignancy.35 In the IARC p53 database, 69 families contain at least one member with an ACC (excluding R337H families). Of these, the first cancer diagnosis within the family was an ACC in 53 (77%) of 69 families.  Go to: DISCUSSION Li et al7,36 identified ACC as one of several rare tumors arising among families with autosomal dominant cancer predisposition resulting from germline TP53 mutations.8 The relevance of TP53 dysfunction to ACC pathogenesis was thus established.  Recent estimates have reported up to 80% prevalence of TP53 mutations among children with ACC.13,37 This has been extrapolated to suggest that ACC rarely occurs in the absence of a germline TP53 mutation.38 Our data suggest this to be an overestimate, with the true prevalence of TP53 mutation to be 50%. The difference may be explained by an inherent methodologic distinction with the former study, which was based on referrals to a central reference laboratory and thus likely enriched for pedigrees with a history of cancers. Although the current study was designed to overcome these biases, we cannot rule out a negative referral bias to tertiary care wherein TP53 testing was not offered to patients with benign (or indeterminate) histology and/or milder disease course.  The high rate of germline TP53 mutation seems almost exclusively limited to individuals diagnosed with ACC in childhood. Indeed, in the current series, the rate of germline positivity decreased from 58% in those diagnosed before age 12 years to 25% in those diagnosed between 12 and 20 years old (Table 1, Fig 4). This is consistent with our prior finding that only 11% of patients with TP53-associated ACC were older than age 12 years and only 3% were older than age 30.39 In two recent series, mutation rates among adults were 3.8% (four of 103 patients)40 and 5.8% (three of 52 patients).41 Figure 4 illustrates aggregate data from our series, as well as those of Herrmann et al40 and Raymond et al.41  Fig 4. Fig 4. Prevalence of germline TP53 mutations based on age at diagnosis. Aggregate data from this study, as well as those of Herrmann et al40 and Raymond et al41 are included in this representation. Percentage of individuals with TP53 germline mutations is indicated. ... Half of patients with TP53 variants lacked a family history of early or atypical cancers. This underscores the merit of the recommendation that all individuals with ACC be offered testing for TP539, regardless of family history, because a significant proportion of mutation carriers would otherwise have gone undetected. Nevertheless, we cannot anticipate the lifetime risk of developing cancer in those unaffected carriers of apparently milder mutations. Moreover, Figure 4 suggests that TP53 testing in patients with ACC older than age 40 years is of low yield and unlikely to have clinical ramifications, absent other primary malignancies or significant family history.  A particularly intriguing finding is the unanticipated wide spectrum of functional activity of TP53. We hypothesized that near-total loss of tumor-suppressor activity would be necessary for tumorigenesis. Instead, several alleles show retention of substantial function. We propose that the degree to which a TP53 mutation alters function impacts risk for MPMs and disease penetrance and may play a role in selective transformation of tissues based on their underlying biology. Alternatively, it is possible that total loss of one or more of the myriad functions of TP53 underlies these effects among those apparently milder alleles.  This wide variation in activity and the absence of observed family history or MPMs among those carrying milder mutants expand the concept of the gradient effect of TP5342, in which phenotype was argued to reflect TP53 activity. It would not be unexpected if tumors arising from individuals with milder mutations showed less genetic instability than those arising from patients with stronger loss-of-function alleles. A recent high-resolution genomic analysis of pediatric adrenocortical tumors identified fewer genomic alterations in tumors with TP53 wild type versus those with mutations.43 Analysis of germline DNA from six of these children revealed the absence of genomic aberrations, suggesting an early role for TP53 in genomic destabilization during tumorigenesis.  Carriers of TP53 mutations are at increased risk for MPMs. Mutation carriage necessitates lifelong surveillance, and screening of relatives is recommended. These data suggest that patients with milder TP53 alleles might be at decreased risk for MPMs. Also notable is the apparent association between milder alleles and a lower penetrance of cancer within families. Given the variable penetrance and tissue distribution of disease among individual TP53 alleles, we speculate that, ultimately, cancer surveillance for mutation carriers may be individualized based on specific alleles and/or modifier genetic or epigenetic variants. This will also have broad implications for genetic counseling and risk assessment in carrier relatives, although much work remains before this is realized.  We note distinct limitations to this analysis. An adequate family history was available for a minority of the individuals; thus, broad conclusions regarding penetrance cannot be drawn until more data are obtained. Moreover, the majority of patients were diagnosed within the past 10 years; therefore, conclusions regarding survival, recurrence, MPMs, and malignancies in mutation-positive siblings await longer follow-up, particularly in the context of a recent observation that carriers of TP53 mutations with partial transactivation develop cancer at a later age.12 Finally, we cannot refute the possibility that these alleles are not the dominant drivers in tumorigenesis, but may in fact be passengers or backseat drivers, modifying disease engendered by other driver mutations.  We and others have observed that ACC presents in a bimodal age distribution, with peaks in the first and fifth to sixth decade of life.39,44 Given the marked divergence in TP53 mutation prevalence in these two peaks, we propose that they evolve as a consequence of distinct molecular mechanisms. This is supported by differing genotype and expression profiles among pediatric and adult tumors.45,46 Whereas tumors arising in adults may result from gradual accumulation of genetic hits, we speculate that tumorigenesis in children reflects adrenal ontogeny and consequent susceptibility to perturbations in the physiologic transition from fetus to newborn.  The high proportion of children diagnosed with ACC within the first 2 years of life is consistent with an origin of disease in the fetal or neonatal period. The adrenal gland undergoes extensive postnatal remodeling as the fetal cortex undergoes a robust wave of apoptosis, decreasing from 70% to 3% of total adrenal volume.47–49 Within this context, even mild perturbations in proapoptotic signaling (via compromised TP53) could impair this remodeling. The apparent adrenal specificity of milder TP53 alleles would thus be conferred by the high apoptotic index, absent in other tissues. This massive apoptotic wave renders the gland vulnerable to mild perturbations in apoptotic signaling wherein failure of apoptosis in a single fetal cell may result in progression to the transformed state. Consequently tumorigenesis associated with seemingly mild TP53 mutations can be explained by a failure of physiologic apoptosis in fetal zone cells.  A fetal origin of disease is further supported by gene expression studies that demonstrate marked similarities between expression profiles of fetal adrenal cortex and ACCs, which are distinct from those of the definitive postnatal gland.45,50–52  We have demonstrated that half of children with ACC carry germline TP53 mutations and that the likelihood of mutation is highest in the first years of life, diminishing with age. The mutation carried in the germline (and its effects on protein function) is germane and likely influences the site of tumor formation, likelihood of subsequent malignancy, and disease penetrance among carriers. These data expand our understanding of the mutational spectrum underlying ACC tumorigenesis and suggest novel mechanisms whereby physiologic remodeling confers temporal and tissue selectivity to a tumorigenic process. 
487|| Abstract Purpose  Adrenocortical carcinoma (ACC) is a rare pediatric malignancy. It occurs in excess among individuals with the Li-Fraumeni syndrome, which results primarily from germline mutations in the TP53 gene. Prior series exploring frequencies of germline TP53 mutation among children with ACC have been small, geographically limited, or subject to referral bias. The functional consequence of mutations has not been related to phenotype. We provide a genotype-phenotype analysis of TP53 mutations in pediatric ACC and propose a model for tissue-specific effects based on adrenocortical ontogeny.  Patients and Methods  Eighty-eight consecutive, unrelated children with ACC, unselected for family history, underwent germline TP53 sequencing. Rate and distribution of mutations were identified. Functional analysis was performed for novel TP53 variants. Correlation with the International Agency for Research on Cancer p53 database further delineated mutational distribution, association with family history, and risk for multiple primary malignancies (MPMs).  Results  Germline mutations were present in 50% of children. These mutations did not correspond to the conventional hotspot mutations. There was a wide range of mutant protein function. Patients bearing alleles encoding protein with higher functionality were less likely to have a strong family cancer history, whereas those with greater loss of function had MPMs and/or positive family history. In patients with MPMs, ACC was the most frequent initial malignancy. Finally, we demonstrated age-dependent rates of TP53 mutation positivity.  Conclusion  TP53 mutations are prevalent in children with ACC but decline with age. Mutations result in a broad spectrum of functional loss. Effect of individual mutations may predict carrier and familial disease penetrance with potentially broad implications for clinical surveillance and counseling.  Go to: INTRODUCTION Adrenocortical carcinoma (ACC) is diagnosed at a rate of 0.3 to 0.4 per million children annually.1,2 Advancing age, large tumors, and metastatic disease predict poorer prognosis. For patients with metastatic disease, survival rates are extremely poor (5-year overall survival of approximately 20%),2 and treatments have significant toxicities. Although treatment guidelines are largely based on knowledge of disease and trials in adults, a recent Children's Oncology Group trial assessed the outcome of combination chemotherapy and retroperitoneal lymph node dissection. In addition, this study documented the rate of TP53 germline alterations among North American and Brazilian children.  Given the rarity of this diagnosis, reports describing demographics, morphology, and outcomes of children with ACC had been primarily reflective of small case series. A registry comprising 254 children with adrenocortical tumors (International Pediatric Adrenocortical Tumor Registry) contributed substantially to understanding the landscape of this disease.2 Even this series, however, was limited by geographic bias, because 79.5% of the patients came from a region in southern Brazil. It is now recognized that these patients carry a common genetic aberration, the R337H allele of the TP53 tumor-suppressor gene.3 This allele exhibits unique biochemical properties, including pH-dependent loss of function and apparent wild-type activity in vitro,4 in contrast to the loss of function observed with other common alleles.3,5 Thus, it is possible that data derived from this population may not be truly reflective of the natural history of pediatric ACC, despite no apparent differences in clinical presentation between patients in this cohort and patients in a subsequent study.6  A fundamental role for TP53 in ACC was first recognized when ACC was identified as a component tumor of the Li-Fraumeni syndrome (LFS).7 LFS results, in most cases, from germline TP53 mutations.8 Among all families with germline TP53 mutations, the six most common alleles (R175H, G245S, R248Q, R248W, R273H, and R282W) occur in 20% of pedigrees and are collectively referred to as hotspot mutations. Germline TP53 testing is advocated for anyone diagnosed with ACC, regardless of age or family cancer history, in recognition of an excess of ACC among families with LFS and a high rate of TP53 mutations among individuals with ACC.9  Small series have reported that 50% to 80% of children with ACC carry germline TP53 mutations. Wagner et al10 demonstrated that three of six children with ACC carried mutations. Subsequently, Varley et al11 identified mutations in 10 of 12 children with ACC. This series was enriched for two alleles, P152L (n = 5) and R158H (n = 3), a finding that is not replicated when examining the overall distribution of TP53 alleles in patients with ACC.12 Both series reported small numbers of children from geographically limited catchments. A more recent study found that 12 (80%) of 15 children with a diagnosis of ACC carried germline mutations.13 However, patients in this study were identified on the basis of referral to a TP53 reference laboratory; thus, enrichment for patients with a positive family history may have skewed these findings.  Striking among TP53 mutation carriers who are relatives of children with ACC has been the existence of apparent low-penetrance alleles. Several reports have identified unaffected carriers of TP53 mutations, including P152L,11 R175L,14 and R337H,3,4 where penetrance may be as low as 2.4%.15 Although these cancer rates are high for the general population, among carriers of TP53 mutations, for whom lifetime risk of cancer is between 70% and 100%,16,17 the cancer penetrance is relatively low. These findings suggest that affected individuals may have additional genetic or environmental exposures that promote tumorigenesis. Because TP53 mutation carriers have a high lifetime risk of developing multiple primary malignancies (MPMs),18 lifelong surveillance for subsequent malignancies decreases morbidity and improves short-term survival.19  Previous studies have suggested tissue specificity of mutations in certain TP53 domains.20,21 Olivier et al22 demonstrated that ACCs were preferentially associated with mutations located in loops opposing protein-DNA contact. Other series, including those describing the Brazilian R337H cohort and the Manchester pediatric cohort,11 have shown a paucity of nonadrenal tumors among pedigrees with certain TP53 alleles.3,11 Given the unique biochemical properties of the R337H mutation, a mechanism for tissue specificity based on perinatal remodeling within the adrenal cortex was proposed.4,20  We sought to characterize the TP53 mutations associated with childhood ACC and to determine whether, in a large cohort, the conventional hotspot alleles were represented or whether adrenal-specific hotspots existed. We undertook functional characterization of novel alleles and integrated these findings with characteristics of disease presentation, family history, and tissue specificity of ACC alleles into a framework for adrenocortical tumorigenesis based on a fetal-origin hypothesis.  Go to: PATIENTS AND METHODS Patients  The Children's Oncology Group study ARAR0332 investigated incidence and functional characteristics of germline TP53 mutations in children with ACC. Fifty-five patients were eligible for analysis in this study. In addition, patients ≤ 20 years old referred to The Hospital for Sick Children with a histologically confirmed diagnosis of ACC were invited to submit blood samples for testing (n = 34) as per current recommendations.9 Four patients have been previously described.10,23  Samples were analyzed regardless of family history of cancers or identifiable genetic syndromes. This study was approved by the institutional research ethics board. All participants provided informed consent.  Sequencing of exons 2 to 11 and multiplex ligation-dependent probe amplification analysis for gene dosage were performed as described in the Appendix (online only). Plasmids expressing TP53 variants were generated using site-directed mutagenesis (Appendix and Appendix Table A1, online only), and functional analysis was performed as described in the Appendix.  Database Query  The International Agency for Research on Cancer (IARC) p53 database (http://p53.iarc.fr)12,24 is a relational database based on all published reports and personal communications regarding individuals with germline and somatic TP53 mutations. This study was based on Revision 15 of the database.  Go to: RESULTS We identified 88 children with ACC derived from a broad geographic catchment, unselected for family history. Demographics (Table 1) overlap closely with those described previously.2,6  Table 1. Table 1. Descriptive Analysis of Patients Included in the Current Study After excluding carriers of the TP53R337H allele (see Appendix), 34 (50%) of 68 children carried TP53 mutations. The distribution of mutation type is similar to that found among all patients with ACC, as well as that found among all individuals with germline TP53-associated tumors (Fig 1). It is distinct from distributions among other tumor-suppressor genes such as Rb, APC, and PRKAR1a, which are more commonly subject to frameshift and nonsense substitutions.25,26  Fig 1. Fig 1. Distribution of germline TP53 mutation type in (A) the current cohort, (B) all reported pedigrees with adrenocortical carcinoma (ACC) in the International Agency for Research on Cancer (IARC) database, and (C) all pedigrees (all tumor types) in the IARC ... Only two of 34 variants in our cohort corresponded to a TP53 hotspot mutation, versus 20% among LFS patients overall (χ2 = 4.008, P = .045). There was no clustering of mutations in this series. Three mutations were present in more than one unrelated individual (c.375G>A, n = 327–29; C229R, n = 3; and a deletion of exons 10 to 11, n = 2). This stands in contrast to a previous report wherein two alleles predominated.11 Although the prior study, in isolation, suggests a mutational selectivity for ACC (an adrenal hotspot), based on our current findings, it more likely represents geographic clustering of the mutation and may suggest a common ancestor of the patients, despite none having been identified by the authors.  The scarcity of conventional hotspot mutations in families with ACC was recapitulated when reviewing the IARC p53 database,12 wherein only 12 (16%) of 75 families affected by ACC carried a hotspot allele. This rate is substantially lower than among families with other LFS-component tumors, including brain tumors (15 [26%] of 57 families) and bone cancers (11 [35%] of 31 families), suggesting that ACC may result from a distinct spectrum of TP53 mutations. Indeed, tumor-specific TP53 mutation spectra have previously been described.21,22  There was no significant difference between groups with germline TP53 wild-type and TP53 variant alleles with respect to sex or tumor stage (Table 1), whereas diagnosis before age 12 years was more likely associated with germline TP53 mutation than diagnosis in adolescence (Fisher's exact test, P = .043).  Several polymorphisms have been associated with altering the TP53 phenotype. We found no association between polymorphisms in codon 72 (PEX4), intron 3 (PIN3), or MDM2SNP309 and age or stage at presentation30,31 (Appendix Table A2, online only).  ACC-Associated TP53 Alleles Demonstrate a Spectrum of Functional Activity  Although hotspot mutations result in near-complete loss of TP53 activity,12 many of the variants identified in this study lacked prior functional characterization in mammalian cells. To determine whether the paucity of hotspot mutations had biologic significance, functional analysis was performed.  TP53-variant proteins were expressed in TP53 functionally null cells to determine protein function based on transactivation of a TP53-dependent luciferase reporter. By virtue of their identification among children with an LFS-component tumor, we anticipated that these variants would result in significant diminution of TP53 function. Remarkably, several variants retained significant levels of wild-type function in three independent cell lines, H1299, SaOS-2, and HAC1532 (Fig 2 and Data Supplement). In addition, several mutants demonstrated dominant-negative activity (Data Supplement).  Fig 2. Fig 2. (A) Functional activity of TP53 variants expressed in H1299 cells as determined by transactivation of TP53-responsive luciferase reporter (or a control reporter with point mutations in the response element which abolish TP53 binding [MutBS], Data Supplement). ... As a subsequent assay of TP53 function, variants were introduced into TP53-null cells in vitro, and their ability to interfere with colony formation was determined (Figs 3A to ​to3C).3C). As with luciferase assays, a spectrum of functionality was observed (Fig 3D).  Fig 3. Fig 3. Colony reduction assays. Fourteen days after transfection, plates were stained with crystal violet and the remaining colony numbers were quantified manually. Representative plates of (A) vector, (B) wild-type (WT) TP53-transfected, or (C) TP53R273H-transfected ... Residual TP53 Activity May Underlie Low-Penetrance Alleles  Loss of TP53 activity is associated with a family history of multiple malignancies. We were struck by the paucity of pedigrees with a strong history of cancer in this cohort, despite recognized associations of ACC with LFS. A family pedigree of three or more generations was available for 32 children. No patients with ACC harboring wild-type TP53 had a significant family history of cancer. Of 19 patients with germline TP53 mutations, 11 (58%) met classic, Birch, or Eeles definitions of LFS or Li-Fraumeni–like syndrome (LFLS; summarized by Gonzalez et al13). Of the remaining eight children with TP53 variants and no family cancer history, four patients had de novo mutations (Y163C, H193P, C275X, and E285V), two patients had a mutation carrier parent unaffected by cancer at age 42 years (G334R) and 51 years (F134Y), and parental DNA was unavailable for two patients (C229R and N235D), although extended four-generation family histories for these two patients failed to reveal early or multiple malignancies.  We compared TP53 function among those alleles with and without criteria for LFS/LFLS. For this analysis, we derived activity from extant data based on transactivation of TP53 target genes in Saccharomyces cerevisiae.33 Median TP53 function across eight different TP53 target genes was determined and classified according to presence of familial cancer (Table 2). Patients meeting LFS/LFLS criteria or with de novo mutations had lower activity alleles than those without a significant cancer history. In this analysis, the R337H allele, with previously estimated adrenocortical tumor penetrance of 2.6% to 9.9%,15,34 demonstrates a predicted activity of 69% of wild type. Thus, penetrance of cancer seems to be linked, at least partially, to the magnitude of residual TP53 function. ACC may present despite near-normal TP53 function, whereas other LFS-related cancers are uncommon in such circumstances.  Table 2. Table 2. Mutational Activity Among Individuals With and Without a Family History Consistent With Li-Fraumeni Syndrome/Li-Fraumeni–Like Syndrome ACC Is the Most Common Initial Tumor in Multiply Affected Individuals and Families  Harboring a germline TP53 mutation places individuals at high lifetime risk for MPMs. The cumulative probability of a second cancer at 30 years is estimated at 57%.18 Thus, we asked whether ACC was commonly an early or a late tumor among individuals with MPMs.  Given our small sample size (six patients with MPMs), we reviewed all instances of individuals with TP53 mutations and MPMs (including ACC as one of the malignancies) in both the IARC database and in our own series (Appendix Table A3, online only). Of 33 individuals, 26 (79%) presented with ACC as their first cancer, either singly or synchronously with other tumors.  Among all families that include a member with ACC, ACC again seems to be the earliest presenting tumor. Chompret et al35 identified 13 families with TP53 mutation, and ACC was present in at least one family member in four families. In all four families, the individual with ACC was the youngest to present with malignancy.35 In the IARC p53 database, 69 families contain at least one member with an ACC (excluding R337H families). Of these, the first cancer diagnosis within the family was an ACC in 53 (77%) of 69 families.  Go to: DISCUSSION Li et al7,36 identified ACC as one of several rare tumors arising among families with autosomal dominant cancer predisposition resulting from germline TP53 mutations.8 The relevance of TP53 dysfunction to ACC pathogenesis was thus established.  Recent estimates have reported up to 80% prevalence of TP53 mutations among children with ACC.13,37 This has been extrapolated to suggest that ACC rarely occurs in the absence of a germline TP53 mutation.38 Our data suggest this to be an overestimate, with the true prevalence of TP53 mutation to be 50%. The difference may be explained by an inherent methodologic distinction with the former study, which was based on referrals to a central reference laboratory and thus likely enriched for pedigrees with a history of cancers. Although the current study was designed to overcome these biases, we cannot rule out a negative referral bias to tertiary care wherein TP53 testing was not offered to patients with benign (or indeterminate) histology and/or milder disease course.  The high rate of germline TP53 mutation seems almost exclusively limited to individuals diagnosed with ACC in childhood. Indeed, in the current series, the rate of germline positivity decreased from 58% in those diagnosed before age 12 years to 25% in those diagnosed between 12 and 20 years old (Table 1, Fig 4). This is consistent with our prior finding that only 11% of patients with TP53-associated ACC were older than age 12 years and only 3% were older than age 30.39 In two recent series, mutation rates among adults were 3.8% (four of 103 patients)40 and 5.8% (three of 52 patients).41 Figure 4 illustrates aggregate data from our series, as well as those of Herrmann et al40 and Raymond et al.41  Fig 4. Fig 4. Prevalence of germline TP53 mutations based on age at diagnosis. Aggregate data from this study, as well as those of Herrmann et al40 and Raymond et al41 are included in this representation. Percentage of individuals with TP53 germline mutations is indicated. ... Half of patients with TP53 variants lacked a family history of early or atypical cancers. This underscores the merit of the recommendation that all individuals with ACC be offered testing for TP539, regardless of family history, because a significant proportion of mutation carriers would otherwise have gone undetected. Nevertheless, we cannot anticipate the lifetime risk of developing cancer in those unaffected carriers of apparently milder mutations. Moreover, Figure 4 suggests that TP53 testing in patients with ACC older than age 40 years is of low yield and unlikely to have clinical ramifications, absent other primary malignancies or significant family history.  A particularly intriguing finding is the unanticipated wide spectrum of functional activity of TP53. We hypothesized that near-total loss of tumor-suppressor activity would be necessary for tumorigenesis. Instead, several alleles show retention of substantial function. We propose that the degree to which a TP53 mutation alters function impacts risk for MPMs and disease penetrance and may play a role in selective transformation of tissues based on their underlying biology. Alternatively, it is possible that total loss of one or more of the myriad functions of TP53 underlies these effects among those apparently milder alleles.  This wide variation in activity and the absence of observed family history or MPMs among those carrying milder mutants expand the concept of the gradient effect of TP5342, in which phenotype was argued to reflect TP53 activity. It would not be unexpected if tumors arising from individuals with milder mutations showed less genetic instability than those arising from patients with stronger loss-of-function alleles. A recent high-resolution genomic analysis of pediatric adrenocortical tumors identified fewer genomic alterations in tumors with TP53 wild type versus those with mutations.43 Analysis of germline DNA from six of these children revealed the absence of genomic aberrations, suggesting an early role for TP53 in genomic destabilization during tumorigenesis.  Carriers of TP53 mutations are at increased risk for MPMs. Mutation carriage necessitates lifelong surveillance, and screening of relatives is recommended. These data suggest that patients with milder TP53 alleles might be at decreased risk for MPMs. Also notable is the apparent association between milder alleles and a lower penetrance of cancer within families. Given the variable penetrance and tissue distribution of disease among individual TP53 alleles, we speculate that, ultimately, cancer surveillance for mutation carriers may be individualized based on specific alleles and/or modifier genetic or epigenetic variants. This will also have broad implications for genetic counseling and risk assessment in carrier relatives, although much work remains before this is realized.  We note distinct limitations to this analysis. An adequate family history was available for a minority of the individuals; thus, broad conclusions regarding penetrance cannot be drawn until more data are obtained. Moreover, the majority of patients were diagnosed within the past 10 years; therefore, conclusions regarding survival, recurrence, MPMs, and malignancies in mutation-positive siblings await longer follow-up, particularly in the context of a recent observation that carriers of TP53 mutations with partial transactivation develop cancer at a later age.12 Finally, we cannot refute the possibility that these alleles are not the dominant drivers in tumorigenesis, but may in fact be passengers or backseat drivers, modifying disease engendered by other driver mutations.  We and others have observed that ACC presents in a bimodal age distribution, with peaks in the first and fifth to sixth decade of life.39,44 Given the marked divergence in TP53 mutation prevalence in these two peaks, we propose that they evolve as a consequence of distinct molecular mechanisms. This is supported by differing genotype and expression profiles among pediatric and adult tumors.45,46 Whereas tumors arising in adults may result from gradual accumulation of genetic hits, we speculate that tumorigenesis in children reflects adrenal ontogeny and consequent susceptibility to perturbations in the physiologic transition from fetus to newborn.  The high proportion of children diagnosed with ACC within the first 2 years of life is consistent with an origin of disease in the fetal or neonatal period. The adrenal gland undergoes extensive postnatal remodeling as the fetal cortex undergoes a robust wave of apoptosis, decreasing from 70% to 3% of total adrenal volume.47–49 Within this context, even mild perturbations in proapoptotic signaling (via compromised TP53) could impair this remodeling. The apparent adrenal specificity of milder TP53 alleles would thus be conferred by the high apoptotic index, absent in other tissues. This massive apoptotic wave renders the gland vulnerable to mild perturbations in apoptotic signaling wherein failure of apoptosis in a single fetal cell may result in progression to the transformed state. Consequently tumorigenesis associated with seemingly mild TP53 mutations can be explained by a failure of physiologic apoptosis in fetal zone cells.  A fetal origin of disease is further supported by gene expression studies that demonstrate marked similarities between expression profiles of fetal adrenal cortex and ACCs, which are distinct from those of the definitive postnatal gland.45,50–52  We have demonstrated that half of children with ACC carry germline TP53 mutations and that the likelihood of mutation is highest in the first years of life, diminishing with age. The mutation carried in the germline (and its effects on protein function) is germane and likely influences the site of tumor formation, likelihood of subsequent malignancy, and disease penetrance among carriers. These data expand our understanding of the mutational spectrum underlying ACC tumorigenesis and suggest novel mechanisms whereby physiologic remodeling confers temporal and tissue selectivity to a tumorigenic process. 
574||Smad proteins are the key effectors of the transforming growth factor β (TGFβ) signaling pathway in mammalian cells. The importance of Smads for human physiology is documented by the identification and characterization of mutations that are frequently found in cancer patients. In the present study we have functionally characterized such a tumorigenic mutation in Smad4 (E330A) and shown that this mutant as well as a Smad3 mutant bearing the corresponding mutation (Smad3 E239A) failed to activate transcription in response to TGFβ stimulation because of defects in homo-and hetero-oligomerization. In the case of Smad3, the E239A mutation also abolished the phosphorylation by the TGFβ type I receptor (ALK5). Examination of the previously published crystal structure of a Smad3/Smad4 MH2 heterotrimer [Protein Data Bank accession code, 1U7F] showed that (a) residue E239 in Smad3 participates in a dense network of intermolecular hydrogen bond and ionic interactions with other conserved polar residues such as Y237 of β1 strand, N276 and R279 of L2 loop, and R287 of helix H1; (b) residue R287 in Smad3 is also involved in intermolecular interactions by making hydrogen and ionic bonds with Y364 in Smad3 and D493 in Smad4, an amino acid residue that is also frequently mutated in cancer patients (mutation D493H). To investigate the contribution of these interactions to Smad function and TGFβ signaling, we replaced two of these polar residues (R287 and Y237) with a nonpolar residue (alanine) and functionally characterized the resulting Smad3 mutants. Our analysis showed that Smad3 mutant R287A was phosphorylated by the ALK5 receptor but was unable to form homo-oligomers or hetero-oligomers with Smad4 and activate transcription whereas mutation Y237A had a wild type phenotype. In summary, our present work provides a molecular basis for the functional inactivation of the TGFβ pathway in patients bearing previously uncharacterized mutations in Smad4 as well as new information regarding the importance of conserved polar amino acids for the structure and function of the MH2 domain of Smads.  Members of the transforming growth factor β (TGFβ1) superfamily of cytokines control important biological processes including cell proliferation, differentiation, apoptosis, angiogenesis, lineage determination, motility, adhesion, and epithelial to mesenchymal transdifferentiation (EMT) in a cell type-dependent manner (1, 2). The interaction of TGFβ with its receptors (type I and type II Ser/Thr kinase receptors) on the cell surface is followed by the phosphorylation of a subset of intracellular signaling mediators termed receptor-regulated Smads (R-Smads) (3−7). The phosphorylation of R-Smads (Smad 2 and 3) by the type I TGFβ receptor induces their oligomerization with the common mediator Smad4 and their translocation to the nucleus where they bind to the promoters of target genes and activate or repress their transcription (3−7). To accomplish this task, R-Smad/Smad4 complexes in the nucleus cooperate with DNA-bound cofactors and non-DNA bound coactivators and corepressors (3−7). Smads harbor two well conserved functional domains of defined structure termed the Mad homology 1 (MH1) and MH2 domain separated by a middle nonconserved flexible linker region (7). The MH1 domain is responsible for binding to DNA by making contacts with nucleotides in Smad DNA binding elements (SBEs) composed of the tetranucleotide 5‘-GTCT-3‘ (8). The MH1 domain contains a nuclear localization signal and negatively regulates the functions of the MH2 domain (9, 10). The MH2 domain is indispensable for Smad homo- and hetero-oligomerization, for the recognition and phosphorylation of R-Smads by their type I receptors, and for transcriptional activation (7). The key structural feature of the MH2 domain is a central β-sandwich core element capped by a three-helical bundle at one end and a loop-helix region at the opposite end (11−15). Smad oligomerization is facilitated by specific contacts between amino acids of the loop-helix region of one MH2 subunit and the three helical bundle of another partner subunit (11). Point mutations in highly conserved amino acid residues either in the loop-helix region or the three-helical bundle of the MH2 domain that disrupt Smad4 homo-oligomerization have been described in cancer patients (12, 16). We have shown recently that TGFβ-stimulated transcriptional activation of target genes via Smad3 protein is mediated by two distinct transactivation domains present in the C-terminal MH2 domain and the middle linker region (17). We characterized the linker region of Smad3 further and showed that it has the capacity to physically and functionally interact with the histone acetyltransferase p300/CBP activating factor (p/CAF) in a ligand-independent manner and to be transcriptionally active in yeast cells that lack a TGFβ pathway (17). In the same study, we showed that the transcriptional activity of the linker depends on the presence of a short region that includes the first and part of the second β strands of the MH2 domain (aa region 230−248) (17). In the present study, we continue our structure−function analysis of Smad proteins by functionally characterizing naturally occurring tumorigenic mutations as well as novel bioengineered mutations. Our aim was (a) to gather new information regarding to the contribution of specific structural elements of Smads to their functions as TGFβ signaling mediators; (b) to provide a molecular basis for the functional inactivation of the TGFβ pathway in patients bearing previously uncharacterized mutations in specific polar amino acid residues of Smad4. Materials and Methods Materials. Dulbecco's Modified Eagle's Medium (DMEM) and penicillin/streptomycin for cell culture was purchased from Invitrogen/Life Technologies (Carlsbad, CA). Fetal bovine serum (FBS) was purchased from BioChrom Labs (Terre Haute, IN). Restriction enzymes and modifying enzymes (T4 DNA ligase and calf intestinal alkaline phosphatase) were purchased from Minotech (Heraklion, Greece) or New England Biolabs (Beverly, MA). GoTaq DNA polymerase, dNTPs, the luciferase assay system, and Wizard SV gel and PCR cleanup system were purchased from Promega (Madison, WI). Streptavidin−agarose, streptavidin−HRP, and the anti-Flag M2 mouse monoclonal antibody were purchased from Sigma-Aldrich (St Louis, MI). The Super Signal West Pico Chemiluminescent Substrate was purchased from Pierce (Rockford, IL). The mouse anti-GAL4 DBD antibody was purchased from Santa Cruz Biotechnology (Santa Cruz, CA). The anti-myc monoclonal antibody was a kind gift from Dr. G. Mavrothalassitis (University of Crete, Heraklion, Greece). The anti-Smad3 and anti-P-Smad3 antibodies were provided by Dr. Aris Moustakas (Ludwig Institute for Cancer Research, Uppsala, Sweden). The anti-mouse peroxidase conjugated secondary antibody was purchased from Chemicon International Inc. (Temecula, CA). Plasmid Constructions. Plasmids expressing the wt human Smad3 tagged with the myc epitope or fused with the DNA binding domain (DBD) of GAL4 have been described previously (17, 18). The mutants bearing the internal deletion of amino acids 230−248 or the single amino acid substitutions E239A, Y237A, and R287A in Smad3 as well as the E330A mutation in Smad4 were constructed by overlap extension PCR (19). Each amplified fragment corresponding to a particular Smad mutant was cloned at the EcoRI and NotI sites of either the pCDNA1amp-6Xmyc vector in frame with a 6myc epitope tag or into the pCDNA3-Bio vector in frame with the biotinylation tag and then subcloned into the pBXG1 vector at the EcoRI and XbaI sites in frame with the DNA binding domain of GAL4. The sequences of all primers used in the PCR amplifications are shown in Table 1 (Supporting Information). All mutant Smad3 cDNAs were sequenced for verification and found to contain the proper mutation. Plasmid pBS-myc-BirA bearing the myc-tagged bacterial biotin ligase BirA was a generous gift of Dr. John Strouboulis (Erasmus Medical Center, Rotterdam, The Netherlands). The expression vector pCDNA3-Bio has been described previously (17, 20). Cell Culture and Treatments. COS-7, HepG2, HEK-293T, JEG-3, and MDA-MB-468 cells were cultured in Dulbecco's Modified Eagle's Medium (DMEM), supplemented with 10% fetal bovine serum (FBS) and penicillin−streptomycin, in a 37 °C, 5% CO2 incubator. Treatment with 200 pM of TGFβ1 was for 24 h. Transient Transfections and Reporter Assays. Transient transfections for transactivation assays were performed by the calcium phosphate coprecipitation method in six-well plates using 1 μg of a reporter plasmid and 1−2 μg of expression vectors per well. For immunofluorescence analysis, 5 × 105 COS-7 cells were transfected in 6-cm plates with 2 μg of each 6-myc Smad expression vector in the presence or in the absence of a constitutively active TGFβ type I receptor (2 μg). β-Galactosidase and luciferase assays were performed using well-established protocols. Indirect Immunofluorescence. Transfected COS-7 cells were seeded on glass coverslips, 22 × 22 mm, covered with 0.1% gelatin and incubated for 16−18 h. Cells were washed three times on a slow rotating platform with PBS+/+ (PBS plus 0.9 mM CaCl2 and 0.5 mM MgCl2) and fixed with 3% p-formaldehyde in PBS +/+ for 5 min at room temperature. Cells were washed three times with PBS+/+ and permeabilized with 0.5% Triton X-100 in buffer 1 (10× buffer 1:  137 mM NaCl, 5 mM KCl, 1 mM Na2HPO4, 0.4 mM KH2PO4, 5.5 mM glucose, 4 mM NaHCO3, 2 mM MgCl2, 2 mM EDTA, 2 mM EGTA, 20 mM MES, pH 6.0−6.5) for 5 min at room temperature. Cells were washed three times with PBS+/+ and blocked with PBS +/+/1.5% FBS two times. Cells were incubated with anti-myc (9E10), 1:200 dilution in PBS +/+/1.5% FBS for 30 min at 4 °C. Cells were washed three times with PBS+/+ /1.5% FBS and incubated with the secondary antibody (goat anti-mouse FITC, 1:50 dilution in PBS +/+/1.5% FBS) for 30 min at 4 °C in the dark. Cells were washed three times with PBS+/+ in the dark and mounted on glass slides using mounting solution (1:1 glycerol/PBS). Cells were observed using a Leica SP confocal fluorescent microscopy. Western Blot Analysis. Cell lysates or proteins bound to streptavidin agarose beads were subjected to SDS-PAGE and transferred to nitrocellulose membranes (Life Sciences and Schleichers & Schuell), with a Bio-Rad Protean electroblot apparatus. Electrophoresis was performed on 10.5% polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis in 500 mL of 1× TGS (1 L of 10× TGS:  30.3 g of Tris, 144.2 g of glycine, 10 g of SDS, pH 8.3). Proteins on the membrane were visualized by Ponceau S staining. Nitrocellulose membranes were washed with TBS-T (TBS + 0.05% Tween-20) for 10 min, at room temperature. Nonspecific sites were blocked by soaking the membrane in TBB buffer (1× TBS + 5% non-fat milk or 5% BSA, 0.1% Tween-20) for 2 h at 4 °C. Western blotting was performed with a 1:5000 dilution of the anti-myc or the anti-FLAG M2 monoclonal antibodies, 1:1000 dilution of the anti-GAL4 (DBD) monoclonal antibody or the anti-P-Smad3 antibody and 1:400 dilution of the anti-Smad3 antibody in TBB overnight at 4 °C. The membranes were washed three times with TBS-T, for 10 min, at room temperature. As a secondary antibody we used anti-mouse or anti-rabbit horseradish peroxidase-conjugated (HRP), in a 1:10 000 dilution in TBS-T, for 1 h at room temperature. In the case of biotinylated proteins, membranes were hybridized directly with HRP-conjugated streptavidin in a 1:10 000 dilution for 1 h at room temperature. After three washes of 15 min with TBS-T at room temperature, bands were visualized by enhanced chemiluminescent detection on Fuji medical X-ray film (Super RX). In Vivo Biotinylation and Protein−Protein Interaction Assay. For the in vivo biotinylation assay (21), 7.5 × 105 of HEK-293T cells were transfected in 10-cm dishes with 7.5 μg of the pCDNA3-Bio-Smad3 expression vector in the presence or in the absence of 7.5 μg of pCDNA3-BirA vector expressing the bacterial biotin ligase BirA. For protein−protein interaction assays, HEK-293T cells were cotransfected with the above plasmids along with 7.5 μg of expression vectors pCDNA3-6myc-Smad2, pCDNA3-6myc-Smad3, pCDNA3-6myc-Smad4, pCDNA3-flag-p/CAF, or pCDNA3-flag-c-Ski in the presence or in the absence of an expression vector for a constitutively active form of the type I TGFβ receptor (ALK5-ca, 7.5 μg). Cells were lysed in lysis buffer (20 mM Tris-HCl pH 7.5, 150 mM NaCl, 10% glycerol, 1% Triton X-100) and allowed to interact with streptavidin agarose beads for 3 h at 4 °C in a rotating platform. Beads were washed three times with lysis buffer and centrifuged at 4000 rpm for 1 min at room temperature. Bound proteins as well as the starting material (input) were subjected to SDS-PAGE followed by immunoblotting as described above. Results An Internal Deletion of the 230−248 Region of Smad3 Abolished Its Function as a TGFβ Signaling Mediator. We have shown previously that TGFβ-stimulated transcriptional activation of target genes via Smad3 protein is mediated by two distinct transactivation domains present in the C-terminal MH2 domain and the middle linker region and that a small region in the junction between these two domains (aa 230−248) is essential for the activity of both domains (17). To investigate further the mechanisms by which the 230−248 region of Smad3 contributes to its functions as a TGFβ signaling mediator, we constructed a new Smad3 mutant bearing an internal deletion of this region (Smad3 Δ230−248, Figure 1A). The transcriptional activity of the new Smad3 mutant was first evaluated by transactivation experiments in the human JEG-3 choriocarcinoma cell line which does not express endogenous Smad3 protein (22). For this purpose, a synthetic Smad-dependent promoter consisting of 12 tandem Smad binding elements (CAGA12) and the minimal E1B promoter was utilized. As shown in Figure 1C, a constitutively active type I TGFβ receptor (CA-ALK5) could not activate this promoter in JEG-3 cells because of the absence of endogenous Smad3. Exogenous expression of 6myc-tagged wild type Smad3 protein in these cells rescued the TGFβ signaling pathway and transactivated the promoter in the absence, and more strongly in the presence, of CA-ALK5. In contrast, no promoter transactivation was osberved when JEG-3 cells were transfected with an expression vector for the Smad3 mutant Δ230−248 either in the absence or in the presence of the CA-ALK5 receptor (Figure 1C). By increasing the concentration of the Smad3 Δ230−248 expression vector several fold, we failed to activate the (CAGA)12E1B promoter above the background levels suggesting that this internal deletion strongly affected the function of Smad3 as a TGFβ-inducible transcriptional activator (data not shown). figure Figure 1 A−E:  Deletion of the 230−248 region abolished the transcriptional activity of Smad3 protein and its functional cooperation with Smad4. Panel A, Schematic representation of wild type Smad3 and the Smad3 Δ230−248 mutant that were utilized in the experiments of panels C, D, and E. Vertical dashed lines and numbers show the coordinates of the deletion. Panel B, Relative levels of expression of wild type Smad3 and the Δ230−248 mutant. HEK293T cells were transfected with equal amounts of expression vectors of 6myc-Smad3 and 6myc-Smad3 (Δ230−248). Equal amounts of whole cell extracts from the transfected cells were subjected to SDS-PAGE and immunoblotting using the anti-myc antibody. Panel C, Human choriocarcinoma JEG-3 cells were transfected with 1 μg of expression vectors for 6myc-Smad3 or 6myc-Smad3 (Δ230−248) in the absence or in the presence of an expression vector for CA-ALK5 (1 μg) along with the p(CAGA)12-E1B-Luc reporter (1 μg). The normalized mean values of luciferase activity (±SEM) are shown with a histogram. Panels D and E, Breast cancer MDA-MB-468 cells (Panel D) or HepG2 cells (Panel E) were transfected with the p(CAGA)12-E1B-Luc reporter (1 μg) along with expression vectors for 6myc-Smad3, 6myc-Smad3 (Δ230−248), and 6myc-Smad4 (1 μg) in the combinations shown at the bottom of the graph and were either treated with TGFβ (200 pM) for 24 h (+) or left untreated (−). The normalized mean values of luciferase activity (±SEM) are shown with histograms. In Panels C, D, and E, all values are shown as % relative luciferase activity relative to the reporter (CAGA)12-E1B-Luc alone, the activity of which was taken as 100%.  The transcriptional activity of the Smad3 Δ230−248 mutant was also examined in the breast cancer cell line MDA-MB-468 that lacks endogenous Smad4 because of a homozygous deletion of the Smad4 gene (23, 24). As shown in Figure 1D, a strong transcriptional activation of the (CAGA)12-E1B promoter was achieved by the simultaneous expression of wild type Smad3 and Smad4 proteins indicative of a strong transcriptional cooperativity between the two TGFβ signaling mediators. In contrast, the Smad3 Δ230−248 mutant failed to functionally cooperate with Smad4 either in the absence or in the presence of TGFβ (Figure 1D). Similar results were obtained using a human hepatoma cell line (HepG2) which expresses both Smad3 and Smad4 proteins endogenously (Figure 1E). The expression of the Smad3 (Δ230−248) mutant was verified by immunoblotting analysis (Figure 1B). The ability of the Smad3 mutant bearing the internal deletion Δ230−248 to activate transcription was also examined using the GAL4 transactivation assay. For this purpose, the cDNAs of wild type Smad3 or the Smad3 Δ230−248 mutant were cloned in frame with the DNA binding domain of GAL4 (Supporting Information Figure 1A). Immunoblotting analysis confirmed the expression of the GAL4-Smad3 Δ230−248 mutant compared to wild type GAL4-Smad3 in HepG2 cells (Supporting Information Figure 1B). As shown in Supporting Information Figure 1C, wild type GAL4-Smad3 protein strongly enhanced the activity of the GAL4-responsive promoter G5-E1B in HepG2 cells, and this transactivation was further enhanced by the constitutively active type I TGFβ receptor (CA-ALK5). In contrast, the GAL4-Smad3 Δ230−248 mutant was transcriptionally silent either in the absence or in the presence of CA-ALK5 (Supporting Information Figure 1C). Using the same system, we showed that exogenous expression of wild type Smad4 in MDA-MB-468 Smad4 (−/−) cells strongly increased the transactivation of the G5-E1B promoter by wild type GAL4-Smad3 and its stimulation by TGFβ (Supporting Information Figure 1D). These findings suggested physical and functional interactions between GAL4-Smad3 and Smad4. In contrast, Smad4 failed to increase the transcriptional activity of GAL4-Smad3 Δ230−248 mutant either in the absence or in the presence of TGFβ, suggesting lack of interaction between the two proteins in agreement with the findings of Figure 1D. Similar results were obtained when the Smad3 Δ230−248 mutant was assayed for oligomerization with wild type Smad3. In HepG2 cells, the transcriptional activity of wild type GAL4-Smad3 protein was increased by the simultaneous expression of wild type Smad3 protein indicative of homo-oligomeric interactions between Smad3 molecules (Supporting Information Figure 1E). In contrast, the activity of GAL4-Smad3 could not be increased by the simultaneous expression of the Smad3 Δ230−248 mutant. In fact, the activity was slightly decreased possibly because of a dominant negative or a squelching effect of the mutant versus the wild type Smad3 protein. Similarly, the transcriptional activity of the GAL4-Smad3 Δ230−248 mutant could not be induced by coexpression of wild type Smad3 protein suggesting a lack of interaction between the two proteins (Supporting Information Figure 1E). In control immunoblotting experiments it was shown that the exogenous expression of 6myc-Smad3 or the 6myc-Smad3 (Δ230−248) mutant had no effect on the levels of expression of GAL4-Smad3 or endogenous Smad3 in HepG2 cells (Supporting Information Figure 1F). The subcellular distribution of wild type Smad3 and the Smad3 Δ230−248 mutant was analyzed by indirect immunofluorescence using 6myc-tagged versions of the two proteins exogenously expressed in COS-7 cells. As shown in Supporting Information Figure 2, the wild type Smad3 displayed a predominant cytoplasmic localization in the absence of the constitutively active ALK5 receptor (top row, -CA-ALK5) whereas in the presence of the coexpressed CA-ALK5, wild type Smad3 accumulated in the nucleus (+CA-ALK5). In contrast, the Smad3 Δ230−248 mutant was localized both in the cytoplasm and in the nucleus in the absence of CA-ALK5 whereas the overexpression of CA-ALK5 caused an extensive nuclear accumulation of the mutant protein. The data of Supporting Information Figure 2 suggested that the Smad3 Δ230−248 deletion deregulated the TGFβ-induced nucleo-cytoplasmic transport mechanism of Smad3. figure Figure 2 A−E:  Utilization of an in vivo biotinylation assay to monitor the homo- and hetero-oligomerization properties of the wild type and the Δ230−248 mutant Smad3 proteins:  Panel A, Schematic representation of wild type Smad3 and the Smad3 Δ230−248 mutant bearing, at their N-terminus, the 23 amino acid peptide tag (Bio) that serves as a target of biotinylation by the biotin ligase BirA. The lysine residue that is biotinylated in the presence of BirA is indicated with an asterisk. Panels B, C, and D, HEK-293T cells were transfected with expression vectors for Bio-Smad3 or Bio-Smad3 Δ230−248 along with 6myc-Smad2 (Panel B), 6myc-Smad3 (Panel C), and 6myc-Smad4 (Panel D) in the absence or in the presence of BirA and CA-ALK5 as indicated on top of each panel. The concentrations of plasmids used and the protocol of the protein−protein interaction assay are described in detail in Materials and Methods. Western blottings were performed using the anti-myc monoclonal antibody for the detection of myc-tagged Smad2, Smad3, and Smad4 proteins, horseradish peroxidase-conjugated streptavidin for the detection of biotinylated Smad3 proteins, and the anti-phospho Smad3 antibody to detect phosphorylated Smad3 (P-Smad3). The arrows on the right show the position of the indicated proteins. WCE:  whole cell extract. Strep:  streptavidin. HRP:  horseradish peroxidase. Panel E, The Δ230−248 deletion does not affect the CA-ALK5-dependent association of Smad3 with the coactivator/histone acetyltransferase p/CAF: HEK-293T cells were transfected with expression vectors for Bio-Smad3 or Bio-Smad3 Δ230−248 along with expression vector for p/CAF-flag in the absence or in the presence of BirA and CA-ALK5 as indicated on top. Western blottings were performed using the anti-flag monoclonal antibody for the detection of p/CAF or horseradish peroxidase-conjugated streptavidin for the detection of biotinylated Smad proteins.  Deletion of the 230−248 Region Abolished Smad3 Phosphorylation by the ALK5 Receptor as well as Homo- And Hetero-oligomerization. To investigate further the effect of the 230−248 internal deletion of Smad3 on its homo- and hetero-oligomerization properties, we utilized a protein−protein interaction assay which is based on the biotinylation of one of the interacting proteins in vivo by the bacterial biotin ligase BirA (21). For this purpose, new expression vectors were constructed bearing the cDNAs of wild type Smad3 or the Smad3 Δ230−248 mutant fused in frame with a small 23 amino acid peptide (Bio) which is a target of the bacterial ligase BirA (Figure 2A). In this system, the simultaneous expression of the Bio-Smad3 fusion proteins and BirA results in Smad3 biotinylation in vivo which facilitates the purification of Smad3 and its interacting proteins from cell extracts using streptavidin agarose beads (21). Using this system, it was shown that wild type biotinylated Smad3 interacted efficiently with 6myc-Smad2 in a CA-ALK5-dependent manner (Figure 2B, upper blot, lane 3). In contrast, a very weak interaction between 6myc-Smad2 and the biotinylated Smad3 Δ230−248 mutant could be observed which was reduced by CA-ALK5 (Figure 2B upper blot, lanes 5 and 6). In a similar manner, it was shown that wild type 6myc-tagged Smad3 and 6myc-tagged Smad4 proteins interacted with biotinylated wild type Smad3 in a CA-ALK5-dependent manner (Figure 2C and 2D, upper blot, lane 3). In contrast, no interactions were observed between wild type 6myc-Smad3 or 6myc-Smad4 with the biotinylated Smad3 Δ230−248 mutant (Figure 2C and 2D, upper blot, lane 6). In control experiments, the expression levels of the wild type, 6myc-tagged Smad proteins and the biotinylated Smad3 forms, were monitored by Western blotting using an anti-myc antibody or HRP-conjugated streptavidin (middle and bottom blots of Figure 2B−D). The lack of ALK5-induced interaction between the Smad3 (Δ230−248) mutant and the other Smads prompted us to investigate the phosphorylation status of this mutant Smad3 protein both in the absence and in the presence of the ALK5 receptor. For this purpose, we utilized an antibody that recognizes Smad3 protein which has been phosphorylated at the C-terminal serine residues 423 and 425 by the ALK5 receptor. As shown in Figure 2D lower blot, the anti-P-Smad3 antibody recognized wild type Smad3 protein which had been phosphorylated by the CA-ALK5 receptor (lane 3) whereas it did not recognize the Smad3 Δ230−248 mutant under the same conditions (lane 6). We then examined the ability of wild type Smad3 and the Smad3 Δ230−248 mutant to interact physically with the transcriptional coactivator/histone acetyl transferase p/CAF. It had been shown previously that p/CAF interacts physically and functionally with both the linker and the MH2 domains of Smad3 protein (17, 25). As shown in Figure 2E, both wild type Smad3 and the Smad3 Δ230−248 mutant interacted efficiently with p/CAF in a CA-ALK5-dependent manner (upper blot, lanes 4 and 7). As the Smad3 (Δ230−248) mutant cannot be phosphorylated by the ALK5 receptor (Figure 2D), the findings of Figure 2E suggested that ALK5 may induce additional phosphorylations in Smad3 protein that favor interactions with p/CAF (see Discussion). Molecular Characterization of a Tumorigenic Mutation in Smad4. The 230−248 region in Smad3 is highly conserved among different Smad family members and includes the first and part of the second β strands of the MH2 domain (β1 and β2 strands, Figure 3 shown in yellow). One of these conserved amino acids, glutamic acid 330 in Smad4 has been found to be mutated to alanine in cancer patients (16). This amino acid is located in the vicinity of helix H1 (Figure 3 bottom). To functionally characterize this tumorigenic mutation, we introduced the E330A substitution into Smad4 protein by site-directed mutagenesis. We found that this amino acid substitution totally abolished the transcriptional cooperativity between Smad3 and Smad4 on the (CAGA)12-E1B promoter in HepG2 cells (Figure 4A). Importantly, we showed that this mutation abolished the ALK5-dependent oligomerization of Smad4 with Smad3 in a protein−protein interaction assay in vivo (Figure 4B). Such a defect in oligomerization could account for the inability of Smad4 to activate transcription cooperatively with Smad3 (Figure 4A). figure Figure 3 Homology between Smad proteins in the 230−248 region of the MH2 domain and MH2 structural features: Amino acid residues which are conserved among TGFβ (Smad2, Smad3) and BMP (Smad1) Smads as well as their common oligomerization partner (Smad4) are shown in yellow. The first two β strands (β1 and β2) of the β sandwich structure of the MH2 domain are shown by thick white arrows. The internal deletion Δ230−248 and the glutamic residue that was mutagenized in Smad3 and Smad4 proteins for the purpose of this study (E330 in Smad4, E239 in Smad3) are shown by the thin arrows and the asterisk respectively. This mutation in Smad4 protein (E330A) is found frequently in cancer patients. The bottom panel shows the structure of the MH2 domain of Smads and the position of all major structural characteristics of this domain (the loop-helix region, the β sandwich core, and the three helical bundle). It also shows the position of the β1 and β2 strands and of amino acid residue E330 in Smad4 in yellow. Note the close proximity of E330 to the α helix H1. The figure was produced with PyMol (http://pymol.sourceforge.net/).  figure Figure 4 A, Β:  The tumorigenic mutation E330A in Smad4 abolished Smad3/Smad4 oligomerization in response to ALK5 activation. Panel A, Mutation E330A abolished the transcriptional activity of Smad4: Human hepatoma HepG2 cells were transfected with 1 μg of expression vectors for 6myc-Smad3, 6myc-Smad4, or 6myc-Smad4 (E330A) along with the p(CAGA)12-E1B-Luc reporter (1 μg). The normalized mean values of luciferase activity (±SEM) are shown with a histogram. Panel Β, Tumorigenic mutation E330A abolished Smad4 oligomerization with Smad3: HEK-293T cells were transfected with expression vectors for Bio-Smad3 and 6myc-Smad4 or 6myc-Smad4 (E330A) in the absence or in the presence of BirA and CA-ALK5 as indicated on top. Western blottings were performed using the anti-myc monoclonal antibody for the detection of myc-tagged Smad4 and Smad4 (E330A) or horseradish peroxidase-conjugated streptavidin for the detection of biotinylated Smad3 protein. The arrows on the right show the position of the indicated proteins. WCE:  whole cell extract. Strep:  streptavidin. HRP:  horseradish peroxidase.  To validate our findings regarding the importance of E330 in Smad oligomerization and transcriptional activation, we introduced the same mutation into the corresponding location of Smad3 protein (E239A). Figure 5 shows that the Smad3 mutant bearing the E239A amino acid substitution (Smad3 E239A) failed to transactivate the (CAGA)12-E1B promoter in JEG (Smad3 −/−) cells (Panel A) as well as in MDA-MB-468 (Smad4 −/−) cells in the presence of Smad4 (Panel B). Furthermore, Smad3 E239A could not be phosphorylated by the ALK5 receptor (Panel D, bottom blot, lane 3), and as a consequence, it failed to oligomerize with wild type Smad3 (Panel D, upper blot, lane 3) or wild type Smad 4 (Panel E, upper blot, lane 3) in vivo in an ALK5-dependent manner. However, the Smad3 E239A mutant retained its ability to interact physically with the product of the protooncogene c-Ski in vivo in agreement with previous reports (Figure 5G, upper blot, lane 6) (26−28). As a negative control in this experiment, we used a mutant Smad3 protein lacking the MH2 domain (Bio-Smad3 ΔMH2) and showed that this mutant failed to interact physically with c-Ski (Figure 5G, upper blot, lane 9) in agreement with previous findings (26−28). Immunoblotting analysis showed that the levels of expression of the Smad3 E239A mutant were slightly lower compared to wild type Smad3 (Figure 5C). Similarly to Smad3 (Δ230−248), the Smad3 E239 mutant was constitutively localized in the nucleus when overexpressed in COS-7 cells (Figure 5F). figure Figure 5 A−G:  Μutation E239A in Smad3 abolished Smad3/Smad4 oligomerization and transcriptional activation but did not affect interaction of Smad3 with the proto-oncogene c-Ski:  Panel A, Human choriocarcinoma JEG-3 cells were transfected with 1 μg of expression vectors for 6myc-Smad3 (wt) or 6myc-Smad3 (E239A) in the absence or in the presence of an expression vector for CA-ALK5 (1 μg) along with the p(CAGA)12-E1B-Luc reporter (1 μg). The normalized mean values of luciferase activity (±SEM) are shown with a histogram. Panel B, Breast cancer MDA-MB-468 cells were transfected with the p(CAGA)12-E1B-Luc reporter (1 μg) along with expression vectors for 6myc-Smad3 (wt), 6myc-Smad3 (E239A), and 6myc-Smad4 (wt) (1 μg) in the combinations shown at the bottom of the graph. The normalized mean values of luciferase activity (±SEM) are shown with histograms. Panel C, Relative levels of expression of wild type Smad3 and the E239A mutant. HEK293T cells were transfected with equal amounts of expression vectors of 6myc-Smad3 and 6myc-Smad3 (E239A). Equal amounts of whole cell extracts from the transfected cells were subjected to SDS-PAGE and immunoblotting using the anti-myc antibody. Panels D, E, HEK-293T cells were transfected with expression vectors for Bio-Smad3 (E239A) and 6myc-Smad3 (Panel D) or 6myc-Smad4 (Panel E) in the absence or in the presence of BirA and CA-ALK5 as indicated on top. Western blottings were performed using the anti-myc monoclonal antibody for the detection of myc-tagged Smads, horseradish peroxidase-conjugated streptavidin for the detection of biotinylated Smad3 E239A protein and the anti-phospho Smad3 antibody to detect phosphorylated Smad3 E239A protein (P-Smad3 E239A). The arrows on the right show the position of the indicated proteins. WCE:  whole cell extract. Strep:  streptavidin. HRP:  horseradish peroxidase. Panel F, The Smad3 (Δ230−248) mutant is constitutively localized in the nucleus: COS-7 cells were transfected with an expression vector for the mutant 6myc-Smad3 E239 in the absence (top row) or in the presence (bottom row) of the constitutively active ALK5 receptor. Immunofluorescence was performed as described in Materials and Methods using the anti-myc (9E10) monoclonal antibody followed by a secondary, FITC-conjugated, antibody. Smad proteins were visualized by fluorescence microscopy. Panel G, Mutation E239A does not affect the CA-ALK5-dependent association of Smad3 with the proto-oncogene cSki: HEK-293T cells were transfected with expression vectors for Bio-Smad3, Bio-Smad3 (E239A) or Bio-Smad3 (MH2) along with an expression vector for FLAG-cSki in the absence or in the presence of BirA and CA-ALK5 as indicated on top. Western blottings were performed using the anti-flag monoclonal antibody for the detection of cSki or horseradish peroxidase-conjugated streptavidin for the detection of biotinylated Smad proteins.  A Network of Hydrogen Bond and Ionic Interactions Involving Polar Amino Acid Residues in β1 Strand, L2 Loop and H1 α Helix Is Essential for Smad3 Function. According to the previously published crystal structure of a Smad3/Smad4 MH2 heterotrimer [Protein Data Bank accession code (PDB) 1U7F (29)], conserved polar amino acid residues of the β1 strand of Smad3 such as E239, participate in a network of hydrogen bond and ionic interactions with other polar amino acids present in helix H1 or the L2 loop that likely contribute to the rigidity of the loop-helix region (29). As shown in Figure 6, E239 in Smad3 forms hydrogen bonds with 4 amino acids:  Y237 of the β1 strand, N276, R279 of the L2 loop, and R287 of helix H1. Moreover, the close proximity of a negatively charged amino acid residue (E239) to two positively charged amino acid residues (R279 and R287) is expected to stabilize the structure by neutralizing partly the two positive charges of these two arginine residues. We speculated that mutation E239A in Smad3 or the corresponding E330A mutation in Smad4 described above (Figures 4 and 5) abolished TGFβ signaling and Smad function possibly because of the loss of these hydrogen bond and ionic interactions which could affect the integrity of this region. We hypothesized that mutations in other amino acids participating in this network of interactions could also have a detrimental effect in Smad structure and function. To test our hypothesis, we mutagenized two of these polar amino acids, Y237 and R287, by replacing them with the nonpolar amino acid alanine in order to eliminate the possibility of hydrogen bond or ionic interactions with neighboring residues and examined the new Smad3 mutants for oligomerization and transcriptional activation. As shown in Figure 7, mutation R287A totally abolished the ability of Smad3 to oligomerize with Smad4 and with Smad3 in an ALK5-dependent manner (Panels A and B, upper blot lane 9). In contrast, mutation Y237A behaved as wild type Smad3 as it interacted effectively with both Smad3 and Smad4 (Panels A and B, upper blot lane 6). Immunoblotting analysis using an antibody that recognizes phosphorylated Smad3 showed that Smad3 R287A was phosphorylated by the ALK5 receptor albeit less effectively than wild type Smad3 or the Y237A mutant (Figure 7A, bottom blot, compare lanes 3 and 6 with lane 9). Finally, we showed that the R287A mutation abolished transactivation of the (CAGA)12-E1B promoter in MDA-MB-468 cells in the presence of Smad4 whereas the Y237A mutation behaved as wild type Smad3 and transactivated strongly the (CAGA)12-E1B promoter in the presence of Smad4 and the CA-ALK5 receptor (Figure 7C). figure Figure 6 Structure of the Smad3 MH2 domain in the region surrounding glutamic acid residue 239. The structure reveals a network of hydrogen bonding interactions between E239 and several amino acid residues that are located either in β1 (Y237), L2 (N276, R279), and H1 (R287). The hydrogen bonds are shown as dashed lines. Note that ionic interactions between positively charged (R279, R287) and negatively charged (E239) amino acids could also contribute to the stability of the structure. The figure was produced with PyMol (http://pymol.sourceforge.net/).  figure Figure 7 A−C:  Effect of Y237A and R287A mutations in the oligomerization and transactivation properties of Smad3 protein. Panels A and B, HEK-293T cells were transfected with expression vectors for Bio-Smad3, Bio-Smad3 (Y237A), and Bio-Smad3 (R287A) along with 6myc-Smad4 (Panel A) or 6myc-Smad3 (Panel B) in the absence or in the presence of BirA and CA-ALK5 as indicated on top of each Panel. Western blottings were performed using the anti-myc monoclonal antibody for the detection of myc-tagged Smad3 and Smad4 proteins, an anti-P-Smad3 antibody for the detection of phosphorylated Smade proteins or horseradish peroxidase-conjugated streptavidin for the detection of biotinylated Smad3 proteins. WCE:  whole cell extract. Strep:  streptavidin. HRP:  horseradish peroxidase. Panel C, Breast cancer MDA-MB-468 cells were transfected with the p(CAGA)12-E1B-Luc reporter (1 μg) along with expression vectors for 6myc-Smad3, 6myc-Smad3 (Y237A), 6myc-Smad3 (R287A), and 6myc-Smad4 (1 μg) in the absence or in the presence of CA-ALK5 (1 μg) in the combinations shown at the bottom of the graph. The normalized mean values of luciferase activity (±SEM) are shown with the histogram.  Discussion In an effort to identify and characterize novel domains in Smad proteins which play essential roles in their functions as TGFβ signaling mediators, we initially focused our attention to a short region at the junction between the linker and the MH2 domain of Smad3 (aa 230−248). The focus on this region came as a result of our previous structure−function analysis of human Smad3 protein which had indicated that this region is required for the transcriptional activity of both the linker and the MH2 domains (17). This region is rich in conserved polar residues and includes the first and part of the second β strands of the MH2 domain (Figure 3). Importantly, a single amino acid substitution within the β1 strand of Smad4 (E330A) was found to be frequently associated with tumors (16). In a previous study, it was shown that the colon cancer cell line VACO-235 expresses a Smad4 protein bearing a double amino acid substitution (E330N/D355A) (30). In these cells, the classical TGFβ/Smad pathway was not operating, but the cells were responsive to the growth inhibitory effects of TGFβ. The authors suggested that growth inhibition in these cells is mediated by an alternative non-Smad signaling pathway. However, this double Smad4 mutant was not characterized further in that report. In the present study, we showed that a Smad4 mutant bearing a single point mutation at position E330, (Smad4 E330A) was transcriptionally inactive in a classic SBE-Luc transactivation assay (Figure 4A), and furthermore we showed that the same mutation abolished the TGFβ-dependent oligomerization of Smad4 with Smad3 (Figure 4B). We proceeded further into the characterization of this region and this residue in particular by showing that the corresponding mutation in Smad3 (E239A) severely affected the ALK5-dependent phosphorylation, oligomerization, and transcriptional activation (Figure 5). A comparison of the data from the analysis of the two mutants (Smad3 E239A and Smad4 E330A) presented in Figures 4 and 5 indicated that the defect in Smad oligomerization caused by this mutation could not be accounted for only by a defect in Smad phosphorylation by the ALK5 receptor as Smad4 cannot be phosphorylated by this receptor (7). Thus, mutagenesis of this specific glutamic acid residue in the β1 strand of R-Smads or Smad4 may directly affect the physical interactions between MH2 subunits. Of interest was the observation that, in contrast to other previously characterized tumorigenic mutations in Smads that map at the interfaces between interacting MH2 subunits, E239 does not map at these interphases. In the previously published crystal structure of the Smad3/Smad4 MH2 heterotrimer [Protein Data Bank accession code, 1U7F (29)], E239 is facing toward the adjacent H1 helix and participates in a dense network of hydrogen bond and ionic interactions with other amino acid residues that are located in the β1 strand, the L2 loop, or the helix H1 (Figure 6). As shown in Figure 6, the carboxyl group of the side chain of glutamic acid 239 could serve as a hydrogen donor or acceptor in hydrogen bonds with four different amino acids:  N276 and R279 of L2, Y237 of β1, and R287 of H1. Furthermore, the same carboxyl group of E239 is located in close proximity with the two positively charged side chains of arginines 279 and 287, and this ionic interaction is expected to stabilize the structure by partly neutralizing the two positive charges. Thus, the replacement of the polar side chain of glutamate with a nonpolar one (alanine) is predicted to disrupt all these hydrogen and ionic bonds. The highly conserved residue tyrosine 237 (Figure 3) was expected to participate actively in this network because of the polar character of the hydroxyl group of tyrosine, which hydrogen bonds with both E239 and R287 (Figure 6) and because the phenol group could also be involved in hydrophobic interactions with other nonpolar residues in the vicinity thus contributing to the rigidity of this structure. Unexpectedly however, we found that substitution of tyrosine 237 to alanine (mutant Y237A) had no phenotype in all functional assays (oligomerization, receptor phosphorylation, and transcriptional activation) suggesting that the polar character of this residue's side chain may not be crucial for its contribution to MH2 structure, and some of the hydrogen bonds that are indicated by the crystal structure may not actually occur. Thus, this mutation in Smad3 is another example of the significance of the structure−function analysis in the elucidation of the role of individual amino acid residues in a protein's function. On the other hand, the substitution of arginine 287 to alanine had dramatic consequences in Smad3 function such as the homo- and hetero-oligomerization and the transcriptional activation (Figure 7). Similar to the E239A and Y237A mutations, this substitution was designed in order to eliminate the ability of this amino acid residue to form hydrogen or ionic bonds with neighboring amino acids such as Y237, E239, and R279 which were indicated from the crystal structure (Figure 6). In addition to these intramolecular interactions which seem to be essential for the rigidity of the MH2 domain, the crystal structure of the Smad3/Smad4 MH2 hetero-trimer [PDB 1U7F] shows that R287 is also involved in intermolecular interactions with adjacent MH2 subunits. More specifically, it interacts via hydrogen or ionic bonds with Y364 of the second Smad3 MH2 subunit and with D493 of the Smad4 MH2 subunit in the heterotrimer (Figure 8A and B respectively), and the loss of these interactions by the side chain substitution may easily account for the oligomerization defect. Of notice was also the observation that in contrast to the E239A mutation which could not be phosphorylated by the ALK5 receptor, in the case of the R287A mutation, the phosphorylation by the ALK5 receptor still occurs (Figure 7A), suggesting that the oligomerization defect in the latter mutant was the result of the loss of direct contacts between Smad subunits following the phosphorylation by the TGFβ receptor type I. figure Figure 8 A, B:  Structure of the Smad3/Smad4 MH2 heterotrimer (PDB:  1U7F) in the region surrounding arginine 287 in Smad3. Panel A: Smad3−Smad3 intermolecular interactions facilitated by R287 in MH2 subunit A (cyan) and Y364 in MH2 subunit C (magenta). The hydrogen bonds are shown as dashed lines. Panel B: Smad3−Smad4 intermolecular interactions facilitated by R287 in Smad3 (MH2 subunit A in magenta) and D493 of Smad4 (MH2 subunit B in lime). The hydrogen bonds are shown as dashed lines.  As discussed above, the defect in Smad oligomerization caused by the E239A mutation could not be accounted for only by a defect in Smad phosphorylation by the ALK5 receptor, as Smad4 cannot be phosphorylated by the type I TGFβ receptor (7). However, the loss of phosphorylation of the Smad3 E239A mutant by the ALK5 receptor is of special interest. Smad oligomerization, which is triggered by the phosphorylation of R-Smads by the type I TGFβ receptor following ligand stimulation, is at the core of TGFβ signaling (31). Previous studies have identified the L3 loop of the MH2 domain of Smad proteins as essential for their interaction with the corresponding type I receptor and for conferring signaling specificity (32). Mutations in the L3 loop abolished Smad activation by the TGFβ type I receptor (32). On the basis of the above, we are tempted to propose that the E239A mutation as well as the more drastic Δ230−248 internal deletion may have caused similar conformational changes in Smad3 protein that prevented its physical association with the ALK5 receptor. Thus, our findings suggest that in addition to the L3 loop, elements of the loop-helix region of Smads may also contribute to Smad activation by the type I TGFβ receptor and to their ability to mediate TGFβ-induced responses including oligomerization and transcriptional activation. Another interesting observation that came from this study was that the phosphorylation-deficient Smad3 mutants Δ230−248 and E239A were still able to interact physically with the histone acetyltransferase p/CAF and the product of the c-ski proto-oncogene respectively in vivo, in an ALK5-dependent manner (Figures 2E and 5G). In the case of Smad3-p/CAF interaction, given that p/CAF interacts with two different domains in Smad3, the MH2 domain and the linker region (17, 25), we suggest that the enhanced interaction with p/CAF (and possibly with c-Ski) is due to Smad3 phosphorylation at additional sites, possibly in the linker region. This is in good agreement with recent data showing that TGFβ enhances the linker phosphorylation of a Smad3 mutant that cannot be phosphorylated at the C-terminus (33). The utilization of the recently identified Smad linker phosphatases SCP1−3 (33) should help clarify the role of linker phosphorylation in several Smad3 functions including their physical interaction with coregulatory factors. Alignment of the amino acid sequences of Smad proteins from different species showed that the region of Smad3 between amino acids 230 and 290 is evolutionarily conserved (Supporting Information Figure 3). Certain amino acids in this region including the residues analyzed in this study (Y237, E239, N276, R279 and R287) are identical in Smad3 from all species examined as well as in bone morphogenetic protein (BMP)-regulated Smads 1 and 5 and in the common partner Smad4, suggesting a crucial role for these residues in Smad structure and function and an evolutionary conserved mechanism of Smad oligomerization. Finally, as discussed above, based on the published crystal structure of the Smad3/Smad4 MH2 heterotrimer, the R287A mutation is predicted to abolish the interaction between R287 in Smad3 and D493 in Smad4 (Figure 8B). A mutation in residue D493 of Smad4 has been identified frequently in cancer patients (34). More specifically, in these patients, aspartic acid 493 has been mutagenized to histidine (D493H). Given the different polar characters of histidine and aspartate (the imidazole ring of histidine side chain is almost uncharged at neutral pH in contrast to the carboxyl group of aspartate which is negatively charged), we predict that histidine at position 493 in Smad4 could not be able to make hydrogen bonds or ionic interactions with arginines 287 and 279 (Figure 8B) but should move to a different position in order to avoid steric clashes (distances <2 Å) with these amino acids. Thus, the tumorigenic mutation D493H in Smad4 could be explained in part by loss of intermolecular interactions with Smad3 at position R287. In conclusion, our mutagenesis analysis presented here revealed for the first time the relative contribution of individual polar amino acids to the structure and function of the MH2 domain of Smad proteins and also provides a molecular basis for previously uncharacterized tumorigenic mutations in Smad proteins.  
616||Background  Melanoma is a heterogeneous tumor with subgroups requiring distinct therapeutic strategies. Genetic dissection of melanoma subgroups and identification of therapeutic agents are of great interest in the field. These efforts will ultimately lead to treatment strategies, likely combinatorial, based on genetic information.  Methods  To identify “driver” genes that can be targeted therapeutically, we screened metastatic melanomas for somatic mutations by exome sequencing followed by selecting those with available targeted therapies directed to the gene product or its functional partner. The FBXW7 gene and its substrate NOTCH1 were identified and further examined. Mutation profiling of FBXW7, biological relevance of these mutations and its inactivation, and pharmacological inhibition of NOTCH1 were examined using in vitro and in vivo assays.  Results  We found FBXW7 to be mutated in eight (8.1%) melanoma patients in our cohort (n = 103). Protein expression analysis in human tissue samples (n = 96) and melanoma cell lines (n = 20) showed FBXW7 inactivation as a common event in melanoma (40.0% of cell lines). As a result of FBXW7 loss, we observed an accumulation of its substrates, such as NOTCH1. Ectopic expression of mutant forms of FBXW7 (by 2.4-fold), as well as silencing of FBXW7 in immortalized melanocytes, accelerated tumor formation in vivo (by 3.9-fold). Its inactivation led to NOTCH1 activation, upregulation of NOTCH1 target genes (by 2.6-fold), and promotion of tumor angiogenesis and resulted in tumor shrinkage upon NOTCH1 inhibition (by fivefold).  Conclusions  Our data provides evidence on FBXW7 as a critical tumor suppressor mutated and inactivated in melanoma that results in sustained NOTCH1 activation and renders NOTCH signaling inhibition as a promising therapeutic strategy in this setting.  Metastatic melanoma is a lethal malignancy leading to an estimated 9480 deaths annually in the United States (1). BRAF and NRAS are bona fide oncogenes frequently mutated in melanoma (2). BRAF inhibitors represent the prototype of targeted therapies in melanoma; however they have met with limited success because of rapid emergence of acquired resistance (3). Patients eventually relapse, rendering the disease incurable. Novel therapeutic strategies remain as a great interest in the field. Metastatic melanomas have high mutational load and intricate signaling networks (4,5). Heterogeneity of the disease adds another layer of complexity. It is plausible that undefined genetic events representing novel potential targets are sequestered within the complex landscape of genetic events in melanoma. Thus, beyond recurrent mutated genes with high frequencies, these may be potential targets that are not so obvious but relevant to a subset of patients.  FBXW7 is a member of the F-box protein family (6). The F-box proteins constitute one of the four subunits of ubiquitin protein ligase complex called SCFs (SKP1-cullin-F-box), which function in phosphorylation-dependent ubiquitination and regulate a network of proteins with central roles in cell division, cell growth, and differentiation (7). The FBXW7 protein comprises three functionally critical domains—the dimerization domain (8), the F-box domain that allows the physical interaction of FBXW7 with the SCF complex (7), and the WD40 domain containing eight tandem repeats that form a β-propeller structure that recognizes a specific consensus phosphodegron motif within the target substrate (9,10). Substrates of FBXW7 include known oncoproteins such as NOTCH1 (11–13). Homozygous null mice for FBXW7 are early embryonic lethal, implicating its involvement with critical cellular functions (14).  In this article, we describe identification of FBXW7 as a “driver” genetic event in an exome sequencing screen, characterize its functional impact in melanoma, and highlight its substrate, NOTCH1, as a relevant therapeutic target in this setting.  Go to: Methods Additional methods are available in the Supplementary Methods (available online).  Exome Sequencing  Genomic DNA was extracted from fresh-frozen melanomas and matching peripheral blood lymphocytes (Qiagen, Valencia, CA); this was followed by whole-exome sequencing as previously described (15) using a HiSeq 2500 system (Illumina, San Diego, CA). In eight melanomas with paired blood samples, an average of 42 million reads per sample (n = 32 million –101 million) was found, of which 98.4% mapped to the hg19 genome using Burrows-Wheeler Aligner 0.5.9-r16, followed by the Genome Analysis Tool Kit indel realignment, resulting in an average depth of 11 reads per base covered at depth greater than zero. Using the statistical algorithm for variant frequency identification (16), we called positions with nucleotide mutations. We retained only the variants at positions with depth greater than 10 in both tumor and normal samples and filtered out variants that appeared in normal samples in more than 25% of the reads. We identified a total of 2308 exonic mutations (n = 737 synonymous; n = 1571 nonsynonymous) that consisted of of 1431 missense and 78 nonsense mutations and 62 insertions/deletions. The mean exonic nonsynonymous mutation rate was 10.6 mutations per megabase, with mutation rates varying from 2.8 to 26.7. The majority of nucleotide substitutions were C>T or G>A transitions (73% to 91% of all mutations), indicative of ultraviolet-induced damage. The hot spot mutation, BRAFV600E, was present in six of the eight melanomas.  Selection of FBXW7  After sequencing and variant calling, we used the collection of nonsynonymous and synonymous exome mutations to identify genes with evidence of positive selection for nonsynonymous variants. First, we evaluated whether a gene had more nonsynonymous mutations than would be expected given the number of synonymous mutations. We estimated the expected number of nonsynonymous mutations for each gene using the number of synonymous mutations in that gene, NS,G, and the nonsynonymous to synonymous mutation ratio across all genes, NN/NS, resulting in an expected number of nonsynonymous mutations of NS,G*NN/NS. We evaluated whether the observed number of nonsynonymous mutations, NN,G, was statistically significantly more than this expected value using a Poisson model. Our second test for selection considered whether the number of nonsynonymous mutations per amino acid was elevated to account for coding length. We calculated the probability of the observed findings using a binomial model, where the amino acid length represented the number of trials and the probability of a nonsynonymous mutation was calculated from the average number of nonsynonymous mutations per amino acid across the genes with mutations. Finally, our candidate list contained genes that had P less than .05 in both tests, which provided a list of 23 putative melanoma driver genes. To find interacting partners, we used GeneRIF interactions (17), keeping only those that were documented in human cells and are not based on affinity assays. Then, for each of these interacting partners, we used the Cancer Commons (18) drug target database to assess whether any drugs targeting those genes were documented. Only a subset of the recurrently mutated genes, including FBXW7, had druggable interacting partners.  Quantitative Real-Time Polymerase Chain Reaction  Total RNA was isolated using RNeasy Plus kit (Qiagen). cDNA was synthesized using RNA to cDNA EcoDry Premix (Clontech, Mountain View, CA). SYBR Premix Ex Taq II (Takara, Mountain View, CA) was used for quantitative reverse-transcription polymerase chain reaction (PCR). Ampliﬁcation and real-time analysis was performed with BioRad CFX96 (BioRad, Hercules, CA). Transcript levels were normalized to the 18S subunit of rRNA levels. The relative mRNA levels were calculated according to the comparative Ct (ΔΔCt) method.  Angiogenesis PCR Array  Changes in expression of angiogenesis-related genes were detected by using RT2 Profiler Mouse Angiogenesis PCR Array (PAMM-024ZD; Qiagen). Total RNA was extracted as explained in the previous section. cDNA was synthesized using RT2 First Strand Kit (Qiagen). RT2 SYBR Green qPCR Master Mix was used for the reaction following manufacturer’s instructions. Ampliﬁcation and real-time analysis were performed with BioRad CFX96 (BioRad).  Western Blot Analysis  Western blotting was performed using standard protocols. The following commercial antibodies were used in this study: FBXW7 (A301-720A; Bethyl Laboratories, Montgomery, TX), cleaved NOTCH1 (4147; Cell Signaling, Danvers, MA), cyclin E (4129; Cell Signaling), MYC (551101; BD Pharmingen, San Jose, CA), Aurora A (610938; BD Pharmingen), MCL1 (sc-819; Santa Cruz Biotechnology, Santa Cruz, CA), and α-tubulin (CP06-100UG; Oncogene Research Products, Boston, MA).  Immunohistochemistry and Immunoﬂuorescence Analyses  Dual immunofluorescence analyses were conducted on formalin-fixed and paraffin-embedded tissue microarray sections (M1004a; US Biomax, Rockville, MD) using standard protocols.  In Vivo Studies  All animal care was in accordance with institutional guidelines. Five-week-old female NCr nude mice were purchased from Taconic (Hudson, NY). Tumor growth was evaluated after subcutaneous injection of 1×106 melan-a melanocytes expressing NRASG12D together with shScr, shRNA1, or shRNA2 into the ﬂanks of mice. Tumors were measured daily, and mice were killed when tumor surface area reached 1500mm3. The numbers of mice in each group in the in vivo studies is given in the Supplementary Methods (available online).  Statistical Analysis  All quantified data represent an average of triplicate samples or as indicated. Error bars represent standard error of the mean. Statistical significance was determined by the Student t test to compare mean values for continuous variables between the two groups, and the χ2 test was used to compare the frequency distribution of categorical variables. All reported P values were two-sided, and P less than .05 was considered statistically significant.  Go to: Results FBXW7 Mutations in Melanoma  To identify driver genes that can be targeted therapeutically, we developed a strategy that combined defining somatically mutated genes in a discovery cohort, evaluation of potential impact on protein function and therapeutic relevance, validation of mutations in an extension cohort, and functional characterization. Sequencing the exomes of metastatic melanomas identified recurrent somatic mutations in 23 genes (Supplementary Figure 1 and Supplementary Tables 1 and 2, available online). Those with therapies directed to the gene product or its functional partner that are commercially available were selected: BRAF, IL7R, GUCY2C, and FBXW7 (Supplementary Table 3, available online). FBXW7 was further characterized. Substrates of FBXW7 include known oncoproteins such as NOTCH1 (11–13). To assess the prevalence of FBXW7 (NM_018315.4) mutations in melanoma, we sequenced the coding regions of FBXW7 and hot spot regions of BRAF and NRAS in a total of 103 melanomas, including 77 tumor samples and 26 cell lines. We detected nonsynonymous mutations in FBXW7 in eight melanomas (8.1% frequency), including five nonsense, two missense, and one frameshift mutation (Figure 1). This is a statistically significantly elevated mutation rate because the probability of having this number of nonsynonymous mutations given the length of the gene (710 amino acids) and the nonsynonymous mutation rate in our samples (1×10–5) is less than 10−4. Because of the occurrence of the mutations within the WD40 domain of FBXW7 (except the frameshift mutation that is in the F-box domain), it is predicted that these mutations disrupt substrate binding of FBXW7, diminish protein turnover, and thus lead to sustained activation of its substrate oncoproteins. Of note, the presence of mutations in FBXW7 was not associated with BRAF or NRAS mutation status (Supplementary Table 4, available online). Collectively, these findings identify somatic mutations of FBXW7 as a novel recurrent genetic event in melanoma.  Figure 1. Figure 1. Mutations in the FBXW7 gene in melanoma. A) Schematic diagram of the FBXW7 gene (NM_018315.4) and protein. Exons corresponding to the WD40 and F-box ... FBXW7 Expression in Melanoma and NOTCH1 as a Relevant Target  We next examined FBXW7 protein expression by immunofluorescence analysis in tissue microarrays consisting of benign melanocytic nevi (n = 21) and primary (n = 56) and metastatic (n = 19) melanoma samples (total n = 96). There was a statistically significant decrease of nuclear FBXW7 expression in the melanomas (14.7%) as compared with nevi (66.7%) (melanoma vs nevi: odds ratio = 11.63; 95% confidence interval [CI] = 3.83 to 35.31; P < .001 by the χ2 test) (Figure 2, ,AA and andB).B). We also analyzed protein expression in a panel of 20 melanoma cell lines, including eight NRAS-mutant, nine BRAF-mutant, and three wild-type for BRAF and NRAS by western blot analysis. Four lines—WC00125, WM39, WM3702, and WM3862—harbored mutations in FBXW7. Of the 20 melanoma cell lines screened, FBXW7 expression relative to the normal human melanocyte was low (less than onefold) in eight cases (40.0%). In the other twelve cases, expression ranged from 1.06-fold to 2.22-fold (Figure 2, ,CC and andD).D). Protein expression levels were statistically significantly different depending on FBXW7 mutation status; the group of four mutant cell lines had lower levels of expression than the group of sixteen nonmutant cell lines (P = .003 by the t test). Of note, several cell lines were found to express very low or undetectable protein levels in the absence of mutations in the FBXW7 gene. Thus, the fraction of melanoma patients with defective FBXW7 is higher than determined based on mutational profiling. Taken together, these data suggest that FBXW7 inactivation is common in human melanoma.  Figure 2. Figure 2. FBXW7 expression in melanoma. A) FBXW7 protein expression in melanoma tissue samples. Immunofluorescence analysis of a tissue microarray consisting of nevi, primary, and metastatic melanomas. The bar graphs indicate percentage of positive nuclear FBXW7 ... Because FBXW7 has a number of known substrates that have oncogenic activity, we then examined regulation of potential FBXW7 targets in melanoma by silencing FBXW7 using FBXW7-specific siRNA in eight human melanoma cell lines. Loss of FBXW7 resulted in consistent accumulation of the intracellular domain of NOTCH1 across all lines, implicating NOTCH1 as a relevant substrate of FBXW7 in melanoma (Figure 3). Its other known targets—cyclin E, MYC, Aurora A (in some lines), but not MCL1—were elevated upon silencing.  Figure 3. Figure 3. Status of oncoproteins that are substrates of FBXW7 upon downregulation of FBXW7 in melanoma cells. Silencing of FBXW7 in eight melanoma cell lines using nontargeting (c) or FBXW7-specific small interfering RNA (siRNA, si). Western blotting analysis of ... FBXW7 as a Driver in Melanoma  To determine the functional relevance of FBXW7 inactivation and consequently sustained activation of its target NOTCH1 in melanoma tumorigenesis, we silenced FBXW7 using two distinct shRNAs (shRNA1 and shRNA2) by lentiviral transduction of melan-a melanocytes expressing mutant NRAS (NRASG12D) and examined NOTCH1 target genes in the presence and absence of proteasome inhibition. Silencing of FBXW7 in NRASG12D-expressing melanocytes resulted in statistically significant upregulation of the NOTCH1 target gene, HEY1, with increasing levels after MG-132 treatment (by 2.28-fold to 17.65-fold) (Figure 4A; Supplementary Table 6, available online). These melanocytic cell lines were then transplanted onto immunodeficient mice. FBXW7 loss led to statistically significant acceleration of in vivo tumorigenesis when compared with the control group (tumor volumes (mm3): mean of shScr group = 407.0, 95% CI = 403.5 to 410.4 vs mean of shRNA1 group = 1592.3, 95% CI = 1581.9 to 1602.6, P < .001; mean of shScr group = 407.0, 95% CI = 403.5 to 410.4 vs mean of shRNA2 group = 825.8, 95% CI = 816.4 to 835.3, P = .02) (Figure 4B; Supplementary Table 6, available online). Of note, reduction of FBXW7 enhanced tumor angiogenesis as determined by H&E (Hematoxylin & Eosin) and CD34 staining (Figure 5A) and led to increased levels of genes promoting angiogenesis, including NOTCH1 targets HES1 and HEY1 (Figure 5B). Angiogenesis array analysis of the tumor mRNA showed statistically significant elevation of several angiogenesis-related genes: IL-6, CXCL2, SERPINE1, and PGF1 (by 2.65-fold to 20.16-fold) (Figure 5B; Supplementary Tables 5 and 6, available online). Additionally, Western blot analysis showed increased levels of phosphorylated STAT3 protein as a result of FBXW7 knockdown (3.6-fold). Furthermore, we observed a statistically significant elevation in PD-L1 expression (by 4.89-fold) through transcriptional regulation by STAT3 (19) in FBXW7-silenced tumors (Figure 5C). In an attempt to further validate the impact of FBXW7 mutations in melanoma, we ectopically expressed five representative mutant forms of FBXW7 in NRASG12D-expressing melanocytes and examined the xenograft growth rates. Mutants W486* and R505C led to statistically significant enhanced tumorigenesis when compared with the control group (tumor volumes (mm3): mean of EV group = 675.1, 95% CI = 668.3 to 682.0 vs mean of W486* group = 1609.9, 95% CI = 1599.8 to 1620.0, P < .001; mean of EV group = 675.1, 95% CI = 668.3 to 682.0 vs mean of R505C group = 1657.7, 95% CI = 1637.6 to 1677.8, P = .02) (Figure 6A; Supplementary Table 6, available online). FBXW7 mutant forms have previously been shown to have a dominant-negative activity (they impair the function of the wild-type protein) (20); this corroborates with the phenotype observed in our study. Furthermore, the R505C mutation is of particular interest because this arginine residue is highly conserved among many species and mutations in this residue affect FBXW7’s interaction with many of its substrates, including NOTCH1 (21). These data define FBXW7 as a driver gene in melanoma, and its mutations lead to alterations in many oncogenic signaling pathways.  Figure 4. Figure 4. Loss of FBXW7 and its effects in melanomagenesis. A) Silencing FBXW7 in melan-a melanocytes expressing NRASG12D transduced with scrambled (shScr) and two independent FBXW7 short hairpain RNAs (shRNA1 and shRNA2) as determined by quantitative real-time ... Figure 5. Figure 5. FBXW7 inactive tumors and angiogenic phenotype. A) Tumor morphology and immunohistochemistry analysis for CD34. Scale bars = 50 μm. H&E = Hematoxylin & Eosin. B) Expression of NOTCH1 target genes and angiogenesis-promoting genes ... Figure 6. Figure 6. Mutant forms of FBXW7 and their contribution to tumorigenesis. A) Tumor growth curves of melan-a melanocytes expressing NRASG12D transduced with the FBXW7 mutants, wild-type FBXW7, and the empty vector (EV = empty vector control, WT = wild-type FBXW7). ... Based on our findings, FBXW7 mutational inactivation represents a mechanism for NOTCH1 activation in melanoma. Of note, we found NOTCH1 and its downstream effector MYC, as well as cyclin E, to be consistently regulated substrates of FBXW7 as opposed to Aurora A (inconsistent) and MCL1 (unregulated) (Figure 3). Therefore, we next examined the effects of inhibiting NOTCH1 and cyclin E alone or in combination in vivo. We used two different γ-secretase inhibitors (dibenzazepine [DBZ] and compound E) for NOTCH1 inhibition and a CDK2 inhibitor (dinaciclib [DNC)] for cyclin E. Mice were grafted with melan-a NRASG12D shRNA1 cells, and once the xenografts reached a volume of 100mm3 they were treated with vehicle, DBZ, compound E, and/or DNC (Figure 7). DBZ treatment resulted in statistically significant reduction of the tumor growth as compared with the vehicle-treated group (tumor volumes (mm3): mean of vehicle group = 2275.3, 95% CI = 2261.7 to 2289.0, vs mean of DBZ group = 453.1, 95% CI = 448.1 to 458.0, P < .001) (Figure 7A; Supplementary Table 6, available online). A similar response in tumor growth was observed with compound E treatment (tumor volumes (mm3): mean of vehicle group = 2275.3, 95% CI = 2261.7 to 2289.0, vs mean of compound E group = 732.8, 95% CI = 728.0 to 737.7, P = .02) (Figure 7B; Supplementary Table 6, available online). There was no major effect of DNC on tumor growth. Combination treatment of DBZ with DNC resulted in mild tumor reduction as compared with the DBZ group alone (not statistically significant) (Figure 7C). Taken together, this study renders anti-NOTCH treatment strategies promising in melanoma as understanding the impact of the spectrum of genomic alterations represented within the melanoma tumors and stratifying patients for treatment based on these aberrations remains the ultimate goal.  Figure 7. Figure 7. NOTCH1 inhibition of FBXW7 inactive tumors. A–C) Melanocytes expressing NRASG12D transduced with shFBXW7 No. 1 injected onto mice to generate xenografts. Tumor growth curves of mice treated with either vehicle, γ-secretase inhibitors (dibenzazepine ... Go to: Discussion Metastatic melanoma is a lethal, incurable malignancy. It represents a heterogeneous tumor with many subgroups that are not well defined. The tumors have high mutational load and complex signaling networks (4,5); however the major focus has so far been on a few driver genes and signaling pathways. Targeted therapies that have been developed, despite effective initial clinical responses, do not lead to sustained clinical remission. Patients eventually relapse, rendering the disease incurable. BRAF and NRAS are proven oncogenes in melanoma critical for tumor initiation (22) and are predictive of response or lack there of, respectively, to RAF inhibition. BRAF inhibitors represent the prototype of targeted therapies in melanoma and prolong survival of patients with BRAF-mutant melanomas; however, resistance emerges after a short period of time (3). By defining a novel melanoma subgroup and characterizing the impact of a new driver gene, FBXW7 tumor suppressor, with potential therapeutic targeting by modulating NOTCH1 signaling, we expect to provide a rationale for mechanism-driven clinical trials and patient stratification based on molecular signatures in future studies.  Recent high-throughput sequencing efforts provide substantial insight into the spectrum of genetic alterations in melanoma (4,5,23–27); however, functional characterization of driver mutations is required for a complete understanding of its pathogenesis. FBXW7 has been found mutated in several exome-sequencing studies (4,5,27); however, experimental validation, functional characterization, and therapeutic implication has not been studied. Thus, the biological relevance of FBXW7 in melanoma has been unknown. Previous exome-sequencing studies in melanoma have identified various MAPK components (24,25), the ERB family member ERBB4 (26), the glutamate receptor GRIN2A (27), G protein-coupled receptor GRM3 (28), and, more recently, a PTEN-interacting protein, PREX2A (23), and RAC1 (5) as mutated and critical for melanoma tumorigenesis. Although these findings require further validation, they represent a viable strategy to dissect the cancer genome.  In this study, we shed light on the genetics of melanoma by identifying FBXW7 as a critical tumor suppressor mutated in this disease. However, our study is not without limitations. It will be important to determine in future studies whether mutations in FBXW7 correlate with poor outcomes in large patient cohorts. Although we found the mutation frequency as 8.1% FBXW7, its protein levels were diminished in 40% of melanoma cell lines. It is thus possible that there are mechanisms other than mutational inactivation (eg, epigenetic) that lead to loss of function and may be relevant for substrate regulation.  Aberrant signaling through NOTCH receptors has been linked to various cancers, including melanoma, making the NOTCH pathway a compelling target for therapeutic intervention (29). New inhibitors are currently being developed and tested (29). NOTCH1 is expressed at high levels in melanoma, although mutations have rarely been documented and validated and have not been studied in depth (4,30). Activated NOTCH1 signaling promotes the progression of early-stage melanoma cell lines in a β-catenin–dependent manner (31). Constitutive NOTCH1 activation confers transforming properties to primary melanocytes in vitro (32), suggesting an oncogenic role for NOTCH1 in melanocytes and melanoma. However, the mechanism of NOTCH1 activation in melanoma is unknown. Moreover, treatment of melanoma with NOTCH1 inhibitors is in a premature stage, and patients are not selected based on molecular signatures.  In summary, we discovered that FBXW7 mutations are recurrent and functionally consequential in melanoma, thus implying that mutations and inactivation of FBXW7 undergo positive selection in human melanoma genesis. We describe, for the first time, a comprehensive mutational spectrum of FBXW7 and its functional impact in melanoma and highlight a new driver gene in melanoma genesis with potential for therapeutic targeting. Additional preclinical studies, as well as clinical trials, of NOTCH1 inhibition in the context of aberrant FBXW7 will be awaited with interest.  
787||Recent efforts to comprehensively characterize the mutational landscape of non-small cell lung cancer have identified frequent mutations in the receptor tyrosine kinase ERBB4. However, the significance of mutated ERBB4 in non-small cell lung cancer remains elusive. Here, we have functionally characterized nine ERBB4 mutations previously identified in lung adenocarcinoma. Four out of the nine mutations, Y285C, D595V, D931Y and K935I, were found to be activating, increasing both basal and ligand-induced ErbB4 phosphorylation. According to structural analysis, the four activating mutations were located at critical positions at the dimerization interfaces of the ErbB4 extracellular (Y285C and D595V) and kinase (D931Y and K935I) domains. Consistently, the mutations enhanced ErbB4 dimerization and increased the trans activation in ErbB4 homodimers and ErbB4-ErbB2 heterodimers. The expression of the activating ERBB4 mutants promoted survival of NIH 3T3 cells in the absence of serum. Interestingly, serum starvation of NIH 3T3 cells expressing the ERBB4 mutants only moderately increased the phosphorylation of canonical ErbB signaling pathway effectors Erk1/2 and Akt as compared with wild-type ERBB4. In contrast, the mutations clearly enhanced the proteolytic release of signaling-competent ErbB4 intracellular domain. These results suggest the presence of activating driver mutations of ERBB4 in non-small cell lung cancer.  Top of page Introduction Lung cancer is one of the leading causes of cancer death worldwide.1 It is often diagnosed at a late stage and has poor prognosis.2 Therapeutic targeting of activated oncogenes can significantly increase the survival of lung cancer patients.3 However, aside from activating kinase domain mutations in epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR) and fusions of the anaplastic lymphoma kinase, the current selection of clinically relevant predictive markers remains limited.3  Recent comprehensive sequencing projects have increased our understanding about the mutational landscape of non-small cell lung cancer and have helped to identify new potential targets that drive tumorigenesis.4, 5, 6 One such target is ERBB4, a member of the EGFR subfamily of receptor tyrosine kinases. According to COSMIC (catalog of somatic mutations in cancer),7 5.4% of non-small cell lung cancers harbor ERBB4 missense mutations. More specifically, 5.2% of adenocarcinomas and 6.3% of squamous cell carcinomas have mutations in the ERBB4 gene that encode an amino-acid change in the receptor.  The abundance of ERBB4 mutations suggests that mutated ERBB4 could have a functional role in lung cancer and serve as a potential drug target. In metastatic melanoma, where ERBB4 mutations are particularly frequent,8, 9, 10 mutated ERBB4 has been shown to act as a driver oncogene and may serve as a novel drug target.8, 11, 12 However, because no mutational hot spots have been identified in ERBB4, and the number of studies comprehensively analyzing lung cancer-associated ERBB4 mutations is limited,13 the functional consequences of ERBB4 mutations in lung cancer remain largely unknown.  Here, we have functionally characterized nine somatic ERBB4 mutations that have been discovered from samples of lung adenocarcinoma.4 Four mutations were found to be activating, increasing ErbB4 phosphorylation both basally and upon ligand stimulation. The activating ERBB4 mutations targeted both the extracellular domain and the intracellular kinase domain of ErbB4. The increased activity of the ErbB4 mutants was demonstrated to be due to enhanced interaction between receptor monomers in ErbB4 homo- and/or heterodimers. Moreover, the activating ERBB4 mutants promoted cell survival in the absence of serum when overexpressed in NIH 3T3 cells. These results indicate the presence of activating, potentially oncogenic ERBB4 mutations in non-small cell lung cancer.  Top of page Results ERBB4 mutations in lung cancer promote receptor activation ERBB4 has been identified as a highly mutated gene in lung adenocarcinoma in a study analyzing the exons of 623 potential cancer genes in 188 clinical lung adenocarcinoma samples.4 Nine ERBB4 mutations reported in this cohort yield a mutation frequency of 4.8% (Figure 1).4 In contrast to the EGFR mutations in lung cancer that typically target the intracellular kinase domain,14 the reported ERBB4 mutations affect all functional subdomains of ErbB4 protein with no hotspot mutations (Figure 1). Seven out of the nine ErbB4 mutations, N181S, T244R, Y285C, R306S, V348L, D595V and H618P, are located in the extracellular domain and two mutations, D931Y and K935I, in the kinase domain. Figure 1. Figure 1 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author Schematic representation of the analyzed ERBB4 mutations. The amino acids targeted by the ERBB4 mutations are indicated by arrows. Different subdomains within the extracellular domain of ErbB4 are indicated by roman numerals. Dark gray indicates the transmembrane domain.  Full figure and legend (30K)  To functionally characterize the ERBB4 mutations, the nine mutations were cloned into a pBABE-puroERBB4-JM-aCYT-2HA retroviral expression vector that encodes HA-tagged ErbB4 JM-a CYT-2 isoform and yields a moderate expression level in stably or transiently transfected cells. To address the effects on ErbB4 activation, wild-type and mutant ERBB4 constructs were transiently transfected into COS-7 cells and analyzed by western blotting. Four out of the nine mutations, Y285C, D595V, D931Y and K935I, were activating, increasing both basal and neuregulin-1 (NRG-1)-induced ErbB4 phosphorylation (Figure 2). The four mutants also promoted increased phosphorylation of endogenous ErbB2 in a NRG-1-dependent manner (Figure 2). The R306S mutation increased basal, but not NRG-1-stimulated, ErbB4 phosphorylation (Figure 2), and did not affect ErbB2 phosphorylation. The mutations N181S, T244R, V348L and H618P did not significantly affect ErbB4 activation (Figure 2), although N181S and V348L enhanced ligand-dependent phosphorylation of ErbB2.  Figure 2. Figure 2 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author Activity of the analyzed ERBB4 mutants in response to ligand stimulation. COS-7 cells were transiently transfected with constructs encoding wild-type ErbB4 or indicated ErbB4 mutants and treated for 10 min with 50 ng/ml NRG-1. ErbB4 phosphorylation was analyzed by western blotting (W) using phospho-ErbB4 and ErbB4 antibodies. ErbB2 phosphorylation was analyzed by western blotting with phosphotyrosine and ErbB2 antibodies after immunoprecipitation (IP) with ErbB2 antibody. Loading was controlled by western blotting with actin antibody.  Full figure and legend (93K)  Interestingly, all the mutations promoting increased basal and/or ligand-induced ErbB4 activation were structurally located at interaction sites within the ErbB4 monomer and/or between receptor monomers in ErbB4 dimers (see below). The mutations targeted three different functional subdomains of ErbB4; Y285C and R306S the extracellular subdomain II; D595V the extracellular subdomain IV; and D931Y and K935I the intracellular kinase domain (Figure 1). The most active ErbB4 mutants Y285C, D595V, D931Y and K935I were selected for further analyses.  ErbB4 extracellular mutations Y285C and D595V induce receptor dimerization Extracellular subdomains II and IV, respectively, harboring the Y285C and D595V mutations, are involved in receptor autoinhibition in the absence of ligand and provide the main interactions between dimerized receptors upon ligand binding.15, 16 Mutations in these subdomains could potentially affect the integrity of the tethered autoinhibitory conformation that the ErbB4 extracellular domain adopts in the absence of ligand,15 or increase the affinity of dimerized receptors. In both cases, mutations would increase dimerization and thus activation of the receptor. To investigate whether ErbB4 Y285C and D595V mutations lead to increased receptor dimerization, NIH 3T3 fibroblasts stably expressing wild-type, Y285C or D595V ErbB4 were stimulated with increasing concentrations of NRG-1, crosslinked, and analyzed for the formation of ErbB4 dimers by western blotting. Both mutants formed homodimers more efficiently than wild-type ErbB4 upon activation (Figure 3a), indicating that the mutations indeed increase ErbB4 dimerization. Figure 3. Figure 3 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author Analysis of ErbB4 Y285C and D595V dimerization. (a) NIH 3T3 cells stably expressing wild-type or mutant ERBB4 were stimulated for 10 min with 0, 0.5, 5 or 50 ng/ml of NRG-1, crosslinked with membrane impermeable BS3, and analyzed for ErbB4 dimers by western blotting. (b) NIH 3T3 cells stably expressing wild-type ERBB4 or ERBB4 mutants were treated for 10 min with 50 ng/ml NRG-1 and analyzed for ErbB4-ErbB2 heterodimerization by co-immunoprecipitation and western blotting. (c) Structure of subdomain I/II interaction in the inactive structure of ErbB4 extracellular domain. M60, V28 and V58 of the subdomain I interact with F288 and Y285 of subdomain II. Carbon atoms—gray, oxygen atoms—red, nitrogen atoms—blue, sulfur atoms—yellow. (d) Structure of the dimerization arm docking site in the ErbB4 dimer. The incoming dimerization arm of the opposing receptor monomer is colored cyan. Key interacting residues are indicated. (e) The dimerization interface between subdomains IV around D595. The carbon atoms of the opposing receptor monomer are colored cyan.  Full figure and legend (212K)  ErbB receptors readily form heterodimers with other members of the ErbB family. In particular, the significance of ErbB4 heterodimerization with ErbB2 is well documented.13, 17, 18 As the observed Y285C and D595V-mediated increase in ErbB2 phosphorylation (Figure 2) could result from increased heterodimerization, wild-type ErbB4 and the two mutants were co-immunoprecipitated together with ErbB2 using stable NIH 3T3 transfectants stimulated or not with NRG-1. Consistent with the crosslinking experiments, both ErbB4 mutants demonstrated increased heterodimerizaton with ErbB2 as compared with wild-type ErbB4 (Figure 3b).  Structural effects of Y285C mutation on ErbB4 extracellular domain dimer To understand the observed functional effects of the Y285C mutation on the ErbB4 structure, we examined the likely consequences of the mutation on the known ErbB4 structures. In the monomer structure (PDB code: 2AHX; tethered, autoinhibited conformation) and the dimer structure of ErbB4 (PDB code: 3U7U), tyrosine Y285 is a central, solvent-exposed residue on the surface of subdomain II; Y285 is surrounded by a cluster of mainly aromatic (three phenylalanines) and hydrophobic (proline, two valines) residues, as well as arginine R306, all from subdomain II. In the monomer structure, both Y285 and F288 of subdomain II interact with subdomain I via aromatic/hydrophobic interactions with methionine M60, valine V28 and valine V58 (Figure 3c). Equivalent valine residues are found in human EGFR and human ErbB2, but otherwise the amino acids at this location are different and none of the residues and specific interactions are conserved in EGFR from Drosophila (PDB code: 1N8Z). In the monomer, the obvious consequences of the mutation Y285C are first to disrupt the subdomain I/II interaction since a key component is missing and this would facilitate the release of subdomain II from subdomain I, which needs to take place to form the active dimer.16, 19 Second, a small cysteine side chain at 285 replacing the large tyrosine side chain is ideally placed to form a disulfide bridge with one or more nearby cysteines and, would likely disrupt the normal pattern of disulfide bridges leading to some change in the local structure and residue packing in this region of subdomain II.  In the ErbB4 dimer structure, Y285 remains a central residue participating in critical interactions with three residues (F273, Y268 and P270) from the dimerization arm of the other monomer (Figure 3d). The aromatic ring of Y285 of one monomer directly interacts at right angles with F273 of the arm of the other monomer, and F273 is further stabilized by typical ring stacking interactions with the guanidinium group of R306, which is in turn sandwiched between F273 and V427 of subdomain III. In transitioning from the monomer to the dimer, V427 moves 29Å closer to R306 (based on their Cα atoms). On the opposite side of Y285 is located P294, which packs against the phenyl ring of Y285; and one of the many disulfide bridges present in the extracellular domains of ErbB4 is formed between C293 and C304. When Y285 is mutated to cysteine, the most obvious effects are the loss of the large aromatic side chain and likely interference with the C293–C304 disulfide bridge.  Naturally-occurring clusters of three cysteine residues leading to one disulfide bridge and one unpaired cysteine are very rare but it has been observed in the vascular endothelial growth factors VEGF-C and VEGF-D where the shift in disulfide pairing likely regulates the amount of dimeric growth factor present and hence receptor activity.20 A likely effect of the Y285C change in ErbB4 would be to alter the local conformation, through forming alternative disulfide bridges, for example, with C293 and/or with C304, probably yielding a mixed population of disulfide linkages. The mutation Y285C in ErbB4 does not lead to covalent dimer formation, that is, by interfering with the other nearby disulfide bridge formed by C262 and C289 and causing inter-subunit disulfide pairing. Such a possibility would require multiple larger rearrangements locally in the structure, whereas Y285 when mutated to cysteine appears ideally placed to form a disulfide bridge with C293 and/or C304 within the same monomer. Indeed, the formation of covalent, disulfide-bonded dimers was not detected in western analyses under non-reducing conditions (data not shown).  The subdomain where Y285 is located is structurally relatively static if one compares the native monomer structure versus the native dimer structure of ErbB4, and loss of the key interaction with subdomain I stabilizing the monomer and variations in disulfide linkage could very well shift the equilibrium in favor of a higher population of dimers. Supporting this notion, the mutation results in space for other side chains (and thus the ErbB4 main chain too) to rearrange locally since the very large tyrosine side chain is being replaced by a small cysteine. Indeed, F297 and possibly P294 seem particularly well placed for moving into the space vacated by the loss of the phenyl ring, and thus maintain and even enhance the aromatic/hydrophobic cluster with F273 on the incoming arm of the other monomer (Figure 3d). Thus, several effects are likely to occur: in the monomer, the aromatic/hydrophobic interactions between subdomains I and II would be disrupted leading to exposure of the subdomain II surface that interacts with the dimerization arm in the dimer; interference of the normal disulfide pairing and removal of a large bulky side chain would entail some local main chain and side chain alterations that appear to support a change in equilibrium toward dimer formation.  Structural effects of ErbB4 D595V mutation The D595V mutation leads to active ErbB4 dimer formation. The region harboring the D595V mutation is not present in the dimeric ErbB4 structure, and thus was modeled based on the structure of EGFR (see Materials and Methods for details). However, it is present in the monomeric ErbB4 structure. Interestingly, the conformation of this hairpin region, residues 592–607, appears to be structurally stabile since the region in the model, based on human EGFR, and the actual structural region in the monomer are very similar; as for many portions of ErbB4, this region is stabilized by a disulfide bridge, here involving C593. In the EGFR dimer structure, and hence in the dimeric model of ErbB4, both monomers directly interact with each other in this region and D595 from both monomers is located at this interface. In the inactive structure of ErbB4 extracellular domain (PDB code: 2AHX), D585, P594, L597 and K606 of the tether loop of subdomain IV pack against residues Y268, P270 and F273 of the tether loop of subdomain II (Supplementary Figure 1A). D595 is located on the opposite side of subdomain IV, and is not involved in the tether formation. D595 forms a strong electrostatic interaction with K592, which, in the case of D595V mutation, is poised to relocate its long side chain to interact with E591. E591 in turn interacts with Q558, but K592 could still maintain its hydrophobic interactions with F583, which stacks against R612. Thus, the disruption of D595-K592 interaction does not explain the increased dimerization of D595V mutant. Accordingly, mutation of K592 into isoleucine did not increase, but abolished dimer formation (Supplementary Figure 1B).  In forming the dimer, the tether loop of subdomain II from each monomer relocates to the vicinity of Y285 of the other monomer (see above), and the tether loop of subdomain IV of each monomer bind to each other along the opposite face (opposite to where subdomain II binds in the monomeric structure) (Figure 3e). In wild-type dimeric ErbB4, D595 would necessarily form a strong ion pair with K592. This interaction would serve to neutralize the negative charge of D595 at the interface of the two monomers, explaining the effects of the K592I mutation on ErbB4 dimer formation (Supplementary Figure 1B). With the D595V mutation, in the dimer, the side chain of K592 is long enough and flexible enough to move out of this region of the interface. Valine at position 595 is a hydrophobic residue and would promote interactions in the dimer because the surrounding residues are aromatic (F603 and F605; repeated twice) and hydrophobic (P594 and L597, repeated twice) at this symmetrical interface of the two monomers in the dimer.  Taken together, these data indicate that the activating ErbB4 mutation Y285C in the extracellular domain disrupts interactions stabilizing the monomer and likely enhances interactions in the dimer; whereas the D595V mutant clearly would enhance the hydrophobic interactions at a key interface formed in the dimer.  ErbB4 K935I mutation increases transactivation between ErbB4 monomers Upon receptor dimerization, the kinase domains of two ErbB4 monomers interact (Figure 4a), forming an asymmetrical dimer (PDB code 3BCE; note that to obtain the coordinates for the asymmetric dimer requires application of symmetry operations to the coordinates).21 In this dimer, the C-terminal lobe of the activator kinase and the N-terminal lobe of the receiver kinase interact, resulting in allosteric activation of the receiver kinase in trans.21, 22 The asymmetric interface between kinase domains extends from one solvent-exposed surface (where a key strong charge-pair interaction takes place between K955, activator kinase domain, and D767, receiver kinase domain), a series of hydrophobic residues from the receiver kinase domain (V763, M766, A769, L770, L788) and from the activator kinase domain (I947, M951, V954, M958, I959), leading to the highly charged interactions at the other solvent-exposed surface. It is at this latter surface where the mutations D931Y and K935I are located within the C-terminal lobe of the activator kinase (Figure 4a). Figure 4. Figure 4 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author Transactivation by the ErbB4 D931Y and K935I mutants. (a) Left: schematic illustration of the asymmetric ErbB4 kinase dimer. Right: sequence alignment of the activator kinase dimerization interface. The positions of D931Y, K935I and an artificial V954R mutation disrupting the asymmetric kinase dimer are indicated by arrows. (b) The outline of the transactivation assay. Left: Upon ErbB receptor dimerization, the kinase domains interact in head-to-tail manner, resulting in activation of the receiver kinase by the activator kinase in trans. Middle: ErbB4 mutants harboring either the V954R mutation or the KD K751R mutation are not able to activate the kinase enzyme alone. Right: When the two mutants (V954R and K751R) are co-expressed, a functional kinase dimer interface is formed. The KD ErbB4 K751R serves as the activator kinase, activating the ErbB4 V954R mutant in trans. By introducing D931Y and K935I mutations to the KD ErbB4 background, the effects of the mutations to transactivation can be analyzed. Purple, cyan and red stars indicate V954R, K751R and D931Y/K935I mutations, respectively. w/wo, with or without. (c) Transactivation by the ErbB4 mutants was analyzed in COS-7 cells transiently transfected with indicated ERBB4 constructs using western blotting. Basal ErbB4 phosphorylation was used as a readout of activation. (d) COS-7 cells transiently transfected with constructs encoding ERBB2 and wild-type ERBB4 or ERBB4 mutants were treated for 10 min with 50 ng/ml NRG-1 and analyzed for ErbB4-ErbB2 heterodimerization by co-immunoprecipitation and western blotting. (e) Part of the dimerization interface in the asymmetric kinase dimer harboring D931 and K935. The carbon atoms of the activator and receiver kinase are shown in gray and cyan, respectively.  Full figure and legend (193K)  K935 is fully conserved among human ErbB receptors, whereas D931 is conserved in all ErbB receptors except EGFR where it is serine (Figure 4a). The location of the two activating mutations suggests that on dimer formation the mutations strengthen the interaction between the kinase domains, leading to an increase in transactivation between dimerized ErbB4 receptors. To address this, a point mutation V954R was first introduced into the C-terminal lobe of the full-length ErbB4 kinase domain, disrupting its capability to serve as an activator kinase (Figures 4a and b).23, 24 Next, the cancer-associated mutations—D931Y and K935I—were introduced separately into the kinase-dead (KD) ErbB4 K751R background. In principle, neither the V954R mutant, due to the disrupted activator interface, nor the KD ErbB4 is able to activate the kinase enzyme alone. However, when the two mutants (V954R and K751R) are co-expressed, a functional kinase dimer interface is formed. The KD ErbB4 K751R serves as the activator kinase, activating the V954R mutant ErbB4 in trans (Figure 4b). The mutations were introduced into the pcDNA3.1.ERBB4JM-aCYT-2-HA expression vector encoding a HA-tagged ErbB4 JM-a CYT-2 isoform, affording a high expression level favoring ErbB4 homodimerization, and enabling the use of basal ErbB4 phosphorylation as the readout for ErbB4 transactivation.  Using this system, the transactivation potency of the mutants was analyzed in COS-7 cells by transiently transfecting the cells with the V954R mutant alone or together with KD ErbB4 K751R with or without D931Y or K935I mutations. As hypothesized, the K935I mutation increased the transactivation (Figure 4c), suggesting that the mutation enhances the interaction between ErbB4 kinase monomers. Surprisingly, the D931Y mutation, while equally activating as K935I (Figure 2), did not increase the transactivation between dimerized ErbB4 monomers (Figure 4c).  The inability of D931Y mutation to increase the activity of ErbB4 homodimers (Figure 4c) and the apparent ability to promote increased phophorylation of ErbB2 (Figure 2) suggested that there is a difference in the capability of the D931Y mutant to homo- vs heterodimerize. We have previously shown that cancer-associated ErbB4 mutations can promote a qualitative shift in active ErbB4 dimers by favoring the formation of ErbB4-ErbB2 heterodimers over ErbB4 homodimers.13 To address whether the D931Y mutation could promote heterodimerization, wild-type ErbB4 or the ErbB4 mutants D931Y and K935I were co-immunoprecipitated together with ErbB2 from transiently transfected COS-7 cells stimulated or not with NRG-1. Both ErbB4 mutants demonstrated increased association with ErbB2 in response to ligand stimulation (Figure 4d). However, K935I, but not D931Y, increased the formation of ErbB4 homodimers in a crosslinking experiment (Supplementary Figure 2). These data indicate that the ErbB4 D931Y mutation induces a qualitative shift in the activity of ErbB4 dimers, increasing the activity of ErbB4-ErbB2 heterodimers, but not ErbB4 homodimers. The ErbB4 K935I mutation, on the other hand, is a potent activator of both ErbB4-ErbB2 heterodimers and ErbB4 homodimers.  Structural effects of D931Y and K935I mutations The location of D931 and K935 in the activator kinase is on helix 10 at the solvent-exposed interface with the receiver kinase in the ErbB4 asymmetric dimer (PDB code: 3BCE) (Figure 4e). Residues along this helix are identical in ErbB2 (PDB code: 3PP0). From the receiver kinase, two loops approach D931 and K935: K714-E715-T716 (K-E-T in ErbB2) (Figure 4e) and C814-L815-S816-P817 (C-L-T-S in ErbB2). Thus, in the immediate surrounding of D931 and K935 only two residues differ between ErbB4 (serine-proline) and ErbB2 (threonine-serine). If D931Y in ErbB4 would alter the local conformation, then hydrogen bonding to both serine and threonine in ErbB2 could take place and hence stabilize the heterodimer complex in comparison with the ErbB4 dimer where serine and proline are present. The K935I mutation leaves a main-chain hydrogen bond between K935I and E715 intact, but would break the polar interaction between K935 and D931 (Figure 4e). Nonetheless, the bulky hydrophobic side chain of isoleucine would pack nicely within a hydrophobic ‘cup’ formed by the aliphatic portions of K714-E715-T716 and possibly P790 from the receiver kinase, and D931, L932, E934 and E937 of the activator kinase (Figure 4e). Thus, despite being largely surrounded by polar side chains, the K935I mutation would effectively increase the overall hydrophobic character and affinity of the kinase dimer interface and facilitate dimer formation, which is consistent with the observed increase in transactivation.  Activating ERBB4 mutations promote survival in NIH 3T3 cells The functional effects of the activating ERBB4 mutations were addressed in NIH 3T3 cells stably transfected with wild-type ERBB4 or ERBB4 mutants Y285C, D595V or K935I. In full (10%) serum, the expression of wild-type or mutant ERBB4 did not have a significant effect on the growth of NIH 3T3 cells (data not shown). However, in the absence of serum, the viability of NIH 3T3 vector control cells and cells expressing wild-type ERBB4 quickly declined, whereas the cells expressing the ERBB4 mutants were significantly more resistant to serum starvation (Figure 5a). Analysis of ErbB4 phosphorylation after 0, 24 and 72 h of serum starvation demonstrated that while wild-type ErbB4 was only moderately phosphorylated in full serum and the phosphorylation level was not detectable after 24 h of starvation, the ErbB4 mutants demonstrated robust ErbB4 phosphorylation in full serum and receptor phosphorylation was sustained for at least 72 h after serum withdrawal (Figure 5b). The sustained ErbB4 phosphorylation of the mutants was reflected to some extent as sustained Erk phosphorylation and PCNA expression (Figure 5b), suggesting prolonged proliferative signaling induced by the ErbB4 mutants in NIH 3T3 cells following serum starvation. Figure 5. Figure 5 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author Effect of ERBB4 mutants on survival and intracellular signaling in NIH 3T3 cells. (a) To analyze the effect of ERBB4 mutations on cell survival, NIH 3T3 cells stably expressing wild-type ERBB4 or indicated ERBB4 mutants were plated on 96-well plates in quadruplicates (4000 cells/well). The following day the cells were washed three times and serum-free growth medium was applied. Viability of the cells was analyzed at indicated timepoints using the MTT assay. The mean and s.d. are shown. **P<0.01; ***P<0.001; compared with cells expressing wild-type ERBB4 by one-way ANOVA. (b) To analyze the effects of serum starvation on intracellular signaling, the NIH 3T3 transfectants were grown on 10 cm culture dishes and subjected to serum starvation as in (a). Protein samples were extracted at the indicated timepoints. The phosphorylation of ErbB4, Erk1/2 and Akt was analyzed by western blotting using phospho-specific antibodies, and PCNA expression using PCNA antibody. Loading was controlled using antibodies recognizing total ErbB4, Erk1/2, Akt or actin. (c and d) Analysis of PDGFRA mRNA (c) and protein (d) expression in serum starved NIH 3T3 transfectants. The cells were cultured and treated as in (b), and RNA and protein samples were extracted at the indicated timepoints. PDGFRA mRNA expression was analyzed using real-time RT–PCR (c), and protein level was analyzed by western blotting (d).  Full figure and legend (151K)  In addition to canonical RTK signaling, ErbB4 can be cleaved from the cell membrane through RIP (regulated intra-membrane proteolysis) and the resulting soluble intracellular domain (ICD) can directly translocate into the nucleus and regulate transcription.25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31 Interestingly, all three ErbB4 mutants demonstrated increased ErbB4 cleavage in NIH 3T3 cells both basally and upon serum starvation when compared with wild-type ErbB4 (Figure 4b, long ErbB4 exposure). To address the signaling activity of the soluble ErbB4 ICD, platelet-derived growth factor receptor-alpha (PDGFRA) expression was analyzed in NIH 3T3 cells expressing wild-type ERBB4 and the different ERBB4 mutants. Soluble ErbB4 ICD has previously been reported to associate with the PDGFRA promoter and stimulate PDGFRA transcription in response to serum starvation.31 In cells expressing the ERBB4 mutants, PDGFRA mRNA and protein levels were robustly increased already at the 24-h time point after serum withdrawal and were sustained at a higher level than in vector control cells or cells expressing wild-type ERBB4 still at the 72-h time point (Figure 5c and d).  Taken together, these data demonstrate that the ERBB4 mutations activate RIP-mediated ErbB4 signaling and promote the survival of NIH 3T3 cells.  Top of page Discussion ERBB4 mutations are frequent in non-small cell lung cancer,7 making ErbB4 a potential novel drug target. However, the functional effects of lung cancer-associated ERBB4 mutations are largely unknown. Moreover, the identified ERBB4 mutations harbor all functional subdomains of ErbB4 protein with no hot spot mutations, which is in contrast to lung cancer-associated EGFR mutations that typically target few sites in the kinase domain.14 Here, we have functionally analyzed nine ERBB4 mutations previously identified in a study introducing ERBB4 as a highly mutated gene among 623 putative cancer genes in a series of 188 lung adenocarcinoma samples.4  Our results indicated that four (Y285C, D595V, D931Y and K935I) out of the nine analyzed ERBB4 mutations were activating, increasing both basal and ligand-induced ErbB4 phosphorylation. The activating mutations were located both in the extracellular ligand binding/dimerization domain (Y285C and D595V) and in the intracellular kinase domain (D931Y and K935I). Interestingly, all activating ErbB4 mutations mapped structurally to interaction sites within the monomer form and between receptor monomers in ErbB4 dimers, suggesting that the enhanced activation was due to effects on receptor dimerization, both uncovering regions in the monomer necessary for dimerization and/or by stabilizing interfaces in the dimer. Indeed, the activating ErbB4 extracellular domain mutations Y285C and D595V increased ErbB4 dimerization in crosslinking experiments, as well as enhanced ErbB4 heterodimerization, as demonstrated by ErbB2 co-immunoprecipitation. Furthermore, the activating kinase domain mutations, D931Y and K935I, enhanced receptor dimerization and transactivation in ErbB4 homo- and/or heterodimers, also indicating increased interaction between receptor monomers in ErbB4 dimers.  The structural locations and functional effects of the activating ErbB4 mutations are similar to those of the recently characterized oncogenic ErbB2 and ErbB3 mutations.32, 33 Mutations in the extracellular subdomain II of ErbB2 induce covalent inter-receptor dimers,33 whereas ErbB3 extracellular subdomain II and kinase domain mutations promote the activation of co-expressed ErbB2.32 Thus, in the case of both ErbB2 and ErbB3, the mutations increase the interaction and activity of ErbB homo- or heterodimers, which is analogous to our results with ErbB4 mutations.  When overexpressed in NIH 3T3 cells, the ErbB4 mutants Y285C, D595V and K935I significantly promoted cell survival upon serum starvation, indicating that activating ERBB4 mutations are potentially oncogenic. Interestingly, in the patient samples harboring the four identified activating mutations Y285C, D595V, D931Y and K935I, the total number of mutated cancer-associated genes was significantly lower than in patients harboring non-activating ERBB4 mutations (4.25 vs 18 mutations in average, P=0.003, t-test).4 This finding is in line with our data that the four identified activating ERBB4 mutations were functionally distinct from the other analyzed ERBB4 mutations and consistent with the hypothesis that the activating ERBB4 mutations are functional in these tumors.  The activating ERBB4 mutations were not mutually exclusive with KRAS mutations, as the patient harboring ErbB4 D595V mutation also harbored a KRAS G12V mutation. This is unexpected, because ERBB4 mutations are mutually exclusive with EGFR mutations,4 suggesting that mutated ErbB4 acts in the same pathway or has similar functions as mutated EGFR. However, our results indicated that while the activating ERBB4 mutations significantly promoted the survival of NIH 3T3 cells, this effect was only moderately translated to the activation of RAS-MAPK pathway, the canonical RTK pathway used by activating EGFR mutants34, 35 as well as by mutant KRAS. In contrast, the activating ErbB4 mutants demonstrated increased cleavage of functionally active ErbB4 ICD from the cell membrane. RIP-mediated release of the ErbB4 ICD is a mode of signaling unique for ErbB4 among the ErbB receptors and ErbB4 ICD has previously been shown to mediate growth-promoting ErbB4 signaling.29, 31 Thus, it is possible that activated ErbB4 mutants, potentially through the action of ErbB4 ICD, provide parallel, synergistic signaling in mutant KRAS-driven tumors, rather than alternative means to activate the RAS-MAPK pathway. Interestingly, a recent study demonstrated that in xenograft and transgenic mouse models of non-small cell lung cancer, ligand-mediated ErbB4 signaling has an important role in tumor recurrence after chemotherapy, irrespectively of the KRAS mutation status.36 Furthermore, in metastatic melanoma, the oncogenic ERBB4 mutations typically co-occur with mutations in RAS or RAF family genes,8 further suggesting that oncogenic ErbB4 signaling is mediated via alternative pathways other than the RAS-MAPK pathway.  Taken together, this study demonstrates the presence of activating ERBB4 mutations in non-small cell lung cancer and warrants further studies assessing the potential therapeutic value of targeting mutated ErbB4 in this disease.  
788||Recent efforts to comprehensively characterize the mutational landscape of non-small cell lung cancer have identified frequent mutations in the receptor tyrosine kinase ERBB4. However, the significance of mutated ERBB4 in non-small cell lung cancer remains elusive. Here, we have functionally characterized nine ERBB4 mutations previously identified in lung adenocarcinoma. Four out of the nine mutations, Y285C, D595V, D931Y and K935I, were found to be activating, increasing both basal and ligand-induced ErbB4 phosphorylation. According to structural analysis, the four activating mutations were located at critical positions at the dimerization interfaces of the ErbB4 extracellular (Y285C and D595V) and kinase (D931Y and K935I) domains. Consistently, the mutations enhanced ErbB4 dimerization and increased the trans activation in ErbB4 homodimers and ErbB4-ErbB2 heterodimers. The expression of the activating ERBB4 mutants promoted survival of NIH 3T3 cells in the absence of serum. Interestingly, serum starvation of NIH 3T3 cells expressing the ERBB4 mutants only moderately increased the phosphorylation of canonical ErbB signaling pathway effectors Erk1/2 and Akt as compared with wild-type ERBB4. In contrast, the mutations clearly enhanced the proteolytic release of signaling-competent ErbB4 intracellular domain. These results suggest the presence of activating driver mutations of ERBB4 in non-small cell lung cancer.  Top of page Introduction Lung cancer is one of the leading causes of cancer death worldwide.1 It is often diagnosed at a late stage and has poor prognosis.2 Therapeutic targeting of activated oncogenes can significantly increase the survival of lung cancer patients.3 However, aside from activating kinase domain mutations in epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR) and fusions of the anaplastic lymphoma kinase, the current selection of clinically relevant predictive markers remains limited.3  Recent comprehensive sequencing projects have increased our understanding about the mutational landscape of non-small cell lung cancer and have helped to identify new potential targets that drive tumorigenesis.4, 5, 6 One such target is ERBB4, a member of the EGFR subfamily of receptor tyrosine kinases. According to COSMIC (catalog of somatic mutations in cancer),7 5.4% of non-small cell lung cancers harbor ERBB4 missense mutations. More specifically, 5.2% of adenocarcinomas and 6.3% of squamous cell carcinomas have mutations in the ERBB4 gene that encode an amino-acid change in the receptor.  The abundance of ERBB4 mutations suggests that mutated ERBB4 could have a functional role in lung cancer and serve as a potential drug target. In metastatic melanoma, where ERBB4 mutations are particularly frequent,8, 9, 10 mutated ERBB4 has been shown to act as a driver oncogene and may serve as a novel drug target.8, 11, 12 However, because no mutational hot spots have been identified in ERBB4, and the number of studies comprehensively analyzing lung cancer-associated ERBB4 mutations is limited,13 the functional consequences of ERBB4 mutations in lung cancer remain largely unknown.  Here, we have functionally characterized nine somatic ERBB4 mutations that have been discovered from samples of lung adenocarcinoma.4 Four mutations were found to be activating, increasing ErbB4 phosphorylation both basally and upon ligand stimulation. The activating ERBB4 mutations targeted both the extracellular domain and the intracellular kinase domain of ErbB4. The increased activity of the ErbB4 mutants was demonstrated to be due to enhanced interaction between receptor monomers in ErbB4 homo- and/or heterodimers. Moreover, the activating ERBB4 mutants promoted cell survival in the absence of serum when overexpressed in NIH 3T3 cells. These results indicate the presence of activating, potentially oncogenic ERBB4 mutations in non-small cell lung cancer.  Top of page Results ERBB4 mutations in lung cancer promote receptor activation ERBB4 has been identified as a highly mutated gene in lung adenocarcinoma in a study analyzing the exons of 623 potential cancer genes in 188 clinical lung adenocarcinoma samples.4 Nine ERBB4 mutations reported in this cohort yield a mutation frequency of 4.8% (Figure 1).4 In contrast to the EGFR mutations in lung cancer that typically target the intracellular kinase domain,14 the reported ERBB4 mutations affect all functional subdomains of ErbB4 protein with no hotspot mutations (Figure 1). Seven out of the nine ErbB4 mutations, N181S, T244R, Y285C, R306S, V348L, D595V and H618P, are located in the extracellular domain and two mutations, D931Y and K935I, in the kinase domain. Figure 1. Figure 1 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author Schematic representation of the analyzed ERBB4 mutations. The amino acids targeted by the ERBB4 mutations are indicated by arrows. Different subdomains within the extracellular domain of ErbB4 are indicated by roman numerals. Dark gray indicates the transmembrane domain.  Full figure and legend (30K)  To functionally characterize the ERBB4 mutations, the nine mutations were cloned into a pBABE-puroERBB4-JM-aCYT-2HA retroviral expression vector that encodes HA-tagged ErbB4 JM-a CYT-2 isoform and yields a moderate expression level in stably or transiently transfected cells. To address the effects on ErbB4 activation, wild-type and mutant ERBB4 constructs were transiently transfected into COS-7 cells and analyzed by western blotting. Four out of the nine mutations, Y285C, D595V, D931Y and K935I, were activating, increasing both basal and neuregulin-1 (NRG-1)-induced ErbB4 phosphorylation (Figure 2). The four mutants also promoted increased phosphorylation of endogenous ErbB2 in a NRG-1-dependent manner (Figure 2). The R306S mutation increased basal, but not NRG-1-stimulated, ErbB4 phosphorylation (Figure 2), and did not affect ErbB2 phosphorylation. The mutations N181S, T244R, V348L and H618P did not significantly affect ErbB4 activation (Figure 2), although N181S and V348L enhanced ligand-dependent phosphorylation of ErbB2.  Figure 2. Figure 2 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author Activity of the analyzed ERBB4 mutants in response to ligand stimulation. COS-7 cells were transiently transfected with constructs encoding wild-type ErbB4 or indicated ErbB4 mutants and treated for 10 min with 50 ng/ml NRG-1. ErbB4 phosphorylation was analyzed by western blotting (W) using phospho-ErbB4 and ErbB4 antibodies. ErbB2 phosphorylation was analyzed by western blotting with phosphotyrosine and ErbB2 antibodies after immunoprecipitation (IP) with ErbB2 antibody. Loading was controlled by western blotting with actin antibody.  Full figure and legend (93K)  Interestingly, all the mutations promoting increased basal and/or ligand-induced ErbB4 activation were structurally located at interaction sites within the ErbB4 monomer and/or between receptor monomers in ErbB4 dimers (see below). The mutations targeted three different functional subdomains of ErbB4; Y285C and R306S the extracellular subdomain II; D595V the extracellular subdomain IV; and D931Y and K935I the intracellular kinase domain (Figure 1). The most active ErbB4 mutants Y285C, D595V, D931Y and K935I were selected for further analyses.  ErbB4 extracellular mutations Y285C and D595V induce receptor dimerization Extracellular subdomains II and IV, respectively, harboring the Y285C and D595V mutations, are involved in receptor autoinhibition in the absence of ligand and provide the main interactions between dimerized receptors upon ligand binding.15, 16 Mutations in these subdomains could potentially affect the integrity of the tethered autoinhibitory conformation that the ErbB4 extracellular domain adopts in the absence of ligand,15 or increase the affinity of dimerized receptors. In both cases, mutations would increase dimerization and thus activation of the receptor. To investigate whether ErbB4 Y285C and D595V mutations lead to increased receptor dimerization, NIH 3T3 fibroblasts stably expressing wild-type, Y285C or D595V ErbB4 were stimulated with increasing concentrations of NRG-1, crosslinked, and analyzed for the formation of ErbB4 dimers by western blotting. Both mutants formed homodimers more efficiently than wild-type ErbB4 upon activation (Figure 3a), indicating that the mutations indeed increase ErbB4 dimerization. Figure 3. Figure 3 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author Analysis of ErbB4 Y285C and D595V dimerization. (a) NIH 3T3 cells stably expressing wild-type or mutant ERBB4 were stimulated for 10 min with 0, 0.5, 5 or 50 ng/ml of NRG-1, crosslinked with membrane impermeable BS3, and analyzed for ErbB4 dimers by western blotting. (b) NIH 3T3 cells stably expressing wild-type ERBB4 or ERBB4 mutants were treated for 10 min with 50 ng/ml NRG-1 and analyzed for ErbB4-ErbB2 heterodimerization by co-immunoprecipitation and western blotting. (c) Structure of subdomain I/II interaction in the inactive structure of ErbB4 extracellular domain. M60, V28 and V58 of the subdomain I interact with F288 and Y285 of subdomain II. Carbon atoms—gray, oxygen atoms—red, nitrogen atoms—blue, sulfur atoms—yellow. (d) Structure of the dimerization arm docking site in the ErbB4 dimer. The incoming dimerization arm of the opposing receptor monomer is colored cyan. Key interacting residues are indicated. (e) The dimerization interface between subdomains IV around D595. The carbon atoms of the opposing receptor monomer are colored cyan.  Full figure and legend (212K)  ErbB receptors readily form heterodimers with other members of the ErbB family. In particular, the significance of ErbB4 heterodimerization with ErbB2 is well documented.13, 17, 18 As the observed Y285C and D595V-mediated increase in ErbB2 phosphorylation (Figure 2) could result from increased heterodimerization, wild-type ErbB4 and the two mutants were co-immunoprecipitated together with ErbB2 using stable NIH 3T3 transfectants stimulated or not with NRG-1. Consistent with the crosslinking experiments, both ErbB4 mutants demonstrated increased heterodimerizaton with ErbB2 as compared with wild-type ErbB4 (Figure 3b).  Structural effects of Y285C mutation on ErbB4 extracellular domain dimer To understand the observed functional effects of the Y285C mutation on the ErbB4 structure, we examined the likely consequences of the mutation on the known ErbB4 structures. In the monomer structure (PDB code: 2AHX; tethered, autoinhibited conformation) and the dimer structure of ErbB4 (PDB code: 3U7U), tyrosine Y285 is a central, solvent-exposed residue on the surface of subdomain II; Y285 is surrounded by a cluster of mainly aromatic (three phenylalanines) and hydrophobic (proline, two valines) residues, as well as arginine R306, all from subdomain II. In the monomer structure, both Y285 and F288 of subdomain II interact with subdomain I via aromatic/hydrophobic interactions with methionine M60, valine V28 and valine V58 (Figure 3c). Equivalent valine residues are found in human EGFR and human ErbB2, but otherwise the amino acids at this location are different and none of the residues and specific interactions are conserved in EGFR from Drosophila (PDB code: 1N8Z). In the monomer, the obvious consequences of the mutation Y285C are first to disrupt the subdomain I/II interaction since a key component is missing and this would facilitate the release of subdomain II from subdomain I, which needs to take place to form the active dimer.16, 19 Second, a small cysteine side chain at 285 replacing the large tyrosine side chain is ideally placed to form a disulfide bridge with one or more nearby cysteines and, would likely disrupt the normal pattern of disulfide bridges leading to some change in the local structure and residue packing in this region of subdomain II.  In the ErbB4 dimer structure, Y285 remains a central residue participating in critical interactions with three residues (F273, Y268 and P270) from the dimerization arm of the other monomer (Figure 3d). The aromatic ring of Y285 of one monomer directly interacts at right angles with F273 of the arm of the other monomer, and F273 is further stabilized by typical ring stacking interactions with the guanidinium group of R306, which is in turn sandwiched between F273 and V427 of subdomain III. In transitioning from the monomer to the dimer, V427 moves 29Å closer to R306 (based on their Cα atoms). On the opposite side of Y285 is located P294, which packs against the phenyl ring of Y285; and one of the many disulfide bridges present in the extracellular domains of ErbB4 is formed between C293 and C304. When Y285 is mutated to cysteine, the most obvious effects are the loss of the large aromatic side chain and likely interference with the C293–C304 disulfide bridge.  Naturally-occurring clusters of three cysteine residues leading to one disulfide bridge and one unpaired cysteine are very rare but it has been observed in the vascular endothelial growth factors VEGF-C and VEGF-D where the shift in disulfide pairing likely regulates the amount of dimeric growth factor present and hence receptor activity.20 A likely effect of the Y285C change in ErbB4 would be to alter the local conformation, through forming alternative disulfide bridges, for example, with C293 and/or with C304, probably yielding a mixed population of disulfide linkages. The mutation Y285C in ErbB4 does not lead to covalent dimer formation, that is, by interfering with the other nearby disulfide bridge formed by C262 and C289 and causing inter-subunit disulfide pairing. Such a possibility would require multiple larger rearrangements locally in the structure, whereas Y285 when mutated to cysteine appears ideally placed to form a disulfide bridge with C293 and/or C304 within the same monomer. Indeed, the formation of covalent, disulfide-bonded dimers was not detected in western analyses under non-reducing conditions (data not shown).  The subdomain where Y285 is located is structurally relatively static if one compares the native monomer structure versus the native dimer structure of ErbB4, and loss of the key interaction with subdomain I stabilizing the monomer and variations in disulfide linkage could very well shift the equilibrium in favor of a higher population of dimers. Supporting this notion, the mutation results in space for other side chains (and thus the ErbB4 main chain too) to rearrange locally since the very large tyrosine side chain is being replaced by a small cysteine. Indeed, F297 and possibly P294 seem particularly well placed for moving into the space vacated by the loss of the phenyl ring, and thus maintain and even enhance the aromatic/hydrophobic cluster with F273 on the incoming arm of the other monomer (Figure 3d). Thus, several effects are likely to occur: in the monomer, the aromatic/hydrophobic interactions between subdomains I and II would be disrupted leading to exposure of the subdomain II surface that interacts with the dimerization arm in the dimer; interference of the normal disulfide pairing and removal of a large bulky side chain would entail some local main chain and side chain alterations that appear to support a change in equilibrium toward dimer formation.  Structural effects of ErbB4 D595V mutation The D595V mutation leads to active ErbB4 dimer formation. The region harboring the D595V mutation is not present in the dimeric ErbB4 structure, and thus was modeled based on the structure of EGFR (see Materials and Methods for details). However, it is present in the monomeric ErbB4 structure. Interestingly, the conformation of this hairpin region, residues 592–607, appears to be structurally stabile since the region in the model, based on human EGFR, and the actual structural region in the monomer are very similar; as for many portions of ErbB4, this region is stabilized by a disulfide bridge, here involving C593. In the EGFR dimer structure, and hence in the dimeric model of ErbB4, both monomers directly interact with each other in this region and D595 from both monomers is located at this interface. In the inactive structure of ErbB4 extracellular domain (PDB code: 2AHX), D585, P594, L597 and K606 of the tether loop of subdomain IV pack against residues Y268, P270 and F273 of the tether loop of subdomain II (Supplementary Figure 1A). D595 is located on the opposite side of subdomain IV, and is not involved in the tether formation. D595 forms a strong electrostatic interaction with K592, which, in the case of D595V mutation, is poised to relocate its long side chain to interact with E591. E591 in turn interacts with Q558, but K592 could still maintain its hydrophobic interactions with F583, which stacks against R612. Thus, the disruption of D595-K592 interaction does not explain the increased dimerization of D595V mutant. Accordingly, mutation of K592 into isoleucine did not increase, but abolished dimer formation (Supplementary Figure 1B).  In forming the dimer, the tether loop of subdomain II from each monomer relocates to the vicinity of Y285 of the other monomer (see above), and the tether loop of subdomain IV of each monomer bind to each other along the opposite face (opposite to where subdomain II binds in the monomeric structure) (Figure 3e). In wild-type dimeric ErbB4, D595 would necessarily form a strong ion pair with K592. This interaction would serve to neutralize the negative charge of D595 at the interface of the two monomers, explaining the effects of the K592I mutation on ErbB4 dimer formation (Supplementary Figure 1B). With the D595V mutation, in the dimer, the side chain of K592 is long enough and flexible enough to move out of this region of the interface. Valine at position 595 is a hydrophobic residue and would promote interactions in the dimer because the surrounding residues are aromatic (F603 and F605; repeated twice) and hydrophobic (P594 and L597, repeated twice) at this symmetrical interface of the two monomers in the dimer.  Taken together, these data indicate that the activating ErbB4 mutation Y285C in the extracellular domain disrupts interactions stabilizing the monomer and likely enhances interactions in the dimer; whereas the D595V mutant clearly would enhance the hydrophobic interactions at a key interface formed in the dimer.  ErbB4 K935I mutation increases transactivation between ErbB4 monomers Upon receptor dimerization, the kinase domains of two ErbB4 monomers interact (Figure 4a), forming an asymmetrical dimer (PDB code 3BCE; note that to obtain the coordinates for the asymmetric dimer requires application of symmetry operations to the coordinates).21 In this dimer, the C-terminal lobe of the activator kinase and the N-terminal lobe of the receiver kinase interact, resulting in allosteric activation of the receiver kinase in trans.21, 22 The asymmetric interface between kinase domains extends from one solvent-exposed surface (where a key strong charge-pair interaction takes place between K955, activator kinase domain, and D767, receiver kinase domain), a series of hydrophobic residues from the receiver kinase domain (V763, M766, A769, L770, L788) and from the activator kinase domain (I947, M951, V954, M958, I959), leading to the highly charged interactions at the other solvent-exposed surface. It is at this latter surface where the mutations D931Y and K935I are located within the C-terminal lobe of the activator kinase (Figure 4a). Figure 4. Figure 4 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author Transactivation by the ErbB4 D931Y and K935I mutants. (a) Left: schematic illustration of the asymmetric ErbB4 kinase dimer. Right: sequence alignment of the activator kinase dimerization interface. The positions of D931Y, K935I and an artificial V954R mutation disrupting the asymmetric kinase dimer are indicated by arrows. (b) The outline of the transactivation assay. Left: Upon ErbB receptor dimerization, the kinase domains interact in head-to-tail manner, resulting in activation of the receiver kinase by the activator kinase in trans. Middle: ErbB4 mutants harboring either the V954R mutation or the KD K751R mutation are not able to activate the kinase enzyme alone. Right: When the two mutants (V954R and K751R) are co-expressed, a functional kinase dimer interface is formed. The KD ErbB4 K751R serves as the activator kinase, activating the ErbB4 V954R mutant in trans. By introducing D931Y and K935I mutations to the KD ErbB4 background, the effects of the mutations to transactivation can be analyzed. Purple, cyan and red stars indicate V954R, K751R and D931Y/K935I mutations, respectively. w/wo, with or without. (c) Transactivation by the ErbB4 mutants was analyzed in COS-7 cells transiently transfected with indicated ERBB4 constructs using western blotting. Basal ErbB4 phosphorylation was used as a readout of activation. (d) COS-7 cells transiently transfected with constructs encoding ERBB2 and wild-type ERBB4 or ERBB4 mutants were treated for 10 min with 50 ng/ml NRG-1 and analyzed for ErbB4-ErbB2 heterodimerization by co-immunoprecipitation and western blotting. (e) Part of the dimerization interface in the asymmetric kinase dimer harboring D931 and K935. The carbon atoms of the activator and receiver kinase are shown in gray and cyan, respectively.  Full figure and legend (193K)  K935 is fully conserved among human ErbB receptors, whereas D931 is conserved in all ErbB receptors except EGFR where it is serine (Figure 4a). The location of the two activating mutations suggests that on dimer formation the mutations strengthen the interaction between the kinase domains, leading to an increase in transactivation between dimerized ErbB4 receptors. To address this, a point mutation V954R was first introduced into the C-terminal lobe of the full-length ErbB4 kinase domain, disrupting its capability to serve as an activator kinase (Figures 4a and b).23, 24 Next, the cancer-associated mutations—D931Y and K935I—were introduced separately into the kinase-dead (KD) ErbB4 K751R background. In principle, neither the V954R mutant, due to the disrupted activator interface, nor the KD ErbB4 is able to activate the kinase enzyme alone. However, when the two mutants (V954R and K751R) are co-expressed, a functional kinase dimer interface is formed. The KD ErbB4 K751R serves as the activator kinase, activating the V954R mutant ErbB4 in trans (Figure 4b). The mutations were introduced into the pcDNA3.1.ERBB4JM-aCYT-2-HA expression vector encoding a HA-tagged ErbB4 JM-a CYT-2 isoform, affording a high expression level favoring ErbB4 homodimerization, and enabling the use of basal ErbB4 phosphorylation as the readout for ErbB4 transactivation.  Using this system, the transactivation potency of the mutants was analyzed in COS-7 cells by transiently transfecting the cells with the V954R mutant alone or together with KD ErbB4 K751R with or without D931Y or K935I mutations. As hypothesized, the K935I mutation increased the transactivation (Figure 4c), suggesting that the mutation enhances the interaction between ErbB4 kinase monomers. Surprisingly, the D931Y mutation, while equally activating as K935I (Figure 2), did not increase the transactivation between dimerized ErbB4 monomers (Figure 4c).  The inability of D931Y mutation to increase the activity of ErbB4 homodimers (Figure 4c) and the apparent ability to promote increased phophorylation of ErbB2 (Figure 2) suggested that there is a difference in the capability of the D931Y mutant to homo- vs heterodimerize. We have previously shown that cancer-associated ErbB4 mutations can promote a qualitative shift in active ErbB4 dimers by favoring the formation of ErbB4-ErbB2 heterodimers over ErbB4 homodimers.13 To address whether the D931Y mutation could promote heterodimerization, wild-type ErbB4 or the ErbB4 mutants D931Y and K935I were co-immunoprecipitated together with ErbB2 from transiently transfected COS-7 cells stimulated or not with NRG-1. Both ErbB4 mutants demonstrated increased association with ErbB2 in response to ligand stimulation (Figure 4d). However, K935I, but not D931Y, increased the formation of ErbB4 homodimers in a crosslinking experiment (Supplementary Figure 2). These data indicate that the ErbB4 D931Y mutation induces a qualitative shift in the activity of ErbB4 dimers, increasing the activity of ErbB4-ErbB2 heterodimers, but not ErbB4 homodimers. The ErbB4 K935I mutation, on the other hand, is a potent activator of both ErbB4-ErbB2 heterodimers and ErbB4 homodimers.  Structural effects of D931Y and K935I mutations The location of D931 and K935 in the activator kinase is on helix 10 at the solvent-exposed interface with the receiver kinase in the ErbB4 asymmetric dimer (PDB code: 3BCE) (Figure 4e). Residues along this helix are identical in ErbB2 (PDB code: 3PP0). From the receiver kinase, two loops approach D931 and K935: K714-E715-T716 (K-E-T in ErbB2) (Figure 4e) and C814-L815-S816-P817 (C-L-T-S in ErbB2). Thus, in the immediate surrounding of D931 and K935 only two residues differ between ErbB4 (serine-proline) and ErbB2 (threonine-serine). If D931Y in ErbB4 would alter the local conformation, then hydrogen bonding to both serine and threonine in ErbB2 could take place and hence stabilize the heterodimer complex in comparison with the ErbB4 dimer where serine and proline are present. The K935I mutation leaves a main-chain hydrogen bond between K935I and E715 intact, but would break the polar interaction between K935 and D931 (Figure 4e). Nonetheless, the bulky hydrophobic side chain of isoleucine would pack nicely within a hydrophobic ‘cup’ formed by the aliphatic portions of K714-E715-T716 and possibly P790 from the receiver kinase, and D931, L932, E934 and E937 of the activator kinase (Figure 4e). Thus, despite being largely surrounded by polar side chains, the K935I mutation would effectively increase the overall hydrophobic character and affinity of the kinase dimer interface and facilitate dimer formation, which is consistent with the observed increase in transactivation.  Activating ERBB4 mutations promote survival in NIH 3T3 cells The functional effects of the activating ERBB4 mutations were addressed in NIH 3T3 cells stably transfected with wild-type ERBB4 or ERBB4 mutants Y285C, D595V or K935I. In full (10%) serum, the expression of wild-type or mutant ERBB4 did not have a significant effect on the growth of NIH 3T3 cells (data not shown). However, in the absence of serum, the viability of NIH 3T3 vector control cells and cells expressing wild-type ERBB4 quickly declined, whereas the cells expressing the ERBB4 mutants were significantly more resistant to serum starvation (Figure 5a). Analysis of ErbB4 phosphorylation after 0, 24 and 72 h of serum starvation demonstrated that while wild-type ErbB4 was only moderately phosphorylated in full serum and the phosphorylation level was not detectable after 24 h of starvation, the ErbB4 mutants demonstrated robust ErbB4 phosphorylation in full serum and receptor phosphorylation was sustained for at least 72 h after serum withdrawal (Figure 5b). The sustained ErbB4 phosphorylation of the mutants was reflected to some extent as sustained Erk phosphorylation and PCNA expression (Figure 5b), suggesting prolonged proliferative signaling induced by the ErbB4 mutants in NIH 3T3 cells following serum starvation. Figure 5. Figure 5 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author Effect of ERBB4 mutants on survival and intracellular signaling in NIH 3T3 cells. (a) To analyze the effect of ERBB4 mutations on cell survival, NIH 3T3 cells stably expressing wild-type ERBB4 or indicated ERBB4 mutants were plated on 96-well plates in quadruplicates (4000 cells/well). The following day the cells were washed three times and serum-free growth medium was applied. Viability of the cells was analyzed at indicated timepoints using the MTT assay. The mean and s.d. are shown. **P<0.01; ***P<0.001; compared with cells expressing wild-type ERBB4 by one-way ANOVA. (b) To analyze the effects of serum starvation on intracellular signaling, the NIH 3T3 transfectants were grown on 10 cm culture dishes and subjected to serum starvation as in (a). Protein samples were extracted at the indicated timepoints. The phosphorylation of ErbB4, Erk1/2 and Akt was analyzed by western blotting using phospho-specific antibodies, and PCNA expression using PCNA antibody. Loading was controlled using antibodies recognizing total ErbB4, Erk1/2, Akt or actin. (c and d) Analysis of PDGFRA mRNA (c) and protein (d) expression in serum starved NIH 3T3 transfectants. The cells were cultured and treated as in (b), and RNA and protein samples were extracted at the indicated timepoints. PDGFRA mRNA expression was analyzed using real-time RT–PCR (c), and protein level was analyzed by western blotting (d).  Full figure and legend (151K)  In addition to canonical RTK signaling, ErbB4 can be cleaved from the cell membrane through RIP (regulated intra-membrane proteolysis) and the resulting soluble intracellular domain (ICD) can directly translocate into the nucleus and regulate transcription.25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31 Interestingly, all three ErbB4 mutants demonstrated increased ErbB4 cleavage in NIH 3T3 cells both basally and upon serum starvation when compared with wild-type ErbB4 (Figure 4b, long ErbB4 exposure). To address the signaling activity of the soluble ErbB4 ICD, platelet-derived growth factor receptor-alpha (PDGFRA) expression was analyzed in NIH 3T3 cells expressing wild-type ERBB4 and the different ERBB4 mutants. Soluble ErbB4 ICD has previously been reported to associate with the PDGFRA promoter and stimulate PDGFRA transcription in response to serum starvation.31 In cells expressing the ERBB4 mutants, PDGFRA mRNA and protein levels were robustly increased already at the 24-h time point after serum withdrawal and were sustained at a higher level than in vector control cells or cells expressing wild-type ERBB4 still at the 72-h time point (Figure 5c and d).  Taken together, these data demonstrate that the ERBB4 mutations activate RIP-mediated ErbB4 signaling and promote the survival of NIH 3T3 cells.  Top of page Discussion ERBB4 mutations are frequent in non-small cell lung cancer,7 making ErbB4 a potential novel drug target. However, the functional effects of lung cancer-associated ERBB4 mutations are largely unknown. Moreover, the identified ERBB4 mutations harbor all functional subdomains of ErbB4 protein with no hot spot mutations, which is in contrast to lung cancer-associated EGFR mutations that typically target few sites in the kinase domain.14 Here, we have functionally analyzed nine ERBB4 mutations previously identified in a study introducing ERBB4 as a highly mutated gene among 623 putative cancer genes in a series of 188 lung adenocarcinoma samples.4  Our results indicated that four (Y285C, D595V, D931Y and K935I) out of the nine analyzed ERBB4 mutations were activating, increasing both basal and ligand-induced ErbB4 phosphorylation. The activating mutations were located both in the extracellular ligand binding/dimerization domain (Y285C and D595V) and in the intracellular kinase domain (D931Y and K935I). Interestingly, all activating ErbB4 mutations mapped structurally to interaction sites within the monomer form and between receptor monomers in ErbB4 dimers, suggesting that the enhanced activation was due to effects on receptor dimerization, both uncovering regions in the monomer necessary for dimerization and/or by stabilizing interfaces in the dimer. Indeed, the activating ErbB4 extracellular domain mutations Y285C and D595V increased ErbB4 dimerization in crosslinking experiments, as well as enhanced ErbB4 heterodimerization, as demonstrated by ErbB2 co-immunoprecipitation. Furthermore, the activating kinase domain mutations, D931Y and K935I, enhanced receptor dimerization and transactivation in ErbB4 homo- and/or heterodimers, also indicating increased interaction between receptor monomers in ErbB4 dimers.  The structural locations and functional effects of the activating ErbB4 mutations are similar to those of the recently characterized oncogenic ErbB2 and ErbB3 mutations.32, 33 Mutations in the extracellular subdomain II of ErbB2 induce covalent inter-receptor dimers,33 whereas ErbB3 extracellular subdomain II and kinase domain mutations promote the activation of co-expressed ErbB2.32 Thus, in the case of both ErbB2 and ErbB3, the mutations increase the interaction and activity of ErbB homo- or heterodimers, which is analogous to our results with ErbB4 mutations.  When overexpressed in NIH 3T3 cells, the ErbB4 mutants Y285C, D595V and K935I significantly promoted cell survival upon serum starvation, indicating that activating ERBB4 mutations are potentially oncogenic. Interestingly, in the patient samples harboring the four identified activating mutations Y285C, D595V, D931Y and K935I, the total number of mutated cancer-associated genes was significantly lower than in patients harboring non-activating ERBB4 mutations (4.25 vs 18 mutations in average, P=0.003, t-test).4 This finding is in line with our data that the four identified activating ERBB4 mutations were functionally distinct from the other analyzed ERBB4 mutations and consistent with the hypothesis that the activating ERBB4 mutations are functional in these tumors.  The activating ERBB4 mutations were not mutually exclusive with KRAS mutations, as the patient harboring ErbB4 D595V mutation also harbored a KRAS G12V mutation. This is unexpected, because ERBB4 mutations are mutually exclusive with EGFR mutations,4 suggesting that mutated ErbB4 acts in the same pathway or has similar functions as mutated EGFR. However, our results indicated that while the activating ERBB4 mutations significantly promoted the survival of NIH 3T3 cells, this effect was only moderately translated to the activation of RAS-MAPK pathway, the canonical RTK pathway used by activating EGFR mutants34, 35 as well as by mutant KRAS. In contrast, the activating ErbB4 mutants demonstrated increased cleavage of functionally active ErbB4 ICD from the cell membrane. RIP-mediated release of the ErbB4 ICD is a mode of signaling unique for ErbB4 among the ErbB receptors and ErbB4 ICD has previously been shown to mediate growth-promoting ErbB4 signaling.29, 31 Thus, it is possible that activated ErbB4 mutants, potentially through the action of ErbB4 ICD, provide parallel, synergistic signaling in mutant KRAS-driven tumors, rather than alternative means to activate the RAS-MAPK pathway. Interestingly, a recent study demonstrated that in xenograft and transgenic mouse models of non-small cell lung cancer, ligand-mediated ErbB4 signaling has an important role in tumor recurrence after chemotherapy, irrespectively of the KRAS mutation status.36 Furthermore, in metastatic melanoma, the oncogenic ERBB4 mutations typically co-occur with mutations in RAS or RAF family genes,8 further suggesting that oncogenic ErbB4 signaling is mediated via alternative pathways other than the RAS-MAPK pathway.  Taken together, this study demonstrates the presence of activating ERBB4 mutations in non-small cell lung cancer and warrants further studies assessing the potential therapeutic value of targeting mutated ErbB4 in this disease.  
794||Recent efforts to comprehensively characterize the mutational landscape of non-small cell lung cancer have identified frequent mutations in the receptor tyrosine kinase ERBB4. However, the significance of mutated ERBB4 in non-small cell lung cancer remains elusive. Here, we have functionally characterized nine ERBB4 mutations previously identified in lung adenocarcinoma. Four out of the nine mutations, Y285C, D595V, D931Y and K935I, were found to be activating, increasing both basal and ligand-induced ErbB4 phosphorylation. According to structural analysis, the four activating mutations were located at critical positions at the dimerization interfaces of the ErbB4 extracellular (Y285C and D595V) and kinase (D931Y and K935I) domains. Consistently, the mutations enhanced ErbB4 dimerization and increased the trans activation in ErbB4 homodimers and ErbB4-ErbB2 heterodimers. The expression of the activating ERBB4 mutants promoted survival of NIH 3T3 cells in the absence of serum. Interestingly, serum starvation of NIH 3T3 cells expressing the ERBB4 mutants only moderately increased the phosphorylation of canonical ErbB signaling pathway effectors Erk1/2 and Akt as compared with wild-type ERBB4. In contrast, the mutations clearly enhanced the proteolytic release of signaling-competent ErbB4 intracellular domain. These results suggest the presence of activating driver mutations of ERBB4 in non-small cell lung cancer.  Top of page Introduction Lung cancer is one of the leading causes of cancer death worldwide.1 It is often diagnosed at a late stage and has poor prognosis.2 Therapeutic targeting of activated oncogenes can significantly increase the survival of lung cancer patients.3 However, aside from activating kinase domain mutations in epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR) and fusions of the anaplastic lymphoma kinase, the current selection of clinically relevant predictive markers remains limited.3  Recent comprehensive sequencing projects have increased our understanding about the mutational landscape of non-small cell lung cancer and have helped to identify new potential targets that drive tumorigenesis.4, 5, 6 One such target is ERBB4, a member of the EGFR subfamily of receptor tyrosine kinases. According to COSMIC (catalog of somatic mutations in cancer),7 5.4% of non-small cell lung cancers harbor ERBB4 missense mutations. More specifically, 5.2% of adenocarcinomas and 6.3% of squamous cell carcinomas have mutations in the ERBB4 gene that encode an amino-acid change in the receptor.  The abundance of ERBB4 mutations suggests that mutated ERBB4 could have a functional role in lung cancer and serve as a potential drug target. In metastatic melanoma, where ERBB4 mutations are particularly frequent,8, 9, 10 mutated ERBB4 has been shown to act as a driver oncogene and may serve as a novel drug target.8, 11, 12 However, because no mutational hot spots have been identified in ERBB4, and the number of studies comprehensively analyzing lung cancer-associated ERBB4 mutations is limited,13 the functional consequences of ERBB4 mutations in lung cancer remain largely unknown.  Here, we have functionally characterized nine somatic ERBB4 mutations that have been discovered from samples of lung adenocarcinoma.4 Four mutations were found to be activating, increasing ErbB4 phosphorylation both basally and upon ligand stimulation. The activating ERBB4 mutations targeted both the extracellular domain and the intracellular kinase domain of ErbB4. The increased activity of the ErbB4 mutants was demonstrated to be due to enhanced interaction between receptor monomers in ErbB4 homo- and/or heterodimers. Moreover, the activating ERBB4 mutants promoted cell survival in the absence of serum when overexpressed in NIH 3T3 cells. These results indicate the presence of activating, potentially oncogenic ERBB4 mutations in non-small cell lung cancer.  Top of page Results ERBB4 mutations in lung cancer promote receptor activation ERBB4 has been identified as a highly mutated gene in lung adenocarcinoma in a study analyzing the exons of 623 potential cancer genes in 188 clinical lung adenocarcinoma samples.4 Nine ERBB4 mutations reported in this cohort yield a mutation frequency of 4.8% (Figure 1).4 In contrast to the EGFR mutations in lung cancer that typically target the intracellular kinase domain,14 the reported ERBB4 mutations affect all functional subdomains of ErbB4 protein with no hotspot mutations (Figure 1). Seven out of the nine ErbB4 mutations, N181S, T244R, Y285C, R306S, V348L, D595V and H618P, are located in the extracellular domain and two mutations, D931Y and K935I, in the kinase domain. Figure 1. Figure 1 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author Schematic representation of the analyzed ERBB4 mutations. The amino acids targeted by the ERBB4 mutations are indicated by arrows. Different subdomains within the extracellular domain of ErbB4 are indicated by roman numerals. Dark gray indicates the transmembrane domain.  Full figure and legend (30K)  To functionally characterize the ERBB4 mutations, the nine mutations were cloned into a pBABE-puroERBB4-JM-aCYT-2HA retroviral expression vector that encodes HA-tagged ErbB4 JM-a CYT-2 isoform and yields a moderate expression level in stably or transiently transfected cells. To address the effects on ErbB4 activation, wild-type and mutant ERBB4 constructs were transiently transfected into COS-7 cells and analyzed by western blotting. Four out of the nine mutations, Y285C, D595V, D931Y and K935I, were activating, increasing both basal and neuregulin-1 (NRG-1)-induced ErbB4 phosphorylation (Figure 2). The four mutants also promoted increased phosphorylation of endogenous ErbB2 in a NRG-1-dependent manner (Figure 2). The R306S mutation increased basal, but not NRG-1-stimulated, ErbB4 phosphorylation (Figure 2), and did not affect ErbB2 phosphorylation. The mutations N181S, T244R, V348L and H618P did not significantly affect ErbB4 activation (Figure 2), although N181S and V348L enhanced ligand-dependent phosphorylation of ErbB2.  Figure 2. Figure 2 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author Activity of the analyzed ERBB4 mutants in response to ligand stimulation. COS-7 cells were transiently transfected with constructs encoding wild-type ErbB4 or indicated ErbB4 mutants and treated for 10 min with 50 ng/ml NRG-1. ErbB4 phosphorylation was analyzed by western blotting (W) using phospho-ErbB4 and ErbB4 antibodies. ErbB2 phosphorylation was analyzed by western blotting with phosphotyrosine and ErbB2 antibodies after immunoprecipitation (IP) with ErbB2 antibody. Loading was controlled by western blotting with actin antibody.  Full figure and legend (93K)  Interestingly, all the mutations promoting increased basal and/or ligand-induced ErbB4 activation were structurally located at interaction sites within the ErbB4 monomer and/or between receptor monomers in ErbB4 dimers (see below). The mutations targeted three different functional subdomains of ErbB4; Y285C and R306S the extracellular subdomain II; D595V the extracellular subdomain IV; and D931Y and K935I the intracellular kinase domain (Figure 1). The most active ErbB4 mutants Y285C, D595V, D931Y and K935I were selected for further analyses.  ErbB4 extracellular mutations Y285C and D595V induce receptor dimerization Extracellular subdomains II and IV, respectively, harboring the Y285C and D595V mutations, are involved in receptor autoinhibition in the absence of ligand and provide the main interactions between dimerized receptors upon ligand binding.15, 16 Mutations in these subdomains could potentially affect the integrity of the tethered autoinhibitory conformation that the ErbB4 extracellular domain adopts in the absence of ligand,15 or increase the affinity of dimerized receptors. In both cases, mutations would increase dimerization and thus activation of the receptor. To investigate whether ErbB4 Y285C and D595V mutations lead to increased receptor dimerization, NIH 3T3 fibroblasts stably expressing wild-type, Y285C or D595V ErbB4 were stimulated with increasing concentrations of NRG-1, crosslinked, and analyzed for the formation of ErbB4 dimers by western blotting. Both mutants formed homodimers more efficiently than wild-type ErbB4 upon activation (Figure 3a), indicating that the mutations indeed increase ErbB4 dimerization. Figure 3. Figure 3 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author Analysis of ErbB4 Y285C and D595V dimerization. (a) NIH 3T3 cells stably expressing wild-type or mutant ERBB4 were stimulated for 10 min with 0, 0.5, 5 or 50 ng/ml of NRG-1, crosslinked with membrane impermeable BS3, and analyzed for ErbB4 dimers by western blotting. (b) NIH 3T3 cells stably expressing wild-type ERBB4 or ERBB4 mutants were treated for 10 min with 50 ng/ml NRG-1 and analyzed for ErbB4-ErbB2 heterodimerization by co-immunoprecipitation and western blotting. (c) Structure of subdomain I/II interaction in the inactive structure of ErbB4 extracellular domain. M60, V28 and V58 of the subdomain I interact with F288 and Y285 of subdomain II. Carbon atoms—gray, oxygen atoms—red, nitrogen atoms—blue, sulfur atoms—yellow. (d) Structure of the dimerization arm docking site in the ErbB4 dimer. The incoming dimerization arm of the opposing receptor monomer is colored cyan. Key interacting residues are indicated. (e) The dimerization interface between subdomains IV around D595. The carbon atoms of the opposing receptor monomer are colored cyan.  Full figure and legend (212K)  ErbB receptors readily form heterodimers with other members of the ErbB family. In particular, the significance of ErbB4 heterodimerization with ErbB2 is well documented.13, 17, 18 As the observed Y285C and D595V-mediated increase in ErbB2 phosphorylation (Figure 2) could result from increased heterodimerization, wild-type ErbB4 and the two mutants were co-immunoprecipitated together with ErbB2 using stable NIH 3T3 transfectants stimulated or not with NRG-1. Consistent with the crosslinking experiments, both ErbB4 mutants demonstrated increased heterodimerizaton with ErbB2 as compared with wild-type ErbB4 (Figure 3b).  Structural effects of Y285C mutation on ErbB4 extracellular domain dimer To understand the observed functional effects of the Y285C mutation on the ErbB4 structure, we examined the likely consequences of the mutation on the known ErbB4 structures. In the monomer structure (PDB code: 2AHX; tethered, autoinhibited conformation) and the dimer structure of ErbB4 (PDB code: 3U7U), tyrosine Y285 is a central, solvent-exposed residue on the surface of subdomain II; Y285 is surrounded by a cluster of mainly aromatic (three phenylalanines) and hydrophobic (proline, two valines) residues, as well as arginine R306, all from subdomain II. In the monomer structure, both Y285 and F288 of subdomain II interact with subdomain I via aromatic/hydrophobic interactions with methionine M60, valine V28 and valine V58 (Figure 3c). Equivalent valine residues are found in human EGFR and human ErbB2, but otherwise the amino acids at this location are different and none of the residues and specific interactions are conserved in EGFR from Drosophila (PDB code: 1N8Z). In the monomer, the obvious consequences of the mutation Y285C are first to disrupt the subdomain I/II interaction since a key component is missing and this would facilitate the release of subdomain II from subdomain I, which needs to take place to form the active dimer.16, 19 Second, a small cysteine side chain at 285 replacing the large tyrosine side chain is ideally placed to form a disulfide bridge with one or more nearby cysteines and, would likely disrupt the normal pattern of disulfide bridges leading to some change in the local structure and residue packing in this region of subdomain II.  In the ErbB4 dimer structure, Y285 remains a central residue participating in critical interactions with three residues (F273, Y268 and P270) from the dimerization arm of the other monomer (Figure 3d). The aromatic ring of Y285 of one monomer directly interacts at right angles with F273 of the arm of the other monomer, and F273 is further stabilized by typical ring stacking interactions with the guanidinium group of R306, which is in turn sandwiched between F273 and V427 of subdomain III. In transitioning from the monomer to the dimer, V427 moves 29Å closer to R306 (based on their Cα atoms). On the opposite side of Y285 is located P294, which packs against the phenyl ring of Y285; and one of the many disulfide bridges present in the extracellular domains of ErbB4 is formed between C293 and C304. When Y285 is mutated to cysteine, the most obvious effects are the loss of the large aromatic side chain and likely interference with the C293–C304 disulfide bridge.  Naturally-occurring clusters of three cysteine residues leading to one disulfide bridge and one unpaired cysteine are very rare but it has been observed in the vascular endothelial growth factors VEGF-C and VEGF-D where the shift in disulfide pairing likely regulates the amount of dimeric growth factor present and hence receptor activity.20 A likely effect of the Y285C change in ErbB4 would be to alter the local conformation, through forming alternative disulfide bridges, for example, with C293 and/or with C304, probably yielding a mixed population of disulfide linkages. The mutation Y285C in ErbB4 does not lead to covalent dimer formation, that is, by interfering with the other nearby disulfide bridge formed by C262 and C289 and causing inter-subunit disulfide pairing. Such a possibility would require multiple larger rearrangements locally in the structure, whereas Y285 when mutated to cysteine appears ideally placed to form a disulfide bridge with C293 and/or C304 within the same monomer. Indeed, the formation of covalent, disulfide-bonded dimers was not detected in western analyses under non-reducing conditions (data not shown).  The subdomain where Y285 is located is structurally relatively static if one compares the native monomer structure versus the native dimer structure of ErbB4, and loss of the key interaction with subdomain I stabilizing the monomer and variations in disulfide linkage could very well shift the equilibrium in favor of a higher population of dimers. Supporting this notion, the mutation results in space for other side chains (and thus the ErbB4 main chain too) to rearrange locally since the very large tyrosine side chain is being replaced by a small cysteine. Indeed, F297 and possibly P294 seem particularly well placed for moving into the space vacated by the loss of the phenyl ring, and thus maintain and even enhance the aromatic/hydrophobic cluster with F273 on the incoming arm of the other monomer (Figure 3d). Thus, several effects are likely to occur: in the monomer, the aromatic/hydrophobic interactions between subdomains I and II would be disrupted leading to exposure of the subdomain II surface that interacts with the dimerization arm in the dimer; interference of the normal disulfide pairing and removal of a large bulky side chain would entail some local main chain and side chain alterations that appear to support a change in equilibrium toward dimer formation.  Structural effects of ErbB4 D595V mutation The D595V mutation leads to active ErbB4 dimer formation. The region harboring the D595V mutation is not present in the dimeric ErbB4 structure, and thus was modeled based on the structure of EGFR (see Materials and Methods for details). However, it is present in the monomeric ErbB4 structure. Interestingly, the conformation of this hairpin region, residues 592–607, appears to be structurally stabile since the region in the model, based on human EGFR, and the actual structural region in the monomer are very similar; as for many portions of ErbB4, this region is stabilized by a disulfide bridge, here involving C593. In the EGFR dimer structure, and hence in the dimeric model of ErbB4, both monomers directly interact with each other in this region and D595 from both monomers is located at this interface. In the inactive structure of ErbB4 extracellular domain (PDB code: 2AHX), D585, P594, L597 and K606 of the tether loop of subdomain IV pack against residues Y268, P270 and F273 of the tether loop of subdomain II (Supplementary Figure 1A). D595 is located on the opposite side of subdomain IV, and is not involved in the tether formation. D595 forms a strong electrostatic interaction with K592, which, in the case of D595V mutation, is poised to relocate its long side chain to interact with E591. E591 in turn interacts with Q558, but K592 could still maintain its hydrophobic interactions with F583, which stacks against R612. Thus, the disruption of D595-K592 interaction does not explain the increased dimerization of D595V mutant. Accordingly, mutation of K592 into isoleucine did not increase, but abolished dimer formation (Supplementary Figure 1B).  In forming the dimer, the tether loop of subdomain II from each monomer relocates to the vicinity of Y285 of the other monomer (see above), and the tether loop of subdomain IV of each monomer bind to each other along the opposite face (opposite to where subdomain II binds in the monomeric structure) (Figure 3e). In wild-type dimeric ErbB4, D595 would necessarily form a strong ion pair with K592. This interaction would serve to neutralize the negative charge of D595 at the interface of the two monomers, explaining the effects of the K592I mutation on ErbB4 dimer formation (Supplementary Figure 1B). With the D595V mutation, in the dimer, the side chain of K592 is long enough and flexible enough to move out of this region of the interface. Valine at position 595 is a hydrophobic residue and would promote interactions in the dimer because the surrounding residues are aromatic (F603 and F605; repeated twice) and hydrophobic (P594 and L597, repeated twice) at this symmetrical interface of the two monomers in the dimer.  Taken together, these data indicate that the activating ErbB4 mutation Y285C in the extracellular domain disrupts interactions stabilizing the monomer and likely enhances interactions in the dimer; whereas the D595V mutant clearly would enhance the hydrophobic interactions at a key interface formed in the dimer.  ErbB4 K935I mutation increases transactivation between ErbB4 monomers Upon receptor dimerization, the kinase domains of two ErbB4 monomers interact (Figure 4a), forming an asymmetrical dimer (PDB code 3BCE; note that to obtain the coordinates for the asymmetric dimer requires application of symmetry operations to the coordinates).21 In this dimer, the C-terminal lobe of the activator kinase and the N-terminal lobe of the receiver kinase interact, resulting in allosteric activation of the receiver kinase in trans.21, 22 The asymmetric interface between kinase domains extends from one solvent-exposed surface (where a key strong charge-pair interaction takes place between K955, activator kinase domain, and D767, receiver kinase domain), a series of hydrophobic residues from the receiver kinase domain (V763, M766, A769, L770, L788) and from the activator kinase domain (I947, M951, V954, M958, I959), leading to the highly charged interactions at the other solvent-exposed surface. It is at this latter surface where the mutations D931Y and K935I are located within the C-terminal lobe of the activator kinase (Figure 4a). Figure 4. Figure 4 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author Transactivation by the ErbB4 D931Y and K935I mutants. (a) Left: schematic illustration of the asymmetric ErbB4 kinase dimer. Right: sequence alignment of the activator kinase dimerization interface. The positions of D931Y, K935I and an artificial V954R mutation disrupting the asymmetric kinase dimer are indicated by arrows. (b) The outline of the transactivation assay. Left: Upon ErbB receptor dimerization, the kinase domains interact in head-to-tail manner, resulting in activation of the receiver kinase by the activator kinase in trans. Middle: ErbB4 mutants harboring either the V954R mutation or the KD K751R mutation are not able to activate the kinase enzyme alone. Right: When the two mutants (V954R and K751R) are co-expressed, a functional kinase dimer interface is formed. The KD ErbB4 K751R serves as the activator kinase, activating the ErbB4 V954R mutant in trans. By introducing D931Y and K935I mutations to the KD ErbB4 background, the effects of the mutations to transactivation can be analyzed. Purple, cyan and red stars indicate V954R, K751R and D931Y/K935I mutations, respectively. w/wo, with or without. (c) Transactivation by the ErbB4 mutants was analyzed in COS-7 cells transiently transfected with indicated ERBB4 constructs using western blotting. Basal ErbB4 phosphorylation was used as a readout of activation. (d) COS-7 cells transiently transfected with constructs encoding ERBB2 and wild-type ERBB4 or ERBB4 mutants were treated for 10 min with 50 ng/ml NRG-1 and analyzed for ErbB4-ErbB2 heterodimerization by co-immunoprecipitation and western blotting. (e) Part of the dimerization interface in the asymmetric kinase dimer harboring D931 and K935. The carbon atoms of the activator and receiver kinase are shown in gray and cyan, respectively.  Full figure and legend (193K)  K935 is fully conserved among human ErbB receptors, whereas D931 is conserved in all ErbB receptors except EGFR where it is serine (Figure 4a). The location of the two activating mutations suggests that on dimer formation the mutations strengthen the interaction between the kinase domains, leading to an increase in transactivation between dimerized ErbB4 receptors. To address this, a point mutation V954R was first introduced into the C-terminal lobe of the full-length ErbB4 kinase domain, disrupting its capability to serve as an activator kinase (Figures 4a and b).23, 24 Next, the cancer-associated mutations—D931Y and K935I—were introduced separately into the kinase-dead (KD) ErbB4 K751R background. In principle, neither the V954R mutant, due to the disrupted activator interface, nor the KD ErbB4 is able to activate the kinase enzyme alone. However, when the two mutants (V954R and K751R) are co-expressed, a functional kinase dimer interface is formed. The KD ErbB4 K751R serves as the activator kinase, activating the V954R mutant ErbB4 in trans (Figure 4b). The mutations were introduced into the pcDNA3.1.ERBB4JM-aCYT-2-HA expression vector encoding a HA-tagged ErbB4 JM-a CYT-2 isoform, affording a high expression level favoring ErbB4 homodimerization, and enabling the use of basal ErbB4 phosphorylation as the readout for ErbB4 transactivation.  Using this system, the transactivation potency of the mutants was analyzed in COS-7 cells by transiently transfecting the cells with the V954R mutant alone or together with KD ErbB4 K751R with or without D931Y or K935I mutations. As hypothesized, the K935I mutation increased the transactivation (Figure 4c), suggesting that the mutation enhances the interaction between ErbB4 kinase monomers. Surprisingly, the D931Y mutation, while equally activating as K935I (Figure 2), did not increase the transactivation between dimerized ErbB4 monomers (Figure 4c).  The inability of D931Y mutation to increase the activity of ErbB4 homodimers (Figure 4c) and the apparent ability to promote increased phophorylation of ErbB2 (Figure 2) suggested that there is a difference in the capability of the D931Y mutant to homo- vs heterodimerize. We have previously shown that cancer-associated ErbB4 mutations can promote a qualitative shift in active ErbB4 dimers by favoring the formation of ErbB4-ErbB2 heterodimers over ErbB4 homodimers.13 To address whether the D931Y mutation could promote heterodimerization, wild-type ErbB4 or the ErbB4 mutants D931Y and K935I were co-immunoprecipitated together with ErbB2 from transiently transfected COS-7 cells stimulated or not with NRG-1. Both ErbB4 mutants demonstrated increased association with ErbB2 in response to ligand stimulation (Figure 4d). However, K935I, but not D931Y, increased the formation of ErbB4 homodimers in a crosslinking experiment (Supplementary Figure 2). These data indicate that the ErbB4 D931Y mutation induces a qualitative shift in the activity of ErbB4 dimers, increasing the activity of ErbB4-ErbB2 heterodimers, but not ErbB4 homodimers. The ErbB4 K935I mutation, on the other hand, is a potent activator of both ErbB4-ErbB2 heterodimers and ErbB4 homodimers.  Structural effects of D931Y and K935I mutations The location of D931 and K935 in the activator kinase is on helix 10 at the solvent-exposed interface with the receiver kinase in the ErbB4 asymmetric dimer (PDB code: 3BCE) (Figure 4e). Residues along this helix are identical in ErbB2 (PDB code: 3PP0). From the receiver kinase, two loops approach D931 and K935: K714-E715-T716 (K-E-T in ErbB2) (Figure 4e) and C814-L815-S816-P817 (C-L-T-S in ErbB2). Thus, in the immediate surrounding of D931 and K935 only two residues differ between ErbB4 (serine-proline) and ErbB2 (threonine-serine). If D931Y in ErbB4 would alter the local conformation, then hydrogen bonding to both serine and threonine in ErbB2 could take place and hence stabilize the heterodimer complex in comparison with the ErbB4 dimer where serine and proline are present. The K935I mutation leaves a main-chain hydrogen bond between K935I and E715 intact, but would break the polar interaction between K935 and D931 (Figure 4e). Nonetheless, the bulky hydrophobic side chain of isoleucine would pack nicely within a hydrophobic ‘cup’ formed by the aliphatic portions of K714-E715-T716 and possibly P790 from the receiver kinase, and D931, L932, E934 and E937 of the activator kinase (Figure 4e). Thus, despite being largely surrounded by polar side chains, the K935I mutation would effectively increase the overall hydrophobic character and affinity of the kinase dimer interface and facilitate dimer formation, which is consistent with the observed increase in transactivation.  Activating ERBB4 mutations promote survival in NIH 3T3 cells The functional effects of the activating ERBB4 mutations were addressed in NIH 3T3 cells stably transfected with wild-type ERBB4 or ERBB4 mutants Y285C, D595V or K935I. In full (10%) serum, the expression of wild-type or mutant ERBB4 did not have a significant effect on the growth of NIH 3T3 cells (data not shown). However, in the absence of serum, the viability of NIH 3T3 vector control cells and cells expressing wild-type ERBB4 quickly declined, whereas the cells expressing the ERBB4 mutants were significantly more resistant to serum starvation (Figure 5a). Analysis of ErbB4 phosphorylation after 0, 24 and 72 h of serum starvation demonstrated that while wild-type ErbB4 was only moderately phosphorylated in full serum and the phosphorylation level was not detectable after 24 h of starvation, the ErbB4 mutants demonstrated robust ErbB4 phosphorylation in full serum and receptor phosphorylation was sustained for at least 72 h after serum withdrawal (Figure 5b). The sustained ErbB4 phosphorylation of the mutants was reflected to some extent as sustained Erk phosphorylation and PCNA expression (Figure 5b), suggesting prolonged proliferative signaling induced by the ErbB4 mutants in NIH 3T3 cells following serum starvation. Figure 5. Figure 5 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author Effect of ERBB4 mutants on survival and intracellular signaling in NIH 3T3 cells. (a) To analyze the effect of ERBB4 mutations on cell survival, NIH 3T3 cells stably expressing wild-type ERBB4 or indicated ERBB4 mutants were plated on 96-well plates in quadruplicates (4000 cells/well). The following day the cells were washed three times and serum-free growth medium was applied. Viability of the cells was analyzed at indicated timepoints using the MTT assay. The mean and s.d. are shown. **P<0.01; ***P<0.001; compared with cells expressing wild-type ERBB4 by one-way ANOVA. (b) To analyze the effects of serum starvation on intracellular signaling, the NIH 3T3 transfectants were grown on 10 cm culture dishes and subjected to serum starvation as in (a). Protein samples were extracted at the indicated timepoints. The phosphorylation of ErbB4, Erk1/2 and Akt was analyzed by western blotting using phospho-specific antibodies, and PCNA expression using PCNA antibody. Loading was controlled using antibodies recognizing total ErbB4, Erk1/2, Akt or actin. (c and d) Analysis of PDGFRA mRNA (c) and protein (d) expression in serum starved NIH 3T3 transfectants. The cells were cultured and treated as in (b), and RNA and protein samples were extracted at the indicated timepoints. PDGFRA mRNA expression was analyzed using real-time RT–PCR (c), and protein level was analyzed by western blotting (d).  Full figure and legend (151K)  In addition to canonical RTK signaling, ErbB4 can be cleaved from the cell membrane through RIP (regulated intra-membrane proteolysis) and the resulting soluble intracellular domain (ICD) can directly translocate into the nucleus and regulate transcription.25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31 Interestingly, all three ErbB4 mutants demonstrated increased ErbB4 cleavage in NIH 3T3 cells both basally and upon serum starvation when compared with wild-type ErbB4 (Figure 4b, long ErbB4 exposure). To address the signaling activity of the soluble ErbB4 ICD, platelet-derived growth factor receptor-alpha (PDGFRA) expression was analyzed in NIH 3T3 cells expressing wild-type ERBB4 and the different ERBB4 mutants. Soluble ErbB4 ICD has previously been reported to associate with the PDGFRA promoter and stimulate PDGFRA transcription in response to serum starvation.31 In cells expressing the ERBB4 mutants, PDGFRA mRNA and protein levels were robustly increased already at the 24-h time point after serum withdrawal and were sustained at a higher level than in vector control cells or cells expressing wild-type ERBB4 still at the 72-h time point (Figure 5c and d).  Taken together, these data demonstrate that the ERBB4 mutations activate RIP-mediated ErbB4 signaling and promote the survival of NIH 3T3 cells.  Top of page Discussion ERBB4 mutations are frequent in non-small cell lung cancer,7 making ErbB4 a potential novel drug target. However, the functional effects of lung cancer-associated ERBB4 mutations are largely unknown. Moreover, the identified ERBB4 mutations harbor all functional subdomains of ErbB4 protein with no hot spot mutations, which is in contrast to lung cancer-associated EGFR mutations that typically target few sites in the kinase domain.14 Here, we have functionally analyzed nine ERBB4 mutations previously identified in a study introducing ERBB4 as a highly mutated gene among 623 putative cancer genes in a series of 188 lung adenocarcinoma samples.4  Our results indicated that four (Y285C, D595V, D931Y and K935I) out of the nine analyzed ERBB4 mutations were activating, increasing both basal and ligand-induced ErbB4 phosphorylation. The activating mutations were located both in the extracellular ligand binding/dimerization domain (Y285C and D595V) and in the intracellular kinase domain (D931Y and K935I). Interestingly, all activating ErbB4 mutations mapped structurally to interaction sites within the monomer form and between receptor monomers in ErbB4 dimers, suggesting that the enhanced activation was due to effects on receptor dimerization, both uncovering regions in the monomer necessary for dimerization and/or by stabilizing interfaces in the dimer. Indeed, the activating ErbB4 extracellular domain mutations Y285C and D595V increased ErbB4 dimerization in crosslinking experiments, as well as enhanced ErbB4 heterodimerization, as demonstrated by ErbB2 co-immunoprecipitation. Furthermore, the activating kinase domain mutations, D931Y and K935I, enhanced receptor dimerization and transactivation in ErbB4 homo- and/or heterodimers, also indicating increased interaction between receptor monomers in ErbB4 dimers.  The structural locations and functional effects of the activating ErbB4 mutations are similar to those of the recently characterized oncogenic ErbB2 and ErbB3 mutations.32, 33 Mutations in the extracellular subdomain II of ErbB2 induce covalent inter-receptor dimers,33 whereas ErbB3 extracellular subdomain II and kinase domain mutations promote the activation of co-expressed ErbB2.32 Thus, in the case of both ErbB2 and ErbB3, the mutations increase the interaction and activity of ErbB homo- or heterodimers, which is analogous to our results with ErbB4 mutations.  When overexpressed in NIH 3T3 cells, the ErbB4 mutants Y285C, D595V and K935I significantly promoted cell survival upon serum starvation, indicating that activating ERBB4 mutations are potentially oncogenic. Interestingly, in the patient samples harboring the four identified activating mutations Y285C, D595V, D931Y and K935I, the total number of mutated cancer-associated genes was significantly lower than in patients harboring non-activating ERBB4 mutations (4.25 vs 18 mutations in average, P=0.003, t-test).4 This finding is in line with our data that the four identified activating ERBB4 mutations were functionally distinct from the other analyzed ERBB4 mutations and consistent with the hypothesis that the activating ERBB4 mutations are functional in these tumors.  The activating ERBB4 mutations were not mutually exclusive with KRAS mutations, as the patient harboring ErbB4 D595V mutation also harbored a KRAS G12V mutation. This is unexpected, because ERBB4 mutations are mutually exclusive with EGFR mutations,4 suggesting that mutated ErbB4 acts in the same pathway or has similar functions as mutated EGFR. However, our results indicated that while the activating ERBB4 mutations significantly promoted the survival of NIH 3T3 cells, this effect was only moderately translated to the activation of RAS-MAPK pathway, the canonical RTK pathway used by activating EGFR mutants34, 35 as well as by mutant KRAS. In contrast, the activating ErbB4 mutants demonstrated increased cleavage of functionally active ErbB4 ICD from the cell membrane. RIP-mediated release of the ErbB4 ICD is a mode of signaling unique for ErbB4 among the ErbB receptors and ErbB4 ICD has previously been shown to mediate growth-promoting ErbB4 signaling.29, 31 Thus, it is possible that activated ErbB4 mutants, potentially through the action of ErbB4 ICD, provide parallel, synergistic signaling in mutant KRAS-driven tumors, rather than alternative means to activate the RAS-MAPK pathway. Interestingly, a recent study demonstrated that in xenograft and transgenic mouse models of non-small cell lung cancer, ligand-mediated ErbB4 signaling has an important role in tumor recurrence after chemotherapy, irrespectively of the KRAS mutation status.36 Furthermore, in metastatic melanoma, the oncogenic ERBB4 mutations typically co-occur with mutations in RAS or RAF family genes,8 further suggesting that oncogenic ErbB4 signaling is mediated via alternative pathways other than the RAS-MAPK pathway.  Taken together, this study demonstrates the presence of activating ERBB4 mutations in non-small cell lung cancer and warrants further studies assessing the potential therapeutic value of targeting mutated ErbB4 in this disease.  
877||Activating mutations in the platelet-derived growth factor (PDGF) receptor alpha (PDGFRA) have been described in patients with gastrointestinal stromal tumors or myeloid malignancies associated with hypereosinophilia. These patients respond well to imatinib mesylate, raising the question as to whether patients with a PDGF receptor mutation in other tumor types should receive a tyrosine kinase inhibitor treatment. We characterized 10 novel somatic point mutations in PDGFRA that have been reported in isolated cases of glioblastoma, melanoma, acute myeloid leukemia, peripheral nerve sheath tumors and neuroendocrine carcinoma. The PDGFRA transmembrane domain mutation V536E stimulated Ba/F3 cell growth and signaling via ERK and STAT5 in the absence of ligand. This mutant, identified in glioblastoma, was strongly inhibited by imatinib. Modeling suggested that the mutation modulates the packing of the transmembrane domain helices in the receptor dimer. By contrast, two mutations in highly conserved residues affected the receptor traffic to the cell surface or kinase activity, thereby preventing the response to PDGF. The other mutations had no significant impact on the receptor activity. This functional analysis matched the predictions of SIFT and PolyPhen for only five mutations and these algorithms do not discriminate gain from loss of function. Finally, an E996K variant that had been identified in a melanoma cell line was not expressed in these cells. Altogether, several newly identified PDGFRA mutations do not activate the receptor and may therefore represent passenger mutations. Our results also underline the importance of characterizing novel kinase alterations in cancer patients.  Keywords: PDGF receptor; tyrosine kinase inhibitors; glioblastoma; leukemia; GIST Top of page Introduction Platelet-derived growth factor (PDGF) receptors are receptor tyrosine kinases that are required for the embryo development.1 Two genes, PDGFRA and PDGFRB, encode the receptor α and β isoforms, which are highly homologous and share a common architecture. They consist of five N-terminal immunoglobulin (Ig)-like domains, which are binding to various isoforms of PDGF, a single transmembrane domain and a split protein tyrosine kinase domain. Although the exact structure of these receptors has not been solved yet, the mechanism of activation could be modeled based on mutation analysis and the partial structure of related receptors such FLT3 and KIT. In the absence of ligand, the juxtamembrane domain and the activation loop adopt a conformation that keeps the kinase domain inactive. PDGF binding induces the receptor dimerization and both inhibitory domains undergo large conformation changes and become phosphorylated on tyrosines, stabilizing the active receptor state. In PDGF receptor β (PDGFRB), the C-terminal tail was also suggested to have an inhibitory role.2 This was not investigated in PDGFRA; its C-terminus being the most divergent part compared with PDGFRB.  Activating point mutations in PDGFRA have been described ina small subset of patients with gastrointestinal stromal tumors (GIST, 5–10%).3, 4 Most mutations are located in the juxtamembrane domain or in the activation loop and are likely to disrupt the inhibited conformation of the kinase domain while stabilizingthe active one. Activated fusions genes, such as FIP1L1-PDGFRA, were described in myeloid malignancies associated with hypereosinophilia (MMAH).5, 6, 7 In most cases, the fusion disrupts the juxtamembrane domain, which is enough to activate the receptor. Alternatively, the fusion partner includes an oligomerization domain, which activates the kinase activity, such as in most PDGFRB fusions. Recently, somatic PDGFRA point mutations were also found in hypereosinophilia.8 Interestingly, some of the reported mutations were not transforming when tested in cell lines. Gain-of-function PDGFRA mutations were also reported in inflammatory fibroid polyps.9 In addition, PDGFRA is activated by overexpression in glioblastoma of the proneural subtype.10 An in-frame deletion of 81 amino acids in the Ig-like domains 4 and 5 was found to activate PDGFRA in glioblastoma patients with a receptor gene amplification.11, 12  The PDGF receptor kinase activity is effectively inhibited by imatinib mesylate (Glivec), a tyrosine kinase inhibitor developed against BCR-ABL, which turned out to be at least 10 times more active on PDGF receptors.7 This drug induces long-term remissions in myeloid malignancies associated with hypereosinophilia in the presence of a PDGF receptor fusion gene.13, 14 GISTs are also sensitive to imatinib, although resistant mutations such as D842V have been described.4 New molecules may overcome resistance. By contrast, imatinib has failed to improve survival of glioblastoma patients.15, 16  The success of imatinib in cancers carrying an activating PDGFRA variant, that is, GIST and MMAH, raises the question as to whether all cancer patients with a PDGF receptor mutation should receive a tyrosine kinase inhibitor treatment. Even though these patients are rare, next-generation sequencing technologies will allow the systematic detection of many different mutations in most cancers. These new technologies have raised great expectations for the development of a personalized treatment of each cancer.  Ten novel somatic point mutations in PDGFRA have been reported in a variety of cancers, namely isolated cases of glioblastoma, melanoma, acute myeloid leukemia (AML), peripheral nerve sheath tumors and neuroendocrine carcinoma (Table 1).10, 17, 18, 19, 20 The mutations were found in single cases, except W349C and V536E, which were reported in two patients.10, 21 In most cases, a polymorphism was carefully excluded. However, they were not functionally characterized and it is not clear whether these patients could have benefited from imatinib therapy. The mutations are located in various domains of the receptor, including regions where activating mutations have not been reported yet, such as the transmembrane domain and the C-terminal tail. The goal of the present study was to characterize them.  Table 1 - PDGFRA mutations characterized in the present study. Table 1 - PDGFRA mutations characterized in the present study - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author Full table  Top of page Results W349C prevents PDGFRA glycosylation and traffic to the cell surface Mutants were stably transfected in Ba/F3 cells, which proliferate in the absence of cytokine when they express a constitutively activated PDGF receptor.4, 22 As a positive control, we also expressed PDGFRA-D842V, a constitutively activated mutant found in GISTs.4 The mutant Ba/F3 lines were sorted to remove the fraction of cells that did not express PDGFRA. Their cell surface expression after sorting is shown in Figure 1a. W349C was not detectable at the cell surface and could not be sorted. Next, the receptor expression level was analyzed by western blot (Figure 1b). All mutants were expressed at a level similar or higher than D842V. Two receptor bands are detected by western blots in transfected Ba/F3 cell extracts and represent differentN-glycosylation levels, as described.23 The heavier form corresponds to the fully glycosylated receptor, which is matured in the Golgi and expressed at the cell surface. Unlike wild-type (WT) PDGFRA and the other mutants, W349C was detectable as a single band corresponding to immature glycosylation, indicating that this mutant is not properly trafficking to the cell surface, in agreement with the flow cytometry data (Figure 1b). Figure 1. Figure 1 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author W349C perturbs PDGFRA traffic to the cell surface. Ba/F3 cells were stably transfected with PDGFRA mutants and sorted. Receptor expression was tested by flow cytometry on intact cells (a) or by western blot (b). The average fluorescence intensity compared with thewild-type (WT) receptor (set at 100%) is shown (from a minimum of two experiments).  Full figure and legend (80K)  V536E constitutively activates the PDGF receptor We next tested the proliferation of transfected Ba/F3 cells using a sensitive tritiated thymidine incorporation test. The V536E mutation in the transmembrane domain was the only one supporting Ba/F3 proliferation in the absence of cytokine, like the D842V positive control (Figure 2a). In the presence of PDGF, the expression of WT or mutant receptors allowed Ba/F3 cell growth to a similar extent, except W349C, as expected from the lack of surface protein expression, and F808L, which did not respond to stimulation. Similar results were obtained by counting cells in liquid cultures in the absence or presence of PDGF (data not shown). All cell lines grew similarly in the presence of interleukin-3 (IL3). Figure 2. Figure 2 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author PDGFRA V536E is constitutively activated, whereas W349C and F808L do not respond to PDGF. (a) Transfected Ba/F3 cells were extensively washed and cultured in the absence of cytokine or in the presence of PDGF for 24 h. Thymidine incorporation was quantified to evaluate cell proliferation. One representative experiment out of three is shown. All cell lines proliferated similarly in the presence of interleukin-3 (data not shown). (b) MCF7 cells were transiently transfected with the indicated receptor and a luciferase construct driven by a serum-responsive element. The average of three experiments is shown with s.e.m. V536E significantly induced the luciferase activity in the absence of cytokine compared with wild type (WT; P<0.05, Student’s t-test).  Full figure and legend (73K)  Constitutive signaling by PDGFRA-V536E was confirmed using a luciferase reporter assay driven by serum response elements in MCF7 cells (Figure 2b). In line with the proliferation results, most mutants were comparable to the WT receptor and only weakly stimulated the reporter activity, except W349C and F808L, which did not produce a significant reporter signal. Similar results were obtained using a promoter driven by signal transducer and activator of transcription (STAT) in PAE cells (Supplementary Figure 1). The ability of the mutant receptors to respond to PDGF was also tested by co-transfecting a PDGF-B cDNA, which confirmed the inability of the two mutants mentioned above to respond to PDGF.  To further demonstrate that V536E is a transforming mutation, we tested its ability to mediate the formation of transformed fibroblasts foci. Low-passage NIH3T3 cells were transfected with the V536E mutant compared with activated D842V, WT and W349C receptors. In line with the Ba/F3 experiment, PDGFRA-V536E induced the formation of foci, by contrast to WT and W349C receptors (Figure 3a).  Figure 3. Figure 3 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author Cell transformation and constitutive signaling by PDGFRA V536E. (a) Low-passage NIH3T3 cells were transfected with the indicated PDGFRA receptor or empty vector. After 3 weeks, transformed fibroblasts foci were stained with crystal violet, photographed (upper panel) and scored (lower panel, average of three independant experiments performed in triplicate cultures, arbitrary units). (b) Ba/F3 cells transfected PDGFRA wild type (WT), V536E or D842V were stimulated with PDGF or IL3 for 15 min or left untreated. Cells were lysed and protein extracts were analyzed by western blot (WB) with antibodies recognizing active phosphorylated STAT5, AKT or ERK. Antibodies against total STAT5, AKT and ERK2 were used as controls. (c) HEK293T cells transiently transfected with the indicated receptor were lysed and analyzed by western blot with anti-phospho-tyrosine or with anti-PDGFRA antibodies (left panels). Alternatively, PDGFRA was immunoprecipitated (IP) from lysates before WB (right panels).  Full figure and legend (90K)  We further studied the V536E mutant signaling in Ba/F3 cells by analyzing STAT5, extracellular signal regulated kinase (ERK)-1/2 and AKT phosphorylation by western blot. The expression of V536E or D842V induced the phosphorylation of ERK and STAT5 but not AKT (Figure 3b). By contrast, cell stimulation with PDGF induced the phosphorylation of ERK and AKT but not STAT5, suggesting that signal transduction by V536E differed from the WT receptor. The phosphorylation of the receptor itself was then analyzed in transfected HEK293T cells (Figure 3c). V536E phosphorylation on tyrosines was increased compared with the WT receptor, confirming that this mutation constitutively activates the receptor.  PDGFRA-D842V is resistant to imatinib, whereas juxtamembrane mutants are highly sensitive to this drug. We have also shown previously that a transmembrane deletion shifts the sensitivity of the ETV6-PDGFRB fusion to imatinib.22 The ability of imatinib to block proliferation and signaling induced by V536E was analyzed in Ba/F3 and MCF7 cells. Figure 4 shows that imatinib completely inhibited Ba/F3-V536E cell growth with an IC50 similar to the one reported for FIP1L1-PDGFRA and much lower than the concentration required to block BCR-ABL.7 The activation of serum-responsive elements by V536E in luciferase assays was also dampened by imatinib. These experiments demonstrate that V536E is highly sensitive to imatinib.  Figure 4. Figure 4 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author V536E is sensitive to inhibition by imatinib. (a) Ba/F3 cells expressing the indicated receptor were treated with imatinib for 24 h. Thymidine incorporation was quantified to evaluate cell proliferation. (b) MCF7 cells were transiently transfected with the indicated receptor, a luciferase reporter construct controlled by serum-responsive elements and a control β-galactosidase reporter. Cells were treated with imatinib for 24 h. The luciferase activity was measured and divided by the β-galactosidase activity.  Full figure and legend (57K)  Impact of V536E on PDGFRA dimerization and structure of the transmembrane domain Mutations similar to V536E in the transmembrane helix of other receptors were suggested to promote dimerization.24 Therefore, we tested the impact of the V536E mutation on PDGFRA dimerization. Receptor dimers were chemically crosslinked before cell lysis and western blot analysis (Figure 5a). This experiment suggested that a small fraction of the receptor could be crosslinked in the absence of ligand. Treatment with PDGF then increased the dimer formation, as expected from published results.25 Importantly, no major difference was observed between WT and mutant receptors. Figure 5. Figure 5 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author V536E mutation does not affect receptor dimerization but modulates packing of transmembrane domains. (a) Ba/F3 cells expressing the indicated receptor were incubated with PDGF-BB for 1 h on ice. Cells were washed and treated with bis(sulfosuccinimidyl)-suberate (BS3) to crosslink membrane protein complexes. PDGF receptors were isolated from cell protein extracts using wheat germ agglutinin-coupled beads. Western blot was performed with anti-PDGFRA antibodies. (b) Top-scoring predicted conformation of the mutant PDGFRA transmembrane dimer (magenta) superimposed with left-handed nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR) conformation (green) of PDGFRB dimer. Crossing angles of dimer conformations and backbone root-mean-square deviations (RMSDs) between them are given. Peptides are shown in cartoon-and-stick representation. (c) Normalized packing score (FCSCOR) of the wild type (WT) and the mutant PDGFRA transmembrane dimers plotted as functions of the dimer crossing angle (χ). For each dimer, three top-scoring conformations (numbered ‘1’, ‘2’ and ‘3’) are shown. See Supplementary Figure 2 for conformation details. Left- and right-handed dimer conformations are shown in cartoon-and-stick representation.  Full figure and legend (174K)  To understand better the structural origin of the receptor constitutive activation induced by the V536E mutation, we performed molecular modeling of possible conformations of PDGFRA transmembrane helix dimer using PREDDIMER approach.26 Transmembrane helices of PDGFRA were predicted to form several distinctive top-scoring dimer conformations similar to those of PDGFRB (Figure 5b and Supplementary Figure 2). We found that the substitution of respective valine for glutamic acid is likely to change the packing efficiency of the predicted dimer conformations and may induce a repopulation of the dimer conformational ensemble. Taking into account an observed gap between packing efficiencies of the transmembrane dimer conformations (calculated according to the scoring function) in mutant V536E receptor, the left-handed conformation is likely to be predominant, whereas the right-handed one is predicted to be less populated (Figure 5c). In contrast, we observed the reverse situation for WT receptor. In addition, the packing efficiency of both WT conformations are relatively more similar to each other. Finally, the mutation has no effect on the packing efficiency ofthe parallel transmembrane dimer conformation (Figure 5c). Previously, nuclear magnetic resonance-derived left-handed conformation of PDGFRB transmembrane dimer (Figure 5b) was proposed to correspond to activated state of the receptor.27 Taking together this assumption with results of our modeling, we speculate that the V536E mutation might favor PDGFRA transmembrane dimer in the activated state and obstruct the conformational transition of the receptor to the inactive one. Similar situation has been recently observed by modeling for ErbB2-Neu* V664Q transmembrane mutant,26 where the analogues mutation increased the dimer packing efficiency relative to the WT and favored the left-handed over theright-handed dimer conformations.  The F808L mutant is devoid of kinase activity Proliferation and luciferase assays suggested that the F808L mutant was unable to respond to PDGF stimulation, even though it was expressed at the cell surface. To test the kinase activity of this mutant, we first overexpressed it in HEK293T cells. Figure 6 shows that F808L was not significantly phosphorylated on tyrosines by contrast to WT and D842V receptors. Then, we performed an in vitro kinase assay after receptor immunoprecipitation. The phosphorylation of the WT and D842V receptors was enhanced in the presence of ATP, but F808L remains unphosphorylated, indicating it is a kinase-dead mutant (Figure 6). Figure 6. Figure 6 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author F808L is a kinase dead mutant. (a) HEK293T cells were transiently transfected with the indicated receptor. Four hours before lysis, cells were treated with imatinib 0.5 μm. PDGFRA was immunoprecipitated (IP) from lysates and analyzed by westernblot (WB) with anti-phospho-tyrosine or anti-PDGFRA antibodies.(b) Alternatively, immunoprecipitates were incubated with ATP (50 μm) in kinase buffer for 10 min. Receptor phosphorylation was analyzed by WB and quantified using the Odyssey technology. The ratio between the receptor phosphorylation and the total receptor expression was calculated. It is normalized to the wild-type (WT) levels (average of three experiments).  Full figure and legend (49K)  The E996K mutant is not expressed in the cell line in which it was identified The E996K mutant was identified in the LB373-MEL cell line, derived from a melanoma metastasis.19 The mutation was absent in immortalized lymphocytes from the same patient confirming that it was an acquired cancer variant. We confirmed the presence of a heterozygous somatic mutation in the genomic DNA of LB373-MEL (data not shown), but we were unable to detect the PDGFRA protein or transcript, compared with positive controls (Figure 7). In conclusion, the E996K mutation, which did not confer any growth advantage in our assays, was not expressed inLB373-MEL cells. Figure 7. Figure 7 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author E996K is not expressed in the cell line in which it was identified. (a) LB373-MEL cells were stained with anti-PDGFRA antibodies and phycoerythrin-linked anti-mouse-IgG. Cells were analyzed by flow cytometry. 32D cells transfected with PDGFRA were used as a positive control. (b) RNA was extracted from LB373-MEL cells and analyzed by reverse transcription–PCR using primers specific for PDGFRA or RPLP0 (as a control). HepG2 cells, which do not express PDGFRA, and AG01518 human fibroblasts were used as negative and positive controls, respectively.  Full figure and legend (52K)  Top of page Discussion Among 10 uncharacterized mutations, V536E was the onlygain-of-function variant that we identified. To our knowledge, this is the first cancer mutation described in the PDGF receptors transmembrane domain. A similar V664E mutation in ErbB2/Neu was shown to induce the receptor constitutive tyrosine kinase activity.24 Activating point mutations in the transmembrane segment have also been found in other receptor tyrosine kinases, such as c-KIT and FGFR3.3 The insertion of two correctly positioned glutamic residues in a simplified valine-based transmembrane domain is enough to activate PDGFRB and ErbB2/Neu.28 In addition, the importance of the transmembrane domain for PDGFRB activation was underlined by studies showing that this domain is essential for transformation by the ETV6-PDGFRB fusion and by the bovine papillomavirus E5 protein.22 It was recently shown that the PDGFRB transmembrane domain is able to form a stable left-handed helical dimer in artificial membranes.27 In this structure, V543, which is homologous to PDGFRA V536, is located at the edge of the interface (Figure 5a). The PDGFRA-V539E mutant is likely to populate this dimeric conformation by increasing the packing efficiency of the transmembrane helix dimer, as suggested by modeling. A similar situation was predicted for the rat ErbB2-Neu* V664Q transmembrane mutant.26 Recently, active and inactive dimer conformations of the EGF receptor transmembrane domain have been reported, supporting the hypothesis that the conformation of this domain has a critical role in receptor tyrosine kinase activation.29, 30 Our model also predicts that the orientation and the angle between the two helices in the left-handed dimer is affected by the V536E mutation, which may optimally positions the two kinase domains facing each other in the receptor dimer. In conclusion, we suggest that the V536E substitution affects the conformation of the transmembrane domain dimer rather than dimerization itself. Further experiments are required to decipher the exact mechanism of constitutive PDGF receptor activation by this mutation.  Based on initial reports, PDGFRA mutation screenings in GIST usually focus on exons 12 and 18, which encode the juxtamembrane domain and the activation loop.4 We suggest that sequencing exon 11, encoding the transmembrane domain, may reveal additional clinically relevant PDGFRA mutations in GIST.  Two mutants, F808L and W349C, did not show any sign of activation and did not respond to PDGF stimulation for different reasons. Interestingly, these two residues were perfectlyconserved in vertebrate PDGFRA as well as in the related human receptors PDGFRB, c-KIT, FLT3, CSF1R and VEGFRs (Supplementary Table I). In the c-KIT structure, W349 mediates key interactions with distant amino acids.31 This mutation may therefore interfere with PDGFRA folding. The W349C protein appeared as a single immature band and failed to traffic to the plasma membrane. Although a cysteine at position 349 may induce the formation of a new aberrant cysteine bridge, we failed to detect covalent W349C dimeric complex. W349 is also located close to two predictedN-glycosylation sites (N353LT and N359LT). The mutation may thus block the glycosylation of these sites or prevent the traffic to the Golgi where the receptor undergoes its final glycosylation steps. In agreement with its absence at the cell surface, W349C did not respond to the addition of exogenous PDGF. In addition,co-transfection of a PDGF-B cDNA did not activate the mutant receptor either. This may result from the disruption of the Ig-like domain 4, which is essential for PDGFRA signal transduction.32 The second defective mutation, F808L, is located nearby the activation loop and disrupted the kinase activity. A similar kinase dead mutation has been described in the receptor tyrosine kinase ALK in neuroblastoma.33 Even if F808L was supporting leukemia development by an unknown mechanism independent of the receptor kinase activity, leukemia patients carrying this mutation are unlikely to benefit from imatinib therapy. Altogether, these two variants likely represent passenger mutations. Nevertheless, we cannot rule out the possibility that they provide an advantage to tumor cells in a particular molecular environment.  Seven mutations produced no particular phenotype and may also be classified as passenger mutations. These residues are conserved in mammalian PDGFRA except V469, which is replaced by an isoleucine in some species (Supplementary Table I). Interestingly, this valine is substituted by an alanine in Tetraodon nigroviridis, mimicking the V469A mutation found in a malignant peripheral nerve sheath tumor. These seven amino acids are poorly conserved in receptors related to PDGFRA. Remarkably, N870 is replaced by a serine in PDGFRB, supporting our conclusion that N870S does not affect PDGF receptors significantly. The original report did not formally exclude that this allele corresponds to a rare polymorphism rather than a somatic mutation.18 In the case of E996K, we had access to the original cell line in which this somatic mutation had been identified,19 but which did not express any detectable PDGFRA protein or transcript. This observation supports the hypothesis that E996K is a passenger mutation, although we cannot rule out the possibility that the receptor was expressed in the original tumor cells and was lost during the adaptation to cell culture.  Three mutations are located in the C-terminal tail, which is unique to PDGFRA, except the last five amino acids, which are also present in PDGFRB.34 This C-terminal motif, which is lost in the S1049CH* frame shift mutant,20 was suggested to recruit PTEN via NHERF adaptor proteins, thereby limiting the activation of the PI3K pathway.35 However, we did not observe any significant increase in PKB phosphorylation downstream this mutant (data not shown). The role of the C-terminal domain of PDGFRA remains to be established.  The occurrence of passenger mutations in cancer genome was highlighted by high throughput sequencing projects.19, 36 Mutation recurrence in multiple patients has been widely used as a criterion to select driver cancer mutations. In this respect, after the initial submission of the present manuscript, the V536E mutation was described in a second glioblastoma patient.21 However, W349C was also reported in two patients.10 The recurrence criterion is also too restrictive because unique cancer variants may be clinically relevant. For instance, several patients with non-recurrent PDGFR fusions genes were successfully treated with imatinib.3 To predict the impact of single-nucleotide variant on protein function, several algorithms based on sequence homologies and structural data have been developed, such as SIFT and PolyPhen.37 For five out of eight mutations present in the database, PolyPhen matched our results (Supplementary Table I). In this set of mutations, the conservation with receptors related to PDGFRA (FLT3, KIT, CSF1R and VEGFRs) was best correlated with the observed functional impact. These tests do not predict whether a given variant leads to a gain of function or a loss of function, a piece of information that is essential in oncology. Therefore, a thorough experimental analysis of cancer mutations remains essential.  After the initial submission of this paper, three novel PDGFRA mutations—among many others—were reported in diffuse large B-cell lymphoma.38 Based on the criteria mentioned above, they may also represent passenger mutations (Supplementary Table I).  Our results confirm the occurrence of activating mutations in glioblastoma, in which two activated PDGFRA variants have been previously described.11, 12 Whether these patients could be more sensitive to kinase inhibitors remains to be studied. By contrast, our observations do not support the existence of driver PDGFRA point mutations in acute myeloid leukemia or malignant peripheral nerve sheath tumors. In the latter tumors, other alterations, namely PDGFRA gene amplification or autocrine loops, may activate WT and mutant receptors.17 Such alterations have also been described in glioblastomas.10 The presence of both activating and passenger alterations in glioblastoma, which was also recently reported in idiopathic hypereosinophilia, may reflect a particularly high PDGFRA mutation rate in these cancers. In line with this hypothesis, the proneural subtype of glioblastoma, in which PDGFRA is expressed, is associated with a higher frequency of the hypermutator phenotype.10  Altogether, we identified a number of key residues for PDGFRA function and characterized a novel type of imatinib-sensitive PDGFRA-activating mutation in the transmembrane segment. Our work underlines the importance of characterizing PDGF receptor mutations in a systematic manner. This is a major issue in the development of personalized targeted therapies.  Top of page Materials and methods Reagents and plasmids The human PDGFRA cDNA was subcloned in pEF-MYC-CYTO (Invitrogen/Life Technologies, Gent, Belgium), which allowed a high expression level in Ba/F3, compensating the fast turn-over of the receptor in these cells.39 A Flag tag was inserted after the signal peptide. Mutations were introduced by Quickchange (Stratagene/Agilent technologies, Diegem, Belgium) and confirmed by sequencing (Macrogen, Seoul, Korea). Western blots were performed as described34 with anti-PDGFRA (1:200, Santa Cruz, Santa Cruz, CA, USA, #951), PY99 (1:200, Santa Cruz), anti-phospho-Y694-STAT5 (1:1000, Signalway Antibodies, College Park, MD, USA), anti-STAT5, anti-phospho-AKT, anti-AKT, anti-phospho-ERK-1/2 (1:1000, Cell Signaling Technologies, Danvers, MA, USA) and anti-ERK2 (1:1000, EET rabbit antiserum34). Imatinib mesylate was purchased from LC Laboratories (Woburn, MA, USA). Cell culture and transfections HEK293T cells were cultured in Dulbecco’s modified Eagle’s medium with fetal calf serum (10%) and antibiotics (Invitrogen). Cells were transfected using the calcium phosphate method as described.39 Ba/F3 cells were cultured in the same medium supplemented with IL3 (200 U/ml). Cells were electroporated as described elsewhere40 and selected in the presence of G418 (3 mg/ml). Transfected cell populations were sorted by flow cytometry after staining with a monoclonal anti-PDGFRA antibody (R&D systems, Minneapolis, MN, USA, MAB1264) and anti-mouse immunoglobulin labeled with phycoerythrin (Jackson Laboratories, Bar Harbor, ME, USA). A few days later, homogeneous PDGFRA expression was confirmed using the same antibodies by flow cytometry. For proliferation assays, cells were washed three times to remove IL3 and seeded in 96-well plates (104 cells/well in 200 μl of medium with 10% serum) without cytokine, with PDGF-BB (20 ng/ml, Peprotec, London, UK) or IL3 (200 U/ml). After 20 h, [3H]-thymidine (0.5 μCi, GE Healthcare, Diegem, Belgium) was added to each well for 4 h. Cells were harvested and the radioactivity incorporated into DNA was counted using a TopCount instrument (Perkin Elmer, Waltham, MA, USA). LB373-MEL cells were kindly provided by Francis Brasseur (Ludwig Institute for Cancer Research, Brussels, Belgium) and were cultured in Iscove-Dulbecco medium with fetal calf serum (10%) and essential amino acids. Cells were analyzed by flow cytometry as described above. mRNA was extracted using a Qiagen kit and PDGFRA expression was measured by quantitative reverse transcription–PCR as described41 using AG01518 human fibroblasts and HEPG2 hepatocarcinoma cells as positive and negative controls, respectively.42 The expression of the house keeping gene RPLP0 was used as control. The sequence of the 996 codon was confirmed by sequencing of multiple clones obtained after PCR amplification of genomic DNA using the oligonucleotides 5′-CGTGTGGACTCAGACAATGCA-3′ and 5′-GGCAGAGGAATGATGTAGCCA-3′ in PDGFRA exon 22.  Transformation assay Low-passage NIH3T3 cells (American Type Culture Collection, Manassas, VA, USA) were transfected as described.33, 43 Briefly, 4.5 × 104 cells were seeded the day before into collagen-coated 12-well plates and transfected for 6 h with 0.5 μg of DNA (pEF-MYC-CYTO vector containing PDGFRA WT, D842V, V536E or W349C) and 1.4 μl of Lipofectamine 2000 in 0.3 ml of Opti-MEM (both from Invitrogen). Twenty-four hours after transfection, three-fifth of the cells from each well were transferred to wells in collagen-coated six-well plates and kept in Dulbecco’s modified Eagle’s medium (10% fetal calf serum and 0.5 mg/ml G418) until the cells reached confluence. Thereafter, cells were kept in Dulbecco’s modified Eagle’s medium(5% fetal calf serum and 0.25 mg/ml G418) for approximately 10 days. Three weeks after transfection, the cells were fixed using methanol and plates were stained with crystal violet. Western blot, immunoprecipitation and crosslinking These experiments were performed essentially as described.22, 44 Briefly, Ba/F3 cells expressing PDGFRA were washed and incubated in the absence of IL3 for 4 h. In signaling studies, cells were restimulated for 15 min with PDGF-BB (25 ng/ml) or IL3 (200 U/ml) at 37 °C, washed and lysed inSDS–polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis sample buffer. For crosslinking studies, 2 × 106 cells were stimulated with PDGF-BB (100 ng/ml) for 1 h on ice to prevent endocytosis. Cells were washed with phosphate-buffered saline and treated with bis(sulfosuccinimidyl)-suberate (Pierce/Thermoscientific, Rockford, IL, USA, 1 mm) for 1 h on ice in 200 μl phosphate-buffered saline. Glycine (3.5 mm, final concentration) was then added to stop the reaction before protein extraction in lysis buffer. PDGF receptors were isolated with wheat germ agglutinin-coupled agarose beads (Sigma-Aldrich, St Louis, MO, USA). Beads were extensively washed and proteins were eluted with sample buffer for western blot analysis with anti-PDGFRA antibodies. Luciferase assays MCF7 and PAE cells were plated in six-well plates, respectively, at 300 000 and 150 000 cells/ well. After one day, cells were transfected with a luciferase construct controlled by serum response elements (0.5 μg)or STAT-response elements (GRR5, 0.5 μg),44 pDRIVEchEF1-RU5(β-galactosidase reporter, Invitrogen, 0.5 μg), pEF-MYC-CYTO-PDGFRA (0.25 μg) and PDGF-B (0.25 μg)2 in the presence of Fugene HD (for MCF7, Promega) or Lipofectamine 2000 (for PAE, Invitrogen). After 24 h, cells were lysed and luciferase activity was measured recommended by the manufacturer (Promega). β-Galactosidase levels were used to normalize the results as described.42 Modeling methods Spatial structures of the dimers formed by transmembrane helical fragments of the WT PDGFRA and its V536E mutant were built using PREDDIMER algorithm starting from their sequences (see Figure 5b) as described elsewhere.26 For calculations of backbone root-mean-square deviations between the predicted models and PDGFRB transmembrane dimer, its nuclear magnetic resonance structure was used (2L6W27). Packing efficiencies of the predicted dimers were estimated according to values of PREDDIMER scoring function (FSCOR). Normalized values of FCSCOR for a combined set of three top ranked of PDGFRA-WT and PDGFRA-V536E dimer conformations were calculated as: FCSCOR=(FSCOR −left fenceFSCORright fence)/std.FSCOR, where left fenceFSCORright fence and std.FSCOR are the mean and standard deviation within the set.  
883||The FIP1L1-PDGFRA fusion is seen in a fraction of cases with a presumptive diagnosis of hypereosinophilic syndrome (HES). However, because most HES patients lack FIP1L1-PDGFRA, we studied whether they harbor activating mutations of the PDGFRA gene. Sequencing of 87 FIP1L1-PDGFRA–negative HES patients revealed several novel PDGFRA point mutations (R481G, L507P, I562M, H570R, H650Q, N659S, L705P, R748G, and Y849S). When cloned into 32D cells, N659S and Y849S and—on selection for high expressors—also H650Q and R748G mutants induced growth factor–independent proliferation, clonogenic growth, and constitutive phosphorylation of PDGFRA and Stat5. Imatinib antagonized Stat5 phosphorylation. Mutations involving positions 659 and 849 had been shown previously to possess transforming potential in gastrointestinal stromal tumors. Because H650Q and R748G mutants possessed only weak transforming activity, we injected 32D cells harboring these mutants or FIP1L1-PDGFRA into mice and found that they induced a leukemia-like disease. Oral imatinib treatment significantly decreased leukemic growth in vivo and prolonged survival. In conclusion, our data provide evidence that imatinib-sensitive PDGFRA point mutations play an important role in the pathogenesis of HES and we propose that more research should be performed to further define the frequency and treatment response of PDGFRA mutations in FIP1L1-PDGFRA–negative HES patients.  Introduction  The WHO classification of myeloproliferative neoplasms (MPNs) comprises a variety of diseases, including BCR-ABL1–positive chronic myelogenous leukemia, chronic neutrophilic leukemia, polycythemia vera, primary myelofibrosis, essential thrombocythemia, and systemic mastocytosis (SM).1 Patients with nonreactive eosinophilia are included in this group and should be termed “chronic eosinophilic leukemia” (CEL) if a clonal aberration is present, or “idiopathic hypereosinophilic syndrome” (HES) if no clonal aberration is detected. In addition, patients with eosinophilia and recurrent genetic abnormalities involving the PDGFRA, PDGFRB, or FGFR1 genes have been classified in a separate subgroup termed “Myeloid and lymphoid neoplasms associated with eosinophilia and abnormalities of PDGFRA, PDGFRB, or FGFR1.”1  However, such genetic lesions are detected only in a minority of patients with nonreactive eosinophilia, with the FIP1L1-PDGFRA fusion gene accounting for 5%-15% of cases and other translocation products involving PDGFRA, PDGFRB, FGFR1, or JAK2 being even less common.2 Another 15%-20% have been shown to belong to the so-called lymphocytic variant group, which is characterized by atypical clonal T lymphocytes secreting eosinophilopoietic cytokines.3 Nonetheless, 65%-80% of these patients remain without known underlying genetic aberration.2  Given that gastrointestinal stromal tumors (GISTs) are also negative for FIP1L1-PDGFRA but display activating point mutations of the PDGFRA gene, we reasoned that FIP1L1-PDGFRA–negative HES patients may harbor similar PDGFRA point mutations. Therefore, fusion gene–negative cases were analyzed by sequencing of exons 9-19 which harbor the majority of activating PDGFRA point mutations in GIST.4 The karyotype of these cases, where known, did not reveal any rearrangement of chromosome 4q11-12, and rapid amplification of cDNA ends–polymerase chain reaction (RACE-PCR) of the PDGFRA gene in a subset of patients failed to identify any cytogenetically silent gene fusions2  Here, we report several novel activating point mutations within the coding region of PDGFRA in patients with HES. We show that 4 of these mutations induce constitutive PDGFR phosphorylation and growth factor independence. Our in vitro and in vivo experiments show that PDGFRA mutant cells remain sensitive to imatinib, suggesting that patients harboring these mutations should be treated with imatinib similarly to patients with PDGFR fusion genes.  Methods  Primary patient samples and sequencing of PDGFRA  Samples of idiopathic HES cases (n = 87 [67% men], all confirmed to be negative for FIP1L1-PDGFRA) were randomly selected from diagnostic peripheral blood (PB) samples which were referred to our hospital between 2005 and 2009, as well as healthy donors (n = 35) and patients with chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL, n = 40). Informed consent was obtained from all patients according to the Declaration of Helsinki. Hemi-nested reverse transcription (RT)–PCR for amplification of PDGFRA was performed using forward primers F1: 5′-TTCAGCCAGTTGGAAGCTGTCA, F2: 5′-CAGACGGTGAGGTGCACAG, and reverse primer R1: 5′-TGTCAAAGATGCTCTCAGGAGC, spanning exons 9-19 of the PDGFRA gene. PCR products were bidirectionally sequenced using the amplification primers. In addition, PDGFRA expression levels were assessed in all patients by quantitative RT-PCR as described.2  Cells and mice  32D cells were obtained from the ATCC and cultured in RPMI 1640 medium (Invitrogen) supplemented with 10% fetal bovine serum (FBS), antibiotics (100 IU/mL penicillin, 50 μg/mL streptomycin), and 10% WEHI-3B (Walter and Eliza Hall Institute) cell supernatant as a source of interleukin-3 (IL-3). Four- to 6-week-old C3H/HeJ mice were purchased from Janvier. Approval for the animal research was obtained from the local authorities of North-Rhine Westphalia, Germany.  Cloning of PDGFRA mutants  Human PDGFRA cDNA (a kind gift of Carl-Hendrik Heldin, Ludwig Institute for Cancer Research, Uppsala, Sweden) was cloned into pEntr.1A (Invitrogen), and the different mutations were introduced by site-directed mutagenesis using the following primer sets:  R481G: 5′-GATCCACTCCCGAGACGGAAGTACCGTGGAGGGC-3′, 5′-GCCCTCCACGGTACTTCCGTCTCGGGAGTGGATC-3′; L507P: 5′-GCTAAGAATCTCCCTGGAGCTGAGAACC-3′, 5′-GGTTCTCAGCTCCAGGGAGATTCTTAGC-3′; I562M: 5′-CGCTGGAGGGTCATGGAATCAATCAGCCC-3′, 5′-GGGCTGATTGATTCCATGACCCTCCAGCG-3′; H570R: 5′-CAATCAGCCCAGATGGACGTGAATATATTTATGTGG-3′, 5′-CCACATAAATATATTCACGTCCATCTGGGCTGATTG-3′; H650Q: 5′-CTGAAGATAATGACTCAACTGGGGCCACATTTGAAC-3′, 5′-GTTCAAATGTGGCCCCAGTTGAGTCATTATCTTCAG-3′; N659S: 5′-CATTTGAACATTGTAAGCTTGCTGGGAGCCTG-3′, 5′-CAGGCTCCCAGCAAGCTTACAATGTTCAAATG-3′; L705P: 5′-GAGAAGCCAAAGAAAGAGCCGGATATCTTTGGATTGAACC-3′, 5′-GGTTCAATCCAAAGATATCCGGCTCTTTCTTTGGCTTCTC-3′; R748G: 5′-CAGTATGTCCCCATGCTAGAAGGCAAAGAGGTTTCTAAATATTC-3′, 5′-GAATATTTAGAAACCTCTTTGCCTTCTAGCATGGGGACATACTG-3′; Y849S: 5′-GCATGATTCGAACTCTGTGTCGAAAGGCAG-3′, 5′-CTGCCTTTCGACACAGAGTTCGAATCATGC-3′.  Constructs were sequenced and shuttled into the pMY-IG vector (a kind gift of Dr Toshio Kitamura, University of Tokyo, Tokyo, Japan).5 The pMY-IG is a retroviral vector harboring a “gateway” cassette for insertion of the respective gene which is followed by an internal ribosomal entry site and an enhanced green fluorescence protein (EGFP) sequence for flow cytometric selection of transduced cells.  Retroviral transduction of 32D cells  For generation of retroviral supernatants, Plat-E–packaging cells were transfected with pMY constructs (empty vector, wild-type [wt] PDGFRA, and different PDGFRA mutations) and supernatants were collected every 12 hours. Stable cell lines (32D empty vector, 32D PDGFRA wt, and other analyzed cell lines) were generated by 3 rounds of retroviral transduction of 32D cells, followed by selection of EGFP-positive or highly EGFP-positive cells by fluorescence-activated cell sorting (FACS; top 10% quantile; except for FIP1L1-PDGFRA and N659S and Y849S mutants, where this was not necessary).  Growth curves and proliferation assays  For growth analysis, 1 × 106 cells per well were plated without IL-3 into a 6-well dish containing 5 mL of medium and counted daily. Wells were adjusted to 5 mL and split daily to maintain cells in a logarithmic growth phase. Total cell numbers were calculated by cell counting after trypan blue staining, and cell growth was calculated by taking into account the dilution factors of the previous days. Cells were cultured in triplicates. For proliferation assays, 2 × 104 cells per well were seeded in triplicates without IL-3 in a 96-well dish. Cells were incubated with different concentrations of imatinib for 72 hours. At the end of the culture period, an MTS assay using 3-(4,5-dimethylthiazol-2-yl)-5-(3-carboxymethoxyphenyl)-2-(4-sulfophenyl)-2H-tetrazolium, inner salt (MTS) was performed. Twenty microliters of MTS/phenazine methosulfate (PMS) solution (Promega) was added and optical density at OD490 was measured after 2 hours of incubation.  CFU assay  Colony-forming unit (CFU) assays were performed in Methocult M3231 methylcellulose (StemCell Technologies), containing no supplemented cytokines to assay for growth factor–independent clones. Cells were IL-3–deprived and seeded in triplicates into 35-mm–diameter dishes containing 200 cells in 1 mL of methylcellulose each. Numbers of CFU were determined 6 days after plating.  Western blotting  Stable 32D PDGFRA cell lines were starved from IL-3 and serum for 12 hours in 0.5% fetal calf serum (FCS). Subsequently, cells were washed once with ice-cold phosphate-buffered saline (PBS) and lysed with buffer containing 150mM sodium chloride, 1% Nonidet P-40 (NP-40), 50mM Tris pH 8.0, 0.5% sodium deoxycholate, 0.1% sodium dodecyl sulfate (SDS), and protease/phosphatase inhibitors (Na3VO4, Sigma-Aldrich; complete EDTA-free, Roche). Cell lysates were spun at 20 000g for 15 minutes. Lysates were resuspended in SDS sample buffer, boiled, and separated by SDS–polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis (PAGE). Proteins were blotted onto Immobilon P membranes (Millipore) and stained with the indicated antibody (pSTAT5, 05-495, Upstate/Millipore; STAT5, sc835, Santa Cruz Biotechnology; pAKT, 4058S; AKT, 9272; pAKT, 3164; PDGFRA, 3164, pPDGFRA, 2992, Cell Signaling; β-actin, Sigma-Aldrich). Detection was done with a secondary antibody, labeled with horseradish peroxidase (HRP)–coupled secondary antibodies and chemiluminescence reagent (ECL-Plus; GE Healthcare) were used for detection of the bands.  Flow cytometric analysis  32D cells and cells from the PB, bone marrow (BM), or spleen from the transplanted mice were isolated as described previously.6 Lysis of enucleated red blood cells was achieved by applying AKC buffer. After washing, cells were analyzed using a FACSCalibur machine (BD Biosciences) for EGFP.  32D cell transplantation and imatinib treatment  Retrovirally transduced 32D cells were resuspended in PBS (1.2 × 106/ 200μL) and 1.2 × 106 cells were injected into the tail veins of 6- to 8-week-old syngeneic C3H/HeJ mice. Mice were analyzed at certain indicated time points or when moribund. PB was collected from the retro-orbital plexus. Imatinib treatment of injected mice started 5 days after injection. Administration was performed 2 times daily by oral gavage of 100 μL of imatinib solution (62.5 mg of imatinib per kilogram body weight solved in water; LC Labs).  Statistical analysis  Statistical analyses were performed using the nonparametric Mann-Whitney U test and presented as mean ± SD (P < .05) was considered statistically significant. Statistical analysis of survival was performed using the log-rank test.  Results  PDGFRA expression and gene mutations in HES patients  Sequencing of the PDGFRA gene in 87 HES patients, in whom the absence of FIP1L1-PDGFRA was confirmed, revealed the presence of known single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs; Table 1) as well as 9 novel PDGFRA gene point mutations in 7 patients. Of the latter patients, 4 patients had only 1 mutation (R481G, N659S, L705P, Y849S), while 3 patients had 2 mutations (I562M and H570R, H650Q and R748G, as well as Y849S and L507P; Table 2). None of these novel mutations has been described as a SNP. No point mutation was found in a separate set of 35 healthy controls. In addition, because 1 of the HES patients had a history of CLL, we sequenced PDGFRA in 40 patients with CLL without eosinophilia but found no PDGFRA mutations in CLL patients (data not shown). Because we had previously shown that a fraction of patients with HES show PDGFRA overexpression, we analyzed all patients for PDGFRA expression by quantitative RT-PCR. As depicted in Tables 1 and 2, 36 of 87 (42.5%) of patients showed PDGFRA overexpression, including the patients harboring the R481G, I562M and H570R, H650Q and R748G, or L705P mutations.  View inlineView popup Table 1 Results from PDGFRA gene sequencing View inlineView popup Table 2 Patients with PDGFRA point mutations PDGFRA mutations transform myeloid cells  To screen which of the PDGFRA point mutants possess transforming activity, we retrovirally expressed each mutant in factor-dependent murine myeloid 32D cells and analyzed the resulting cell lines for factor-independent cell growth. While all of the mutant cell lines grew in the presence of WEHI as a source of IL-3, 4 mutant cell lines (H650Q, N659S, R748G, and Y849S) survived in the absence of IL-3. The N659S and Y849S mutants immediately showed exponential growth in liquid culture and clonogenic assays. In addition, the H650Q and R748G PDGFRA mutant cell lines also showed exponential growth and increased colony formation in the absence of IL-3 when they were sorted for high EGFP expression (top 10%; Figure 1A-B). These effects were similar to those seen with 32D cells transduced with FIP1L1-PDGFRA, Flt3-ITD, or BCR-ABL1 (Figure 1A). No relevant cell or colony growth was detected for R481G, L507P, I562M, H570R, L705P mutants or 32D cells transduced with wt PDGFRA, wt JAK2, or the empty vector (Figure 1B), regardless of whether they were sorted for high EGFP expression or not. PDGFRA transcripts were readily detected in all of the transduced cells (not shown), and all of the cells expressed EGFP and PDGFRA, as assessed by Western blotting (Figure 1C) and flow cytometry (data not shown). Because H650Q and R748G were present in the same patient (Table 2), we investigated whether both mutations occurred on the same allele. To do this, cloning of the PCR products from this patient was performed and revealed that the resulting 40 Escherichia coli clones which were analyzed contained either the H650Q or the R748G mutation. These results suggest that the H650Q and R748G mutations occurred on separate alleles. The SNP P567P was present in all PCR clones and was thus not informative (homozygous SNP).  Figure 1 Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 1 Expression of specific PDGFRA mutations in 32D cells overcomes IL-3 dependence. 32D cells were retrovirally transduced with PDGFRA vectors containing mutations as specified in the results section or empty vector, FIP1L1-PDGFRA, JAK2wt, JAK2V617F, BCR-ABL1 or FLT3-ITD. (A) Growth capacity of all mutant PDGFRA cell lines without IL-3. PDGFRA H650Q, N659S, R748G, and Y849S induce IL-3–independent growth in 32D cells. Cells expressing the indicated mutations were seeded without IL-3 and counted daily for 5 days. The graph depicts mean viable cell numbers taken from a representative experiment performed in triplicates. The results were confirmed in 3 independent experiments. (B) Clonogenic growth in semisolid medium. The 32D cells expressing the indicated mutations were plated in triplicates in methyl cellulose media without IL-3 at a concentration of 200 cells per dish. Colonies were counted on day 6. These results were confirmed in 3 independent experiments. (C) Western blot experiments of 32D cell lines. Total cell lysates of IL-3– and 0.5% FCS-deprived (12-hour starvation) 32D cells were conducted. Blots were stained with the indicated phosphorylation-specific or total antibodies. PDGFRA and pPDGFRA antibodies recognize 2 bands, the mature form of the receptor with a size of approximately 180 kDa and an incompletely glycosylated precursor at about 160 kDa.37 Stat5 and Stat5 phosphorylation were detected on a second membrane using same lysates and same amounts of protein. PDGFRA mutants are constitutively active and are sensitive to imatinib  We first sought to investigate whether the mutants were able to induce Stat5 activation. Indeed, after IL-3 deprivation, we found that the 4 transforming mutants, H650Q, N659S, R748G, Y849S as well as FIP1L1-PDGFRA but none of the other mutants or wt PDGFRA-transduced cells showed constitutive phosphorylation of Stat5 (Figure 1C).  To investigate whether the mutant receptors retained responsiveness to ligand, we stimulated IL-3–starved 32D PDGFRA mutant cells with PDGF-AA. We found that none of the cells showed an additional increase of Stat5 phosphorylation on PDGF-AA stimulation (Figure 2A). However, Akt phosphorylation was strongly increased in both PDGFRA wt cells and the H650Q, N659S, R748G, and Y849S mutant cells but not FIP1L1-PDGFRA mutants (Figure 2A), demonstrating that the PDGFRA point mutations do not alter sensitivity to PDGF ligand.  Figure 2 Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 2 32D cells expressing mutated PDGFRA retain ligand dependent phosphorylation of AKT and imatinib sensitivity in vitro. (A) Activation of different signaling pathways by PDGF-AA. Cell mutants were starved overnight in medium containing 0.5% FCS and stimulated with 10 ng/mL PDGF-AA for 10 minutes. Total cell lysates were prepared, and the Western blot membranes were stained with the indicated phosphorylation-specific antibodies. (B) MTS assay in presence of imatinib and calculated IC50 values. The same 32D cells were used in a Cell Titer 96 Aqueous Solution Assay to measure the influence of imatinib on proliferation after 72 hours of imatinib exposure. Each point represents the mean percentage of growth compared with the untreated cells from 3 independent experiments. Data were used to calculate IC50 values with GraphPad Prism 5. (C) Inhibition of intracellular signaling by imatinib treatment. 32D cell mutants were starved overnight in medium containing 0.5% FCS and treated with the indicated concentrations of imatinib for 2 hours. Total cell lysates were separated by SDS-PAGE. After blotting, the blots were stained with a phosphorylation-specific Stat5, total Stat5, or β-actin antibody. (D) FACS analysis of imatinib-treated mutant 32D cell lines. Cells were incubated with 0.5 or 5μM imatinib or vehicle for 72h and 7-AAD stained. Depicted percentages and gates represent remaining GFP-positive and 7-AAD negative cells. The figure shows 1 representative experiment of 2 independent experiments. Imatinib is a strong PDGFRA and PDGFRB inhibitor, but imatinib resistance has been described both for BCR-ABL1 and FIP1L1-PDGFRA mutants.4,7,8 We assessed whether the transforming mutants were sensitive to imatinib treatment in vitro. Indeed, all mutants retained sensitivity to imatinib, as detected by an MTS assay (Figure 2B). A dose-dependent curve fitting algorithm from GraphPad Prism 5.0 was used to determine IC50 values of all 32D mutants (2.0nM H650Q; 159nM N659S; 0.9nM R748G; 2.6nM Y849S; 1.8nM FIP1L1-PDGFRA; 689nM BCR-ABL1), showing that H650Q, R748G, and Y849S mutants were as sensitive to imatinib as FIP1L1-PDGFRA, whereas mutant N659S was less sensitive but still more sensitive than BCR-ABL1 (Figure 2B). As expected, JAK2V617F mutants were insensitive to imatinib. Stat5 phosphorylation was inhibited by imatinib in all sensitive cell lines (Figure 2C). Imatinib exposure induced cell death as shown by 7-AAD positivity and loss of EGFP expression (Figure 2D).  PDGFRA mutants H650Q and R748G induce leukemia-like disease in vivo similar to FIP1L1-PDFGRA  Mutants involving the 659 and 849 amino acids had previously been shown to possess transforming potential in GIST, and our own results in 32D cells harboring the N659S and Y849S mutants showed that these 2 mutants immediately induced IL-3–independent growth.4,9,10 However, IL-3–independent clonogenic growth of H650Q and R748G cell lines was only seen after sorting for highly expressing clones. We sought to investigate whether these mutant cell lines were able to grow in vivo and induce a leukemia-like disease. Intravenous injection of 32D cell lines harboring the H650Q or R748G point mutants, or FIP1L1-PDGFRA into syngeneic C3H/HeJ mice readily induced fatal leukemia-like disease within 20 to 40 days after injection (Figure 3A), while animals receiving 32D cells overexpressing wild-type PDGFRA showed no signs of disease for at least 8 months (data not shown) and showed no EGFP-positive cells on autopsy (Figure 3E). Diseased mice unequivocally showed splenomegaly (Figure 3B,D) and lymphadenopathy (Figure 3C). Intriguingly, the degree of lymphadenopathy was significantly higher in the recipients of the H650Q and R748G mutants than those receiving FIP1L1-PDGFRA–expressing cells (Figure 3C). FACS analysis demonstrated EGFP-positive donor cells in all affected organs analyzed (PB, BM, spleen, and lymph nodes; Figure 3E). In addition, histologic analysis showed infiltrates in the perivascular regions of the liver and a disturbed follicular structure of the spleen as well as displacement of normal granulocytic cells by blastlike cells in the BM (Figure 3F).  Figure 3 Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 3 PDGFRA point mutations show increased lymphadenopathy compared with the FIP1L1-PDGFRA fusion in a syngeneic transplantation model. (A) H650Q and R748G are transforming in vivo. Kaplan-Meier plot shows survival of C3H/HeJ mice injected with 1.2 × 106 cells of 32D cell lines retrovirally expressing PDGFRA wt (n = 29), H650Q (n = 4), R748G (n = 15), and FIP1L1-PDGFRA (n = 5). (B) Diseased mice show significant enlargement of the spleen. Mice were killed on day 22 after injection for analysis. The numbers below the photographs depict spleen weight. (C-D) Lymph node and spleen weight of injected mice. Moribund or dead mice were analyzed for spleen and lymph node weight, controls were analyzed at various time points (range days 22-57; PDGFRA wt n = 17; H650Q n = 14; R748G n = 14; FIP1L1-PDGFRA n = 10). Included are untreated mice and mice treated with water by oral gavage. No statistical difference was observed between the 2 control groups (untreated vs water-treated) with the exception of R748G mice, because of 3 outliers which harbored greatly enlarged lymph nodes but marginally significantly smaller spleens. Statistical significance was tested with the nonparametric Mann-Whitney U test. (E) Hematopoietic and lymphatic organs show invasion of GFP-positive 32D cells. Bone marrow (BM), spleen (Spl), lymph nodes (LN), and peripheral blood cells (PB) were analyzed by flow cytometry for the presence of GFP-positive 32D cells. Depicted gates and percent values represent GFP-positive cells. Shown is 1 mouse of each group, analyzed 22 days after injection. (F) Histologic analysis of spleen, liver, and BM on day 22 after injection was performed after HE (hematoxylin/eosin) or NACE (Naphthyl acetate (chloro-)esterase) staining and showed infiltrates in the perivascular regions of the liver (arrows), a disturbed follicular structure of the spleen and remarkable reduction of NACE-positive cells in BM. Spleen and liver slides are depicted at ×10 magnification, BM at ×100. In vivo imatinib treatment prolongs survival of mice injected with PDGFRA mutant cell lines  To investigate whether imatinib treatment can rescue mice injected with PDGFRA-mutant cells, we treated mice injected with wt PDGFRA, H650Q, R748G, or FIP1L1-PDGFRA–overexpressing cells twice daily with imatinib by oral gavage starting on day 5 postinjection. Imatinib treatment of mice injected with PDGFRA wt cells had no negative impact on survival but significantly prolonged survival in all other groups (Figure 4A). In addition, there was a significant decrease of lymphadenopathy in all treated mice (Figure 4B). Splenomegaly was significantly decreased at the time of the final analysis in the case of the H650Q and R748G single mutants, while differences in spleen weight were not significantly reduced by imatinib in mice receiving FIP1L1-PDGFRA cells (Figure 4C).  Figure 4 Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 4 Imatinib treatment of mutant 32D PDGFRA cell-injected mice prolongs survival and decreases lymphadenopathy. Mice were injected with 1.2 × 106 cells of indicated cell lines (32D PDGFRA wt [−imatinib/+imatinib n = 5/5], H650Q [n = 5/5], R748G [n = 5/5], and FIP1L1-PDGFRA [n = 4/5]) and treated with 62.5 mg of imatinib per kilogram body weight twice daily by oral gavage from day 5 after cell injection. One mouse was excluded because of late death on day 50 supposedly because of infection without comparable lymphadenopathy (PDGFRA wt). (A) Injected cells are susceptible to imatinib treatment, prolonging survival of mice. Kaplan-Meier plots show survival of injected mice (survival curves for PDGFRA wt overlap). Statistical significance was tested with the log-rank test. (B-C) Treatment with imatinib consistently decreases lymphadenopathy and spleen weight of 32D PDGFRA H650Q and R748G-injected mice as shown by lymph node and spleen weight. Moribund or dead mice were analyzed for spleen and lymph node weight; animals surviving for 57 days were killed and included. Statistical significance was tested with the Mann-Whitney U test. Autopsy of the 4 surviving imatinib-treated FIP1L1-PDFGRA mice showed splenomegaly in 3 of the mice, while 1 of the mice showed a normal spleen weight. Therefore, although splenomegaly did develop in some of these mice, the difference was not statistically significant. Discussion  Considerable progress has been achieved in our understanding of the pathogenesis of CEL/HES through the identification of tyrosine kinase fusion genes and abnormal clonal T cells that overproduce eosinophilopoietic cytokines. However, these abnormalities are only found in a maximum of 20%-35% of patients and, therefore, the molecular pathogenesis still remains unknown for the majority of patients. Here, we report on the identification of several novel point mutations within functionally relevant domains of the receptor tyrosine kinase PDGFRA in HES patients.  Several of these mutations were functionally not related to growth factor independence (R481G, L507P, I562M, H570R, L705P). In contrast, 4 mutations possessed transforming potential (H650Q, N659S, R748G, and Y849S). The N659S and Y849S mutations were identified in 1 and 2 patients with HES, respectively, and similar mutations had previously been identified in patients with GIST.4,10,11 The H650Q and R748G mutations were found in a 64-year-old female who had a 3-year history of B-CLL and was in remission after rituximab-based immunochemotherapy when eosinophilia first occurred. Eosinophil counts fluctuated between 1000/μL and 4560/μL until B-CLL relapsed approximately 2 years later, and the patient died approximately 10 months later despite chemotherapy. Transforming activity of H650Q and R748G in 32D cells was only detected on sorting for high expressor cells. Interestingly, the patient harboring these mutants showed overexpression of PDGFRA, suggesting that these 2 mutants may be weaker transforming mutants compared with the strong oncogenic mutations N659S and Y849S. A similar phenomenon was described for BCR-ABL–transduced CD34+ cells from human cord blood,12 where BCR-ABLhigh but not BCR-ABLlow expressors showed factor-independent proliferation. Nevertheless, cells overexpressing H650Q and R748G were able to induce fatal leukemia-like disease in mice, suggesting that they were indeed involved in the pathogenesis of HES in this patient.  While the Y849S mutation was identified in 2 patients, none of the other mutations occurred more than once in our cohort of patients (Table 2). However, previously reported novel mutations such as CBL mutations in acute myeloid leukemia (AML) were initially only found in 1 of 150 patients,13 but subsequently confirmed in up to 9% of secondary AML14 and myeloproliferative and myelodysplastic syndromes.15 We found that CD3+ T lymphocytes from the patient with the N659S mutation did not harbor this mutation (data not shown), showing that the mutation is acquired. In addition, we clearly demonstrate biologic relevance of this and the other 3 activating mutants. This suggests that these mutations are driver mutations for malignant growth. In contrast, the remaining mutations are likely to be mere passenger mutations as described for the Flt3 locus in AML,16 although we cannot completely rule out that some of these mutants do possess weak transforming potential, possibly in conjunction with other yet undefined aberrations.  Our data show that the H650Q and R748G mutations were not located on the same allele because none of the sequencing products showed both mutations, as analyzed by individual bacterial clones. Because the P567P SNP was present in all bacterial clones and was therefore homozygous, we cannot distinguish between the possibility that both mutations in this patient occurred on separate alleles in the same cell or in different cell clones. As both mutations harbor transforming potential on their own, it is likely that 2 different cell clones were present.  The H650Q and N659S mutations are located in the first tyrosine kinase domain of PDGFRA (exon 14) in close proximity to the ATP-binding site (amino acid 627) and close to the kinase insert domain that separates the 2 kinase domains. The replacement of a basic charged histidine by the neutral nonpolar glutamine residue is not located in the proximity of any known protein-binding site, and therefore, the mechanism of receptor activation resulting from this amino acid exchange remains elusive at this point. In contrast, the R748G mutation is located in the 104 amino acid–spanning kinase insert domain (amino acids 691 to 795; exon 16). This region is rich of tyrosine residues known to be autophosphorylated on activation of the receptor, thus enabling the receptor to directly recruit different SH2 domain–containing proteins such as Src and SHP2 or indirectly as proposed for GRB2.17  Finally, the Y849S mutation is located in the activation loop of PDGFRA (exon 18) and affects the main tyrosine residue that leads to increased catalytic efficiency of the PDGFRA on autophosphorylation.18 Interestingly, the H650Q, R748G, and Y849S mutants were highly sensitive to imatinib-mediated kinase inhibition, while the N659S mutant showed a lower sensitivity.  Activating mutations in PDGFRA have been described in diverse malignancies. Most frequently, they are found in approximately 8% of all patients with GIST.19 Up to 97% of PDGFRA mutations are located in exon 18 which codes for the tyrosine kinase domain (D842V/Y/I, D846Y, Y849C as well as deletions and longer mutations spanning at least 1 of the amino acid residues D842 or D846)4,9,10,20⇓⇓⇓⇓⇓⇓⇓⇓–29 and approximately 3% in exon 12 which codes for the juxtamembrane domain (V561D and deletions/insertions of 2 or more amino acids including the V561 residue or residue S566).4,9,21,22,27,28,30 To date, only 3 patients have been described with mutations in exon 14 which codes for the tyrosine kinase domain 1 (N659K).10 In inflammatory fibroid polyps (IFPs), rare cases of PDGFRA mutations in exon 12 and 18 have been reported (V561D, D842V/I mutations, different deletions spanning position 556 and 571 as well as small deletions around position 824 to 848).31 In addition, 2 AML cases were described with PDGFRA mutations in exon 17 and 19 (F808L, N870S)32 and 1 acute lymphoblastic leukemia (ALL) case with a mutation in exon 10 which encodes the extracellular fifth Ig-like domain (A509D).33 Lastly, 4 cases with PDGFRA mutations (C235Y in exon 5, W349C in exon 7 [n = 2], V536E in exon 11)20 and 2 cases with deletions34,35 have been reported in patients suffering from glioblastoma multiforme.  The finding of imatinib-sensitive PDGFRA point mutations in patients with HES and CEL suggests that all patients without underlying tyrosine kinase fusion genes should be screened for the presence of activating point mutations and treated with imatinib. However, because in our series, PDGFRA-overexpressing cases were overrepresented and lymphocytic variants of HES were not formally excluded. These data need extension as well as confirmation, and we suggest that more research should be performed to identify the frequency of PDGFRA mutants in larger cohorts of patients. Importantly, novel point mutants should be rigorously tested for their transforming potential as well as tyrosine kinase inhibitor (TKI) sensitivity to exclude passenger mutations such as those seen in our own screen as well as those described for FLT3-ITD in AML.16 In addition, we need to learn more about the imatinib sensitivity of all of the mutant cells in vivo in patients before we can confirm or exclude that these mutations are involved in the pathogenesis of the disease. Finally, the interesting finding of PDGFRA point mutations and deletions in IFPs31 which are characterized by an inflammatory infiltrate rich in eosinophils raises the issue of a potential common pathogenesis of IFPs and hypereosinophilic neoplasms with PDGFRA mutations. It will be interesting in the future to dissect spindle cells and eosinophils from IFPs and define the exact cell population harboring the PDGFRA mutation.  Surprisingly, animals injected with 32D PDGFRA H650Q and R748G mutant cells showed a significantly stronger degree of lymphadenopathy compared with mice injected with 32D FIP1L1-PDGFRA cells (P < .001, P = .007, P < .001, respectively, Figure 3C) while the degree of splenomegaly was not different (Figure 3D). One major difference between the PDGFRA point mutants (H650Q and R748G) and the FIP1L1-PDGFRA fusion protein is that the PDGFRA point mutants but not FIP1L1-PDGFRA retain surface expression through transmembrane localization. Along this line, our results demonstrate that the ligand (PDGF-AA) was able to induce phosphorylation of downstream signaling molecules such as Akt only in the point mutant-transduced cells but not in the FIP1L1-PDGFRA–transduced cells (Figure 2A). This fact renders the PDGFRA point mutant-expressing cells responsive to exogenous PDGF which has been described to be expressed in lymph node stromal cell lines,36 suggesting that this may play a role in the preferential lymph adenopathy seen with these mutants.  In conclusion, we describe novel PDGFRA point mutations that transform growth factor–dependent hematopoietic cell lines in vitro and induce leukemia-like disease in vivo. Moreover, our in vitro and in vivo findings suggest that imatinib may be effective in patients with activating PDGFRA point mutations. Although only found in a minority of patients, the screening of HES patients for those mutations may therefore allow selection of patients with a response to imatinib or alternative tyrosine kinase inhibitors. In addition, our data extend the spectrum of diseases harboring PDGFRA point mutations and suggest common oncogenic pathways in idiopathic HES and GIST. If our results are confirmed by other groups, the current WHO classification of MPN may have to be extended to include PDGFRA point mutations.  
886||Activating mutations in the platelet-derived growth factor (PDGF) receptor alpha (PDGFRA) have been described in patients with gastrointestinal stromal tumors or myeloid malignancies associated with hypereosinophilia. These patients respond well to imatinib mesylate, raising the question as to whether patients with a PDGF receptor mutation in other tumor types should receive a tyrosine kinase inhibitor treatment. We characterized 10 novel somatic point mutations in PDGFRA that have been reported in isolated cases of glioblastoma, melanoma, acute myeloid leukemia, peripheral nerve sheath tumors and neuroendocrine carcinoma. The PDGFRA transmembrane domain mutation V536E stimulated Ba/F3 cell growth and signaling via ERK and STAT5 in the absence of ligand. This mutant, identified in glioblastoma, was strongly inhibited by imatinib. Modeling suggested that the mutation modulates the packing of the transmembrane domain helices in the receptor dimer. By contrast, two mutations in highly conserved residues affected the receptor traffic to the cell surface or kinase activity, thereby preventing the response to PDGF. The other mutations had no significant impact on the receptor activity. This functional analysis matched the predictions of SIFT and PolyPhen for only five mutations and these algorithms do not discriminate gain from loss of function. Finally, an E996K variant that had been identified in a melanoma cell line was not expressed in these cells. Altogether, several newly identified PDGFRA mutations do not activate the receptor and may therefore represent passenger mutations. Our results also underline the importance of characterizing novel kinase alterations in cancer patients.  Keywords: PDGF receptor; tyrosine kinase inhibitors; glioblastoma; leukemia; GIST Top of page Introduction Platelet-derived growth factor (PDGF) receptors are receptor tyrosine kinases that are required for the embryo development.1 Two genes, PDGFRA and PDGFRB, encode the receptor α and β isoforms, which are highly homologous and share a common architecture. They consist of five N-terminal immunoglobulin (Ig)-like domains, which are binding to various isoforms of PDGF, a single transmembrane domain and a split protein tyrosine kinase domain. Although the exact structure of these receptors has not been solved yet, the mechanism of activation could be modeled based on mutation analysis and the partial structure of related receptors such FLT3 and KIT. In the absence of ligand, the juxtamembrane domain and the activation loop adopt a conformation that keeps the kinase domain inactive. PDGF binding induces the receptor dimerization and both inhibitory domains undergo large conformation changes and become phosphorylated on tyrosines, stabilizing the active receptor state. In PDGF receptor β (PDGFRB), the C-terminal tail was also suggested to have an inhibitory role.2 This was not investigated in PDGFRA; its C-terminus being the most divergent part compared with PDGFRB.  Activating point mutations in PDGFRA have been described ina small subset of patients with gastrointestinal stromal tumors (GIST, 5–10%).3, 4 Most mutations are located in the juxtamembrane domain or in the activation loop and are likely to disrupt the inhibited conformation of the kinase domain while stabilizingthe active one. Activated fusions genes, such as FIP1L1-PDGFRA, were described in myeloid malignancies associated with hypereosinophilia (MMAH).5, 6, 7 In most cases, the fusion disrupts the juxtamembrane domain, which is enough to activate the receptor. Alternatively, the fusion partner includes an oligomerization domain, which activates the kinase activity, such as in most PDGFRB fusions. Recently, somatic PDGFRA point mutations were also found in hypereosinophilia.8 Interestingly, some of the reported mutations were not transforming when tested in cell lines. Gain-of-function PDGFRA mutations were also reported in inflammatory fibroid polyps.9 In addition, PDGFRA is activated by overexpression in glioblastoma of the proneural subtype.10 An in-frame deletion of 81 amino acids in the Ig-like domains 4 and 5 was found to activate PDGFRA in glioblastoma patients with a receptor gene amplification.11, 12  The PDGF receptor kinase activity is effectively inhibited by imatinib mesylate (Glivec), a tyrosine kinase inhibitor developed against BCR-ABL, which turned out to be at least 10 times more active on PDGF receptors.7 This drug induces long-term remissions in myeloid malignancies associated with hypereosinophilia in the presence of a PDGF receptor fusion gene.13, 14 GISTs are also sensitive to imatinib, although resistant mutations such as D842V have been described.4 New molecules may overcome resistance. By contrast, imatinib has failed to improve survival of glioblastoma patients.15, 16  The success of imatinib in cancers carrying an activating PDGFRA variant, that is, GIST and MMAH, raises the question as to whether all cancer patients with a PDGF receptor mutation should receive a tyrosine kinase inhibitor treatment. Even though these patients are rare, next-generation sequencing technologies will allow the systematic detection of many different mutations in most cancers. These new technologies have raised great expectations for the development of a personalized treatment of each cancer.  Ten novel somatic point mutations in PDGFRA have been reported in a variety of cancers, namely isolated cases of glioblastoma, melanoma, acute myeloid leukemia (AML), peripheral nerve sheath tumors and neuroendocrine carcinoma (Table 1).10, 17, 18, 19, 20 The mutations were found in single cases, except W349C and V536E, which were reported in two patients.10, 21 In most cases, a polymorphism was carefully excluded. However, they were not functionally characterized and it is not clear whether these patients could have benefited from imatinib therapy. The mutations are located in various domains of the receptor, including regions where activating mutations have not been reported yet, such as the transmembrane domain and the C-terminal tail. The goal of the present study was to characterize them.  Table 1 - PDGFRA mutations characterized in the present study. Table 1 - PDGFRA mutations characterized in the present study - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author Full table  Top of page Results W349C prevents PDGFRA glycosylation and traffic to the cell surface Mutants were stably transfected in Ba/F3 cells, which proliferate in the absence of cytokine when they express a constitutively activated PDGF receptor.4, 22 As a positive control, we also expressed PDGFRA-D842V, a constitutively activated mutant found in GISTs.4 The mutant Ba/F3 lines were sorted to remove the fraction of cells that did not express PDGFRA. Their cell surface expression after sorting is shown in Figure 1a. W349C was not detectable at the cell surface and could not be sorted. Next, the receptor expression level was analyzed by western blot (Figure 1b). All mutants were expressed at a level similar or higher than D842V. Two receptor bands are detected by western blots in transfected Ba/F3 cell extracts and represent differentN-glycosylation levels, as described.23 The heavier form corresponds to the fully glycosylated receptor, which is matured in the Golgi and expressed at the cell surface. Unlike wild-type (WT) PDGFRA and the other mutants, W349C was detectable as a single band corresponding to immature glycosylation, indicating that this mutant is not properly trafficking to the cell surface, in agreement with the flow cytometry data (Figure 1b). Figure 1. Figure 1 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author W349C perturbs PDGFRA traffic to the cell surface. Ba/F3 cells were stably transfected with PDGFRA mutants and sorted. Receptor expression was tested by flow cytometry on intact cells (a) or by western blot (b). The average fluorescence intensity compared with thewild-type (WT) receptor (set at 100%) is shown (from a minimum of two experiments).  Full figure and legend (80K)  V536E constitutively activates the PDGF receptor We next tested the proliferation of transfected Ba/F3 cells using a sensitive tritiated thymidine incorporation test. The V536E mutation in the transmembrane domain was the only one supporting Ba/F3 proliferation in the absence of cytokine, like the D842V positive control (Figure 2a). In the presence of PDGF, the expression of WT or mutant receptors allowed Ba/F3 cell growth to a similar extent, except W349C, as expected from the lack of surface protein expression, and F808L, which did not respond to stimulation. Similar results were obtained by counting cells in liquid cultures in the absence or presence of PDGF (data not shown). All cell lines grew similarly in the presence of interleukin-3 (IL3). Figure 2. Figure 2 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author PDGFRA V536E is constitutively activated, whereas W349C and F808L do not respond to PDGF. (a) Transfected Ba/F3 cells were extensively washed and cultured in the absence of cytokine or in the presence of PDGF for 24 h. Thymidine incorporation was quantified to evaluate cell proliferation. One representative experiment out of three is shown. All cell lines proliferated similarly in the presence of interleukin-3 (data not shown). (b) MCF7 cells were transiently transfected with the indicated receptor and a luciferase construct driven by a serum-responsive element. The average of three experiments is shown with s.e.m. V536E significantly induced the luciferase activity in the absence of cytokine compared with wild type (WT; P<0.05, Student’s t-test).  Full figure and legend (73K)  Constitutive signaling by PDGFRA-V536E was confirmed using a luciferase reporter assay driven by serum response elements in MCF7 cells (Figure 2b). In line with the proliferation results, most mutants were comparable to the WT receptor and only weakly stimulated the reporter activity, except W349C and F808L, which did not produce a significant reporter signal. Similar results were obtained using a promoter driven by signal transducer and activator of transcription (STAT) in PAE cells (Supplementary Figure 1). The ability of the mutant receptors to respond to PDGF was also tested by co-transfecting a PDGF-B cDNA, which confirmed the inability of the two mutants mentioned above to respond to PDGF.  To further demonstrate that V536E is a transforming mutation, we tested its ability to mediate the formation of transformed fibroblasts foci. Low-passage NIH3T3 cells were transfected with the V536E mutant compared with activated D842V, WT and W349C receptors. In line with the Ba/F3 experiment, PDGFRA-V536E induced the formation of foci, by contrast to WT and W349C receptors (Figure 3a).  Figure 3. Figure 3 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author Cell transformation and constitutive signaling by PDGFRA V536E. (a) Low-passage NIH3T3 cells were transfected with the indicated PDGFRA receptor or empty vector. After 3 weeks, transformed fibroblasts foci were stained with crystal violet, photographed (upper panel) and scored (lower panel, average of three independant experiments performed in triplicate cultures, arbitrary units). (b) Ba/F3 cells transfected PDGFRA wild type (WT), V536E or D842V were stimulated with PDGF or IL3 for 15 min or left untreated. Cells were lysed and protein extracts were analyzed by western blot (WB) with antibodies recognizing active phosphorylated STAT5, AKT or ERK. Antibodies against total STAT5, AKT and ERK2 were used as controls. (c) HEK293T cells transiently transfected with the indicated receptor were lysed and analyzed by western blot with anti-phospho-tyrosine or with anti-PDGFRA antibodies (left panels). Alternatively, PDGFRA was immunoprecipitated (IP) from lysates before WB (right panels).  Full figure and legend (90K)  We further studied the V536E mutant signaling in Ba/F3 cells by analyzing STAT5, extracellular signal regulated kinase (ERK)-1/2 and AKT phosphorylation by western blot. The expression of V536E or D842V induced the phosphorylation of ERK and STAT5 but not AKT (Figure 3b). By contrast, cell stimulation with PDGF induced the phosphorylation of ERK and AKT but not STAT5, suggesting that signal transduction by V536E differed from the WT receptor. The phosphorylation of the receptor itself was then analyzed in transfected HEK293T cells (Figure 3c). V536E phosphorylation on tyrosines was increased compared with the WT receptor, confirming that this mutation constitutively activates the receptor.  PDGFRA-D842V is resistant to imatinib, whereas juxtamembrane mutants are highly sensitive to this drug. We have also shown previously that a transmembrane deletion shifts the sensitivity of the ETV6-PDGFRB fusion to imatinib.22 The ability of imatinib to block proliferation and signaling induced by V536E was analyzed in Ba/F3 and MCF7 cells. Figure 4 shows that imatinib completely inhibited Ba/F3-V536E cell growth with an IC50 similar to the one reported for FIP1L1-PDGFRA and much lower than the concentration required to block BCR-ABL.7 The activation of serum-responsive elements by V536E in luciferase assays was also dampened by imatinib. These experiments demonstrate that V536E is highly sensitive to imatinib.  Figure 4. Figure 4 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author V536E is sensitive to inhibition by imatinib. (a) Ba/F3 cells expressing the indicated receptor were treated with imatinib for 24 h. Thymidine incorporation was quantified to evaluate cell proliferation. (b) MCF7 cells were transiently transfected with the indicated receptor, a luciferase reporter construct controlled by serum-responsive elements and a control β-galactosidase reporter. Cells were treated with imatinib for 24 h. The luciferase activity was measured and divided by the β-galactosidase activity.  Full figure and legend (57K)  Impact of V536E on PDGFRA dimerization and structure of the transmembrane domain Mutations similar to V536E in the transmembrane helix of other receptors were suggested to promote dimerization.24 Therefore, we tested the impact of the V536E mutation on PDGFRA dimerization. Receptor dimers were chemically crosslinked before cell lysis and western blot analysis (Figure 5a). This experiment suggested that a small fraction of the receptor could be crosslinked in the absence of ligand. Treatment with PDGF then increased the dimer formation, as expected from published results.25 Importantly, no major difference was observed between WT and mutant receptors. Figure 5. Figure 5 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author V536E mutation does not affect receptor dimerization but modulates packing of transmembrane domains. (a) Ba/F3 cells expressing the indicated receptor were incubated with PDGF-BB for 1 h on ice. Cells were washed and treated with bis(sulfosuccinimidyl)-suberate (BS3) to crosslink membrane protein complexes. PDGF receptors were isolated from cell protein extracts using wheat germ agglutinin-coupled beads. Western blot was performed with anti-PDGFRA antibodies. (b) Top-scoring predicted conformation of the mutant PDGFRA transmembrane dimer (magenta) superimposed with left-handed nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR) conformation (green) of PDGFRB dimer. Crossing angles of dimer conformations and backbone root-mean-square deviations (RMSDs) between them are given. Peptides are shown in cartoon-and-stick representation. (c) Normalized packing score (FCSCOR) of the wild type (WT) and the mutant PDGFRA transmembrane dimers plotted as functions of the dimer crossing angle (χ). For each dimer, three top-scoring conformations (numbered ‘1’, ‘2’ and ‘3’) are shown. See Supplementary Figure 2 for conformation details. Left- and right-handed dimer conformations are shown in cartoon-and-stick representation.  Full figure and legend (174K)  To understand better the structural origin of the receptor constitutive activation induced by the V536E mutation, we performed molecular modeling of possible conformations of PDGFRA transmembrane helix dimer using PREDDIMER approach.26 Transmembrane helices of PDGFRA were predicted to form several distinctive top-scoring dimer conformations similar to those of PDGFRB (Figure 5b and Supplementary Figure 2). We found that the substitution of respective valine for glutamic acid is likely to change the packing efficiency of the predicted dimer conformations and may induce a repopulation of the dimer conformational ensemble. Taking into account an observed gap between packing efficiencies of the transmembrane dimer conformations (calculated according to the scoring function) in mutant V536E receptor, the left-handed conformation is likely to be predominant, whereas the right-handed one is predicted to be less populated (Figure 5c). In contrast, we observed the reverse situation for WT receptor. In addition, the packing efficiency of both WT conformations are relatively more similar to each other. Finally, the mutation has no effect on the packing efficiency ofthe parallel transmembrane dimer conformation (Figure 5c). Previously, nuclear magnetic resonance-derived left-handed conformation of PDGFRB transmembrane dimer (Figure 5b) was proposed to correspond to activated state of the receptor.27 Taking together this assumption with results of our modeling, we speculate that the V536E mutation might favor PDGFRA transmembrane dimer in the activated state and obstruct the conformational transition of the receptor to the inactive one. Similar situation has been recently observed by modeling for ErbB2-Neu* V664Q transmembrane mutant,26 where the analogues mutation increased the dimer packing efficiency relative to the WT and favored the left-handed over theright-handed dimer conformations.  The F808L mutant is devoid of kinase activity Proliferation and luciferase assays suggested that the F808L mutant was unable to respond to PDGF stimulation, even though it was expressed at the cell surface. To test the kinase activity of this mutant, we first overexpressed it in HEK293T cells. Figure 6 shows that F808L was not significantly phosphorylated on tyrosines by contrast to WT and D842V receptors. Then, we performed an in vitro kinase assay after receptor immunoprecipitation. The phosphorylation of the WT and D842V receptors was enhanced in the presence of ATP, but F808L remains unphosphorylated, indicating it is a kinase-dead mutant (Figure 6). Figure 6. Figure 6 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author F808L is a kinase dead mutant. (a) HEK293T cells were transiently transfected with the indicated receptor. Four hours before lysis, cells were treated with imatinib 0.5 μm. PDGFRA was immunoprecipitated (IP) from lysates and analyzed by westernblot (WB) with anti-phospho-tyrosine or anti-PDGFRA antibodies.(b) Alternatively, immunoprecipitates were incubated with ATP (50 μm) in kinase buffer for 10 min. Receptor phosphorylation was analyzed by WB and quantified using the Odyssey technology. The ratio between the receptor phosphorylation and the total receptor expression was calculated. It is normalized to the wild-type (WT) levels (average of three experiments).  Full figure and legend (49K)  The E996K mutant is not expressed in the cell line in which it was identified The E996K mutant was identified in the LB373-MEL cell line, derived from a melanoma metastasis.19 The mutation was absent in immortalized lymphocytes from the same patient confirming that it was an acquired cancer variant. We confirmed the presence of a heterozygous somatic mutation in the genomic DNA of LB373-MEL (data not shown), but we were unable to detect the PDGFRA protein or transcript, compared with positive controls (Figure 7). In conclusion, the E996K mutation, which did not confer any growth advantage in our assays, was not expressed inLB373-MEL cells. Figure 7. Figure 7 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author E996K is not expressed in the cell line in which it was identified. (a) LB373-MEL cells were stained with anti-PDGFRA antibodies and phycoerythrin-linked anti-mouse-IgG. Cells were analyzed by flow cytometry. 32D cells transfected with PDGFRA were used as a positive control. (b) RNA was extracted from LB373-MEL cells and analyzed by reverse transcription–PCR using primers specific for PDGFRA or RPLP0 (as a control). HepG2 cells, which do not express PDGFRA, and AG01518 human fibroblasts were used as negative and positive controls, respectively.  Full figure and legend (52K)  Top of page Discussion Among 10 uncharacterized mutations, V536E was the onlygain-of-function variant that we identified. To our knowledge, this is the first cancer mutation described in the PDGF receptors transmembrane domain. A similar V664E mutation in ErbB2/Neu was shown to induce the receptor constitutive tyrosine kinase activity.24 Activating point mutations in the transmembrane segment have also been found in other receptor tyrosine kinases, such as c-KIT and FGFR3.3 The insertion of two correctly positioned glutamic residues in a simplified valine-based transmembrane domain is enough to activate PDGFRB and ErbB2/Neu.28 In addition, the importance of the transmembrane domain for PDGFRB activation was underlined by studies showing that this domain is essential for transformation by the ETV6-PDGFRB fusion and by the bovine papillomavirus E5 protein.22 It was recently shown that the PDGFRB transmembrane domain is able to form a stable left-handed helical dimer in artificial membranes.27 In this structure, V543, which is homologous to PDGFRA V536, is located at the edge of the interface (Figure 5a). The PDGFRA-V539E mutant is likely to populate this dimeric conformation by increasing the packing efficiency of the transmembrane helix dimer, as suggested by modeling. A similar situation was predicted for the rat ErbB2-Neu* V664Q transmembrane mutant.26 Recently, active and inactive dimer conformations of the EGF receptor transmembrane domain have been reported, supporting the hypothesis that the conformation of this domain has a critical role in receptor tyrosine kinase activation.29, 30 Our model also predicts that the orientation and the angle between the two helices in the left-handed dimer is affected by the V536E mutation, which may optimally positions the two kinase domains facing each other in the receptor dimer. In conclusion, we suggest that the V536E substitution affects the conformation of the transmembrane domain dimer rather than dimerization itself. Further experiments are required to decipher the exact mechanism of constitutive PDGF receptor activation by this mutation.  Based on initial reports, PDGFRA mutation screenings in GIST usually focus on exons 12 and 18, which encode the juxtamembrane domain and the activation loop.4 We suggest that sequencing exon 11, encoding the transmembrane domain, may reveal additional clinically relevant PDGFRA mutations in GIST.  Two mutants, F808L and W349C, did not show any sign of activation and did not respond to PDGF stimulation for different reasons. Interestingly, these two residues were perfectlyconserved in vertebrate PDGFRA as well as in the related human receptors PDGFRB, c-KIT, FLT3, CSF1R and VEGFRs (Supplementary Table I). In the c-KIT structure, W349 mediates key interactions with distant amino acids.31 This mutation may therefore interfere with PDGFRA folding. The W349C protein appeared as a single immature band and failed to traffic to the plasma membrane. Although a cysteine at position 349 may induce the formation of a new aberrant cysteine bridge, we failed to detect covalent W349C dimeric complex. W349 is also located close to two predictedN-glycosylation sites (N353LT and N359LT). The mutation may thus block the glycosylation of these sites or prevent the traffic to the Golgi where the receptor undergoes its final glycosylation steps. In agreement with its absence at the cell surface, W349C did not respond to the addition of exogenous PDGF. In addition,co-transfection of a PDGF-B cDNA did not activate the mutant receptor either. This may result from the disruption of the Ig-like domain 4, which is essential for PDGFRA signal transduction.32 The second defective mutation, F808L, is located nearby the activation loop and disrupted the kinase activity. A similar kinase dead mutation has been described in the receptor tyrosine kinase ALK in neuroblastoma.33 Even if F808L was supporting leukemia development by an unknown mechanism independent of the receptor kinase activity, leukemia patients carrying this mutation are unlikely to benefit from imatinib therapy. Altogether, these two variants likely represent passenger mutations. Nevertheless, we cannot rule out the possibility that they provide an advantage to tumor cells in a particular molecular environment.  Seven mutations produced no particular phenotype and may also be classified as passenger mutations. These residues are conserved in mammalian PDGFRA except V469, which is replaced by an isoleucine in some species (Supplementary Table I). Interestingly, this valine is substituted by an alanine in Tetraodon nigroviridis, mimicking the V469A mutation found in a malignant peripheral nerve sheath tumor. These seven amino acids are poorly conserved in receptors related to PDGFRA. Remarkably, N870 is replaced by a serine in PDGFRB, supporting our conclusion that N870S does not affect PDGF receptors significantly. The original report did not formally exclude that this allele corresponds to a rare polymorphism rather than a somatic mutation.18 In the case of E996K, we had access to the original cell line in which this somatic mutation had been identified,19 but which did not express any detectable PDGFRA protein or transcript. This observation supports the hypothesis that E996K is a passenger mutation, although we cannot rule out the possibility that the receptor was expressed in the original tumor cells and was lost during the adaptation to cell culture.  Three mutations are located in the C-terminal tail, which is unique to PDGFRA, except the last five amino acids, which are also present in PDGFRB.34 This C-terminal motif, which is lost in the S1049CH* frame shift mutant,20 was suggested to recruit PTEN via NHERF adaptor proteins, thereby limiting the activation of the PI3K pathway.35 However, we did not observe any significant increase in PKB phosphorylation downstream this mutant (data not shown). The role of the C-terminal domain of PDGFRA remains to be established.  The occurrence of passenger mutations in cancer genome was highlighted by high throughput sequencing projects.19, 36 Mutation recurrence in multiple patients has been widely used as a criterion to select driver cancer mutations. In this respect, after the initial submission of the present manuscript, the V536E mutation was described in a second glioblastoma patient.21 However, W349C was also reported in two patients.10 The recurrence criterion is also too restrictive because unique cancer variants may be clinically relevant. For instance, several patients with non-recurrent PDGFR fusions genes were successfully treated with imatinib.3 To predict the impact of single-nucleotide variant on protein function, several algorithms based on sequence homologies and structural data have been developed, such as SIFT and PolyPhen.37 For five out of eight mutations present in the database, PolyPhen matched our results (Supplementary Table I). In this set of mutations, the conservation with receptors related to PDGFRA (FLT3, KIT, CSF1R and VEGFRs) was best correlated with the observed functional impact. These tests do not predict whether a given variant leads to a gain of function or a loss of function, a piece of information that is essential in oncology. Therefore, a thorough experimental analysis of cancer mutations remains essential.  After the initial submission of this paper, three novel PDGFRA mutations—among many others—were reported in diffuse large B-cell lymphoma.38 Based on the criteria mentioned above, they may also represent passenger mutations (Supplementary Table I).  Our results confirm the occurrence of activating mutations in glioblastoma, in which two activated PDGFRA variants have been previously described.11, 12 Whether these patients could be more sensitive to kinase inhibitors remains to be studied. By contrast, our observations do not support the existence of driver PDGFRA point mutations in acute myeloid leukemia or malignant peripheral nerve sheath tumors. In the latter tumors, other alterations, namely PDGFRA gene amplification or autocrine loops, may activate WT and mutant receptors.17 Such alterations have also been described in glioblastomas.10 The presence of both activating and passenger alterations in glioblastoma, which was also recently reported in idiopathic hypereosinophilia, may reflect a particularly high PDGFRA mutation rate in these cancers. In line with this hypothesis, the proneural subtype of glioblastoma, in which PDGFRA is expressed, is associated with a higher frequency of the hypermutator phenotype.10  Altogether, we identified a number of key residues for PDGFRA function and characterized a novel type of imatinib-sensitive PDGFRA-activating mutation in the transmembrane segment. Our work underlines the importance of characterizing PDGF receptor mutations in a systematic manner. This is a major issue in the development of personalized targeted therapies.  Top of page Materials and methods Reagents and plasmids The human PDGFRA cDNA was subcloned in pEF-MYC-CYTO (Invitrogen/Life Technologies, Gent, Belgium), which allowed a high expression level in Ba/F3, compensating the fast turn-over of the receptor in these cells.39 A Flag tag was inserted after the signal peptide. Mutations were introduced by Quickchange (Stratagene/Agilent technologies, Diegem, Belgium) and confirmed by sequencing (Macrogen, Seoul, Korea). Western blots were performed as described34 with anti-PDGFRA (1:200, Santa Cruz, Santa Cruz, CA, USA, #951), PY99 (1:200, Santa Cruz), anti-phospho-Y694-STAT5 (1:1000, Signalway Antibodies, College Park, MD, USA), anti-STAT5, anti-phospho-AKT, anti-AKT, anti-phospho-ERK-1/2 (1:1000, Cell Signaling Technologies, Danvers, MA, USA) and anti-ERK2 (1:1000, EET rabbit antiserum34). Imatinib mesylate was purchased from LC Laboratories (Woburn, MA, USA). Cell culture and transfections HEK293T cells were cultured in Dulbecco’s modified Eagle’s medium with fetal calf serum (10%) and antibiotics (Invitrogen). Cells were transfected using the calcium phosphate method as described.39 Ba/F3 cells were cultured in the same medium supplemented with IL3 (200 U/ml). Cells were electroporated as described elsewhere40 and selected in the presence of G418 (3 mg/ml). Transfected cell populations were sorted by flow cytometry after staining with a monoclonal anti-PDGFRA antibody (R&D systems, Minneapolis, MN, USA, MAB1264) and anti-mouse immunoglobulin labeled with phycoerythrin (Jackson Laboratories, Bar Harbor, ME, USA). A few days later, homogeneous PDGFRA expression was confirmed using the same antibodies by flow cytometry. For proliferation assays, cells were washed three times to remove IL3 and seeded in 96-well plates (104 cells/well in 200 μl of medium with 10% serum) without cytokine, with PDGF-BB (20 ng/ml, Peprotec, London, UK) or IL3 (200 U/ml). After 20 h, [3H]-thymidine (0.5 μCi, GE Healthcare, Diegem, Belgium) was added to each well for 4 h. Cells were harvested and the radioactivity incorporated into DNA was counted using a TopCount instrument (Perkin Elmer, Waltham, MA, USA). LB373-MEL cells were kindly provided by Francis Brasseur (Ludwig Institute for Cancer Research, Brussels, Belgium) and were cultured in Iscove-Dulbecco medium with fetal calf serum (10%) and essential amino acids. Cells were analyzed by flow cytometry as described above. mRNA was extracted using a Qiagen kit and PDGFRA expression was measured by quantitative reverse transcription–PCR as described41 using AG01518 human fibroblasts and HEPG2 hepatocarcinoma cells as positive and negative controls, respectively.42 The expression of the house keeping gene RPLP0 was used as control. The sequence of the 996 codon was confirmed by sequencing of multiple clones obtained after PCR amplification of genomic DNA using the oligonucleotides 5′-CGTGTGGACTCAGACAATGCA-3′ and 5′-GGCAGAGGAATGATGTAGCCA-3′ in PDGFRA exon 22.  Transformation assay Low-passage NIH3T3 cells (American Type Culture Collection, Manassas, VA, USA) were transfected as described.33, 43 Briefly, 4.5 × 104 cells were seeded the day before into collagen-coated 12-well plates and transfected for 6 h with 0.5 μg of DNA (pEF-MYC-CYTO vector containing PDGFRA WT, D842V, V536E or W349C) and 1.4 μl of Lipofectamine 2000 in 0.3 ml of Opti-MEM (both from Invitrogen). Twenty-four hours after transfection, three-fifth of the cells from each well were transferred to wells in collagen-coated six-well plates and kept in Dulbecco’s modified Eagle’s medium (10% fetal calf serum and 0.5 mg/ml G418) until the cells reached confluence. Thereafter, cells were kept in Dulbecco’s modified Eagle’s medium(5% fetal calf serum and 0.25 mg/ml G418) for approximately 10 days. Three weeks after transfection, the cells were fixed using methanol and plates were stained with crystal violet. Western blot, immunoprecipitation and crosslinking These experiments were performed essentially as described.22, 44 Briefly, Ba/F3 cells expressing PDGFRA were washed and incubated in the absence of IL3 for 4 h. In signaling studies, cells were restimulated for 15 min with PDGF-BB (25 ng/ml) or IL3 (200 U/ml) at 37 °C, washed and lysed inSDS–polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis sample buffer. For crosslinking studies, 2 × 106 cells were stimulated with PDGF-BB (100 ng/ml) for 1 h on ice to prevent endocytosis. Cells were washed with phosphate-buffered saline and treated with bis(sulfosuccinimidyl)-suberate (Pierce/Thermoscientific, Rockford, IL, USA, 1 mm) for 1 h on ice in 200 μl phosphate-buffered saline. Glycine (3.5 mm, final concentration) was then added to stop the reaction before protein extraction in lysis buffer. PDGF receptors were isolated with wheat germ agglutinin-coupled agarose beads (Sigma-Aldrich, St Louis, MO, USA). Beads were extensively washed and proteins were eluted with sample buffer for western blot analysis with anti-PDGFRA antibodies. Luciferase assays MCF7 and PAE cells were plated in six-well plates, respectively, at 300 000 and 150 000 cells/ well. After one day, cells were transfected with a luciferase construct controlled by serum response elements (0.5 μg)or STAT-response elements (GRR5, 0.5 μg),44 pDRIVEchEF1-RU5(β-galactosidase reporter, Invitrogen, 0.5 μg), pEF-MYC-CYTO-PDGFRA (0.25 μg) and PDGF-B (0.25 μg)2 in the presence of Fugene HD (for MCF7, Promega) or Lipofectamine 2000 (for PAE, Invitrogen). After 24 h, cells were lysed and luciferase activity was measured recommended by the manufacturer (Promega). β-Galactosidase levels were used to normalize the results as described.42 Modeling methods Spatial structures of the dimers formed by transmembrane helical fragments of the WT PDGFRA and its V536E mutant were built using PREDDIMER algorithm starting from their sequences (see Figure 5b) as described elsewhere.26 For calculations of backbone root-mean-square deviations between the predicted models and PDGFRB transmembrane dimer, its nuclear magnetic resonance structure was used (2L6W27). Packing efficiencies of the predicted dimers were estimated according to values of PREDDIMER scoring function (FSCOR). Normalized values of FCSCOR for a combined set of three top ranked of PDGFRA-WT and PDGFRA-V536E dimer conformations were calculated as: FCSCOR=(FSCOR −left fenceFSCORright fence)/std.FSCOR, where left fenceFSCORright fence and std.FSCOR are the mean and standard deviation within the set.  
891||Activating mutations in the platelet-derived growth factor (PDGF) receptor alpha (PDGFRA) have been described in patients with gastrointestinal stromal tumors or myeloid malignancies associated with hypereosinophilia. These patients respond well to imatinib mesylate, raising the question as to whether patients with a PDGF receptor mutation in other tumor types should receive a tyrosine kinase inhibitor treatment. We characterized 10 novel somatic point mutations in PDGFRA that have been reported in isolated cases of glioblastoma, melanoma, acute myeloid leukemia, peripheral nerve sheath tumors and neuroendocrine carcinoma. The PDGFRA transmembrane domain mutation V536E stimulated Ba/F3 cell growth and signaling via ERK and STAT5 in the absence of ligand. This mutant, identified in glioblastoma, was strongly inhibited by imatinib. Modeling suggested that the mutation modulates the packing of the transmembrane domain helices in the receptor dimer. By contrast, two mutations in highly conserved residues affected the receptor traffic to the cell surface or kinase activity, thereby preventing the response to PDGF. The other mutations had no significant impact on the receptor activity. This functional analysis matched the predictions of SIFT and PolyPhen for only five mutations and these algorithms do not discriminate gain from loss of function. Finally, an E996K variant that had been identified in a melanoma cell line was not expressed in these cells. Altogether, several newly identified PDGFRA mutations do not activate the receptor and may therefore represent passenger mutations. Our results also underline the importance of characterizing novel kinase alterations in cancer patients.  Keywords: PDGF receptor; tyrosine kinase inhibitors; glioblastoma; leukemia; GIST Top of page Introduction Platelet-derived growth factor (PDGF) receptors are receptor tyrosine kinases that are required for the embryo development.1 Two genes, PDGFRA and PDGFRB, encode the receptor α and β isoforms, which are highly homologous and share a common architecture. They consist of five N-terminal immunoglobulin (Ig)-like domains, which are binding to various isoforms of PDGF, a single transmembrane domain and a split protein tyrosine kinase domain. Although the exact structure of these receptors has not been solved yet, the mechanism of activation could be modeled based on mutation analysis and the partial structure of related receptors such FLT3 and KIT. In the absence of ligand, the juxtamembrane domain and the activation loop adopt a conformation that keeps the kinase domain inactive. PDGF binding induces the receptor dimerization and both inhibitory domains undergo large conformation changes and become phosphorylated on tyrosines, stabilizing the active receptor state. In PDGF receptor β (PDGFRB), the C-terminal tail was also suggested to have an inhibitory role.2 This was not investigated in PDGFRA; its C-terminus being the most divergent part compared with PDGFRB.  Activating point mutations in PDGFRA have been described ina small subset of patients with gastrointestinal stromal tumors (GIST, 5–10%).3, 4 Most mutations are located in the juxtamembrane domain or in the activation loop and are likely to disrupt the inhibited conformation of the kinase domain while stabilizingthe active one. Activated fusions genes, such as FIP1L1-PDGFRA, were described in myeloid malignancies associated with hypereosinophilia (MMAH).5, 6, 7 In most cases, the fusion disrupts the juxtamembrane domain, which is enough to activate the receptor. Alternatively, the fusion partner includes an oligomerization domain, which activates the kinase activity, such as in most PDGFRB fusions. Recently, somatic PDGFRA point mutations were also found in hypereosinophilia.8 Interestingly, some of the reported mutations were not transforming when tested in cell lines. Gain-of-function PDGFRA mutations were also reported in inflammatory fibroid polyps.9 In addition, PDGFRA is activated by overexpression in glioblastoma of the proneural subtype.10 An in-frame deletion of 81 amino acids in the Ig-like domains 4 and 5 was found to activate PDGFRA in glioblastoma patients with a receptor gene amplification.11, 12  The PDGF receptor kinase activity is effectively inhibited by imatinib mesylate (Glivec), a tyrosine kinase inhibitor developed against BCR-ABL, which turned out to be at least 10 times more active on PDGF receptors.7 This drug induces long-term remissions in myeloid malignancies associated with hypereosinophilia in the presence of a PDGF receptor fusion gene.13, 14 GISTs are also sensitive to imatinib, although resistant mutations such as D842V have been described.4 New molecules may overcome resistance. By contrast, imatinib has failed to improve survival of glioblastoma patients.15, 16  The success of imatinib in cancers carrying an activating PDGFRA variant, that is, GIST and MMAH, raises the question as to whether all cancer patients with a PDGF receptor mutation should receive a tyrosine kinase inhibitor treatment. Even though these patients are rare, next-generation sequencing technologies will allow the systematic detection of many different mutations in most cancers. These new technologies have raised great expectations for the development of a personalized treatment of each cancer.  Ten novel somatic point mutations in PDGFRA have been reported in a variety of cancers, namely isolated cases of glioblastoma, melanoma, acute myeloid leukemia (AML), peripheral nerve sheath tumors and neuroendocrine carcinoma (Table 1).10, 17, 18, 19, 20 The mutations were found in single cases, except W349C and V536E, which were reported in two patients.10, 21 In most cases, a polymorphism was carefully excluded. However, they were not functionally characterized and it is not clear whether these patients could have benefited from imatinib therapy. The mutations are located in various domains of the receptor, including regions where activating mutations have not been reported yet, such as the transmembrane domain and the C-terminal tail. The goal of the present study was to characterize them.  Table 1 - PDGFRA mutations characterized in the present study. Table 1 - PDGFRA mutations characterized in the present study - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author Full table  Top of page Results W349C prevents PDGFRA glycosylation and traffic to the cell surface Mutants were stably transfected in Ba/F3 cells, which proliferate in the absence of cytokine when they express a constitutively activated PDGF receptor.4, 22 As a positive control, we also expressed PDGFRA-D842V, a constitutively activated mutant found in GISTs.4 The mutant Ba/F3 lines were sorted to remove the fraction of cells that did not express PDGFRA. Their cell surface expression after sorting is shown in Figure 1a. W349C was not detectable at the cell surface and could not be sorted. Next, the receptor expression level was analyzed by western blot (Figure 1b). All mutants were expressed at a level similar or higher than D842V. Two receptor bands are detected by western blots in transfected Ba/F3 cell extracts and represent differentN-glycosylation levels, as described.23 The heavier form corresponds to the fully glycosylated receptor, which is matured in the Golgi and expressed at the cell surface. Unlike wild-type (WT) PDGFRA and the other mutants, W349C was detectable as a single band corresponding to immature glycosylation, indicating that this mutant is not properly trafficking to the cell surface, in agreement with the flow cytometry data (Figure 1b). Figure 1. Figure 1 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author W349C perturbs PDGFRA traffic to the cell surface. Ba/F3 cells were stably transfected with PDGFRA mutants and sorted. Receptor expression was tested by flow cytometry on intact cells (a) or by western blot (b). The average fluorescence intensity compared with thewild-type (WT) receptor (set at 100%) is shown (from a minimum of two experiments).  Full figure and legend (80K)  V536E constitutively activates the PDGF receptor We next tested the proliferation of transfected Ba/F3 cells using a sensitive tritiated thymidine incorporation test. The V536E mutation in the transmembrane domain was the only one supporting Ba/F3 proliferation in the absence of cytokine, like the D842V positive control (Figure 2a). In the presence of PDGF, the expression of WT or mutant receptors allowed Ba/F3 cell growth to a similar extent, except W349C, as expected from the lack of surface protein expression, and F808L, which did not respond to stimulation. Similar results were obtained by counting cells in liquid cultures in the absence or presence of PDGF (data not shown). All cell lines grew similarly in the presence of interleukin-3 (IL3). Figure 2. Figure 2 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author PDGFRA V536E is constitutively activated, whereas W349C and F808L do not respond to PDGF. (a) Transfected Ba/F3 cells were extensively washed and cultured in the absence of cytokine or in the presence of PDGF for 24 h. Thymidine incorporation was quantified to evaluate cell proliferation. One representative experiment out of three is shown. All cell lines proliferated similarly in the presence of interleukin-3 (data not shown). (b) MCF7 cells were transiently transfected with the indicated receptor and a luciferase construct driven by a serum-responsive element. The average of three experiments is shown with s.e.m. V536E significantly induced the luciferase activity in the absence of cytokine compared with wild type (WT; P<0.05, Student’s t-test).  Full figure and legend (73K)  Constitutive signaling by PDGFRA-V536E was confirmed using a luciferase reporter assay driven by serum response elements in MCF7 cells (Figure 2b). In line with the proliferation results, most mutants were comparable to the WT receptor and only weakly stimulated the reporter activity, except W349C and F808L, which did not produce a significant reporter signal. Similar results were obtained using a promoter driven by signal transducer and activator of transcription (STAT) in PAE cells (Supplementary Figure 1). The ability of the mutant receptors to respond to PDGF was also tested by co-transfecting a PDGF-B cDNA, which confirmed the inability of the two mutants mentioned above to respond to PDGF.  To further demonstrate that V536E is a transforming mutation, we tested its ability to mediate the formation of transformed fibroblasts foci. Low-passage NIH3T3 cells were transfected with the V536E mutant compared with activated D842V, WT and W349C receptors. In line with the Ba/F3 experiment, PDGFRA-V536E induced the formation of foci, by contrast to WT and W349C receptors (Figure 3a).  Figure 3. Figure 3 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author Cell transformation and constitutive signaling by PDGFRA V536E. (a) Low-passage NIH3T3 cells were transfected with the indicated PDGFRA receptor or empty vector. After 3 weeks, transformed fibroblasts foci were stained with crystal violet, photographed (upper panel) and scored (lower panel, average of three independant experiments performed in triplicate cultures, arbitrary units). (b) Ba/F3 cells transfected PDGFRA wild type (WT), V536E or D842V were stimulated with PDGF or IL3 for 15 min or left untreated. Cells were lysed and protein extracts were analyzed by western blot (WB) with antibodies recognizing active phosphorylated STAT5, AKT or ERK. Antibodies against total STAT5, AKT and ERK2 were used as controls. (c) HEK293T cells transiently transfected with the indicated receptor were lysed and analyzed by western blot with anti-phospho-tyrosine or with anti-PDGFRA antibodies (left panels). Alternatively, PDGFRA was immunoprecipitated (IP) from lysates before WB (right panels).  Full figure and legend (90K)  We further studied the V536E mutant signaling in Ba/F3 cells by analyzing STAT5, extracellular signal regulated kinase (ERK)-1/2 and AKT phosphorylation by western blot. The expression of V536E or D842V induced the phosphorylation of ERK and STAT5 but not AKT (Figure 3b). By contrast, cell stimulation with PDGF induced the phosphorylation of ERK and AKT but not STAT5, suggesting that signal transduction by V536E differed from the WT receptor. The phosphorylation of the receptor itself was then analyzed in transfected HEK293T cells (Figure 3c). V536E phosphorylation on tyrosines was increased compared with the WT receptor, confirming that this mutation constitutively activates the receptor.  PDGFRA-D842V is resistant to imatinib, whereas juxtamembrane mutants are highly sensitive to this drug. We have also shown previously that a transmembrane deletion shifts the sensitivity of the ETV6-PDGFRB fusion to imatinib.22 The ability of imatinib to block proliferation and signaling induced by V536E was analyzed in Ba/F3 and MCF7 cells. Figure 4 shows that imatinib completely inhibited Ba/F3-V536E cell growth with an IC50 similar to the one reported for FIP1L1-PDGFRA and much lower than the concentration required to block BCR-ABL.7 The activation of serum-responsive elements by V536E in luciferase assays was also dampened by imatinib. These experiments demonstrate that V536E is highly sensitive to imatinib.  Figure 4. Figure 4 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author V536E is sensitive to inhibition by imatinib. (a) Ba/F3 cells expressing the indicated receptor were treated with imatinib for 24 h. Thymidine incorporation was quantified to evaluate cell proliferation. (b) MCF7 cells were transiently transfected with the indicated receptor, a luciferase reporter construct controlled by serum-responsive elements and a control β-galactosidase reporter. Cells were treated with imatinib for 24 h. The luciferase activity was measured and divided by the β-galactosidase activity.  Full figure and legend (57K)  Impact of V536E on PDGFRA dimerization and structure of the transmembrane domain Mutations similar to V536E in the transmembrane helix of other receptors were suggested to promote dimerization.24 Therefore, we tested the impact of the V536E mutation on PDGFRA dimerization. Receptor dimers were chemically crosslinked before cell lysis and western blot analysis (Figure 5a). This experiment suggested that a small fraction of the receptor could be crosslinked in the absence of ligand. Treatment with PDGF then increased the dimer formation, as expected from published results.25 Importantly, no major difference was observed between WT and mutant receptors. Figure 5. Figure 5 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author V536E mutation does not affect receptor dimerization but modulates packing of transmembrane domains. (a) Ba/F3 cells expressing the indicated receptor were incubated with PDGF-BB for 1 h on ice. Cells were washed and treated with bis(sulfosuccinimidyl)-suberate (BS3) to crosslink membrane protein complexes. PDGF receptors were isolated from cell protein extracts using wheat germ agglutinin-coupled beads. Western blot was performed with anti-PDGFRA antibodies. (b) Top-scoring predicted conformation of the mutant PDGFRA transmembrane dimer (magenta) superimposed with left-handed nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR) conformation (green) of PDGFRB dimer. Crossing angles of dimer conformations and backbone root-mean-square deviations (RMSDs) between them are given. Peptides are shown in cartoon-and-stick representation. (c) Normalized packing score (FCSCOR) of the wild type (WT) and the mutant PDGFRA transmembrane dimers plotted as functions of the dimer crossing angle (χ). For each dimer, three top-scoring conformations (numbered ‘1’, ‘2’ and ‘3’) are shown. See Supplementary Figure 2 for conformation details. Left- and right-handed dimer conformations are shown in cartoon-and-stick representation.  Full figure and legend (174K)  To understand better the structural origin of the receptor constitutive activation induced by the V536E mutation, we performed molecular modeling of possible conformations of PDGFRA transmembrane helix dimer using PREDDIMER approach.26 Transmembrane helices of PDGFRA were predicted to form several distinctive top-scoring dimer conformations similar to those of PDGFRB (Figure 5b and Supplementary Figure 2). We found that the substitution of respective valine for glutamic acid is likely to change the packing efficiency of the predicted dimer conformations and may induce a repopulation of the dimer conformational ensemble. Taking into account an observed gap between packing efficiencies of the transmembrane dimer conformations (calculated according to the scoring function) in mutant V536E receptor, the left-handed conformation is likely to be predominant, whereas the right-handed one is predicted to be less populated (Figure 5c). In contrast, we observed the reverse situation for WT receptor. In addition, the packing efficiency of both WT conformations are relatively more similar to each other. Finally, the mutation has no effect on the packing efficiency ofthe parallel transmembrane dimer conformation (Figure 5c). Previously, nuclear magnetic resonance-derived left-handed conformation of PDGFRB transmembrane dimer (Figure 5b) was proposed to correspond to activated state of the receptor.27 Taking together this assumption with results of our modeling, we speculate that the V536E mutation might favor PDGFRA transmembrane dimer in the activated state and obstruct the conformational transition of the receptor to the inactive one. Similar situation has been recently observed by modeling for ErbB2-Neu* V664Q transmembrane mutant,26 where the analogues mutation increased the dimer packing efficiency relative to the WT and favored the left-handed over theright-handed dimer conformations.  The F808L mutant is devoid of kinase activity Proliferation and luciferase assays suggested that the F808L mutant was unable to respond to PDGF stimulation, even though it was expressed at the cell surface. To test the kinase activity of this mutant, we first overexpressed it in HEK293T cells. Figure 6 shows that F808L was not significantly phosphorylated on tyrosines by contrast to WT and D842V receptors. Then, we performed an in vitro kinase assay after receptor immunoprecipitation. The phosphorylation of the WT and D842V receptors was enhanced in the presence of ATP, but F808L remains unphosphorylated, indicating it is a kinase-dead mutant (Figure 6). Figure 6. Figure 6 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author F808L is a kinase dead mutant. (a) HEK293T cells were transiently transfected with the indicated receptor. Four hours before lysis, cells were treated with imatinib 0.5 μm. PDGFRA was immunoprecipitated (IP) from lysates and analyzed by westernblot (WB) with anti-phospho-tyrosine or anti-PDGFRA antibodies.(b) Alternatively, immunoprecipitates were incubated with ATP (50 μm) in kinase buffer for 10 min. Receptor phosphorylation was analyzed by WB and quantified using the Odyssey technology. The ratio between the receptor phosphorylation and the total receptor expression was calculated. It is normalized to the wild-type (WT) levels (average of three experiments).  Full figure and legend (49K)  The E996K mutant is not expressed in the cell line in which it was identified The E996K mutant was identified in the LB373-MEL cell line, derived from a melanoma metastasis.19 The mutation was absent in immortalized lymphocytes from the same patient confirming that it was an acquired cancer variant. We confirmed the presence of a heterozygous somatic mutation in the genomic DNA of LB373-MEL (data not shown), but we were unable to detect the PDGFRA protein or transcript, compared with positive controls (Figure 7). In conclusion, the E996K mutation, which did not confer any growth advantage in our assays, was not expressed inLB373-MEL cells. Figure 7. Figure 7 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author E996K is not expressed in the cell line in which it was identified. (a) LB373-MEL cells were stained with anti-PDGFRA antibodies and phycoerythrin-linked anti-mouse-IgG. Cells were analyzed by flow cytometry. 32D cells transfected with PDGFRA were used as a positive control. (b) RNA was extracted from LB373-MEL cells and analyzed by reverse transcription–PCR using primers specific for PDGFRA or RPLP0 (as a control). HepG2 cells, which do not express PDGFRA, and AG01518 human fibroblasts were used as negative and positive controls, respectively.  Full figure and legend (52K)  Top of page Discussion Among 10 uncharacterized mutations, V536E was the onlygain-of-function variant that we identified. To our knowledge, this is the first cancer mutation described in the PDGF receptors transmembrane domain. A similar V664E mutation in ErbB2/Neu was shown to induce the receptor constitutive tyrosine kinase activity.24 Activating point mutations in the transmembrane segment have also been found in other receptor tyrosine kinases, such as c-KIT and FGFR3.3 The insertion of two correctly positioned glutamic residues in a simplified valine-based transmembrane domain is enough to activate PDGFRB and ErbB2/Neu.28 In addition, the importance of the transmembrane domain for PDGFRB activation was underlined by studies showing that this domain is essential for transformation by the ETV6-PDGFRB fusion and by the bovine papillomavirus E5 protein.22 It was recently shown that the PDGFRB transmembrane domain is able to form a stable left-handed helical dimer in artificial membranes.27 In this structure, V543, which is homologous to PDGFRA V536, is located at the edge of the interface (Figure 5a). The PDGFRA-V539E mutant is likely to populate this dimeric conformation by increasing the packing efficiency of the transmembrane helix dimer, as suggested by modeling. A similar situation was predicted for the rat ErbB2-Neu* V664Q transmembrane mutant.26 Recently, active and inactive dimer conformations of the EGF receptor transmembrane domain have been reported, supporting the hypothesis that the conformation of this domain has a critical role in receptor tyrosine kinase activation.29, 30 Our model also predicts that the orientation and the angle between the two helices in the left-handed dimer is affected by the V536E mutation, which may optimally positions the two kinase domains facing each other in the receptor dimer. In conclusion, we suggest that the V536E substitution affects the conformation of the transmembrane domain dimer rather than dimerization itself. Further experiments are required to decipher the exact mechanism of constitutive PDGF receptor activation by this mutation.  Based on initial reports, PDGFRA mutation screenings in GIST usually focus on exons 12 and 18, which encode the juxtamembrane domain and the activation loop.4 We suggest that sequencing exon 11, encoding the transmembrane domain, may reveal additional clinically relevant PDGFRA mutations in GIST.  Two mutants, F808L and W349C, did not show any sign of activation and did not respond to PDGF stimulation for different reasons. Interestingly, these two residues were perfectlyconserved in vertebrate PDGFRA as well as in the related human receptors PDGFRB, c-KIT, FLT3, CSF1R and VEGFRs (Supplementary Table I). In the c-KIT structure, W349 mediates key interactions with distant amino acids.31 This mutation may therefore interfere with PDGFRA folding. The W349C protein appeared as a single immature band and failed to traffic to the plasma membrane. Although a cysteine at position 349 may induce the formation of a new aberrant cysteine bridge, we failed to detect covalent W349C dimeric complex. W349 is also located close to two predictedN-glycosylation sites (N353LT and N359LT). The mutation may thus block the glycosylation of these sites or prevent the traffic to the Golgi where the receptor undergoes its final glycosylation steps. In agreement with its absence at the cell surface, W349C did not respond to the addition of exogenous PDGF. In addition,co-transfection of a PDGF-B cDNA did not activate the mutant receptor either. This may result from the disruption of the Ig-like domain 4, which is essential for PDGFRA signal transduction.32 The second defective mutation, F808L, is located nearby the activation loop and disrupted the kinase activity. A similar kinase dead mutation has been described in the receptor tyrosine kinase ALK in neuroblastoma.33 Even if F808L was supporting leukemia development by an unknown mechanism independent of the receptor kinase activity, leukemia patients carrying this mutation are unlikely to benefit from imatinib therapy. Altogether, these two variants likely represent passenger mutations. Nevertheless, we cannot rule out the possibility that they provide an advantage to tumor cells in a particular molecular environment.  Seven mutations produced no particular phenotype and may also be classified as passenger mutations. These residues are conserved in mammalian PDGFRA except V469, which is replaced by an isoleucine in some species (Supplementary Table I). Interestingly, this valine is substituted by an alanine in Tetraodon nigroviridis, mimicking the V469A mutation found in a malignant peripheral nerve sheath tumor. These seven amino acids are poorly conserved in receptors related to PDGFRA. Remarkably, N870 is replaced by a serine in PDGFRB, supporting our conclusion that N870S does not affect PDGF receptors significantly. The original report did not formally exclude that this allele corresponds to a rare polymorphism rather than a somatic mutation.18 In the case of E996K, we had access to the original cell line in which this somatic mutation had been identified,19 but which did not express any detectable PDGFRA protein or transcript. This observation supports the hypothesis that E996K is a passenger mutation, although we cannot rule out the possibility that the receptor was expressed in the original tumor cells and was lost during the adaptation to cell culture.  Three mutations are located in the C-terminal tail, which is unique to PDGFRA, except the last five amino acids, which are also present in PDGFRB.34 This C-terminal motif, which is lost in the S1049CH* frame shift mutant,20 was suggested to recruit PTEN via NHERF adaptor proteins, thereby limiting the activation of the PI3K pathway.35 However, we did not observe any significant increase in PKB phosphorylation downstream this mutant (data not shown). The role of the C-terminal domain of PDGFRA remains to be established.  The occurrence of passenger mutations in cancer genome was highlighted by high throughput sequencing projects.19, 36 Mutation recurrence in multiple patients has been widely used as a criterion to select driver cancer mutations. In this respect, after the initial submission of the present manuscript, the V536E mutation was described in a second glioblastoma patient.21 However, W349C was also reported in two patients.10 The recurrence criterion is also too restrictive because unique cancer variants may be clinically relevant. For instance, several patients with non-recurrent PDGFR fusions genes were successfully treated with imatinib.3 To predict the impact of single-nucleotide variant on protein function, several algorithms based on sequence homologies and structural data have been developed, such as SIFT and PolyPhen.37 For five out of eight mutations present in the database, PolyPhen matched our results (Supplementary Table I). In this set of mutations, the conservation with receptors related to PDGFRA (FLT3, KIT, CSF1R and VEGFRs) was best correlated with the observed functional impact. These tests do not predict whether a given variant leads to a gain of function or a loss of function, a piece of information that is essential in oncology. Therefore, a thorough experimental analysis of cancer mutations remains essential.  After the initial submission of this paper, three novel PDGFRA mutations—among many others—were reported in diffuse large B-cell lymphoma.38 Based on the criteria mentioned above, they may also represent passenger mutations (Supplementary Table I).  Our results confirm the occurrence of activating mutations in glioblastoma, in which two activated PDGFRA variants have been previously described.11, 12 Whether these patients could be more sensitive to kinase inhibitors remains to be studied. By contrast, our observations do not support the existence of driver PDGFRA point mutations in acute myeloid leukemia or malignant peripheral nerve sheath tumors. In the latter tumors, other alterations, namely PDGFRA gene amplification or autocrine loops, may activate WT and mutant receptors.17 Such alterations have also been described in glioblastomas.10 The presence of both activating and passenger alterations in glioblastoma, which was also recently reported in idiopathic hypereosinophilia, may reflect a particularly high PDGFRA mutation rate in these cancers. In line with this hypothesis, the proneural subtype of glioblastoma, in which PDGFRA is expressed, is associated with a higher frequency of the hypermutator phenotype.10  Altogether, we identified a number of key residues for PDGFRA function and characterized a novel type of imatinib-sensitive PDGFRA-activating mutation in the transmembrane segment. Our work underlines the importance of characterizing PDGF receptor mutations in a systematic manner. This is a major issue in the development of personalized targeted therapies.  Top of page Materials and methods Reagents and plasmids The human PDGFRA cDNA was subcloned in pEF-MYC-CYTO (Invitrogen/Life Technologies, Gent, Belgium), which allowed a high expression level in Ba/F3, compensating the fast turn-over of the receptor in these cells.39 A Flag tag was inserted after the signal peptide. Mutations were introduced by Quickchange (Stratagene/Agilent technologies, Diegem, Belgium) and confirmed by sequencing (Macrogen, Seoul, Korea). Western blots were performed as described34 with anti-PDGFRA (1:200, Santa Cruz, Santa Cruz, CA, USA, #951), PY99 (1:200, Santa Cruz), anti-phospho-Y694-STAT5 (1:1000, Signalway Antibodies, College Park, MD, USA), anti-STAT5, anti-phospho-AKT, anti-AKT, anti-phospho-ERK-1/2 (1:1000, Cell Signaling Technologies, Danvers, MA, USA) and anti-ERK2 (1:1000, EET rabbit antiserum34). Imatinib mesylate was purchased from LC Laboratories (Woburn, MA, USA). Cell culture and transfections HEK293T cells were cultured in Dulbecco’s modified Eagle’s medium with fetal calf serum (10%) and antibiotics (Invitrogen). Cells were transfected using the calcium phosphate method as described.39 Ba/F3 cells were cultured in the same medium supplemented with IL3 (200 U/ml). Cells were electroporated as described elsewhere40 and selected in the presence of G418 (3 mg/ml). Transfected cell populations were sorted by flow cytometry after staining with a monoclonal anti-PDGFRA antibody (R&D systems, Minneapolis, MN, USA, MAB1264) and anti-mouse immunoglobulin labeled with phycoerythrin (Jackson Laboratories, Bar Harbor, ME, USA). A few days later, homogeneous PDGFRA expression was confirmed using the same antibodies by flow cytometry. For proliferation assays, cells were washed three times to remove IL3 and seeded in 96-well plates (104 cells/well in 200 μl of medium with 10% serum) without cytokine, with PDGF-BB (20 ng/ml, Peprotec, London, UK) or IL3 (200 U/ml). After 20 h, [3H]-thymidine (0.5 μCi, GE Healthcare, Diegem, Belgium) was added to each well for 4 h. Cells were harvested and the radioactivity incorporated into DNA was counted using a TopCount instrument (Perkin Elmer, Waltham, MA, USA). LB373-MEL cells were kindly provided by Francis Brasseur (Ludwig Institute for Cancer Research, Brussels, Belgium) and were cultured in Iscove-Dulbecco medium with fetal calf serum (10%) and essential amino acids. Cells were analyzed by flow cytometry as described above. mRNA was extracted using a Qiagen kit and PDGFRA expression was measured by quantitative reverse transcription–PCR as described41 using AG01518 human fibroblasts and HEPG2 hepatocarcinoma cells as positive and negative controls, respectively.42 The expression of the house keeping gene RPLP0 was used as control. The sequence of the 996 codon was confirmed by sequencing of multiple clones obtained after PCR amplification of genomic DNA using the oligonucleotides 5′-CGTGTGGACTCAGACAATGCA-3′ and 5′-GGCAGAGGAATGATGTAGCCA-3′ in PDGFRA exon 22.  Transformation assay Low-passage NIH3T3 cells (American Type Culture Collection, Manassas, VA, USA) were transfected as described.33, 43 Briefly, 4.5 × 104 cells were seeded the day before into collagen-coated 12-well plates and transfected for 6 h with 0.5 μg of DNA (pEF-MYC-CYTO vector containing PDGFRA WT, D842V, V536E or W349C) and 1.4 μl of Lipofectamine 2000 in 0.3 ml of Opti-MEM (both from Invitrogen). Twenty-four hours after transfection, three-fifth of the cells from each well were transferred to wells in collagen-coated six-well plates and kept in Dulbecco’s modified Eagle’s medium (10% fetal calf serum and 0.5 mg/ml G418) until the cells reached confluence. Thereafter, cells were kept in Dulbecco’s modified Eagle’s medium(5% fetal calf serum and 0.25 mg/ml G418) for approximately 10 days. Three weeks after transfection, the cells were fixed using methanol and plates were stained with crystal violet. Western blot, immunoprecipitation and crosslinking These experiments were performed essentially as described.22, 44 Briefly, Ba/F3 cells expressing PDGFRA were washed and incubated in the absence of IL3 for 4 h. In signaling studies, cells were restimulated for 15 min with PDGF-BB (25 ng/ml) or IL3 (200 U/ml) at 37 °C, washed and lysed inSDS–polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis sample buffer. For crosslinking studies, 2 × 106 cells were stimulated with PDGF-BB (100 ng/ml) for 1 h on ice to prevent endocytosis. Cells were washed with phosphate-buffered saline and treated with bis(sulfosuccinimidyl)-suberate (Pierce/Thermoscientific, Rockford, IL, USA, 1 mm) for 1 h on ice in 200 μl phosphate-buffered saline. Glycine (3.5 mm, final concentration) was then added to stop the reaction before protein extraction in lysis buffer. PDGF receptors were isolated with wheat germ agglutinin-coupled agarose beads (Sigma-Aldrich, St Louis, MO, USA). Beads were extensively washed and proteins were eluted with sample buffer for western blot analysis with anti-PDGFRA antibodies. Luciferase assays MCF7 and PAE cells were plated in six-well plates, respectively, at 300 000 and 150 000 cells/ well. After one day, cells were transfected with a luciferase construct controlled by serum response elements (0.5 μg)or STAT-response elements (GRR5, 0.5 μg),44 pDRIVEchEF1-RU5(β-galactosidase reporter, Invitrogen, 0.5 μg), pEF-MYC-CYTO-PDGFRA (0.25 μg) and PDGF-B (0.25 μg)2 in the presence of Fugene HD (for MCF7, Promega) or Lipofectamine 2000 (for PAE, Invitrogen). After 24 h, cells were lysed and luciferase activity was measured recommended by the manufacturer (Promega). β-Galactosidase levels were used to normalize the results as described.42 Modeling methods Spatial structures of the dimers formed by transmembrane helical fragments of the WT PDGFRA and its V536E mutant were built using PREDDIMER algorithm starting from their sequences (see Figure 5b) as described elsewhere.26 For calculations of backbone root-mean-square deviations between the predicted models and PDGFRB transmembrane dimer, its nuclear magnetic resonance structure was used (2L6W27). Packing efficiencies of the predicted dimers were estimated according to values of PREDDIMER scoring function (FSCOR). Normalized values of FCSCOR for a combined set of three top ranked of PDGFRA-WT and PDGFRA-V536E dimer conformations were calculated as: FCSCOR=(FSCOR −left fenceFSCORright fence)/std.FSCOR, where left fenceFSCORright fence and std.FSCOR are the mean and standard deviation within the set.  
892||Purpose: Platelet-derived growth factor receptor α (PDGFRA) is a target for tyrosine kinase inhibitor (TKI)-based targeted therapy. Dysregulation of PDGFRA has been reported in many cancers. However, PDGFRA mutations in melanomas have not been well studied. We analyzed the genetic mutations of PDGFRA in Chinese patients with melanoma and determined the inhibitory potency of TKIs, such as imatinib and crenolanib, on mutant PDGFRA.  Experimental Design: Of note, 351 melanoma tissue samples were examined for genetic mutations in exons 12, 14, and 18 of PDGFRA. Activities of mutations in response to imatinib and crenolanib were analyzed by Western blotting of tyrosine-phosphorylated PDGFRA and cell proliferation assays.  Results: PDGFRA mutations were observed in 4.6% (16 of 351) of melanomas, and these mutations were mainly detected in acral and mucosal melanomas. PDGFRA mutations seem to be mutually exclusive with KIT mutations, but may coexist with BRAF and NRAS mutations. The genetic mutations of PDGFRA were unrelated to the age, thickness, and ulceration status of primary melanomas. Thirteen mutations were not reported before, and five (P577S, V658A, R841K, H845Y, and G853D) of them resulted in strong autophosphorylation of PDGFRA. Crenolanib showed higher potency than imatinib in inhibiting the kinase activity of PDGFRA. Except that V658A mutation was imatinib-resistant, all the other mutations were sensitive to both imatinib and crenolanib.  Conclusions: PDGFRA mutations are detected in a small population of melanoma patients. Our study suggests that patients with melanoma harboring certain PDGFRA mutations may benefit from imatinib and crenolanib treatment. Clin Cancer Res; 19(24); 6935–42. ©2013 AACR.  Translational Relevance  The incidence of melanoma is increasing worldwide. Similar to KIT, PDGFRA is a type III receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK) and a potential target for tyrosine kinase inhibitors (TKIs), such as imatinib and crenolanib, in cancer treatments. Genetic mutations of PDGFRA have been reported in many cancers, but its mutations in melanomas have not been well studied. Moreover, sensitivity of PDGFRA mutants to TKIs has not been fully evaluated. Defined sensitivity of mutant PDGFRA to TKIs might provide stratification criteria for patients with melanoma, who would benefit from TKI-based targeted therapy. Our study demonstrates that PDGFRA mutations are detected in a small population of melanoma patients, primarily in acral and mucosal melanomas. Our study suggests that a subgroup of patients with melanoma harboring PDGFRA mutations may benefit from TKIs, casting new light in the selection of melanoma patients sensitive to TKIs, such as imatinib and crenolanib.  Introduction  Melanoma is the most aggressive skin cancer with the fastest increasing incidence rate. From 2005 to 2009, the age-adjusted incidence rate was 21.0 per 100,000 men and women per year in the United States (1). Metastatic melanoma is difficult to treat as standard chemotherapy [high-dose interleukin (IL)-2 and dacarbazine] cannot significantly improve the overall survival (OS; ref. 2). Targeted therapeutic agents have shown promising clinical efficacy, such as BRAF inhibitors (e.g., vemurafenib and dabrafenib; refs. 3, 4), KIT inhibitor (imatinib; refs. 5, 6), and MAP–ERK kinase (MEK) inhibitor (trametinib; ref. 7). Although about 50% of melanomas harbors BRAF mutation in Caucasians (8), we have previously shown that KIT, BRAF, and NRAS mutation rates in Chinese patients with melanoma are 10.8%, 25.5%, and 7.2%, respectively (9, 10). Therefore, uncovering other potential driver oncogenic mutations will help to identify patients with melanoma who may benefit from targeted therapeutic agents.  Platelet-derived growth factor receptor α polypeptide (PDGFRA, also known as CD140A) belongs to the type III receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK) subfamily, and regulates cell proliferation, differentiation, survival, and tumor progression (11, 12). Dysregulation of PDGFRA has been reported in several cancers (12–16). PDGFRA is overexpressed in some melanomas and the increased copy number has also been reported previously (17, 18). The mutational analysis of PDGFRA is relatively limited in melanoma despite that one intronic mutation of PDGFRA has been reported in ocular melanoma (18–20). Some patients with gastrointestinal stromal tumors (GIST) bearing PDGFRA mutations have benefited from molecular therapeutic agents (21).  Imatinib is a tyrosine kinase inhibitor (TKI) against BCR-ABL, KIT, and PDGFRA. It is the first-line therapy for chronic myelogenous leukemia and has been approved by U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) for the treatment of patients with advanced GIST in 2002 (21, 22). The latest National Comprehensive Cancer Network (NCCN) guidelines have suggested imatinib as a treatment of KIT-mutated melanomas (23). Crenolanib is a PDGFR-specific TKI that significantly inhibits the kinase activity of PDGFRA (24). Several phase II clinical trials are ongoing, including a trial of crenolanib in advanced GIST with D842-related mutations and deletions in PDGFRA (NCT01243346).  Considering that the mutational status of PDGFRA in melanomas has not been fully evaluated and that PDGFRA is a potential target for TKIs-based targeted therapy, we collected 351 melanoma tissue samples and examined the mutational status of PDGFRA. Kinase activities of these mutated PDGFRA as well as their sensitivity to imatinib and crenolanib were also evaluated.  Materials and Methods  Tumor samples  A total of 351 archival formalin-fixed and paraffin-embedded (FFPE) melanomas (including 316 primary melanomas and 35 metastatic melanomas) were derived from Peking University Cancer Hospital & Institute (Beijing, China) between 2006 and 2011. Clinical data, including age, gender, stage, thickness, and ulceration, were collected. This study was reviewed and approved by the medical ethics committee of the Peking University Cancer Hospital & Institute.  DNA extraction and mutation detection  Genomic DNA was extracted from FFPE specimens using the QIAamp DNA FFPE Tissue Kit (Qiagen) according to the manufacturer's instruction. Exons 12, 14, and 18 of PDGFRA were amplified by PCR in at least two separate preparations of genomic DNA. The primers and annealing temperatures were listed in Supplementary Table S1. The PCR products purification and sequencing were performed as described previously (9, 10).  Cells  293T (catalog no. ACC-635) and Ba/F3 (catalog no. ACC-300) cells were initially obtained from Leibniz Institute DSMZ (Braunschweig, Germany) and cultured as recommended. 293T cells are highly transfectable derivative of the human primary embryonal kidney cell line 293 (ACC-305), carrying a plasmid containing the temperature-sensitive mutant of SV-40 large T-antigen, which were authenticated by morphology assays (fibroblastoid cells growing adherently as monolayer), PCR assays of large T antigens, 293 cell-specific short tandem repeat markers, and cytogenetic karyotypes assays. Ba/F3 cells are IL-3–dependent murine pro-B cell line derived from C3H mouse strain, which were authenticated by morphology assays (single, round cells in suspension), PCR assays of mouse species-specific markers, immunologic assays (CD11b−F4/80+), and cytogenetic karyotypes assays. Both cell lines were confirmed to be negative for the common microorganisms. Detailed information for authentication of these cells could be obtained online (http://www.dsmz.de).  Plasmid construction and lentiviral packaging  The wild-type (WT) PDGFRA cDNA was amplified from melanoma cDNA by PCR and subcloned into the expression vector pLenti PGK Neo DEST (w531-1; Addgene). All the PDGFRA-mutant cDNAs were generated by site-directed mutagenesis as previously described (25). All vectors were confirmed by bidirectional sequencing. The lentiviral expression vector, psPAX2 packaging vector, and pMD2.G envelop vector were added into 293T cells using Fugene 6 transfection reagent (Promega). The virus-containing supernatants were harvested, filtered through a 0.45-μm cellulose acetate filter (Millipore) at 48 and 72 hours, and concentrated using Lenti-X Concentrator (Clontech).  Cell cultures and transfections  293T cells were grown in Dulbecco's modified Eagle medium (DMEM) medium (Invitrogen), supplemented with 10% FBS (Hyclone) and penicillin/streptomycin (Invitrogen). Ba/F3 cells (a kind gift from Dr. Wei Tong, Children's Hospital of Philadelphia, University of Pennsylvania, Philadelphia, PA) were grown in RPMI-1640 medium with GlutaMAX (Invitrogen), supplemented with 10% FBS, 10 ng/mL IL-3 (Invitrogen), and penicillin/streptomycin. Virus was added onto 293T or Ba/F3 cells with polybrene. Ba/F3 clones were selected by 1 mg/mL G418 and followed by IL-3–independent growth. DNA from stably transfected cell lines was extracted and sequenced to confirm the presence of mutant PDGFRA sequence.  Immunoprecipitation and Western blotting  Cells were lysed using PhosphoSafe Extraction Reagent (Millipore) and protein extracts were immunoprecipitated with rabbit anti-human PDGFRA polyclonal antibody (C-20; Santa Cruz Biotechnology) and Protein A/G beads (Sigma-Aldrich). Western blotting was performed with mouse anti-phosphotyrosine antibody (4G10; Millipore) and PDGFRA antibody. The procedures were carried out as described previously (26).  Assessment of PDGFRA kinase activity  Imatinib and crenolanib were purchased from Selleckchem and resolved in dimethyl sulfoxide (DMSO) at the concentration of 10 mmol/L and stocked at −80°C. Ba/F3 cells were treated with vehicle alone or various concentrations of kinase inhibitors for 90 minutes. Protein lysates were extracted and subjected to immunoprecipitation and Western blotting.  Cell proliferation assays  Ba/F3 cells transfected with various PDGFRA mutants were seeded into 96-well plates at a density of 2 × 104 cells per well and incubated with different concentrations of imatinib or crenolanib for 72 hours, the proliferation and viability was measured by CCK-8 (Dojindo) according to the manufacturer's instruction.  Statistical analysis  Statistical analyses were performed using SPSS 16.0 software. Continuous data such as age and thickness were described using mean ± SD for normally distributed data. The correlations between mutational status and clinical parameters were evaluated by χ2 test or Fisher exact test. All statistical analyses were two sided and P < 0.05 was considered as statistically significant.  Results  Genetic mutations of PDGFRA in melanoma subtypes  Of a total of 351 melanomas analyzed, 16 (4.6%) of them were identified to contain PDGFRA mutations. The mutation frequencies of PDGFRA in acral, mucosal, melanomas on skin without chronic sun-induced damage (non-CSD) melanoma subtypes were 6.8% (9 of 132), 3.6% (4 of 110), and 1.8% (1 of 56), respectively. No PDGFRA mutation was found in melanomas on skin with CSD (Table 1).  View inlineView popup Table 1. Genetic mutations of PDGFRA in melanoma subtypes Mutation types of PDGFRA in melanoma  Sixteen melanomas were found to harbor PDGFRA mutations and 18 different mutations were detected, all of which were heterozygous point mutations (Table 2 and Supplementary Figs. S1–S3). In addition to previously reported five mutations (V561A, K646E, H816Y, L839P, and Y849C; refs. 27–30), the other 13 mutations were novel (Table 2). No common mutation was found. Among the 18 PDGFRA mutations, five mutations were located in juxtamembrane domain (exon 12, 27.8%), five and eight mutations were identified in the first and second tyrosine kinase domain separately (exon 14, 27.8%; exon 18, 44.4%). A premature stop mutation (Q639stop) was observed in one patient. Two patients harbored two different missense point mutations simultaneously, one harbored two mutations in exon 14 (V658A) and 18 (R841K) separately, and the other harbored two mutations both in exon 12 (V561A and Q579R). No mutation was detected in codon 842, which was the most prevalence mutation reported in GISTs (13). All the mutations, including those obtained from The Cancer Genome Atlas (TCGA) database and those reported here, are illustrated in Fig. 1 (31). To exclude the possibility that the detected mutations were due to polymorphisms, we extracted DNA from the peripheral blood mononuclear cells from all the 16 patients harboring PDGFRA mutations and examined the mutation status of PDGFRA. No mutations in exons 12, 14, and 18 of PDGFRA were detected, indicating that the mutations detected by us are indeed somatic mutations.  Figure 1. Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 1. Distribution of mutations in PDGFRA. PDGFRA somatic mutations found in our study and TCGA database were shown. The mutations found in our study were underlined. Boxes represent functional domains: I–V, five immunoglobulin-like domain; TM, transmembrane domain; JM, juxtamembrane domain; TK1, tyrosine kinase domain 1; KI, kinase insert domain; TK2, tyrosine kinase domain 2. View inlineView popup Table 2. Mutation types of PDGFRA in melanoma To analyze the relationship of PDGFRA mutations to other important mutations in melanoma, we further screened the KIT, BRAF, and NRAS sequences as previously described (9, 10). We found two BRAFV600E mutations, one NRASQ61L mutation and zero KIT mutation in samples harboring PDGFRA mutations. Four BRAF mutations, five NRAS mutations, and zero PDGFRA mutation were found in 36 samples containing KIT mutations (data not shown).  Correlation of PDGFRA mutations to the clinical characteristics of melanoma  The summary of correlations between PDGFRA mutations and clinical characteristics is shown in Table 3. Both the age and the proportion of gender were not significantly different between patients with PDGFRA mutations and those without a PDGFRA mutation.  View inlineView popup Table 3. Correlation of PDGFRA genotype to clinical characteristics of melanoma As the Breslow thickness of melanoma is an important prognostic indicator (32), we analyzed the thickness of melanoma samples. Among the 310 samples with thickness data available, the average thickness of samples with PDGFRA mutations was 5.85 mm ± 2.66 mm, whereas that of samples without PDGFRA mutations was 4.87 mm ± 2.64 mm (P = 0.194).  Ulceration is another adverse prognostic factor for melanoma (32). The overall ulceration rate of 311 available samples was 58.8% (183 of 311). The ulceration rate in acral, mucosal, non-CSD, and CSD were 63.1%, 54.2%, 56.4%, and 61.1%, respectively. The ulceration rate was not significantly different in patients with PDGFRA mutations and those without PDGFRA mutations (P = 0.437).  Among the 16 patients with PDGFRA mutations, stage data were available in 15 patients. The percentages of PDGFRA mutations at stage I, II, III, and IV were not significantly different from those with WT PDGFRA (P = 0.217). Among the 6 patients in stage III and IV of disease with PDGFRA mutations, tumor samples from primary sites and metastatic sites were available for 3 of them. Mutational analysis showed that the PDGFRA mutations were the same for the primary and metastatic melanomas.  In addition, the relationship of PDGFRA mutations with melanoma subtypes was analyzed. In the 316 patients with subtype information available, the PDGFRA mutation frequency was not significantly different in melanomas subtypes (P = 0.419). Nevertheless, PDGFRA mutations were more commonly seen in acral and mucosal melanomas, whereas non-CSD and CSD melanomas were less likely to harbor PDGFRA mutations. When comparing PDGFRA mutations in three subtypes of melanomas (acral, mucosal, and nonacral cutaneous melanomas), we found that the PDGFRA mutation frequency was still not significantly different (P = 0.176).  Functional analysis of PDGFRA mutations  To investigate whether the somatic mutations could induce PDGFRA protein auto-activation, 12 novel missense mutants were overexpressed in 293T cells. The tyrosine phosphorylation levels of these PDGFRAs were analyzed by Western blotting. Because D842V was demonstrated to be the most common activating mutation in GISTs, it was used as the positive control. Strong phosphorylation was observed in P577S, V658A, R841K, H845Y, and G853D mutations without the stimulation of PDGF ligand, whereas the other mutations showed weak to medium phosphorylation (Fig. 2A). The five mutations were then transfected into Ba/F3 cells, and the results showed that transfected Ba/F3 cells could grow after G418 selection and withdrawal of IL-3 (Fig. 2B). Therefore, P577S, V658A, R841K, H845Y and G853D substitutions may be gain-of-function mutations. The substitution mutations P577S and V658A may be homologs for the P573S and V654A mutations reported in KIT respectively (33, 34).  Figure 2. Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 2. Activation status of PDGFRA mutations in 293T cells. A, 293T cells were transfected with blank vector, expression vector for WT and mutant(s) PDGFRA. Transfected cells were serum-starved overnight, and Western blotting was used to analyze the phosphorylation levels of PDGFRA after immunoprecipitation. B, Ba/F3 cells transduced with indicated vectors were cultured in the presence or absence of IL-3 after G418 selection, and cell numbers were determined by CCK-8 proliferation assays. Results were presented as mean ± SD of triplicate samples. WT, WT PDGFRA. The experiments were repeated three times with similar results. In vitro sensitivity of PDGFRA gain-of-function mutations to imatinib and crenolanib  To analyze the effects of imatinib and crenolanib on gain-of-function mutations of PDGFRA, the representative PDGFRA mutants were expressed in Ba/F3 cells. The tyrosine phosphorylation status of PDGFRA was detected under different drug concentrations. As others have demonstrated that D842Y was sensitive to imatinib while D842V was resistant to imatinib, they were used as positive and negative control separately (13). Phosphorylation induced by D842Y was completely inhibited at the concentration of 1 μmol/L while D842V was still strongly phosphorylated (Supplementary Fig. S4). D842V was fully inhibited at the crenolanib concentration of 0.1 μmol/L, being consistent with Heinrich and colleagues' report (24).  The six testing mutations were all sensitive to crenolanib and the phosphorylation was completely inhibited at the concentration of 1 μmol/L. V561A, P577S, R841K, H845Y, and G853D were sensitive to imatinib, only V658A was imatinib-resistant. Therefore, imatinib and crenolanib had same inhibitory efficiency on V561A and G853D, whereas crenolanib showed stronger inhibitory effect than imatinib on P577S, V658A, R841K, and H845Y (Fig. 3A).  Figure 3. Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 3. Effects of imatinib and crenolanib on autophosphorylation of mutational PDGFRA. A, Ba/F3 cells were transfected with PDGFRA cDNA encoding for different mutations, and positive cells were selected for G418 resistance and IL-3 independence. Ba/F3 cells were incubated with dissolvent or imatinib/crenolanib at different concentrations for 90 minutes. Whole-cell lysates were extracted and Western blotting was used to analyze the phosphorylation levels of immunoprecipitated PDGFRA. B, Ba/F3 cells bearing mutant PDGFRA were incubated for 72 hours in the presence or absence of different concentrations of imatinib or crenolanib. Cell numbers were determined by CCK-8 proliferation assays. Results were presented as mean ± SD of triplicate samples. The experiments were repeated three times with similar results. To confirm the observations, cell proliferation assays were performed in selected PDGFRA mutants. IL-3–independent growth of V658A and D842V was inhibited by crenolanib, while still sustained in the presence of imatinib. R841K and D842Y induced IL-3–independent growth was almost fully inhibited by either imatinib or crenolanib at the concentration of 1 μmol/L (Fig. 3B). Moreover, P577S and G853D induced IL-3–independent growth could also be inhibited by either imatinib or crenolanib to different extent. However, both imatinib and crenolanib could not significantly inhibit IL-3–dependent growth of Ba/F3 cells even at the concentration of 1 μmol/L (data not shown).  Discussion  The treatment of advanced melanoma is still challenging. Ipilimumab (Yervoy) and vemurafenib (Zelboraf) have been approved by the FDA for the treatment of advanced melanoma. Ipilimumab is the only monotherapy reported to prolong OS with the longest duration time, but the overall response rate is only limited, and side effects can be severe due to hepatoxicity and immune-related adverse events (35, 36). Unlike immunotherapy, targeted therapeutic agents showed fewer side effects. Vemurafenib is the first targeted inhibitor approved by FDA and European Commission for the treatment of patients with advanced melanoma. About 50% of metastatic melanomas harboring BRAFV600E and majority of these patients responded to vemurafenib, with a median OS of approximately 16 months. But the response only lasts 5 to 8 months, and most patients eventually progressed because of acquired resistance (3, 8, 37, 38). The prevalence of BRAF mutation is only 25.5% in Chinese patients with melanoma, which was due to acral and mucosal melanomas have much lower BRAF mutation rates (8, 10). KIT mutation is another common genetic aberration in acral and mucosal melanomas, as acral and mucosal melanomas are the common subtypes in China; the total mutation rate of KIT in Chinese patients with melanoma is much higher than that in Caucasians, such as in Australia and Portland (39, 40). The rate of total disease control was about 50% when patients with melanoma harboring KIT mutations were treated with imatinib, but acquired resistance developed within 3 to 4 months (5, 6). These data indicate that other druggable therapeutic targets are needed for melanoma.  In this study, we have examined the frequency and function of PDGFRA mutations in a cohort of 351 Chinese patients with melanoma. The overall mutation rate in our study was 4.6%. Mutations of PDGFRA are more likely to be happened in acral and mucosal melanomas, as indicated by higher mutation incidence than other subtypes. On the basis of the literature to date, only few studies have examined PDGFRA mutation analysis in melanoma, and no PDGFRA exon mutation was reported before (18–20). There were only 9 cases of acral and 13 mucosal melanomas in these reports. The discrepancy may be due to small sizes of their cohorts, especially the acral and mucosal samples were limited. Although KIT and PDGFRA belong to the same RTK subfamily, the PDGFRA mutation frequency in Chinese patients with melanoma is lower than KIT (10.8%; ref. 9). The PDGFRA mutations were all detected in KIT WT melanomas and in none of the KIT-mutant melanomas. Recently, TCGA database published a dataset of exon sequencing results of 225 cutaneous melanomas. In this cohort, 23 different PDGFRA mutations were found in 21 melanomas (9.3%; 21 of 225), whereas only 3.1% (7 of 225) harbored KIT mutations (31). Their PDGFRA mutation frequency was higher than that in our cohort, which may be due to the fact that whole exons were sequenced, whereas we only sequenced the mutation hotspot of PDGFRA; in their cohort, the frequency of PDGFRA mutations in exon 12, 14, and 18 was 1.3% (3 of 225). In addition, the cases in the TCGA database were most likely from Caucasian patients and race difference may also play a role. In the PDGFRA mutation samples reported by TCGA, six were found with BRAF mutations and eight were found with NRAS mutations simultaneously; in the seven melanoma samples with KIT mutations, two NRAS mutations were detected. On the basis of our data and the data from TCGA, PDGFRA and KIT mutations seem to be mutually exclusive. Although we detected three PDGFRA mutations (A633T, H845Y, and A663V) in melanomas that simultaneously contained BRAFV600E or NRASQ61L mutations, two of them (A633T and A663V) did not cause autophosphorylation of PDGFRA, suggesting that these PDGFRA mutations may not affect the kinase activity and additional studies are needed to explore the function of these mutations.  Unlike BRAF mutations, there is no hotspot in PDGFRA mutations, and no overlapping mutation was found in different patients in our study or in the TCGA database. Exons 12, 14, and 18 of PDGFRA, which are more commonly mutated in other malignancies, encode for juxtamembrane domain, ATP-binding domain, and phosphotransferase domain, respectively. Our results showed no significant difference in the incidence rates of the three exons, quite different from the mutation distribution in GISTs with the highest mutation frequency detected within exon 18 (13, 41). Together with our functional analysis and the previous studies, almost half of the mutations found in our study can induce strong and constitutive activation of PDGFRA, although we cannot exclude the possibility that weak activation may also exert same effects on the downstream pathways.  Imatinib has been used for the treatment of patients harboring PDGFRA mutations for years. The mutational status of PDGFRA may be a significant predictive factor for response to imatinib. Similar to the facts in GISTs that PDGFRA mutation status affect the response to imatinib, our results showed that the sensitivity of PDGFRA to imatinib was correlated with the mutational types, with five (V561A, P577S, R841K, H845Y, and G853D; in except of V658A) of the six mutations sensitive to imatinib. The valine in codon 658 is located in the ATP-binding domain of PDGFRA, which is conserved in KIT and corresponds to codon 654. It has been demonstrated that KITV654A mutation was resistant to imatinib because V654A substitution directly affected the binding of imatinib to KIT protein (34). Crenolanib is a benzimidazole TKI that specifically inhibited the PDGFRA and PDGFRB, and several phase II clinical trials are ongoing. In our study, crenolanib showed a broader spectrum and higher potency than imatinib in inhibiting PDGFRA mutations, evidenced by the fact that all the mutations causing auto-phosphorylation could be fully inhibited by crenolanib. It has been reported that imatinib and crenolanib had different activity spectrum according to the PDGFRA mutation status, and crenolanib was more potent in imatinib-resistant mutations (e.g., D842V, D842I, etc.), whereas imatinib was more potent in inhibiting V561D mutation (24). On the basis of our study, it seems that crenolanib has a broader efficacy spectrum than imatinib in inhibiting PDGFRA activity.  To sum up, our study has confirmed that a small population of Chinese patients with melanoma harbor PDGFRA mutations. Gain-of-function mutations of PDGFRA can lead to ligand-independent activation of PDGFRA and this can be inhibited by TKIs. Our study suggested that patients with melanoma harboring PDGFRA mutations may respond to TKIs-based targeted therapy, thus warranting phase II clinical trials of imatinib or crenolanib in these patients. 
894||The FIP1L1-PDGFRA fusion is seen in a fraction of cases with a presumptive diagnosis of hypereosinophilic syndrome (HES). However, because most HES patients lack FIP1L1-PDGFRA, we studied whether they harbor activating mutations of the PDGFRA gene. Sequencing of 87 FIP1L1-PDGFRA–negative HES patients revealed several novel PDGFRA point mutations (R481G, L507P, I562M, H570R, H650Q, N659S, L705P, R748G, and Y849S). When cloned into 32D cells, N659S and Y849S and—on selection for high expressors—also H650Q and R748G mutants induced growth factor–independent proliferation, clonogenic growth, and constitutive phosphorylation of PDGFRA and Stat5. Imatinib antagonized Stat5 phosphorylation. Mutations involving positions 659 and 849 had been shown previously to possess transforming potential in gastrointestinal stromal tumors. Because H650Q and R748G mutants possessed only weak transforming activity, we injected 32D cells harboring these mutants or FIP1L1-PDGFRA into mice and found that they induced a leukemia-like disease. Oral imatinib treatment significantly decreased leukemic growth in vivo and prolonged survival. In conclusion, our data provide evidence that imatinib-sensitive PDGFRA point mutations play an important role in the pathogenesis of HES and we propose that more research should be performed to further define the frequency and treatment response of PDGFRA mutations in FIP1L1-PDGFRA–negative HES patients.  Introduction  The WHO classification of myeloproliferative neoplasms (MPNs) comprises a variety of diseases, including BCR-ABL1–positive chronic myelogenous leukemia, chronic neutrophilic leukemia, polycythemia vera, primary myelofibrosis, essential thrombocythemia, and systemic mastocytosis (SM).1 Patients with nonreactive eosinophilia are included in this group and should be termed “chronic eosinophilic leukemia” (CEL) if a clonal aberration is present, or “idiopathic hypereosinophilic syndrome” (HES) if no clonal aberration is detected. In addition, patients with eosinophilia and recurrent genetic abnormalities involving the PDGFRA, PDGFRB, or FGFR1 genes have been classified in a separate subgroup termed “Myeloid and lymphoid neoplasms associated with eosinophilia and abnormalities of PDGFRA, PDGFRB, or FGFR1.”1  However, such genetic lesions are detected only in a minority of patients with nonreactive eosinophilia, with the FIP1L1-PDGFRA fusion gene accounting for 5%-15% of cases and other translocation products involving PDGFRA, PDGFRB, FGFR1, or JAK2 being even less common.2 Another 15%-20% have been shown to belong to the so-called lymphocytic variant group, which is characterized by atypical clonal T lymphocytes secreting eosinophilopoietic cytokines.3 Nonetheless, 65%-80% of these patients remain without known underlying genetic aberration.2  Given that gastrointestinal stromal tumors (GISTs) are also negative for FIP1L1-PDGFRA but display activating point mutations of the PDGFRA gene, we reasoned that FIP1L1-PDGFRA–negative HES patients may harbor similar PDGFRA point mutations. Therefore, fusion gene–negative cases were analyzed by sequencing of exons 9-19 which harbor the majority of activating PDGFRA point mutations in GIST.4 The karyotype of these cases, where known, did not reveal any rearrangement of chromosome 4q11-12, and rapid amplification of cDNA ends–polymerase chain reaction (RACE-PCR) of the PDGFRA gene in a subset of patients failed to identify any cytogenetically silent gene fusions2  Here, we report several novel activating point mutations within the coding region of PDGFRA in patients with HES. We show that 4 of these mutations induce constitutive PDGFR phosphorylation and growth factor independence. Our in vitro and in vivo experiments show that PDGFRA mutant cells remain sensitive to imatinib, suggesting that patients harboring these mutations should be treated with imatinib similarly to patients with PDGFR fusion genes.  Methods  Primary patient samples and sequencing of PDGFRA  Samples of idiopathic HES cases (n = 87 [67% men], all confirmed to be negative for FIP1L1-PDGFRA) were randomly selected from diagnostic peripheral blood (PB) samples which were referred to our hospital between 2005 and 2009, as well as healthy donors (n = 35) and patients with chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL, n = 40). Informed consent was obtained from all patients according to the Declaration of Helsinki. Hemi-nested reverse transcription (RT)–PCR for amplification of PDGFRA was performed using forward primers F1: 5′-TTCAGCCAGTTGGAAGCTGTCA, F2: 5′-CAGACGGTGAGGTGCACAG, and reverse primer R1: 5′-TGTCAAAGATGCTCTCAGGAGC, spanning exons 9-19 of the PDGFRA gene. PCR products were bidirectionally sequenced using the amplification primers. In addition, PDGFRA expression levels were assessed in all patients by quantitative RT-PCR as described.2  Cells and mice  32D cells were obtained from the ATCC and cultured in RPMI 1640 medium (Invitrogen) supplemented with 10% fetal bovine serum (FBS), antibiotics (100 IU/mL penicillin, 50 μg/mL streptomycin), and 10% WEHI-3B (Walter and Eliza Hall Institute) cell supernatant as a source of interleukin-3 (IL-3). Four- to 6-week-old C3H/HeJ mice were purchased from Janvier. Approval for the animal research was obtained from the local authorities of North-Rhine Westphalia, Germany.  Cloning of PDGFRA mutants  Human PDGFRA cDNA (a kind gift of Carl-Hendrik Heldin, Ludwig Institute for Cancer Research, Uppsala, Sweden) was cloned into pEntr.1A (Invitrogen), and the different mutations were introduced by site-directed mutagenesis using the following primer sets:  R481G: 5′-GATCCACTCCCGAGACGGAAGTACCGTGGAGGGC-3′, 5′-GCCCTCCACGGTACTTCCGTCTCGGGAGTGGATC-3′; L507P: 5′-GCTAAGAATCTCCCTGGAGCTGAGAACC-3′, 5′-GGTTCTCAGCTCCAGGGAGATTCTTAGC-3′; I562M: 5′-CGCTGGAGGGTCATGGAATCAATCAGCCC-3′, 5′-GGGCTGATTGATTCCATGACCCTCCAGCG-3′; H570R: 5′-CAATCAGCCCAGATGGACGTGAATATATTTATGTGG-3′, 5′-CCACATAAATATATTCACGTCCATCTGGGCTGATTG-3′; H650Q: 5′-CTGAAGATAATGACTCAACTGGGGCCACATTTGAAC-3′, 5′-GTTCAAATGTGGCCCCAGTTGAGTCATTATCTTCAG-3′; N659S: 5′-CATTTGAACATTGTAAGCTTGCTGGGAGCCTG-3′, 5′-CAGGCTCCCAGCAAGCTTACAATGTTCAAATG-3′; L705P: 5′-GAGAAGCCAAAGAAAGAGCCGGATATCTTTGGATTGAACC-3′, 5′-GGTTCAATCCAAAGATATCCGGCTCTTTCTTTGGCTTCTC-3′; R748G: 5′-CAGTATGTCCCCATGCTAGAAGGCAAAGAGGTTTCTAAATATTC-3′, 5′-GAATATTTAGAAACCTCTTTGCCTTCTAGCATGGGGACATACTG-3′; Y849S: 5′-GCATGATTCGAACTCTGTGTCGAAAGGCAG-3′, 5′-CTGCCTTTCGACACAGAGTTCGAATCATGC-3′.  Constructs were sequenced and shuttled into the pMY-IG vector (a kind gift of Dr Toshio Kitamura, University of Tokyo, Tokyo, Japan).5 The pMY-IG is a retroviral vector harboring a “gateway” cassette for insertion of the respective gene which is followed by an internal ribosomal entry site and an enhanced green fluorescence protein (EGFP) sequence for flow cytometric selection of transduced cells.  Retroviral transduction of 32D cells  For generation of retroviral supernatants, Plat-E–packaging cells were transfected with pMY constructs (empty vector, wild-type [wt] PDGFRA, and different PDGFRA mutations) and supernatants were collected every 12 hours. Stable cell lines (32D empty vector, 32D PDGFRA wt, and other analyzed cell lines) were generated by 3 rounds of retroviral transduction of 32D cells, followed by selection of EGFP-positive or highly EGFP-positive cells by fluorescence-activated cell sorting (FACS; top 10% quantile; except for FIP1L1-PDGFRA and N659S and Y849S mutants, where this was not necessary).  Growth curves and proliferation assays  For growth analysis, 1 × 106 cells per well were plated without IL-3 into a 6-well dish containing 5 mL of medium and counted daily. Wells were adjusted to 5 mL and split daily to maintain cells in a logarithmic growth phase. Total cell numbers were calculated by cell counting after trypan blue staining, and cell growth was calculated by taking into account the dilution factors of the previous days. Cells were cultured in triplicates. For proliferation assays, 2 × 104 cells per well were seeded in triplicates without IL-3 in a 96-well dish. Cells were incubated with different concentrations of imatinib for 72 hours. At the end of the culture period, an MTS assay using 3-(4,5-dimethylthiazol-2-yl)-5-(3-carboxymethoxyphenyl)-2-(4-sulfophenyl)-2H-tetrazolium, inner salt (MTS) was performed. Twenty microliters of MTS/phenazine methosulfate (PMS) solution (Promega) was added and optical density at OD490 was measured after 2 hours of incubation.  CFU assay  Colony-forming unit (CFU) assays were performed in Methocult M3231 methylcellulose (StemCell Technologies), containing no supplemented cytokines to assay for growth factor–independent clones. Cells were IL-3–deprived and seeded in triplicates into 35-mm–diameter dishes containing 200 cells in 1 mL of methylcellulose each. Numbers of CFU were determined 6 days after plating.  Western blotting  Stable 32D PDGFRA cell lines were starved from IL-3 and serum for 12 hours in 0.5% fetal calf serum (FCS). Subsequently, cells were washed once with ice-cold phosphate-buffered saline (PBS) and lysed with buffer containing 150mM sodium chloride, 1% Nonidet P-40 (NP-40), 50mM Tris pH 8.0, 0.5% sodium deoxycholate, 0.1% sodium dodecyl sulfate (SDS), and protease/phosphatase inhibitors (Na3VO4, Sigma-Aldrich; complete EDTA-free, Roche). Cell lysates were spun at 20 000g for 15 minutes. Lysates were resuspended in SDS sample buffer, boiled, and separated by SDS–polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis (PAGE). Proteins were blotted onto Immobilon P membranes (Millipore) and stained with the indicated antibody (pSTAT5, 05-495, Upstate/Millipore; STAT5, sc835, Santa Cruz Biotechnology; pAKT, 4058S; AKT, 9272; pAKT, 3164; PDGFRA, 3164, pPDGFRA, 2992, Cell Signaling; β-actin, Sigma-Aldrich). Detection was done with a secondary antibody, labeled with horseradish peroxidase (HRP)–coupled secondary antibodies and chemiluminescence reagent (ECL-Plus; GE Healthcare) were used for detection of the bands.  Flow cytometric analysis  32D cells and cells from the PB, bone marrow (BM), or spleen from the transplanted mice were isolated as described previously.6 Lysis of enucleated red blood cells was achieved by applying AKC buffer. After washing, cells were analyzed using a FACSCalibur machine (BD Biosciences) for EGFP.  32D cell transplantation and imatinib treatment  Retrovirally transduced 32D cells were resuspended in PBS (1.2 × 106/ 200μL) and 1.2 × 106 cells were injected into the tail veins of 6- to 8-week-old syngeneic C3H/HeJ mice. Mice were analyzed at certain indicated time points or when moribund. PB was collected from the retro-orbital plexus. Imatinib treatment of injected mice started 5 days after injection. Administration was performed 2 times daily by oral gavage of 100 μL of imatinib solution (62.5 mg of imatinib per kilogram body weight solved in water; LC Labs).  Statistical analysis  Statistical analyses were performed using the nonparametric Mann-Whitney U test and presented as mean ± SD (P < .05) was considered statistically significant. Statistical analysis of survival was performed using the log-rank test.  Results  PDGFRA expression and gene mutations in HES patients  Sequencing of the PDGFRA gene in 87 HES patients, in whom the absence of FIP1L1-PDGFRA was confirmed, revealed the presence of known single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs; Table 1) as well as 9 novel PDGFRA gene point mutations in 7 patients. Of the latter patients, 4 patients had only 1 mutation (R481G, N659S, L705P, Y849S), while 3 patients had 2 mutations (I562M and H570R, H650Q and R748G, as well as Y849S and L507P; Table 2). None of these novel mutations has been described as a SNP. No point mutation was found in a separate set of 35 healthy controls. In addition, because 1 of the HES patients had a history of CLL, we sequenced PDGFRA in 40 patients with CLL without eosinophilia but found no PDGFRA mutations in CLL patients (data not shown). Because we had previously shown that a fraction of patients with HES show PDGFRA overexpression, we analyzed all patients for PDGFRA expression by quantitative RT-PCR. As depicted in Tables 1 and 2, 36 of 87 (42.5%) of patients showed PDGFRA overexpression, including the patients harboring the R481G, I562M and H570R, H650Q and R748G, or L705P mutations.  View inlineView popup Table 1 Results from PDGFRA gene sequencing View inlineView popup Table 2 Patients with PDGFRA point mutations PDGFRA mutations transform myeloid cells  To screen which of the PDGFRA point mutants possess transforming activity, we retrovirally expressed each mutant in factor-dependent murine myeloid 32D cells and analyzed the resulting cell lines for factor-independent cell growth. While all of the mutant cell lines grew in the presence of WEHI as a source of IL-3, 4 mutant cell lines (H650Q, N659S, R748G, and Y849S) survived in the absence of IL-3. The N659S and Y849S mutants immediately showed exponential growth in liquid culture and clonogenic assays. In addition, the H650Q and R748G PDGFRA mutant cell lines also showed exponential growth and increased colony formation in the absence of IL-3 when they were sorted for high EGFP expression (top 10%; Figure 1A-B). These effects were similar to those seen with 32D cells transduced with FIP1L1-PDGFRA, Flt3-ITD, or BCR-ABL1 (Figure 1A). No relevant cell or colony growth was detected for R481G, L507P, I562M, H570R, L705P mutants or 32D cells transduced with wt PDGFRA, wt JAK2, or the empty vector (Figure 1B), regardless of whether they were sorted for high EGFP expression or not. PDGFRA transcripts were readily detected in all of the transduced cells (not shown), and all of the cells expressed EGFP and PDGFRA, as assessed by Western blotting (Figure 1C) and flow cytometry (data not shown). Because H650Q and R748G were present in the same patient (Table 2), we investigated whether both mutations occurred on the same allele. To do this, cloning of the PCR products from this patient was performed and revealed that the resulting 40 Escherichia coli clones which were analyzed contained either the H650Q or the R748G mutation. These results suggest that the H650Q and R748G mutations occurred on separate alleles. The SNP P567P was present in all PCR clones and was thus not informative (homozygous SNP).  Figure 1 Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 1 Expression of specific PDGFRA mutations in 32D cells overcomes IL-3 dependence. 32D cells were retrovirally transduced with PDGFRA vectors containing mutations as specified in the results section or empty vector, FIP1L1-PDGFRA, JAK2wt, JAK2V617F, BCR-ABL1 or FLT3-ITD. (A) Growth capacity of all mutant PDGFRA cell lines without IL-3. PDGFRA H650Q, N659S, R748G, and Y849S induce IL-3–independent growth in 32D cells. Cells expressing the indicated mutations were seeded without IL-3 and counted daily for 5 days. The graph depicts mean viable cell numbers taken from a representative experiment performed in triplicates. The results were confirmed in 3 independent experiments. (B) Clonogenic growth in semisolid medium. The 32D cells expressing the indicated mutations were plated in triplicates in methyl cellulose media without IL-3 at a concentration of 200 cells per dish. Colonies were counted on day 6. These results were confirmed in 3 independent experiments. (C) Western blot experiments of 32D cell lines. Total cell lysates of IL-3– and 0.5% FCS-deprived (12-hour starvation) 32D cells were conducted. Blots were stained with the indicated phosphorylation-specific or total antibodies. PDGFRA and pPDGFRA antibodies recognize 2 bands, the mature form of the receptor with a size of approximately 180 kDa and an incompletely glycosylated precursor at about 160 kDa.37 Stat5 and Stat5 phosphorylation were detected on a second membrane using same lysates and same amounts of protein. PDGFRA mutants are constitutively active and are sensitive to imatinib  We first sought to investigate whether the mutants were able to induce Stat5 activation. Indeed, after IL-3 deprivation, we found that the 4 transforming mutants, H650Q, N659S, R748G, Y849S as well as FIP1L1-PDGFRA but none of the other mutants or wt PDGFRA-transduced cells showed constitutive phosphorylation of Stat5 (Figure 1C).  To investigate whether the mutant receptors retained responsiveness to ligand, we stimulated IL-3–starved 32D PDGFRA mutant cells with PDGF-AA. We found that none of the cells showed an additional increase of Stat5 phosphorylation on PDGF-AA stimulation (Figure 2A). However, Akt phosphorylation was strongly increased in both PDGFRA wt cells and the H650Q, N659S, R748G, and Y849S mutant cells but not FIP1L1-PDGFRA mutants (Figure 2A), demonstrating that the PDGFRA point mutations do not alter sensitivity to PDGF ligand.  Figure 2 Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 2 32D cells expressing mutated PDGFRA retain ligand dependent phosphorylation of AKT and imatinib sensitivity in vitro. (A) Activation of different signaling pathways by PDGF-AA. Cell mutants were starved overnight in medium containing 0.5% FCS and stimulated with 10 ng/mL PDGF-AA for 10 minutes. Total cell lysates were prepared, and the Western blot membranes were stained with the indicated phosphorylation-specific antibodies. (B) MTS assay in presence of imatinib and calculated IC50 values. The same 32D cells were used in a Cell Titer 96 Aqueous Solution Assay to measure the influence of imatinib on proliferation after 72 hours of imatinib exposure. Each point represents the mean percentage of growth compared with the untreated cells from 3 independent experiments. Data were used to calculate IC50 values with GraphPad Prism 5. (C) Inhibition of intracellular signaling by imatinib treatment. 32D cell mutants were starved overnight in medium containing 0.5% FCS and treated with the indicated concentrations of imatinib for 2 hours. Total cell lysates were separated by SDS-PAGE. After blotting, the blots were stained with a phosphorylation-specific Stat5, total Stat5, or β-actin antibody. (D) FACS analysis of imatinib-treated mutant 32D cell lines. Cells were incubated with 0.5 or 5μM imatinib or vehicle for 72h and 7-AAD stained. Depicted percentages and gates represent remaining GFP-positive and 7-AAD negative cells. The figure shows 1 representative experiment of 2 independent experiments. Imatinib is a strong PDGFRA and PDGFRB inhibitor, but imatinib resistance has been described both for BCR-ABL1 and FIP1L1-PDGFRA mutants.4,7,8 We assessed whether the transforming mutants were sensitive to imatinib treatment in vitro. Indeed, all mutants retained sensitivity to imatinib, as detected by an MTS assay (Figure 2B). A dose-dependent curve fitting algorithm from GraphPad Prism 5.0 was used to determine IC50 values of all 32D mutants (2.0nM H650Q; 159nM N659S; 0.9nM R748G; 2.6nM Y849S; 1.8nM FIP1L1-PDGFRA; 689nM BCR-ABL1), showing that H650Q, R748G, and Y849S mutants were as sensitive to imatinib as FIP1L1-PDGFRA, whereas mutant N659S was less sensitive but still more sensitive than BCR-ABL1 (Figure 2B). As expected, JAK2V617F mutants were insensitive to imatinib. Stat5 phosphorylation was inhibited by imatinib in all sensitive cell lines (Figure 2C). Imatinib exposure induced cell death as shown by 7-AAD positivity and loss of EGFP expression (Figure 2D).  PDGFRA mutants H650Q and R748G induce leukemia-like disease in vivo similar to FIP1L1-PDFGRA  Mutants involving the 659 and 849 amino acids had previously been shown to possess transforming potential in GIST, and our own results in 32D cells harboring the N659S and Y849S mutants showed that these 2 mutants immediately induced IL-3–independent growth.4,9,10 However, IL-3–independent clonogenic growth of H650Q and R748G cell lines was only seen after sorting for highly expressing clones. We sought to investigate whether these mutant cell lines were able to grow in vivo and induce a leukemia-like disease. Intravenous injection of 32D cell lines harboring the H650Q or R748G point mutants, or FIP1L1-PDGFRA into syngeneic C3H/HeJ mice readily induced fatal leukemia-like disease within 20 to 40 days after injection (Figure 3A), while animals receiving 32D cells overexpressing wild-type PDGFRA showed no signs of disease for at least 8 months (data not shown) and showed no EGFP-positive cells on autopsy (Figure 3E). Diseased mice unequivocally showed splenomegaly (Figure 3B,D) and lymphadenopathy (Figure 3C). Intriguingly, the degree of lymphadenopathy was significantly higher in the recipients of the H650Q and R748G mutants than those receiving FIP1L1-PDGFRA–expressing cells (Figure 3C). FACS analysis demonstrated EGFP-positive donor cells in all affected organs analyzed (PB, BM, spleen, and lymph nodes; Figure 3E). In addition, histologic analysis showed infiltrates in the perivascular regions of the liver and a disturbed follicular structure of the spleen as well as displacement of normal granulocytic cells by blastlike cells in the BM (Figure 3F).  Figure 3 Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 3 PDGFRA point mutations show increased lymphadenopathy compared with the FIP1L1-PDGFRA fusion in a syngeneic transplantation model. (A) H650Q and R748G are transforming in vivo. Kaplan-Meier plot shows survival of C3H/HeJ mice injected with 1.2 × 106 cells of 32D cell lines retrovirally expressing PDGFRA wt (n = 29), H650Q (n = 4), R748G (n = 15), and FIP1L1-PDGFRA (n = 5). (B) Diseased mice show significant enlargement of the spleen. Mice were killed on day 22 after injection for analysis. The numbers below the photographs depict spleen weight. (C-D) Lymph node and spleen weight of injected mice. Moribund or dead mice were analyzed for spleen and lymph node weight, controls were analyzed at various time points (range days 22-57; PDGFRA wt n = 17; H650Q n = 14; R748G n = 14; FIP1L1-PDGFRA n = 10). Included are untreated mice and mice treated with water by oral gavage. No statistical difference was observed between the 2 control groups (untreated vs water-treated) with the exception of R748G mice, because of 3 outliers which harbored greatly enlarged lymph nodes but marginally significantly smaller spleens. Statistical significance was tested with the nonparametric Mann-Whitney U test. (E) Hematopoietic and lymphatic organs show invasion of GFP-positive 32D cells. Bone marrow (BM), spleen (Spl), lymph nodes (LN), and peripheral blood cells (PB) were analyzed by flow cytometry for the presence of GFP-positive 32D cells. Depicted gates and percent values represent GFP-positive cells. Shown is 1 mouse of each group, analyzed 22 days after injection. (F) Histologic analysis of spleen, liver, and BM on day 22 after injection was performed after HE (hematoxylin/eosin) or NACE (Naphthyl acetate (chloro-)esterase) staining and showed infiltrates in the perivascular regions of the liver (arrows), a disturbed follicular structure of the spleen and remarkable reduction of NACE-positive cells in BM. Spleen and liver slides are depicted at ×10 magnification, BM at ×100. In vivo imatinib treatment prolongs survival of mice injected with PDGFRA mutant cell lines  To investigate whether imatinib treatment can rescue mice injected with PDGFRA-mutant cells, we treated mice injected with wt PDGFRA, H650Q, R748G, or FIP1L1-PDGFRA–overexpressing cells twice daily with imatinib by oral gavage starting on day 5 postinjection. Imatinib treatment of mice injected with PDGFRA wt cells had no negative impact on survival but significantly prolonged survival in all other groups (Figure 4A). In addition, there was a significant decrease of lymphadenopathy in all treated mice (Figure 4B). Splenomegaly was significantly decreased at the time of the final analysis in the case of the H650Q and R748G single mutants, while differences in spleen weight were not significantly reduced by imatinib in mice receiving FIP1L1-PDGFRA cells (Figure 4C).  Figure 4 Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 4 Imatinib treatment of mutant 32D PDGFRA cell-injected mice prolongs survival and decreases lymphadenopathy. Mice were injected with 1.2 × 106 cells of indicated cell lines (32D PDGFRA wt [−imatinib/+imatinib n = 5/5], H650Q [n = 5/5], R748G [n = 5/5], and FIP1L1-PDGFRA [n = 4/5]) and treated with 62.5 mg of imatinib per kilogram body weight twice daily by oral gavage from day 5 after cell injection. One mouse was excluded because of late death on day 50 supposedly because of infection without comparable lymphadenopathy (PDGFRA wt). (A) Injected cells are susceptible to imatinib treatment, prolonging survival of mice. Kaplan-Meier plots show survival of injected mice (survival curves for PDGFRA wt overlap). Statistical significance was tested with the log-rank test. (B-C) Treatment with imatinib consistently decreases lymphadenopathy and spleen weight of 32D PDGFRA H650Q and R748G-injected mice as shown by lymph node and spleen weight. Moribund or dead mice were analyzed for spleen and lymph node weight; animals surviving for 57 days were killed and included. Statistical significance was tested with the Mann-Whitney U test. Autopsy of the 4 surviving imatinib-treated FIP1L1-PDFGRA mice showed splenomegaly in 3 of the mice, while 1 of the mice showed a normal spleen weight. Therefore, although splenomegaly did develop in some of these mice, the difference was not statistically significant. Discussion  Considerable progress has been achieved in our understanding of the pathogenesis of CEL/HES through the identification of tyrosine kinase fusion genes and abnormal clonal T cells that overproduce eosinophilopoietic cytokines. However, these abnormalities are only found in a maximum of 20%-35% of patients and, therefore, the molecular pathogenesis still remains unknown for the majority of patients. Here, we report on the identification of several novel point mutations within functionally relevant domains of the receptor tyrosine kinase PDGFRA in HES patients.  Several of these mutations were functionally not related to growth factor independence (R481G, L507P, I562M, H570R, L705P). In contrast, 4 mutations possessed transforming potential (H650Q, N659S, R748G, and Y849S). The N659S and Y849S mutations were identified in 1 and 2 patients with HES, respectively, and similar mutations had previously been identified in patients with GIST.4,10,11 The H650Q and R748G mutations were found in a 64-year-old female who had a 3-year history of B-CLL and was in remission after rituximab-based immunochemotherapy when eosinophilia first occurred. Eosinophil counts fluctuated between 1000/μL and 4560/μL until B-CLL relapsed approximately 2 years later, and the patient died approximately 10 months later despite chemotherapy. Transforming activity of H650Q and R748G in 32D cells was only detected on sorting for high expressor cells. Interestingly, the patient harboring these mutants showed overexpression of PDGFRA, suggesting that these 2 mutants may be weaker transforming mutants compared with the strong oncogenic mutations N659S and Y849S. A similar phenomenon was described for BCR-ABL–transduced CD34+ cells from human cord blood,12 where BCR-ABLhigh but not BCR-ABLlow expressors showed factor-independent proliferation. Nevertheless, cells overexpressing H650Q and R748G were able to induce fatal leukemia-like disease in mice, suggesting that they were indeed involved in the pathogenesis of HES in this patient.  While the Y849S mutation was identified in 2 patients, none of the other mutations occurred more than once in our cohort of patients (Table 2). However, previously reported novel mutations such as CBL mutations in acute myeloid leukemia (AML) were initially only found in 1 of 150 patients,13 but subsequently confirmed in up to 9% of secondary AML14 and myeloproliferative and myelodysplastic syndromes.15 We found that CD3+ T lymphocytes from the patient with the N659S mutation did not harbor this mutation (data not shown), showing that the mutation is acquired. In addition, we clearly demonstrate biologic relevance of this and the other 3 activating mutants. This suggests that these mutations are driver mutations for malignant growth. In contrast, the remaining mutations are likely to be mere passenger mutations as described for the Flt3 locus in AML,16 although we cannot completely rule out that some of these mutants do possess weak transforming potential, possibly in conjunction with other yet undefined aberrations.  Our data show that the H650Q and R748G mutations were not located on the same allele because none of the sequencing products showed both mutations, as analyzed by individual bacterial clones. Because the P567P SNP was present in all bacterial clones and was therefore homozygous, we cannot distinguish between the possibility that both mutations in this patient occurred on separate alleles in the same cell or in different cell clones. As both mutations harbor transforming potential on their own, it is likely that 2 different cell clones were present.  The H650Q and N659S mutations are located in the first tyrosine kinase domain of PDGFRA (exon 14) in close proximity to the ATP-binding site (amino acid 627) and close to the kinase insert domain that separates the 2 kinase domains. The replacement of a basic charged histidine by the neutral nonpolar glutamine residue is not located in the proximity of any known protein-binding site, and therefore, the mechanism of receptor activation resulting from this amino acid exchange remains elusive at this point. In contrast, the R748G mutation is located in the 104 amino acid–spanning kinase insert domain (amino acids 691 to 795; exon 16). This region is rich of tyrosine residues known to be autophosphorylated on activation of the receptor, thus enabling the receptor to directly recruit different SH2 domain–containing proteins such as Src and SHP2 or indirectly as proposed for GRB2.17  Finally, the Y849S mutation is located in the activation loop of PDGFRA (exon 18) and affects the main tyrosine residue that leads to increased catalytic efficiency of the PDGFRA on autophosphorylation.18 Interestingly, the H650Q, R748G, and Y849S mutants were highly sensitive to imatinib-mediated kinase inhibition, while the N659S mutant showed a lower sensitivity.  Activating mutations in PDGFRA have been described in diverse malignancies. Most frequently, they are found in approximately 8% of all patients with GIST.19 Up to 97% of PDGFRA mutations are located in exon 18 which codes for the tyrosine kinase domain (D842V/Y/I, D846Y, Y849C as well as deletions and longer mutations spanning at least 1 of the amino acid residues D842 or D846)4,9,10,20⇓⇓⇓⇓⇓⇓⇓⇓–29 and approximately 3% in exon 12 which codes for the juxtamembrane domain (V561D and deletions/insertions of 2 or more amino acids including the V561 residue or residue S566).4,9,21,22,27,28,30 To date, only 3 patients have been described with mutations in exon 14 which codes for the tyrosine kinase domain 1 (N659K).10 In inflammatory fibroid polyps (IFPs), rare cases of PDGFRA mutations in exon 12 and 18 have been reported (V561D, D842V/I mutations, different deletions spanning position 556 and 571 as well as small deletions around position 824 to 848).31 In addition, 2 AML cases were described with PDGFRA mutations in exon 17 and 19 (F808L, N870S)32 and 1 acute lymphoblastic leukemia (ALL) case with a mutation in exon 10 which encodes the extracellular fifth Ig-like domain (A509D).33 Lastly, 4 cases with PDGFRA mutations (C235Y in exon 5, W349C in exon 7 [n = 2], V536E in exon 11)20 and 2 cases with deletions34,35 have been reported in patients suffering from glioblastoma multiforme.  The finding of imatinib-sensitive PDGFRA point mutations in patients with HES and CEL suggests that all patients without underlying tyrosine kinase fusion genes should be screened for the presence of activating point mutations and treated with imatinib. However, because in our series, PDGFRA-overexpressing cases were overrepresented and lymphocytic variants of HES were not formally excluded. These data need extension as well as confirmation, and we suggest that more research should be performed to identify the frequency of PDGFRA mutants in larger cohorts of patients. Importantly, novel point mutants should be rigorously tested for their transforming potential as well as tyrosine kinase inhibitor (TKI) sensitivity to exclude passenger mutations such as those seen in our own screen as well as those described for FLT3-ITD in AML.16 In addition, we need to learn more about the imatinib sensitivity of all of the mutant cells in vivo in patients before we can confirm or exclude that these mutations are involved in the pathogenesis of the disease. Finally, the interesting finding of PDGFRA point mutations and deletions in IFPs31 which are characterized by an inflammatory infiltrate rich in eosinophils raises the issue of a potential common pathogenesis of IFPs and hypereosinophilic neoplasms with PDGFRA mutations. It will be interesting in the future to dissect spindle cells and eosinophils from IFPs and define the exact cell population harboring the PDGFRA mutation.  Surprisingly, animals injected with 32D PDGFRA H650Q and R748G mutant cells showed a significantly stronger degree of lymphadenopathy compared with mice injected with 32D FIP1L1-PDGFRA cells (P < .001, P = .007, P < .001, respectively, Figure 3C) while the degree of splenomegaly was not different (Figure 3D). One major difference between the PDGFRA point mutants (H650Q and R748G) and the FIP1L1-PDGFRA fusion protein is that the PDGFRA point mutants but not FIP1L1-PDGFRA retain surface expression through transmembrane localization. Along this line, our results demonstrate that the ligand (PDGF-AA) was able to induce phosphorylation of downstream signaling molecules such as Akt only in the point mutant-transduced cells but not in the FIP1L1-PDGFRA–transduced cells (Figure 2A). This fact renders the PDGFRA point mutant-expressing cells responsive to exogenous PDGF which has been described to be expressed in lymph node stromal cell lines,36 suggesting that this may play a role in the preferential lymph adenopathy seen with these mutants.  In conclusion, we describe novel PDGFRA point mutations that transform growth factor–dependent hematopoietic cell lines in vitro and induce leukemia-like disease in vivo. Moreover, our in vitro and in vivo findings suggest that imatinib may be effective in patients with activating PDGFRA point mutations. Although only found in a minority of patients, the screening of HES patients for those mutations may therefore allow selection of patients with a response to imatinib or alternative tyrosine kinase inhibitors. In addition, our data extend the spectrum of diseases harboring PDGFRA point mutations and suggest common oncogenic pathways in idiopathic HES and GIST. If our results are confirmed by other groups, the current WHO classification of MPN may have to be extended to include PDGFRA point mutations.  
898||Purpose: Platelet-derived growth factor receptor α (PDGFRA) is a target for tyrosine kinase inhibitor (TKI)-based targeted therapy. Dysregulation of PDGFRA has been reported in many cancers. However, PDGFRA mutations in melanomas have not been well studied. We analyzed the genetic mutations of PDGFRA in Chinese patients with melanoma and determined the inhibitory potency of TKIs, such as imatinib and crenolanib, on mutant PDGFRA.  Experimental Design: Of note, 351 melanoma tissue samples were examined for genetic mutations in exons 12, 14, and 18 of PDGFRA. Activities of mutations in response to imatinib and crenolanib were analyzed by Western blotting of tyrosine-phosphorylated PDGFRA and cell proliferation assays.  Results: PDGFRA mutations were observed in 4.6% (16 of 351) of melanomas, and these mutations were mainly detected in acral and mucosal melanomas. PDGFRA mutations seem to be mutually exclusive with KIT mutations, but may coexist with BRAF and NRAS mutations. The genetic mutations of PDGFRA were unrelated to the age, thickness, and ulceration status of primary melanomas. Thirteen mutations were not reported before, and five (P577S, V658A, R841K, H845Y, and G853D) of them resulted in strong autophosphorylation of PDGFRA. Crenolanib showed higher potency than imatinib in inhibiting the kinase activity of PDGFRA. Except that V658A mutation was imatinib-resistant, all the other mutations were sensitive to both imatinib and crenolanib.  Conclusions: PDGFRA mutations are detected in a small population of melanoma patients. Our study suggests that patients with melanoma harboring certain PDGFRA mutations may benefit from imatinib and crenolanib treatment. Clin Cancer Res; 19(24); 6935–42. ©2013 AACR.  Translational Relevance  The incidence of melanoma is increasing worldwide. Similar to KIT, PDGFRA is a type III receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK) and a potential target for tyrosine kinase inhibitors (TKIs), such as imatinib and crenolanib, in cancer treatments. Genetic mutations of PDGFRA have been reported in many cancers, but its mutations in melanomas have not been well studied. Moreover, sensitivity of PDGFRA mutants to TKIs has not been fully evaluated. Defined sensitivity of mutant PDGFRA to TKIs might provide stratification criteria for patients with melanoma, who would benefit from TKI-based targeted therapy. Our study demonstrates that PDGFRA mutations are detected in a small population of melanoma patients, primarily in acral and mucosal melanomas. Our study suggests that a subgroup of patients with melanoma harboring PDGFRA mutations may benefit from TKIs, casting new light in the selection of melanoma patients sensitive to TKIs, such as imatinib and crenolanib.  Introduction  Melanoma is the most aggressive skin cancer with the fastest increasing incidence rate. From 2005 to 2009, the age-adjusted incidence rate was 21.0 per 100,000 men and women per year in the United States (1). Metastatic melanoma is difficult to treat as standard chemotherapy [high-dose interleukin (IL)-2 and dacarbazine] cannot significantly improve the overall survival (OS; ref. 2). Targeted therapeutic agents have shown promising clinical efficacy, such as BRAF inhibitors (e.g., vemurafenib and dabrafenib; refs. 3, 4), KIT inhibitor (imatinib; refs. 5, 6), and MAP–ERK kinase (MEK) inhibitor (trametinib; ref. 7). Although about 50% of melanomas harbors BRAF mutation in Caucasians (8), we have previously shown that KIT, BRAF, and NRAS mutation rates in Chinese patients with melanoma are 10.8%, 25.5%, and 7.2%, respectively (9, 10). Therefore, uncovering other potential driver oncogenic mutations will help to identify patients with melanoma who may benefit from targeted therapeutic agents.  Platelet-derived growth factor receptor α polypeptide (PDGFRA, also known as CD140A) belongs to the type III receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK) subfamily, and regulates cell proliferation, differentiation, survival, and tumor progression (11, 12). Dysregulation of PDGFRA has been reported in several cancers (12–16). PDGFRA is overexpressed in some melanomas and the increased copy number has also been reported previously (17, 18). The mutational analysis of PDGFRA is relatively limited in melanoma despite that one intronic mutation of PDGFRA has been reported in ocular melanoma (18–20). Some patients with gastrointestinal stromal tumors (GIST) bearing PDGFRA mutations have benefited from molecular therapeutic agents (21).  Imatinib is a tyrosine kinase inhibitor (TKI) against BCR-ABL, KIT, and PDGFRA. It is the first-line therapy for chronic myelogenous leukemia and has been approved by U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) for the treatment of patients with advanced GIST in 2002 (21, 22). The latest National Comprehensive Cancer Network (NCCN) guidelines have suggested imatinib as a treatment of KIT-mutated melanomas (23). Crenolanib is a PDGFR-specific TKI that significantly inhibits the kinase activity of PDGFRA (24). Several phase II clinical trials are ongoing, including a trial of crenolanib in advanced GIST with D842-related mutations and deletions in PDGFRA (NCT01243346).  Considering that the mutational status of PDGFRA in melanomas has not been fully evaluated and that PDGFRA is a potential target for TKIs-based targeted therapy, we collected 351 melanoma tissue samples and examined the mutational status of PDGFRA. Kinase activities of these mutated PDGFRA as well as their sensitivity to imatinib and crenolanib were also evaluated.  Materials and Methods  Tumor samples  A total of 351 archival formalin-fixed and paraffin-embedded (FFPE) melanomas (including 316 primary melanomas and 35 metastatic melanomas) were derived from Peking University Cancer Hospital & Institute (Beijing, China) between 2006 and 2011. Clinical data, including age, gender, stage, thickness, and ulceration, were collected. This study was reviewed and approved by the medical ethics committee of the Peking University Cancer Hospital & Institute.  DNA extraction and mutation detection  Genomic DNA was extracted from FFPE specimens using the QIAamp DNA FFPE Tissue Kit (Qiagen) according to the manufacturer's instruction. Exons 12, 14, and 18 of PDGFRA were amplified by PCR in at least two separate preparations of genomic DNA. The primers and annealing temperatures were listed in Supplementary Table S1. The PCR products purification and sequencing were performed as described previously (9, 10).  Cells  293T (catalog no. ACC-635) and Ba/F3 (catalog no. ACC-300) cells were initially obtained from Leibniz Institute DSMZ (Braunschweig, Germany) and cultured as recommended. 293T cells are highly transfectable derivative of the human primary embryonal kidney cell line 293 (ACC-305), carrying a plasmid containing the temperature-sensitive mutant of SV-40 large T-antigen, which were authenticated by morphology assays (fibroblastoid cells growing adherently as monolayer), PCR assays of large T antigens, 293 cell-specific short tandem repeat markers, and cytogenetic karyotypes assays. Ba/F3 cells are IL-3–dependent murine pro-B cell line derived from C3H mouse strain, which were authenticated by morphology assays (single, round cells in suspension), PCR assays of mouse species-specific markers, immunologic assays (CD11b−F4/80+), and cytogenetic karyotypes assays. Both cell lines were confirmed to be negative for the common microorganisms. Detailed information for authentication of these cells could be obtained online (http://www.dsmz.de).  Plasmid construction and lentiviral packaging  The wild-type (WT) PDGFRA cDNA was amplified from melanoma cDNA by PCR and subcloned into the expression vector pLenti PGK Neo DEST (w531-1; Addgene). All the PDGFRA-mutant cDNAs were generated by site-directed mutagenesis as previously described (25). All vectors were confirmed by bidirectional sequencing. The lentiviral expression vector, psPAX2 packaging vector, and pMD2.G envelop vector were added into 293T cells using Fugene 6 transfection reagent (Promega). The virus-containing supernatants were harvested, filtered through a 0.45-μm cellulose acetate filter (Millipore) at 48 and 72 hours, and concentrated using Lenti-X Concentrator (Clontech).  Cell cultures and transfections  293T cells were grown in Dulbecco's modified Eagle medium (DMEM) medium (Invitrogen), supplemented with 10% FBS (Hyclone) and penicillin/streptomycin (Invitrogen). Ba/F3 cells (a kind gift from Dr. Wei Tong, Children's Hospital of Philadelphia, University of Pennsylvania, Philadelphia, PA) were grown in RPMI-1640 medium with GlutaMAX (Invitrogen), supplemented with 10% FBS, 10 ng/mL IL-3 (Invitrogen), and penicillin/streptomycin. Virus was added onto 293T or Ba/F3 cells with polybrene. Ba/F3 clones were selected by 1 mg/mL G418 and followed by IL-3–independent growth. DNA from stably transfected cell lines was extracted and sequenced to confirm the presence of mutant PDGFRA sequence.  Immunoprecipitation and Western blotting  Cells were lysed using PhosphoSafe Extraction Reagent (Millipore) and protein extracts were immunoprecipitated with rabbit anti-human PDGFRA polyclonal antibody (C-20; Santa Cruz Biotechnology) and Protein A/G beads (Sigma-Aldrich). Western blotting was performed with mouse anti-phosphotyrosine antibody (4G10; Millipore) and PDGFRA antibody. The procedures were carried out as described previously (26).  Assessment of PDGFRA kinase activity  Imatinib and crenolanib were purchased from Selleckchem and resolved in dimethyl sulfoxide (DMSO) at the concentration of 10 mmol/L and stocked at −80°C. Ba/F3 cells were treated with vehicle alone or various concentrations of kinase inhibitors for 90 minutes. Protein lysates were extracted and subjected to immunoprecipitation and Western blotting.  Cell proliferation assays  Ba/F3 cells transfected with various PDGFRA mutants were seeded into 96-well plates at a density of 2 × 104 cells per well and incubated with different concentrations of imatinib or crenolanib for 72 hours, the proliferation and viability was measured by CCK-8 (Dojindo) according to the manufacturer's instruction.  Statistical analysis  Statistical analyses were performed using SPSS 16.0 software. Continuous data such as age and thickness were described using mean ± SD for normally distributed data. The correlations between mutational status and clinical parameters were evaluated by χ2 test or Fisher exact test. All statistical analyses were two sided and P < 0.05 was considered as statistically significant.  Results  Genetic mutations of PDGFRA in melanoma subtypes  Of a total of 351 melanomas analyzed, 16 (4.6%) of them were identified to contain PDGFRA mutations. The mutation frequencies of PDGFRA in acral, mucosal, melanomas on skin without chronic sun-induced damage (non-CSD) melanoma subtypes were 6.8% (9 of 132), 3.6% (4 of 110), and 1.8% (1 of 56), respectively. No PDGFRA mutation was found in melanomas on skin with CSD (Table 1).  View inlineView popup Table 1. Genetic mutations of PDGFRA in melanoma subtypes Mutation types of PDGFRA in melanoma  Sixteen melanomas were found to harbor PDGFRA mutations and 18 different mutations were detected, all of which were heterozygous point mutations (Table 2 and Supplementary Figs. S1–S3). In addition to previously reported five mutations (V561A, K646E, H816Y, L839P, and Y849C; refs. 27–30), the other 13 mutations were novel (Table 2). No common mutation was found. Among the 18 PDGFRA mutations, five mutations were located in juxtamembrane domain (exon 12, 27.8%), five and eight mutations were identified in the first and second tyrosine kinase domain separately (exon 14, 27.8%; exon 18, 44.4%). A premature stop mutation (Q639stop) was observed in one patient. Two patients harbored two different missense point mutations simultaneously, one harbored two mutations in exon 14 (V658A) and 18 (R841K) separately, and the other harbored two mutations both in exon 12 (V561A and Q579R). No mutation was detected in codon 842, which was the most prevalence mutation reported in GISTs (13). All the mutations, including those obtained from The Cancer Genome Atlas (TCGA) database and those reported here, are illustrated in Fig. 1 (31). To exclude the possibility that the detected mutations were due to polymorphisms, we extracted DNA from the peripheral blood mononuclear cells from all the 16 patients harboring PDGFRA mutations and examined the mutation status of PDGFRA. No mutations in exons 12, 14, and 18 of PDGFRA were detected, indicating that the mutations detected by us are indeed somatic mutations.  Figure 1. Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 1. Distribution of mutations in PDGFRA. PDGFRA somatic mutations found in our study and TCGA database were shown. The mutations found in our study were underlined. Boxes represent functional domains: I–V, five immunoglobulin-like domain; TM, transmembrane domain; JM, juxtamembrane domain; TK1, tyrosine kinase domain 1; KI, kinase insert domain; TK2, tyrosine kinase domain 2. View inlineView popup Table 2. Mutation types of PDGFRA in melanoma To analyze the relationship of PDGFRA mutations to other important mutations in melanoma, we further screened the KIT, BRAF, and NRAS sequences as previously described (9, 10). We found two BRAFV600E mutations, one NRASQ61L mutation and zero KIT mutation in samples harboring PDGFRA mutations. Four BRAF mutations, five NRAS mutations, and zero PDGFRA mutation were found in 36 samples containing KIT mutations (data not shown).  Correlation of PDGFRA mutations to the clinical characteristics of melanoma  The summary of correlations between PDGFRA mutations and clinical characteristics is shown in Table 3. Both the age and the proportion of gender were not significantly different between patients with PDGFRA mutations and those without a PDGFRA mutation.  View inlineView popup Table 3. Correlation of PDGFRA genotype to clinical characteristics of melanoma As the Breslow thickness of melanoma is an important prognostic indicator (32), we analyzed the thickness of melanoma samples. Among the 310 samples with thickness data available, the average thickness of samples with PDGFRA mutations was 5.85 mm ± 2.66 mm, whereas that of samples without PDGFRA mutations was 4.87 mm ± 2.64 mm (P = 0.194).  Ulceration is another adverse prognostic factor for melanoma (32). The overall ulceration rate of 311 available samples was 58.8% (183 of 311). The ulceration rate in acral, mucosal, non-CSD, and CSD were 63.1%, 54.2%, 56.4%, and 61.1%, respectively. The ulceration rate was not significantly different in patients with PDGFRA mutations and those without PDGFRA mutations (P = 0.437).  Among the 16 patients with PDGFRA mutations, stage data were available in 15 patients. The percentages of PDGFRA mutations at stage I, II, III, and IV were not significantly different from those with WT PDGFRA (P = 0.217). Among the 6 patients in stage III and IV of disease with PDGFRA mutations, tumor samples from primary sites and metastatic sites were available for 3 of them. Mutational analysis showed that the PDGFRA mutations were the same for the primary and metastatic melanomas.  In addition, the relationship of PDGFRA mutations with melanoma subtypes was analyzed. In the 316 patients with subtype information available, the PDGFRA mutation frequency was not significantly different in melanomas subtypes (P = 0.419). Nevertheless, PDGFRA mutations were more commonly seen in acral and mucosal melanomas, whereas non-CSD and CSD melanomas were less likely to harbor PDGFRA mutations. When comparing PDGFRA mutations in three subtypes of melanomas (acral, mucosal, and nonacral cutaneous melanomas), we found that the PDGFRA mutation frequency was still not significantly different (P = 0.176).  Functional analysis of PDGFRA mutations  To investigate whether the somatic mutations could induce PDGFRA protein auto-activation, 12 novel missense mutants were overexpressed in 293T cells. The tyrosine phosphorylation levels of these PDGFRAs were analyzed by Western blotting. Because D842V was demonstrated to be the most common activating mutation in GISTs, it was used as the positive control. Strong phosphorylation was observed in P577S, V658A, R841K, H845Y, and G853D mutations without the stimulation of PDGF ligand, whereas the other mutations showed weak to medium phosphorylation (Fig. 2A). The five mutations were then transfected into Ba/F3 cells, and the results showed that transfected Ba/F3 cells could grow after G418 selection and withdrawal of IL-3 (Fig. 2B). Therefore, P577S, V658A, R841K, H845Y and G853D substitutions may be gain-of-function mutations. The substitution mutations P577S and V658A may be homologs for the P573S and V654A mutations reported in KIT respectively (33, 34).  Figure 2. Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 2. Activation status of PDGFRA mutations in 293T cells. A, 293T cells were transfected with blank vector, expression vector for WT and mutant(s) PDGFRA. Transfected cells were serum-starved overnight, and Western blotting was used to analyze the phosphorylation levels of PDGFRA after immunoprecipitation. B, Ba/F3 cells transduced with indicated vectors were cultured in the presence or absence of IL-3 after G418 selection, and cell numbers were determined by CCK-8 proliferation assays. Results were presented as mean ± SD of triplicate samples. WT, WT PDGFRA. The experiments were repeated three times with similar results. In vitro sensitivity of PDGFRA gain-of-function mutations to imatinib and crenolanib  To analyze the effects of imatinib and crenolanib on gain-of-function mutations of PDGFRA, the representative PDGFRA mutants were expressed in Ba/F3 cells. The tyrosine phosphorylation status of PDGFRA was detected under different drug concentrations. As others have demonstrated that D842Y was sensitive to imatinib while D842V was resistant to imatinib, they were used as positive and negative control separately (13). Phosphorylation induced by D842Y was completely inhibited at the concentration of 1 μmol/L while D842V was still strongly phosphorylated (Supplementary Fig. S4). D842V was fully inhibited at the crenolanib concentration of 0.1 μmol/L, being consistent with Heinrich and colleagues' report (24).  The six testing mutations were all sensitive to crenolanib and the phosphorylation was completely inhibited at the concentration of 1 μmol/L. V561A, P577S, R841K, H845Y, and G853D were sensitive to imatinib, only V658A was imatinib-resistant. Therefore, imatinib and crenolanib had same inhibitory efficiency on V561A and G853D, whereas crenolanib showed stronger inhibitory effect than imatinib on P577S, V658A, R841K, and H845Y (Fig. 3A).  Figure 3. Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 3. Effects of imatinib and crenolanib on autophosphorylation of mutational PDGFRA. A, Ba/F3 cells were transfected with PDGFRA cDNA encoding for different mutations, and positive cells were selected for G418 resistance and IL-3 independence. Ba/F3 cells were incubated with dissolvent or imatinib/crenolanib at different concentrations for 90 minutes. Whole-cell lysates were extracted and Western blotting was used to analyze the phosphorylation levels of immunoprecipitated PDGFRA. B, Ba/F3 cells bearing mutant PDGFRA were incubated for 72 hours in the presence or absence of different concentrations of imatinib or crenolanib. Cell numbers were determined by CCK-8 proliferation assays. Results were presented as mean ± SD of triplicate samples. The experiments were repeated three times with similar results. To confirm the observations, cell proliferation assays were performed in selected PDGFRA mutants. IL-3–independent growth of V658A and D842V was inhibited by crenolanib, while still sustained in the presence of imatinib. R841K and D842Y induced IL-3–independent growth was almost fully inhibited by either imatinib or crenolanib at the concentration of 1 μmol/L (Fig. 3B). Moreover, P577S and G853D induced IL-3–independent growth could also be inhibited by either imatinib or crenolanib to different extent. However, both imatinib and crenolanib could not significantly inhibit IL-3–dependent growth of Ba/F3 cells even at the concentration of 1 μmol/L (data not shown).  Discussion  The treatment of advanced melanoma is still challenging. Ipilimumab (Yervoy) and vemurafenib (Zelboraf) have been approved by the FDA for the treatment of advanced melanoma. Ipilimumab is the only monotherapy reported to prolong OS with the longest duration time, but the overall response rate is only limited, and side effects can be severe due to hepatoxicity and immune-related adverse events (35, 36). Unlike immunotherapy, targeted therapeutic agents showed fewer side effects. Vemurafenib is the first targeted inhibitor approved by FDA and European Commission for the treatment of patients with advanced melanoma. About 50% of metastatic melanomas harboring BRAFV600E and majority of these patients responded to vemurafenib, with a median OS of approximately 16 months. But the response only lasts 5 to 8 months, and most patients eventually progressed because of acquired resistance (3, 8, 37, 38). The prevalence of BRAF mutation is only 25.5% in Chinese patients with melanoma, which was due to acral and mucosal melanomas have much lower BRAF mutation rates (8, 10). KIT mutation is another common genetic aberration in acral and mucosal melanomas, as acral and mucosal melanomas are the common subtypes in China; the total mutation rate of KIT in Chinese patients with melanoma is much higher than that in Caucasians, such as in Australia and Portland (39, 40). The rate of total disease control was about 50% when patients with melanoma harboring KIT mutations were treated with imatinib, but acquired resistance developed within 3 to 4 months (5, 6). These data indicate that other druggable therapeutic targets are needed for melanoma.  In this study, we have examined the frequency and function of PDGFRA mutations in a cohort of 351 Chinese patients with melanoma. The overall mutation rate in our study was 4.6%. Mutations of PDGFRA are more likely to be happened in acral and mucosal melanomas, as indicated by higher mutation incidence than other subtypes. On the basis of the literature to date, only few studies have examined PDGFRA mutation analysis in melanoma, and no PDGFRA exon mutation was reported before (18–20). There were only 9 cases of acral and 13 mucosal melanomas in these reports. The discrepancy may be due to small sizes of their cohorts, especially the acral and mucosal samples were limited. Although KIT and PDGFRA belong to the same RTK subfamily, the PDGFRA mutation frequency in Chinese patients with melanoma is lower than KIT (10.8%; ref. 9). The PDGFRA mutations were all detected in KIT WT melanomas and in none of the KIT-mutant melanomas. Recently, TCGA database published a dataset of exon sequencing results of 225 cutaneous melanomas. In this cohort, 23 different PDGFRA mutations were found in 21 melanomas (9.3%; 21 of 225), whereas only 3.1% (7 of 225) harbored KIT mutations (31). Their PDGFRA mutation frequency was higher than that in our cohort, which may be due to the fact that whole exons were sequenced, whereas we only sequenced the mutation hotspot of PDGFRA; in their cohort, the frequency of PDGFRA mutations in exon 12, 14, and 18 was 1.3% (3 of 225). In addition, the cases in the TCGA database were most likely from Caucasian patients and race difference may also play a role. In the PDGFRA mutation samples reported by TCGA, six were found with BRAF mutations and eight were found with NRAS mutations simultaneously; in the seven melanoma samples with KIT mutations, two NRAS mutations were detected. On the basis of our data and the data from TCGA, PDGFRA and KIT mutations seem to be mutually exclusive. Although we detected three PDGFRA mutations (A633T, H845Y, and A663V) in melanomas that simultaneously contained BRAFV600E or NRASQ61L mutations, two of them (A633T and A663V) did not cause autophosphorylation of PDGFRA, suggesting that these PDGFRA mutations may not affect the kinase activity and additional studies are needed to explore the function of these mutations.  Unlike BRAF mutations, there is no hotspot in PDGFRA mutations, and no overlapping mutation was found in different patients in our study or in the TCGA database. Exons 12, 14, and 18 of PDGFRA, which are more commonly mutated in other malignancies, encode for juxtamembrane domain, ATP-binding domain, and phosphotransferase domain, respectively. Our results showed no significant difference in the incidence rates of the three exons, quite different from the mutation distribution in GISTs with the highest mutation frequency detected within exon 18 (13, 41). Together with our functional analysis and the previous studies, almost half of the mutations found in our study can induce strong and constitutive activation of PDGFRA, although we cannot exclude the possibility that weak activation may also exert same effects on the downstream pathways.  Imatinib has been used for the treatment of patients harboring PDGFRA mutations for years. The mutational status of PDGFRA may be a significant predictive factor for response to imatinib. Similar to the facts in GISTs that PDGFRA mutation status affect the response to imatinib, our results showed that the sensitivity of PDGFRA to imatinib was correlated with the mutational types, with five (V561A, P577S, R841K, H845Y, and G853D; in except of V658A) of the six mutations sensitive to imatinib. The valine in codon 658 is located in the ATP-binding domain of PDGFRA, which is conserved in KIT and corresponds to codon 654. It has been demonstrated that KITV654A mutation was resistant to imatinib because V654A substitution directly affected the binding of imatinib to KIT protein (34). Crenolanib is a benzimidazole TKI that specifically inhibited the PDGFRA and PDGFRB, and several phase II clinical trials are ongoing. In our study, crenolanib showed a broader spectrum and higher potency than imatinib in inhibiting PDGFRA mutations, evidenced by the fact that all the mutations causing auto-phosphorylation could be fully inhibited by crenolanib. It has been reported that imatinib and crenolanib had different activity spectrum according to the PDGFRA mutation status, and crenolanib was more potent in imatinib-resistant mutations (e.g., D842V, D842I, etc.), whereas imatinib was more potent in inhibiting V561D mutation (24). On the basis of our study, it seems that crenolanib has a broader efficacy spectrum than imatinib in inhibiting PDGFRA activity.  To sum up, our study has confirmed that a small population of Chinese patients with melanoma harbor PDGFRA mutations. Gain-of-function mutations of PDGFRA can lead to ligand-independent activation of PDGFRA and this can be inhibited by TKIs. Our study suggested that patients with melanoma harboring PDGFRA mutations may respond to TKIs-based targeted therapy, thus warranting phase II clinical trials of imatinib or crenolanib in these patients. 
905||Purpose: Platelet-derived growth factor receptor α (PDGFRA) is a target for tyrosine kinase inhibitor (TKI)-based targeted therapy. Dysregulation of PDGFRA has been reported in many cancers. However, PDGFRA mutations in melanomas have not been well studied. We analyzed the genetic mutations of PDGFRA in Chinese patients with melanoma and determined the inhibitory potency of TKIs, such as imatinib and crenolanib, on mutant PDGFRA.  Experimental Design: Of note, 351 melanoma tissue samples were examined for genetic mutations in exons 12, 14, and 18 of PDGFRA. Activities of mutations in response to imatinib and crenolanib were analyzed by Western blotting of tyrosine-phosphorylated PDGFRA and cell proliferation assays.  Results: PDGFRA mutations were observed in 4.6% (16 of 351) of melanomas, and these mutations were mainly detected in acral and mucosal melanomas. PDGFRA mutations seem to be mutually exclusive with KIT mutations, but may coexist with BRAF and NRAS mutations. The genetic mutations of PDGFRA were unrelated to the age, thickness, and ulceration status of primary melanomas. Thirteen mutations were not reported before, and five (P577S, V658A, R841K, H845Y, and G853D) of them resulted in strong autophosphorylation of PDGFRA. Crenolanib showed higher potency than imatinib in inhibiting the kinase activity of PDGFRA. Except that V658A mutation was imatinib-resistant, all the other mutations were sensitive to both imatinib and crenolanib.  Conclusions: PDGFRA mutations are detected in a small population of melanoma patients. Our study suggests that patients with melanoma harboring certain PDGFRA mutations may benefit from imatinib and crenolanib treatment. Clin Cancer Res; 19(24); 6935–42. ©2013 AACR.  Translational Relevance  The incidence of melanoma is increasing worldwide. Similar to KIT, PDGFRA is a type III receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK) and a potential target for tyrosine kinase inhibitors (TKIs), such as imatinib and crenolanib, in cancer treatments. Genetic mutations of PDGFRA have been reported in many cancers, but its mutations in melanomas have not been well studied. Moreover, sensitivity of PDGFRA mutants to TKIs has not been fully evaluated. Defined sensitivity of mutant PDGFRA to TKIs might provide stratification criteria for patients with melanoma, who would benefit from TKI-based targeted therapy. Our study demonstrates that PDGFRA mutations are detected in a small population of melanoma patients, primarily in acral and mucosal melanomas. Our study suggests that a subgroup of patients with melanoma harboring PDGFRA mutations may benefit from TKIs, casting new light in the selection of melanoma patients sensitive to TKIs, such as imatinib and crenolanib.  Introduction  Melanoma is the most aggressive skin cancer with the fastest increasing incidence rate. From 2005 to 2009, the age-adjusted incidence rate was 21.0 per 100,000 men and women per year in the United States (1). Metastatic melanoma is difficult to treat as standard chemotherapy [high-dose interleukin (IL)-2 and dacarbazine] cannot significantly improve the overall survival (OS; ref. 2). Targeted therapeutic agents have shown promising clinical efficacy, such as BRAF inhibitors (e.g., vemurafenib and dabrafenib; refs. 3, 4), KIT inhibitor (imatinib; refs. 5, 6), and MAP–ERK kinase (MEK) inhibitor (trametinib; ref. 7). Although about 50% of melanomas harbors BRAF mutation in Caucasians (8), we have previously shown that KIT, BRAF, and NRAS mutation rates in Chinese patients with melanoma are 10.8%, 25.5%, and 7.2%, respectively (9, 10). Therefore, uncovering other potential driver oncogenic mutations will help to identify patients with melanoma who may benefit from targeted therapeutic agents.  Platelet-derived growth factor receptor α polypeptide (PDGFRA, also known as CD140A) belongs to the type III receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK) subfamily, and regulates cell proliferation, differentiation, survival, and tumor progression (11, 12). Dysregulation of PDGFRA has been reported in several cancers (12–16). PDGFRA is overexpressed in some melanomas and the increased copy number has also been reported previously (17, 18). The mutational analysis of PDGFRA is relatively limited in melanoma despite that one intronic mutation of PDGFRA has been reported in ocular melanoma (18–20). Some patients with gastrointestinal stromal tumors (GIST) bearing PDGFRA mutations have benefited from molecular therapeutic agents (21).  Imatinib is a tyrosine kinase inhibitor (TKI) against BCR-ABL, KIT, and PDGFRA. It is the first-line therapy for chronic myelogenous leukemia and has been approved by U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) for the treatment of patients with advanced GIST in 2002 (21, 22). The latest National Comprehensive Cancer Network (NCCN) guidelines have suggested imatinib as a treatment of KIT-mutated melanomas (23). Crenolanib is a PDGFR-specific TKI that significantly inhibits the kinase activity of PDGFRA (24). Several phase II clinical trials are ongoing, including a trial of crenolanib in advanced GIST with D842-related mutations and deletions in PDGFRA (NCT01243346).  Considering that the mutational status of PDGFRA in melanomas has not been fully evaluated and that PDGFRA is a potential target for TKIs-based targeted therapy, we collected 351 melanoma tissue samples and examined the mutational status of PDGFRA. Kinase activities of these mutated PDGFRA as well as their sensitivity to imatinib and crenolanib were also evaluated.  Materials and Methods  Tumor samples  A total of 351 archival formalin-fixed and paraffin-embedded (FFPE) melanomas (including 316 primary melanomas and 35 metastatic melanomas) were derived from Peking University Cancer Hospital & Institute (Beijing, China) between 2006 and 2011. Clinical data, including age, gender, stage, thickness, and ulceration, were collected. This study was reviewed and approved by the medical ethics committee of the Peking University Cancer Hospital & Institute.  DNA extraction and mutation detection  Genomic DNA was extracted from FFPE specimens using the QIAamp DNA FFPE Tissue Kit (Qiagen) according to the manufacturer's instruction. Exons 12, 14, and 18 of PDGFRA were amplified by PCR in at least two separate preparations of genomic DNA. The primers and annealing temperatures were listed in Supplementary Table S1. The PCR products purification and sequencing were performed as described previously (9, 10).  Cells  293T (catalog no. ACC-635) and Ba/F3 (catalog no. ACC-300) cells were initially obtained from Leibniz Institute DSMZ (Braunschweig, Germany) and cultured as recommended. 293T cells are highly transfectable derivative of the human primary embryonal kidney cell line 293 (ACC-305), carrying a plasmid containing the temperature-sensitive mutant of SV-40 large T-antigen, which were authenticated by morphology assays (fibroblastoid cells growing adherently as monolayer), PCR assays of large T antigens, 293 cell-specific short tandem repeat markers, and cytogenetic karyotypes assays. Ba/F3 cells are IL-3–dependent murine pro-B cell line derived from C3H mouse strain, which were authenticated by morphology assays (single, round cells in suspension), PCR assays of mouse species-specific markers, immunologic assays (CD11b−F4/80+), and cytogenetic karyotypes assays. Both cell lines were confirmed to be negative for the common microorganisms. Detailed information for authentication of these cells could be obtained online (http://www.dsmz.de).  Plasmid construction and lentiviral packaging  The wild-type (WT) PDGFRA cDNA was amplified from melanoma cDNA by PCR and subcloned into the expression vector pLenti PGK Neo DEST (w531-1; Addgene). All the PDGFRA-mutant cDNAs were generated by site-directed mutagenesis as previously described (25). All vectors were confirmed by bidirectional sequencing. The lentiviral expression vector, psPAX2 packaging vector, and pMD2.G envelop vector were added into 293T cells using Fugene 6 transfection reagent (Promega). The virus-containing supernatants were harvested, filtered through a 0.45-μm cellulose acetate filter (Millipore) at 48 and 72 hours, and concentrated using Lenti-X Concentrator (Clontech).  Cell cultures and transfections  293T cells were grown in Dulbecco's modified Eagle medium (DMEM) medium (Invitrogen), supplemented with 10% FBS (Hyclone) and penicillin/streptomycin (Invitrogen). Ba/F3 cells (a kind gift from Dr. Wei Tong, Children's Hospital of Philadelphia, University of Pennsylvania, Philadelphia, PA) were grown in RPMI-1640 medium with GlutaMAX (Invitrogen), supplemented with 10% FBS, 10 ng/mL IL-3 (Invitrogen), and penicillin/streptomycin. Virus was added onto 293T or Ba/F3 cells with polybrene. Ba/F3 clones were selected by 1 mg/mL G418 and followed by IL-3–independent growth. DNA from stably transfected cell lines was extracted and sequenced to confirm the presence of mutant PDGFRA sequence.  Immunoprecipitation and Western blotting  Cells were lysed using PhosphoSafe Extraction Reagent (Millipore) and protein extracts were immunoprecipitated with rabbit anti-human PDGFRA polyclonal antibody (C-20; Santa Cruz Biotechnology) and Protein A/G beads (Sigma-Aldrich). Western blotting was performed with mouse anti-phosphotyrosine antibody (4G10; Millipore) and PDGFRA antibody. The procedures were carried out as described previously (26).  Assessment of PDGFRA kinase activity  Imatinib and crenolanib were purchased from Selleckchem and resolved in dimethyl sulfoxide (DMSO) at the concentration of 10 mmol/L and stocked at −80°C. Ba/F3 cells were treated with vehicle alone or various concentrations of kinase inhibitors for 90 minutes. Protein lysates were extracted and subjected to immunoprecipitation and Western blotting.  Cell proliferation assays  Ba/F3 cells transfected with various PDGFRA mutants were seeded into 96-well plates at a density of 2 × 104 cells per well and incubated with different concentrations of imatinib or crenolanib for 72 hours, the proliferation and viability was measured by CCK-8 (Dojindo) according to the manufacturer's instruction.  Statistical analysis  Statistical analyses were performed using SPSS 16.0 software. Continuous data such as age and thickness were described using mean ± SD for normally distributed data. The correlations between mutational status and clinical parameters were evaluated by χ2 test or Fisher exact test. All statistical analyses were two sided and P < 0.05 was considered as statistically significant.  Results  Genetic mutations of PDGFRA in melanoma subtypes  Of a total of 351 melanomas analyzed, 16 (4.6%) of them were identified to contain PDGFRA mutations. The mutation frequencies of PDGFRA in acral, mucosal, melanomas on skin without chronic sun-induced damage (non-CSD) melanoma subtypes were 6.8% (9 of 132), 3.6% (4 of 110), and 1.8% (1 of 56), respectively. No PDGFRA mutation was found in melanomas on skin with CSD (Table 1).  View inlineView popup Table 1. Genetic mutations of PDGFRA in melanoma subtypes Mutation types of PDGFRA in melanoma  Sixteen melanomas were found to harbor PDGFRA mutations and 18 different mutations were detected, all of which were heterozygous point mutations (Table 2 and Supplementary Figs. S1–S3). In addition to previously reported five mutations (V561A, K646E, H816Y, L839P, and Y849C; refs. 27–30), the other 13 mutations were novel (Table 2). No common mutation was found. Among the 18 PDGFRA mutations, five mutations were located in juxtamembrane domain (exon 12, 27.8%), five and eight mutations were identified in the first and second tyrosine kinase domain separately (exon 14, 27.8%; exon 18, 44.4%). A premature stop mutation (Q639stop) was observed in one patient. Two patients harbored two different missense point mutations simultaneously, one harbored two mutations in exon 14 (V658A) and 18 (R841K) separately, and the other harbored two mutations both in exon 12 (V561A and Q579R). No mutation was detected in codon 842, which was the most prevalence mutation reported in GISTs (13). All the mutations, including those obtained from The Cancer Genome Atlas (TCGA) database and those reported here, are illustrated in Fig. 1 (31). To exclude the possibility that the detected mutations were due to polymorphisms, we extracted DNA from the peripheral blood mononuclear cells from all the 16 patients harboring PDGFRA mutations and examined the mutation status of PDGFRA. No mutations in exons 12, 14, and 18 of PDGFRA were detected, indicating that the mutations detected by us are indeed somatic mutations.  Figure 1. Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 1. Distribution of mutations in PDGFRA. PDGFRA somatic mutations found in our study and TCGA database were shown. The mutations found in our study were underlined. Boxes represent functional domains: I–V, five immunoglobulin-like domain; TM, transmembrane domain; JM, juxtamembrane domain; TK1, tyrosine kinase domain 1; KI, kinase insert domain; TK2, tyrosine kinase domain 2. View inlineView popup Table 2. Mutation types of PDGFRA in melanoma To analyze the relationship of PDGFRA mutations to other important mutations in melanoma, we further screened the KIT, BRAF, and NRAS sequences as previously described (9, 10). We found two BRAFV600E mutations, one NRASQ61L mutation and zero KIT mutation in samples harboring PDGFRA mutations. Four BRAF mutations, five NRAS mutations, and zero PDGFRA mutation were found in 36 samples containing KIT mutations (data not shown).  Correlation of PDGFRA mutations to the clinical characteristics of melanoma  The summary of correlations between PDGFRA mutations and clinical characteristics is shown in Table 3. Both the age and the proportion of gender were not significantly different between patients with PDGFRA mutations and those without a PDGFRA mutation.  View inlineView popup Table 3. Correlation of PDGFRA genotype to clinical characteristics of melanoma As the Breslow thickness of melanoma is an important prognostic indicator (32), we analyzed the thickness of melanoma samples. Among the 310 samples with thickness data available, the average thickness of samples with PDGFRA mutations was 5.85 mm ± 2.66 mm, whereas that of samples without PDGFRA mutations was 4.87 mm ± 2.64 mm (P = 0.194).  Ulceration is another adverse prognostic factor for melanoma (32). The overall ulceration rate of 311 available samples was 58.8% (183 of 311). The ulceration rate in acral, mucosal, non-CSD, and CSD were 63.1%, 54.2%, 56.4%, and 61.1%, respectively. The ulceration rate was not significantly different in patients with PDGFRA mutations and those without PDGFRA mutations (P = 0.437).  Among the 16 patients with PDGFRA mutations, stage data were available in 15 patients. The percentages of PDGFRA mutations at stage I, II, III, and IV were not significantly different from those with WT PDGFRA (P = 0.217). Among the 6 patients in stage III and IV of disease with PDGFRA mutations, tumor samples from primary sites and metastatic sites were available for 3 of them. Mutational analysis showed that the PDGFRA mutations were the same for the primary and metastatic melanomas.  In addition, the relationship of PDGFRA mutations with melanoma subtypes was analyzed. In the 316 patients with subtype information available, the PDGFRA mutation frequency was not significantly different in melanomas subtypes (P = 0.419). Nevertheless, PDGFRA mutations were more commonly seen in acral and mucosal melanomas, whereas non-CSD and CSD melanomas were less likely to harbor PDGFRA mutations. When comparing PDGFRA mutations in three subtypes of melanomas (acral, mucosal, and nonacral cutaneous melanomas), we found that the PDGFRA mutation frequency was still not significantly different (P = 0.176).  Functional analysis of PDGFRA mutations  To investigate whether the somatic mutations could induce PDGFRA protein auto-activation, 12 novel missense mutants were overexpressed in 293T cells. The tyrosine phosphorylation levels of these PDGFRAs were analyzed by Western blotting. Because D842V was demonstrated to be the most common activating mutation in GISTs, it was used as the positive control. Strong phosphorylation was observed in P577S, V658A, R841K, H845Y, and G853D mutations without the stimulation of PDGF ligand, whereas the other mutations showed weak to medium phosphorylation (Fig. 2A). The five mutations were then transfected into Ba/F3 cells, and the results showed that transfected Ba/F3 cells could grow after G418 selection and withdrawal of IL-3 (Fig. 2B). Therefore, P577S, V658A, R841K, H845Y and G853D substitutions may be gain-of-function mutations. The substitution mutations P577S and V658A may be homologs for the P573S and V654A mutations reported in KIT respectively (33, 34).  Figure 2. Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 2. Activation status of PDGFRA mutations in 293T cells. A, 293T cells were transfected with blank vector, expression vector for WT and mutant(s) PDGFRA. Transfected cells were serum-starved overnight, and Western blotting was used to analyze the phosphorylation levels of PDGFRA after immunoprecipitation. B, Ba/F3 cells transduced with indicated vectors were cultured in the presence or absence of IL-3 after G418 selection, and cell numbers were determined by CCK-8 proliferation assays. Results were presented as mean ± SD of triplicate samples. WT, WT PDGFRA. The experiments were repeated three times with similar results. In vitro sensitivity of PDGFRA gain-of-function mutations to imatinib and crenolanib  To analyze the effects of imatinib and crenolanib on gain-of-function mutations of PDGFRA, the representative PDGFRA mutants were expressed in Ba/F3 cells. The tyrosine phosphorylation status of PDGFRA was detected under different drug concentrations. As others have demonstrated that D842Y was sensitive to imatinib while D842V was resistant to imatinib, they were used as positive and negative control separately (13). Phosphorylation induced by D842Y was completely inhibited at the concentration of 1 μmol/L while D842V was still strongly phosphorylated (Supplementary Fig. S4). D842V was fully inhibited at the crenolanib concentration of 0.1 μmol/L, being consistent with Heinrich and colleagues' report (24).  The six testing mutations were all sensitive to crenolanib and the phosphorylation was completely inhibited at the concentration of 1 μmol/L. V561A, P577S, R841K, H845Y, and G853D were sensitive to imatinib, only V658A was imatinib-resistant. Therefore, imatinib and crenolanib had same inhibitory efficiency on V561A and G853D, whereas crenolanib showed stronger inhibitory effect than imatinib on P577S, V658A, R841K, and H845Y (Fig. 3A).  Figure 3. Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 3. Effects of imatinib and crenolanib on autophosphorylation of mutational PDGFRA. A, Ba/F3 cells were transfected with PDGFRA cDNA encoding for different mutations, and positive cells were selected for G418 resistance and IL-3 independence. Ba/F3 cells were incubated with dissolvent or imatinib/crenolanib at different concentrations for 90 minutes. Whole-cell lysates were extracted and Western blotting was used to analyze the phosphorylation levels of immunoprecipitated PDGFRA. B, Ba/F3 cells bearing mutant PDGFRA were incubated for 72 hours in the presence or absence of different concentrations of imatinib or crenolanib. Cell numbers were determined by CCK-8 proliferation assays. Results were presented as mean ± SD of triplicate samples. The experiments were repeated three times with similar results. To confirm the observations, cell proliferation assays were performed in selected PDGFRA mutants. IL-3–independent growth of V658A and D842V was inhibited by crenolanib, while still sustained in the presence of imatinib. R841K and D842Y induced IL-3–independent growth was almost fully inhibited by either imatinib or crenolanib at the concentration of 1 μmol/L (Fig. 3B). Moreover, P577S and G853D induced IL-3–independent growth could also be inhibited by either imatinib or crenolanib to different extent. However, both imatinib and crenolanib could not significantly inhibit IL-3–dependent growth of Ba/F3 cells even at the concentration of 1 μmol/L (data not shown).  Discussion  The treatment of advanced melanoma is still challenging. Ipilimumab (Yervoy) and vemurafenib (Zelboraf) have been approved by the FDA for the treatment of advanced melanoma. Ipilimumab is the only monotherapy reported to prolong OS with the longest duration time, but the overall response rate is only limited, and side effects can be severe due to hepatoxicity and immune-related adverse events (35, 36). Unlike immunotherapy, targeted therapeutic agents showed fewer side effects. Vemurafenib is the first targeted inhibitor approved by FDA and European Commission for the treatment of patients with advanced melanoma. About 50% of metastatic melanomas harboring BRAFV600E and majority of these patients responded to vemurafenib, with a median OS of approximately 16 months. But the response only lasts 5 to 8 months, and most patients eventually progressed because of acquired resistance (3, 8, 37, 38). The prevalence of BRAF mutation is only 25.5% in Chinese patients with melanoma, which was due to acral and mucosal melanomas have much lower BRAF mutation rates (8, 10). KIT mutation is another common genetic aberration in acral and mucosal melanomas, as acral and mucosal melanomas are the common subtypes in China; the total mutation rate of KIT in Chinese patients with melanoma is much higher than that in Caucasians, such as in Australia and Portland (39, 40). The rate of total disease control was about 50% when patients with melanoma harboring KIT mutations were treated with imatinib, but acquired resistance developed within 3 to 4 months (5, 6). These data indicate that other druggable therapeutic targets are needed for melanoma.  In this study, we have examined the frequency and function of PDGFRA mutations in a cohort of 351 Chinese patients with melanoma. The overall mutation rate in our study was 4.6%. Mutations of PDGFRA are more likely to be happened in acral and mucosal melanomas, as indicated by higher mutation incidence than other subtypes. On the basis of the literature to date, only few studies have examined PDGFRA mutation analysis in melanoma, and no PDGFRA exon mutation was reported before (18–20). There were only 9 cases of acral and 13 mucosal melanomas in these reports. The discrepancy may be due to small sizes of their cohorts, especially the acral and mucosal samples were limited. Although KIT and PDGFRA belong to the same RTK subfamily, the PDGFRA mutation frequency in Chinese patients with melanoma is lower than KIT (10.8%; ref. 9). The PDGFRA mutations were all detected in KIT WT melanomas and in none of the KIT-mutant melanomas. Recently, TCGA database published a dataset of exon sequencing results of 225 cutaneous melanomas. In this cohort, 23 different PDGFRA mutations were found in 21 melanomas (9.3%; 21 of 225), whereas only 3.1% (7 of 225) harbored KIT mutations (31). Their PDGFRA mutation frequency was higher than that in our cohort, which may be due to the fact that whole exons were sequenced, whereas we only sequenced the mutation hotspot of PDGFRA; in their cohort, the frequency of PDGFRA mutations in exon 12, 14, and 18 was 1.3% (3 of 225). In addition, the cases in the TCGA database were most likely from Caucasian patients and race difference may also play a role. In the PDGFRA mutation samples reported by TCGA, six were found with BRAF mutations and eight were found with NRAS mutations simultaneously; in the seven melanoma samples with KIT mutations, two NRAS mutations were detected. On the basis of our data and the data from TCGA, PDGFRA and KIT mutations seem to be mutually exclusive. Although we detected three PDGFRA mutations (A633T, H845Y, and A663V) in melanomas that simultaneously contained BRAFV600E or NRASQ61L mutations, two of them (A633T and A663V) did not cause autophosphorylation of PDGFRA, suggesting that these PDGFRA mutations may not affect the kinase activity and additional studies are needed to explore the function of these mutations.  Unlike BRAF mutations, there is no hotspot in PDGFRA mutations, and no overlapping mutation was found in different patients in our study or in the TCGA database. Exons 12, 14, and 18 of PDGFRA, which are more commonly mutated in other malignancies, encode for juxtamembrane domain, ATP-binding domain, and phosphotransferase domain, respectively. Our results showed no significant difference in the incidence rates of the three exons, quite different from the mutation distribution in GISTs with the highest mutation frequency detected within exon 18 (13, 41). Together with our functional analysis and the previous studies, almost half of the mutations found in our study can induce strong and constitutive activation of PDGFRA, although we cannot exclude the possibility that weak activation may also exert same effects on the downstream pathways.  Imatinib has been used for the treatment of patients harboring PDGFRA mutations for years. The mutational status of PDGFRA may be a significant predictive factor for response to imatinib. Similar to the facts in GISTs that PDGFRA mutation status affect the response to imatinib, our results showed that the sensitivity of PDGFRA to imatinib was correlated with the mutational types, with five (V561A, P577S, R841K, H845Y, and G853D; in except of V658A) of the six mutations sensitive to imatinib. The valine in codon 658 is located in the ATP-binding domain of PDGFRA, which is conserved in KIT and corresponds to codon 654. It has been demonstrated that KITV654A mutation was resistant to imatinib because V654A substitution directly affected the binding of imatinib to KIT protein (34). Crenolanib is a benzimidazole TKI that specifically inhibited the PDGFRA and PDGFRB, and several phase II clinical trials are ongoing. In our study, crenolanib showed a broader spectrum and higher potency than imatinib in inhibiting PDGFRA mutations, evidenced by the fact that all the mutations causing auto-phosphorylation could be fully inhibited by crenolanib. It has been reported that imatinib and crenolanib had different activity spectrum according to the PDGFRA mutation status, and crenolanib was more potent in imatinib-resistant mutations (e.g., D842V, D842I, etc.), whereas imatinib was more potent in inhibiting V561D mutation (24). On the basis of our study, it seems that crenolanib has a broader efficacy spectrum than imatinib in inhibiting PDGFRA activity.  To sum up, our study has confirmed that a small population of Chinese patients with melanoma harbor PDGFRA mutations. Gain-of-function mutations of PDGFRA can lead to ligand-independent activation of PDGFRA and this can be inhibited by TKIs. Our study suggested that patients with melanoma harboring PDGFRA mutations may respond to TKIs-based targeted therapy, thus warranting phase II clinical trials of imatinib or crenolanib in these patients. 
906||Activating mutations in the platelet-derived growth factor (PDGF) receptor alpha (PDGFRA) have been described in patients with gastrointestinal stromal tumors or myeloid malignancies associated with hypereosinophilia. These patients respond well to imatinib mesylate, raising the question as to whether patients with a PDGF receptor mutation in other tumor types should receive a tyrosine kinase inhibitor treatment. We characterized 10 novel somatic point mutations in PDGFRA that have been reported in isolated cases of glioblastoma, melanoma, acute myeloid leukemia, peripheral nerve sheath tumors and neuroendocrine carcinoma. The PDGFRA transmembrane domain mutation V536E stimulated Ba/F3 cell growth and signaling via ERK and STAT5 in the absence of ligand. This mutant, identified in glioblastoma, was strongly inhibited by imatinib. Modeling suggested that the mutation modulates the packing of the transmembrane domain helices in the receptor dimer. By contrast, two mutations in highly conserved residues affected the receptor traffic to the cell surface or kinase activity, thereby preventing the response to PDGF. The other mutations had no significant impact on the receptor activity. This functional analysis matched the predictions of SIFT and PolyPhen for only five mutations and these algorithms do not discriminate gain from loss of function. Finally, an E996K variant that had been identified in a melanoma cell line was not expressed in these cells. Altogether, several newly identified PDGFRA mutations do not activate the receptor and may therefore represent passenger mutations. Our results also underline the importance of characterizing novel kinase alterations in cancer patients.  Keywords: PDGF receptor; tyrosine kinase inhibitors; glioblastoma; leukemia; GIST Top of page Introduction Platelet-derived growth factor (PDGF) receptors are receptor tyrosine kinases that are required for the embryo development.1 Two genes, PDGFRA and PDGFRB, encode the receptor α and β isoforms, which are highly homologous and share a common architecture. They consist of five N-terminal immunoglobulin (Ig)-like domains, which are binding to various isoforms of PDGF, a single transmembrane domain and a split protein tyrosine kinase domain. Although the exact structure of these receptors has not been solved yet, the mechanism of activation could be modeled based on mutation analysis and the partial structure of related receptors such FLT3 and KIT. In the absence of ligand, the juxtamembrane domain and the activation loop adopt a conformation that keeps the kinase domain inactive. PDGF binding induces the receptor dimerization and both inhibitory domains undergo large conformation changes and become phosphorylated on tyrosines, stabilizing the active receptor state. In PDGF receptor β (PDGFRB), the C-terminal tail was also suggested to have an inhibitory role.2 This was not investigated in PDGFRA; its C-terminus being the most divergent part compared with PDGFRB.  Activating point mutations in PDGFRA have been described ina small subset of patients with gastrointestinal stromal tumors (GIST, 5–10%).3, 4 Most mutations are located in the juxtamembrane domain or in the activation loop and are likely to disrupt the inhibited conformation of the kinase domain while stabilizingthe active one. Activated fusions genes, such as FIP1L1-PDGFRA, were described in myeloid malignancies associated with hypereosinophilia (MMAH).5, 6, 7 In most cases, the fusion disrupts the juxtamembrane domain, which is enough to activate the receptor. Alternatively, the fusion partner includes an oligomerization domain, which activates the kinase activity, such as in most PDGFRB fusions. Recently, somatic PDGFRA point mutations were also found in hypereosinophilia.8 Interestingly, some of the reported mutations were not transforming when tested in cell lines. Gain-of-function PDGFRA mutations were also reported in inflammatory fibroid polyps.9 In addition, PDGFRA is activated by overexpression in glioblastoma of the proneural subtype.10 An in-frame deletion of 81 amino acids in the Ig-like domains 4 and 5 was found to activate PDGFRA in glioblastoma patients with a receptor gene amplification.11, 12  The PDGF receptor kinase activity is effectively inhibited by imatinib mesylate (Glivec), a tyrosine kinase inhibitor developed against BCR-ABL, which turned out to be at least 10 times more active on PDGF receptors.7 This drug induces long-term remissions in myeloid malignancies associated with hypereosinophilia in the presence of a PDGF receptor fusion gene.13, 14 GISTs are also sensitive to imatinib, although resistant mutations such as D842V have been described.4 New molecules may overcome resistance. By contrast, imatinib has failed to improve survival of glioblastoma patients.15, 16  The success of imatinib in cancers carrying an activating PDGFRA variant, that is, GIST and MMAH, raises the question as to whether all cancer patients with a PDGF receptor mutation should receive a tyrosine kinase inhibitor treatment. Even though these patients are rare, next-generation sequencing technologies will allow the systematic detection of many different mutations in most cancers. These new technologies have raised great expectations for the development of a personalized treatment of each cancer.  Ten novel somatic point mutations in PDGFRA have been reported in a variety of cancers, namely isolated cases of glioblastoma, melanoma, acute myeloid leukemia (AML), peripheral nerve sheath tumors and neuroendocrine carcinoma (Table 1).10, 17, 18, 19, 20 The mutations were found in single cases, except W349C and V536E, which were reported in two patients.10, 21 In most cases, a polymorphism was carefully excluded. However, they were not functionally characterized and it is not clear whether these patients could have benefited from imatinib therapy. The mutations are located in various domains of the receptor, including regions where activating mutations have not been reported yet, such as the transmembrane domain and the C-terminal tail. The goal of the present study was to characterize them.  Table 1 - PDGFRA mutations characterized in the present study. Table 1 - PDGFRA mutations characterized in the present study - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author Full table  Top of page Results W349C prevents PDGFRA glycosylation and traffic to the cell surface Mutants were stably transfected in Ba/F3 cells, which proliferate in the absence of cytokine when they express a constitutively activated PDGF receptor.4, 22 As a positive control, we also expressed PDGFRA-D842V, a constitutively activated mutant found in GISTs.4 The mutant Ba/F3 lines were sorted to remove the fraction of cells that did not express PDGFRA. Their cell surface expression after sorting is shown in Figure 1a. W349C was not detectable at the cell surface and could not be sorted. Next, the receptor expression level was analyzed by western blot (Figure 1b). All mutants were expressed at a level similar or higher than D842V. Two receptor bands are detected by western blots in transfected Ba/F3 cell extracts and represent differentN-glycosylation levels, as described.23 The heavier form corresponds to the fully glycosylated receptor, which is matured in the Golgi and expressed at the cell surface. Unlike wild-type (WT) PDGFRA and the other mutants, W349C was detectable as a single band corresponding to immature glycosylation, indicating that this mutant is not properly trafficking to the cell surface, in agreement with the flow cytometry data (Figure 1b). Figure 1. Figure 1 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author W349C perturbs PDGFRA traffic to the cell surface. Ba/F3 cells were stably transfected with PDGFRA mutants and sorted. Receptor expression was tested by flow cytometry on intact cells (a) or by western blot (b). The average fluorescence intensity compared with thewild-type (WT) receptor (set at 100%) is shown (from a minimum of two experiments).  Full figure and legend (80K)  V536E constitutively activates the PDGF receptor We next tested the proliferation of transfected Ba/F3 cells using a sensitive tritiated thymidine incorporation test. The V536E mutation in the transmembrane domain was the only one supporting Ba/F3 proliferation in the absence of cytokine, like the D842V positive control (Figure 2a). In the presence of PDGF, the expression of WT or mutant receptors allowed Ba/F3 cell growth to a similar extent, except W349C, as expected from the lack of surface protein expression, and F808L, which did not respond to stimulation. Similar results were obtained by counting cells in liquid cultures in the absence or presence of PDGF (data not shown). All cell lines grew similarly in the presence of interleukin-3 (IL3). Figure 2. Figure 2 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author PDGFRA V536E is constitutively activated, whereas W349C and F808L do not respond to PDGF. (a) Transfected Ba/F3 cells were extensively washed and cultured in the absence of cytokine or in the presence of PDGF for 24 h. Thymidine incorporation was quantified to evaluate cell proliferation. One representative experiment out of three is shown. All cell lines proliferated similarly in the presence of interleukin-3 (data not shown). (b) MCF7 cells were transiently transfected with the indicated receptor and a luciferase construct driven by a serum-responsive element. The average of three experiments is shown with s.e.m. V536E significantly induced the luciferase activity in the absence of cytokine compared with wild type (WT; P<0.05, Student’s t-test).  Full figure and legend (73K)  Constitutive signaling by PDGFRA-V536E was confirmed using a luciferase reporter assay driven by serum response elements in MCF7 cells (Figure 2b). In line with the proliferation results, most mutants were comparable to the WT receptor and only weakly stimulated the reporter activity, except W349C and F808L, which did not produce a significant reporter signal. Similar results were obtained using a promoter driven by signal transducer and activator of transcription (STAT) in PAE cells (Supplementary Figure 1). The ability of the mutant receptors to respond to PDGF was also tested by co-transfecting a PDGF-B cDNA, which confirmed the inability of the two mutants mentioned above to respond to PDGF.  To further demonstrate that V536E is a transforming mutation, we tested its ability to mediate the formation of transformed fibroblasts foci. Low-passage NIH3T3 cells were transfected with the V536E mutant compared with activated D842V, WT and W349C receptors. In line with the Ba/F3 experiment, PDGFRA-V536E induced the formation of foci, by contrast to WT and W349C receptors (Figure 3a).  Figure 3. Figure 3 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author Cell transformation and constitutive signaling by PDGFRA V536E. (a) Low-passage NIH3T3 cells were transfected with the indicated PDGFRA receptor or empty vector. After 3 weeks, transformed fibroblasts foci were stained with crystal violet, photographed (upper panel) and scored (lower panel, average of three independant experiments performed in triplicate cultures, arbitrary units). (b) Ba/F3 cells transfected PDGFRA wild type (WT), V536E or D842V were stimulated with PDGF or IL3 for 15 min or left untreated. Cells were lysed and protein extracts were analyzed by western blot (WB) with antibodies recognizing active phosphorylated STAT5, AKT or ERK. Antibodies against total STAT5, AKT and ERK2 were used as controls. (c) HEK293T cells transiently transfected with the indicated receptor were lysed and analyzed by western blot with anti-phospho-tyrosine or with anti-PDGFRA antibodies (left panels). Alternatively, PDGFRA was immunoprecipitated (IP) from lysates before WB (right panels).  Full figure and legend (90K)  We further studied the V536E mutant signaling in Ba/F3 cells by analyzing STAT5, extracellular signal regulated kinase (ERK)-1/2 and AKT phosphorylation by western blot. The expression of V536E or D842V induced the phosphorylation of ERK and STAT5 but not AKT (Figure 3b). By contrast, cell stimulation with PDGF induced the phosphorylation of ERK and AKT but not STAT5, suggesting that signal transduction by V536E differed from the WT receptor. The phosphorylation of the receptor itself was then analyzed in transfected HEK293T cells (Figure 3c). V536E phosphorylation on tyrosines was increased compared with the WT receptor, confirming that this mutation constitutively activates the receptor.  PDGFRA-D842V is resistant to imatinib, whereas juxtamembrane mutants are highly sensitive to this drug. We have also shown previously that a transmembrane deletion shifts the sensitivity of the ETV6-PDGFRB fusion to imatinib.22 The ability of imatinib to block proliferation and signaling induced by V536E was analyzed in Ba/F3 and MCF7 cells. Figure 4 shows that imatinib completely inhibited Ba/F3-V536E cell growth with an IC50 similar to the one reported for FIP1L1-PDGFRA and much lower than the concentration required to block BCR-ABL.7 The activation of serum-responsive elements by V536E in luciferase assays was also dampened by imatinib. These experiments demonstrate that V536E is highly sensitive to imatinib.  Figure 4. Figure 4 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author V536E is sensitive to inhibition by imatinib. (a) Ba/F3 cells expressing the indicated receptor were treated with imatinib for 24 h. Thymidine incorporation was quantified to evaluate cell proliferation. (b) MCF7 cells were transiently transfected with the indicated receptor, a luciferase reporter construct controlled by serum-responsive elements and a control β-galactosidase reporter. Cells were treated with imatinib for 24 h. The luciferase activity was measured and divided by the β-galactosidase activity.  Full figure and legend (57K)  Impact of V536E on PDGFRA dimerization and structure of the transmembrane domain Mutations similar to V536E in the transmembrane helix of other receptors were suggested to promote dimerization.24 Therefore, we tested the impact of the V536E mutation on PDGFRA dimerization. Receptor dimers were chemically crosslinked before cell lysis and western blot analysis (Figure 5a). This experiment suggested that a small fraction of the receptor could be crosslinked in the absence of ligand. Treatment with PDGF then increased the dimer formation, as expected from published results.25 Importantly, no major difference was observed between WT and mutant receptors. Figure 5. Figure 5 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author V536E mutation does not affect receptor dimerization but modulates packing of transmembrane domains. (a) Ba/F3 cells expressing the indicated receptor were incubated with PDGF-BB for 1 h on ice. Cells were washed and treated with bis(sulfosuccinimidyl)-suberate (BS3) to crosslink membrane protein complexes. PDGF receptors were isolated from cell protein extracts using wheat germ agglutinin-coupled beads. Western blot was performed with anti-PDGFRA antibodies. (b) Top-scoring predicted conformation of the mutant PDGFRA transmembrane dimer (magenta) superimposed with left-handed nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR) conformation (green) of PDGFRB dimer. Crossing angles of dimer conformations and backbone root-mean-square deviations (RMSDs) between them are given. Peptides are shown in cartoon-and-stick representation. (c) Normalized packing score (FCSCOR) of the wild type (WT) and the mutant PDGFRA transmembrane dimers plotted as functions of the dimer crossing angle (χ). For each dimer, three top-scoring conformations (numbered ‘1’, ‘2’ and ‘3’) are shown. See Supplementary Figure 2 for conformation details. Left- and right-handed dimer conformations are shown in cartoon-and-stick representation.  Full figure and legend (174K)  To understand better the structural origin of the receptor constitutive activation induced by the V536E mutation, we performed molecular modeling of possible conformations of PDGFRA transmembrane helix dimer using PREDDIMER approach.26 Transmembrane helices of PDGFRA were predicted to form several distinctive top-scoring dimer conformations similar to those of PDGFRB (Figure 5b and Supplementary Figure 2). We found that the substitution of respective valine for glutamic acid is likely to change the packing efficiency of the predicted dimer conformations and may induce a repopulation of the dimer conformational ensemble. Taking into account an observed gap between packing efficiencies of the transmembrane dimer conformations (calculated according to the scoring function) in mutant V536E receptor, the left-handed conformation is likely to be predominant, whereas the right-handed one is predicted to be less populated (Figure 5c). In contrast, we observed the reverse situation for WT receptor. In addition, the packing efficiency of both WT conformations are relatively more similar to each other. Finally, the mutation has no effect on the packing efficiency ofthe parallel transmembrane dimer conformation (Figure 5c). Previously, nuclear magnetic resonance-derived left-handed conformation of PDGFRB transmembrane dimer (Figure 5b) was proposed to correspond to activated state of the receptor.27 Taking together this assumption with results of our modeling, we speculate that the V536E mutation might favor PDGFRA transmembrane dimer in the activated state and obstruct the conformational transition of the receptor to the inactive one. Similar situation has been recently observed by modeling for ErbB2-Neu* V664Q transmembrane mutant,26 where the analogues mutation increased the dimer packing efficiency relative to the WT and favored the left-handed over theright-handed dimer conformations.  The F808L mutant is devoid of kinase activity Proliferation and luciferase assays suggested that the F808L mutant was unable to respond to PDGF stimulation, even though it was expressed at the cell surface. To test the kinase activity of this mutant, we first overexpressed it in HEK293T cells. Figure 6 shows that F808L was not significantly phosphorylated on tyrosines by contrast to WT and D842V receptors. Then, we performed an in vitro kinase assay after receptor immunoprecipitation. The phosphorylation of the WT and D842V receptors was enhanced in the presence of ATP, but F808L remains unphosphorylated, indicating it is a kinase-dead mutant (Figure 6). Figure 6. Figure 6 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author F808L is a kinase dead mutant. (a) HEK293T cells were transiently transfected with the indicated receptor. Four hours before lysis, cells were treated with imatinib 0.5 μm. PDGFRA was immunoprecipitated (IP) from lysates and analyzed by westernblot (WB) with anti-phospho-tyrosine or anti-PDGFRA antibodies.(b) Alternatively, immunoprecipitates were incubated with ATP (50 μm) in kinase buffer for 10 min. Receptor phosphorylation was analyzed by WB and quantified using the Odyssey technology. The ratio between the receptor phosphorylation and the total receptor expression was calculated. It is normalized to the wild-type (WT) levels (average of three experiments).  Full figure and legend (49K)  The E996K mutant is not expressed in the cell line in which it was identified The E996K mutant was identified in the LB373-MEL cell line, derived from a melanoma metastasis.19 The mutation was absent in immortalized lymphocytes from the same patient confirming that it was an acquired cancer variant. We confirmed the presence of a heterozygous somatic mutation in the genomic DNA of LB373-MEL (data not shown), but we were unable to detect the PDGFRA protein or transcript, compared with positive controls (Figure 7). In conclusion, the E996K mutation, which did not confer any growth advantage in our assays, was not expressed inLB373-MEL cells. Figure 7. Figure 7 - Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, please contact help@nature.com or the author E996K is not expressed in the cell line in which it was identified. (a) LB373-MEL cells were stained with anti-PDGFRA antibodies and phycoerythrin-linked anti-mouse-IgG. Cells were analyzed by flow cytometry. 32D cells transfected with PDGFRA were used as a positive control. (b) RNA was extracted from LB373-MEL cells and analyzed by reverse transcription–PCR using primers specific for PDGFRA or RPLP0 (as a control). HepG2 cells, which do not express PDGFRA, and AG01518 human fibroblasts were used as negative and positive controls, respectively.  Full figure and legend (52K)  Top of page Discussion Among 10 uncharacterized mutations, V536E was the onlygain-of-function variant that we identified. To our knowledge, this is the first cancer mutation described in the PDGF receptors transmembrane domain. A similar V664E mutation in ErbB2/Neu was shown to induce the receptor constitutive tyrosine kinase activity.24 Activating point mutations in the transmembrane segment have also been found in other receptor tyrosine kinases, such as c-KIT and FGFR3.3 The insertion of two correctly positioned glutamic residues in a simplified valine-based transmembrane domain is enough to activate PDGFRB and ErbB2/Neu.28 In addition, the importance of the transmembrane domain for PDGFRB activation was underlined by studies showing that this domain is essential for transformation by the ETV6-PDGFRB fusion and by the bovine papillomavirus E5 protein.22 It was recently shown that the PDGFRB transmembrane domain is able to form a stable left-handed helical dimer in artificial membranes.27 In this structure, V543, which is homologous to PDGFRA V536, is located at the edge of the interface (Figure 5a). The PDGFRA-V539E mutant is likely to populate this dimeric conformation by increasing the packing efficiency of the transmembrane helix dimer, as suggested by modeling. A similar situation was predicted for the rat ErbB2-Neu* V664Q transmembrane mutant.26 Recently, active and inactive dimer conformations of the EGF receptor transmembrane domain have been reported, supporting the hypothesis that the conformation of this domain has a critical role in receptor tyrosine kinase activation.29, 30 Our model also predicts that the orientation and the angle between the two helices in the left-handed dimer is affected by the V536E mutation, which may optimally positions the two kinase domains facing each other in the receptor dimer. In conclusion, we suggest that the V536E substitution affects the conformation of the transmembrane domain dimer rather than dimerization itself. Further experiments are required to decipher the exact mechanism of constitutive PDGF receptor activation by this mutation.  Based on initial reports, PDGFRA mutation screenings in GIST usually focus on exons 12 and 18, which encode the juxtamembrane domain and the activation loop.4 We suggest that sequencing exon 11, encoding the transmembrane domain, may reveal additional clinically relevant PDGFRA mutations in GIST.  Two mutants, F808L and W349C, did not show any sign of activation and did not respond to PDGF stimulation for different reasons. Interestingly, these two residues were perfectlyconserved in vertebrate PDGFRA as well as in the related human receptors PDGFRB, c-KIT, FLT3, CSF1R and VEGFRs (Supplementary Table I). In the c-KIT structure, W349 mediates key interactions with distant amino acids.31 This mutation may therefore interfere with PDGFRA folding. The W349C protein appeared as a single immature band and failed to traffic to the plasma membrane. Although a cysteine at position 349 may induce the formation of a new aberrant cysteine bridge, we failed to detect covalent W349C dimeric complex. W349 is also located close to two predictedN-glycosylation sites (N353LT and N359LT). The mutation may thus block the glycosylation of these sites or prevent the traffic to the Golgi where the receptor undergoes its final glycosylation steps. In agreement with its absence at the cell surface, W349C did not respond to the addition of exogenous PDGF. In addition,co-transfection of a PDGF-B cDNA did not activate the mutant receptor either. This may result from the disruption of the Ig-like domain 4, which is essential for PDGFRA signal transduction.32 The second defective mutation, F808L, is located nearby the activation loop and disrupted the kinase activity. A similar kinase dead mutation has been described in the receptor tyrosine kinase ALK in neuroblastoma.33 Even if F808L was supporting leukemia development by an unknown mechanism independent of the receptor kinase activity, leukemia patients carrying this mutation are unlikely to benefit from imatinib therapy. Altogether, these two variants likely represent passenger mutations. Nevertheless, we cannot rule out the possibility that they provide an advantage to tumor cells in a particular molecular environment.  Seven mutations produced no particular phenotype and may also be classified as passenger mutations. These residues are conserved in mammalian PDGFRA except V469, which is replaced by an isoleucine in some species (Supplementary Table I). Interestingly, this valine is substituted by an alanine in Tetraodon nigroviridis, mimicking the V469A mutation found in a malignant peripheral nerve sheath tumor. These seven amino acids are poorly conserved in receptors related to PDGFRA. Remarkably, N870 is replaced by a serine in PDGFRB, supporting our conclusion that N870S does not affect PDGF receptors significantly. The original report did not formally exclude that this allele corresponds to a rare polymorphism rather than a somatic mutation.18 In the case of E996K, we had access to the original cell line in which this somatic mutation had been identified,19 but which did not express any detectable PDGFRA protein or transcript. This observation supports the hypothesis that E996K is a passenger mutation, although we cannot rule out the possibility that the receptor was expressed in the original tumor cells and was lost during the adaptation to cell culture.  Three mutations are located in the C-terminal tail, which is unique to PDGFRA, except the last five amino acids, which are also present in PDGFRB.34 This C-terminal motif, which is lost in the S1049CH* frame shift mutant,20 was suggested to recruit PTEN via NHERF adaptor proteins, thereby limiting the activation of the PI3K pathway.35 However, we did not observe any significant increase in PKB phosphorylation downstream this mutant (data not shown). The role of the C-terminal domain of PDGFRA remains to be established.  The occurrence of passenger mutations in cancer genome was highlighted by high throughput sequencing projects.19, 36 Mutation recurrence in multiple patients has been widely used as a criterion to select driver cancer mutations. In this respect, after the initial submission of the present manuscript, the V536E mutation was described in a second glioblastoma patient.21 However, W349C was also reported in two patients.10 The recurrence criterion is also too restrictive because unique cancer variants may be clinically relevant. For instance, several patients with non-recurrent PDGFR fusions genes were successfully treated with imatinib.3 To predict the impact of single-nucleotide variant on protein function, several algorithms based on sequence homologies and structural data have been developed, such as SIFT and PolyPhen.37 For five out of eight mutations present in the database, PolyPhen matched our results (Supplementary Table I). In this set of mutations, the conservation with receptors related to PDGFRA (FLT3, KIT, CSF1R and VEGFRs) was best correlated with the observed functional impact. These tests do not predict whether a given variant leads to a gain of function or a loss of function, a piece of information that is essential in oncology. Therefore, a thorough experimental analysis of cancer mutations remains essential.  After the initial submission of this paper, three novel PDGFRA mutations—among many others—were reported in diffuse large B-cell lymphoma.38 Based on the criteria mentioned above, they may also represent passenger mutations (Supplementary Table I).  Our results confirm the occurrence of activating mutations in glioblastoma, in which two activated PDGFRA variants have been previously described.11, 12 Whether these patients could be more sensitive to kinase inhibitors remains to be studied. By contrast, our observations do not support the existence of driver PDGFRA point mutations in acute myeloid leukemia or malignant peripheral nerve sheath tumors. In the latter tumors, other alterations, namely PDGFRA gene amplification or autocrine loops, may activate WT and mutant receptors.17 Such alterations have also been described in glioblastomas.10 The presence of both activating and passenger alterations in glioblastoma, which was also recently reported in idiopathic hypereosinophilia, may reflect a particularly high PDGFRA mutation rate in these cancers. In line with this hypothesis, the proneural subtype of glioblastoma, in which PDGFRA is expressed, is associated with a higher frequency of the hypermutator phenotype.10  Altogether, we identified a number of key residues for PDGFRA function and characterized a novel type of imatinib-sensitive PDGFRA-activating mutation in the transmembrane segment. Our work underlines the importance of characterizing PDGF receptor mutations in a systematic manner. This is a major issue in the development of personalized targeted therapies.  Top of page Materials and methods Reagents and plasmids The human PDGFRA cDNA was subcloned in pEF-MYC-CYTO (Invitrogen/Life Technologies, Gent, Belgium), which allowed a high expression level in Ba/F3, compensating the fast turn-over of the receptor in these cells.39 A Flag tag was inserted after the signal peptide. Mutations were introduced by Quickchange (Stratagene/Agilent technologies, Diegem, Belgium) and confirmed by sequencing (Macrogen, Seoul, Korea). Western blots were performed as described34 with anti-PDGFRA (1:200, Santa Cruz, Santa Cruz, CA, USA, #951), PY99 (1:200, Santa Cruz), anti-phospho-Y694-STAT5 (1:1000, Signalway Antibodies, College Park, MD, USA), anti-STAT5, anti-phospho-AKT, anti-AKT, anti-phospho-ERK-1/2 (1:1000, Cell Signaling Technologies, Danvers, MA, USA) and anti-ERK2 (1:1000, EET rabbit antiserum34). Imatinib mesylate was purchased from LC Laboratories (Woburn, MA, USA). Cell culture and transfections HEK293T cells were cultured in Dulbecco’s modified Eagle’s medium with fetal calf serum (10%) and antibiotics (Invitrogen). Cells were transfected using the calcium phosphate method as described.39 Ba/F3 cells were cultured in the same medium supplemented with IL3 (200 U/ml). Cells were electroporated as described elsewhere40 and selected in the presence of G418 (3 mg/ml). Transfected cell populations were sorted by flow cytometry after staining with a monoclonal anti-PDGFRA antibody (R&D systems, Minneapolis, MN, USA, MAB1264) and anti-mouse immunoglobulin labeled with phycoerythrin (Jackson Laboratories, Bar Harbor, ME, USA). A few days later, homogeneous PDGFRA expression was confirmed using the same antibodies by flow cytometry. For proliferation assays, cells were washed three times to remove IL3 and seeded in 96-well plates (104 cells/well in 200 μl of medium with 10% serum) without cytokine, with PDGF-BB (20 ng/ml, Peprotec, London, UK) or IL3 (200 U/ml). After 20 h, [3H]-thymidine (0.5 μCi, GE Healthcare, Diegem, Belgium) was added to each well for 4 h. Cells were harvested and the radioactivity incorporated into DNA was counted using a TopCount instrument (Perkin Elmer, Waltham, MA, USA). LB373-MEL cells were kindly provided by Francis Brasseur (Ludwig Institute for Cancer Research, Brussels, Belgium) and were cultured in Iscove-Dulbecco medium with fetal calf serum (10%) and essential amino acids. Cells were analyzed by flow cytometry as described above. mRNA was extracted using a Qiagen kit and PDGFRA expression was measured by quantitative reverse transcription–PCR as described41 using AG01518 human fibroblasts and HEPG2 hepatocarcinoma cells as positive and negative controls, respectively.42 The expression of the house keeping gene RPLP0 was used as control. The sequence of the 996 codon was confirmed by sequencing of multiple clones obtained after PCR amplification of genomic DNA using the oligonucleotides 5′-CGTGTGGACTCAGACAATGCA-3′ and 5′-GGCAGAGGAATGATGTAGCCA-3′ in PDGFRA exon 22.  Transformation assay Low-passage NIH3T3 cells (American Type Culture Collection, Manassas, VA, USA) were transfected as described.33, 43 Briefly, 4.5 × 104 cells were seeded the day before into collagen-coated 12-well plates and transfected for 6 h with 0.5 μg of DNA (pEF-MYC-CYTO vector containing PDGFRA WT, D842V, V536E or W349C) and 1.4 μl of Lipofectamine 2000 in 0.3 ml of Opti-MEM (both from Invitrogen). Twenty-four hours after transfection, three-fifth of the cells from each well were transferred to wells in collagen-coated six-well plates and kept in Dulbecco’s modified Eagle’s medium (10% fetal calf serum and 0.5 mg/ml G418) until the cells reached confluence. Thereafter, cells were kept in Dulbecco’s modified Eagle’s medium(5% fetal calf serum and 0.25 mg/ml G418) for approximately 10 days. Three weeks after transfection, the cells were fixed using methanol and plates were stained with crystal violet. Western blot, immunoprecipitation and crosslinking These experiments were performed essentially as described.22, 44 Briefly, Ba/F3 cells expressing PDGFRA were washed and incubated in the absence of IL3 for 4 h. In signaling studies, cells were restimulated for 15 min with PDGF-BB (25 ng/ml) or IL3 (200 U/ml) at 37 °C, washed and lysed inSDS–polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis sample buffer. For crosslinking studies, 2 × 106 cells were stimulated with PDGF-BB (100 ng/ml) for 1 h on ice to prevent endocytosis. Cells were washed with phosphate-buffered saline and treated with bis(sulfosuccinimidyl)-suberate (Pierce/Thermoscientific, Rockford, IL, USA, 1 mm) for 1 h on ice in 200 μl phosphate-buffered saline. Glycine (3.5 mm, final concentration) was then added to stop the reaction before protein extraction in lysis buffer. PDGF receptors were isolated with wheat germ agglutinin-coupled agarose beads (Sigma-Aldrich, St Louis, MO, USA). Beads were extensively washed and proteins were eluted with sample buffer for western blot analysis with anti-PDGFRA antibodies. Luciferase assays MCF7 and PAE cells were plated in six-well plates, respectively, at 300 000 and 150 000 cells/ well. After one day, cells were transfected with a luciferase construct controlled by serum response elements (0.5 μg)or STAT-response elements (GRR5, 0.5 μg),44 pDRIVEchEF1-RU5(β-galactosidase reporter, Invitrogen, 0.5 μg), pEF-MYC-CYTO-PDGFRA (0.25 μg) and PDGF-B (0.25 μg)2 in the presence of Fugene HD (for MCF7, Promega) or Lipofectamine 2000 (for PAE, Invitrogen). After 24 h, cells were lysed and luciferase activity was measured recommended by the manufacturer (Promega). β-Galactosidase levels were used to normalize the results as described.42 Modeling methods Spatial structures of the dimers formed by transmembrane helical fragments of the WT PDGFRA and its V536E mutant were built using PREDDIMER algorithm starting from their sequences (see Figure 5b) as described elsewhere.26 For calculations of backbone root-mean-square deviations between the predicted models and PDGFRB transmembrane dimer, its nuclear magnetic resonance structure was used (2L6W27). Packing efficiencies of the predicted dimers were estimated according to values of PREDDIMER scoring function (FSCOR). Normalized values of FCSCOR for a combined set of three top ranked of PDGFRA-WT and PDGFRA-V536E dimer conformations were calculated as: FCSCOR=(FSCOR −left fenceFSCORright fence)/std.FSCOR, where left fenceFSCORright fence and std.FSCOR are the mean and standard deviation within the set.  
963||Recent studies have identified somatic ESR1 mutations in patients with metastatic breast cancer and found some of them to promote estrogen-independent activation of the receptor. The degree to which all recurrent mutants can drive estrogen-independent activities and reduced sensitivity to ER antagonists like fulvestrant is not established. In this report, we characterize the spectrum of ESR1 mutations from more than 900 patients. ESR1 mutations were detected in 10%, with D538G being the most frequent (36%), followed by Y537S (14%). Several novel, activating mutations were also detected (e.g., L469V, V422del, and Y537D). Although many mutations lead to constitutive activity and reduced sensitivity to ER antagonists, only select mutants such as Y537S caused a magnitude of change associated with fulvestrant resistance in vivo. Correspondingly, tumors driven by Y537S, but not D5358G, E380Q, or S463P, were less effectively inhibited by fulvestrant than more potent and bioavailable antagonists, including AZD9496. These data point to a need for antagonists with optimal pharmacokinetic properties to realize clinical efficacy against certain ESR1 mutants.  Significance: A diversity of activating ESR1 mutations exist, only some of which confer resistance to existing ER antagonists that might be overcome by next-generation inhibitors such as AZD9496. Cancer Discov; 7(3); 277–87. ©2016 AACR.  This article is highlighted in the In This Issue feature, p. 235  Introduction  Therapeutic targeting of estrogen synthesis is a mainstay of therapy for the over 70% of breast cancers that feature estrogen receptor expression. These treatments markedly reduce the risk of recurrence from early-stage disease and improve outcomes in those with advanced disease (1, 2).  Despite this efficacy, a significant subset of estrogen receptor–positive (ER+) breast tumors ultimately develops resistance to antiestrogen therapy. Recent work has identified a set of recurrent mutations in the estrogen receptor ESR1 from patients with hormone-refractory metastatic breast cancer (MBC; refs. 3–7). These analyses from small populations of patients described mutations within the ligand-binding domain (LBD) of the receptor, with the majority of the mutations at residues Y537 and D538. It was not clear whether a greater repertoire of somatic LBD mutants might be identified by sequencing a larger population of MBCs. Recurrent mutations at Y537 and D538 were characterized using biochemical, cellular, and structural analyses and were shown to promote (i) an aporeceptor conformation similar to that of an estradiol-bound receptor, (ii) constitutive coactivator binding and transcriptional activity in the absence of estrogen, and (iii) hormone-independent proliferation when expressed in hormone-dependent cells (3, 8, 9). Also evident from these studies was the potential for ER antagonists to potently inhibit mutant receptor activities. However, whether existing antagonists had sufficient potency and adequate pharmacokinetic properties to inhibit mutant receptors in vivo and thereby overcome hormone-resistant phenotypes has not been clear.  In this study, we analyzed ESR1 DNA sequences from a large series of metastatic breast tumors and found several novel LBD mutations that constitutively activate the receptor and promote breast cancer phenotypes. We further investigated the ability of ER antagonists to potently inhibit mutant receptor activities. We observed differential sensitivity of the LBD mutants to selective estrogen receptor degraders (SERD). Among the mutants Y537S was the most constitutively active and required the highest drug concentrations to fully inhibit the receptor. This specific mutant proved to be less effectively antagonized in vivo by fulvestrant, a drug with suboptimal pharmacokinetic properties compared with the more potent and orally bioavailable SERD AZD9496. Collectively, these data suggest that activating ESR1 LBD mutations differentially affect the efficacy of ER antagonists.  Results  Novel ESR1 LBD Mutations in Patients with Hormone-Resistant Breast Cancer  With an expansion of our efforts to analyze mutations present in MBC using next-generation sequencing (National Clinical Trials Registry #00897702), we now have a more comprehensive portrait of the diversity and frequency of ESR1 mutations in MBC (Fig. 1A). In this series, over 929 cases of breast cancer (including ER+, HER2+, and ER− tumors) were analyzed, with 95 patients having somatic mutations in ESR1 (Table 1). Somatic mutations were found in the LBD in all but one case. Clinically, 85 out of 95 patients with ESR1 mutations had ER+/HER2− MBC, whereas 10 of them were ER+/HER2+. In terms of treatment in the metastatic setting, 67.4% of the ESR1-mutant patients had prior exposure to an aromatase inhibitor (AI), whereas only 18.8% of the wild-type (WT) patients had an AI as a treatment for metastatic disease (Supplementary Table S1). Among the metastatic sites with ESR1 mutations detected, liver and bone were the two most frequent, whereas none were detected in brain metastasis biopsies. The most frequent mutations in this series were D538G (n = 34), Y537S (n = 13), E380Q (n = 20), Y537C (n = 6), Y537N (n = 5), and L536H (n = 4). A number of other mutations were also observed at low frequency (n ≤ 2), most of which have not previously been described (Supplementary Table S2). Although these individual mutations are not common, in aggregate they represent 20% of the cases of LBD mutations in ESR1.  Figure 1. Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 1. Newly detected ESR1 mutations exhibit a range of estrogen-independent activities. A, Diagram of ESR1 ligand-binding domain with somatic mutations identified from 929 breast tumors analyzed. Height of the circles correlates to the number of cases with that specific mutation. The color codes of the circles are as follows: green for missense mutations, red for truncating mutations (nonsense, nonstop, frameshift deletion, frameshift insertion, splice site) and black for in-frame mutations. AF-2, Activation function-2. B, Activation of ER reporter gene. ER+ MCF7 cells were transfected with empty vector, HA-ERα WT or indicated ESR1 mutation, estrogen response element (ERE)-luciferase and Renilla luciferase reporter constructs in hormone-depleted medium with 10 nmol/L of E2 added for 24 hours where indicated. Firefly luciferase activity shows increased activity in the absence of E2 or presence of E2 for certain mutations. Graphs were plotted with the mean ± SD of three biological replicates. *, P < 0.05; **, P < 0.01; ***, P < 0.001; ****, P < 0.0001. C, Activation of ER target genes. MCF7 cells were transfected with empty vector, HA-ERα WT or mutant in hormone-depleted medium and harvested 48 hours after transfection for qRT-PCR analysis. Bars represent mean ± SD of three technical replicates normalized to actin (ACTB) expression. *, P < 0.05; **, P < 0.01; ***, P < 0.001; ****, P < 0.0001. D, Activation of ER phosphorylation in MCF7 cells. Expression level of the mutant HA-tagged ERs and their relative phosphorylation status at Serine118 and Serine 167, treated with or without 10 nmol/L E2 for 24 hours by immunoblot analysis with specific antibodies as indicated. E, Activation of hormone-independent cell proliferation. Doxycycline-inducible ER-mutant receptors (E380Q, S463P, L536R, and Y537S) expressing MCF7 cells were seeded in 96-well plates in hormone-depleted medium with or without the addition of doxycycline and proliferation was assayed using resazurin reagent. Data show sufficiency of these four mutants to promote cell growth in the absence of estradiol. Each point in the graph represented mean ± SD of six technical replicates. F, Binding of the SRC3 nuclear receptor domain to Y537S, D538G, E380Q, or S463P ERα LBD in the absence or presence of E2. SRC3 was titrated into a fixed amount of ER-LBD-biotin and time-resolved Förster resonance energy transfer (tr-FRET) indicated that only Y537S and D538G were able to recruit SRC3 in the absence of E2 but not E380Q and S463P. LBD, ligand-binding domain. View inlineView popup Table 1. Clinical characteristics of the tumor biopsies sequenced in the study The presence of a somatic mutation in the LBD of ESR1 does not necessarily imply constitutive activity, and thus we sought to characterize the activity of a set of these infrequent mutants and compare them with the activities of the better-described variants such as Y537S. We generated hemagglutinin (HA)-tagged ESR1 constructs with mutations introduced by site-directed mutagenesis and determined their activity through luciferase assays performed in the breast cancer cell lines MCF7 (ER+) and SKBr3 (ER−). First, to determine if the mutants had the ability to drive estrogen-independent transcription in the cellular context in which they are typically found (ER+ breast cancer), we examined the ability of transient expression of mutant ER to promote transcription from an estrogen response element (ERE)-luciferase construct in MCF7 cells. We found that most of the mutant ERs had elevated ERE-luciferase activity in the absence of estradiol (E2) compared with WT ER, although none of them displayed activity higher than Y537S (Fig. 1B). There were two notable exceptions, however, in which the S432L and V534E mutants showed no increase in activity in the absence of E2, despite being expressed at relatively similar levels as that of WT (Supplementary Fig. S1A). In addition to the augmentation of E2-independent activity, we examined whether any of the mutants had altered response to E2. ER with mutations in amino acid 537 showed little further induction with the addition of estradiol, whereas all the other mutants, including S432L and V534E, showed induction with the addition of E2, as was the case for WT. Because the effect of E2 addition for these mutants could be ascribed to the presence of the endogenous WT ER, we also examined the effect of mutant ER expression in ER− SKBr3 cells (Supplementary Fig. S1B). With the exception of Y537S, which is already maximally activated, the other ER mutants could be further activated by the addition of E2 in SKBr3 cells. This includes the S432L and V534E mutants, demonstrating that although these mutations are not constitutively active, they are also not inactivating alterations. The E2-independent activities of the ER mutants were not restricted to the luciferase reporter, as demonstrated by the induction of endogenous ER-dependent transcripts such as PGR and GREB1 (Fig. 1C and Supplementary Fig. S1C). As observed with the luciferase assays, most of the mutants could induce transcripts to levels above that from WT in the absence of E2. Once again, the S432L and V534E mutants showed little evidence of constitutive activity in the absence of E2, whereas the ESR amino acid 536 and 537 mutants were the most active. In addition to regulating ER target genes directly through ER binding sites in the genome, ER modulates gene expression indirectly via interaction with other transcription factors, such as the activator protein-1 (AP1). We thus examined the effect of several ER mutants on the induction of AP1 target genes, namely CCND1 and MYC, and found no significant changes in the levels of these two gene transcripts in comparing WT and mutant ERs (data not shown).  We looked for further evidence of biological activation of these somatic LBD mutants beyond assays for transcriptional activation. The phosphorylation of serine 118 and serine 167 of ER has been correlated with receptor activation in the absence of ligand (10–12). Consistent with the transcriptional assays, all mutants except S432L and V534E showed increased steady state ER S118 and S167 phosphorylation compared with WT in the absence of E2 when expressed in MCF7 cells (Fig. 1D). The addition of E2 suppressed apparent differences between phosphorylation of WT and most of the mutants (Fig. 1D). There were slight differences in the expression levels of ESR mutants (HA and ER blots) despite our efforts to achieve equal expression. This may be partly due to differential effects of some mutants on receptor stability, which we have demonstrated previously with Y537S and D538G (3). Together, these data demonstrate the constitutive activity of most of the infrequent ESR1 mutations, and also reveal that at least two mutants (V534E and S432L) show no evidence of constitutive activation.  Given their constitutive activities, we hypothesized that these infrequent ER mutants might promote estrogen-independent tumor growth. We therefore generated doxycycline-inducible cell lines that expressed four representative ER mutants (E380Q, S463P, L536R, and Y537S) in the estrogen-dependent MCF7 model and examined their proliferation in estrogen-deprived medium. The concentrations of doxycycline used to induce comparable levels of ER expression were determined by immunoblot analyses and quantitative PCR (Supplementary Fig. S2A and S2B). We found that this set of mutants behaved similarly to Y537S in their ability to promote E2-independent growth (Fig. 1E). However, there were some differences observed in the degree of growth stimulation, such as the E380Q mutant promoting growth to a lesser degree than the other mutants. Overall, the data point to several infrequent LBD mutants driving higher estrogen-independent receptor activity and thereby potentially promoting resistance to estrogen deprivation therapy.  The data together point to significant differences in the level of estrogen-independent activity of recurrent mutants with the well-characterized mutants in the loop between helix 11–12 (Y537S and D538G) being more potent inducers than some of the less frequent mutants (e.g., S463P or E380Q). One hallmark of both ligand-bound ER as well as constitutively active mutants such as Y537S is their ability to induce a conformation that binds coactivator proteins. To characterize whether these less frequent mutants could induce this “agonist conformation” in vitro without estradiol, we performed a time-resolved Förster Resonance Energy Transfer (tr-FRET) assay with steroid receptor coactivator 3 (SRC3) nuclear receptor domain (NRD) titrated to a fixed amount of mutant ER-LBD (Y537S, D538G, S463P, and E380Q; refs. 13, 14). SRC3 is a well-established ER coactivator that is highly expressed in breast cancer cells and has a high affinity for ligand-bound ER (15). As shown in Fig. 1F, SRC3 NRD bound to unliganded Y537S with the highest affinity (18.2 nmol/L). The D538G mutant was also able to bind SRC3 in the absence of E2 (137 nmol/L) albeit somewhat less avidly than Y537S. In contrast, no binding was detected for S436P and E380Q LBD whatsoever in the absence of E2. When the ER mutants were presaturated with E2, all of them bound to SRC3 NRD with varying affinities. S463P and E380Q showed similar affinities (EC50 = 3.9 nmol/L and 3.4 nmol/L), whereas Y537S and D538G had higher affinities (EC50 = 0.3 nmol/L and 1.1 nmol/L). The results of a trypsin digestion FRET assay further demonstrated the differences between the conformations of the mutants. This assay tests accessibility of the region of surrounding K529 to trypsin access and cleavage. All mutants tested provide substantial to major conformational stabilization of this region, but there were significant differences between mutants (Supplementary Table S3). In the absence of ligand (Apo), the t½ of WT-ER is the shortest at 3 minutes, implying that this region of the WT-ER is very accessible to trypsin attack. In contrast, Y537S and S463P demonstrate the greatest stabilization, in the range of 15–25-fold, followed by D538G, E380Q, and L536R with less than 5-fold stabilization. In the presence of ligand, marked stabilization is provided by the same two mutations (Y537S and S463P), as well as by D538G compared with WT. Although the degree of stabilization provided by the mutations does not fully correlate with their degree of constitutive activity, it provides evidence that the conformations of the mutants, at least in the region of helix 11, are quite different. Altogether, the data are consistent with mutants inducing constitutive activity through distinctive mechanisms and with Y537S appearing to be the most active.  Efficacy of SERDs Against ER Mutants  Previous work has suggested that ER antagonists are able to inhibit ER mutants but may be less potent than they are against WT ER (3). Given the differential activities of the LBD mutants, we asked whether different LBD mutants had comparable activity against the pure ER antagonist, fulvestrant (ICI). We examined the effect of selected ER mutants upon the dose-dependent inhibition of ER-driven transcription and proliferation by fulvestrant in MCF7 cells. Fulvestrant was able to inhibit the activity of all of the mutants; however, it appeared that the Y537S mutants required significantly higher levels of drug (70-fold higher IC99 for Y537S compared with WT) to fully inhibit their activities (Fig. 2A). In contrast, E380Q and S463P showed only slight resistance to fulvestrant with 2-fold higher IC99 as compared with WT (Fig. 2B). In terms of cell proliferation, Y537S required the highest concentration of fulvestrant (IC50 = 55-fold higher than WT) for complete growth inhibition, whereas several other mutants had modest effects (Y537C/N/D, D538G, and S463P; Fig. 2C and D and Supplementary Fig. S3A–S3D). This result is fairly concordant with the data from Fig. 2A and B. One exception is that S463P mutant appeared to have a greater effect on fulvestrant sensitivity in the proliferation assay than the transcriptional assay. This is consistent with a greater impact of this mutant in promoting estrogen-independent proliferation than transcription (Fig. 1E and C). The differential effects of fulvestrant upon ER-driven transcription from different mutants were also evident by assessing GREB1 and PGR transcript levels by quantitative PCR (Supplementary Fig. S3E and S3F). Taken together, the data indicate that certain ESR1 mutants can alter fulvestrant sensitivity in vitro.  Figure 2. Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 2. Efficacy of SERDs against ER mutants. Inhibition of WT and mutant-driven ERE luciferase (A–B) and proliferation (C–D) by fulvestrant (ICI). Doxycycline-induced WT and mutant ER-expressing MCF7 cells were treated with various doses of each antagonist in regular medium, demonstrating that the more active mutants required higher level of antagonists for complete inhibition. Graphs were plotted with the mean ± SD of two technical or six biological replicates respectively. (Note: SD values for Fig. 3A and B are too low for error bars to be visible in the graphs.) E, Detection of PR levels in MCF7 Y537S CRISPR knock-in cell by Western blot showed elevated PR levels in the Y537S knock-in cells in comparison with the parental line, indicating the expression of Y537S ER-mutant receptors. F, Proliferation assays of parental and Y537S CRISPR knock-in cell lines performed in hormone-depleted or regular media whereby Y537S knock-in cells showed estrogen-independent cell proliferation. G and H, Proliferation assays of parental MCF7 and MCF7 Y537S CRISPR knock-in cells treated with various doses of fulvestrant, AZD9496, or 4OHT demonstrated that significantly higher doses are required to cause growth inhibition of Y537S-expressing cells by ER antagonists. Cell confluency was measured using the IncuCyte Zoom standard software over a few days. Graphs were plotted with the mean ± SD of three biological replicates. To test if the partial resistance conferred by ER mutants was a class effect for SERDs, we compared the effects of three other SERDs, namely AZD9496 (16), RU-58668, and GDC-0810, on the WT and mutant cell lines. Although all three SERDs were capable of inhibiting cell proliferation by all mutants, significantly higher concentrations were consistently required for Y537S (Supplementary Fig. S4A–S4F). These findings corroborate previously published reports where the Y537S mutation led to reduced rates of ligand association and greater resistance to disruption of ligand binding by urea compared with WT (17).  Because SERD potency was tested using a model involving transient expression of the mutants, we sought to confirm the findings regarding Y537S in a system in which the mutation was expressed from its endogenous genomic locus. We therefore generated an ESR1 knock-in of Y537S into the MCF7 cell line, using CRISPR/Cas9-mediated genome editing. The insertion of Y537S into the ESR1 gene locus was confirmed by digital droplet (dd) PCR analysis of the parental cells, pooled cells (cells before single-cell sorting), and Y537S CRISPR knock-in cells (clone B3). These data demonstrated that the knock-in cell line is homozygous for the Y537S mutation, having an insignificant number of WT positive droplets detected (Supplementary Fig. S5). Cells expressing the Y537S allele also demonstrated enhanced expression of progesterone receptor (PR) protein and proliferation in hormone-depleted media compared with parental cells (Fig. 2E and F). The potency of fulvestrant and AZD9496 in Y537S-expressing cells was examined by assaying cell proliferation over a range of drug doses. As shown in Fig. 2G, the growth of MCF7 WT cells was inhibited by fulvestrant and AZD9496 at an IC50 concentration of 0.4 nmol/L, whereas in the Y537S-expressing cells, fulvestrant and AZD9496 inhibited growth with an IC50 of 25 nmol/L (Fig. 2H). These reduced sensitivities in the CRISPR knock-in Y537S cell line are consistent with the results seen with the doxycycline-induced overexpression mutant cell lines.  Superior Antitumor Activity on ER Mutant–Expressing Xenografts Achieved with AZD9496  The poor pharmacokinetic properties of fulvestrant are well documented in both mice and humans (3, 18). Given the comparable efficacy of AZD9496 and fulvestrant in vitro and the high serum levels of AZD9496 achievable through oral administration, we sought to compare these drugs in xenograft models of ER-mutant disease. We examined xenografts from the MCF7 cells engineered to express WT or mutant ER under a doxycycline-inducible promoter (3). We have previously demonstrated that the growth of these tumors is entirely dependent on ER signaling and that complete ablation of ER is able to fully block tumor growth. Maximally effective doses of fulvestrant (200 mg/kg) twice weekly via subcutaneous injection or AZD9496 (15 mg/kg) orally once daily were administered to mice with tumors expressing WT, E380Q, S463P, Y537S, or D538G ER. Fulvestrant fully inhibited the growth of the WT-, E380Q-, and S463P-expressing tumors while nearly completely inhibiting the growth of D538G tumors (Fig. 3A–E). The Y537S-expressing tumors, however, continued to grow in the presence of fulvestrant, albeit more slowly than in untreated controls. Whereas fulvestrant was only partially effective at suppressing the Y537S tumors, AZD9496 was able to completely inhibit their growth. The relative resistance of the Y537S tumors to fulvestrant was evident when we compared the sizes of the tumors at the end of the study by plotting them as scatter plots, which showed that the Y537S tumors were significantly larger than WT or D538G tumors in the fulvestrant arms (ICI) but not in the AZD9496 arms (Fig. 3F and G). In contrast, tumors expressing the alternate Y537 mutations, Y537C/N as well as V422del, responded similarly to WT upon inhibition by either fulvestrant or AZD9496 (Supplementary Fig. S6A–S6D). Similar observations were made when we tested the effect of another bioavailable SERD, GDC-0810, on the growth of ER-mutant tumors, suggesting that the improved pharmacokinetic properties of the antagonists aid in efficient targeting of the mutant ER (Supplementary Fig. S7A–S7C).  Figure 3. Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 3. AZD9496 demonstrates superior antitumor effects on ER-mutant expressing xenografts. Mice bearing MCF7-inducible HA-ER WT (A), Y537S (B), D538G (C), E380Q (D), or S463P (E) tumors were randomly assigned to treatment groups of either 15 mg/kg of AZD9496 daily orally or 200 mg/kg of fulvestrant twice weekly, s.c. Tumors treated with AZD9496 showed greater growth inhibition as compared with those treated with fulvestrant. The result was presented as average tumor volume measured for each group ± SD (n = 10 mice/group). *, P < 0.05; **, P < 0.01; ***, P < 0.001; ****, P < 0.0001. F and G, Scatter plots of the volumes of tumors expressing WT, Y537S, or D538G treated with either fulvestrant (ICI) or AZD9496 taken at the end of the xenograft studies shown in A–C. T-tests comparing the volumes of mutant tumors with those of the WT indicated significant resistance of Y537S-mutant tumors to fulvestrant treatment. *, P < 0.05; **, P < 0.01; ***, P < 0.001; ****, P < 0.0001. H, PDX, CTC-174, with D538G mutation, showed greater growth arrest with 5 mg/kg of AZD9496. The result was presented as average tumor volume measured for each group ± SEM. I, Quantitative PCR detection of various ER target genes of AZD9496-treated CTC-174, the D538G PDX model, showed significant reduction in the transcript levels of GREB1, STC2, TFF1, and PGR when compared with the vehicle, indicating inhibition of the ER signaling pathway by AZD9496. Graphs were plotted with the mean ± SD of three technical replicates. As further support of the potential for ER antagonists to target most ER-mutant tumors, we examined the effect of AZD9496 and fulvestrant on the growth of a patient-derived xenograft (PDX), CTC-174 (19), that expresses a D538G ESR1 mutation (Supplementary Fig. S8A and S8B). Both AZD9496 and fulvestrant were able to slow tumor growth in this model with a slightly enhanced efficacy seen for AZD9496 in this context, similar to what was observed for the MCF7-D538G model (Fig. 3H and C). It should be noted that unlike the MCF7 model, growth of this particular xenograft has never been shown to be fully dependent on ER signaling alone, and this may be partially affected by PIK3CAN345K (activating mutation) and two ARID1A truncation mutations (E1776* and S705fs; inactivating mutations) identified in sequencing of this model. Consistent with these results, assessment of ER-driven transcripts in the AZD9496- and vehicle-treated tumors shows marked reduction of ER activity from AZD9496 administration, suggesting it was efficacious in blocking the ER-driven component of this disease (Fig. 3I). Overall, the data from the two ER mutant models are consistent with the ability of AZD9496 to inhibit mutant ER-driven tumor growth across a broader range of mutants than fulvestrant in vivo. In support of this, we examined the drug levels of AZD9496 and fulvestrant in serum using pharmacokinetic modeling. We found that the average area under the curve (AUC) and Cmax for fulvestrant (AUC = 5.29 μmol/L • h, Cmax = 0.65 μmol/L) were markedly lower than those obtained for AZD9496 (AUC = 218 μmol/L • h, Cmax = 59 μmol/L). This difference was observed despite dosing fulvestrant at levels approximately 5-fold higher than are administered to patients. Taken together, the data are consistent with fulvestrant and AZD9496 both inhibiting mutant ER activities in vitro but AZD9496 having superior pharmacokinetic properties enabling in vivo efficacy across a broader range of ER-mutant models, including those driven by Y537S.  Discussion  The two major strategies for therapeutic targeting of hormonal signaling in breast cancer are estrogen deprivation and direct antagonism of the estrogen receptor. Through large clinical investigations, estrogen deprivation has become the clinical standard for both the adjuvant and metastatic setting. Recently, however, resistance to estrogen deprivation therapy has been characterized as frequently involving activating mutations in the estrogen receptor (20). Biochemical and structural studies of the most common mutations have shown them to promote an activated conformation in the absence of ligand. This conformation remains permissive for ligand binding, thus leading to the hypothesis that direct antagonism may be a rational strategy for these mutant receptors. However, the ability of different ER antagonists to effectively block all of the different ER mutants that occur in the clinic has not been established. In this study, we characterize the diversity of activating ESR1 mutations that are observed in the clinic and determine conditions needed for ER antagonists to be effective against the mutations.  Initial reports on the existence of somatic ESR1 mutations in ER+ MBC came from somewhat smaller populations of tumors in the range of 11 to 76 tumors (3–6). Recurrent alterations were the focal point of the in vitro characterizations, and it was demonstrated that the mutations D538G, Y537S/N/C, and L536R all promoted estrogen-independent activation of the receptor (3–6). In addition, several of these reports assessed the ability of ER antagonists such as 4-hydroxytamoxifen and fulvestrant to block these mutant receptors (3–6). From these data, it appeared that the mutant receptors might be inhibited, albeit at higher drug concentrations (3, 4, 6, 21). Whether all ESR1 mutants followed the pattern of these mutations in amino acids 536 to 538 was unknown. In the current study, we report the identification of ESR1 LBD mutations from a large cohort of patients with MBC. The majority of mutations are in amino acids 538, 537, 380, and 536. However, we detected a number of low-frequency novel mutations, which collectively comprised 20% of the mutations detected within this series. An analysis of the different mutations revealed a range of activities. Across a variety of assays surveying in vitro conformation, phosphorylation, transcriptional activity, and estrogen-independent proliferation, the Y537S mutant appeared to have the greatest effect. Mutation in neighboring residues 536 and 538 also led to high activity; however, in both cases, these were often at or below the level observed with estradiol stimulation. It is also notable that mutation at the same amino acid 537 site to cysteine (C), aspartic acid (D), and asparagine (N) caused receptor activation, but to a lesser degree than did the S mutant. Hence, the level of ER activation depends on both the site of mutation and the nature of the mutant residue. Beyond these mutations, all of the mutants outside this region show only modest activity in the absence of estradiol. In addition, two somatic mutations (S432L and V534E) showed no activation in the absence of estrogen and so their role in promoting resistance to aromatase inhibition is not supported by these data. The basis for these differences in basal activation levels is likely to lie in the conformational changes that these mutations induce. Structures of D538G and Y537S ligand binding domains have now been reported and show similarities in the mechanisms whereby they induce ligand-independent activation (22). However, even these two structures highlight important differences in hydrogen bonding and side chain packing that may well translate into the apparent differences in coactivator binding affinity and basal transcriptional activity. Alterations such as E380Q or S463P appear likely to promote hormone independence through still other mechanisms as evidenced by the lack of coactivator binding they induce in vitro in the absence of estradiol. These findings support ongoing efforts to characterize structures of all of the different recurrent ER mutants as they likely reveal the different constraints that prevent unliganded ER from activating transcription.  From a translational perspective, the varying activities observed from different ESR1 mutations raise several issues. First, it is not yet clear whether different mutations are more or less able to promote resistance to aromatase inhibitors. The data revealing the presence of ESR1 mutations in hormone-independent tumors and their association with poor outcomes have largely been obtained from small populations that are underpowered to look for differences in outcome due to different mutations. One recent report suggested that patients with D538G and Y537S mutant tumors may have slight differences in survival outcomes, but this again involved numbers too small to be conclusive on this point (20). Our data raise the possibility that some mutations may indeed be more effective in promoting resistance than others. Perhaps of even greater significance, estrogen receptor antagonists might have differential efficacies as a function of mutation type and activity, a possibility that we have investigated in our models.  Estrogen receptor antagonists such as fulvestrant appear broadly effective against ER mutants in vitro, but important differences emerge when comparing the potencies against individual mutants. Whereas several mutations had a modest effect on fulvestrant efficacy, Y537S led to major changes in the concentration required to fully inhibit ER activities. What accounts for the specific differences in drug potency is not yet clear, but it is notable that the Y537S mutant is the most activated in the absence of ligand and also shows reduced ligand association rates and binding affinities in vitro. Perhaps this points to a particularly active state of the receptor that might be targeted by a unique pharmacologic strategy. However, despite this reduced affinity, antagonists such as fulvestrant can ultimately inhibit ER mutants, including Y537S, in vitro, albeit at higher doses. To address whether these differences in potency might have clinical implications, we examined the in vivo effects of these drugs in xenograft models.  Using these models, we found that fulvestrant was capable of fully inhibiting WT, E380Q, and S463P ER-driven breast cancers. However, Y537S mutants were not fully inhibited by fulvestrant despite dosing to higher levels than are typically achieved in the clinic. The tumor model driven by D538G was nearly completely inhibited by fulvestrant and so appeared to behave more like the E380Q and S463P mutants in vivo. The oral SERDs, AZD9496 and GDC-0810, were able to completely block growth of WT and all mutant ER-driven models including those driven by Y537S. These findings are consistent with clinical observations that the major limitation of fulvestrant is its poor pharmacokinetic properties. Although fulvestrant is highly potent in vitro, receptor occupancy in vivo is incomplete at the steady-state serum concentrations reached with current dosing (18). However, higher peak and steady-state levels of AZD9496 and GDC-0810 are achievable despite administering significantly less drug to mice. As several more bioavailable SERDs such as AZD9496 and GDC-0810 are now in early clinical trial testing, the value of higher drug levels can be formally evaluated. Our data indicate the need to include assessment of specific mutations in this evaluation because mutations in amino acid 537 and perhaps also 536 and 538 will likely necessitate higher drug levels to achieve complete inhibition.  Finally, it is notable that the PDX model we analyzed demonstrated only partial tumor growth inhibition with AZD9496. Although the data for ESR1 mutations are consistent with these alterations being common and reducing tumor dependence on estrogen, they do not imply that all mutant tumors are exclusively dependent on ER signaling for their growth. Tumor genotyping of ESR1-mutant breast cancers also reveals recurrent alterations in the PI3K/AKT pathway, cyclin D1, and FGF receptors, among others (3). These alterations likely reduce tumor dependence on ER signaling. Such tumors are appropriate candidates for combinations of antiestrogens with inhibitors of PI3K, AKT, CDK4/6, and FGFRs that are all in phase II/III testing. Our data suggest that the specific hormonal drug used in such a combination is likely to matter significantly, a point further emphasized by our recent observation that inhibition of growth signals such as PI3K/AKT led to further activation of and restored dependence upon ER signaling (23). Taken together, our data and the emerging literature suggest that more potent and bioavailable compounds to block ER signaling may play a key role in the management of ER+ MBC.  
975||Recent studies have identified somatic ESR1 mutations in patients with metastatic breast cancer and found some of them to promote estrogen-independent activation of the receptor. The degree to which all recurrent mutants can drive estrogen-independent activities and reduced sensitivity to ER antagonists like fulvestrant is not established. In this report, we characterize the spectrum of ESR1 mutations from more than 900 patients. ESR1 mutations were detected in 10%, with D538G being the most frequent (36%), followed by Y537S (14%). Several novel, activating mutations were also detected (e.g., L469V, V422del, and Y537D). Although many mutations lead to constitutive activity and reduced sensitivity to ER antagonists, only select mutants such as Y537S caused a magnitude of change associated with fulvestrant resistance in vivo. Correspondingly, tumors driven by Y537S, but not D5358G, E380Q, or S463P, were less effectively inhibited by fulvestrant than more potent and bioavailable antagonists, including AZD9496. These data point to a need for antagonists with optimal pharmacokinetic properties to realize clinical efficacy against certain ESR1 mutants.  Significance: A diversity of activating ESR1 mutations exist, only some of which confer resistance to existing ER antagonists that might be overcome by next-generation inhibitors such as AZD9496. Cancer Discov; 7(3); 277–87. ©2016 AACR.  This article is highlighted in the In This Issue feature, p. 235  Introduction  Therapeutic targeting of estrogen synthesis is a mainstay of therapy for the over 70% of breast cancers that feature estrogen receptor expression. These treatments markedly reduce the risk of recurrence from early-stage disease and improve outcomes in those with advanced disease (1, 2).  Despite this efficacy, a significant subset of estrogen receptor–positive (ER+) breast tumors ultimately develops resistance to antiestrogen therapy. Recent work has identified a set of recurrent mutations in the estrogen receptor ESR1 from patients with hormone-refractory metastatic breast cancer (MBC; refs. 3–7). These analyses from small populations of patients described mutations within the ligand-binding domain (LBD) of the receptor, with the majority of the mutations at residues Y537 and D538. It was not clear whether a greater repertoire of somatic LBD mutants might be identified by sequencing a larger population of MBCs. Recurrent mutations at Y537 and D538 were characterized using biochemical, cellular, and structural analyses and were shown to promote (i) an aporeceptor conformation similar to that of an estradiol-bound receptor, (ii) constitutive coactivator binding and transcriptional activity in the absence of estrogen, and (iii) hormone-independent proliferation when expressed in hormone-dependent cells (3, 8, 9). Also evident from these studies was the potential for ER antagonists to potently inhibit mutant receptor activities. However, whether existing antagonists had sufficient potency and adequate pharmacokinetic properties to inhibit mutant receptors in vivo and thereby overcome hormone-resistant phenotypes has not been clear.  In this study, we analyzed ESR1 DNA sequences from a large series of metastatic breast tumors and found several novel LBD mutations that constitutively activate the receptor and promote breast cancer phenotypes. We further investigated the ability of ER antagonists to potently inhibit mutant receptor activities. We observed differential sensitivity of the LBD mutants to selective estrogen receptor degraders (SERD). Among the mutants Y537S was the most constitutively active and required the highest drug concentrations to fully inhibit the receptor. This specific mutant proved to be less effectively antagonized in vivo by fulvestrant, a drug with suboptimal pharmacokinetic properties compared with the more potent and orally bioavailable SERD AZD9496. Collectively, these data suggest that activating ESR1 LBD mutations differentially affect the efficacy of ER antagonists.  Results  Novel ESR1 LBD Mutations in Patients with Hormone-Resistant Breast Cancer  With an expansion of our efforts to analyze mutations present in MBC using next-generation sequencing (National Clinical Trials Registry #00897702), we now have a more comprehensive portrait of the diversity and frequency of ESR1 mutations in MBC (Fig. 1A). In this series, over 929 cases of breast cancer (including ER+, HER2+, and ER− tumors) were analyzed, with 95 patients having somatic mutations in ESR1 (Table 1). Somatic mutations were found in the LBD in all but one case. Clinically, 85 out of 95 patients with ESR1 mutations had ER+/HER2− MBC, whereas 10 of them were ER+/HER2+. In terms of treatment in the metastatic setting, 67.4% of the ESR1-mutant patients had prior exposure to an aromatase inhibitor (AI), whereas only 18.8% of the wild-type (WT) patients had an AI as a treatment for metastatic disease (Supplementary Table S1). Among the metastatic sites with ESR1 mutations detected, liver and bone were the two most frequent, whereas none were detected in brain metastasis biopsies. The most frequent mutations in this series were D538G (n = 34), Y537S (n = 13), E380Q (n = 20), Y537C (n = 6), Y537N (n = 5), and L536H (n = 4). A number of other mutations were also observed at low frequency (n ≤ 2), most of which have not previously been described (Supplementary Table S2). Although these individual mutations are not common, in aggregate they represent 20% of the cases of LBD mutations in ESR1.  Figure 1. Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 1. Newly detected ESR1 mutations exhibit a range of estrogen-independent activities. A, Diagram of ESR1 ligand-binding domain with somatic mutations identified from 929 breast tumors analyzed. Height of the circles correlates to the number of cases with that specific mutation. The color codes of the circles are as follows: green for missense mutations, red for truncating mutations (nonsense, nonstop, frameshift deletion, frameshift insertion, splice site) and black for in-frame mutations. AF-2, Activation function-2. B, Activation of ER reporter gene. ER+ MCF7 cells were transfected with empty vector, HA-ERα WT or indicated ESR1 mutation, estrogen response element (ERE)-luciferase and Renilla luciferase reporter constructs in hormone-depleted medium with 10 nmol/L of E2 added for 24 hours where indicated. Firefly luciferase activity shows increased activity in the absence of E2 or presence of E2 for certain mutations. Graphs were plotted with the mean ± SD of three biological replicates. *, P < 0.05; **, P < 0.01; ***, P < 0.001; ****, P < 0.0001. C, Activation of ER target genes. MCF7 cells were transfected with empty vector, HA-ERα WT or mutant in hormone-depleted medium and harvested 48 hours after transfection for qRT-PCR analysis. Bars represent mean ± SD of three technical replicates normalized to actin (ACTB) expression. *, P < 0.05; **, P < 0.01; ***, P < 0.001; ****, P < 0.0001. D, Activation of ER phosphorylation in MCF7 cells. Expression level of the mutant HA-tagged ERs and their relative phosphorylation status at Serine118 and Serine 167, treated with or without 10 nmol/L E2 for 24 hours by immunoblot analysis with specific antibodies as indicated. E, Activation of hormone-independent cell proliferation. Doxycycline-inducible ER-mutant receptors (E380Q, S463P, L536R, and Y537S) expressing MCF7 cells were seeded in 96-well plates in hormone-depleted medium with or without the addition of doxycycline and proliferation was assayed using resazurin reagent. Data show sufficiency of these four mutants to promote cell growth in the absence of estradiol. Each point in the graph represented mean ± SD of six technical replicates. F, Binding of the SRC3 nuclear receptor domain to Y537S, D538G, E380Q, or S463P ERα LBD in the absence or presence of E2. SRC3 was titrated into a fixed amount of ER-LBD-biotin and time-resolved Förster resonance energy transfer (tr-FRET) indicated that only Y537S and D538G were able to recruit SRC3 in the absence of E2 but not E380Q and S463P. LBD, ligand-binding domain. View inlineView popup Table 1. Clinical characteristics of the tumor biopsies sequenced in the study The presence of a somatic mutation in the LBD of ESR1 does not necessarily imply constitutive activity, and thus we sought to characterize the activity of a set of these infrequent mutants and compare them with the activities of the better-described variants such as Y537S. We generated hemagglutinin (HA)-tagged ESR1 constructs with mutations introduced by site-directed mutagenesis and determined their activity through luciferase assays performed in the breast cancer cell lines MCF7 (ER+) and SKBr3 (ER−). First, to determine if the mutants had the ability to drive estrogen-independent transcription in the cellular context in which they are typically found (ER+ breast cancer), we examined the ability of transient expression of mutant ER to promote transcription from an estrogen response element (ERE)-luciferase construct in MCF7 cells. We found that most of the mutant ERs had elevated ERE-luciferase activity in the absence of estradiol (E2) compared with WT ER, although none of them displayed activity higher than Y537S (Fig. 1B). There were two notable exceptions, however, in which the S432L and V534E mutants showed no increase in activity in the absence of E2, despite being expressed at relatively similar levels as that of WT (Supplementary Fig. S1A). In addition to the augmentation of E2-independent activity, we examined whether any of the mutants had altered response to E2. ER with mutations in amino acid 537 showed little further induction with the addition of estradiol, whereas all the other mutants, including S432L and V534E, showed induction with the addition of E2, as was the case for WT. Because the effect of E2 addition for these mutants could be ascribed to the presence of the endogenous WT ER, we also examined the effect of mutant ER expression in ER− SKBr3 cells (Supplementary Fig. S1B). With the exception of Y537S, which is already maximally activated, the other ER mutants could be further activated by the addition of E2 in SKBr3 cells. This includes the S432L and V534E mutants, demonstrating that although these mutations are not constitutively active, they are also not inactivating alterations. The E2-independent activities of the ER mutants were not restricted to the luciferase reporter, as demonstrated by the induction of endogenous ER-dependent transcripts such as PGR and GREB1 (Fig. 1C and Supplementary Fig. S1C). As observed with the luciferase assays, most of the mutants could induce transcripts to levels above that from WT in the absence of E2. Once again, the S432L and V534E mutants showed little evidence of constitutive activity in the absence of E2, whereas the ESR amino acid 536 and 537 mutants were the most active. In addition to regulating ER target genes directly through ER binding sites in the genome, ER modulates gene expression indirectly via interaction with other transcription factors, such as the activator protein-1 (AP1). We thus examined the effect of several ER mutants on the induction of AP1 target genes, namely CCND1 and MYC, and found no significant changes in the levels of these two gene transcripts in comparing WT and mutant ERs (data not shown).  We looked for further evidence of biological activation of these somatic LBD mutants beyond assays for transcriptional activation. The phosphorylation of serine 118 and serine 167 of ER has been correlated with receptor activation in the absence of ligand (10–12). Consistent with the transcriptional assays, all mutants except S432L and V534E showed increased steady state ER S118 and S167 phosphorylation compared with WT in the absence of E2 when expressed in MCF7 cells (Fig. 1D). The addition of E2 suppressed apparent differences between phosphorylation of WT and most of the mutants (Fig. 1D). There were slight differences in the expression levels of ESR mutants (HA and ER blots) despite our efforts to achieve equal expression. This may be partly due to differential effects of some mutants on receptor stability, which we have demonstrated previously with Y537S and D538G (3). Together, these data demonstrate the constitutive activity of most of the infrequent ESR1 mutations, and also reveal that at least two mutants (V534E and S432L) show no evidence of constitutive activation.  Given their constitutive activities, we hypothesized that these infrequent ER mutants might promote estrogen-independent tumor growth. We therefore generated doxycycline-inducible cell lines that expressed four representative ER mutants (E380Q, S463P, L536R, and Y537S) in the estrogen-dependent MCF7 model and examined their proliferation in estrogen-deprived medium. The concentrations of doxycycline used to induce comparable levels of ER expression were determined by immunoblot analyses and quantitative PCR (Supplementary Fig. S2A and S2B). We found that this set of mutants behaved similarly to Y537S in their ability to promote E2-independent growth (Fig. 1E). However, there were some differences observed in the degree of growth stimulation, such as the E380Q mutant promoting growth to a lesser degree than the other mutants. Overall, the data point to several infrequent LBD mutants driving higher estrogen-independent receptor activity and thereby potentially promoting resistance to estrogen deprivation therapy.  The data together point to significant differences in the level of estrogen-independent activity of recurrent mutants with the well-characterized mutants in the loop between helix 11–12 (Y537S and D538G) being more potent inducers than some of the less frequent mutants (e.g., S463P or E380Q). One hallmark of both ligand-bound ER as well as constitutively active mutants such as Y537S is their ability to induce a conformation that binds coactivator proteins. To characterize whether these less frequent mutants could induce this “agonist conformation” in vitro without estradiol, we performed a time-resolved Förster Resonance Energy Transfer (tr-FRET) assay with steroid receptor coactivator 3 (SRC3) nuclear receptor domain (NRD) titrated to a fixed amount of mutant ER-LBD (Y537S, D538G, S463P, and E380Q; refs. 13, 14). SRC3 is a well-established ER coactivator that is highly expressed in breast cancer cells and has a high affinity for ligand-bound ER (15). As shown in Fig. 1F, SRC3 NRD bound to unliganded Y537S with the highest affinity (18.2 nmol/L). The D538G mutant was also able to bind SRC3 in the absence of E2 (137 nmol/L) albeit somewhat less avidly than Y537S. In contrast, no binding was detected for S436P and E380Q LBD whatsoever in the absence of E2. When the ER mutants were presaturated with E2, all of them bound to SRC3 NRD with varying affinities. S463P and E380Q showed similar affinities (EC50 = 3.9 nmol/L and 3.4 nmol/L), whereas Y537S and D538G had higher affinities (EC50 = 0.3 nmol/L and 1.1 nmol/L). The results of a trypsin digestion FRET assay further demonstrated the differences between the conformations of the mutants. This assay tests accessibility of the region of surrounding K529 to trypsin access and cleavage. All mutants tested provide substantial to major conformational stabilization of this region, but there were significant differences between mutants (Supplementary Table S3). In the absence of ligand (Apo), the t½ of WT-ER is the shortest at 3 minutes, implying that this region of the WT-ER is very accessible to trypsin attack. In contrast, Y537S and S463P demonstrate the greatest stabilization, in the range of 15–25-fold, followed by D538G, E380Q, and L536R with less than 5-fold stabilization. In the presence of ligand, marked stabilization is provided by the same two mutations (Y537S and S463P), as well as by D538G compared with WT. Although the degree of stabilization provided by the mutations does not fully correlate with their degree of constitutive activity, it provides evidence that the conformations of the mutants, at least in the region of helix 11, are quite different. Altogether, the data are consistent with mutants inducing constitutive activity through distinctive mechanisms and with Y537S appearing to be the most active.  Efficacy of SERDs Against ER Mutants  Previous work has suggested that ER antagonists are able to inhibit ER mutants but may be less potent than they are against WT ER (3). Given the differential activities of the LBD mutants, we asked whether different LBD mutants had comparable activity against the pure ER antagonist, fulvestrant (ICI). We examined the effect of selected ER mutants upon the dose-dependent inhibition of ER-driven transcription and proliferation by fulvestrant in MCF7 cells. Fulvestrant was able to inhibit the activity of all of the mutants; however, it appeared that the Y537S mutants required significantly higher levels of drug (70-fold higher IC99 for Y537S compared with WT) to fully inhibit their activities (Fig. 2A). In contrast, E380Q and S463P showed only slight resistance to fulvestrant with 2-fold higher IC99 as compared with WT (Fig. 2B). In terms of cell proliferation, Y537S required the highest concentration of fulvestrant (IC50 = 55-fold higher than WT) for complete growth inhibition, whereas several other mutants had modest effects (Y537C/N/D, D538G, and S463P; Fig. 2C and D and Supplementary Fig. S3A–S3D). This result is fairly concordant with the data from Fig. 2A and B. One exception is that S463P mutant appeared to have a greater effect on fulvestrant sensitivity in the proliferation assay than the transcriptional assay. This is consistent with a greater impact of this mutant in promoting estrogen-independent proliferation than transcription (Fig. 1E and C). The differential effects of fulvestrant upon ER-driven transcription from different mutants were also evident by assessing GREB1 and PGR transcript levels by quantitative PCR (Supplementary Fig. S3E and S3F). Taken together, the data indicate that certain ESR1 mutants can alter fulvestrant sensitivity in vitro.  Figure 2. Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 2. Efficacy of SERDs against ER mutants. Inhibition of WT and mutant-driven ERE luciferase (A–B) and proliferation (C–D) by fulvestrant (ICI). Doxycycline-induced WT and mutant ER-expressing MCF7 cells were treated with various doses of each antagonist in regular medium, demonstrating that the more active mutants required higher level of antagonists for complete inhibition. Graphs were plotted with the mean ± SD of two technical or six biological replicates respectively. (Note: SD values for Fig. 3A and B are too low for error bars to be visible in the graphs.) E, Detection of PR levels in MCF7 Y537S CRISPR knock-in cell by Western blot showed elevated PR levels in the Y537S knock-in cells in comparison with the parental line, indicating the expression of Y537S ER-mutant receptors. F, Proliferation assays of parental and Y537S CRISPR knock-in cell lines performed in hormone-depleted or regular media whereby Y537S knock-in cells showed estrogen-independent cell proliferation. G and H, Proliferation assays of parental MCF7 and MCF7 Y537S CRISPR knock-in cells treated with various doses of fulvestrant, AZD9496, or 4OHT demonstrated that significantly higher doses are required to cause growth inhibition of Y537S-expressing cells by ER antagonists. Cell confluency was measured using the IncuCyte Zoom standard software over a few days. Graphs were plotted with the mean ± SD of three biological replicates. To test if the partial resistance conferred by ER mutants was a class effect for SERDs, we compared the effects of three other SERDs, namely AZD9496 (16), RU-58668, and GDC-0810, on the WT and mutant cell lines. Although all three SERDs were capable of inhibiting cell proliferation by all mutants, significantly higher concentrations were consistently required for Y537S (Supplementary Fig. S4A–S4F). These findings corroborate previously published reports where the Y537S mutation led to reduced rates of ligand association and greater resistance to disruption of ligand binding by urea compared with WT (17).  Because SERD potency was tested using a model involving transient expression of the mutants, we sought to confirm the findings regarding Y537S in a system in which the mutation was expressed from its endogenous genomic locus. We therefore generated an ESR1 knock-in of Y537S into the MCF7 cell line, using CRISPR/Cas9-mediated genome editing. The insertion of Y537S into the ESR1 gene locus was confirmed by digital droplet (dd) PCR analysis of the parental cells, pooled cells (cells before single-cell sorting), and Y537S CRISPR knock-in cells (clone B3). These data demonstrated that the knock-in cell line is homozygous for the Y537S mutation, having an insignificant number of WT positive droplets detected (Supplementary Fig. S5). Cells expressing the Y537S allele also demonstrated enhanced expression of progesterone receptor (PR) protein and proliferation in hormone-depleted media compared with parental cells (Fig. 2E and F). The potency of fulvestrant and AZD9496 in Y537S-expressing cells was examined by assaying cell proliferation over a range of drug doses. As shown in Fig. 2G, the growth of MCF7 WT cells was inhibited by fulvestrant and AZD9496 at an IC50 concentration of 0.4 nmol/L, whereas in the Y537S-expressing cells, fulvestrant and AZD9496 inhibited growth with an IC50 of 25 nmol/L (Fig. 2H). These reduced sensitivities in the CRISPR knock-in Y537S cell line are consistent with the results seen with the doxycycline-induced overexpression mutant cell lines.  Superior Antitumor Activity on ER Mutant–Expressing Xenografts Achieved with AZD9496  The poor pharmacokinetic properties of fulvestrant are well documented in both mice and humans (3, 18). Given the comparable efficacy of AZD9496 and fulvestrant in vitro and the high serum levels of AZD9496 achievable through oral administration, we sought to compare these drugs in xenograft models of ER-mutant disease. We examined xenografts from the MCF7 cells engineered to express WT or mutant ER under a doxycycline-inducible promoter (3). We have previously demonstrated that the growth of these tumors is entirely dependent on ER signaling and that complete ablation of ER is able to fully block tumor growth. Maximally effective doses of fulvestrant (200 mg/kg) twice weekly via subcutaneous injection or AZD9496 (15 mg/kg) orally once daily were administered to mice with tumors expressing WT, E380Q, S463P, Y537S, or D538G ER. Fulvestrant fully inhibited the growth of the WT-, E380Q-, and S463P-expressing tumors while nearly completely inhibiting the growth of D538G tumors (Fig. 3A–E). The Y537S-expressing tumors, however, continued to grow in the presence of fulvestrant, albeit more slowly than in untreated controls. Whereas fulvestrant was only partially effective at suppressing the Y537S tumors, AZD9496 was able to completely inhibit their growth. The relative resistance of the Y537S tumors to fulvestrant was evident when we compared the sizes of the tumors at the end of the study by plotting them as scatter plots, which showed that the Y537S tumors were significantly larger than WT or D538G tumors in the fulvestrant arms (ICI) but not in the AZD9496 arms (Fig. 3F and G). In contrast, tumors expressing the alternate Y537 mutations, Y537C/N as well as V422del, responded similarly to WT upon inhibition by either fulvestrant or AZD9496 (Supplementary Fig. S6A–S6D). Similar observations were made when we tested the effect of another bioavailable SERD, GDC-0810, on the growth of ER-mutant tumors, suggesting that the improved pharmacokinetic properties of the antagonists aid in efficient targeting of the mutant ER (Supplementary Fig. S7A–S7C).  Figure 3. Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 3. AZD9496 demonstrates superior antitumor effects on ER-mutant expressing xenografts. Mice bearing MCF7-inducible HA-ER WT (A), Y537S (B), D538G (C), E380Q (D), or S463P (E) tumors were randomly assigned to treatment groups of either 15 mg/kg of AZD9496 daily orally or 200 mg/kg of fulvestrant twice weekly, s.c. Tumors treated with AZD9496 showed greater growth inhibition as compared with those treated with fulvestrant. The result was presented as average tumor volume measured for each group ± SD (n = 10 mice/group). *, P < 0.05; **, P < 0.01; ***, P < 0.001; ****, P < 0.0001. F and G, Scatter plots of the volumes of tumors expressing WT, Y537S, or D538G treated with either fulvestrant (ICI) or AZD9496 taken at the end of the xenograft studies shown in A–C. T-tests comparing the volumes of mutant tumors with those of the WT indicated significant resistance of Y537S-mutant tumors to fulvestrant treatment. *, P < 0.05; **, P < 0.01; ***, P < 0.001; ****, P < 0.0001. H, PDX, CTC-174, with D538G mutation, showed greater growth arrest with 5 mg/kg of AZD9496. The result was presented as average tumor volume measured for each group ± SEM. I, Quantitative PCR detection of various ER target genes of AZD9496-treated CTC-174, the D538G PDX model, showed significant reduction in the transcript levels of GREB1, STC2, TFF1, and PGR when compared with the vehicle, indicating inhibition of the ER signaling pathway by AZD9496. Graphs were plotted with the mean ± SD of three technical replicates. As further support of the potential for ER antagonists to target most ER-mutant tumors, we examined the effect of AZD9496 and fulvestrant on the growth of a patient-derived xenograft (PDX), CTC-174 (19), that expresses a D538G ESR1 mutation (Supplementary Fig. S8A and S8B). Both AZD9496 and fulvestrant were able to slow tumor growth in this model with a slightly enhanced efficacy seen for AZD9496 in this context, similar to what was observed for the MCF7-D538G model (Fig. 3H and C). It should be noted that unlike the MCF7 model, growth of this particular xenograft has never been shown to be fully dependent on ER signaling alone, and this may be partially affected by PIK3CAN345K (activating mutation) and two ARID1A truncation mutations (E1776* and S705fs; inactivating mutations) identified in sequencing of this model. Consistent with these results, assessment of ER-driven transcripts in the AZD9496- and vehicle-treated tumors shows marked reduction of ER activity from AZD9496 administration, suggesting it was efficacious in blocking the ER-driven component of this disease (Fig. 3I). Overall, the data from the two ER mutant models are consistent with the ability of AZD9496 to inhibit mutant ER-driven tumor growth across a broader range of mutants than fulvestrant in vivo. In support of this, we examined the drug levels of AZD9496 and fulvestrant in serum using pharmacokinetic modeling. We found that the average area under the curve (AUC) and Cmax for fulvestrant (AUC = 5.29 μmol/L • h, Cmax = 0.65 μmol/L) were markedly lower than those obtained for AZD9496 (AUC = 218 μmol/L • h, Cmax = 59 μmol/L). This difference was observed despite dosing fulvestrant at levels approximately 5-fold higher than are administered to patients. Taken together, the data are consistent with fulvestrant and AZD9496 both inhibiting mutant ER activities in vitro but AZD9496 having superior pharmacokinetic properties enabling in vivo efficacy across a broader range of ER-mutant models, including those driven by Y537S.  Discussion  The two major strategies for therapeutic targeting of hormonal signaling in breast cancer are estrogen deprivation and direct antagonism of the estrogen receptor. Through large clinical investigations, estrogen deprivation has become the clinical standard for both the adjuvant and metastatic setting. Recently, however, resistance to estrogen deprivation therapy has been characterized as frequently involving activating mutations in the estrogen receptor (20). Biochemical and structural studies of the most common mutations have shown them to promote an activated conformation in the absence of ligand. This conformation remains permissive for ligand binding, thus leading to the hypothesis that direct antagonism may be a rational strategy for these mutant receptors. However, the ability of different ER antagonists to effectively block all of the different ER mutants that occur in the clinic has not been established. In this study, we characterize the diversity of activating ESR1 mutations that are observed in the clinic and determine conditions needed for ER antagonists to be effective against the mutations.  Initial reports on the existence of somatic ESR1 mutations in ER+ MBC came from somewhat smaller populations of tumors in the range of 11 to 76 tumors (3–6). Recurrent alterations were the focal point of the in vitro characterizations, and it was demonstrated that the mutations D538G, Y537S/N/C, and L536R all promoted estrogen-independent activation of the receptor (3–6). In addition, several of these reports assessed the ability of ER antagonists such as 4-hydroxytamoxifen and fulvestrant to block these mutant receptors (3–6). From these data, it appeared that the mutant receptors might be inhibited, albeit at higher drug concentrations (3, 4, 6, 21). Whether all ESR1 mutants followed the pattern of these mutations in amino acids 536 to 538 was unknown. In the current study, we report the identification of ESR1 LBD mutations from a large cohort of patients with MBC. The majority of mutations are in amino acids 538, 537, 380, and 536. However, we detected a number of low-frequency novel mutations, which collectively comprised 20% of the mutations detected within this series. An analysis of the different mutations revealed a range of activities. Across a variety of assays surveying in vitro conformation, phosphorylation, transcriptional activity, and estrogen-independent proliferation, the Y537S mutant appeared to have the greatest effect. Mutation in neighboring residues 536 and 538 also led to high activity; however, in both cases, these were often at or below the level observed with estradiol stimulation. It is also notable that mutation at the same amino acid 537 site to cysteine (C), aspartic acid (D), and asparagine (N) caused receptor activation, but to a lesser degree than did the S mutant. Hence, the level of ER activation depends on both the site of mutation and the nature of the mutant residue. Beyond these mutations, all of the mutants outside this region show only modest activity in the absence of estradiol. In addition, two somatic mutations (S432L and V534E) showed no activation in the absence of estrogen and so their role in promoting resistance to aromatase inhibition is not supported by these data. The basis for these differences in basal activation levels is likely to lie in the conformational changes that these mutations induce. Structures of D538G and Y537S ligand binding domains have now been reported and show similarities in the mechanisms whereby they induce ligand-independent activation (22). However, even these two structures highlight important differences in hydrogen bonding and side chain packing that may well translate into the apparent differences in coactivator binding affinity and basal transcriptional activity. Alterations such as E380Q or S463P appear likely to promote hormone independence through still other mechanisms as evidenced by the lack of coactivator binding they induce in vitro in the absence of estradiol. These findings support ongoing efforts to characterize structures of all of the different recurrent ER mutants as they likely reveal the different constraints that prevent unliganded ER from activating transcription.  From a translational perspective, the varying activities observed from different ESR1 mutations raise several issues. First, it is not yet clear whether different mutations are more or less able to promote resistance to aromatase inhibitors. The data revealing the presence of ESR1 mutations in hormone-independent tumors and their association with poor outcomes have largely been obtained from small populations that are underpowered to look for differences in outcome due to different mutations. One recent report suggested that patients with D538G and Y537S mutant tumors may have slight differences in survival outcomes, but this again involved numbers too small to be conclusive on this point (20). Our data raise the possibility that some mutations may indeed be more effective in promoting resistance than others. Perhaps of even greater significance, estrogen receptor antagonists might have differential efficacies as a function of mutation type and activity, a possibility that we have investigated in our models.  Estrogen receptor antagonists such as fulvestrant appear broadly effective against ER mutants in vitro, but important differences emerge when comparing the potencies against individual mutants. Whereas several mutations had a modest effect on fulvestrant efficacy, Y537S led to major changes in the concentration required to fully inhibit ER activities. What accounts for the specific differences in drug potency is not yet clear, but it is notable that the Y537S mutant is the most activated in the absence of ligand and also shows reduced ligand association rates and binding affinities in vitro. Perhaps this points to a particularly active state of the receptor that might be targeted by a unique pharmacologic strategy. However, despite this reduced affinity, antagonists such as fulvestrant can ultimately inhibit ER mutants, including Y537S, in vitro, albeit at higher doses. To address whether these differences in potency might have clinical implications, we examined the in vivo effects of these drugs in xenograft models.  Using these models, we found that fulvestrant was capable of fully inhibiting WT, E380Q, and S463P ER-driven breast cancers. However, Y537S mutants were not fully inhibited by fulvestrant despite dosing to higher levels than are typically achieved in the clinic. The tumor model driven by D538G was nearly completely inhibited by fulvestrant and so appeared to behave more like the E380Q and S463P mutants in vivo. The oral SERDs, AZD9496 and GDC-0810, were able to completely block growth of WT and all mutant ER-driven models including those driven by Y537S. These findings are consistent with clinical observations that the major limitation of fulvestrant is its poor pharmacokinetic properties. Although fulvestrant is highly potent in vitro, receptor occupancy in vivo is incomplete at the steady-state serum concentrations reached with current dosing (18). However, higher peak and steady-state levels of AZD9496 and GDC-0810 are achievable despite administering significantly less drug to mice. As several more bioavailable SERDs such as AZD9496 and GDC-0810 are now in early clinical trial testing, the value of higher drug levels can be formally evaluated. Our data indicate the need to include assessment of specific mutations in this evaluation because mutations in amino acid 537 and perhaps also 536 and 538 will likely necessitate higher drug levels to achieve complete inhibition.  Finally, it is notable that the PDX model we analyzed demonstrated only partial tumor growth inhibition with AZD9496. Although the data for ESR1 mutations are consistent with these alterations being common and reducing tumor dependence on estrogen, they do not imply that all mutant tumors are exclusively dependent on ER signaling for their growth. Tumor genotyping of ESR1-mutant breast cancers also reveals recurrent alterations in the PI3K/AKT pathway, cyclin D1, and FGF receptors, among others (3). These alterations likely reduce tumor dependence on ER signaling. Such tumors are appropriate candidates for combinations of antiestrogens with inhibitors of PI3K, AKT, CDK4/6, and FGFRs that are all in phase II/III testing. Our data suggest that the specific hormonal drug used in such a combination is likely to matter significantly, a point further emphasized by our recent observation that inhibition of growth signals such as PI3K/AKT led to further activation of and restored dependence upon ER signaling (23). Taken together, our data and the emerging literature suggest that more potent and bioavailable compounds to block ER signaling may play a key role in the management of ER+ MBC.  
995||Tuberous sclerosis complex (TSC) is an autosomal dominant disorder characterised by the development of hamartomas in a variety of organs and tissues. The disease is caused by mutations in either the TSC1 gene on chromosome 9q34 or the TSC2 gene on chromosome 16p13.3. The TSC1 and TSC2 gene products, TSC1 and TSC2, interact to form a protein complex that inhibits signal transduction to the downstream effectors of the mammalian target of rapamycin (mTOR). Here we investigate the effects of putative TSC1 missense mutations identified in individuals with signs and/or symptoms of TSC on TSC1–TSC2 complex formation and mTOR signalling. We show that specific amino-acid substitutions close to the N-terminal of TSC1 reduce steady-state levels of TSC1, resulting in the activation of mTOR signalling and leading to the symptoms of TSC.  Keywords: tuberous sclerosis complex, TSC1, TSC2 Go to: Introduction Tuberous sclerosis complex (TSC) is an autosomal dominant disorder characterised by the development of hamartomas in a variety of organs and tissues, including the brain, skin and kidneys.1, 2  Mutations in either the TSC1 gene on chromosome 9q343 or the TSC2 gene on chromosome 16p13.34 cause TSC. The TSC1 and TSC2 gene products, TSC1 and TSC2, interact to form a protein complex. TSC2 contains a GTPase-activating protein domain and the TSC1–TSC2 complex acts on the rheb GTPase to prevent the rheb-GTP-dependent stimulation of cell growth through the mammalian target of rapamycin (mTOR).5 In cells lacking either TSC1 or TSC2, the downstream targets of mTOR, including p70 S6 kinase (S6K) and ribosomal protein S6, are constitutively phosphorylated.6, 7 The identification of the role of the TSC1–TSC2 complex in regulating mTOR activity has made it possible to compare TSC1 and TSC2 variants found in the normal population with variants identified in individuals with symptoms of TSC. The effects of amino-acid changes on TSC1–TSC2 complex formation, on the activation of rheb GTPase activity by the complex and on the phosphorylation status of S6K and S6 can be determined.8  Comprehensive screens for mutations at both the TSC1 and TSC2 loci have been performed in several large cohorts of TSC patients, and a wide variety of different pathogenic mutations have been described.9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15 Although ∼20% of the mutations identified in the TSC2 gene are missense changes, missense mutations in the TSC1 gene appear much less frequently. One simple explanation for this observation is that TSC1 missense mutations are rare because the majority of TSC patients have a mutation in the TSC2 gene. According to the TSC1 mutation database,16 22 putative missense mutations have been identified in TSC patients. However, only one of these is a confirmed de novo mutation. Here, we investigate the effects of 10 TSC1 missense changes (c.350T>C (p.L117P), c.539T>C (p.L180P), c.572T>A (p.L191H), c.671T>G (p.M224R), c.737G>A (p.R246K), c.913G>A (p.G305R), c.913G>T (p.G305W), c.1526G>A (p.R509Q), c.3103G>A (p.G1035S) and c.3290G>A (p.R1097H)) on TSC1–TSC2 function. We compared these TSC1 variants with wild-type TSC1 and three truncation variants: c.379_381delTGT (p.128delV), c.593_595delACT (p.N198F199delinsI) and c.2075C>T (p.R692X). Our analysis demonstrates that TSC1 missense mutations reduce steady-state levels of TSC1, resulting in increased mTOR activity and leading to the symptoms of TSC.  Go to: Materials and methods Patient characteristics  Samples from patients with either a putative or definite diagnosis of TSC were received for mutation analysis. Details on clinical symptoms were obtained from the treating physicians who were sent a standardised clinical evaluation form (see Supplementary Table 1).  Mutation analysis  DNA was extracted from peripheral blood using standard techniques. Mutation analysis was performed as described earlier,13 or by direct sequence analysis of all TSC1 and TSC2 coding exons and exon/intron boundaries. In addition, both genes were analysed using the multiplex ligation-dependent probe amplification assay (MRC Holland, Amsterdam, The Netherlands).  To investigate whether the identified changes had an effect on splicing, three different splice-site prediction programs were used,17, 18, 19 as described earlier.13  Generation of constructs and antisera  Expression constructs encoding C-terminal YFP- and myc-tagged TSC1 variants were derived using the QuikChange site-directed mutagenesis kit (Stratagene, La Jolla, CA, USA). In each case, the complete open reading frame of the mutated construct was verified by sequence analysis. The other constructs used in this study have been described earlier.8, 20, 21 Polyclonal rabbit antisera specific for human TSC1 and TSC2 have been described earlier.21 Other antibodies were purchased from Cell Signaling Technology (Danvers, MA, USA).  Functional analysis of TSC1 variants  Expression of TSC1 variants in transfected cells Human embryonal kidney (HEK) 293T cells seeded into 6-cm diameter dishes were transfected with a 1:1 mixture of the TSC1 and TSC2 expression constructs using Lipofectamine Plus (Invitrogen, Carlsbad, CA, USA), following the manufacturer's instructions. Two days after transfection, the cells were lysed in 50 m Tris-HCl (pH 8.0), 100 m NaCl, 50 m NaF, 0.5 m EDTA and 1% Triton X-100 plus protease inhibitors (Roche, Basel, Switzerland) and separated into supernatant and pellet fractions by centrifugation at 10 000 g for 10 min at 4°C as described earlier.22 Wild-type TSC1 and the TSC1 variants were immunoprecipitated from the supernatant fractions by incubation with a monoclonal antibody against the C-terminal myc epitope tag for 90 min at 4°C before incubation with Protein G beads (GE Healthcare, Uppsala, Sweden). After gentle agitation for 90 min at 4°C, the beads were washed three times with a >50-fold excess of lysis buffer. The immunoprecipitated proteins were detected by immunoblotting. Blots were developed using enhanced chemiluminescent detection (GE Healthcare).8  Immunoblot analysis of S6K T389 phosphorylation in cells overexpressing TSC1 variants HEK 293T cells were transfected with a 4:2:1 mixture of the TSC1, TSC2 and S6K expression constructs. A total of 1.75 μg DNA was diluted in 200 μl Dulbecco's modified Eagle's medium (DMEM) containing 7 μg polyethyleneimine (Polysciences, Warrington, PA, USA). Where necessary, an empty expression vector (pcDNA3; Invitrogen) was added to make up the total amount of DNA. After 15 min at room temperature, the DNA/polyethyleneimine complexes were added to 80% confluent cells in 3.5-cm diameter dishes. After 4 h at 37°C, the transfection mixture was replaced with DMEM containing 10% foetal calf serum. Twenty-four hours after transfection, the cells were harvested and analysed by immunoblotting as before or by near infrared fluorescent detection on an Odyssey™ Infrared Imager (169 μm resolution, medium quality with 0 mm focus offset) (Li-Cor Biosciences, Lincoln, NE, USA). The integrated intensities of the protein bands were determined using the Odyssey software (default settings with background correction; 3-pixel width border average method). The mean ratios of the T389-phosphorylated S6K signal to the total S6K signal (T389/S6K) and the total TSC2 signal to the total TSC1 signal (TSC2/TSC1) were determined relative to wild-type TSC1 from at least three independent experiments (wild-type T389/S6K and TSC2/TSC1 ratios=1).  Immunofluorescent detection of S235/236 phosphorylation of ribosomal protein S6 in TSC1-deficient cells Tsc1−/− mouse embryo fibroblasts (MEFs)7 were transfected with expression constructs encoding wild-type TSC1 or the TSC1 variants, using Lipofectamine Plus (Invitrogen), following the manufacturer's instructions. Twenty-four hours after transfection, S6 (S235/236) phosphorylation in the transfected cells was detected by immunofluorescent microscopy using a rabbit polyclonal antibody specific for S235/236-phosphorylated S6.23 TSC1 variants were identified either directly (for C-terminal-tagged TSC1-YFP variants) or with a mouse monoclonal antibody against the myc epitope tag (for C-terminal-tagged TSC1-myc variants). If possible, at least 50 cells expressing each TSC1 variant were counted per experiment and the number of cells showing a clear reduction in S6 (S235/236) phosphorylation was noted. The mean proportions of expressing cells with reduced S6 phosphorylation were calculated from at least three independent experiments.  Go to: Results Patient characteristics and mutation analysis  The TSC1 c.350T>C (p.L117P) change was detected in two generations of a family with TSC (Figure 1a). The index patient (I:1) had epilepsy since the age of 22 years and fulfilled the diagnostic criteria for definite TSC, with facial angiofibroma, ungual fibroma, hypomelanotic macules, a shagreen patch and cerebral white matter migration lines. No mental disability was reported. The youngest child (II:2) had the c.350T>C change. Despite being somewhat hyperactive, this child developed normally until 4 years of age when epileptic seizures occurred and development stagnated. The child is now severely mentally retarded. No information was available about other signs of TSC. The eldest child (II:1), who could not yet be tested for the c.350T>C change, suffered severe anoxia at birth and has severe infantile encephalopathy with spastic tetraplegia and epilepsy.  Figure 1 Figure 1 Pedigrees of the investigated families with TSC. Arrows indicate the index cases. Open symbols indicate no signs or symptoms of TSC; black symbols indicate individuals with definite TSC; hatched symbols indicate individuals with possible TSC. A question ... The TSC1 c.671T>G (p.M224R) and TSC1 c.3103G>A (p.G1035S) changes were identified in two generations of a family with TSC24 (Figure 1b). The index case (II:3) had definite TSC with multiple shagreen patches, hypomelanotic macules, ungual fibromas, dental pits, epilepsy and severe mental disability. One parent (I:2) and both siblings (II:1 and II:2) of the index case also fulfilled the diagnostic criteria for definite TSC. Individual I:2, who was seizure-free and of below-average intelligence (IQ 73), had skin lesions pathognomonic for TSC. Individual II:1, who was of normal intelligence (IQ 94), had seizures, cortical tubers and multiple TSC skin lesions. Individual II:2 had epilepsy, below-average intelligence (IQ 67) and multiple TSC skin lesions. All the affected individuals in this family were heterozygous for the c.671T>G and c.3103G>A changes. Three affected individuals (I:2, II:1 and II:2) were heterozygous for a polymorphism in the TSC2 gene (TSC2 c.1276-32C>G). The index case was homozygous for the wild-type TSC2 1276-32C allele, consistent with TSC segregating with a mutation at the TSC1 locus in this family.  The TSC1 c.539T>C (p.L180P) change was detected in three generations of a family with TSC (Figure 1c). Individual I:2 had an ungual fibroma as the only reported sign of TSC. Individual II:2 had epilepsy, no mental disability, skin signs typical for TSC and a subependymal giant cell astrocytoma as well as other brain lesions consistent with a definite diagnosis of TSC. Individual II:3, the half-sibling of II:2, had typical TSC-associated skin lesions and possible mild mental retardation. Individual II:4, the other half-sibling of II:2, had a history of seizures during puberty and some skin tags, not typical of TSC. Individual III:1, the child of II:2, had epilepsy, and typical TSC-associated skin and brain lesions. Individual III:2, the sibling of III:1, had multiple cardiac rhabdomyoma and Wolff–Parkinson–White syndrome. No mental disability was reported for either individual III:1 or III:2. TSC did not cosegregate with markers mapping close to the TSC2 locus on chromosome 16p13.3, and no candidate TSC2 mutation was identified in the index case.  The TSC1 c.572T>A (p.L191H) change was identified in an individual who met the clinical criteria for definite TSC, including typical skin, heart and brain lesions. The individual had a history of seizures but no mental disability was reported. The c.572T>A change was absent in the individual's parents and child (Figure 1d). None of these individuals showed any signs of TSC.  Two TSC patients, one Finnish and one Dutch, were identified with the TSC1 c.737G>A (p.R246K) change. No information was available on the parents of either of these two individuals. The Finnish individual had typical TSC-associated skin, brain and kidney lesions. No mental disability or history of seizures was reported. The Dutch individual was also reported to have definite TSC. The sibling of this individual did not have any signs of TSC and did not carry the c.737G>A change.  The TSC1 c.1526G>A (p.R509Q) change was identified in a child of African origin, suspected of having TSC due to an echodensity that was detected prenatally in the septum of the heart. After birth, physical examination of the child did not reveal any signs of TSC but multiple congenital malformations that fitted with VACTERL (vertebral anomalies, atresia, cardiac malformations, tracheoesophageal fistula, renal anomalies and limb anomalies) association were identified. The same c.1526G>A change was identified in one of the parents. Neither parent reported any signs of TSC.  The TSC1 c.3290G>A (p.R1097H) change was identified in a child with cardiac rhabdomyoma who subsequently developed epilepsy at the age of 3 months. An MRI scan of the brain showed multiple subependymal nodules, cortical tubers and white matter abnormalities. This individual fulfilled the diagnostic criteria for definite TSC, with angiomyolipoma and multiple skin lesions. The c.3290G>A change was also identified in one of the parents; neither parent showed any signs of TSC.  The TSC1 c.379_381delTGT (p.128delV) change was detected in a child with epilepsy and a definite diagnosis of TSC (multiple skin signs, subependymal nodules and angiomyolipoma). No mental disability was reported and no information was available on the phenotypic or genetic status of the parents. The same change has been reported in another unrelated TSC patient.25 The TSC1 c.593_595delACT (p.N198F199delinsI), c.913G>A (p.G305R) and c.913G>T (p.G305W) missense changes have been reported earlier to cosegregate with TSC in three independent families.15, 26  In all the above cases, no other putative pathogenic mutations were identified and comparison of the allele ratios of the index cases and parents (where possible) did not reveal any evidence for somatic mosaicism in the leukocyte DNA.  Comparative analysis of TSC1 amino-acid substitutions  During our initial mutation screening, the L117P change was the only putative pathogenic TSC1 amino-acid substitution identified. We compared the L117P variant with wild-type TSC1, an earlier characterised TSC1 in-frame deletion (N198F199delinsI)27 and to a common TSC1 truncation mutation, R692X3, 10 (Figure 2). Wild-type TSC1 was detected predominantly in the post 10 000 g pellet fraction, whereas the three variants were detected in the supernatant fraction (Figure 2a). Upon coexpression of TSC2, the variants as well as wild-type TSC1 were detected in both subcellular fractions (Figure 2b). TSC2 was coimmunoprecipitated from the supernatant fraction with all three variants, although clearly less effectively than with wild-type TSC1.  Figure 2 Figure 2 Analysis of the TSC1 L117P variant. Wild-type TSC1 (wt) or the L117P, N198F199delinsI (del) or R692X variants (all containing a C-terminal myc epitope tag) were overexpressed in HEK 293T cells alone (a) or in the presence of coexpressed TSC2 (b). Cell ... Next, we investigated whether the variants could inhibit mTOR signalling. Expression of wild-type TSC1 alone is insufficient to inhibit mTOR activity.28 Therefore, the variants were coexpressed with TSC2 and S6K in HEK 293T cells, and S6K T389 phosphorylation was analysed by immunoblotting (Figure 3a). To try and achieve comparable expression levels of the different variants, we used different quantities of the corresponding expression constructs. Coexpression of wild-type TSC1 and TSC2 resulted in a reduction in S6K T389 phosphorylation, even with low levels of the TSC1 expression construct. In contrast, coexpression of TSC2 with the variants did not reduce S6K T389 phosphorylation, indicating that they were unable to inhibit mTOR effectively. Compared with wild-type TSC1, the L117P and N198F199delinsI variants were detected at low levels, even when the quantity of transfected expression construct DNA was increased.  Figure 3 Figure 3 TSC1–TSC2-dependent inhibition of mTOR signalling by the TSC1 L117P variant. (a) T389 phosphorylation of S6K in HEK 293T cells coexpressing TSC2, myc-tagged S6K and myc-tagged wild-type TSC1 (wt) or the TSC1 L117P, N198F199delinsI (del) or R692X ... To confirm that the L117P and N198F199delinsI variants were unable to inhibit mTOR, they were expressed in Tsc1−/− MEFs. These cells exhibit constitutive S6 (S235/236) phosphorylation.7 As shown in Figure 3b, wild-type YFP-tagged TSC1 reduced S6 phosphorylation in >60% of the YFP-positive Tsc1−/− MEFs, consistent with earlier results.8 In contrast, S6 phosphorylation was reduced in <30% of cells expressing the L117P or N198F199delinsI variants (paired t-test P<0.001). Nevertheless, a reduction in S6 phosphorylation was observed in a higher proportion of variant-expressing cells than in cells expressing YFP only (paired t-test P<0.02). Therefore, although both variants were clearly less effective than wild-type TSC, we could not exclude the possibility that the variants can antagonise mTOR activity.  As a result of on-going TSC1 and TSC2 mutation screening, we identified eight additional TSC1 single amino-acid changes: p.128delV, p.L180P, p.L191H, p.M224R, p.R246K, p.R509Q, p.G1035S and p.R1097H. The p.M224R and p.G1035S changes cosegregated with TSC in a single family (Figure 1b). To investigate the effects of these two amino-acid substitutions on TSC1 function, the corresponding single and double variants were compared with wild-type TSC1 and the R692X truncation. As shown in Figure 4a, the M224R variant and the M224R/G1035S double variant were detected at lower levels than wild-type TSC1 and the G1035S variant. Furthermore, the expression of wild-type TSC1 or the G1035S variant reduced S6 phosphorylation in >50% of transfected Tsc1−/− MEFs whereas <20% of the MEFs expressing the M224R, M224R/G1035S or R692X variants showed a reduction in S6 phosphorylation (Figure 4b), indicating that the M224R substitution is the pathogenic mutation in this family and that the G1035S substitution is a cosegregating neutral variant.24 We did not observe any differences between the M224R single mutant and the M224R/G1035S double mutant.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Results of the functional assays on the M224R, G1035S and M224R/G1035S variants. (a) TSC1–TSC2-dependent inhibition of S6K-T389 phosphorylation. TSC2, S6K and wild-type TSC1 (wt TSC1), or the TSC1 variants, were expressed in HEK 293T cells. T389 ... To determine whether the 128delV, L180P, L191H, R246K, R509Q and R1097H amino-acid changes were pathogenic, we compared these variants with the previously characterised L117P and R692X variants, and with two additional putative missense variants, G305R and G305W15 (Figure 5). The R246K, G305R, G305W, R509Q and R1097H variants were detected at comparable levels with wild-type TSC1 (Figure 5a and b) and were just as effective at inhibiting S6K T389 phosphorylation (Figure 5a and c). In contrast, the 128delV, L180P and L191H variants were detected at low levels, similar to the L117P and M224R variants (Figure 5a and b). Furthermore, S6K T389 phosphorylation was not inhibited by the expression of these variants (Figure 5a and c). Consistent with the immunoblot data, the expression of the L117P, 128delV, L180P, L191H, M224R, M224R/G1035S and R692X variants in Tsc1−/− MEFs reduced S6 phosphorylation in <40% of cells, whereas wild-type TSC1 and the R246K, G305R, G305W, R509Q, G1035S and R1097H variants reduced S6 phosphorylation in >50% of the expressing cells (Figure 5d).  Figure 5 Figure 5 Analysis of the 128delV, L180P, L191H, R246K, G305R, G305W, R509Q and R1097H variants. (a) TSC1-dependent inhibition of S6K T389 phosphorylation. S6K T389 phosphorylation was determined by immunoblotting as before except that the blots were developed ... We concluded that the 128delV, L180P and L191H changes destabilise TSC1, resulting in increased mTOR activity. The R246K, G305R, G305W, R509Q, G1035S and R1097H amino-acid substitutions did not affect TSC1 function in our assays.  Splice-site prediction analysis  Splice-site prediction analysis of the identified variants was performed according to a standard protocol13 using three independent splice-site prediction programs.17, 18, 19 Effects were predicted for four of the variants: TSC1 c.379_381delTGT (p.128delV), c.737G>A (p.R246K) c.913G>A (p.G305R) and c.913G>T (p.G305W).  According to two of the prediction programs, the c.379_381delTGT mutation created a potential new acceptor site within exon 6. However, the values of the new site (0.48 and 0.33 in Fruitfly and NetGene2, respectively) were lower than the values of the wild-type acceptor site (0.98 and 0.97, respectively). It is therefore unlikely that this sequence change affects splicing.  The R246K, G305R and G305W amino-acid substitutions did not affect TSC1 function. However, the c.737G>A (p.R246K) nucleotide substitution altered the last nucleotide of exon 8 and all three programs indicated that this change disrupted the intron 8 splice donor site, leaving a new potential donor site 90 nucleotides downstream. Similarly, the c.913G>A (p.G305R) and c.913G>T (p.G305W) substitutions affect the last nucleotide of exon 9 and were predicted by all three programs to disrupt splicing to the intron 9 donor site. We concluded that these three variants are most likely pathogenic splice-site mutations, not missense mutations. Unfortunately, the effect of these sequence changes on TSC1 RNA splicing could not be confirmed experimentally because no new samples could be obtained.  An overview of the functional assays and splice-site analysis is presented in Supplementary Table 2.  Go to: Discussion Mutation analysis of the TSC1 and TSC2 genes in individuals with TSC, and in those suspected of having the disease is important for diagnosis and genetic counselling. During our screening of a cohort of approximately 900 index cases with TSC, or possible TSC, we identified eight putative pathogenic TSC1 missense changes, c.350T>C (p.L117P), c.539T>C (p.L180P), c.572T>A (p.L191H), c.671T>G (p.M224R), c.737G>A (p.R246K), c.1526G>A (p.R509Q), c.3103G>A (p.G1035S) and c.3290G>A (p.R1097H), as well as a putative pathogenic in-frame deletion mutant, TSC1 c.379_381delTGT (p.128delV). We compared these variants with the earlier reported c.913G>A (p.G305R), c.913G>T (p.G305W), c.593_595delACT (p.N198F199delinsI) and c.2074C>T (p.R692X) mutants.2, 15, 26  The TSC1 L117P, 128delV, L180P, L191H, N198F199delinsI and M224R changes resulted in reduced levels of TSC1 and a reduction in TSC1-dependent inhibition of mTOR activity, as detected by immunoblotting. In each case, the functional characterisation was consistent with the genetic and phenotypic findings and we concluded that the changes were pathogenic.  The R246K, G305R, G305W, R509Q, G1035S and R1097H amino-acid substitutions did not affect TSC1 function in our assays. However, we concluded that the TSC1 c.737G>A (p.R246K), c.913G>A (p.G305R) and c.913G>T (p.G305W) changes were most likely pathogenic splice-site mutations. The c.737G>A transition was predicted to destroy the splice donor site at the 3′ end of exon 8 and the c.913G>A and c.913G>T substitutions affect the last nucleotide of exon 9, also disrupting the normal splice donor site. The c.1526G>A (p.R509Q), c.3103G>A (p.G1035S) and c.3290G>A (p.R1097H) variants did not appear to affect either TSC1 RNA splicing or TSC1 function. The c.1526G>A change was identified in a foetus suspected of having TSC. However, after birth, the child showed multiple congenital malformations that fitted with VACTERL association, and a normal physical examination of the child did not reveal any signs of TSC. We concluded that this variant is unlikely to cause TSC. The c.3103G>A variant cosegregated with the pathogenic c.671T>G (p.M224R) variant and TSC in a single family.24 We concluded that the p.G1035S substitution was a neutral variant, consistent with previous reports.29, 30 The c.3290G>A change was identified in a child with definite TSC and in one unaffected parent, and we concluded that it was also most likely a rare neutral variant.  Here we demonstrate that specific amino-acid substitutions close to the N-terminal of TSC1 (amino acids 117–224) reduce the steady-state levels of TSC1. The location and the effects of these changes on TSC1 function are very similar to a small number of missense mutations described recently in some cases of bladder cancer,31 suggesting that the pathogenetic mechanisms underlying TSC-associated lesions and tumours of the bladder may be related.  Several studies indicate that TSC1 mutations are associated with a less severe clinical presentation in TSC patients.9, 12, 13, 15 The small number of patients that we identified with a TSC1 missense mutation made it difficult to identify a specific phenotypic spectrum in this group. Nevertheless, the use of functional assays to differentiate between polymorphisms and pathogenic mutations, in TSC and other diseases, will not only facilitate the identification of pathogenic mutations but also help investigate possible genotype–phenotype correlations and provide insight into how specific amino-acid residues contribute to protein function.  
996||More than 50% of transitional cell carcinomas of the bladder show loss of heterozygosity of a region spanning the TSC1 locus at 9q34 and mutations of TSC1 have been identified in 14.5% of tumours. These comprise nonsense mutations, splicing mutations, small deletions and missense mutations. Missense mutations are only rarely found in the germline in TSC disease. Therefore, we have examined six somatic missense mutations found in bladder cancer to determine whether these result in loss of function. We describe loss of function via distinct mechanisms. Five mutations caused mutually exclusive defects at mRNA and protein levels. Of these, two mutations caused pre-mRNA splicing errors that were predicted to result in premature protein truncation and three resulted in markedly reduced stability of exogenous TSC1 protein. Primary tumours with aberrant TSC1 pre-mRNA splicing were confirmed as negative for TSC1 expression by immunohistochemistry. Expression was also significantly reduced in a tumour with a TSC1 missense mutation resulting in diminished protein half-life. A single TSC1 missense mutation identified in a tumour with retained heterozygosity of the TSC1 region on chromosome 9 caused an apparently TSC2- and mTOR-independent localization defect of the mutant protein. We conclude that although TSC1 missense mutations do not play a major role in causation of TSC disease, they represent a significant proportion of somatic loss of function mutations in bladder cancer.  Go to: INTRODUCTION Tuberous Sclerosis Complex (TSC) is an autosomal dominant tumour suppressor gene syndrome with an incidence of 1 in 6000–10 000 births. TSC is characterized by the development of benign growths, called hamartomas, in the kidneys, heart, brain and skin, and patients present clinically with a variety of developmental disorders (1). TSC is caused by mutations affecting either of the tumour suppressor genes TSC1 or TSC2. TSC1 on chromosome 9q34 encodes hamartin (2) and TSC2 on chromosome 16p13.3 encodes tuberin (3). Approximately half of large TSC families show linkage to 9q34 and half to 16p13.3 (4–6). Tumour development in TSC patients is thought to occur as the result of a somatic ‘second-hit’ in either TSC1 or TSC2, according to Knudson’s tumour suppressor model (7). Loss of heterozygosity (LOH) of TSC1 or TSC2 has been reported in some TSC hamartomas, such as renal angiomyolipomas. However, loss of the wild-type allele in brain lesions is rare, suggesting the possibility of tissue-specific haploinsufficiency of TSC genes (8–10).  Co-localization and co-immunoprecipitation of TSC1 and TSC2 in mammalian cells (11,12) and direct binding in yeast two-hybrid assays provide a tentative explanation for the similar disease phenotype in TSC patients with mutations in either TSC1 or TSC2 genes (2,13). Functionally, the TSC1/TSC2 complex is positioned at the centre of multiple growth signalling pathways and is a key integrator of signals controlling protein translation and cell growth (14). Activation of the TSC1/TSC2 complex in growth-limiting conditions attenuates signalling through mTOR via specific GTPase activating protein (GAP) activity of TSC2 towards RHEB (15,16).  While epithelial malignancy is not a common feature of TSC, studies in this laboratory and others have implicated loss of function of TSC1 in bladder tumorigenesis (17–19). Loss of heterozygosity (LOH) for markers on chromosome 9 is observed in more than 50% of bladder tumours of all grades and stages (20) and sub-chromosomal LOH analyses have identified the TSC1 locus at 9q34 as a common critical region of deletion between markers D9S149 and D9S66 (19,21–23). To date, we have screened 154 bladder tumours by fluorescent single strand conformation polymorphism (F-SSCP) analysis and direct sequencing, and found an overall mutation frequency of 14.5%. The mutation spectrum comprises nonsense (35%), missense (26%), frameshift (26%), in-frame deletions (3%) and splicing (10%) mutations (24) (Platt et al., in preparation). In all cases but one, TSC1 missense mutations were tumour-specific somatic events. TSC1 is the only gene on 9q that has been found to be mutated in bladder tumours, and may therefore be the critical gene on this chromosome arm implicated in >50% of all bladder tumours.  Missense mutations of TSC1 have not routinely been confirmed as functionally inactivating in TSC disease, though two recent reports provide evidence that in a few cases these are likely to be disease-causing (25,26). Here we sought to determine whether the TSC1 missense mutations identified in bladder tumours constituted inactivating mutations. We anticipated that discrete amino acid changes of mutant proteins might allow the identification of functionally important residues. Wild-type and mutant TSC1 constructs were retrovirally delivered into TSC1-null bladder tumour cell lines and functionally characterized. All somatic TSC1 missense mutations perturbed TSC1 function by causing aberrant splicing, protein instability or protein mislocalization. Defects were confirmed in primary tumours by RT–PCR analysis of mutant transcripts and immunohistochemical analysis.  Go to: RESULTS Missense mutations of TSC1 identified in bladder tumours  Previously, we identified 8 mutations including 2 missense mutations in a series of 62 bladder tumours (24). Screening of an additional 92 tumours (Platt et al., in preparation) identified an additional 15 mutations of which 4 were missense mutations. In total, therefore, 6 missense mutations have been identified in 154 tumours, representing 26% of all mutations found (Table 1). Mutations were determined as tumour-specific by genotyping of paired tumour and blood samples. 1250C>T (Thr417Ile) was previously described in the germline in TSC disease in Japanese patients, but was not confirmed as causative of TSC (27,28). 1250C>T was also identified in our laboratory in the patient’s constitutional DNA, and the tumour sample retained heterozygosity for microsatellite markers at the TSC1 gene locus (24). Threonine 417 was previously identified as a site of CDK1-dependent phosphorylation (29). To determine the biological significance of this variant, 1250C>T (Thr417Ile) was characterized here alongside tumour-specific missense mutations. Five of six other tumours with TSC1 missense mutations showed LOH for markers at the TSC1 locus (Table 1). There was no relationship between mutation and tumour stage or grade. Missense mutations were predominantly N-terminal but did not localize to a common functional domain (Fig. 1).  Figure 1. Figure 1. Positions of amino acid substitutions in relation to described functional domains of hamartin. Table 1. Table 1. TSC1 missense variants identified in bladder tumours To assess possible functional implications of amino acid substitutions, conservation of missense mutant residues was determined in TSC1 orthologs. His68, Phe158 and Phe216 were conserved among Rattus, Mus, Drosophila, Fugu and Gallus orthologs. His105, His206 and Thr417 differed only in Drosophila, which shares 31% identity with human TSC1. Ser35 differed in Drosophila, Fugu and Gallus orthologs. According to the BLOSUM62 scoring matrix (30), His68Arg and His105Arg substitutions are considered conservative. Ser35Cys, His206Asp and Thr417Ile are less conservative and Phe158Cys and Phe216Asp are least conservative (Table 1).  Re-expression of missense mutant TSC1 proteins in TSC1-null urothelial cells  We anticipated that missense mutations might lead to loss of function at the amino acid level. Thus, our initial approach was to express wild-type and missense mutant TSC1 cDNAs in TSC1-null bladder cell lines and investigate function of the mutant proteins. Missense mutant proteins were C-terminally FLAG- or GFP-tagged, expressed in 97-1 and HCV29 cells and characterized for TSC2 binding activity, and mTOR suppressive activity in nutrient-starved conditions.  Expression of mutant proteins was investigated by immunoblotting following retroviral transduction and selection of neomycin resistant mass cell populations. Expression levels of mutant proteins were markedly different; Ser35Cys, His105Arg, Phe216Asp and Thr417Ile were expressed at high levels similar to wild-type protein, whereas His68Arg and Phe158Cys were much reduced and His206Asp was not detected (Fig. 2A). Repeated independent infections of these two cell lines and of telomerase-immortalized normal human urothelial cells (TERT-NHUC) and assessment of mass populations of cells following selection resulted in entirely reproducible expression levels of all mutant proteins (data not shown). The transcription of missense RNA was confirmed by real time RT–PCR and uniform levels of wild-type and missense transcripts were detected (Fig. 2B). The consistently reduced or absent protein expression of His68Arg and Phe158Cys and His206Asp missense mutant forms despite the presence of RNA expression suggested possible effects of these missense changes on protein stability.  Figure 2. Figure 2. (A) Immunoblot showing levels of wild-type and mutant TSC1-FLAG proteins and endogenous TSC2 in 97-1 cell lines. (B) Measurement of TSC1 RNA levels by real time RT–PCR analysis of wild-type and mutant TSC1-FLAG mRNA transcript levels in 97-1 cell ... Mutant TSC1 proteins retain interaction with TSC2  The interaction between TSC1 and TSC2 appears to be important in maintaining the stability of each of the proteins. TSC1/TSC2 binding specifically augments TSC2 expression by limiting its ubiquitination (31,32). TSC2 GAP activity towards RHEB defines TSC1/2 mediated control of mTOR signalling, and phosphorylation of downstream effectors of mTOR is constitutive and refractory to amino acid withdrawal in cells lacking TSC1 or TSC2 (33–35). Where expressed, missense mutant TSC1 proteins stabilized TSC2 levels in 97-1 cells (Fig. 2A) and co-immunoprecipitated with it (Fig. 3A). However, our data cannot exclude minor effects on interaction or TSC2 stability.  Figure 3. Figure 3. (A) Immunoblot showing TSC1 and TSC2 in 97-1 Neo control and FLAG-tagged wild-type and mutant TSC1 cell line lysates immunoprecipitated with anti-TSC1 and non-specific mouse IgM antibodies. (B) Immunoblot showing expression levels of GFP-tagged wild-type ... While His206Asp-FLAG was undetected in transduced 97-1 cells, we were able to achieve low-level expression of His206Asp-GFP in HCV29 cells, suggesting some stabilizing effect of the GFP tag. TSC2 co-immunoprecipitation and S6 phosphorylation assays were not accurately quantitative, but expression of all missense mutant proteins in TSC1-null cells reduced S6 phosphorylation in amino acid starved conditions, relative to vector alone (Fig. 3B), indicating that none of these mutant forms of TSC1 abolish interaction with TSC2.  Aberrant RNA splicing caused by TSC1 missense mutations  High-level expression and TSC2 binding activity of TSC1 Ser35Cys, His105Arg and Phe216Ala proteins suggested no functional effect of amino acid substitutions caused by 104C>G, 314A>G and 648T>A missense mutations. However, the expression of proteins from exogenous missense cDNAs did not allow the assessment of possible effects of mutations at the pre-mRNA level. We speculated that TSC1 missense mutations may cause loss of function through introduction of splicing errors in mutant transcripts in vivo. Therefore, wild-type and missense mutant TSC1 pre-mRNA sequences were screened for effects of mutations on splice site definition using the neural network algorithm (http://www.fruitfly.org/seq_tools/splice.html).  Interestingly, significant differences were seen between splice site scores of wild-type and 104C>G and 314A>G TSC1 transcripts. The 104C>G mutation, positioned 3 bp upstream of the TSC1 exon 3/4 junction, resulted in a reduced exon 3/4 splice motif score. The 314A>G mutation resulted in the introduction of a high-scoring 5′ donor splice site, immediately upstream of the A/G transversion, by generation of a novel consensus splice motif. No differences in splice site scores were observed between wild-type and 648T>A or 1250C>T transcripts or between wild-type and mutant transcripts that generated low exogenous protein expression.  To examine splicing of missense mutant TSC1 transcripts, fragments spanning the mutation site and flanking intron/exon junctions were amplified from respective tumour cDNAs by RT–PCR and sequenced. An RT–PCR product reproducibly amplified from cDNA of the tumour containing 104C>G showed increased electrophoretic mobility relative to a control fragment amplified from TERT-NHUC cDNA (Fig. 4A). Sequencing of the tumour product revealed use of a cryptic 5′ donor site in exon 4, the adjacent downstream exon to the 104C>G mutant exon (Supplementary Material, Fig. S1). The reduced splice motif score at the exon 3/4 junction was shown to have no effect on exon 3/4 splicing. If translated, this 104C>G mutant transcript would generate 26 new amino acids from an alternate reading frame and truncate prematurely at residue 79.  Figure 4. Figure 4. Semi quantitative RT–PCR analysis of TSC1 RNA in normal urothelial cells and TSC1 mutant tumour samples, showing increased electrophoretic mobility of RT–PCR products amplified from cDNA from tumours containing TSC1 104C>G (A) ... A faster migrating band was also reproducibly amplified from cDNA of the tumour containing 314A>G (Fig. 4B), compared to control TERT-NHUC cDNA. Sequence analysis of PCR products revealed a 50-nucleotide deletion in the transcript generated from the missense allele. The 314A>G mutation created a de novo 5′ donor splice site immediately upstream of 314A>G and resulted in the splicing of 50 nucleotides from the 3′ end of exon 5. The effect seen at the mRNA level was entirely consistent with the prediction made by in silico analysis. If translated, the 314A>G mutant transcript is expected to generate two new C-terminal amino acids and truncate prematurely at residue 107.  Exon skipping through introduction of a de novo 5′ splice site by point mutation is a relatively well-described mechanism of aberrant pre-mRNA splicing (36–38). No normal transcript was amplified from cDNA from tumours containing TSC1 104C>G or 314A>G mutations, suggesting that all splicing occurs via the novel sites. The abundance of missense transcripts appeared lower than normal transcript by semi-quantitative RT–PCR, when standardized to HPRT. However, by real time RT–PCR, TSC1 transcript abundance was relatively higher in tumours with TSC1 missense mutations causing transcript splicing or protein stability defects, than in uncultured or cultured TERT-NHUC, when standardized to SDHA (data not shown).  Missense mutant TSC1 proteins exhibit reduced protein stability  The demonstration of consistently low-level exogenous protein expression, despite uniform mRNA transcript abundance, suggested diminished stability of TSC1 His68Arg, Phe158Cys and His206Asp mutant proteins. By inhibiting protein synthesis with cycloheximide, we determined that His68Arg, Phe158Cys and His206Asp mutant proteins were turned-over relatively faster than wild-type TSC1, in a proteasome-dependent manner (Fig. 5 A and B and data not shown). Moreover, by 35S labelling, we were able to show that His68Arg, Phe158Cys and His206Asp proteins had markedly shorter half-lives than wild-type TSC1 (Fig. 5C).  Figure 5. Figure 5. (A) Immunoblot showing turnover of wild-type and S35C and H68R missense TSC1 proteins in cycloheximide (CHX)-treated cells. Cells were cultured in full growth medium supplemented with 100 µg/ml CHX or DMSO vehicle alone, and lysed at time-points ... Phe216Ala TSC1 protein shows altered localization  Previous studies have described a granular, cytoplasmic localization of endogenous TSC1 in vitro and in vivo and also of overexpressed TSC1 in COS-7 cells (39–41). Localization of monomeric TSC1 and of TSC1 complexed with TSC2 is likely influenced by culture conditions given that components of the Akt-mTOR signalling cascade are membrane localized when activated. In addition, TSC2 is reported to shuttle into the nucleus in a cell cycle and phosphorylation-dependent manner (42–44).  It was anticipated that the characterization of discrete missense amino acid changes may offer insight into potentially mTOR-independent or bladder-specific functions of TSC1. Our results indicated that TSC1 104C>G, 203A>G, 314A>G, 473T>G and 616C>G missense mutations cause loss of function by generic mechanisms of altered message or reduced protein stability. However, sequencing of RT–PCR products amplified from cDNA from the tumour containing the TSC1 648T>A mutation showed no altered splicing of the mutant transcript. Also, at the protein level, Phe216Ala was expressed at high levels similar to wild-type TSC1. The substitution of a phenylalanine residue for an alanine residue constitutes the loss of a high-molecular weight, hydrophobic benzyl group and is assigned a non-conservative –2 BLOSUM62 score. The lack of effect on splicing or protein stability raised the possibility that this mutation may cause a defect in TSC1 protein function per se.  We determined the localization of GFP-tagged mutant proteins in nutrient replete and deficient conditions. Wild-type, Phe216Ala, Ser35Cys, His68Arg and Thr417Ile proteins were compared. In complete growth medium, wild-type TSC1 and Ser35Cys, His68Arg and Thr417Ile mutant proteins showed diffuse punctate cytoplasmic distribution with distinct cytoplasmic foci. In amino acid deficient medium, these proteins became localized almost exclusively to large cytoplasmic bodies. Intriguingly, the Phe216Ala substitution markedly altered the localization of TSC1; Phe216Ala was exclusively cytoplasmic and diffuse in full growth medium and did not redistribute to discrete bodies in amino acid deficient conditions (Fig. 6). However, it was shown to stabilize and to co-immunoprecipitate with endogenous TSC2, and to attenuate growth signalling through mTOR in starved conditions (Fig. 3B). These observations were reproduced in TSC1-transduced 97-1 and HCV29 cell lines and TERT-NHUC and suggest that localization of TSC1 to cytoplasmic foci is not a requirement for TSC2 binding or negative regulation of mTOR. Also, defective localization of Phe216Ala is likely TSC2- and mTOR-independent, possibly suggesting an independent function of TSC1 at cytoplasmic foci.  Figure 6. Figure 6. Localization of wild-type TSC1 (A) and TSC1 Ser35Cys (B), Phe216Ala (C) and Thr417Ile (D) mutant proteins in amino acid-starved 97-1 cells. Cells were cultured in full growth medium on highly optically clear microscopy dishes to sub-confluence and amino ... Unlike the other five tumours with missense mutations, the tumour containing the TSC1 648T>A mutation did not show LOH of 9q, as confirmed by analysis of pure microdissected tumour cell populations (data not shown). Both normal and mutant alleles were detected by sequencing of tumour cDNA.  TSC1 protein expression in bladder tumour tissues  To examine the effects of pre-mRNA splicing defects and protein stability defects caused by missense mutations at the tumour level, TSC1 mutant and wild-type tumours were screened for expression of TSC1 protein by immunohistochemistry. Sensitivity and specificity of a rabbit monoclonal anti-TSC1 antibody was confirmed by staining of paraffin-embedded pellets of TSC1-null HCV29 cells and HCV29 in which wild-type TSC1 had been re-expressed (Fig. 7A and D). Normal ureter showed strong cytoplasmic TSC1 expression in the urothelium (Fig. 7E). Tumours with wild-type TSC1 showed strong cytoplasmic staining (Fig. 7F), and a tumour with a TSC1 73–77Δ 5 small deletion causing premature truncation at residue 27, showed no TSC1 expression (Fig. 7C). Both tumours with homozygous TSC1 missense mutations causing pre-mRNA splicing defects were negative for TSC1 expression (Fig. 7G and H). Figure 7H shows normal urothelium with strong TSC1 staining adjacent to immunonegative TSC1 314A>G mutant tumour cells. The 648T>A (Phe216Ala) mutant tumour showed moderate TSC1 expression consistent with normal stability of the Phe216Ala protein and retention of chromosome 9q heterozygosity in the tumour (Fig. 7I). Of the three missense mutations causing reduced protein stability (TSC1 203A>G, 473T>G and 616C>G), tumour material was available only for the 616C>G (His206Asp) mutant sample. The 616C>G mutation was identified from tumour material resected in 2003, and TSC1 expression was shown to be low in three tumour resections from this patient in successive years (Fig. 7J–L).  Figure 7. Figure 7. TSC1 immunostaining of HCV29 Neo (A) and TSC1 (D) cell pellets, normal ureter (negative (B) and positive (E) antibody controls) and TSC1 73–77Δ 5 (C) and TSC1 wild-type (F) bladder tumours. TSC1 staining of TSC1 missense mutant bladder ... Go to: DISCUSSION We have demonstrated that bladder tumour-derived TSC1 missense mutations result in loss of TSC1 function and that this occurs via distinct mechanisms. An overall TSC1 mutation frequency of ∼14.5% is found in bladder cancer (24) (Platt et al., in preparation) and missense mutations comprise 26% of mutations found to date. The identification of deleterious missense mutations in bladder tumours indicates a causative role of loss of TSC1 function via this mechanism in bladder tumorigenesis. The vast majority of TSC1 mutations in TSC disease are predicted to be protein truncating in nature, and no significant genotype/phenotype correlations have been observed (2,5,45–48). Non-chain terminating TSC1 mutations (missense or in-frame deletions) are rare in TSC disease (27,47,49,50) (www.LOVD.nl/TSC1). Although missense mutations have been reported previously, most have not been confirmed as disease-causing. Several have been revealed as rare polymorphisms or associated with other nonsense mutations in the same patient (46,50). Others have been disregarded as potentially disease-causing on the basis of conservative amino acid changes, or have not been characterized further (27,51). However, a recent publication by Jansen et al. (26) that identified three missense mutations (L916R, M224R and E412V) in affected individuals reported functional analyses on two of these. It was reported that E412V affected RNA splicing. Interestingly, in transfections of constructs of wild-type TSC1 and the M224R variant, the latter showed lower levels of protein expression that were unable to completely suppress S6 phosphorylation, results similar to those described here for missense variants with reduced protein half-life.  We have shown that two of six bladder tumour-derived missense mutations result in pre-mRNA splicing defects, three lead to reduced stability of mutant proteins and intriguingly, one mutation causes a TSC2- and mTOR-independent localization defect of the mutant protein. Wild-type TSC1 showed a granular cytoplasmic distribution in cells in full growth medium and became localized almost exclusively to large cytoplasmic bodies in amino acid starved cells. In contrast, TSC1 was cytoplasmic and diffuse in serum-starved cells. Preliminary results indicated that TSC1 bodies were dynamic, non-aggresomal structures (data not shown). Interestingly, the Phe216Ala substitution abolished the localization of TSC1 to these bodies. As expected from its position outside the recognized TSC2 binding domain, TSC1 Phe216Ala retained TSC2 binding activity and mTOR suppressive activity in amino acid starved conditions, suggesting that localization of TSC1 to cytoplasmic foci was not a requirement for TSC2 binding or for suppression of mTOR signalling. This may also suggest that TSC1 has a separable function at cytoplasmic foci that is independent of TSC2 and independent of negative regulation of mTOR by TSC1/TSC2. However, it is not clear whether the formation of intensely staining bodies in conditions of over-expression of TSC1 and/or TSC2 (39,52) is relevant to the normal physiological condition. Further investigation of the function of Phe216Ala is now required, ideally at levels of expression that are closer to normal and in both TSC1-null cells and those expressing endogenous wild-type TSC1.  Although the missense variant 1250C>T (T417I) was found in the patient’s germline and this patient showed no symptoms of TSC, we included this variant in our analyses as threonine 417 has previously been identified as a site of CDK1-dependent phosphorylation (29). We found no evidence for a functional defect and conclude that this represents a rare polymorphism. As this patient was Japanese, as were both TSC patients in whom this variant was reported previously (27,28), this rare variant may be confined to the Japanese population.  Evidence suggests that cis-acting mutations affecting splicing of some tumour suppressor genes can have causal roles in tumour initiation and progression (53). Predicted and confirmed effects of TSC-related and bladder tumour-derived TSC1 missense changes on pre-mRNA splicing reported here underscore the importance of using RNA-based techniques, together with conventional mutation detection methods, to effectively identify disease-causing mutations. One of the mutations that deleteriously affected splicing (104C>G) had an unexpected effect. The use of a cryptic 5′ donor site in an adjacent downstream exon is a non-conventional splicing event; disease-associated mutations at splice junctions typically result in skipping of the mutant exon (38,54,55). The 104C>G mutation was shown to reduce the exon 3 5′ splice site motif score and to disrupt an enhancer sequence spanning exon 3/4. 104C>G also disrupts a U1 snRNA-binding motif, spanning the 5′ splice site from position –3 to +8 (Supplementary Material, Fig. S1). In combination with a normally low-scoring exon 4 3′ acceptor site, these factors may result in reduced splicing efficiency of introns 3–4. Spliceosome assembly is directed by juxtaposed splicing elements, and were introns 4–5 to splice first, splicing machinery at the 3′ acceptor site of exon 4 may stimulate recruitment of U1 snRNA to possible binding sites in exon 4, and result in use of a cryptic 5′ donor site.  In bladder tumours as in TSC disease, nonsense, deletion and frameshift TSC1 mutations result in premature protein truncation and loss of protein function. We have now shown that missense mutations cause loss of function by aberrant splicing or reduced protein stability. The identification of tumour-specific TSC1 mutations in the context of chromosome 9 LOH argues strongly for a direct role of loss of TSC1 function in the aetiology of these tumours. These data are consistent with TSC1 acting as a tumour suppressor gene in bladder cancer in accordance with Knudsen’s two-hit hypothesis. Biallelic inactivation of TSC1 or TSC2 may not be necessarily required in some TSC-related tumours (9). The discrepancy between frequency of TSC1 mutation and frequency of LOH in the TSC1 gene region in bladder tumours suggests that haploinsufficiency of TSC1 may contribute to tumour development in some cases. LOH of chromosome 9 is a particularly frequent event in bladder cancer and to date, TSC1 is the only gene on 9q found to be mutated in bladder tumours. The contribution of partial loss of TSC1 to clonal expansion of tumour cells with 9q LOH is unknown, and haploinsufficiency remains a possibility in those bladder tumours with 9q LOH and no TSC1 mutation. LOH at the TSC1 locus may accompany another event driving loss of chromosome 9. Deletion of the CDKN2A locus at 9p21, which occurs in up to 50% of bladder tumours (56,57), or of an as yet unidentified chromosome 9 tumour suppressor gene, may constitute such a driving force. Loss of one copy of TSC1 may therefore be an advantageous gratuitous hit or ‘passenger event’ (58).  TSC is not a cancer prone syndrome and TSC lesions very rarely progress to malignancy. That TSC patients do not have an increased risk of developing bladder cancer, or other sporadic cancers, may be explained by the requirement of cumulative genetic insults and the typically late onset of malignant disease. The timing and order of initiating and subsequent genetic events in hamartoma and bladder tumour development is likely to be critical in determining malignant potential. Why TSC1 appears to be involved in bladder cancer and not other epithelial cancers is an unresolved question.  Frequent LOH of 9q is found in other tumour types, including ovarian carcinoma, gallbladder carcinoma, nasopharyngeal carcinoma and non-small cell lung cancer (59–65). However, reports of TSC1 and TSC2 mutation status in sporadic tumours other than bladder are very few. No mutations were observed in sporadic glial and glioneuronal tumours or renal cell carcinomas (66,67). Fifty-three and 39% of lung adenocarcinomas and precursor lesions, respectively, were found to have LOH of 9q (68). Subsequently, a screen of 47 lung adenocarcinomas identified three confirmed TSC1 mutations. However, LOH and mutations were not detected simultaneously (69).  In ovarian carcinoma, gallbladder carcinoma, nasopharyngeal carcinoma and lung adenocarcinoma, LOH or deletion is described in both TSC gene regions (63,68,70,71). If loss of TSC1/2 complex function is the pathogenic effect of loss of TSC1, it may be expected that bladder tumours would also show loss of TSC2 function. In an LOH screen of 16p, we have detected LOH for markers at the TSC2 locus in 16% of bladder tumours (Platt et al., in preparation). It will be important to screen for mutations in the retained copy of TSC2 in cases with LOH to determine whether there is also an involvement of TSC2 or whether there is an important independent role of TSC1 in urothelial cells.  Abstract We have surveyed the mutations of TSC1 and TSC2 from 38 (25 sporadic, 11 familial, and 2 unknown) Japanese patients with tuberous sclerosis complex. In 23 of 38 subjects, we detected 18 new mutations in addition to 4 mutations that had been previously reported. We also found 3 new polymorphisms. The mutations were not clustered on a particular exon in either of the genes. Seven TSC1 mutations found in 3 familial and 4 sporadic cases were on the exons (3 missense, 2 nonsense point mutations, a 1-base insertion, and a 2-bp deletion). Fifteen TSC2 mutations were found in 5 familial cases, 10 sporadic cases, and 1 unknown case. The 12 mutations were on the exons (8 missense, 1 nonsense point mutations, a 1-bp insertion, a 5- bp deletion, and a 4-bp replacement) and 3 point mutations were on the exon–intron junctions. Although the patients with TSC2 mutations tend to exhibit relatively severe mental retardation in comparison to those with TSC1 mutations, a genotype–phenotype correlation could not yet be established. The widespread distribution of TSC1/TSC2 mutations hinders the development of a simple diagnostic test, and the identification of individual mutations does not provide the prediction of prognosis. Key words Tuberous sclerosis complex • TSC1 gene • TSC2 gene • Hamartin • Tuberin • Mutation Introduction Tuberous sclerosis complex (TSC) is an autosomal dominant disease with an estimated prevalence of 1 in 10,000 in the Caucasian population and 1 in 31,000 in the Japanese population (Ohno et al. 1981; Gomez 1988). Multiple organs are affected in TSC, including the central nervous system (mental retardation, epilepsy), skin (facial angiofibroma, shagreen patches, hypopigmented macules, periungual fibromas), heart (cardiac rhabdomyomas), and kidney (cysts, angiomyolipoma). There are two causative genes of TSC. The TSC1 (hamartin) is located on 9q34 and consists of 23 exons. The TSC2 (tuberin) is located on 16p13.3 and consists of 41 exons (European Chromosome 16 Tuberous Sclerosis Consortium 1993; Van Slegtenhorst et al. 1997). Loss of heterozygosity (LOH) of either TSC1 or TSC2 in the affected tissues indicates that both act as a tumor suppressor (Green et al. 1994; Henske et al. 1995, 1996; Sepp et al. 1996). Multiple isotypes of tuberin are generated by alternative splicing at two different exons (exon 25 and 31) of TSC2 (Xiao et al. 1997). Since the identification of the TSC1/ TSC2 genes, the mutations in Caucasian TSC patients have been extensively surveyed (Kumar et al. 1995 a,b; Vrtel et al. 1996; Wilson et al. 1996; Bajek et al. 1997; Jones et al. 1997; Maheshwar et al. 1997; Van Slegtenhorst et al. 1997; Au et al. 1997, 1998). The mutations in Japanese TSC patients, however, have remained unknown. In the present study, we surveyed the mutations in Japanese patients and assessed the relationship between the mutations and clinical symptoms. Materials and methods Patients and sample collection Thirty-eight (25 sporadic, 11 familial, and 2 unknown) Japanese TSC patients were clinically diagnosed according to the criteria (Gomez 1988). In some cases, ultrasound renogra392 phy, MRI, and CT brain scan gave supportive evidence for the diagnosis. Genomic DNAs were prepared from the blood samples as described (Nanba et al. 1995). Healthy Japanese volunteer DNA as normal controls were extracted by the Nucleic Acid Purification System (MagExtractor MFX-2000; Toyobo, Osaka, Japan) from 100íl blood. Polymerase chain reaction-single strand conformation polymorphism (PCR-SSCP) analysis All coding exons of TSC1 and TSC2 were analyzed for every patient. Sets of PCR primers for the 41 exons of TSC2 were designed based on the TSC2 sequence, except for the primers for exon 13 and 25, which were kindly obtained by Dr. J.R. Sampson at the University of Wales, Cardiff, UK (Maheshwar et al. 1996) (Table 1). The primer information for the 21 coding exons of the TSC1 gene was obtained from Dr. O Hino in the Department of Experimental Pathology, Cancer Institute, Tokyo, Japan, and Dr. D.J. Kwiatkowski in Brigham and Womens’ Hospital, Boston, USA, except for the primers for exon 9 (CACTGAGTTGACACTCTGAAG and CTGAACTAAGTCTTACTCCAG), which were originally designed. PCR contained 25ng of the genomic DNA as a template, 10pmol of each primer, 0.25íM of each dNTP, 0.1 unit of Ampli Taq Gold (Perkin-Elmer, Norwalk, CT, USA), and a buffer in a total volume of 5íl. Cycling conditions were as follows: an initial denaturation at 95°C for 10 min followed by 30 cycles of denaturation at 95°C for 1 min, annealing at 65°C for 1min and elongation at 72°C for 1min, with a final extension at 72°C for 5min. All the PCR products were analyzed on 1.5% agarose gel. SSCP analysis was performed as described (Orita et al. 1989; Yuasa et al. 1997). Using a minigel (10 3 10 cm), the samples were analyzed under four different electrophoresis conditions, in a combination of two sets of gel mixtures (12% polyacrylamide gel with or without 5% glycerol) and two temperature conditions (4°C or 22°C). Table 1. Primers for TSC2 gene analysis Exon Product size (bp) 1 F: AAGGTTATGCCCACCAGAGA; R: AGACACAGGTAGCTCACTCA 296 2 F: CACTGGCCCCTTTTTCTTCT; R: CTCTAGTAGCTCAACTGGAT 150 3 F: CTTGGAGAGCACATCCTCAC; R: CAGCCTGACGTCACCCATCC 195 4 F: CTGATCCTGTGGCTTTTGTC; R: AGAAACCTCCAACCCAAGGT 199 5 F: TCGCAAACTGCGCGACTTCT; R: CAGAACAGGATCTCAATTCT 173 6 F: GACTGAGCTCGGTGCTCCCT; R: TGAAATGGGCCGGCCCTGGG 109 7 F: GAAGGAGGTGGGAAGGAAG; R: CATCCATGTGCTCTCAGGAA 278 8 F: CTTTGGGAGGAGATGGTGG; R: ATGTGTGCGTTGGTAAGGGA 286 9 F: CGTCTCTCTGGGGAACACTT; R: TCACTGCACACAGAAACCGC 176 10 F: TGCTGGCCGGGCTCGTGTTC; R: TGCTCCCCGGAGCTCCTGCC 198 11 F: GCCTGTGTCATCGTGCCTGG; R: AAAGGCCCCACCCAGGAGGG 194 12 F: CAACACCGGCTCTTCTTTTG; R: AGGCAAGGCTACAGAGGACC 153 13a F: GGGCTGTGGCGGGCACTC; R: AGAGGTCCGGCAGACCGAAGTC 245 14 F: TTGGCCTCCCTTGTGCCTGT; R: GCCCCGGGTACAACGGCTCT 203 15 F: GACTCAGAACCATGAGCCTG; R: AACAGACTCCAACACAACGC 251 16 F: CGTGGTGAGCTGCGTCCTCT; R: ACTGCGTGCGCAACCCCAGC 178 17 F: GGCTTTCACCATCCTCTTCC; R: TCATGGGCCGTGGGCAGGTC 160 18 F: GCCTCAGCTGCTTCTCTTGC; R: AACGTGGGACGGATGGTCCC 216 19 F: CCTGACGCCTCCTCTCCTCG; R: CCCAACCCCAGGCCGGCATG 185 20 F: TCATGCCTGGATTTGGTCAT; R: TCAAGCTCGCCTGCTCTGAC 187 21 F: GGGCCTGAGGTGTCCTGTCT; R: AGGTGCAGTGCTGCAGGGCG 246 22 F: GGCTCCCTGACCACCTCTCC; R: ACAGGGCCTGGGGCGACCAC 148 23 F: GTGCCAGCCCCCTTCTCATC; R: ACAGCCTTCACCGCCCTGAG 152 24 F: TCACTGTCTGGGTGTGCTC; R: TGCCCTGCCTCACATACTC 260 25a F: CCCTCCACTGGCTTGTTCTCC; R: CGGGCAAGACGATGAGGTCAT —b 26 F: CCTGGTCACGGCCTCTCCCT; R: CCAGCCCTGTAGTGCCGCCT 213 27 F: GGTTTCACGCTCCCTGTCTT; R: GGAGGAAAGGAAGGTGCAGT 200 28 F: ACCCTGTGCGTGGGATTCTC; R: AGGTGGCTGGGGCCAAGGCT 163 29 F: CCTCATGCCCGTCTTCTTC; R: AGATGGCGCTCAGGCCAC 267 30 F: AAGGTAGTCTGCCGCCTCCG; R: CCAAGGCCCGCCATGCCACT 251 31 F: CGTCGACACGGCCTTCCCTT; R: ACCGCTTCCCTCTGAGAGGC 118 32 F: AGCAGCCCCGTCTGTGTCCT; R: GTCCAGGCTCTGAGCCACAC 171 33 1F: CTCTTTGGGATGGTCCTTTC; 1R: CTGTGACCGGGCCTTAACCT 275 33 2F: CCTGGGGACAAGGCCGACGT; 2R: CCCGCCCGGAAGCAAGAGGC 317 34 F: CCACCATCCCCTCCCTGT; R: TAGCCAGAGCCCTCTGCAA 206 35 F: CTCTGGCTAAGCTCCCTGT; R: TGAGCACTTCATGCTGTAGG 326 36 F: GGGAGTGATGCCACCCTG; R: ATGGGAGCCGTGCCCTGA —b 37 F: CATCCGGCCCTGCTCACCCT; R: GCCTCACTGACGGCCCTCAC 187 38 F: TGACCCTTTCTCTTGTCCGG; R: TCTGCACTGCAGCCCCACCC 131 39,40 F: TGGCGTGACCACCAAGTCTC; R: GCTGAGGAGCCCCATATTCC 325 41 F: CAGACTTACTGCCCAAGCCGCCT; R: CCCCGCACCAAGCAGACAAA 342 a Data were kindly provided by Dr. J.R. Sampson (University of Wales, UK) b The exact sizes of the PCR products were not known 393 Sequencing Variant bands were reamplified and subcloned into pGEMT Vector (Promega, Madison, WI, USA). The DNA sequences were determined using the Thermo Sequenase Fluorescent Labeled Primer Cycle Sequencing Kit (Amersham, Buckinghamshire, England) with Cy-5-labeled M13 universal or reversal primers and ALFred Automatic Sequencer (Pharmacia Biotech, Tokyo, Japan). At least ten independent clones of each PCR product were sequenced in both directions. The sequence data were analyzed by Genetyx computer software (Software Development, Tokyo, Japan). Results SSCP analysis A total of 25 variants were detected by SSCP analysis (Fig. 1) from 23 patients (60% of the total 38 patients). Seven variants of TSC1 gene were detected in 3 familial cases and 4 sporadic ones. Fifteen variants of TSC2 gene were detected in 5 familial cases, 10 sporadic cases, and one unknown case. L574L of TSC1 and I531I of TSC2 genes were considered to be polymorphisms because the point mutations did not cause amino acid substitution. M322T of TSC1 was detected in the normal controls (6 of 80) and was supposed to represent a polymorphism (Table 2A). All other missense mutations were not detected in 60 or 100 normal controls. Any DNA sample from the parents was not available except for P28. Mutations in TSC1 gene Two nonsense, two frame shift, and three missense mutations were located in various exons of the gene. Two mutations (R509X, Q654E) in three patients were located in exon 15, and the R509X was found both in a sporadic patient (P26) and a familial patient (P3). Two mutations (W676X and T417I) were found in one patient (P31). Mutations in TSC2 gene One nonsense, 3 frame shift, and 8 missense mutations were identified in 16 patients (Table 2B). The two single nucleotide substitutions (2760 1 1 G to A, 5179 2 1 G to T) of an exon–intron junction were predicted to cause a splicing error. Although a substitution (5178 1 5 G to A) in the intron was not in the consensus sequence of the splicing, the mutation was located 5bp distant from the exon and was not detected in 100 normal controls. The mutation might cause a splicing error. L717R in a patient with pulmonary tuberous sclerosis was reported previously (Zhan et al. 1999). Both the V769E mutation (P2 and P21) and R1459X mutation (P6 and P8) were detected in 2 unrelated sporadic patients. Two missense mutations (H137R and D647N) Fig. 1. PCR-SSCP analysis of the TSC1/TSC2 genes. Arrows indicate the aberrant bands found in the patients’ samples. C, control samples from healthy subjects; P, patients’ samples 394 were found in the same patient (P32). P1657L in P28 was confirmed to be a de novo mutation by examination of the parents’ samples. Clinical symptoms and mutation types The clinical symptoms and the gene mutations are summarized in Table 3. The number of the patients with mental retardation (1 and 11) in TSC2 was significantly larger than that in TSC1 (ø2 5 4.8, P 5 0.0285). The severity of mental retardation of the patients with TSC1 mutations appeared to be milder than that of the patients with TSC2 mutations. Complete information on renal and cardiac involvements was not available and could not be assessed. None of the mutation types (missense, nonsense, frame shift, and splicing) appeared to be correlated with a specific clinical symptom. In particular, the R509X mutation in TSC1 was detected in two patients, and the severity of mental retardation in these patients were quite different. Discussion Mutations in a given gene may be screened by various methods such as Southern blot analysis, SSCP, heteroduplex analysis, protein truncation test, and RT-PCR followed by SSCP (Kumar et al. 1995a,b; Vrtel et al. 1996; Wilson et al. 1996; Bajek et al. 1997; Jones et al. 1997; Maheshwar et al. 1997; Au et al. 1997, 1998). In the present study, we employed SSCP to survey the mutations of TSC1 and TSC2 genes because the method is simple enough to cover the multiple numbers of exons. To increase the mutation detection rate of SSCP, we used four electrophoresis conditions by a combination of different sets of temperature and glycerol content of the gel. Our mutation detection rate was 60% (23 of 38), which is comparable with those in other reports (Jones et al. 1997; Van Slegtenhorst et al. 1997; Au et al. 1998). There are several possible explanations for the failure to detect of TSC1/TSC2 mutations in the 15 patients. First, it can be false negative. One report showed that the SSCP Table 2A. Mutations in TSC1 Type of Nucleotide Patient Amino acid change Location mutation alteration S/F* 46 216PheFS-216X(a) exon 7 Frame shift 866delTT F 11 311SerFS-340X exon 10 Frame shift 1210insT F 31 T417l exon 12 Missense 1471 CtoT S 26,3 R509X(b) exon 15 Nonsense 1746 CtoT F,S 23 Q654E(b) exon 15 Missense 2181 CtoG S 31 W676X exon 16 Nonsense 2249 GtoA S 12 T899S exon 21 Missense 2918 CtoG S 46,27,3 L574L exon 15 Polymorphism 1947 TtoC 17,34,36 M322T exon 10 Polymorphism 1186 TtoC Table 2B. Mutations in TSC2 Type of Nucleotide Patient Mutation Location mutation alteration S/F* 32 H137R Exon 4 Missense 428 AtoG S 48 238LeuFS-337X Exon 7 Frame shift 725 insT S 30 F320L Exon 9 Missense 978 TtoG 43 337GluFS-351X Exon 10 Frame shift 1029GATCdel, CATGGCAT ins F 22 R611Q(c) Exon 16 Missense 1850 GtoA F 47 597HisFS-614X Exon 16 Frame shift 1808delACTAC S 32 D647N Exon 17 Missense 1957 AtoG S 1 L717R Exon 19 Missense 2168 TtoG S 21,2 V769E Exon 20 Missense 2324 TtoA F,S 33 — Intron 24 Splicing 2760 1 1 GtoA S 27 V963M Exon 25 Missense 2905 GtoA S 6,8 R1459X Exon 33 Nonsense 4393 CtoT S,S 28 P1657L(d) Exon 38 Missense 5042 CtoT S 24 — Intron 39 Splicing 5178 1 5 GtoA F 41 — Intron 39 Splicing 5179 2 1 GtoT F 33 1531l Exon 14 Polymorphism 1611 CtoT *S, sporadic; F, familial The initiator ATG begins at base 222 of TSC1 and at base 19 for TSC2 The original amino acid and its position in the protein (numbered from the initiator Met as 1) are followed by a new amino acid for missense mutations, and by X for nonsense mutation a,b The identical change was reported by Van Slegtenhorst et al. (1997) c The identical change was reported by Wilson et al. (1996) d The identical change was reported by Maheshwar et al. (1997) 395 method to detect a point mutation on a 250-bp DNA fragment was 63% effective (Sheffield et al. 1993). Second, it may be true negative in those cases in which the mutation lies outside of the coding sequence, either in the 59-regulatory elements, within the intronic sequences, or in the 39- UTR. In addition, a large-scale rearrangement of genomic DNA may yield true negative results in the SSCP of the coding exons. Although there is no report of a large-scale mutation in TSC1, there are indeed some in TSC2 (Jones et al. 1997; The European Chromosome 16 Tuberous Sclerosis Consortium 1993; Au et al. 1997; Van Slegtenhorst et al. 1997). The mutation surveys of TSC1/TSC2 genes in Caucasian TSC patients revealed no clustering of the mutation in either gene (Wilson et al. 1996; Jones et al. 1997; Van Slegtenhorst et al. 1997; Au et al. 1998). In accordance with these previous findings, the 22 mutations (18 new and 4 reported) found in this study were distributed on various exons and there was no clustering of the mutations. Again in accordance with the previous findings, there was no obvious relationship between the type and location of the mutation and the clinical symptoms. However, the patients with TSC2 mutations appeared to have more severe mental retardation compared with the patients with TSC1 mutations. The same tendency has been noted (Jones et al. 1997). It is therefore at least clear that the clinical phenotype cannot be predicted from the genotype. Because of the heterogeneity of the mutations, it also appears impossible at present to develop a simple diagnostic test for TSC. Acknowledgements We thank Dr. Satoko Kumada, Dr. Akira Uchiyama (Tokyo Metropolitan Fuchu Ryoiku Center), Dr. Youich Sakakihara, Dr. Hidekazu Takeshita (Departement of Pediatrics, Graduate School of Medicine, University of Tokyo), Dr. Khotaro Table 3. Clinical data of mutation detected patients Patient Mental White Subependymal number Age Sex retardation AF macules nodules Seizures S/F Mutations Location of mutation 46 9 M 1 2 1 1 1 F Frame shift TSC1 exon 7 11 7 F 6 1 1 1 1 F Frame shift TSC1 exon 10 31 8 F 1 n.d. 1 1 1 S Missense/nonsense TSC1 exon 12; TSC1 exon 16 3 32 F 11 n.d. n.d. n.d. n.d. S Nonsense TSC1 exon 15 26 21 M 2 2 1 1 2 F Nonsense TSC1 exon 15 23 21 M 1 2 1 1 1 S Missense TSC1 exon 15 12 32 F 2 1 1 1 1 S Missense TSC1 exon 21 32 2 M n.d. n.d. 1 1 1 S Missenses TSC2 exon 4; TSC2 exon 17 48 24 M 11 1 1 1 1 S Frame shift TSC2 exon 7 30 nd nd n.d. n.d. n.d. n.d. n.d. n.d. Missense TSC2 exon 9 43 8 M 11 1 1 1 1 F Frame shift TSC2 exon 10 22 6 F 2 2 1 1 1 F Missense TSC2 exon 16 47 6 F 1 1 1 1 1 S Frame shift TSC2 exon 16 1 17 F 2 1 1 1 1 S Missense TSC2 exon 19 21 44 F 11 1 1 n.d. 1 F Missense TSC2 exon 20 2 32 M 11 1 1 1 1 S Missense TSC2 exon 20 33 48 M 11 n.d. n.d. n.d. 1 S Splicing TSC2 intron 24 27 13 M 2 2 1 1 1 F Missense TSC2 exon 25 6 8 M 11 n.d. n.d. n.d. n.d. F Nonsense TSC2 exon 33 8 9 F 11 1 1 1 1 S Nonsense TSC2 exon 33 28 3 F 1 n.d. 1 1 1 S Missense TSC2 exon 38 24 12 M 2 2 1 1 1 F Splicing TSC2 intron 39 41 7 M 2 1 1 1 1 F Splicing TSC2 intron 39 n.d., information not available; AF, angiofibroma; S, sporadic; F, familial Izumi, Dr. Masahiro Nakagawa (Third Department of Internal Medicine, Faculty of Medicine, Kagoshima University), Dr. Ryutaro Kira (Department of Pediatrics, Kyushu University), Dr. Hitoshi Sejima (Department of Pediatrics, Shimane Medical University), Dr. Masahito Miyazaki (Department of Pediatrics, School of Medicine, Tokushima University), Dr. Akira Kuramochi (Department of Dermatology, Saitama Medical School), and Dr. Sadahisa Ohta (Department of Neurosurgery, Tokyo Medical and Dental University) for collecting the samples of the TSC patients. This work was supported by the Ministry of Health and Welfare of Japan by a special grant for neurocutaneous disease, and by the Ministry of Education, Science, Sport and Culture of Japan by a grant-in-aid for scientific research.  Twenty-seven Japanese patients with the tuberous sclerosis complex (TSC), consisting of 23 sporadic and 4 familial cases, were tested for mutations in the TSC1 and TSC2 genes, using single-strand conformational polymorphism analysis and direct sequencing. Four possible pathogenic mutations were found in the TSC1 gene, including three frame shifts and a nonsense mutation in a familial case. All mutations were expected to result in a truncated hamartin gene product. The TSC2 gene analysis identified six possible pathogenic mutations only in the sporadic cases, including two frame shifts, one in-frame deletion, and three missense mutations. Two of the TSC2 mutations were expected to result in a truncated tuberin gene product. These results of the Japanese TSC patients were compatible with the reports from Europe and the United States, i.e., (1) TSC1 mutations are rarer in sporadic cases than in familial cases, (2) substantial numbers of sporadic cases arise from mutations in the TSC2 gene, and (3) mutations of the TSC1 gene may cause premature truncation of hamartin.  
997||Tuberous sclerosis complex (TSC) is an autosomal dominant disorder characterised by the development of hamartomas in a variety of organs and tissues. The disease is caused by mutations in either the TSC1 gene on chromosome 9q34 or the TSC2 gene on chromosome 16p13.3. The TSC1 and TSC2 gene products, TSC1 and TSC2, interact to form a protein complex that inhibits signal transduction to the downstream effectors of the mammalian target of rapamycin (mTOR). Here we investigate the effects of putative TSC1 missense mutations identified in individuals with signs and/or symptoms of TSC on TSC1–TSC2 complex formation and mTOR signalling. We show that specific amino-acid substitutions close to the N-terminal of TSC1 reduce steady-state levels of TSC1, resulting in the activation of mTOR signalling and leading to the symptoms of TSC.  Keywords: tuberous sclerosis complex, TSC1, TSC2 Go to: Introduction Tuberous sclerosis complex (TSC) is an autosomal dominant disorder characterised by the development of hamartomas in a variety of organs and tissues, including the brain, skin and kidneys.1, 2  Mutations in either the TSC1 gene on chromosome 9q343 or the TSC2 gene on chromosome 16p13.34 cause TSC. The TSC1 and TSC2 gene products, TSC1 and TSC2, interact to form a protein complex. TSC2 contains a GTPase-activating protein domain and the TSC1–TSC2 complex acts on the rheb GTPase to prevent the rheb-GTP-dependent stimulation of cell growth through the mammalian target of rapamycin (mTOR).5 In cells lacking either TSC1 or TSC2, the downstream targets of mTOR, including p70 S6 kinase (S6K) and ribosomal protein S6, are constitutively phosphorylated.6, 7 The identification of the role of the TSC1–TSC2 complex in regulating mTOR activity has made it possible to compare TSC1 and TSC2 variants found in the normal population with variants identified in individuals with symptoms of TSC. The effects of amino-acid changes on TSC1–TSC2 complex formation, on the activation of rheb GTPase activity by the complex and on the phosphorylation status of S6K and S6 can be determined.8  Comprehensive screens for mutations at both the TSC1 and TSC2 loci have been performed in several large cohorts of TSC patients, and a wide variety of different pathogenic mutations have been described.9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15 Although ∼20% of the mutations identified in the TSC2 gene are missense changes, missense mutations in the TSC1 gene appear much less frequently. One simple explanation for this observation is that TSC1 missense mutations are rare because the majority of TSC patients have a mutation in the TSC2 gene. According to the TSC1 mutation database,16 22 putative missense mutations have been identified in TSC patients. However, only one of these is a confirmed de novo mutation. Here, we investigate the effects of 10 TSC1 missense changes (c.350T>C (p.L117P), c.539T>C (p.L180P), c.572T>A (p.L191H), c.671T>G (p.M224R), c.737G>A (p.R246K), c.913G>A (p.G305R), c.913G>T (p.G305W), c.1526G>A (p.R509Q), c.3103G>A (p.G1035S) and c.3290G>A (p.R1097H)) on TSC1–TSC2 function. We compared these TSC1 variants with wild-type TSC1 and three truncation variants: c.379_381delTGT (p.128delV), c.593_595delACT (p.N198F199delinsI) and c.2075C>T (p.R692X). Our analysis demonstrates that TSC1 missense mutations reduce steady-state levels of TSC1, resulting in increased mTOR activity and leading to the symptoms of TSC.  Go to: Materials and methods Patient characteristics  Samples from patients with either a putative or definite diagnosis of TSC were received for mutation analysis. Details on clinical symptoms were obtained from the treating physicians who were sent a standardised clinical evaluation form (see Supplementary Table 1).  Mutation analysis  DNA was extracted from peripheral blood using standard techniques. Mutation analysis was performed as described earlier,13 or by direct sequence analysis of all TSC1 and TSC2 coding exons and exon/intron boundaries. In addition, both genes were analysed using the multiplex ligation-dependent probe amplification assay (MRC Holland, Amsterdam, The Netherlands).  To investigate whether the identified changes had an effect on splicing, three different splice-site prediction programs were used,17, 18, 19 as described earlier.13  Generation of constructs and antisera  Expression constructs encoding C-terminal YFP- and myc-tagged TSC1 variants were derived using the QuikChange site-directed mutagenesis kit (Stratagene, La Jolla, CA, USA). In each case, the complete open reading frame of the mutated construct was verified by sequence analysis. The other constructs used in this study have been described earlier.8, 20, 21 Polyclonal rabbit antisera specific for human TSC1 and TSC2 have been described earlier.21 Other antibodies were purchased from Cell Signaling Technology (Danvers, MA, USA).  Functional analysis of TSC1 variants  Expression of TSC1 variants in transfected cells Human embryonal kidney (HEK) 293T cells seeded into 6-cm diameter dishes were transfected with a 1:1 mixture of the TSC1 and TSC2 expression constructs using Lipofectamine Plus (Invitrogen, Carlsbad, CA, USA), following the manufacturer's instructions. Two days after transfection, the cells were lysed in 50 m Tris-HCl (pH 8.0), 100 m NaCl, 50 m NaF, 0.5 m EDTA and 1% Triton X-100 plus protease inhibitors (Roche, Basel, Switzerland) and separated into supernatant and pellet fractions by centrifugation at 10 000 g for 10 min at 4°C as described earlier.22 Wild-type TSC1 and the TSC1 variants were immunoprecipitated from the supernatant fractions by incubation with a monoclonal antibody against the C-terminal myc epitope tag for 90 min at 4°C before incubation with Protein G beads (GE Healthcare, Uppsala, Sweden). After gentle agitation for 90 min at 4°C, the beads were washed three times with a >50-fold excess of lysis buffer. The immunoprecipitated proteins were detected by immunoblotting. Blots were developed using enhanced chemiluminescent detection (GE Healthcare).8  Immunoblot analysis of S6K T389 phosphorylation in cells overexpressing TSC1 variants HEK 293T cells were transfected with a 4:2:1 mixture of the TSC1, TSC2 and S6K expression constructs. A total of 1.75 μg DNA was diluted in 200 μl Dulbecco's modified Eagle's medium (DMEM) containing 7 μg polyethyleneimine (Polysciences, Warrington, PA, USA). Where necessary, an empty expression vector (pcDNA3; Invitrogen) was added to make up the total amount of DNA. After 15 min at room temperature, the DNA/polyethyleneimine complexes were added to 80% confluent cells in 3.5-cm diameter dishes. After 4 h at 37°C, the transfection mixture was replaced with DMEM containing 10% foetal calf serum. Twenty-four hours after transfection, the cells were harvested and analysed by immunoblotting as before or by near infrared fluorescent detection on an Odyssey™ Infrared Imager (169 μm resolution, medium quality with 0 mm focus offset) (Li-Cor Biosciences, Lincoln, NE, USA). The integrated intensities of the protein bands were determined using the Odyssey software (default settings with background correction; 3-pixel width border average method). The mean ratios of the T389-phosphorylated S6K signal to the total S6K signal (T389/S6K) and the total TSC2 signal to the total TSC1 signal (TSC2/TSC1) were determined relative to wild-type TSC1 from at least three independent experiments (wild-type T389/S6K and TSC2/TSC1 ratios=1).  Immunofluorescent detection of S235/236 phosphorylation of ribosomal protein S6 in TSC1-deficient cells Tsc1−/− mouse embryo fibroblasts (MEFs)7 were transfected with expression constructs encoding wild-type TSC1 or the TSC1 variants, using Lipofectamine Plus (Invitrogen), following the manufacturer's instructions. Twenty-four hours after transfection, S6 (S235/236) phosphorylation in the transfected cells was detected by immunofluorescent microscopy using a rabbit polyclonal antibody specific for S235/236-phosphorylated S6.23 TSC1 variants were identified either directly (for C-terminal-tagged TSC1-YFP variants) or with a mouse monoclonal antibody against the myc epitope tag (for C-terminal-tagged TSC1-myc variants). If possible, at least 50 cells expressing each TSC1 variant were counted per experiment and the number of cells showing a clear reduction in S6 (S235/236) phosphorylation was noted. The mean proportions of expressing cells with reduced S6 phosphorylation were calculated from at least three independent experiments.  Go to: Results Patient characteristics and mutation analysis  The TSC1 c.350T>C (p.L117P) change was detected in two generations of a family with TSC (Figure 1a). The index patient (I:1) had epilepsy since the age of 22 years and fulfilled the diagnostic criteria for definite TSC, with facial angiofibroma, ungual fibroma, hypomelanotic macules, a shagreen patch and cerebral white matter migration lines. No mental disability was reported. The youngest child (II:2) had the c.350T>C change. Despite being somewhat hyperactive, this child developed normally until 4 years of age when epileptic seizures occurred and development stagnated. The child is now severely mentally retarded. No information was available about other signs of TSC. The eldest child (II:1), who could not yet be tested for the c.350T>C change, suffered severe anoxia at birth and has severe infantile encephalopathy with spastic tetraplegia and epilepsy.  Figure 1 Figure 1 Pedigrees of the investigated families with TSC. Arrows indicate the index cases. Open symbols indicate no signs or symptoms of TSC; black symbols indicate individuals with definite TSC; hatched symbols indicate individuals with possible TSC. A question ... The TSC1 c.671T>G (p.M224R) and TSC1 c.3103G>A (p.G1035S) changes were identified in two generations of a family with TSC24 (Figure 1b). The index case (II:3) had definite TSC with multiple shagreen patches, hypomelanotic macules, ungual fibromas, dental pits, epilepsy and severe mental disability. One parent (I:2) and both siblings (II:1 and II:2) of the index case also fulfilled the diagnostic criteria for definite TSC. Individual I:2, who was seizure-free and of below-average intelligence (IQ 73), had skin lesions pathognomonic for TSC. Individual II:1, who was of normal intelligence (IQ 94), had seizures, cortical tubers and multiple TSC skin lesions. Individual II:2 had epilepsy, below-average intelligence (IQ 67) and multiple TSC skin lesions. All the affected individuals in this family were heterozygous for the c.671T>G and c.3103G>A changes. Three affected individuals (I:2, II:1 and II:2) were heterozygous for a polymorphism in the TSC2 gene (TSC2 c.1276-32C>G). The index case was homozygous for the wild-type TSC2 1276-32C allele, consistent with TSC segregating with a mutation at the TSC1 locus in this family.  The TSC1 c.539T>C (p.L180P) change was detected in three generations of a family with TSC (Figure 1c). Individual I:2 had an ungual fibroma as the only reported sign of TSC. Individual II:2 had epilepsy, no mental disability, skin signs typical for TSC and a subependymal giant cell astrocytoma as well as other brain lesions consistent with a definite diagnosis of TSC. Individual II:3, the half-sibling of II:2, had typical TSC-associated skin lesions and possible mild mental retardation. Individual II:4, the other half-sibling of II:2, had a history of seizures during puberty and some skin tags, not typical of TSC. Individual III:1, the child of II:2, had epilepsy, and typical TSC-associated skin and brain lesions. Individual III:2, the sibling of III:1, had multiple cardiac rhabdomyoma and Wolff–Parkinson–White syndrome. No mental disability was reported for either individual III:1 or III:2. TSC did not cosegregate with markers mapping close to the TSC2 locus on chromosome 16p13.3, and no candidate TSC2 mutation was identified in the index case.  The TSC1 c.572T>A (p.L191H) change was identified in an individual who met the clinical criteria for definite TSC, including typical skin, heart and brain lesions. The individual had a history of seizures but no mental disability was reported. The c.572T>A change was absent in the individual's parents and child (Figure 1d). None of these individuals showed any signs of TSC.  Two TSC patients, one Finnish and one Dutch, were identified with the TSC1 c.737G>A (p.R246K) change. No information was available on the parents of either of these two individuals. The Finnish individual had typical TSC-associated skin, brain and kidney lesions. No mental disability or history of seizures was reported. The Dutch individual was also reported to have definite TSC. The sibling of this individual did not have any signs of TSC and did not carry the c.737G>A change.  The TSC1 c.1526G>A (p.R509Q) change was identified in a child of African origin, suspected of having TSC due to an echodensity that was detected prenatally in the septum of the heart. After birth, physical examination of the child did not reveal any signs of TSC but multiple congenital malformations that fitted with VACTERL (vertebral anomalies, atresia, cardiac malformations, tracheoesophageal fistula, renal anomalies and limb anomalies) association were identified. The same c.1526G>A change was identified in one of the parents. Neither parent reported any signs of TSC.  The TSC1 c.3290G>A (p.R1097H) change was identified in a child with cardiac rhabdomyoma who subsequently developed epilepsy at the age of 3 months. An MRI scan of the brain showed multiple subependymal nodules, cortical tubers and white matter abnormalities. This individual fulfilled the diagnostic criteria for definite TSC, with angiomyolipoma and multiple skin lesions. The c.3290G>A change was also identified in one of the parents; neither parent showed any signs of TSC.  The TSC1 c.379_381delTGT (p.128delV) change was detected in a child with epilepsy and a definite diagnosis of TSC (multiple skin signs, subependymal nodules and angiomyolipoma). No mental disability was reported and no information was available on the phenotypic or genetic status of the parents. The same change has been reported in another unrelated TSC patient.25 The TSC1 c.593_595delACT (p.N198F199delinsI), c.913G>A (p.G305R) and c.913G>T (p.G305W) missense changes have been reported earlier to cosegregate with TSC in three independent families.15, 26  In all the above cases, no other putative pathogenic mutations were identified and comparison of the allele ratios of the index cases and parents (where possible) did not reveal any evidence for somatic mosaicism in the leukocyte DNA.  Comparative analysis of TSC1 amino-acid substitutions  During our initial mutation screening, the L117P change was the only putative pathogenic TSC1 amino-acid substitution identified. We compared the L117P variant with wild-type TSC1, an earlier characterised TSC1 in-frame deletion (N198F199delinsI)27 and to a common TSC1 truncation mutation, R692X3, 10 (Figure 2). Wild-type TSC1 was detected predominantly in the post 10 000 g pellet fraction, whereas the three variants were detected in the supernatant fraction (Figure 2a). Upon coexpression of TSC2, the variants as well as wild-type TSC1 were detected in both subcellular fractions (Figure 2b). TSC2 was coimmunoprecipitated from the supernatant fraction with all three variants, although clearly less effectively than with wild-type TSC1.  Figure 2 Figure 2 Analysis of the TSC1 L117P variant. Wild-type TSC1 (wt) or the L117P, N198F199delinsI (del) or R692X variants (all containing a C-terminal myc epitope tag) were overexpressed in HEK 293T cells alone (a) or in the presence of coexpressed TSC2 (b). Cell ... Next, we investigated whether the variants could inhibit mTOR signalling. Expression of wild-type TSC1 alone is insufficient to inhibit mTOR activity.28 Therefore, the variants were coexpressed with TSC2 and S6K in HEK 293T cells, and S6K T389 phosphorylation was analysed by immunoblotting (Figure 3a). To try and achieve comparable expression levels of the different variants, we used different quantities of the corresponding expression constructs. Coexpression of wild-type TSC1 and TSC2 resulted in a reduction in S6K T389 phosphorylation, even with low levels of the TSC1 expression construct. In contrast, coexpression of TSC2 with the variants did not reduce S6K T389 phosphorylation, indicating that they were unable to inhibit mTOR effectively. Compared with wild-type TSC1, the L117P and N198F199delinsI variants were detected at low levels, even when the quantity of transfected expression construct DNA was increased.  Figure 3 Figure 3 TSC1–TSC2-dependent inhibition of mTOR signalling by the TSC1 L117P variant. (a) T389 phosphorylation of S6K in HEK 293T cells coexpressing TSC2, myc-tagged S6K and myc-tagged wild-type TSC1 (wt) or the TSC1 L117P, N198F199delinsI (del) or R692X ... To confirm that the L117P and N198F199delinsI variants were unable to inhibit mTOR, they were expressed in Tsc1−/− MEFs. These cells exhibit constitutive S6 (S235/236) phosphorylation.7 As shown in Figure 3b, wild-type YFP-tagged TSC1 reduced S6 phosphorylation in >60% of the YFP-positive Tsc1−/− MEFs, consistent with earlier results.8 In contrast, S6 phosphorylation was reduced in <30% of cells expressing the L117P or N198F199delinsI variants (paired t-test P<0.001). Nevertheless, a reduction in S6 phosphorylation was observed in a higher proportion of variant-expressing cells than in cells expressing YFP only (paired t-test P<0.02). Therefore, although both variants were clearly less effective than wild-type TSC, we could not exclude the possibility that the variants can antagonise mTOR activity.  As a result of on-going TSC1 and TSC2 mutation screening, we identified eight additional TSC1 single amino-acid changes: p.128delV, p.L180P, p.L191H, p.M224R, p.R246K, p.R509Q, p.G1035S and p.R1097H. The p.M224R and p.G1035S changes cosegregated with TSC in a single family (Figure 1b). To investigate the effects of these two amino-acid substitutions on TSC1 function, the corresponding single and double variants were compared with wild-type TSC1 and the R692X truncation. As shown in Figure 4a, the M224R variant and the M224R/G1035S double variant were detected at lower levels than wild-type TSC1 and the G1035S variant. Furthermore, the expression of wild-type TSC1 or the G1035S variant reduced S6 phosphorylation in >50% of transfected Tsc1−/− MEFs whereas <20% of the MEFs expressing the M224R, M224R/G1035S or R692X variants showed a reduction in S6 phosphorylation (Figure 4b), indicating that the M224R substitution is the pathogenic mutation in this family and that the G1035S substitution is a cosegregating neutral variant.24 We did not observe any differences between the M224R single mutant and the M224R/G1035S double mutant.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Results of the functional assays on the M224R, G1035S and M224R/G1035S variants. (a) TSC1–TSC2-dependent inhibition of S6K-T389 phosphorylation. TSC2, S6K and wild-type TSC1 (wt TSC1), or the TSC1 variants, were expressed in HEK 293T cells. T389 ... To determine whether the 128delV, L180P, L191H, R246K, R509Q and R1097H amino-acid changes were pathogenic, we compared these variants with the previously characterised L117P and R692X variants, and with two additional putative missense variants, G305R and G305W15 (Figure 5). The R246K, G305R, G305W, R509Q and R1097H variants were detected at comparable levels with wild-type TSC1 (Figure 5a and b) and were just as effective at inhibiting S6K T389 phosphorylation (Figure 5a and c). In contrast, the 128delV, L180P and L191H variants were detected at low levels, similar to the L117P and M224R variants (Figure 5a and b). Furthermore, S6K T389 phosphorylation was not inhibited by the expression of these variants (Figure 5a and c). Consistent with the immunoblot data, the expression of the L117P, 128delV, L180P, L191H, M224R, M224R/G1035S and R692X variants in Tsc1−/− MEFs reduced S6 phosphorylation in <40% of cells, whereas wild-type TSC1 and the R246K, G305R, G305W, R509Q, G1035S and R1097H variants reduced S6 phosphorylation in >50% of the expressing cells (Figure 5d).  Figure 5 Figure 5 Analysis of the 128delV, L180P, L191H, R246K, G305R, G305W, R509Q and R1097H variants. (a) TSC1-dependent inhibition of S6K T389 phosphorylation. S6K T389 phosphorylation was determined by immunoblotting as before except that the blots were developed ... We concluded that the 128delV, L180P and L191H changes destabilise TSC1, resulting in increased mTOR activity. The R246K, G305R, G305W, R509Q, G1035S and R1097H amino-acid substitutions did not affect TSC1 function in our assays.  Splice-site prediction analysis  Splice-site prediction analysis of the identified variants was performed according to a standard protocol13 using three independent splice-site prediction programs.17, 18, 19 Effects were predicted for four of the variants: TSC1 c.379_381delTGT (p.128delV), c.737G>A (p.R246K) c.913G>A (p.G305R) and c.913G>T (p.G305W).  According to two of the prediction programs, the c.379_381delTGT mutation created a potential new acceptor site within exon 6. However, the values of the new site (0.48 and 0.33 in Fruitfly and NetGene2, respectively) were lower than the values of the wild-type acceptor site (0.98 and 0.97, respectively). It is therefore unlikely that this sequence change affects splicing.  The R246K, G305R and G305W amino-acid substitutions did not affect TSC1 function. However, the c.737G>A (p.R246K) nucleotide substitution altered the last nucleotide of exon 8 and all three programs indicated that this change disrupted the intron 8 splice donor site, leaving a new potential donor site 90 nucleotides downstream. Similarly, the c.913G>A (p.G305R) and c.913G>T (p.G305W) substitutions affect the last nucleotide of exon 9 and were predicted by all three programs to disrupt splicing to the intron 9 donor site. We concluded that these three variants are most likely pathogenic splice-site mutations, not missense mutations. Unfortunately, the effect of these sequence changes on TSC1 RNA splicing could not be confirmed experimentally because no new samples could be obtained.  An overview of the functional assays and splice-site analysis is presented in Supplementary Table 2.  Go to: Discussion Mutation analysis of the TSC1 and TSC2 genes in individuals with TSC, and in those suspected of having the disease is important for diagnosis and genetic counselling. During our screening of a cohort of approximately 900 index cases with TSC, or possible TSC, we identified eight putative pathogenic TSC1 missense changes, c.350T>C (p.L117P), c.539T>C (p.L180P), c.572T>A (p.L191H), c.671T>G (p.M224R), c.737G>A (p.R246K), c.1526G>A (p.R509Q), c.3103G>A (p.G1035S) and c.3290G>A (p.R1097H), as well as a putative pathogenic in-frame deletion mutant, TSC1 c.379_381delTGT (p.128delV). We compared these variants with the earlier reported c.913G>A (p.G305R), c.913G>T (p.G305W), c.593_595delACT (p.N198F199delinsI) and c.2074C>T (p.R692X) mutants.2, 15, 26  The TSC1 L117P, 128delV, L180P, L191H, N198F199delinsI and M224R changes resulted in reduced levels of TSC1 and a reduction in TSC1-dependent inhibition of mTOR activity, as detected by immunoblotting. In each case, the functional characterisation was consistent with the genetic and phenotypic findings and we concluded that the changes were pathogenic.  The R246K, G305R, G305W, R509Q, G1035S and R1097H amino-acid substitutions did not affect TSC1 function in our assays. However, we concluded that the TSC1 c.737G>A (p.R246K), c.913G>A (p.G305R) and c.913G>T (p.G305W) changes were most likely pathogenic splice-site mutations. The c.737G>A transition was predicted to destroy the splice donor site at the 3′ end of exon 8 and the c.913G>A and c.913G>T substitutions affect the last nucleotide of exon 9, also disrupting the normal splice donor site. The c.1526G>A (p.R509Q), c.3103G>A (p.G1035S) and c.3290G>A (p.R1097H) variants did not appear to affect either TSC1 RNA splicing or TSC1 function. The c.1526G>A change was identified in a foetus suspected of having TSC. However, after birth, the child showed multiple congenital malformations that fitted with VACTERL association, and a normal physical examination of the child did not reveal any signs of TSC. We concluded that this variant is unlikely to cause TSC. The c.3103G>A variant cosegregated with the pathogenic c.671T>G (p.M224R) variant and TSC in a single family.24 We concluded that the p.G1035S substitution was a neutral variant, consistent with previous reports.29, 30 The c.3290G>A change was identified in a child with definite TSC and in one unaffected parent, and we concluded that it was also most likely a rare neutral variant.  Here we demonstrate that specific amino-acid substitutions close to the N-terminal of TSC1 (amino acids 117–224) reduce the steady-state levels of TSC1. The location and the effects of these changes on TSC1 function are very similar to a small number of missense mutations described recently in some cases of bladder cancer,31 suggesting that the pathogenetic mechanisms underlying TSC-associated lesions and tumours of the bladder may be related.  Several studies indicate that TSC1 mutations are associated with a less severe clinical presentation in TSC patients.9, 12, 13, 15 The small number of patients that we identified with a TSC1 missense mutation made it difficult to identify a specific phenotypic spectrum in this group. Nevertheless, the use of functional assays to differentiate between polymorphisms and pathogenic mutations, in TSC and other diseases, will not only facilitate the identification of pathogenic mutations but also help investigate possible genotype–phenotype correlations and provide insight into how specific amino-acid residues contribute to protein function.  
1002||Tuberous sclerosis complex (TSC) is an autosomal dominant disorder characterised by the development of hamartomas in a variety of organs and tissues. The disease is caused by mutations in either the TSC1 gene on chromosome 9q34 or the TSC2 gene on chromosome 16p13.3. The TSC1 and TSC2 gene products, TSC1 and TSC2, interact to form a protein complex that inhibits signal transduction to the downstream effectors of the mammalian target of rapamycin (mTOR). Here we investigate the effects of putative TSC1 missense mutations identified in individuals with signs and/or symptoms of TSC on TSC1–TSC2 complex formation and mTOR signalling. We show that specific amino-acid substitutions close to the N-terminal of TSC1 reduce steady-state levels of TSC1, resulting in the activation of mTOR signalling and leading to the symptoms of TSC.  Keywords: tuberous sclerosis complex, TSC1, TSC2 Go to: Introduction Tuberous sclerosis complex (TSC) is an autosomal dominant disorder characterised by the development of hamartomas in a variety of organs and tissues, including the brain, skin and kidneys.1, 2  Mutations in either the TSC1 gene on chromosome 9q343 or the TSC2 gene on chromosome 16p13.34 cause TSC. The TSC1 and TSC2 gene products, TSC1 and TSC2, interact to form a protein complex. TSC2 contains a GTPase-activating protein domain and the TSC1–TSC2 complex acts on the rheb GTPase to prevent the rheb-GTP-dependent stimulation of cell growth through the mammalian target of rapamycin (mTOR).5 In cells lacking either TSC1 or TSC2, the downstream targets of mTOR, including p70 S6 kinase (S6K) and ribosomal protein S6, are constitutively phosphorylated.6, 7 The identification of the role of the TSC1–TSC2 complex in regulating mTOR activity has made it possible to compare TSC1 and TSC2 variants found in the normal population with variants identified in individuals with symptoms of TSC. The effects of amino-acid changes on TSC1–TSC2 complex formation, on the activation of rheb GTPase activity by the complex and on the phosphorylation status of S6K and S6 can be determined.8  Comprehensive screens for mutations at both the TSC1 and TSC2 loci have been performed in several large cohorts of TSC patients, and a wide variety of different pathogenic mutations have been described.9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15 Although ∼20% of the mutations identified in the TSC2 gene are missense changes, missense mutations in the TSC1 gene appear much less frequently. One simple explanation for this observation is that TSC1 missense mutations are rare because the majority of TSC patients have a mutation in the TSC2 gene. According to the TSC1 mutation database,16 22 putative missense mutations have been identified in TSC patients. However, only one of these is a confirmed de novo mutation. Here, we investigate the effects of 10 TSC1 missense changes (c.350T>C (p.L117P), c.539T>C (p.L180P), c.572T>A (p.L191H), c.671T>G (p.M224R), c.737G>A (p.R246K), c.913G>A (p.G305R), c.913G>T (p.G305W), c.1526G>A (p.R509Q), c.3103G>A (p.G1035S) and c.3290G>A (p.R1097H)) on TSC1–TSC2 function. We compared these TSC1 variants with wild-type TSC1 and three truncation variants: c.379_381delTGT (p.128delV), c.593_595delACT (p.N198F199delinsI) and c.2075C>T (p.R692X). Our analysis demonstrates that TSC1 missense mutations reduce steady-state levels of TSC1, resulting in increased mTOR activity and leading to the symptoms of TSC.  Go to: Materials and methods Patient characteristics  Samples from patients with either a putative or definite diagnosis of TSC were received for mutation analysis. Details on clinical symptoms were obtained from the treating physicians who were sent a standardised clinical evaluation form (see Supplementary Table 1).  Mutation analysis  DNA was extracted from peripheral blood using standard techniques. Mutation analysis was performed as described earlier,13 or by direct sequence analysis of all TSC1 and TSC2 coding exons and exon/intron boundaries. In addition, both genes were analysed using the multiplex ligation-dependent probe amplification assay (MRC Holland, Amsterdam, The Netherlands).  To investigate whether the identified changes had an effect on splicing, three different splice-site prediction programs were used,17, 18, 19 as described earlier.13  Generation of constructs and antisera  Expression constructs encoding C-terminal YFP- and myc-tagged TSC1 variants were derived using the QuikChange site-directed mutagenesis kit (Stratagene, La Jolla, CA, USA). In each case, the complete open reading frame of the mutated construct was verified by sequence analysis. The other constructs used in this study have been described earlier.8, 20, 21 Polyclonal rabbit antisera specific for human TSC1 and TSC2 have been described earlier.21 Other antibodies were purchased from Cell Signaling Technology (Danvers, MA, USA).  Functional analysis of TSC1 variants  Expression of TSC1 variants in transfected cells Human embryonal kidney (HEK) 293T cells seeded into 6-cm diameter dishes were transfected with a 1:1 mixture of the TSC1 and TSC2 expression constructs using Lipofectamine Plus (Invitrogen, Carlsbad, CA, USA), following the manufacturer's instructions. Two days after transfection, the cells were lysed in 50 m Tris-HCl (pH 8.0), 100 m NaCl, 50 m NaF, 0.5 m EDTA and 1% Triton X-100 plus protease inhibitors (Roche, Basel, Switzerland) and separated into supernatant and pellet fractions by centrifugation at 10 000 g for 10 min at 4°C as described earlier.22 Wild-type TSC1 and the TSC1 variants were immunoprecipitated from the supernatant fractions by incubation with a monoclonal antibody against the C-terminal myc epitope tag for 90 min at 4°C before incubation with Protein G beads (GE Healthcare, Uppsala, Sweden). After gentle agitation for 90 min at 4°C, the beads were washed three times with a >50-fold excess of lysis buffer. The immunoprecipitated proteins were detected by immunoblotting. Blots were developed using enhanced chemiluminescent detection (GE Healthcare).8  Immunoblot analysis of S6K T389 phosphorylation in cells overexpressing TSC1 variants HEK 293T cells were transfected with a 4:2:1 mixture of the TSC1, TSC2 and S6K expression constructs. A total of 1.75 μg DNA was diluted in 200 μl Dulbecco's modified Eagle's medium (DMEM) containing 7 μg polyethyleneimine (Polysciences, Warrington, PA, USA). Where necessary, an empty expression vector (pcDNA3; Invitrogen) was added to make up the total amount of DNA. After 15 min at room temperature, the DNA/polyethyleneimine complexes were added to 80% confluent cells in 3.5-cm diameter dishes. After 4 h at 37°C, the transfection mixture was replaced with DMEM containing 10% foetal calf serum. Twenty-four hours after transfection, the cells were harvested and analysed by immunoblotting as before or by near infrared fluorescent detection on an Odyssey™ Infrared Imager (169 μm resolution, medium quality with 0 mm focus offset) (Li-Cor Biosciences, Lincoln, NE, USA). The integrated intensities of the protein bands were determined using the Odyssey software (default settings with background correction; 3-pixel width border average method). The mean ratios of the T389-phosphorylated S6K signal to the total S6K signal (T389/S6K) and the total TSC2 signal to the total TSC1 signal (TSC2/TSC1) were determined relative to wild-type TSC1 from at least three independent experiments (wild-type T389/S6K and TSC2/TSC1 ratios=1).  Immunofluorescent detection of S235/236 phosphorylation of ribosomal protein S6 in TSC1-deficient cells Tsc1−/− mouse embryo fibroblasts (MEFs)7 were transfected with expression constructs encoding wild-type TSC1 or the TSC1 variants, using Lipofectamine Plus (Invitrogen), following the manufacturer's instructions. Twenty-four hours after transfection, S6 (S235/236) phosphorylation in the transfected cells was detected by immunofluorescent microscopy using a rabbit polyclonal antibody specific for S235/236-phosphorylated S6.23 TSC1 variants were identified either directly (for C-terminal-tagged TSC1-YFP variants) or with a mouse monoclonal antibody against the myc epitope tag (for C-terminal-tagged TSC1-myc variants). If possible, at least 50 cells expressing each TSC1 variant were counted per experiment and the number of cells showing a clear reduction in S6 (S235/236) phosphorylation was noted. The mean proportions of expressing cells with reduced S6 phosphorylation were calculated from at least three independent experiments.  Go to: Results Patient characteristics and mutation analysis  The TSC1 c.350T>C (p.L117P) change was detected in two generations of a family with TSC (Figure 1a). The index patient (I:1) had epilepsy since the age of 22 years and fulfilled the diagnostic criteria for definite TSC, with facial angiofibroma, ungual fibroma, hypomelanotic macules, a shagreen patch and cerebral white matter migration lines. No mental disability was reported. The youngest child (II:2) had the c.350T>C change. Despite being somewhat hyperactive, this child developed normally until 4 years of age when epileptic seizures occurred and development stagnated. The child is now severely mentally retarded. No information was available about other signs of TSC. The eldest child (II:1), who could not yet be tested for the c.350T>C change, suffered severe anoxia at birth and has severe infantile encephalopathy with spastic tetraplegia and epilepsy.  Figure 1 Figure 1 Pedigrees of the investigated families with TSC. Arrows indicate the index cases. Open symbols indicate no signs or symptoms of TSC; black symbols indicate individuals with definite TSC; hatched symbols indicate individuals with possible TSC. A question ... The TSC1 c.671T>G (p.M224R) and TSC1 c.3103G>A (p.G1035S) changes were identified in two generations of a family with TSC24 (Figure 1b). The index case (II:3) had definite TSC with multiple shagreen patches, hypomelanotic macules, ungual fibromas, dental pits, epilepsy and severe mental disability. One parent (I:2) and both siblings (II:1 and II:2) of the index case also fulfilled the diagnostic criteria for definite TSC. Individual I:2, who was seizure-free and of below-average intelligence (IQ 73), had skin lesions pathognomonic for TSC. Individual II:1, who was of normal intelligence (IQ 94), had seizures, cortical tubers and multiple TSC skin lesions. Individual II:2 had epilepsy, below-average intelligence (IQ 67) and multiple TSC skin lesions. All the affected individuals in this family were heterozygous for the c.671T>G and c.3103G>A changes. Three affected individuals (I:2, II:1 and II:2) were heterozygous for a polymorphism in the TSC2 gene (TSC2 c.1276-32C>G). The index case was homozygous for the wild-type TSC2 1276-32C allele, consistent with TSC segregating with a mutation at the TSC1 locus in this family.  The TSC1 c.539T>C (p.L180P) change was detected in three generations of a family with TSC (Figure 1c). Individual I:2 had an ungual fibroma as the only reported sign of TSC. Individual II:2 had epilepsy, no mental disability, skin signs typical for TSC and a subependymal giant cell astrocytoma as well as other brain lesions consistent with a definite diagnosis of TSC. Individual II:3, the half-sibling of II:2, had typical TSC-associated skin lesions and possible mild mental retardation. Individual II:4, the other half-sibling of II:2, had a history of seizures during puberty and some skin tags, not typical of TSC. Individual III:1, the child of II:2, had epilepsy, and typical TSC-associated skin and brain lesions. Individual III:2, the sibling of III:1, had multiple cardiac rhabdomyoma and Wolff–Parkinson–White syndrome. No mental disability was reported for either individual III:1 or III:2. TSC did not cosegregate with markers mapping close to the TSC2 locus on chromosome 16p13.3, and no candidate TSC2 mutation was identified in the index case.  The TSC1 c.572T>A (p.L191H) change was identified in an individual who met the clinical criteria for definite TSC, including typical skin, heart and brain lesions. The individual had a history of seizures but no mental disability was reported. The c.572T>A change was absent in the individual's parents and child (Figure 1d). None of these individuals showed any signs of TSC.  Two TSC patients, one Finnish and one Dutch, were identified with the TSC1 c.737G>A (p.R246K) change. No information was available on the parents of either of these two individuals. The Finnish individual had typical TSC-associated skin, brain and kidney lesions. No mental disability or history of seizures was reported. The Dutch individual was also reported to have definite TSC. The sibling of this individual did not have any signs of TSC and did not carry the c.737G>A change.  The TSC1 c.1526G>A (p.R509Q) change was identified in a child of African origin, suspected of having TSC due to an echodensity that was detected prenatally in the septum of the heart. After birth, physical examination of the child did not reveal any signs of TSC but multiple congenital malformations that fitted with VACTERL (vertebral anomalies, atresia, cardiac malformations, tracheoesophageal fistula, renal anomalies and limb anomalies) association were identified. The same c.1526G>A change was identified in one of the parents. Neither parent reported any signs of TSC.  The TSC1 c.3290G>A (p.R1097H) change was identified in a child with cardiac rhabdomyoma who subsequently developed epilepsy at the age of 3 months. An MRI scan of the brain showed multiple subependymal nodules, cortical tubers and white matter abnormalities. This individual fulfilled the diagnostic criteria for definite TSC, with angiomyolipoma and multiple skin lesions. The c.3290G>A change was also identified in one of the parents; neither parent showed any signs of TSC.  The TSC1 c.379_381delTGT (p.128delV) change was detected in a child with epilepsy and a definite diagnosis of TSC (multiple skin signs, subependymal nodules and angiomyolipoma). No mental disability was reported and no information was available on the phenotypic or genetic status of the parents. The same change has been reported in another unrelated TSC patient.25 The TSC1 c.593_595delACT (p.N198F199delinsI), c.913G>A (p.G305R) and c.913G>T (p.G305W) missense changes have been reported earlier to cosegregate with TSC in three independent families.15, 26  In all the above cases, no other putative pathogenic mutations were identified and comparison of the allele ratios of the index cases and parents (where possible) did not reveal any evidence for somatic mosaicism in the leukocyte DNA.  Comparative analysis of TSC1 amino-acid substitutions  During our initial mutation screening, the L117P change was the only putative pathogenic TSC1 amino-acid substitution identified. We compared the L117P variant with wild-type TSC1, an earlier characterised TSC1 in-frame deletion (N198F199delinsI)27 and to a common TSC1 truncation mutation, R692X3, 10 (Figure 2). Wild-type TSC1 was detected predominantly in the post 10 000 g pellet fraction, whereas the three variants were detected in the supernatant fraction (Figure 2a). Upon coexpression of TSC2, the variants as well as wild-type TSC1 were detected in both subcellular fractions (Figure 2b). TSC2 was coimmunoprecipitated from the supernatant fraction with all three variants, although clearly less effectively than with wild-type TSC1.  Figure 2 Figure 2 Analysis of the TSC1 L117P variant. Wild-type TSC1 (wt) or the L117P, N198F199delinsI (del) or R692X variants (all containing a C-terminal myc epitope tag) were overexpressed in HEK 293T cells alone (a) or in the presence of coexpressed TSC2 (b). Cell ... Next, we investigated whether the variants could inhibit mTOR signalling. Expression of wild-type TSC1 alone is insufficient to inhibit mTOR activity.28 Therefore, the variants were coexpressed with TSC2 and S6K in HEK 293T cells, and S6K T389 phosphorylation was analysed by immunoblotting (Figure 3a). To try and achieve comparable expression levels of the different variants, we used different quantities of the corresponding expression constructs. Coexpression of wild-type TSC1 and TSC2 resulted in a reduction in S6K T389 phosphorylation, even with low levels of the TSC1 expression construct. In contrast, coexpression of TSC2 with the variants did not reduce S6K T389 phosphorylation, indicating that they were unable to inhibit mTOR effectively. Compared with wild-type TSC1, the L117P and N198F199delinsI variants were detected at low levels, even when the quantity of transfected expression construct DNA was increased.  Figure 3 Figure 3 TSC1–TSC2-dependent inhibition of mTOR signalling by the TSC1 L117P variant. (a) T389 phosphorylation of S6K in HEK 293T cells coexpressing TSC2, myc-tagged S6K and myc-tagged wild-type TSC1 (wt) or the TSC1 L117P, N198F199delinsI (del) or R692X ... To confirm that the L117P and N198F199delinsI variants were unable to inhibit mTOR, they were expressed in Tsc1−/− MEFs. These cells exhibit constitutive S6 (S235/236) phosphorylation.7 As shown in Figure 3b, wild-type YFP-tagged TSC1 reduced S6 phosphorylation in >60% of the YFP-positive Tsc1−/− MEFs, consistent with earlier results.8 In contrast, S6 phosphorylation was reduced in <30% of cells expressing the L117P or N198F199delinsI variants (paired t-test P<0.001). Nevertheless, a reduction in S6 phosphorylation was observed in a higher proportion of variant-expressing cells than in cells expressing YFP only (paired t-test P<0.02). Therefore, although both variants were clearly less effective than wild-type TSC, we could not exclude the possibility that the variants can antagonise mTOR activity.  As a result of on-going TSC1 and TSC2 mutation screening, we identified eight additional TSC1 single amino-acid changes: p.128delV, p.L180P, p.L191H, p.M224R, p.R246K, p.R509Q, p.G1035S and p.R1097H. The p.M224R and p.G1035S changes cosegregated with TSC in a single family (Figure 1b). To investigate the effects of these two amino-acid substitutions on TSC1 function, the corresponding single and double variants were compared with wild-type TSC1 and the R692X truncation. As shown in Figure 4a, the M224R variant and the M224R/G1035S double variant were detected at lower levels than wild-type TSC1 and the G1035S variant. Furthermore, the expression of wild-type TSC1 or the G1035S variant reduced S6 phosphorylation in >50% of transfected Tsc1−/− MEFs whereas <20% of the MEFs expressing the M224R, M224R/G1035S or R692X variants showed a reduction in S6 phosphorylation (Figure 4b), indicating that the M224R substitution is the pathogenic mutation in this family and that the G1035S substitution is a cosegregating neutral variant.24 We did not observe any differences between the M224R single mutant and the M224R/G1035S double mutant.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Results of the functional assays on the M224R, G1035S and M224R/G1035S variants. (a) TSC1–TSC2-dependent inhibition of S6K-T389 phosphorylation. TSC2, S6K and wild-type TSC1 (wt TSC1), or the TSC1 variants, were expressed in HEK 293T cells. T389 ... To determine whether the 128delV, L180P, L191H, R246K, R509Q and R1097H amino-acid changes were pathogenic, we compared these variants with the previously characterised L117P and R692X variants, and with two additional putative missense variants, G305R and G305W15 (Figure 5). The R246K, G305R, G305W, R509Q and R1097H variants were detected at comparable levels with wild-type TSC1 (Figure 5a and b) and were just as effective at inhibiting S6K T389 phosphorylation (Figure 5a and c). In contrast, the 128delV, L180P and L191H variants were detected at low levels, similar to the L117P and M224R variants (Figure 5a and b). Furthermore, S6K T389 phosphorylation was not inhibited by the expression of these variants (Figure 5a and c). Consistent with the immunoblot data, the expression of the L117P, 128delV, L180P, L191H, M224R, M224R/G1035S and R692X variants in Tsc1−/− MEFs reduced S6 phosphorylation in <40% of cells, whereas wild-type TSC1 and the R246K, G305R, G305W, R509Q, G1035S and R1097H variants reduced S6 phosphorylation in >50% of the expressing cells (Figure 5d).  Figure 5 Figure 5 Analysis of the 128delV, L180P, L191H, R246K, G305R, G305W, R509Q and R1097H variants. (a) TSC1-dependent inhibition of S6K T389 phosphorylation. S6K T389 phosphorylation was determined by immunoblotting as before except that the blots were developed ... We concluded that the 128delV, L180P and L191H changes destabilise TSC1, resulting in increased mTOR activity. The R246K, G305R, G305W, R509Q, G1035S and R1097H amino-acid substitutions did not affect TSC1 function in our assays.  Splice-site prediction analysis  Splice-site prediction analysis of the identified variants was performed according to a standard protocol13 using three independent splice-site prediction programs.17, 18, 19 Effects were predicted for four of the variants: TSC1 c.379_381delTGT (p.128delV), c.737G>A (p.R246K) c.913G>A (p.G305R) and c.913G>T (p.G305W).  According to two of the prediction programs, the c.379_381delTGT mutation created a potential new acceptor site within exon 6. However, the values of the new site (0.48 and 0.33 in Fruitfly and NetGene2, respectively) were lower than the values of the wild-type acceptor site (0.98 and 0.97, respectively). It is therefore unlikely that this sequence change affects splicing.  The R246K, G305R and G305W amino-acid substitutions did not affect TSC1 function. However, the c.737G>A (p.R246K) nucleotide substitution altered the last nucleotide of exon 8 and all three programs indicated that this change disrupted the intron 8 splice donor site, leaving a new potential donor site 90 nucleotides downstream. Similarly, the c.913G>A (p.G305R) and c.913G>T (p.G305W) substitutions affect the last nucleotide of exon 9 and were predicted by all three programs to disrupt splicing to the intron 9 donor site. We concluded that these three variants are most likely pathogenic splice-site mutations, not missense mutations. Unfortunately, the effect of these sequence changes on TSC1 RNA splicing could not be confirmed experimentally because no new samples could be obtained.  An overview of the functional assays and splice-site analysis is presented in Supplementary Table 2.  Go to: Discussion Mutation analysis of the TSC1 and TSC2 genes in individuals with TSC, and in those suspected of having the disease is important for diagnosis and genetic counselling. During our screening of a cohort of approximately 900 index cases with TSC, or possible TSC, we identified eight putative pathogenic TSC1 missense changes, c.350T>C (p.L117P), c.539T>C (p.L180P), c.572T>A (p.L191H), c.671T>G (p.M224R), c.737G>A (p.R246K), c.1526G>A (p.R509Q), c.3103G>A (p.G1035S) and c.3290G>A (p.R1097H), as well as a putative pathogenic in-frame deletion mutant, TSC1 c.379_381delTGT (p.128delV). We compared these variants with the earlier reported c.913G>A (p.G305R), c.913G>T (p.G305W), c.593_595delACT (p.N198F199delinsI) and c.2074C>T (p.R692X) mutants.2, 15, 26  The TSC1 L117P, 128delV, L180P, L191H, N198F199delinsI and M224R changes resulted in reduced levels of TSC1 and a reduction in TSC1-dependent inhibition of mTOR activity, as detected by immunoblotting. In each case, the functional characterisation was consistent with the genetic and phenotypic findings and we concluded that the changes were pathogenic.  The R246K, G305R, G305W, R509Q, G1035S and R1097H amino-acid substitutions did not affect TSC1 function in our assays. However, we concluded that the TSC1 c.737G>A (p.R246K), c.913G>A (p.G305R) and c.913G>T (p.G305W) changes were most likely pathogenic splice-site mutations. The c.737G>A transition was predicted to destroy the splice donor site at the 3′ end of exon 8 and the c.913G>A and c.913G>T substitutions affect the last nucleotide of exon 9, also disrupting the normal splice donor site. The c.1526G>A (p.R509Q), c.3103G>A (p.G1035S) and c.3290G>A (p.R1097H) variants did not appear to affect either TSC1 RNA splicing or TSC1 function. The c.1526G>A change was identified in a foetus suspected of having TSC. However, after birth, the child showed multiple congenital malformations that fitted with VACTERL association, and a normal physical examination of the child did not reveal any signs of TSC. We concluded that this variant is unlikely to cause TSC. The c.3103G>A variant cosegregated with the pathogenic c.671T>G (p.M224R) variant and TSC in a single family.24 We concluded that the p.G1035S substitution was a neutral variant, consistent with previous reports.29, 30 The c.3290G>A change was identified in a child with definite TSC and in one unaffected parent, and we concluded that it was also most likely a rare neutral variant.  Here we demonstrate that specific amino-acid substitutions close to the N-terminal of TSC1 (amino acids 117–224) reduce the steady-state levels of TSC1. The location and the effects of these changes on TSC1 function are very similar to a small number of missense mutations described recently in some cases of bladder cancer,31 suggesting that the pathogenetic mechanisms underlying TSC-associated lesions and tumours of the bladder may be related.  Several studies indicate that TSC1 mutations are associated with a less severe clinical presentation in TSC patients.9, 12, 13, 15 The small number of patients that we identified with a TSC1 missense mutation made it difficult to identify a specific phenotypic spectrum in this group. Nevertheless, the use of functional assays to differentiate between polymorphisms and pathogenic mutations, in TSC and other diseases, will not only facilitate the identification of pathogenic mutations but also help investigate possible genotype–phenotype correlations and provide insight into how specific amino-acid residues contribute to protein function.  
1005||Tuberous sclerosis complex (TSC) is an autosomal dominant disorder characterised by the development of hamartomas in a variety of organs and tissues. The disease is caused by mutations in either the TSC1 gene on chromosome 9q34 or the TSC2 gene on chromosome 16p13.3. The TSC1 and TSC2 gene products, TSC1 and TSC2, interact to form a protein complex that inhibits signal transduction to the downstream effectors of the mammalian target of rapamycin (mTOR). Here we investigate the effects of putative TSC1 missense mutations identified in individuals with signs and/or symptoms of TSC on TSC1–TSC2 complex formation and mTOR signalling. We show that specific amino-acid substitutions close to the N-terminal of TSC1 reduce steady-state levels of TSC1, resulting in the activation of mTOR signalling and leading to the symptoms of TSC.  Keywords: tuberous sclerosis complex, TSC1, TSC2 Go to: Introduction Tuberous sclerosis complex (TSC) is an autosomal dominant disorder characterised by the development of hamartomas in a variety of organs and tissues, including the brain, skin and kidneys.1, 2  Mutations in either the TSC1 gene on chromosome 9q343 or the TSC2 gene on chromosome 16p13.34 cause TSC. The TSC1 and TSC2 gene products, TSC1 and TSC2, interact to form a protein complex. TSC2 contains a GTPase-activating protein domain and the TSC1–TSC2 complex acts on the rheb GTPase to prevent the rheb-GTP-dependent stimulation of cell growth through the mammalian target of rapamycin (mTOR).5 In cells lacking either TSC1 or TSC2, the downstream targets of mTOR, including p70 S6 kinase (S6K) and ribosomal protein S6, are constitutively phosphorylated.6, 7 The identification of the role of the TSC1–TSC2 complex in regulating mTOR activity has made it possible to compare TSC1 and TSC2 variants found in the normal population with variants identified in individuals with symptoms of TSC. The effects of amino-acid changes on TSC1–TSC2 complex formation, on the activation of rheb GTPase activity by the complex and on the phosphorylation status of S6K and S6 can be determined.8  Comprehensive screens for mutations at both the TSC1 and TSC2 loci have been performed in several large cohorts of TSC patients, and a wide variety of different pathogenic mutations have been described.9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15 Although ∼20% of the mutations identified in the TSC2 gene are missense changes, missense mutations in the TSC1 gene appear much less frequently. One simple explanation for this observation is that TSC1 missense mutations are rare because the majority of TSC patients have a mutation in the TSC2 gene. According to the TSC1 mutation database,16 22 putative missense mutations have been identified in TSC patients. However, only one of these is a confirmed de novo mutation. Here, we investigate the effects of 10 TSC1 missense changes (c.350T>C (p.L117P), c.539T>C (p.L180P), c.572T>A (p.L191H), c.671T>G (p.M224R), c.737G>A (p.R246K), c.913G>A (p.G305R), c.913G>T (p.G305W), c.1526G>A (p.R509Q), c.3103G>A (p.G1035S) and c.3290G>A (p.R1097H)) on TSC1–TSC2 function. We compared these TSC1 variants with wild-type TSC1 and three truncation variants: c.379_381delTGT (p.128delV), c.593_595delACT (p.N198F199delinsI) and c.2075C>T (p.R692X). Our analysis demonstrates that TSC1 missense mutations reduce steady-state levels of TSC1, resulting in increased mTOR activity and leading to the symptoms of TSC.  Go to: Materials and methods Patient characteristics  Samples from patients with either a putative or definite diagnosis of TSC were received for mutation analysis. Details on clinical symptoms were obtained from the treating physicians who were sent a standardised clinical evaluation form (see Supplementary Table 1).  Mutation analysis  DNA was extracted from peripheral blood using standard techniques. Mutation analysis was performed as described earlier,13 or by direct sequence analysis of all TSC1 and TSC2 coding exons and exon/intron boundaries. In addition, both genes were analysed using the multiplex ligation-dependent probe amplification assay (MRC Holland, Amsterdam, The Netherlands).  To investigate whether the identified changes had an effect on splicing, three different splice-site prediction programs were used,17, 18, 19 as described earlier.13  Generation of constructs and antisera  Expression constructs encoding C-terminal YFP- and myc-tagged TSC1 variants were derived using the QuikChange site-directed mutagenesis kit (Stratagene, La Jolla, CA, USA). In each case, the complete open reading frame of the mutated construct was verified by sequence analysis. The other constructs used in this study have been described earlier.8, 20, 21 Polyclonal rabbit antisera specific for human TSC1 and TSC2 have been described earlier.21 Other antibodies were purchased from Cell Signaling Technology (Danvers, MA, USA).  Functional analysis of TSC1 variants  Expression of TSC1 variants in transfected cells Human embryonal kidney (HEK) 293T cells seeded into 6-cm diameter dishes were transfected with a 1:1 mixture of the TSC1 and TSC2 expression constructs using Lipofectamine Plus (Invitrogen, Carlsbad, CA, USA), following the manufacturer's instructions. Two days after transfection, the cells were lysed in 50 m Tris-HCl (pH 8.0), 100 m NaCl, 50 m NaF, 0.5 m EDTA and 1% Triton X-100 plus protease inhibitors (Roche, Basel, Switzerland) and separated into supernatant and pellet fractions by centrifugation at 10 000 g for 10 min at 4°C as described earlier.22 Wild-type TSC1 and the TSC1 variants were immunoprecipitated from the supernatant fractions by incubation with a monoclonal antibody against the C-terminal myc epitope tag for 90 min at 4°C before incubation with Protein G beads (GE Healthcare, Uppsala, Sweden). After gentle agitation for 90 min at 4°C, the beads were washed three times with a >50-fold excess of lysis buffer. The immunoprecipitated proteins were detected by immunoblotting. Blots were developed using enhanced chemiluminescent detection (GE Healthcare).8  Immunoblot analysis of S6K T389 phosphorylation in cells overexpressing TSC1 variants HEK 293T cells were transfected with a 4:2:1 mixture of the TSC1, TSC2 and S6K expression constructs. A total of 1.75 μg DNA was diluted in 200 μl Dulbecco's modified Eagle's medium (DMEM) containing 7 μg polyethyleneimine (Polysciences, Warrington, PA, USA). Where necessary, an empty expression vector (pcDNA3; Invitrogen) was added to make up the total amount of DNA. After 15 min at room temperature, the DNA/polyethyleneimine complexes were added to 80% confluent cells in 3.5-cm diameter dishes. After 4 h at 37°C, the transfection mixture was replaced with DMEM containing 10% foetal calf serum. Twenty-four hours after transfection, the cells were harvested and analysed by immunoblotting as before or by near infrared fluorescent detection on an Odyssey™ Infrared Imager (169 μm resolution, medium quality with 0 mm focus offset) (Li-Cor Biosciences, Lincoln, NE, USA). The integrated intensities of the protein bands were determined using the Odyssey software (default settings with background correction; 3-pixel width border average method). The mean ratios of the T389-phosphorylated S6K signal to the total S6K signal (T389/S6K) and the total TSC2 signal to the total TSC1 signal (TSC2/TSC1) were determined relative to wild-type TSC1 from at least three independent experiments (wild-type T389/S6K and TSC2/TSC1 ratios=1).  Immunofluorescent detection of S235/236 phosphorylation of ribosomal protein S6 in TSC1-deficient cells Tsc1−/− mouse embryo fibroblasts (MEFs)7 were transfected with expression constructs encoding wild-type TSC1 or the TSC1 variants, using Lipofectamine Plus (Invitrogen), following the manufacturer's instructions. Twenty-four hours after transfection, S6 (S235/236) phosphorylation in the transfected cells was detected by immunofluorescent microscopy using a rabbit polyclonal antibody specific for S235/236-phosphorylated S6.23 TSC1 variants were identified either directly (for C-terminal-tagged TSC1-YFP variants) or with a mouse monoclonal antibody against the myc epitope tag (for C-terminal-tagged TSC1-myc variants). If possible, at least 50 cells expressing each TSC1 variant were counted per experiment and the number of cells showing a clear reduction in S6 (S235/236) phosphorylation was noted. The mean proportions of expressing cells with reduced S6 phosphorylation were calculated from at least three independent experiments.  Go to: Results Patient characteristics and mutation analysis  The TSC1 c.350T>C (p.L117P) change was detected in two generations of a family with TSC (Figure 1a). The index patient (I:1) had epilepsy since the age of 22 years and fulfilled the diagnostic criteria for definite TSC, with facial angiofibroma, ungual fibroma, hypomelanotic macules, a shagreen patch and cerebral white matter migration lines. No mental disability was reported. The youngest child (II:2) had the c.350T>C change. Despite being somewhat hyperactive, this child developed normally until 4 years of age when epileptic seizures occurred and development stagnated. The child is now severely mentally retarded. No information was available about other signs of TSC. The eldest child (II:1), who could not yet be tested for the c.350T>C change, suffered severe anoxia at birth and has severe infantile encephalopathy with spastic tetraplegia and epilepsy.  Figure 1 Figure 1 Pedigrees of the investigated families with TSC. Arrows indicate the index cases. Open symbols indicate no signs or symptoms of TSC; black symbols indicate individuals with definite TSC; hatched symbols indicate individuals with possible TSC. A question ... The TSC1 c.671T>G (p.M224R) and TSC1 c.3103G>A (p.G1035S) changes were identified in two generations of a family with TSC24 (Figure 1b). The index case (II:3) had definite TSC with multiple shagreen patches, hypomelanotic macules, ungual fibromas, dental pits, epilepsy and severe mental disability. One parent (I:2) and both siblings (II:1 and II:2) of the index case also fulfilled the diagnostic criteria for definite TSC. Individual I:2, who was seizure-free and of below-average intelligence (IQ 73), had skin lesions pathognomonic for TSC. Individual II:1, who was of normal intelligence (IQ 94), had seizures, cortical tubers and multiple TSC skin lesions. Individual II:2 had epilepsy, below-average intelligence (IQ 67) and multiple TSC skin lesions. All the affected individuals in this family were heterozygous for the c.671T>G and c.3103G>A changes. Three affected individuals (I:2, II:1 and II:2) were heterozygous for a polymorphism in the TSC2 gene (TSC2 c.1276-32C>G). The index case was homozygous for the wild-type TSC2 1276-32C allele, consistent with TSC segregating with a mutation at the TSC1 locus in this family.  The TSC1 c.539T>C (p.L180P) change was detected in three generations of a family with TSC (Figure 1c). Individual I:2 had an ungual fibroma as the only reported sign of TSC. Individual II:2 had epilepsy, no mental disability, skin signs typical for TSC and a subependymal giant cell astrocytoma as well as other brain lesions consistent with a definite diagnosis of TSC. Individual II:3, the half-sibling of II:2, had typical TSC-associated skin lesions and possible mild mental retardation. Individual II:4, the other half-sibling of II:2, had a history of seizures during puberty and some skin tags, not typical of TSC. Individual III:1, the child of II:2, had epilepsy, and typical TSC-associated skin and brain lesions. Individual III:2, the sibling of III:1, had multiple cardiac rhabdomyoma and Wolff–Parkinson–White syndrome. No mental disability was reported for either individual III:1 or III:2. TSC did not cosegregate with markers mapping close to the TSC2 locus on chromosome 16p13.3, and no candidate TSC2 mutation was identified in the index case.  The TSC1 c.572T>A (p.L191H) change was identified in an individual who met the clinical criteria for definite TSC, including typical skin, heart and brain lesions. The individual had a history of seizures but no mental disability was reported. The c.572T>A change was absent in the individual's parents and child (Figure 1d). None of these individuals showed any signs of TSC.  Two TSC patients, one Finnish and one Dutch, were identified with the TSC1 c.737G>A (p.R246K) change. No information was available on the parents of either of these two individuals. The Finnish individual had typical TSC-associated skin, brain and kidney lesions. No mental disability or history of seizures was reported. The Dutch individual was also reported to have definite TSC. The sibling of this individual did not have any signs of TSC and did not carry the c.737G>A change.  The TSC1 c.1526G>A (p.R509Q) change was identified in a child of African origin, suspected of having TSC due to an echodensity that was detected prenatally in the septum of the heart. After birth, physical examination of the child did not reveal any signs of TSC but multiple congenital malformations that fitted with VACTERL (vertebral anomalies, atresia, cardiac malformations, tracheoesophageal fistula, renal anomalies and limb anomalies) association were identified. The same c.1526G>A change was identified in one of the parents. Neither parent reported any signs of TSC.  The TSC1 c.3290G>A (p.R1097H) change was identified in a child with cardiac rhabdomyoma who subsequently developed epilepsy at the age of 3 months. An MRI scan of the brain showed multiple subependymal nodules, cortical tubers and white matter abnormalities. This individual fulfilled the diagnostic criteria for definite TSC, with angiomyolipoma and multiple skin lesions. The c.3290G>A change was also identified in one of the parents; neither parent showed any signs of TSC.  The TSC1 c.379_381delTGT (p.128delV) change was detected in a child with epilepsy and a definite diagnosis of TSC (multiple skin signs, subependymal nodules and angiomyolipoma). No mental disability was reported and no information was available on the phenotypic or genetic status of the parents. The same change has been reported in another unrelated TSC patient.25 The TSC1 c.593_595delACT (p.N198F199delinsI), c.913G>A (p.G305R) and c.913G>T (p.G305W) missense changes have been reported earlier to cosegregate with TSC in three independent families.15, 26  In all the above cases, no other putative pathogenic mutations were identified and comparison of the allele ratios of the index cases and parents (where possible) did not reveal any evidence for somatic mosaicism in the leukocyte DNA.  Comparative analysis of TSC1 amino-acid substitutions  During our initial mutation screening, the L117P change was the only putative pathogenic TSC1 amino-acid substitution identified. We compared the L117P variant with wild-type TSC1, an earlier characterised TSC1 in-frame deletion (N198F199delinsI)27 and to a common TSC1 truncation mutation, R692X3, 10 (Figure 2). Wild-type TSC1 was detected predominantly in the post 10 000 g pellet fraction, whereas the three variants were detected in the supernatant fraction (Figure 2a). Upon coexpression of TSC2, the variants as well as wild-type TSC1 were detected in both subcellular fractions (Figure 2b). TSC2 was coimmunoprecipitated from the supernatant fraction with all three variants, although clearly less effectively than with wild-type TSC1.  Figure 2 Figure 2 Analysis of the TSC1 L117P variant. Wild-type TSC1 (wt) or the L117P, N198F199delinsI (del) or R692X variants (all containing a C-terminal myc epitope tag) were overexpressed in HEK 293T cells alone (a) or in the presence of coexpressed TSC2 (b). Cell ... Next, we investigated whether the variants could inhibit mTOR signalling. Expression of wild-type TSC1 alone is insufficient to inhibit mTOR activity.28 Therefore, the variants were coexpressed with TSC2 and S6K in HEK 293T cells, and S6K T389 phosphorylation was analysed by immunoblotting (Figure 3a). To try and achieve comparable expression levels of the different variants, we used different quantities of the corresponding expression constructs. Coexpression of wild-type TSC1 and TSC2 resulted in a reduction in S6K T389 phosphorylation, even with low levels of the TSC1 expression construct. In contrast, coexpression of TSC2 with the variants did not reduce S6K T389 phosphorylation, indicating that they were unable to inhibit mTOR effectively. Compared with wild-type TSC1, the L117P and N198F199delinsI variants were detected at low levels, even when the quantity of transfected expression construct DNA was increased.  Figure 3 Figure 3 TSC1–TSC2-dependent inhibition of mTOR signalling by the TSC1 L117P variant. (a) T389 phosphorylation of S6K in HEK 293T cells coexpressing TSC2, myc-tagged S6K and myc-tagged wild-type TSC1 (wt) or the TSC1 L117P, N198F199delinsI (del) or R692X ... To confirm that the L117P and N198F199delinsI variants were unable to inhibit mTOR, they were expressed in Tsc1−/− MEFs. These cells exhibit constitutive S6 (S235/236) phosphorylation.7 As shown in Figure 3b, wild-type YFP-tagged TSC1 reduced S6 phosphorylation in >60% of the YFP-positive Tsc1−/− MEFs, consistent with earlier results.8 In contrast, S6 phosphorylation was reduced in <30% of cells expressing the L117P or N198F199delinsI variants (paired t-test P<0.001). Nevertheless, a reduction in S6 phosphorylation was observed in a higher proportion of variant-expressing cells than in cells expressing YFP only (paired t-test P<0.02). Therefore, although both variants were clearly less effective than wild-type TSC, we could not exclude the possibility that the variants can antagonise mTOR activity.  As a result of on-going TSC1 and TSC2 mutation screening, we identified eight additional TSC1 single amino-acid changes: p.128delV, p.L180P, p.L191H, p.M224R, p.R246K, p.R509Q, p.G1035S and p.R1097H. The p.M224R and p.G1035S changes cosegregated with TSC in a single family (Figure 1b). To investigate the effects of these two amino-acid substitutions on TSC1 function, the corresponding single and double variants were compared with wild-type TSC1 and the R692X truncation. As shown in Figure 4a, the M224R variant and the M224R/G1035S double variant were detected at lower levels than wild-type TSC1 and the G1035S variant. Furthermore, the expression of wild-type TSC1 or the G1035S variant reduced S6 phosphorylation in >50% of transfected Tsc1−/− MEFs whereas <20% of the MEFs expressing the M224R, M224R/G1035S or R692X variants showed a reduction in S6 phosphorylation (Figure 4b), indicating that the M224R substitution is the pathogenic mutation in this family and that the G1035S substitution is a cosegregating neutral variant.24 We did not observe any differences between the M224R single mutant and the M224R/G1035S double mutant.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Results of the functional assays on the M224R, G1035S and M224R/G1035S variants. (a) TSC1–TSC2-dependent inhibition of S6K-T389 phosphorylation. TSC2, S6K and wild-type TSC1 (wt TSC1), or the TSC1 variants, were expressed in HEK 293T cells. T389 ... To determine whether the 128delV, L180P, L191H, R246K, R509Q and R1097H amino-acid changes were pathogenic, we compared these variants with the previously characterised L117P and R692X variants, and with two additional putative missense variants, G305R and G305W15 (Figure 5). The R246K, G305R, G305W, R509Q and R1097H variants were detected at comparable levels with wild-type TSC1 (Figure 5a and b) and were just as effective at inhibiting S6K T389 phosphorylation (Figure 5a and c). In contrast, the 128delV, L180P and L191H variants were detected at low levels, similar to the L117P and M224R variants (Figure 5a and b). Furthermore, S6K T389 phosphorylation was not inhibited by the expression of these variants (Figure 5a and c). Consistent with the immunoblot data, the expression of the L117P, 128delV, L180P, L191H, M224R, M224R/G1035S and R692X variants in Tsc1−/− MEFs reduced S6 phosphorylation in <40% of cells, whereas wild-type TSC1 and the R246K, G305R, G305W, R509Q, G1035S and R1097H variants reduced S6 phosphorylation in >50% of the expressing cells (Figure 5d).  Figure 5 Figure 5 Analysis of the 128delV, L180P, L191H, R246K, G305R, G305W, R509Q and R1097H variants. (a) TSC1-dependent inhibition of S6K T389 phosphorylation. S6K T389 phosphorylation was determined by immunoblotting as before except that the blots were developed ... We concluded that the 128delV, L180P and L191H changes destabilise TSC1, resulting in increased mTOR activity. The R246K, G305R, G305W, R509Q, G1035S and R1097H amino-acid substitutions did not affect TSC1 function in our assays.  Splice-site prediction analysis  Splice-site prediction analysis of the identified variants was performed according to a standard protocol13 using three independent splice-site prediction programs.17, 18, 19 Effects were predicted for four of the variants: TSC1 c.379_381delTGT (p.128delV), c.737G>A (p.R246K) c.913G>A (p.G305R) and c.913G>T (p.G305W).  According to two of the prediction programs, the c.379_381delTGT mutation created a potential new acceptor site within exon 6. However, the values of the new site (0.48 and 0.33 in Fruitfly and NetGene2, respectively) were lower than the values of the wild-type acceptor site (0.98 and 0.97, respectively). It is therefore unlikely that this sequence change affects splicing.  The R246K, G305R and G305W amino-acid substitutions did not affect TSC1 function. However, the c.737G>A (p.R246K) nucleotide substitution altered the last nucleotide of exon 8 and all three programs indicated that this change disrupted the intron 8 splice donor site, leaving a new potential donor site 90 nucleotides downstream. Similarly, the c.913G>A (p.G305R) and c.913G>T (p.G305W) substitutions affect the last nucleotide of exon 9 and were predicted by all three programs to disrupt splicing to the intron 9 donor site. We concluded that these three variants are most likely pathogenic splice-site mutations, not missense mutations. Unfortunately, the effect of these sequence changes on TSC1 RNA splicing could not be confirmed experimentally because no new samples could be obtained.  An overview of the functional assays and splice-site analysis is presented in Supplementary Table 2.  Go to: Discussion Mutation analysis of the TSC1 and TSC2 genes in individuals with TSC, and in those suspected of having the disease is important for diagnosis and genetic counselling. During our screening of a cohort of approximately 900 index cases with TSC, or possible TSC, we identified eight putative pathogenic TSC1 missense changes, c.350T>C (p.L117P), c.539T>C (p.L180P), c.572T>A (p.L191H), c.671T>G (p.M224R), c.737G>A (p.R246K), c.1526G>A (p.R509Q), c.3103G>A (p.G1035S) and c.3290G>A (p.R1097H), as well as a putative pathogenic in-frame deletion mutant, TSC1 c.379_381delTGT (p.128delV). We compared these variants with the earlier reported c.913G>A (p.G305R), c.913G>T (p.G305W), c.593_595delACT (p.N198F199delinsI) and c.2074C>T (p.R692X) mutants.2, 15, 26  The TSC1 L117P, 128delV, L180P, L191H, N198F199delinsI and M224R changes resulted in reduced levels of TSC1 and a reduction in TSC1-dependent inhibition of mTOR activity, as detected by immunoblotting. In each case, the functional characterisation was consistent with the genetic and phenotypic findings and we concluded that the changes were pathogenic.  The R246K, G305R, G305W, R509Q, G1035S and R1097H amino-acid substitutions did not affect TSC1 function in our assays. However, we concluded that the TSC1 c.737G>A (p.R246K), c.913G>A (p.G305R) and c.913G>T (p.G305W) changes were most likely pathogenic splice-site mutations. The c.737G>A transition was predicted to destroy the splice donor site at the 3′ end of exon 8 and the c.913G>A and c.913G>T substitutions affect the last nucleotide of exon 9, also disrupting the normal splice donor site. The c.1526G>A (p.R509Q), c.3103G>A (p.G1035S) and c.3290G>A (p.R1097H) variants did not appear to affect either TSC1 RNA splicing or TSC1 function. The c.1526G>A change was identified in a foetus suspected of having TSC. However, after birth, the child showed multiple congenital malformations that fitted with VACTERL association, and a normal physical examination of the child did not reveal any signs of TSC. We concluded that this variant is unlikely to cause TSC. The c.3103G>A variant cosegregated with the pathogenic c.671T>G (p.M224R) variant and TSC in a single family.24 We concluded that the p.G1035S substitution was a neutral variant, consistent with previous reports.29, 30 The c.3290G>A change was identified in a child with definite TSC and in one unaffected parent, and we concluded that it was also most likely a rare neutral variant.  Here we demonstrate that specific amino-acid substitutions close to the N-terminal of TSC1 (amino acids 117–224) reduce the steady-state levels of TSC1. The location and the effects of these changes on TSC1 function are very similar to a small number of missense mutations described recently in some cases of bladder cancer,31 suggesting that the pathogenetic mechanisms underlying TSC-associated lesions and tumours of the bladder may be related.  Several studies indicate that TSC1 mutations are associated with a less severe clinical presentation in TSC patients.9, 12, 13, 15 The small number of patients that we identified with a TSC1 missense mutation made it difficult to identify a specific phenotypic spectrum in this group. Nevertheless, the use of functional assays to differentiate between polymorphisms and pathogenic mutations, in TSC and other diseases, will not only facilitate the identification of pathogenic mutations but also help investigate possible genotype–phenotype correlations and provide insight into how specific amino-acid residues contribute to protein function.  
1008||Tuberous sclerosis complex (TSC) is an autosomal dominant disorder characterised by the development of hamartomas in a variety of organs and tissues. The disease is caused by mutations in either the TSC1 gene on chromosome 9q34 or the TSC2 gene on chromosome 16p13.3. The TSC1 and TSC2 gene products, TSC1 and TSC2, interact to form a protein complex that inhibits signal transduction to the downstream effectors of the mammalian target of rapamycin (mTOR). Here we investigate the effects of putative TSC1 missense mutations identified in individuals with signs and/or symptoms of TSC on TSC1–TSC2 complex formation and mTOR signalling. We show that specific amino-acid substitutions close to the N-terminal of TSC1 reduce steady-state levels of TSC1, resulting in the activation of mTOR signalling and leading to the symptoms of TSC.  Keywords: tuberous sclerosis complex, TSC1, TSC2 Go to: Introduction Tuberous sclerosis complex (TSC) is an autosomal dominant disorder characterised by the development of hamartomas in a variety of organs and tissues, including the brain, skin and kidneys.1, 2  Mutations in either the TSC1 gene on chromosome 9q343 or the TSC2 gene on chromosome 16p13.34 cause TSC. The TSC1 and TSC2 gene products, TSC1 and TSC2, interact to form a protein complex. TSC2 contains a GTPase-activating protein domain and the TSC1–TSC2 complex acts on the rheb GTPase to prevent the rheb-GTP-dependent stimulation of cell growth through the mammalian target of rapamycin (mTOR).5 In cells lacking either TSC1 or TSC2, the downstream targets of mTOR, including p70 S6 kinase (S6K) and ribosomal protein S6, are constitutively phosphorylated.6, 7 The identification of the role of the TSC1–TSC2 complex in regulating mTOR activity has made it possible to compare TSC1 and TSC2 variants found in the normal population with variants identified in individuals with symptoms of TSC. The effects of amino-acid changes on TSC1–TSC2 complex formation, on the activation of rheb GTPase activity by the complex and on the phosphorylation status of S6K and S6 can be determined.8  Comprehensive screens for mutations at both the TSC1 and TSC2 loci have been performed in several large cohorts of TSC patients, and a wide variety of different pathogenic mutations have been described.9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15 Although ∼20% of the mutations identified in the TSC2 gene are missense changes, missense mutations in the TSC1 gene appear much less frequently. One simple explanation for this observation is that TSC1 missense mutations are rare because the majority of TSC patients have a mutation in the TSC2 gene. According to the TSC1 mutation database,16 22 putative missense mutations have been identified in TSC patients. However, only one of these is a confirmed de novo mutation. Here, we investigate the effects of 10 TSC1 missense changes (c.350T>C (p.L117P), c.539T>C (p.L180P), c.572T>A (p.L191H), c.671T>G (p.M224R), c.737G>A (p.R246K), c.913G>A (p.G305R), c.913G>T (p.G305W), c.1526G>A (p.R509Q), c.3103G>A (p.G1035S) and c.3290G>A (p.R1097H)) on TSC1–TSC2 function. We compared these TSC1 variants with wild-type TSC1 and three truncation variants: c.379_381delTGT (p.128delV), c.593_595delACT (p.N198F199delinsI) and c.2075C>T (p.R692X). Our analysis demonstrates that TSC1 missense mutations reduce steady-state levels of TSC1, resulting in increased mTOR activity and leading to the symptoms of TSC.  Go to: Materials and methods Patient characteristics  Samples from patients with either a putative or definite diagnosis of TSC were received for mutation analysis. Details on clinical symptoms were obtained from the treating physicians who were sent a standardised clinical evaluation form (see Supplementary Table 1).  Mutation analysis  DNA was extracted from peripheral blood using standard techniques. Mutation analysis was performed as described earlier,13 or by direct sequence analysis of all TSC1 and TSC2 coding exons and exon/intron boundaries. In addition, both genes were analysed using the multiplex ligation-dependent probe amplification assay (MRC Holland, Amsterdam, The Netherlands).  To investigate whether the identified changes had an effect on splicing, three different splice-site prediction programs were used,17, 18, 19 as described earlier.13  Generation of constructs and antisera  Expression constructs encoding C-terminal YFP- and myc-tagged TSC1 variants were derived using the QuikChange site-directed mutagenesis kit (Stratagene, La Jolla, CA, USA). In each case, the complete open reading frame of the mutated construct was verified by sequence analysis. The other constructs used in this study have been described earlier.8, 20, 21 Polyclonal rabbit antisera specific for human TSC1 and TSC2 have been described earlier.21 Other antibodies were purchased from Cell Signaling Technology (Danvers, MA, USA).  Functional analysis of TSC1 variants  Expression of TSC1 variants in transfected cells Human embryonal kidney (HEK) 293T cells seeded into 6-cm diameter dishes were transfected with a 1:1 mixture of the TSC1 and TSC2 expression constructs using Lipofectamine Plus (Invitrogen, Carlsbad, CA, USA), following the manufacturer's instructions. Two days after transfection, the cells were lysed in 50 m Tris-HCl (pH 8.0), 100 m NaCl, 50 m NaF, 0.5 m EDTA and 1% Triton X-100 plus protease inhibitors (Roche, Basel, Switzerland) and separated into supernatant and pellet fractions by centrifugation at 10 000 g for 10 min at 4°C as described earlier.22 Wild-type TSC1 and the TSC1 variants were immunoprecipitated from the supernatant fractions by incubation with a monoclonal antibody against the C-terminal myc epitope tag for 90 min at 4°C before incubation with Protein G beads (GE Healthcare, Uppsala, Sweden). After gentle agitation for 90 min at 4°C, the beads were washed three times with a >50-fold excess of lysis buffer. The immunoprecipitated proteins were detected by immunoblotting. Blots were developed using enhanced chemiluminescent detection (GE Healthcare).8  Immunoblot analysis of S6K T389 phosphorylation in cells overexpressing TSC1 variants HEK 293T cells were transfected with a 4:2:1 mixture of the TSC1, TSC2 and S6K expression constructs. A total of 1.75 μg DNA was diluted in 200 μl Dulbecco's modified Eagle's medium (DMEM) containing 7 μg polyethyleneimine (Polysciences, Warrington, PA, USA). Where necessary, an empty expression vector (pcDNA3; Invitrogen) was added to make up the total amount of DNA. After 15 min at room temperature, the DNA/polyethyleneimine complexes were added to 80% confluent cells in 3.5-cm diameter dishes. After 4 h at 37°C, the transfection mixture was replaced with DMEM containing 10% foetal calf serum. Twenty-four hours after transfection, the cells were harvested and analysed by immunoblotting as before or by near infrared fluorescent detection on an Odyssey™ Infrared Imager (169 μm resolution, medium quality with 0 mm focus offset) (Li-Cor Biosciences, Lincoln, NE, USA). The integrated intensities of the protein bands were determined using the Odyssey software (default settings with background correction; 3-pixel width border average method). The mean ratios of the T389-phosphorylated S6K signal to the total S6K signal (T389/S6K) and the total TSC2 signal to the total TSC1 signal (TSC2/TSC1) were determined relative to wild-type TSC1 from at least three independent experiments (wild-type T389/S6K and TSC2/TSC1 ratios=1).  Immunofluorescent detection of S235/236 phosphorylation of ribosomal protein S6 in TSC1-deficient cells Tsc1−/− mouse embryo fibroblasts (MEFs)7 were transfected with expression constructs encoding wild-type TSC1 or the TSC1 variants, using Lipofectamine Plus (Invitrogen), following the manufacturer's instructions. Twenty-four hours after transfection, S6 (S235/236) phosphorylation in the transfected cells was detected by immunofluorescent microscopy using a rabbit polyclonal antibody specific for S235/236-phosphorylated S6.23 TSC1 variants were identified either directly (for C-terminal-tagged TSC1-YFP variants) or with a mouse monoclonal antibody against the myc epitope tag (for C-terminal-tagged TSC1-myc variants). If possible, at least 50 cells expressing each TSC1 variant were counted per experiment and the number of cells showing a clear reduction in S6 (S235/236) phosphorylation was noted. The mean proportions of expressing cells with reduced S6 phosphorylation were calculated from at least three independent experiments.  Go to: Results Patient characteristics and mutation analysis  The TSC1 c.350T>C (p.L117P) change was detected in two generations of a family with TSC (Figure 1a). The index patient (I:1) had epilepsy since the age of 22 years and fulfilled the diagnostic criteria for definite TSC, with facial angiofibroma, ungual fibroma, hypomelanotic macules, a shagreen patch and cerebral white matter migration lines. No mental disability was reported. The youngest child (II:2) had the c.350T>C change. Despite being somewhat hyperactive, this child developed normally until 4 years of age when epileptic seizures occurred and development stagnated. The child is now severely mentally retarded. No information was available about other signs of TSC. The eldest child (II:1), who could not yet be tested for the c.350T>C change, suffered severe anoxia at birth and has severe infantile encephalopathy with spastic tetraplegia and epilepsy.  Figure 1 Figure 1 Pedigrees of the investigated families with TSC. Arrows indicate the index cases. Open symbols indicate no signs or symptoms of TSC; black symbols indicate individuals with definite TSC; hatched symbols indicate individuals with possible TSC. A question ... The TSC1 c.671T>G (p.M224R) and TSC1 c.3103G>A (p.G1035S) changes were identified in two generations of a family with TSC24 (Figure 1b). The index case (II:3) had definite TSC with multiple shagreen patches, hypomelanotic macules, ungual fibromas, dental pits, epilepsy and severe mental disability. One parent (I:2) and both siblings (II:1 and II:2) of the index case also fulfilled the diagnostic criteria for definite TSC. Individual I:2, who was seizure-free and of below-average intelligence (IQ 73), had skin lesions pathognomonic for TSC. Individual II:1, who was of normal intelligence (IQ 94), had seizures, cortical tubers and multiple TSC skin lesions. Individual II:2 had epilepsy, below-average intelligence (IQ 67) and multiple TSC skin lesions. All the affected individuals in this family were heterozygous for the c.671T>G and c.3103G>A changes. Three affected individuals (I:2, II:1 and II:2) were heterozygous for a polymorphism in the TSC2 gene (TSC2 c.1276-32C>G). The index case was homozygous for the wild-type TSC2 1276-32C allele, consistent with TSC segregating with a mutation at the TSC1 locus in this family.  The TSC1 c.539T>C (p.L180P) change was detected in three generations of a family with TSC (Figure 1c). Individual I:2 had an ungual fibroma as the only reported sign of TSC. Individual II:2 had epilepsy, no mental disability, skin signs typical for TSC and a subependymal giant cell astrocytoma as well as other brain lesions consistent with a definite diagnosis of TSC. Individual II:3, the half-sibling of II:2, had typical TSC-associated skin lesions and possible mild mental retardation. Individual II:4, the other half-sibling of II:2, had a history of seizures during puberty and some skin tags, not typical of TSC. Individual III:1, the child of II:2, had epilepsy, and typical TSC-associated skin and brain lesions. Individual III:2, the sibling of III:1, had multiple cardiac rhabdomyoma and Wolff–Parkinson–White syndrome. No mental disability was reported for either individual III:1 or III:2. TSC did not cosegregate with markers mapping close to the TSC2 locus on chromosome 16p13.3, and no candidate TSC2 mutation was identified in the index case.  The TSC1 c.572T>A (p.L191H) change was identified in an individual who met the clinical criteria for definite TSC, including typical skin, heart and brain lesions. The individual had a history of seizures but no mental disability was reported. The c.572T>A change was absent in the individual's parents and child (Figure 1d). None of these individuals showed any signs of TSC.  Two TSC patients, one Finnish and one Dutch, were identified with the TSC1 c.737G>A (p.R246K) change. No information was available on the parents of either of these two individuals. The Finnish individual had typical TSC-associated skin, brain and kidney lesions. No mental disability or history of seizures was reported. The Dutch individual was also reported to have definite TSC. The sibling of this individual did not have any signs of TSC and did not carry the c.737G>A change.  The TSC1 c.1526G>A (p.R509Q) change was identified in a child of African origin, suspected of having TSC due to an echodensity that was detected prenatally in the septum of the heart. After birth, physical examination of the child did not reveal any signs of TSC but multiple congenital malformations that fitted with VACTERL (vertebral anomalies, atresia, cardiac malformations, tracheoesophageal fistula, renal anomalies and limb anomalies) association were identified. The same c.1526G>A change was identified in one of the parents. Neither parent reported any signs of TSC.  The TSC1 c.3290G>A (p.R1097H) change was identified in a child with cardiac rhabdomyoma who subsequently developed epilepsy at the age of 3 months. An MRI scan of the brain showed multiple subependymal nodules, cortical tubers and white matter abnormalities. This individual fulfilled the diagnostic criteria for definite TSC, with angiomyolipoma and multiple skin lesions. The c.3290G>A change was also identified in one of the parents; neither parent showed any signs of TSC.  The TSC1 c.379_381delTGT (p.128delV) change was detected in a child with epilepsy and a definite diagnosis of TSC (multiple skin signs, subependymal nodules and angiomyolipoma). No mental disability was reported and no information was available on the phenotypic or genetic status of the parents. The same change has been reported in another unrelated TSC patient.25 The TSC1 c.593_595delACT (p.N198F199delinsI), c.913G>A (p.G305R) and c.913G>T (p.G305W) missense changes have been reported earlier to cosegregate with TSC in three independent families.15, 26  In all the above cases, no other putative pathogenic mutations were identified and comparison of the allele ratios of the index cases and parents (where possible) did not reveal any evidence for somatic mosaicism in the leukocyte DNA.  Comparative analysis of TSC1 amino-acid substitutions  During our initial mutation screening, the L117P change was the only putative pathogenic TSC1 amino-acid substitution identified. We compared the L117P variant with wild-type TSC1, an earlier characterised TSC1 in-frame deletion (N198F199delinsI)27 and to a common TSC1 truncation mutation, R692X3, 10 (Figure 2). Wild-type TSC1 was detected predominantly in the post 10 000 g pellet fraction, whereas the three variants were detected in the supernatant fraction (Figure 2a). Upon coexpression of TSC2, the variants as well as wild-type TSC1 were detected in both subcellular fractions (Figure 2b). TSC2 was coimmunoprecipitated from the supernatant fraction with all three variants, although clearly less effectively than with wild-type TSC1.  Figure 2 Figure 2 Analysis of the TSC1 L117P variant. Wild-type TSC1 (wt) or the L117P, N198F199delinsI (del) or R692X variants (all containing a C-terminal myc epitope tag) were overexpressed in HEK 293T cells alone (a) or in the presence of coexpressed TSC2 (b). Cell ... Next, we investigated whether the variants could inhibit mTOR signalling. Expression of wild-type TSC1 alone is insufficient to inhibit mTOR activity.28 Therefore, the variants were coexpressed with TSC2 and S6K in HEK 293T cells, and S6K T389 phosphorylation was analysed by immunoblotting (Figure 3a). To try and achieve comparable expression levels of the different variants, we used different quantities of the corresponding expression constructs. Coexpression of wild-type TSC1 and TSC2 resulted in a reduction in S6K T389 phosphorylation, even with low levels of the TSC1 expression construct. In contrast, coexpression of TSC2 with the variants did not reduce S6K T389 phosphorylation, indicating that they were unable to inhibit mTOR effectively. Compared with wild-type TSC1, the L117P and N198F199delinsI variants were detected at low levels, even when the quantity of transfected expression construct DNA was increased.  Figure 3 Figure 3 TSC1–TSC2-dependent inhibition of mTOR signalling by the TSC1 L117P variant. (a) T389 phosphorylation of S6K in HEK 293T cells coexpressing TSC2, myc-tagged S6K and myc-tagged wild-type TSC1 (wt) or the TSC1 L117P, N198F199delinsI (del) or R692X ... To confirm that the L117P and N198F199delinsI variants were unable to inhibit mTOR, they were expressed in Tsc1−/− MEFs. These cells exhibit constitutive S6 (S235/236) phosphorylation.7 As shown in Figure 3b, wild-type YFP-tagged TSC1 reduced S6 phosphorylation in >60% of the YFP-positive Tsc1−/− MEFs, consistent with earlier results.8 In contrast, S6 phosphorylation was reduced in <30% of cells expressing the L117P or N198F199delinsI variants (paired t-test P<0.001). Nevertheless, a reduction in S6 phosphorylation was observed in a higher proportion of variant-expressing cells than in cells expressing YFP only (paired t-test P<0.02). Therefore, although both variants were clearly less effective than wild-type TSC, we could not exclude the possibility that the variants can antagonise mTOR activity.  As a result of on-going TSC1 and TSC2 mutation screening, we identified eight additional TSC1 single amino-acid changes: p.128delV, p.L180P, p.L191H, p.M224R, p.R246K, p.R509Q, p.G1035S and p.R1097H. The p.M224R and p.G1035S changes cosegregated with TSC in a single family (Figure 1b). To investigate the effects of these two amino-acid substitutions on TSC1 function, the corresponding single and double variants were compared with wild-type TSC1 and the R692X truncation. As shown in Figure 4a, the M224R variant and the M224R/G1035S double variant were detected at lower levels than wild-type TSC1 and the G1035S variant. Furthermore, the expression of wild-type TSC1 or the G1035S variant reduced S6 phosphorylation in >50% of transfected Tsc1−/− MEFs whereas <20% of the MEFs expressing the M224R, M224R/G1035S or R692X variants showed a reduction in S6 phosphorylation (Figure 4b), indicating that the M224R substitution is the pathogenic mutation in this family and that the G1035S substitution is a cosegregating neutral variant.24 We did not observe any differences between the M224R single mutant and the M224R/G1035S double mutant.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Results of the functional assays on the M224R, G1035S and M224R/G1035S variants. (a) TSC1–TSC2-dependent inhibition of S6K-T389 phosphorylation. TSC2, S6K and wild-type TSC1 (wt TSC1), or the TSC1 variants, were expressed in HEK 293T cells. T389 ... To determine whether the 128delV, L180P, L191H, R246K, R509Q and R1097H amino-acid changes were pathogenic, we compared these variants with the previously characterised L117P and R692X variants, and with two additional putative missense variants, G305R and G305W15 (Figure 5). The R246K, G305R, G305W, R509Q and R1097H variants were detected at comparable levels with wild-type TSC1 (Figure 5a and b) and were just as effective at inhibiting S6K T389 phosphorylation (Figure 5a and c). In contrast, the 128delV, L180P and L191H variants were detected at low levels, similar to the L117P and M224R variants (Figure 5a and b). Furthermore, S6K T389 phosphorylation was not inhibited by the expression of these variants (Figure 5a and c). Consistent with the immunoblot data, the expression of the L117P, 128delV, L180P, L191H, M224R, M224R/G1035S and R692X variants in Tsc1−/− MEFs reduced S6 phosphorylation in <40% of cells, whereas wild-type TSC1 and the R246K, G305R, G305W, R509Q, G1035S and R1097H variants reduced S6 phosphorylation in >50% of the expressing cells (Figure 5d).  Figure 5 Figure 5 Analysis of the 128delV, L180P, L191H, R246K, G305R, G305W, R509Q and R1097H variants. (a) TSC1-dependent inhibition of S6K T389 phosphorylation. S6K T389 phosphorylation was determined by immunoblotting as before except that the blots were developed ... We concluded that the 128delV, L180P and L191H changes destabilise TSC1, resulting in increased mTOR activity. The R246K, G305R, G305W, R509Q, G1035S and R1097H amino-acid substitutions did not affect TSC1 function in our assays.  Splice-site prediction analysis  Splice-site prediction analysis of the identified variants was performed according to a standard protocol13 using three independent splice-site prediction programs.17, 18, 19 Effects were predicted for four of the variants: TSC1 c.379_381delTGT (p.128delV), c.737G>A (p.R246K) c.913G>A (p.G305R) and c.913G>T (p.G305W).  According to two of the prediction programs, the c.379_381delTGT mutation created a potential new acceptor site within exon 6. However, the values of the new site (0.48 and 0.33 in Fruitfly and NetGene2, respectively) were lower than the values of the wild-type acceptor site (0.98 and 0.97, respectively). It is therefore unlikely that this sequence change affects splicing.  The R246K, G305R and G305W amino-acid substitutions did not affect TSC1 function. However, the c.737G>A (p.R246K) nucleotide substitution altered the last nucleotide of exon 8 and all three programs indicated that this change disrupted the intron 8 splice donor site, leaving a new potential donor site 90 nucleotides downstream. Similarly, the c.913G>A (p.G305R) and c.913G>T (p.G305W) substitutions affect the last nucleotide of exon 9 and were predicted by all three programs to disrupt splicing to the intron 9 donor site. We concluded that these three variants are most likely pathogenic splice-site mutations, not missense mutations. Unfortunately, the effect of these sequence changes on TSC1 RNA splicing could not be confirmed experimentally because no new samples could be obtained.  An overview of the functional assays and splice-site analysis is presented in Supplementary Table 2.  Go to: Discussion Mutation analysis of the TSC1 and TSC2 genes in individuals with TSC, and in those suspected of having the disease is important for diagnosis and genetic counselling. During our screening of a cohort of approximately 900 index cases with TSC, or possible TSC, we identified eight putative pathogenic TSC1 missense changes, c.350T>C (p.L117P), c.539T>C (p.L180P), c.572T>A (p.L191H), c.671T>G (p.M224R), c.737G>A (p.R246K), c.1526G>A (p.R509Q), c.3103G>A (p.G1035S) and c.3290G>A (p.R1097H), as well as a putative pathogenic in-frame deletion mutant, TSC1 c.379_381delTGT (p.128delV). We compared these variants with the earlier reported c.913G>A (p.G305R), c.913G>T (p.G305W), c.593_595delACT (p.N198F199delinsI) and c.2074C>T (p.R692X) mutants.2, 15, 26  The TSC1 L117P, 128delV, L180P, L191H, N198F199delinsI and M224R changes resulted in reduced levels of TSC1 and a reduction in TSC1-dependent inhibition of mTOR activity, as detected by immunoblotting. In each case, the functional characterisation was consistent with the genetic and phenotypic findings and we concluded that the changes were pathogenic.  The R246K, G305R, G305W, R509Q, G1035S and R1097H amino-acid substitutions did not affect TSC1 function in our assays. However, we concluded that the TSC1 c.737G>A (p.R246K), c.913G>A (p.G305R) and c.913G>T (p.G305W) changes were most likely pathogenic splice-site mutations. The c.737G>A transition was predicted to destroy the splice donor site at the 3′ end of exon 8 and the c.913G>A and c.913G>T substitutions affect the last nucleotide of exon 9, also disrupting the normal splice donor site. The c.1526G>A (p.R509Q), c.3103G>A (p.G1035S) and c.3290G>A (p.R1097H) variants did not appear to affect either TSC1 RNA splicing or TSC1 function. The c.1526G>A change was identified in a foetus suspected of having TSC. However, after birth, the child showed multiple congenital malformations that fitted with VACTERL association, and a normal physical examination of the child did not reveal any signs of TSC. We concluded that this variant is unlikely to cause TSC. The c.3103G>A variant cosegregated with the pathogenic c.671T>G (p.M224R) variant and TSC in a single family.24 We concluded that the p.G1035S substitution was a neutral variant, consistent with previous reports.29, 30 The c.3290G>A change was identified in a child with definite TSC and in one unaffected parent, and we concluded that it was also most likely a rare neutral variant.  Here we demonstrate that specific amino-acid substitutions close to the N-terminal of TSC1 (amino acids 117–224) reduce the steady-state levels of TSC1. The location and the effects of these changes on TSC1 function are very similar to a small number of missense mutations described recently in some cases of bladder cancer,31 suggesting that the pathogenetic mechanisms underlying TSC-associated lesions and tumours of the bladder may be related.  Several studies indicate that TSC1 mutations are associated with a less severe clinical presentation in TSC patients.9, 12, 13, 15 The small number of patients that we identified with a TSC1 missense mutation made it difficult to identify a specific phenotypic spectrum in this group. Nevertheless, the use of functional assays to differentiate between polymorphisms and pathogenic mutations, in TSC and other diseases, will not only facilitate the identification of pathogenic mutations but also help investigate possible genotype–phenotype correlations and provide insight into how specific amino-acid residues contribute to protein function.  
1342||The protein kinase v-akt murine thymoma viral oncogene homolog (AKT), a key regulator of cell survival and proliferation, is frequently hyperactivated in human cancers. Intramolecular pleckstrin homology (PH) domain–kinase domain (KD) interactions are important in maintaining AKT in an inactive state. AKT activation proceeds after a conformational change that dislodges the PH from the KD. To understand these autoinhibitory interactions, we generated mutations at the PH–KD interface and found that most of them lead to constitutive activation of AKT. Such mutations are likely another mechanism by which activation may occur in human cancers and other diseases. In support of this likelihood, we found somatic mutations in AKT1 at the PH–KD interface that have not been previously described in human cancers. Furthermore, we show that the AKT1 somatic mutants are constitutively active, leading to oncogenic signaling. Additionally, our studies show that the AKT1 mutants are not effectively inhibited by allosteric AKT inhibitors, consistent with the requirement for an intact PH–KD interface for allosteric inhibition. These results have important implications for therapeutic intervention in patients with AKT mutations at the PH–KD interface.  Keywords: interdomain, AKT-targeting, PI3K-pathway, next generation sequencing, BaF3 The mammalian v-akt murine thymoma viral oncogene homolog (AKT) family consists of three members, AKT1/protein kinase B (PKB)a, AKT2/PKBβ, and AKT3/PKBγ (Fig. S1). They belong to the protein kinase A, kinase G, and kinase C (AGC) superfamily of serine/threonine kinases and are involved in regulating key cellular processes, including cell proliferation, survival, growth, metabolism, and angiogenesis (1). The AKTs share a common domain architecture consisting of an N-terminal pleckstrin homology (PH) domain, a kinase domain (KD), and a C-terminal regulatory region that contains a hydrophobic motif (2, 3).  AKT functions downstream of class IA PI3K (4). After growth factor stimulation, activated PI3Ks catalyze the conversion of phosphatidylinositol 4,5 bisphosphate to phosphatidylinositol 3,4,5 trisphosphate that directs translocation of AKT to the plasma membrane (5). At the membrane, AKT1 undergoes phosphorylation on two regulatory sites: T308 within the catalytic domain and S473 in the hydrophobic motif through phosphoinositide-dependent kinase 1 (PDK1) and PDK2 mammalian target of Rapamycin (mTORC2), respectively. This phosphorylation leads to its activation and downstream signaling (6).  AKT is frequently activated in cancers, mostly through mutations or amplifications of upstream genes like PIK3CA (7). AKT activation can also result from inactivation or loss of the lipid phosphatase, PTEN (8). Genomic alterations that directly affect AKT also lead to its activation. Whereas AKT1 amplification is rare, AKT2 is frequently amplified in a variety of cancers (9). Recently, a somatic mutation in the PH domain of AKT1 was identified in a subset of human carcinomas (10). This mutation results in the substitution of glutamic acid at codon 17 of AKT1 with lysine (E17K) and alters the lipid-binding specificity of AKT, leading to pathological membrane association and constitutive signaling (10, 11). Other than human cancers, germ-line and somatic E17K mutations in AKT have been identified in Proteus syndrome, human hypoglycemia, and hemimegalencephaly (12–14).  Recent molecular modeling and structure-based studies suggest that, under basal conditions, interactions between the PH and KD maintain AKT in a closed conformation (PH-in) (15–17). In this state, PDK1 is unable to access and phosphorylate T308. In response to upstream signaling, AKT shifts from an autoinhibited PH-in confirmation to an open PH-out state, leading to its phosphorylation and activation. Molecular dynamic studies and crystal structure of AKT suggest that the interactions between the PH and KD are important for maintaining the kinase in an inactive state.  In this study, we have performed a systematic analysis to understand the effects of perturbing PH–KD interactions on activation of AKT. We show that disrupting interdomain contacts by mutating residues at the PH–KD interface leads to AKT activation. Given this finding, we sequenced a large number of human tumors to see if mutations at the PH–KD contact sites occur in cancers. Interestingly, we found human tumors that carry mutations in AKT at these sites, indicating that disruption of PH–KD interactions is a mechanism for AKT activation in cancers. Furthermore, we show that these tumor-specific mutations are oncogenic and that they alter sensitivity to allosteric AKT inhibitors.  Go to: RESULTS Perturbing PH–KD Contacts Lead to AKT Activation. To assess the activation status of AKT, we measured its ability to promote growth factor-independent survival of IL-3–dependent BaF3 cells. The BaF3 pro-B cells can be rendered growth factor-independent by enforced expression of oncogenes (18). We generated BaF3 cells expressing WT AKT1, Myristoylated (Myr), or the E17K AKT1 mutant and found that activated AKT by itself was unable to promote factor independence (Fig. 1A). However, coexpression of Myr or E17K AKT1 and an activated form of the MAP2 kinase mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK)/extracellular-signal-regulated kinase (ERK) kinase (MEK1) (Mek1 ΔN3, S218E, S222D) (19) promoted factor-independent growth of BaF3 cells (Fig. 1A). Although WT AKT1 along with active MEK1 (MEK1 N3) showed some activity in this assay, it was markedly less compared with mutant AKT1. This result is consistent with previous reports that show cooperation between AKT and MEK in oncogenic transformation (20, 21).  Fig. 1. Fig. 1. PH–KD contact site mutations lead to AKT activation. (A) IL-3–independent proliferation of BaF3 cells expressing empty vector (EV), WT, Myr, or E17K AKT1 alone or combined with MEK1 N3. (B) An open book representation of PH (purple) and ... We used the BaF3 assay to investigate the consequence of disrupting PH–KD interactions. Using the recently published full-length structure of AKT1 (17), we identified residues at the PH–KD interface. Mutations at these sites were designed to compromise the PH–KD interaction (Materials and Methods). We generated a library of 35 such AKT1 mutants (Fig. 1B and Dataset S1), including negative (WT AKT1) and positive (Myr and E17K AKT1) controls for activity. We used this library to derive a pool of BaF3 cells that stably coexpressed the mutants along with MEK1 N3. After allowing growth in the absence of IL-3 for 3–4 d, the proportion of various mutants in the pool was determined relative to the input at 0 h using next-generation sequencing (Fig. 1C). Each mutation was scored based on a normalized ratio of observed frequency at a given time point compared with the input frequency, and these ratios were then normalized to the ratios for WT AKT1. As expected, AKT1 E17K was more than 50 times enriched over WT. Similarly, mutants, such as T81Y and D323A, were also strongly enriched (>15-fold over WT), indicating that these mutations lead to AKT activation. Other mutants (R23A, N53A, F55Y, L78T, Q79E, W80A, E191A, T195I, V270A, V271A, L321A, D325A, and R328A) showed moderate enrichment (two- to sixfold over WT) in the assay and are likely activating (Fig. 1D and Dataset S1).  To further understand the effect of PH–KD interface mutants, we generated BaF3 cell lines expressing some of the AKT1 mutants that promoted survival and some that did not promote survival in our initial screen. We then assessed the T308 and S473 phosphorylation status (pT308 and pS473) of AKT in these lines. Consistent with the survival activity observed in the screen, we found that mutants, such as F55Y, T81Y, T195I, L321A, and D325A, showed elevated levels of pT308 and pS473 (Fig. 1E), confirming the positive correlation between phosphorylated AKT (pAKT) status and cell survival (T308: R2 = 0.71, P value = 8.735e-05; S473: R2 = 0.66, P value = 0.0002158) (Fig. 1 F and G). However, R23A, although scored positive for survival in our initial screen, failed to show increased pAKT, indicating that it potentially was a false positive. Furthermore, AKT mutants Y18S, I19E, Q59E, R200A, L202F, and L362R, which did not support IL-3–independent survival, also did not show an increase in pAKT levels (Fig. 1E). These results indicate that disrupting the PH–KD contacts leads to constitutive phosphorylation of AKT. In agreement with this result, a recent study showed that deletion of AKT1 PH domain led to its constitutive S473 phopshorylation (22).  Identification of AKT Somatic Mutations in Cancer. Given that perturbation of the PH–KD interface led to AKT activation, we wanted to assess if such mutations occur in human primary tumors. To identify potential AKT mutations, we sequenced all of the coding exons of AKT1, AKT2, and AKT3 in a total of 394 human primary tumor samples consisting of 65 colorectal, 51 breast, 48 nonsmall-cell lung (NSCLC) adenocarcinoma (adeno), 43 NSCLC (squamous), 43 renal carcinoma, 37 melanoma, 33 gastric, 32 ovarian, 15 esophageal, 11 hepatocellular, 10 small-cell lung cancer, and 6 others (5 lung large cell and 1 lung cancer other) (Dataset S2). We found protein-altering, somatic AKT1 mutations in 2 of 51 (4%) breast and 1 of 65 (1.5%) colon samples. We also found AKT2 somatic mutations in 2 of 43 (∼5%) NSCLC (adeno) samples (Fig. 2A and Dataset S3). Previous studies have reported protein-altering mutations in AKT1, primarily in codon 17 (E17K) in ∼5% of breast cancers (10, 23). Mutations at other residues in AKT family members, although quite rare, have been reported (Fig. 2A and Dataset S4) (24–27).  Fig. 2. Fig. 2. Somatic AKT mutations in human cancer. (A) Somatic mutations in AKT family members. Horizontal black bars indicate residues conserved across AKT1, AKT2, and AKT3. (B) Localization of somatic mutations mapped onto AKT1 crystal structure. The central portion ... Other than the E17K mutation, we have previously reported an AKT1 mutation at codon 52, L52R (Fig. 2A and Datasets S3 and S4) (28). L52 is at the PH–KD interface and makes hydrophobic contacts with V270, V271, Y326, and the methylene portion of R328 in the KD (Fig. 1B). Although the L52A mutant did not support IL-3–independent survival of BaF3 cells (Fig. 1D), the L52R mutation is likely to weaken PH–KD interaction, because it is predicated to replace favorable hydrophobic interactions with an unfavorable interaction with R328 (Fig. 2B). The synthetic mutant D323A was active in our screen (Fig. 1D), suggesting that D323H will also be constitutively active, because a histidine is even more disruptive to the interdomain contacts than alanine. The R96 residue located in the main PH domain helix is far removed from the KD interface and hence, unlikely to promote activation through disruption of PH–KD interactions (Fig. 2B). Electron density for residues K189 to E198 is not observed in the full-length AKT1 crystal structure (Fig. 2B), and hence, a structure-based assessment of its effect on AKT1 activity could not be made.  To understand the biological significance of the somatic mutations identified in this study and a few published somatic AKT1 mutations, we tested their ability to support IL-3–independent growth of BaF3 cells coexpressing MEK1 N3. We found that L52R, Q79K, and D323H, like Myr and E17K AKT1, supported growth factor-independent survival of BaF3 cells (Fig. 2C), and this support was dependent on their kinase activity (Fig. S2). Consistently, mutants that promoted survival also showed elevated levels of pAKT (Fig. 2D).  AKT1 Somatic Mutants Signal Constitutively and Lead to Transformation. To further assess the functional relevance of the AKT1 somatic mutations, we tested their effect on signaling in NIH 3T3 cells expressing FLAG-tagged WT, Myr, E17K, L52R, K189N, or D323H AKT1. Immunoblot analysis showed that, similar to Myr AKT1, all mutants (except K189N) showed elevated pAKT levels compared with WT (Fig. 3A). Consistent with this finding, we observed increased phosphorylation of the AKT substrates FOXO and S6 ribosomal protein (Fig. 3A). Also, we observed elevation of phospho PRAS40 levels, although the activation was delayed in E17K and D323H mutant-expressing NIH 3T3 cells (Fig. 3A and Fig. S3 A and B).  Fig. 3. Fig. 3. AKT1 somatic mutations are activating. (A) NIH 3T3 cells stably expressing AKT1 somatic mutations show elevated pT308 and pS473. (B) Representative image showing anchorage-independent growth of NIH 3T3 cells expressing the indicated AKT1 constructs. ( ... To further characterize the AKT1 mutants, we tested their transforming ability in an anchorage-independent growth assay. We found that NIH 3T3 cells expressing Myr or mutant AKT1 formed ∼20-fold more colonies compared with controls (Fig. 3B). To further characterize these mutants, we used a 3D morphogenesis assay using MCF10A breast epithelial cells. MCF10A cells, when cultured on a 3D matrix, form polarized acini with a hollow lumen (29). Expression of oncogenes (including Myr AKT1) in this system is known to disrupt acinar architecture (30). We found that, like Myr AKT1, expression of E17K, L52R, K189N, D323H, or Q79K led to formation of disorganized multiacinar structures (Fig. 3C), and it was dependent on the kinase activity of these mutants (Fig. 3C). In contrast, the mutants F35L and R96W, consistent with their inability to promote survival (Fig. 2C), did not affect morphogenesis (Fig. 3C). Interestingly, although the K189N mutant did not support BaF3 survival or increase downstream signaling (Figs. 2 C and D and and3A3A and Fig. S3C), it promoted anchorage-independent growth and acinar disruption (Fig. 3 B and C). Consistent with this finding, MCF10A cells expressing the K189N mutant showed elevated pAKT and increased pS6RP levels compared with WT when cultured on a 3D matrix (Fig. 3D).  AKT1 PH–KD Mutants Weaken Interdomain Interactions and Show Impaired Plasma Membrane Translocation. Although the cancer-specific AKT1 mutations (L52R and D323H) occur at positions predicted to disrupt PH–KD interactions, the amino acid substitutions observed were different from the synthetic mutants generated and analyzed earlier (Fig. 1 B, D, and E). To directly test whether these somatic mutations weaken interdomain interactions, we performed a mammalian two-hybrid assay using AKT PH and KD constructs fused to the VP16 activation domain and Gal4 DNA-binding domain, respectively. The strength of the interaction was measured using a luciferase reporter, where the luciferase activity is proportional to the strength of the interaction. We found that the L52R PH/WT-KD, Q79K-PH/WT-KD, and WT-PH/D323H-KD combinations showed significant reduction in the interaction signal compared with WT-PH/WT-KD, confirming that these mutants are deficient in the PH–KD interaction (Fig. 3E). In contrast, F35L-PH/WT-KD, R96W-PH/WT-KD, and WT-PH/K189N-KD combinations in the two-hybrid assay showed interaction that was comparable with the WT-PH/WT-KD pair, indicating that these mutations do not affect PH–KD interactions. Interestingly, the E17K-PH/WT-KD combination also showed a reduced interaction compared with the WT-PH/WT-KD combination, suggesting that the E17K mutation may also weaken PH–KD interaction, although this effect was modest (Fig. 3E).  To further understand the mechanism of activation of AKT mutants, we tested their cellular localization. Previous studies indicate that mutations in lipid-binding PH domains that result in dysregulated membrane recruitment can lead to carcinogenesis (31). To assess the effects of the PH domain mutant L52R on subcellular localization and membrane translocation, we generated GFP-tagged L52R PH domain along with GFP-tagged WT and E17K PH domains as controls. In the absence of stimulation, whereas WT AKT1 was distributed throughout the cytoplasm and nucleus, AKT1 E17K was constitutively localized to the plasma membrane as previously reported (10). In contrast, the L52R PH domain was distributed throughout the cell, behaving like the WT PH domain. However, on growth factor stimulation, unlike WT, the mutant L52R PH domain did not translocate to the membrane (Fig. 3F and Movies S1, S2, and S3). This result suggests that, unlike E17K, which is activated in response to altered lipid affinity and localization, the L52R mutant is most likely activated in the cytoplasm because of absence of autoinhibitory interactions. Consistent with this finding, a recent study has shown that activation of AKT can occur in the cytoplasm independent of membrane localization (32).  Disruption of AKT2 and AKT3 PH–KD Interactions Leads to Their Activation. Given the common domain architecture of the AKT family members, we tested whether disrupting PH–KD interactions in AKT2 and AKT3 can lead to their activation. To test, we generated AKT2 mutants L52R and D324H and AKT3 mutants L51R and D320H (equivalent of AKT1 L52R and D323H), all of which are predicted to disrupt PH–KD interactions (Fig. S4). Because AKT3 E17K mutations in melanoma (33) and AKT2 E17K mutations in human hypoglycemina (12) have been reported, we generated the E17K AKT2 and AKT3 mutants along with additional AKT2 and AKT3 somatic mutations that have been identified in human cancers (Fig. 2A). Additionally, we generated Myr AKT2 and Myr AKT3 as positive controls. We stably expressed the AKT2 and AKT3 mutants in NIH 3T3 cells and assessed pAKT. AKT2 E17K, L52R, and D324H, and AKT3 E17K, L51R, and D320H all showed elevated pT308 and pS473 compared with WT AKT2 or AKT3 (Fig. S5A). Consistent with the activation status, these mutants (combined with MEK1 N3) support IL-3–independent survival of BaF3 cells (Fig. S5B). Interestingly, the cancer-specific AKT2 R371H mutant, although it showed elevated pAKT, was not capable of promoting growth factor-independent survival of BaF3. The remaining mutants (AKT2 V90L and R101L and AKT3 Q124L and G171R) did not increase pAKT and were unable to support growth factor-independent survival of BaF3 cells (Fig. S5). Inspections of the homology models generated for full-length AKT2 and AKT3 indicate that these mutations occur in surface-exposed loops and are not proximal to the PH–KD interface (Fig. 2B). Note that, although AKT2 V90L and AKT3 Q124L are in loops not defined in the AKT1 electron density, the termini of these loops are not proximal to the PH–KD interface. Thus, structural analysis does not offer insights into the role of these mutants in cancers.  AKT1 Somatic Mutants Promote Oncogenesis in Vivo. Previous studies have shown that BaF3 cells stably expressing oncogenes promote a leukemia-like disease when implanted in mice, leading to reduced overall survival (34, 35). Because the AKT1 mutants cooperate with active MEK1 to promote factor-independent growth of BaF3 cells (Figs. 1A and and2C),2C), we used this model system to test their tumorigenic potential in vivo. Mice implanted with BaF3 cells coexpressing MEK1 N3 and Myr or mutant AKT1 (E17K, L52R or D323H) showed a median survival of 19–20.5 d. In contrast, mice implanted with cells coexpressing MEK1 N3 and AKT1 WT had a significantly longer median survival of 29 d (Fig. 4). This result is consistent with the fact that AKT1 WT in the context of active MEK1 was able to support IL-3-independent survival of BaF3 cells, although the effect was modest compared with AKT mutants (Fig. 1A and and2C).2C). As expected, mice expressing MEK1 N3 alone (control) were alive at the end of the 55-d study period. Necropsies were performed at 19 d posttransplantation on a cohort of three mice per treatment group to follow disease progression. Consistent with the reduced overall survival, mice implanted with mutant AKT1 had a significant proportion of GFP-tagged BaF3 cells in the bone marrow and spleens (Fig. S6A) and had massively enlarged liver and spleen compared with controls (Fig. S6 B–D). Histological examination of H&E-stained liver, spleen, and bone marrow sections from these mice showed evidence of infiltration with leukemic blasts (Fig. S6E). These results confirm the transforming potential of the AKT1 mutants in vivo.  Fig. 4. Fig. 4. AKT1 mutants promote oncogenesis in vivo. Kaplan–Meier survival curve depicting reduction in overall survival of mice implanted with BaF3 cells expressing AKT1 mutants. (n = 10 for arms; log-rank test P < 0.0001). AKT1 PH–KD Interaction-Deficient Mutants Are Less Sensitive to Allosteric Inhibitors. Several ATP-competitive and allosteric small-molecule inhibitors of AKT are in development and/or clinical trials (36, 37). Previous studies have shown that allosteric AKT inhibitors require an intact PH–KD interface for their activity (17, 38–40). Given that some AKT1 somatic mutants have impaired PH–KD contacts, we predicted that allosteric inhibitors are likely to be less efficacious in inhibiting their activity. We tested this prediction by assaying the activity of two ATP-competitive inhibitors [GNE-692 (41) and GSK690693 (42)] and two allosteric inhibitors [Inhibitor VIII (43) and GNE-929 (Fig. S7)] on recombinant full-length WT and mutant AKT1 enzymes. We also tested the effect of the inhibitors on the proliferation of NIH 3T3 cells expressing WT or mutant AKT1.  We found that, in biochemical activity assays, the ATP-competitive inhibitors GNE-692 and GSK690693 were effective in blocking activity of WT AKT1 (GNE-692 IC50 = 24.3 nM) as well as the mutant enzymes (E17K, L52R, and D323H; GNE-692 IC50 = 3.7–15.8 nM) (Fig. S8A, Fig. S8E, and Dataset S5A). Similarly, the ATP-competitive inhibitors were equally effective against both WT and mutant AKT1 in the cell-based proliferation assay (Fig. S8B and Dataset S5B). In contrast, the allosteric inhibitors, Inhibitor VIII and GNE-929, were less effective against recombinant full-length mutant enzymes (Inhibitor VIII: IC50 = 268.4 nM for L52R; IC50 > 1 μM for D323H) compared with WT AKT1 (Inhibitor VIII: IC50 = 119.3 nM) (Fig. S8C, Fig. S8F, and Dataset S5A). Consistent with this finding, in cell-based assay, we found Inhibitor VIII to be at least 50% less effective at blocking proliferation of cells expressing mutant AKT1 compared with WT AKT (Fig. S8D and Dataset S5B).  To confirm that the reduced sensitivity of the mutants to allosteric inhibitors was caused by impaired PH–KD interactions, we performed an in vitro biochemical reconstitution assay using purified recombinant PH and KD. In this system, allosteric Inhibitor VIII, when assayed against AKT1 KD alone, was unable to block its activity (Fig. 5 A and B). Reconstituting the enzyme by adding back WT PH domain restored the ability of Inhibitor VIII to block enzyme activity, albeit with a threefold higher IC50 (IC50 = 238.8 nM), compared with the full-length WT enzyme (IC50 = 80.8 nM) (Fig. 5 A and B and Dataset S5C). In contrast, reconstitution with mutant PH domain (L52R or E17K) further impaired the ability of Inhibitor VIII in blocking AKT1 (L52R IC50 = 713.5 nM and E17K IC50 > 1 μM) (Fig. 5A and Dataset S5C). Similarly, Inhibitor VIII showed no activity when the WT PH domain was reconstituted with a mutant D323H KD (Fig. 5B). The lack of E17K inhibition by allosteric inhibitors suggests that, in addition to increased affinity for phosphatidylinositol 4,5 bisphosphate (10, 11), this mutation may also affect the PH–KD interaction, leading to its activation. These data confirm the importance of an intact PH–KD interface for AKT1 allosteric inhibitors.  Fig. 5. Fig. 5. Effective AKT inhibition by allosteric inhibitors requires intact PH–KD interaction. (A) Effect of Inhibitor VIII on the kinase activity of recombinant AKT1 WT KD reconstituted with WT or mutant PH domains or (B) AKT1 D323H KD reconstituted with ... Go to: DISCUSSION Recent structural studies indicate that inhibitory interdomain interactions play a crucial role in regulating AKT activation (15, 17). Using a mutational screen, we show here that activation of AKT can result from mutations in residues involved in PH–KD contacts. Furthermore, we report the identification of mutations in human cancers, some of which involve residues at the PH–KD interface.  In addition to the previously identified mutation E17K, we show that the AKT1 PH domain mutant L52R and the KD mutant D323H identified in clinical samples mediate cellular transformation and are oncogenic in vivo. Inspection of the structure of full-length AKT1 reveals that E17, L52, and D323 are at the PH–KD interface and that substitutions at these positions are predicted to perturb PH–KD binding. Consistent with this finding, both L52R and D323H weaken PH–KD binding in two-hybrid assays. Previously, the mechanism of activation of E17K has been attributed to an altered lipid-binding specificity (10, 11). Our results indicate perturbation of interdomain interactions to be an additional mechanism underlying E17K activation.  Taken together, our findings suggest that the oncogenicity of the AKT1 PH–KD interface mutations identified here is caused by their constitutive activation resulting from destabilization of interdomain contacts. The activity of many multidomain proteins is regulated through autoinhibitory intramolecular interactions (44). It is likely that mutational destabilization of such interactions is a general mechanism leading to their inappropriate activation in human disease. In agreement with this likelihood, activating mutations in interdomain contact residues have been described in nonreceptor tyrosine kinases, like JAK2 (in polycythemia vera) and BCR-ABL, as well as phosphatases, such as SHP-2 in Noonan’s syndrome and juvenile myelo-monocytic leukemia (45–48).  Inhibitors targeting the PI3K-AKT pathway members, including AKT, are currently in various stages of development (36, 37). Previous studies have shown that AKT allosteric inhibitors require an intact PH–KD interface, because such inhibitors preferentially bind the closed PH-in conformation (16, 17, 38). Consistent with this result, we found that mutations in AKT that favor an open (PH-out) conformation show reduced sensitivity to allosteric AKT inhibitors, although they retain sensitivity to ATP-competitive inhibitors. This finding indicates that the AKT mutational status has important implications for the choice of inhibitor in the clinic. AKT mutations, although they may function as drivers in naive tumors, can also arise in tumors in response to agents that target upstream components of the AKT pathway. Future studies will be required to assess such mutations and fully understand the predictive and prognostic significance of these mutations in the clinic.  
1345||The protein kinase v-akt murine thymoma viral oncogene homolog (AKT), a key regulator of cell survival and proliferation, is frequently hyperactivated in human cancers. Intramolecular pleckstrin homology (PH) domain–kinase domain (KD) interactions are important in maintaining AKT in an inactive state. AKT activation proceeds after a conformational change that dislodges the PH from the KD. To understand these autoinhibitory interactions, we generated mutations at the PH–KD interface and found that most of them lead to constitutive activation of AKT. Such mutations are likely another mechanism by which activation may occur in human cancers and other diseases. In support of this likelihood, we found somatic mutations in AKT1 at the PH–KD interface that have not been previously described in human cancers. Furthermore, we show that the AKT1 somatic mutants are constitutively active, leading to oncogenic signaling. Additionally, our studies show that the AKT1 mutants are not effectively inhibited by allosteric AKT inhibitors, consistent with the requirement for an intact PH–KD interface for allosteric inhibition. These results have important implications for therapeutic intervention in patients with AKT mutations at the PH–KD interface.  Keywords: interdomain, AKT-targeting, PI3K-pathway, next generation sequencing, BaF3 The mammalian v-akt murine thymoma viral oncogene homolog (AKT) family consists of three members, AKT1/protein kinase B (PKB)a, AKT2/PKBβ, and AKT3/PKBγ (Fig. S1). They belong to the protein kinase A, kinase G, and kinase C (AGC) superfamily of serine/threonine kinases and are involved in regulating key cellular processes, including cell proliferation, survival, growth, metabolism, and angiogenesis (1). The AKTs share a common domain architecture consisting of an N-terminal pleckstrin homology (PH) domain, a kinase domain (KD), and a C-terminal regulatory region that contains a hydrophobic motif (2, 3).  AKT functions downstream of class IA PI3K (4). After growth factor stimulation, activated PI3Ks catalyze the conversion of phosphatidylinositol 4,5 bisphosphate to phosphatidylinositol 3,4,5 trisphosphate that directs translocation of AKT to the plasma membrane (5). At the membrane, AKT1 undergoes phosphorylation on two regulatory sites: T308 within the catalytic domain and S473 in the hydrophobic motif through phosphoinositide-dependent kinase 1 (PDK1) and PDK2 mammalian target of Rapamycin (mTORC2), respectively. This phosphorylation leads to its activation and downstream signaling (6).  AKT is frequently activated in cancers, mostly through mutations or amplifications of upstream genes like PIK3CA (7). AKT activation can also result from inactivation or loss of the lipid phosphatase, PTEN (8). Genomic alterations that directly affect AKT also lead to its activation. Whereas AKT1 amplification is rare, AKT2 is frequently amplified in a variety of cancers (9). Recently, a somatic mutation in the PH domain of AKT1 was identified in a subset of human carcinomas (10). This mutation results in the substitution of glutamic acid at codon 17 of AKT1 with lysine (E17K) and alters the lipid-binding specificity of AKT, leading to pathological membrane association and constitutive signaling (10, 11). Other than human cancers, germ-line and somatic E17K mutations in AKT have been identified in Proteus syndrome, human hypoglycemia, and hemimegalencephaly (12–14).  Recent molecular modeling and structure-based studies suggest that, under basal conditions, interactions between the PH and KD maintain AKT in a closed conformation (PH-in) (15–17). In this state, PDK1 is unable to access and phosphorylate T308. In response to upstream signaling, AKT shifts from an autoinhibited PH-in confirmation to an open PH-out state, leading to its phosphorylation and activation. Molecular dynamic studies and crystal structure of AKT suggest that the interactions between the PH and KD are important for maintaining the kinase in an inactive state.  In this study, we have performed a systematic analysis to understand the effects of perturbing PH–KD interactions on activation of AKT. We show that disrupting interdomain contacts by mutating residues at the PH–KD interface leads to AKT activation. Given this finding, we sequenced a large number of human tumors to see if mutations at the PH–KD contact sites occur in cancers. Interestingly, we found human tumors that carry mutations in AKT at these sites, indicating that disruption of PH–KD interactions is a mechanism for AKT activation in cancers. Furthermore, we show that these tumor-specific mutations are oncogenic and that they alter sensitivity to allosteric AKT inhibitors.  Go to: RESULTS Perturbing PH–KD Contacts Lead to AKT Activation. To assess the activation status of AKT, we measured its ability to promote growth factor-independent survival of IL-3–dependent BaF3 cells. The BaF3 pro-B cells can be rendered growth factor-independent by enforced expression of oncogenes (18). We generated BaF3 cells expressing WT AKT1, Myristoylated (Myr), or the E17K AKT1 mutant and found that activated AKT by itself was unable to promote factor independence (Fig. 1A). However, coexpression of Myr or E17K AKT1 and an activated form of the MAP2 kinase mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK)/extracellular-signal-regulated kinase (ERK) kinase (MEK1) (Mek1 ΔN3, S218E, S222D) (19) promoted factor-independent growth of BaF3 cells (Fig. 1A). Although WT AKT1 along with active MEK1 (MEK1 N3) showed some activity in this assay, it was markedly less compared with mutant AKT1. This result is consistent with previous reports that show cooperation between AKT and MEK in oncogenic transformation (20, 21).  Fig. 1. Fig. 1. PH–KD contact site mutations lead to AKT activation. (A) IL-3–independent proliferation of BaF3 cells expressing empty vector (EV), WT, Myr, or E17K AKT1 alone or combined with MEK1 N3. (B) An open book representation of PH (purple) and ... We used the BaF3 assay to investigate the consequence of disrupting PH–KD interactions. Using the recently published full-length structure of AKT1 (17), we identified residues at the PH–KD interface. Mutations at these sites were designed to compromise the PH–KD interaction (Materials and Methods). We generated a library of 35 such AKT1 mutants (Fig. 1B and Dataset S1), including negative (WT AKT1) and positive (Myr and E17K AKT1) controls for activity. We used this library to derive a pool of BaF3 cells that stably coexpressed the mutants along with MEK1 N3. After allowing growth in the absence of IL-3 for 3–4 d, the proportion of various mutants in the pool was determined relative to the input at 0 h using next-generation sequencing (Fig. 1C). Each mutation was scored based on a normalized ratio of observed frequency at a given time point compared with the input frequency, and these ratios were then normalized to the ratios for WT AKT1. As expected, AKT1 E17K was more than 50 times enriched over WT. Similarly, mutants, such as T81Y and D323A, were also strongly enriched (>15-fold over WT), indicating that these mutations lead to AKT activation. Other mutants (R23A, N53A, F55Y, L78T, Q79E, W80A, E191A, T195I, V270A, V271A, L321A, D325A, and R328A) showed moderate enrichment (two- to sixfold over WT) in the assay and are likely activating (Fig. 1D and Dataset S1).  To further understand the effect of PH–KD interface mutants, we generated BaF3 cell lines expressing some of the AKT1 mutants that promoted survival and some that did not promote survival in our initial screen. We then assessed the T308 and S473 phosphorylation status (pT308 and pS473) of AKT in these lines. Consistent with the survival activity observed in the screen, we found that mutants, such as F55Y, T81Y, T195I, L321A, and D325A, showed elevated levels of pT308 and pS473 (Fig. 1E), confirming the positive correlation between phosphorylated AKT (pAKT) status and cell survival (T308: R2 = 0.71, P value = 8.735e-05; S473: R2 = 0.66, P value = 0.0002158) (Fig. 1 F and G). However, R23A, although scored positive for survival in our initial screen, failed to show increased pAKT, indicating that it potentially was a false positive. Furthermore, AKT mutants Y18S, I19E, Q59E, R200A, L202F, and L362R, which did not support IL-3–independent survival, also did not show an increase in pAKT levels (Fig. 1E). These results indicate that disrupting the PH–KD contacts leads to constitutive phosphorylation of AKT. In agreement with this result, a recent study showed that deletion of AKT1 PH domain led to its constitutive S473 phopshorylation (22).  Identification of AKT Somatic Mutations in Cancer. Given that perturbation of the PH–KD interface led to AKT activation, we wanted to assess if such mutations occur in human primary tumors. To identify potential AKT mutations, we sequenced all of the coding exons of AKT1, AKT2, and AKT3 in a total of 394 human primary tumor samples consisting of 65 colorectal, 51 breast, 48 nonsmall-cell lung (NSCLC) adenocarcinoma (adeno), 43 NSCLC (squamous), 43 renal carcinoma, 37 melanoma, 33 gastric, 32 ovarian, 15 esophageal, 11 hepatocellular, 10 small-cell lung cancer, and 6 others (5 lung large cell and 1 lung cancer other) (Dataset S2). We found protein-altering, somatic AKT1 mutations in 2 of 51 (4%) breast and 1 of 65 (1.5%) colon samples. We also found AKT2 somatic mutations in 2 of 43 (∼5%) NSCLC (adeno) samples (Fig. 2A and Dataset S3). Previous studies have reported protein-altering mutations in AKT1, primarily in codon 17 (E17K) in ∼5% of breast cancers (10, 23). Mutations at other residues in AKT family members, although quite rare, have been reported (Fig. 2A and Dataset S4) (24–27).  Fig. 2. Fig. 2. Somatic AKT mutations in human cancer. (A) Somatic mutations in AKT family members. Horizontal black bars indicate residues conserved across AKT1, AKT2, and AKT3. (B) Localization of somatic mutations mapped onto AKT1 crystal structure. The central portion ... Other than the E17K mutation, we have previously reported an AKT1 mutation at codon 52, L52R (Fig. 2A and Datasets S3 and S4) (28). L52 is at the PH–KD interface and makes hydrophobic contacts with V270, V271, Y326, and the methylene portion of R328 in the KD (Fig. 1B). Although the L52A mutant did not support IL-3–independent survival of BaF3 cells (Fig. 1D), the L52R mutation is likely to weaken PH–KD interaction, because it is predicated to replace favorable hydrophobic interactions with an unfavorable interaction with R328 (Fig. 2B). The synthetic mutant D323A was active in our screen (Fig. 1D), suggesting that D323H will also be constitutively active, because a histidine is even more disruptive to the interdomain contacts than alanine. The R96 residue located in the main PH domain helix is far removed from the KD interface and hence, unlikely to promote activation through disruption of PH–KD interactions (Fig. 2B). Electron density for residues K189 to E198 is not observed in the full-length AKT1 crystal structure (Fig. 2B), and hence, a structure-based assessment of its effect on AKT1 activity could not be made.  To understand the biological significance of the somatic mutations identified in this study and a few published somatic AKT1 mutations, we tested their ability to support IL-3–independent growth of BaF3 cells coexpressing MEK1 N3. We found that L52R, Q79K, and D323H, like Myr and E17K AKT1, supported growth factor-independent survival of BaF3 cells (Fig. 2C), and this support was dependent on their kinase activity (Fig. S2). Consistently, mutants that promoted survival also showed elevated levels of pAKT (Fig. 2D).  AKT1 Somatic Mutants Signal Constitutively and Lead to Transformation. To further assess the functional relevance of the AKT1 somatic mutations, we tested their effect on signaling in NIH 3T3 cells expressing FLAG-tagged WT, Myr, E17K, L52R, K189N, or D323H AKT1. Immunoblot analysis showed that, similar to Myr AKT1, all mutants (except K189N) showed elevated pAKT levels compared with WT (Fig. 3A). Consistent with this finding, we observed increased phosphorylation of the AKT substrates FOXO and S6 ribosomal protein (Fig. 3A). Also, we observed elevation of phospho PRAS40 levels, although the activation was delayed in E17K and D323H mutant-expressing NIH 3T3 cells (Fig. 3A and Fig. S3 A and B).  Fig. 3. Fig. 3. AKT1 somatic mutations are activating. (A) NIH 3T3 cells stably expressing AKT1 somatic mutations show elevated pT308 and pS473. (B) Representative image showing anchorage-independent growth of NIH 3T3 cells expressing the indicated AKT1 constructs. ( ... To further characterize the AKT1 mutants, we tested their transforming ability in an anchorage-independent growth assay. We found that NIH 3T3 cells expressing Myr or mutant AKT1 formed ∼20-fold more colonies compared with controls (Fig. 3B). To further characterize these mutants, we used a 3D morphogenesis assay using MCF10A breast epithelial cells. MCF10A cells, when cultured on a 3D matrix, form polarized acini with a hollow lumen (29). Expression of oncogenes (including Myr AKT1) in this system is known to disrupt acinar architecture (30). We found that, like Myr AKT1, expression of E17K, L52R, K189N, D323H, or Q79K led to formation of disorganized multiacinar structures (Fig. 3C), and it was dependent on the kinase activity of these mutants (Fig. 3C). In contrast, the mutants F35L and R96W, consistent with their inability to promote survival (Fig. 2C), did not affect morphogenesis (Fig. 3C). Interestingly, although the K189N mutant did not support BaF3 survival or increase downstream signaling (Figs. 2 C and D and and3A3A and Fig. S3C), it promoted anchorage-independent growth and acinar disruption (Fig. 3 B and C). Consistent with this finding, MCF10A cells expressing the K189N mutant showed elevated pAKT and increased pS6RP levels compared with WT when cultured on a 3D matrix (Fig. 3D).  AKT1 PH–KD Mutants Weaken Interdomain Interactions and Show Impaired Plasma Membrane Translocation. Although the cancer-specific AKT1 mutations (L52R and D323H) occur at positions predicted to disrupt PH–KD interactions, the amino acid substitutions observed were different from the synthetic mutants generated and analyzed earlier (Fig. 1 B, D, and E). To directly test whether these somatic mutations weaken interdomain interactions, we performed a mammalian two-hybrid assay using AKT PH and KD constructs fused to the VP16 activation domain and Gal4 DNA-binding domain, respectively. The strength of the interaction was measured using a luciferase reporter, where the luciferase activity is proportional to the strength of the interaction. We found that the L52R PH/WT-KD, Q79K-PH/WT-KD, and WT-PH/D323H-KD combinations showed significant reduction in the interaction signal compared with WT-PH/WT-KD, confirming that these mutants are deficient in the PH–KD interaction (Fig. 3E). In contrast, F35L-PH/WT-KD, R96W-PH/WT-KD, and WT-PH/K189N-KD combinations in the two-hybrid assay showed interaction that was comparable with the WT-PH/WT-KD pair, indicating that these mutations do not affect PH–KD interactions. Interestingly, the E17K-PH/WT-KD combination also showed a reduced interaction compared with the WT-PH/WT-KD combination, suggesting that the E17K mutation may also weaken PH–KD interaction, although this effect was modest (Fig. 3E).  To further understand the mechanism of activation of AKT mutants, we tested their cellular localization. Previous studies indicate that mutations in lipid-binding PH domains that result in dysregulated membrane recruitment can lead to carcinogenesis (31). To assess the effects of the PH domain mutant L52R on subcellular localization and membrane translocation, we generated GFP-tagged L52R PH domain along with GFP-tagged WT and E17K PH domains as controls. In the absence of stimulation, whereas WT AKT1 was distributed throughout the cytoplasm and nucleus, AKT1 E17K was constitutively localized to the plasma membrane as previously reported (10). In contrast, the L52R PH domain was distributed throughout the cell, behaving like the WT PH domain. However, on growth factor stimulation, unlike WT, the mutant L52R PH domain did not translocate to the membrane (Fig. 3F and Movies S1, S2, and S3). This result suggests that, unlike E17K, which is activated in response to altered lipid affinity and localization, the L52R mutant is most likely activated in the cytoplasm because of absence of autoinhibitory interactions. Consistent with this finding, a recent study has shown that activation of AKT can occur in the cytoplasm independent of membrane localization (32).  Disruption of AKT2 and AKT3 PH–KD Interactions Leads to Their Activation. Given the common domain architecture of the AKT family members, we tested whether disrupting PH–KD interactions in AKT2 and AKT3 can lead to their activation. To test, we generated AKT2 mutants L52R and D324H and AKT3 mutants L51R and D320H (equivalent of AKT1 L52R and D323H), all of which are predicted to disrupt PH–KD interactions (Fig. S4). Because AKT3 E17K mutations in melanoma (33) and AKT2 E17K mutations in human hypoglycemina (12) have been reported, we generated the E17K AKT2 and AKT3 mutants along with additional AKT2 and AKT3 somatic mutations that have been identified in human cancers (Fig. 2A). Additionally, we generated Myr AKT2 and Myr AKT3 as positive controls. We stably expressed the AKT2 and AKT3 mutants in NIH 3T3 cells and assessed pAKT. AKT2 E17K, L52R, and D324H, and AKT3 E17K, L51R, and D320H all showed elevated pT308 and pS473 compared with WT AKT2 or AKT3 (Fig. S5A). Consistent with the activation status, these mutants (combined with MEK1 N3) support IL-3–independent survival of BaF3 cells (Fig. S5B). Interestingly, the cancer-specific AKT2 R371H mutant, although it showed elevated pAKT, was not capable of promoting growth factor-independent survival of BaF3. The remaining mutants (AKT2 V90L and R101L and AKT3 Q124L and G171R) did not increase pAKT and were unable to support growth factor-independent survival of BaF3 cells (Fig. S5). Inspections of the homology models generated for full-length AKT2 and AKT3 indicate that these mutations occur in surface-exposed loops and are not proximal to the PH–KD interface (Fig. 2B). Note that, although AKT2 V90L and AKT3 Q124L are in loops not defined in the AKT1 electron density, the termini of these loops are not proximal to the PH–KD interface. Thus, structural analysis does not offer insights into the role of these mutants in cancers.  AKT1 Somatic Mutants Promote Oncogenesis in Vivo. Previous studies have shown that BaF3 cells stably expressing oncogenes promote a leukemia-like disease when implanted in mice, leading to reduced overall survival (34, 35). Because the AKT1 mutants cooperate with active MEK1 to promote factor-independent growth of BaF3 cells (Figs. 1A and and2C),2C), we used this model system to test their tumorigenic potential in vivo. Mice implanted with BaF3 cells coexpressing MEK1 N3 and Myr or mutant AKT1 (E17K, L52R or D323H) showed a median survival of 19–20.5 d. In contrast, mice implanted with cells coexpressing MEK1 N3 and AKT1 WT had a significantly longer median survival of 29 d (Fig. 4). This result is consistent with the fact that AKT1 WT in the context of active MEK1 was able to support IL-3-independent survival of BaF3 cells, although the effect was modest compared with AKT mutants (Fig. 1A and and2C).2C). As expected, mice expressing MEK1 N3 alone (control) were alive at the end of the 55-d study period. Necropsies were performed at 19 d posttransplantation on a cohort of three mice per treatment group to follow disease progression. Consistent with the reduced overall survival, mice implanted with mutant AKT1 had a significant proportion of GFP-tagged BaF3 cells in the bone marrow and spleens (Fig. S6A) and had massively enlarged liver and spleen compared with controls (Fig. S6 B–D). Histological examination of H&E-stained liver, spleen, and bone marrow sections from these mice showed evidence of infiltration with leukemic blasts (Fig. S6E). These results confirm the transforming potential of the AKT1 mutants in vivo.  Fig. 4. Fig. 4. AKT1 mutants promote oncogenesis in vivo. Kaplan–Meier survival curve depicting reduction in overall survival of mice implanted with BaF3 cells expressing AKT1 mutants. (n = 10 for arms; log-rank test P < 0.0001). AKT1 PH–KD Interaction-Deficient Mutants Are Less Sensitive to Allosteric Inhibitors. Several ATP-competitive and allosteric small-molecule inhibitors of AKT are in development and/or clinical trials (36, 37). Previous studies have shown that allosteric AKT inhibitors require an intact PH–KD interface for their activity (17, 38–40). Given that some AKT1 somatic mutants have impaired PH–KD contacts, we predicted that allosteric inhibitors are likely to be less efficacious in inhibiting their activity. We tested this prediction by assaying the activity of two ATP-competitive inhibitors [GNE-692 (41) and GSK690693 (42)] and two allosteric inhibitors [Inhibitor VIII (43) and GNE-929 (Fig. S7)] on recombinant full-length WT and mutant AKT1 enzymes. We also tested the effect of the inhibitors on the proliferation of NIH 3T3 cells expressing WT or mutant AKT1.  We found that, in biochemical activity assays, the ATP-competitive inhibitors GNE-692 and GSK690693 were effective in blocking activity of WT AKT1 (GNE-692 IC50 = 24.3 nM) as well as the mutant enzymes (E17K, L52R, and D323H; GNE-692 IC50 = 3.7–15.8 nM) (Fig. S8A, Fig. S8E, and Dataset S5A). Similarly, the ATP-competitive inhibitors were equally effective against both WT and mutant AKT1 in the cell-based proliferation assay (Fig. S8B and Dataset S5B). In contrast, the allosteric inhibitors, Inhibitor VIII and GNE-929, were less effective against recombinant full-length mutant enzymes (Inhibitor VIII: IC50 = 268.4 nM for L52R; IC50 > 1 μM for D323H) compared with WT AKT1 (Inhibitor VIII: IC50 = 119.3 nM) (Fig. S8C, Fig. S8F, and Dataset S5A). Consistent with this finding, in cell-based assay, we found Inhibitor VIII to be at least 50% less effective at blocking proliferation of cells expressing mutant AKT1 compared with WT AKT (Fig. S8D and Dataset S5B).  To confirm that the reduced sensitivity of the mutants to allosteric inhibitors was caused by impaired PH–KD interactions, we performed an in vitro biochemical reconstitution assay using purified recombinant PH and KD. In this system, allosteric Inhibitor VIII, when assayed against AKT1 KD alone, was unable to block its activity (Fig. 5 A and B). Reconstituting the enzyme by adding back WT PH domain restored the ability of Inhibitor VIII to block enzyme activity, albeit with a threefold higher IC50 (IC50 = 238.8 nM), compared with the full-length WT enzyme (IC50 = 80.8 nM) (Fig. 5 A and B and Dataset S5C). In contrast, reconstitution with mutant PH domain (L52R or E17K) further impaired the ability of Inhibitor VIII in blocking AKT1 (L52R IC50 = 713.5 nM and E17K IC50 > 1 μM) (Fig. 5A and Dataset S5C). Similarly, Inhibitor VIII showed no activity when the WT PH domain was reconstituted with a mutant D323H KD (Fig. 5B). The lack of E17K inhibition by allosteric inhibitors suggests that, in addition to increased affinity for phosphatidylinositol 4,5 bisphosphate (10, 11), this mutation may also affect the PH–KD interaction, leading to its activation. These data confirm the importance of an intact PH–KD interface for AKT1 allosteric inhibitors.  Fig. 5. Fig. 5. Effective AKT inhibition by allosteric inhibitors requires intact PH–KD interaction. (A) Effect of Inhibitor VIII on the kinase activity of recombinant AKT1 WT KD reconstituted with WT or mutant PH domains or (B) AKT1 D323H KD reconstituted with ... Go to: DISCUSSION Recent structural studies indicate that inhibitory interdomain interactions play a crucial role in regulating AKT activation (15, 17). Using a mutational screen, we show here that activation of AKT can result from mutations in residues involved in PH–KD contacts. Furthermore, we report the identification of mutations in human cancers, some of which involve residues at the PH–KD interface.  In addition to the previously identified mutation E17K, we show that the AKT1 PH domain mutant L52R and the KD mutant D323H identified in clinical samples mediate cellular transformation and are oncogenic in vivo. Inspection of the structure of full-length AKT1 reveals that E17, L52, and D323 are at the PH–KD interface and that substitutions at these positions are predicted to perturb PH–KD binding. Consistent with this finding, both L52R and D323H weaken PH–KD binding in two-hybrid assays. Previously, the mechanism of activation of E17K has been attributed to an altered lipid-binding specificity (10, 11). Our results indicate perturbation of interdomain interactions to be an additional mechanism underlying E17K activation.  Taken together, our findings suggest that the oncogenicity of the AKT1 PH–KD interface mutations identified here is caused by their constitutive activation resulting from destabilization of interdomain contacts. The activity of many multidomain proteins is regulated through autoinhibitory intramolecular interactions (44). It is likely that mutational destabilization of such interactions is a general mechanism leading to their inappropriate activation in human disease. In agreement with this likelihood, activating mutations in interdomain contact residues have been described in nonreceptor tyrosine kinases, like JAK2 (in polycythemia vera) and BCR-ABL, as well as phosphatases, such as SHP-2 in Noonan’s syndrome and juvenile myelo-monocytic leukemia (45–48).  Inhibitors targeting the PI3K-AKT pathway members, including AKT, are currently in various stages of development (36, 37). Previous studies have shown that AKT allosteric inhibitors require an intact PH–KD interface, because such inhibitors preferentially bind the closed PH-in conformation (16, 17, 38). Consistent with this result, we found that mutations in AKT that favor an open (PH-out) conformation show reduced sensitivity to allosteric AKT inhibitors, although they retain sensitivity to ATP-competitive inhibitors. This finding indicates that the AKT mutational status has important implications for the choice of inhibitor in the clinic. AKT mutations, although they may function as drivers in naive tumors, can also arise in tumors in response to agents that target upstream components of the AKT pathway. Future studies will be required to assess such mutations and fully understand the predictive and prognostic significance of these mutations in the clinic.  
1366||The protein kinase v-akt murine thymoma viral oncogene homolog (AKT), a key regulator of cell survival and proliferation, is frequently hyperactivated in human cancers. Intramolecular pleckstrin homology (PH) domain–kinase domain (KD) interactions are important in maintaining AKT in an inactive state. AKT activation proceeds after a conformational change that dislodges the PH from the KD. To understand these autoinhibitory interactions, we generated mutations at the PH–KD interface and found that most of them lead to constitutive activation of AKT. Such mutations are likely another mechanism by which activation may occur in human cancers and other diseases. In support of this likelihood, we found somatic mutations in AKT1 at the PH–KD interface that have not been previously described in human cancers. Furthermore, we show that the AKT1 somatic mutants are constitutively active, leading to oncogenic signaling. Additionally, our studies show that the AKT1 mutants are not effectively inhibited by allosteric AKT inhibitors, consistent with the requirement for an intact PH–KD interface for allosteric inhibition. These results have important implications for therapeutic intervention in patients with AKT mutations at the PH–KD interface.  Keywords: interdomain, AKT-targeting, PI3K-pathway, next generation sequencing, BaF3 The mammalian v-akt murine thymoma viral oncogene homolog (AKT) family consists of three members, AKT1/protein kinase B (PKB)a, AKT2/PKBβ, and AKT3/PKBγ (Fig. S1). They belong to the protein kinase A, kinase G, and kinase C (AGC) superfamily of serine/threonine kinases and are involved in regulating key cellular processes, including cell proliferation, survival, growth, metabolism, and angiogenesis (1). The AKTs share a common domain architecture consisting of an N-terminal pleckstrin homology (PH) domain, a kinase domain (KD), and a C-terminal regulatory region that contains a hydrophobic motif (2, 3).  AKT functions downstream of class IA PI3K (4). After growth factor stimulation, activated PI3Ks catalyze the conversion of phosphatidylinositol 4,5 bisphosphate to phosphatidylinositol 3,4,5 trisphosphate that directs translocation of AKT to the plasma membrane (5). At the membrane, AKT1 undergoes phosphorylation on two regulatory sites: T308 within the catalytic domain and S473 in the hydrophobic motif through phosphoinositide-dependent kinase 1 (PDK1) and PDK2 mammalian target of Rapamycin (mTORC2), respectively. This phosphorylation leads to its activation and downstream signaling (6).  AKT is frequently activated in cancers, mostly through mutations or amplifications of upstream genes like PIK3CA (7). AKT activation can also result from inactivation or loss of the lipid phosphatase, PTEN (8). Genomic alterations that directly affect AKT also lead to its activation. Whereas AKT1 amplification is rare, AKT2 is frequently amplified in a variety of cancers (9). Recently, a somatic mutation in the PH domain of AKT1 was identified in a subset of human carcinomas (10). This mutation results in the substitution of glutamic acid at codon 17 of AKT1 with lysine (E17K) and alters the lipid-binding specificity of AKT, leading to pathological membrane association and constitutive signaling (10, 11). Other than human cancers, germ-line and somatic E17K mutations in AKT have been identified in Proteus syndrome, human hypoglycemia, and hemimegalencephaly (12–14).  Recent molecular modeling and structure-based studies suggest that, under basal conditions, interactions between the PH and KD maintain AKT in a closed conformation (PH-in) (15–17). In this state, PDK1 is unable to access and phosphorylate T308. In response to upstream signaling, AKT shifts from an autoinhibited PH-in confirmation to an open PH-out state, leading to its phosphorylation and activation. Molecular dynamic studies and crystal structure of AKT suggest that the interactions between the PH and KD are important for maintaining the kinase in an inactive state.  In this study, we have performed a systematic analysis to understand the effects of perturbing PH–KD interactions on activation of AKT. We show that disrupting interdomain contacts by mutating residues at the PH–KD interface leads to AKT activation. Given this finding, we sequenced a large number of human tumors to see if mutations at the PH–KD contact sites occur in cancers. Interestingly, we found human tumors that carry mutations in AKT at these sites, indicating that disruption of PH–KD interactions is a mechanism for AKT activation in cancers. Furthermore, we show that these tumor-specific mutations are oncogenic and that they alter sensitivity to allosteric AKT inhibitors.  Go to: RESULTS Perturbing PH–KD Contacts Lead to AKT Activation. To assess the activation status of AKT, we measured its ability to promote growth factor-independent survival of IL-3–dependent BaF3 cells. The BaF3 pro-B cells can be rendered growth factor-independent by enforced expression of oncogenes (18). We generated BaF3 cells expressing WT AKT1, Myristoylated (Myr), or the E17K AKT1 mutant and found that activated AKT by itself was unable to promote factor independence (Fig. 1A). However, coexpression of Myr or E17K AKT1 and an activated form of the MAP2 kinase mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK)/extracellular-signal-regulated kinase (ERK) kinase (MEK1) (Mek1 ΔN3, S218E, S222D) (19) promoted factor-independent growth of BaF3 cells (Fig. 1A). Although WT AKT1 along with active MEK1 (MEK1 N3) showed some activity in this assay, it was markedly less compared with mutant AKT1. This result is consistent with previous reports that show cooperation between AKT and MEK in oncogenic transformation (20, 21).  Fig. 1. Fig. 1. PH–KD contact site mutations lead to AKT activation. (A) IL-3–independent proliferation of BaF3 cells expressing empty vector (EV), WT, Myr, or E17K AKT1 alone or combined with MEK1 N3. (B) An open book representation of PH (purple) and ... We used the BaF3 assay to investigate the consequence of disrupting PH–KD interactions. Using the recently published full-length structure of AKT1 (17), we identified residues at the PH–KD interface. Mutations at these sites were designed to compromise the PH–KD interaction (Materials and Methods). We generated a library of 35 such AKT1 mutants (Fig. 1B and Dataset S1), including negative (WT AKT1) and positive (Myr and E17K AKT1) controls for activity. We used this library to derive a pool of BaF3 cells that stably coexpressed the mutants along with MEK1 N3. After allowing growth in the absence of IL-3 for 3–4 d, the proportion of various mutants in the pool was determined relative to the input at 0 h using next-generation sequencing (Fig. 1C). Each mutation was scored based on a normalized ratio of observed frequency at a given time point compared with the input frequency, and these ratios were then normalized to the ratios for WT AKT1. As expected, AKT1 E17K was more than 50 times enriched over WT. Similarly, mutants, such as T81Y and D323A, were also strongly enriched (>15-fold over WT), indicating that these mutations lead to AKT activation. Other mutants (R23A, N53A, F55Y, L78T, Q79E, W80A, E191A, T195I, V270A, V271A, L321A, D325A, and R328A) showed moderate enrichment (two- to sixfold over WT) in the assay and are likely activating (Fig. 1D and Dataset S1).  To further understand the effect of PH–KD interface mutants, we generated BaF3 cell lines expressing some of the AKT1 mutants that promoted survival and some that did not promote survival in our initial screen. We then assessed the T308 and S473 phosphorylation status (pT308 and pS473) of AKT in these lines. Consistent with the survival activity observed in the screen, we found that mutants, such as F55Y, T81Y, T195I, L321A, and D325A, showed elevated levels of pT308 and pS473 (Fig. 1E), confirming the positive correlation between phosphorylated AKT (pAKT) status and cell survival (T308: R2 = 0.71, P value = 8.735e-05; S473: R2 = 0.66, P value = 0.0002158) (Fig. 1 F and G). However, R23A, although scored positive for survival in our initial screen, failed to show increased pAKT, indicating that it potentially was a false positive. Furthermore, AKT mutants Y18S, I19E, Q59E, R200A, L202F, and L362R, which did not support IL-3–independent survival, also did not show an increase in pAKT levels (Fig. 1E). These results indicate that disrupting the PH–KD contacts leads to constitutive phosphorylation of AKT. In agreement with this result, a recent study showed that deletion of AKT1 PH domain led to its constitutive S473 phopshorylation (22).  Identification of AKT Somatic Mutations in Cancer. Given that perturbation of the PH–KD interface led to AKT activation, we wanted to assess if such mutations occur in human primary tumors. To identify potential AKT mutations, we sequenced all of the coding exons of AKT1, AKT2, and AKT3 in a total of 394 human primary tumor samples consisting of 65 colorectal, 51 breast, 48 nonsmall-cell lung (NSCLC) adenocarcinoma (adeno), 43 NSCLC (squamous), 43 renal carcinoma, 37 melanoma, 33 gastric, 32 ovarian, 15 esophageal, 11 hepatocellular, 10 small-cell lung cancer, and 6 others (5 lung large cell and 1 lung cancer other) (Dataset S2). We found protein-altering, somatic AKT1 mutations in 2 of 51 (4%) breast and 1 of 65 (1.5%) colon samples. We also found AKT2 somatic mutations in 2 of 43 (∼5%) NSCLC (adeno) samples (Fig. 2A and Dataset S3). Previous studies have reported protein-altering mutations in AKT1, primarily in codon 17 (E17K) in ∼5% of breast cancers (10, 23). Mutations at other residues in AKT family members, although quite rare, have been reported (Fig. 2A and Dataset S4) (24–27).  Fig. 2. Fig. 2. Somatic AKT mutations in human cancer. (A) Somatic mutations in AKT family members. Horizontal black bars indicate residues conserved across AKT1, AKT2, and AKT3. (B) Localization of somatic mutations mapped onto AKT1 crystal structure. The central portion ... Other than the E17K mutation, we have previously reported an AKT1 mutation at codon 52, L52R (Fig. 2A and Datasets S3 and S4) (28). L52 is at the PH–KD interface and makes hydrophobic contacts with V270, V271, Y326, and the methylene portion of R328 in the KD (Fig. 1B). Although the L52A mutant did not support IL-3–independent survival of BaF3 cells (Fig. 1D), the L52R mutation is likely to weaken PH–KD interaction, because it is predicated to replace favorable hydrophobic interactions with an unfavorable interaction with R328 (Fig. 2B). The synthetic mutant D323A was active in our screen (Fig. 1D), suggesting that D323H will also be constitutively active, because a histidine is even more disruptive to the interdomain contacts than alanine. The R96 residue located in the main PH domain helix is far removed from the KD interface and hence, unlikely to promote activation through disruption of PH–KD interactions (Fig. 2B). Electron density for residues K189 to E198 is not observed in the full-length AKT1 crystal structure (Fig. 2B), and hence, a structure-based assessment of its effect on AKT1 activity could not be made.  To understand the biological significance of the somatic mutations identified in this study and a few published somatic AKT1 mutations, we tested their ability to support IL-3–independent growth of BaF3 cells coexpressing MEK1 N3. We found that L52R, Q79K, and D323H, like Myr and E17K AKT1, supported growth factor-independent survival of BaF3 cells (Fig. 2C), and this support was dependent on their kinase activity (Fig. S2). Consistently, mutants that promoted survival also showed elevated levels of pAKT (Fig. 2D).  AKT1 Somatic Mutants Signal Constitutively and Lead to Transformation. To further assess the functional relevance of the AKT1 somatic mutations, we tested their effect on signaling in NIH 3T3 cells expressing FLAG-tagged WT, Myr, E17K, L52R, K189N, or D323H AKT1. Immunoblot analysis showed that, similar to Myr AKT1, all mutants (except K189N) showed elevated pAKT levels compared with WT (Fig. 3A). Consistent with this finding, we observed increased phosphorylation of the AKT substrates FOXO and S6 ribosomal protein (Fig. 3A). Also, we observed elevation of phospho PRAS40 levels, although the activation was delayed in E17K and D323H mutant-expressing NIH 3T3 cells (Fig. 3A and Fig. S3 A and B).  Fig. 3. Fig. 3. AKT1 somatic mutations are activating. (A) NIH 3T3 cells stably expressing AKT1 somatic mutations show elevated pT308 and pS473. (B) Representative image showing anchorage-independent growth of NIH 3T3 cells expressing the indicated AKT1 constructs. ( ... To further characterize the AKT1 mutants, we tested their transforming ability in an anchorage-independent growth assay. We found that NIH 3T3 cells expressing Myr or mutant AKT1 formed ∼20-fold more colonies compared with controls (Fig. 3B). To further characterize these mutants, we used a 3D morphogenesis assay using MCF10A breast epithelial cells. MCF10A cells, when cultured on a 3D matrix, form polarized acini with a hollow lumen (29). Expression of oncogenes (including Myr AKT1) in this system is known to disrupt acinar architecture (30). We found that, like Myr AKT1, expression of E17K, L52R, K189N, D323H, or Q79K led to formation of disorganized multiacinar structures (Fig. 3C), and it was dependent on the kinase activity of these mutants (Fig. 3C). In contrast, the mutants F35L and R96W, consistent with their inability to promote survival (Fig. 2C), did not affect morphogenesis (Fig. 3C). Interestingly, although the K189N mutant did not support BaF3 survival or increase downstream signaling (Figs. 2 C and D and and3A3A and Fig. S3C), it promoted anchorage-independent growth and acinar disruption (Fig. 3 B and C). Consistent with this finding, MCF10A cells expressing the K189N mutant showed elevated pAKT and increased pS6RP levels compared with WT when cultured on a 3D matrix (Fig. 3D).  AKT1 PH–KD Mutants Weaken Interdomain Interactions and Show Impaired Plasma Membrane Translocation. Although the cancer-specific AKT1 mutations (L52R and D323H) occur at positions predicted to disrupt PH–KD interactions, the amino acid substitutions observed were different from the synthetic mutants generated and analyzed earlier (Fig. 1 B, D, and E). To directly test whether these somatic mutations weaken interdomain interactions, we performed a mammalian two-hybrid assay using AKT PH and KD constructs fused to the VP16 activation domain and Gal4 DNA-binding domain, respectively. The strength of the interaction was measured using a luciferase reporter, where the luciferase activity is proportional to the strength of the interaction. We found that the L52R PH/WT-KD, Q79K-PH/WT-KD, and WT-PH/D323H-KD combinations showed significant reduction in the interaction signal compared with WT-PH/WT-KD, confirming that these mutants are deficient in the PH–KD interaction (Fig. 3E). In contrast, F35L-PH/WT-KD, R96W-PH/WT-KD, and WT-PH/K189N-KD combinations in the two-hybrid assay showed interaction that was comparable with the WT-PH/WT-KD pair, indicating that these mutations do not affect PH–KD interactions. Interestingly, the E17K-PH/WT-KD combination also showed a reduced interaction compared with the WT-PH/WT-KD combination, suggesting that the E17K mutation may also weaken PH–KD interaction, although this effect was modest (Fig. 3E).  To further understand the mechanism of activation of AKT mutants, we tested their cellular localization. Previous studies indicate that mutations in lipid-binding PH domains that result in dysregulated membrane recruitment can lead to carcinogenesis (31). To assess the effects of the PH domain mutant L52R on subcellular localization and membrane translocation, we generated GFP-tagged L52R PH domain along with GFP-tagged WT and E17K PH domains as controls. In the absence of stimulation, whereas WT AKT1 was distributed throughout the cytoplasm and nucleus, AKT1 E17K was constitutively localized to the plasma membrane as previously reported (10). In contrast, the L52R PH domain was distributed throughout the cell, behaving like the WT PH domain. However, on growth factor stimulation, unlike WT, the mutant L52R PH domain did not translocate to the membrane (Fig. 3F and Movies S1, S2, and S3). This result suggests that, unlike E17K, which is activated in response to altered lipid affinity and localization, the L52R mutant is most likely activated in the cytoplasm because of absence of autoinhibitory interactions. Consistent with this finding, a recent study has shown that activation of AKT can occur in the cytoplasm independent of membrane localization (32).  Disruption of AKT2 and AKT3 PH–KD Interactions Leads to Their Activation. Given the common domain architecture of the AKT family members, we tested whether disrupting PH–KD interactions in AKT2 and AKT3 can lead to their activation. To test, we generated AKT2 mutants L52R and D324H and AKT3 mutants L51R and D320H (equivalent of AKT1 L52R and D323H), all of which are predicted to disrupt PH–KD interactions (Fig. S4). Because AKT3 E17K mutations in melanoma (33) and AKT2 E17K mutations in human hypoglycemina (12) have been reported, we generated the E17K AKT2 and AKT3 mutants along with additional AKT2 and AKT3 somatic mutations that have been identified in human cancers (Fig. 2A). Additionally, we generated Myr AKT2 and Myr AKT3 as positive controls. We stably expressed the AKT2 and AKT3 mutants in NIH 3T3 cells and assessed pAKT. AKT2 E17K, L52R, and D324H, and AKT3 E17K, L51R, and D320H all showed elevated pT308 and pS473 compared with WT AKT2 or AKT3 (Fig. S5A). Consistent with the activation status, these mutants (combined with MEK1 N3) support IL-3–independent survival of BaF3 cells (Fig. S5B). Interestingly, the cancer-specific AKT2 R371H mutant, although it showed elevated pAKT, was not capable of promoting growth factor-independent survival of BaF3. The remaining mutants (AKT2 V90L and R101L and AKT3 Q124L and G171R) did not increase pAKT and were unable to support growth factor-independent survival of BaF3 cells (Fig. S5). Inspections of the homology models generated for full-length AKT2 and AKT3 indicate that these mutations occur in surface-exposed loops and are not proximal to the PH–KD interface (Fig. 2B). Note that, although AKT2 V90L and AKT3 Q124L are in loops not defined in the AKT1 electron density, the termini of these loops are not proximal to the PH–KD interface. Thus, structural analysis does not offer insights into the role of these mutants in cancers.  AKT1 Somatic Mutants Promote Oncogenesis in Vivo. Previous studies have shown that BaF3 cells stably expressing oncogenes promote a leukemia-like disease when implanted in mice, leading to reduced overall survival (34, 35). Because the AKT1 mutants cooperate with active MEK1 to promote factor-independent growth of BaF3 cells (Figs. 1A and and2C),2C), we used this model system to test their tumorigenic potential in vivo. Mice implanted with BaF3 cells coexpressing MEK1 N3 and Myr or mutant AKT1 (E17K, L52R or D323H) showed a median survival of 19–20.5 d. In contrast, mice implanted with cells coexpressing MEK1 N3 and AKT1 WT had a significantly longer median survival of 29 d (Fig. 4). This result is consistent with the fact that AKT1 WT in the context of active MEK1 was able to support IL-3-independent survival of BaF3 cells, although the effect was modest compared with AKT mutants (Fig. 1A and and2C).2C). As expected, mice expressing MEK1 N3 alone (control) were alive at the end of the 55-d study period. Necropsies were performed at 19 d posttransplantation on a cohort of three mice per treatment group to follow disease progression. Consistent with the reduced overall survival, mice implanted with mutant AKT1 had a significant proportion of GFP-tagged BaF3 cells in the bone marrow and spleens (Fig. S6A) and had massively enlarged liver and spleen compared with controls (Fig. S6 B–D). Histological examination of H&E-stained liver, spleen, and bone marrow sections from these mice showed evidence of infiltration with leukemic blasts (Fig. S6E). These results confirm the transforming potential of the AKT1 mutants in vivo.  Fig. 4. Fig. 4. AKT1 mutants promote oncogenesis in vivo. Kaplan–Meier survival curve depicting reduction in overall survival of mice implanted with BaF3 cells expressing AKT1 mutants. (n = 10 for arms; log-rank test P < 0.0001). AKT1 PH–KD Interaction-Deficient Mutants Are Less Sensitive to Allosteric Inhibitors. Several ATP-competitive and allosteric small-molecule inhibitors of AKT are in development and/or clinical trials (36, 37). Previous studies have shown that allosteric AKT inhibitors require an intact PH–KD interface for their activity (17, 38–40). Given that some AKT1 somatic mutants have impaired PH–KD contacts, we predicted that allosteric inhibitors are likely to be less efficacious in inhibiting their activity. We tested this prediction by assaying the activity of two ATP-competitive inhibitors [GNE-692 (41) and GSK690693 (42)] and two allosteric inhibitors [Inhibitor VIII (43) and GNE-929 (Fig. S7)] on recombinant full-length WT and mutant AKT1 enzymes. We also tested the effect of the inhibitors on the proliferation of NIH 3T3 cells expressing WT or mutant AKT1.  We found that, in biochemical activity assays, the ATP-competitive inhibitors GNE-692 and GSK690693 were effective in blocking activity of WT AKT1 (GNE-692 IC50 = 24.3 nM) as well as the mutant enzymes (E17K, L52R, and D323H; GNE-692 IC50 = 3.7–15.8 nM) (Fig. S8A, Fig. S8E, and Dataset S5A). Similarly, the ATP-competitive inhibitors were equally effective against both WT and mutant AKT1 in the cell-based proliferation assay (Fig. S8B and Dataset S5B). In contrast, the allosteric inhibitors, Inhibitor VIII and GNE-929, were less effective against recombinant full-length mutant enzymes (Inhibitor VIII: IC50 = 268.4 nM for L52R; IC50 > 1 μM for D323H) compared with WT AKT1 (Inhibitor VIII: IC50 = 119.3 nM) (Fig. S8C, Fig. S8F, and Dataset S5A). Consistent with this finding, in cell-based assay, we found Inhibitor VIII to be at least 50% less effective at blocking proliferation of cells expressing mutant AKT1 compared with WT AKT (Fig. S8D and Dataset S5B).  To confirm that the reduced sensitivity of the mutants to allosteric inhibitors was caused by impaired PH–KD interactions, we performed an in vitro biochemical reconstitution assay using purified recombinant PH and KD. In this system, allosteric Inhibitor VIII, when assayed against AKT1 KD alone, was unable to block its activity (Fig. 5 A and B). Reconstituting the enzyme by adding back WT PH domain restored the ability of Inhibitor VIII to block enzyme activity, albeit with a threefold higher IC50 (IC50 = 238.8 nM), compared with the full-length WT enzyme (IC50 = 80.8 nM) (Fig. 5 A and B and Dataset S5C). In contrast, reconstitution with mutant PH domain (L52R or E17K) further impaired the ability of Inhibitor VIII in blocking AKT1 (L52R IC50 = 713.5 nM and E17K IC50 > 1 μM) (Fig. 5A and Dataset S5C). Similarly, Inhibitor VIII showed no activity when the WT PH domain was reconstituted with a mutant D323H KD (Fig. 5B). The lack of E17K inhibition by allosteric inhibitors suggests that, in addition to increased affinity for phosphatidylinositol 4,5 bisphosphate (10, 11), this mutation may also affect the PH–KD interaction, leading to its activation. These data confirm the importance of an intact PH–KD interface for AKT1 allosteric inhibitors.  Fig. 5. Fig. 5. Effective AKT inhibition by allosteric inhibitors requires intact PH–KD interaction. (A) Effect of Inhibitor VIII on the kinase activity of recombinant AKT1 WT KD reconstituted with WT or mutant PH domains or (B) AKT1 D323H KD reconstituted with ... Go to: DISCUSSION Recent structural studies indicate that inhibitory interdomain interactions play a crucial role in regulating AKT activation (15, 17). Using a mutational screen, we show here that activation of AKT can result from mutations in residues involved in PH–KD contacts. Furthermore, we report the identification of mutations in human cancers, some of which involve residues at the PH–KD interface.  In addition to the previously identified mutation E17K, we show that the AKT1 PH domain mutant L52R and the KD mutant D323H identified in clinical samples mediate cellular transformation and are oncogenic in vivo. Inspection of the structure of full-length AKT1 reveals that E17, L52, and D323 are at the PH–KD interface and that substitutions at these positions are predicted to perturb PH–KD binding. Consistent with this finding, both L52R and D323H weaken PH–KD binding in two-hybrid assays. Previously, the mechanism of activation of E17K has been attributed to an altered lipid-binding specificity (10, 11). Our results indicate perturbation of interdomain interactions to be an additional mechanism underlying E17K activation.  Taken together, our findings suggest that the oncogenicity of the AKT1 PH–KD interface mutations identified here is caused by their constitutive activation resulting from destabilization of interdomain contacts. The activity of many multidomain proteins is regulated through autoinhibitory intramolecular interactions (44). It is likely that mutational destabilization of such interactions is a general mechanism leading to their inappropriate activation in human disease. In agreement with this likelihood, activating mutations in interdomain contact residues have been described in nonreceptor tyrosine kinases, like JAK2 (in polycythemia vera) and BCR-ABL, as well as phosphatases, such as SHP-2 in Noonan’s syndrome and juvenile myelo-monocytic leukemia (45–48).  Inhibitors targeting the PI3K-AKT pathway members, including AKT, are currently in various stages of development (36, 37). Previous studies have shown that AKT allosteric inhibitors require an intact PH–KD interface, because such inhibitors preferentially bind the closed PH-in conformation (16, 17, 38). Consistent with this result, we found that mutations in AKT that favor an open (PH-out) conformation show reduced sensitivity to allosteric AKT inhibitors, although they retain sensitivity to ATP-competitive inhibitors. This finding indicates that the AKT mutational status has important implications for the choice of inhibitor in the clinic. AKT mutations, although they may function as drivers in naive tumors, can also arise in tumors in response to agents that target upstream components of the AKT pathway. Future studies will be required to assess such mutations and fully understand the predictive and prognostic significance of these mutations in the clinic.  
1514||In the era of personalized medicine, understanding the molecular drivers of oncogenesis will be likely to trump morphological characteristics with regard to diagnostics, prognostics and choice of therapies. Identifying single driver mutations from billions of possibilities used to require substantial insight. However, as the cost of deep genomic sequencing goes down each month, clever tricks such as identifying family cohorts may not be as necessary. Family cohorts have driven genetic discovery for decades, including the identification of most tumor suppressor genes and many oncogenes.  Neuroblastoma is a lethal cancer of early childhood that essentially comes in two forms: highly malignant and locally manageable, or, to paraphrase Audrey Evans, an early leader in the field, the ‘good’ies and the ‘bad’ies. The underlying genes responsible for neuroblastoma remain largely unknown, despite the discovery of a handful of genetic changes that have been implicated in neuroblastoma development. For example, Brodeur et al.1 and Look et al.2 correlated MYCN oncogene amplification with aggressive tumors that have a high propensity for metastasis and that cause mortality. Also, very small subsets of familial neuroblastoma were associated with PHOX2B (encoding paired-like homeobox-2) mutations, but these mutations accounted for only very few families (reviewed in ref. 3).  To identify additional oncogenes that cause familial neuroblastoma, Mossé et al.4 returned to old-fashioned family trees. They collected the pedigrees of 20 families that showed an autosomal dominant pattern of neuroblastoma inheritance. Using a genome-wide scan for linkage at 6,000 single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs), these investigators identified a previously unknown series of germline mutations in the ALK gene. Some but not all of these families had genomic amplicons on chromosome 2 that also included MYCN. Among the mutations identified, most were predicted to lead to amino acid substitutions in the ALK tyrosine kinase domain (Fig. 1). Five of the eight pedigrees with germline mutation led to proteins with the same R1275Q mutation. A neuroblastoma cell line containing the R1275Q mutation showed ALK activation, which was indicated by tyrosine phosphorylation at ALK Y1604.  Figure 1 Figure 1 The ALK receptor kinase: its domains, pathways, mutations and inhibitors. The different domains of ALK are shown within their bordering amino-acid positions. The major mutations found by Mossé et al.4, Janoueix-Lerosey et al.5, Chen et al.6 and ... Three additional publications by Janoueix-Lerosey et al.5, Chen et al.6 and George et al.7 used SNP- or amplicon-based sequencing methods to identify similar mutations in ALK (Fig. 1). Each of the three studies showed the effects of a dominant oncogene with a similar pattern of results. Not all mutations resulted in constitutive kinase activity; in fact, only the minority showed clear increases in ALK autophosphorylation and downstream target activation, such as phosphorylation of AKT. The R1275Q and F1174L(V) mutations were shown to have constitutive tyrosine phosphorylation in cell lines that endogenously expressed these mutant forms of ALK, or when expressed in either 3T3 or Ba/F3 cells6,7.  ALK mutations in neuroblastoma tissues account for small survival differences in the whole population of people with neuroblastoma; this is due to their very low incidence in the population. Still, individuals who have neuroblastomas with the ALK F1174 mutation show a significantly worse outcome relative to the overall cohort, suggesting that this mutation has an important impact on malignant progression, whereas the presence of the ALK R1275Q mutation did not make a difference8. Stratification according to ALK expression showed that individuals with high ALK expression in their tumors had a significantly worse overall survival and disease-free survival than those with low tumor ALK expression. Although this type of single-gene analysis can be useful to direct treatment with a targeted therapy, genomic instability in the tumors leads to complex mixtures of clonal cells; therefore, multigene analyses can provide a more robust predictor of disease course and may ultimately provide a more complex insight into pathways activated during tumorigenesis and even predict candidate drug sensitivity8.  The functional role of these ALK mutations was addressed in each of the four studies4–7; however, a deeper understanding will be necessary to optimize any ALK-targeted therapy. Each study used either ALK expression followed by inhibition in non-neuroblastoma cell lines, RNAi-mediated reduction of endogenous ALK expression in cell lines or small-molecule kinase inhibitors. Generally, the results from these studies supported a dominant role for mutant ALK. However, in some cases, RNAi-mediated reduction of wild-type ALK expression also reduced neuroblastoma cell growth, suggesting that the level of ALK expression might be as important as an activating mutation in driving tumorigenesis.  A recent paper by Sasaki et al.9 identified ALK F1174L as a mutation that occurred naturally in an individual with inflammatory myoblastic tumor undergoing treatment with the dual MET and ALK kinase inhibitor crizotinib. This tumor contained a somatic RANBP2-ALK translocation; however, when the person experienced recurrent disease, one ALK locus contained an additional F1174L mutation. An evaluation of the inflammatory myoblastic tumor cells harboring ALK F1174L showed that they had higher levels of phosphorylated ALK along with increased downstream phosphorylation of AKT. Thus, this study supports that F1174L is an activating mutation of ALK.  ALK was independently identified as a molecular target in neuroblastoma by screening >600 human cancer cell lines with pharmacological inhibitors of ALK kinase activity10. This work provided a platform from which to launch inhibitor development when a transforming EML4-ALK fusion gene was identified as a major driver in a subset of approximately 5% of non–small-cell lung cancers11. Indeed, a first clinical trial with crizotinib showed striking efficacy in individuals with non–small-cell lung cancer, providing evidence that a well-defined activated pathway may be targeted effectively12 (Fig. 1). A recent structural study of the ALK kinase domain revealed differences from the same domain in related receptor kinases in the insulin receptor family that will be helpful in designing new inhibitors as resistance to the initial ALK inhibitors emerges13.  As higher ALK receptor expression in neuroblastoma coincides with poorer disease outcome8, overexpressed ALK may thus be a potentially valuable therapeutic target. Indeed, two proteins—pleiotrophin and the related midkine—have been shown to activate mammalian ALK14 through extracellular interactions with it (Fig. 1). Therefore, antibody strategies to target overexpressed ALK in neuroblastoma may be an attractive additional approach. Antibody therapy may even act syn ergistically with small-molecule tyrosine kinase inhibitors.  It is clear that targeting ALK is now open season for the development of new therapies for neuroblastoma, as well as other cancers. The insights gained from ongoing trials are likely to directly benefit both subgroups of individuals whose tumors are driven by ALK and, in general, targeted approaches to cancer treatment. Obviously, genetic mutations can reveal new drivers and pathways activated in cancer and may present new therapeutic opportunities. However, fully validating any new target is a challenge at a new frontier of a deadly cancer.  SUMMARY Neuroblastoma is a childhood extracranial solid tumour that is associated with a number of genetic changes. Included in these genetic alterations are mutations in the kinase domain of the anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK) receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK), which have been found in both somatic and familial neuroblastoma. In order to treat patients accordingly requires characterisation of these mutations in terms of their response to ALK tyrosine kinase inhibitors (TKIs). Here, we report the identification and characterisation of two novel neuroblastoma ALK mutations (A1099T and R1464STOP), which we have investigated together with several previously reported but uncharacterised ALK mutations (T1087I, D1091N, T1151M, M1166R, F1174I and A1234T). In order to understand the potential role of these ALK mutations in neuroblastoma progression, we have employed cell culture-based systems together with the model organism Drosophila as a readout for ligand-independent activity. Mutation of ALK at position 1174 (F1174I) generates a gain-of-function receptor capable of activating intracellular targets such as ERK (extracellular signal regulated kinase) and STAT3 (signal transducer and activator of transcription 3) in a ligand-independent manner. Analysis of these previously uncharacterised ALK mutants and comparison with ALKF1174 mutants suggests that ALK mutations observed in neuroblastoma fall into three classes. These classes are: (i) gain-of-function ligand-independent mutations such as ALKF1174l, (ii) kinase-dead ALK mutants, e.g. ALKI1250T (Schönherr et al., 2011a) and (iii) ALK mutations that are ligand-dependent in nature. Irrespective of the nature of the observed ALK mutants, in every case the activity of the mutant ALK receptors could be abrogated by the ALK inhibitor crizotinib (Xalkori/PF-02341066), albeit with differing levels of sensitivity.  Go to: INTRODUCTION Neuroblastoma is a common childhood cancer that arises in the tissues of the sympathetic nervous system (Maris et al., 2007). It most commonly originates in the adrenal glands, but can also develop at additional sites in the neck, chest and abdomen. It is considered to be a disease of developing tissue because it originates from precursor cells of neural crest tissue that are active during embryonic development. This in part explains the median age of 17 months for occurrence of neuroblastoma (Maris, 2010). Recently, anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK) gain-of-function mutations have been described in both familial (Janoueix-Lerosey et al., 2008; Mossé et al., 2008) and sporadic neuroblastoma (Carén et al., 2008; Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Martinsson et al., 2011; Mossé et al., 2008). Although there is currently no clinically approved treatment for ALK mutations in neuroblastoma, ongoing clinical trials are expected to determine the potential usefulness of ALK-targeted therapies for use in the future. Inhibition of ALK activity using crizotinib (Xalkori/PF-02341066) has been reported in both inflammatory myofibroblastic tumours (IMT) and non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) patients (Butrynski et al., 2010; Kwak et al., 2010). Anti-ALK inhibitor therapy thus appears to offer promise in the treatment of ALK-mediated tumours at this point (Hallberg and Palmer, 2011). It is of future clinical importance to characterise each ALK mutation so that individual patients can be treated accordingly. Furthermore, we have addressed the important issue of whether ALK mutations are resistant to the medicine that is currently in use.  ALK was originally identified as a fusion partner with nucleophosmin or nucleolar protein gene (NPM)-ALK oncogene in anaplastic large cell lymphoma (Morris et al., 1994; Shiota et al., 1994). Later, ALK was reported to be receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK), with a molecular weight of 220 kDa, belonging to the insulin receptor superfamily (Iwahara et al., 1997; Morris et al., 1997). ALK contains an extracellular ligand-binding domain, a transmembrane-spanning domain and an intracellular tyrosine kinase domain (Palmer et al., 2009) and is expressed primarily in the central and peripheral nervous system during embryonic development and at lower concentrations in the nervous system of adults. Its expression is also observed in developing sensory organs, reproductive organs, skin and stomach (Iwahara et al., 1997; Morris et al., 1997; Vernersson et al., 2006) and its physiological function is still enigmatic. It has been associated with multiple translocation events involved in several different human malignancies (Palmer et al., 2009), such as IMT (Griffin et al., 1999), NSCLC (Rikova et al., 2007; Soda et al., 2007), diffuse large B cell lymphomas (DLBCL) (Arber et al., 1996) and renal cell carcinoma (Debelenko et al., 2011) amongst others. Involvement of ALK in a number of human diseases including neuroblastoma has accelerated recent efforts to understand the function of this RTK under both pathological and non-pathological conditions.  In this study, we have characterised a number of novel mutations in the ALK gene from neuroblastoma patients. From analysis of genomic DNA from patient biopsy samples, two novel germ line mutations were identified, leading to A1099T and R1464STOP mutations at the protein level. We have investigated these mutations, looking at whether they could act as driver or passenger mutations in neuroblastoma, with the aim of predicting their potential role in disease progression. Further, we have compared them with a number of other previously reported, but currently uncharacterised, ALK mutations, namely T1087I, D1091N, T1151M, M1166R and F1174I.  Our findings confirm that the ALKF1174I mutation, in keeping with the previously characterised ALKF1174S and ALKF1174L mutants, is a gain-of-function mutation that mediates activation of downstream targets such as ERK and STAT3 in a ligand-independent manner. The ALKF1174I mutant is able to transform both Ba/F3 and NIH3T3 cells. Although we observed that the ALKM1166R mutant is unable to transform Ba/F3 cells, it was able to give rise to foci in NIH3T3 transformation assays. Taken together, our data suggest that the ALK mutations investigated to date fall into three classes: (i) gain-of-function ligand-independent mutations (e.g. F1174I), (ii) kinase-dead ALK mutants (Schönherr et al., 2011a) and (iii) ALK mutations that are ligand-dependent in nature, such as the human ALK mutations (T1087I, D1091N, A1099T, T1151M, M1166R, A1234T, R1464STOP), which are not constitutively active but which display ligand-dependent activation when challenged with agonist antibodies. Importantly, to date, the activity of all ALK mutants tested can be abrogated by treatment with ALK small molecule TKIs.  TRANSLATIONAL IMPACT  Clinical issue  Neuroblastoma is a childhood extracranial solid tumour that has been associated with alterations in several different genes. Among these, are mutations in the kinase domain of the anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK), a receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK). ALK mutations have been reported in both somatic and familial forms of neuroblastoma. Many ALK mutations confer a gain of function to the protein, but mechanistic information is not available for all identified mutations. Optimal treatment of neuroblastoma (e.g. with tyrosine kinase inhibitors) requires a clearer understanding of how different ALK mutations influence protein function and, in turn, contribute to neuroblastoma development. In addition, it is important to investigate whether certain ALK mutations confer resistance to currently available neuroblastoma drugs.  Results  Here, the authors compared signalling mediated by several different ALK mutants identified in patients with neuroblastoma with signalling mediated by wild-type ALK. Their studies aimed to determine whether disease-associated ALK mutations are universally gain-of-function and whether certain ALK mutations can confer resistance to tyrosine kinase inhibitors. Their results, together with existing data, suggest that the neuroblastoma-associated ALK mutations characterised thus far fall into three classes: (i) gain-of-function, ligand-independent mutations of varying activation strength, such as ALKF1174, (ii) kinase-dead ALK mutants, such as ALKI1250T and (iii) ALK mutations that are ligand-dependent and might represent ‘passenger’ mutations. Importantly, the activity of all mutant ALK receptors, irrespective of mutation type, could be abrogated by the ALK inhibitor crizotinib, albeit with differing levels of sensitivity.  Implications and future directions  Characterizing individual ALK mutations is clinically important so that individual neuroblastoma patients can be classified and treated appropriately. These results provide mechanistic information on several neuroblastoma-associated ALK mutations and propose a way to classify all ALK mutants. Encouragingly, these results also indicate that various types of ALK mutations are sensitive to currently available neuroblastoma therapy.  Go to: RESULTS Evaluating the role of human ALK mutations as driver or passenger  We set out to characterise two novel germ line ALK variants identified in patients with neuroblastoma (ALKA1099T and ALKR1464STOP) and their potential roles as driver or passenger mutations in neuroblastoma. ALKA1099T was identified in a Japanese infant diagnosed with neuroblastoma, born to unrelated healthy parents with no neuroblastoma history. No MYCN amplification or ALK amplification was detected in this patient, and the tumour was classified as stage 2. The ALKA1099T variant was heterozygous in both tumour and blood DNA samples. The ALKR1464STOP mutation was observed in the DNA and RNA from a patient sample analysed as part of the TARGET (therapeutically applicable research to generate effective treatments) initiative, which aims to characterise the genomic landscape of the most common childhood cancers, including neuroblastoma. This sequence variant was heterozygous in tumour DNA and RNA, as well as in blood DNA. DNA from the patient's parents was not available for testing.  Also included in this analysis were the earlier reported, but as yet uncharacterised, putative gain-of-function ALK mutations: ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKT1151M, ALKM1166R, ALKF1174I and ALKA1234T (Fig. 1A,B) (Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Mossé et al., 2008). As a positive control, the previously verified constitutively active ALK mutations ALKF1174L and ALKF1174S were also included (Martinsson et al., 2011). Initially, we investigated these eight human neuroblastoma ALK mutations in a PC12 cell culture system, examining both signalling activity and capacity to drive differentiation, as measured by neurite outgrowth. PC12 cells are a clonal rat adrenal pheochromocytoma cell line, which are well characterised as differentiating and extending neurites upon stimulation with nerve growth factor or differentiation factors (Greene and Tischler, 1976). They do not express ALK at detectable levels. We, and others, have previously shown that expression of wild-type ALK (ALKwt), followed by stimulation with ALK agonist monoclonal antibody 31 (mAb31) or expression of activating ALK mutants leads to neurite extension in PC12 cells (Martinsson et al., 2011) (Fig. 1C, lane 1). PC12 cells were transiently transfected with ALK mutants and serum-starved for 48 hours prior to stimulation with mAb31 for 30 minutes. Both human ALKwt and human ALKF1174S were included as controls (Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Martinsson et al., 2011) (Fig. 1). The ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants displayed characteristics similar to that of ALKwt and were able to activate downstream targets such as ERK only upon stimulation with agonist mAb31 (Fig. 1C). In a manner similar to that previously observed for human ALKF1174S, two of the mutants investigated (human ALKM1166R and human ALKF1174I) were able to activate phosphorylation of ERK in the absence of agonist mAb31, suggesting that these two mutants might be constitutively activated in a ligand-independent manner (Fig. 1C). Furthermore, in keeping with this hypothesis, both human ALKM1166R and human ALKF1174I mediated robust phosphorylation of STAT3, as reported for the ALKF1174S mutation (Fig. 1C). Interestingly, none of the other mutants were able to generate STAT3 phosphorylation or activation upon stimulation for up to 30 minutes, as previously shown for wild-type ALK (Schönherr et al., 2011b).  Fig. 1. Fig. 1. Domain structure of ALK mutations and their activation of downstream targets. (A) The extracellular, transmembrane domain and the intracellular domain, which contains the protein tyrosine kinase domain are shown. Mutation residues within the intracellular ... Thus, in this initial analysis, the ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants were found to be inducibly activated by agonist mAb31 and displayed enhanced activation of ERK upon stimulation. However, they were unable to activate STAT3. By contrast, both ALKM1166R and ALKF1174I appeared to be activated in a ligand-independent manner and led to robust activation of downstream targets, such as ERK and STAT3, in a manner similar to the ALKF1174S mutation.  Crizotinib blocks neurite outgrowth activity of human ALK mutants  The PC12 cell system is a sensitive readout for ALK signalling activity as a result of receptor activation (Schönherr et al., 2011b; Yang et al., 2007). Transient transfection of ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP did not stimulate neurite outgrowth in the absence of agonist mAb31. However, addition of agonist antibody lead to significantly increased levels of neurite outgrowth (up to 30-40%) (Fig. 2). The levels of ALK-induced neurite outgrowth were similar to that observed upon stimulation of the wild-type ALK receptor. In agreement with our earlier results, the ALKM1166R and ALKF1174I mutants were capable of mediating neurite outgrowth in a ligand-independent manner, displaying similar percentages of neurite outgrowth in the presence or absence of agonist antibody (Fig. 2). To investigate whether neurite outgrowth could be abrogated by ALK inhibition, we employed crizotinib (Xalkori), an FDA-approved small inhibitor of both ALK and MET receptor tyrosine kinases, which is being employed in phase II and III clinical trials (Butrynski et al., 2010; Kwak et al., 2010; Hallberg and Palmer, 2011). Crizotinib (250 nM) treatment resulted in a significant reduction in ALK-induced neurite outgrowth. Thus, crizotinib is able to effectively block neurite outgrowth mediated by all human ALK mutants investigated here.  Fig. 2. Fig. 2. Crizotinib abrogates ALK-mediated neurite outgrowth in PC12 cells. PC12 cells were co-transfected with pcDNA3-human ALK and pEGFPN1 and seeded out in the presence or absence of crizotinib. Cells were stimulated with 1 μg/ml mAb31. After 48 hours, ... In Ba/F3 cells, crizotinib inhibits constitutively active ALK mutants with varying IC50 values  To confirm and extend our analysis of the inhibition of these ALK mutants by crizotinib, the Ba/F3 cell system was employed (Lu et al., 2009; Schönherr et al., 2011b). Ba/F3 cells, an IL-3-dependent cell line, are often employed in kinase drug discovery, exploiting their characteristic of being able to overcome IL-3 dependence, which allows them to survive and proliferate in the absence of IL-3 when expressing constitutively active tyrosine kinase or other oncogenes (Warmuth et al., 2007). Ba/F3 cells were transfected with human wild-type ALK and the eight different ALK mutants, and subsequently selected with the antibiotic G418 in the presence of IL-3 for 10 days. We observed that Ba/F3 cells expressing the different ALK mutants exhibited variable proliferation ability in the absence of IL-3 (Fig. 3B). At the end of selection in IL-3-free medium, only the human ALKF1174I mutant gave rise to IL-3-independent cell lines, along with the human ALKF1174L positive control. By contrast, ALKwt, ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, human ALKM1166R, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants were unable to substitute for IL-3 to drive proliferation in Ba/F3 cells, even though they expressed ALK protein (Fig. 3A,B and data not shown). To further analyse the responsiveness of these mutants toward crizotinib, the cells were treated with different doses of this ALK inhibitor. Importantly, crizotinib did not inhibit cell growth or cell viability when cells were grown in the presence of IL-3 (Fig. 3C), indicating that it is not toxic to Ba/F3 cells at the levels employed. Proliferation of both human ALKF1174I and human ALKF1174L mutants was blocked by crizotinib (Fig. 4A). IC50 (concentration of drug responsible for 50% inhibition) values show that inhibition of ALKF1174I required similar doses of crizotinib as human ALKF1174L (Fig. 4B). Furthermore, inhibition of ALK mutant activity was also confirmed at the level of ALK tyrosine phosphorylation at position 1278. Tyr1278 corresponds to the first tyrosine of the Y'RAS'YY motif in the A-loop of ALK that is necessary for auto-activation of ALK kinase domain and transformation ability of nucleophosmin (NPM)-ALK (Tartari et al, 2008). Immunoblot analysis performed on Ba/F3 cell lysates showed a reduction in the levels of ALK Tyr1278 phosphorylation in the presence of inhibitor for both human ALKF1174L and human ALKF1174I mutants (Fig. 4C). In agreement with these results, both mutants exhibited decreased ALK Tyr1604 phosphorylation (Fig. 4C). Reduced levels of ERK phosphorylation by both mutants upon treatment with crizotinib confirmed the inhibition of ALK-mediated downstream targets (Fig. 4C). Taken together, these data suggest that crizotinib is able to block the ALK activity of these mutants in a dose-dependent manner.  Fig. 3. Fig. 3. Expression of human ALK in Ba/F3 cells. (A) Ba/F3 cells were transfected with human wild-type or mutant ALKs and selected with G418 in the presence of IL-3. Whole cell lysates were prepared and run on SDS-PAGE, followed by immunoblotting with indicated ... Fig. 4. Fig. 4. Crizotinib inhibits both human ALKF1174-driven proliferation and phosphorylation at Tyr1278 and Tyr1604 of ALK in Ba/F3 cells. (A) IC50 values for crizotinib for both human ALKF1174I and human ALKF1174L were calculated. Values represent mean + s.d. from ... Transforming potential of human ALK mutations  We further examined the transforming ability of human ALK mutants using NIH3T3 cells. Expression of the human ALK mutations ALKwt, ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP were unable to generate formation of foci greater than that of the vector control or ALK wild-type control. By contrast, both ALKF1174I and ALKF1174L displayed robust foci formation, although ALKM1166R showed rather weak foci formation ability in comparison with ALKF1174S (Fig. 5A). These results indicate different degrees of foci formation by the ligand-independent ALK mutations, which is in agreement with our previous results in the Ba/F3 system (Fig. 5B).  Fig. 5. Fig. 5. Transformation potential of human ALK mutants. (A,B) The transforming potential of the mutations was assayed by transfecting NIH3T3 cells with pcDNA3-human ALK (mutant and wild type). Cells were selected with G418 for 3 weeks. (A) Representative images ... Ectopic expression of human ALK mutants in Drosophila melanogaster  Transgenic Drosophila expressing the human ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants were generated to confirm their ligand-dependent characteristics. These were ectopically expressed in Drosophila eye, together with the previously generated human ALKF1174L and ALKwt, employing the pGMR-Gal4 driver line, which directs protein expression in developing photoreceptors of the eye. The expression of human ALK proteins was confirmed by immunostaining of the eye discs by using anti-human ALK antibody. Expression of human ALKF1174L resulted in a rough eye phenotype, whereas expression of human ALKwt, ALKA1234T or ALKR1464STOP did not show any obvious phenotype in adult flies (Martinsson et al., 2011) (Fig. 6). However, the regular hexagonal arrangement of ommatidia was disorganised, with many interommatidial bristles missing in human ALKF1174L. The data strongly support the conclusion that the human ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants are ligand-dependent in nature.  Fig. 6. Fig. 6. Ectopic expression of human ALKA1234T and human ALKR1464STOP in Drosophila eye does not generate the rough eye phenotype. Adult fly eyes (upper) and larval eye discs (lower) ectopically expressing mutant human ALK variants. Human ALKwt and human ALKF1174L ... Go to: DISCUSSION ALK mutations have been reported in both familial (Mossé et al., 2008) and sporadic neuroblastoma (Carén et al., 2008; Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Janoueix-Lerosey et al., 2008; Martinsson et al., 2011; Mossé et al., 2008). The presence of ALK mutations in neuroblastoma draws attention to its possible function and its role in disease progression. Therefore, characterisation of these different ALK mutations is an important exercise in assessing whether the various mutants are functional or not, with potential importance for the patient to be treated accordingly.  In this study, we have investigated two novel mutations of ALK (ALKA1099T and ALKR1464STOP) and compared them with six previously described but uncharacterised human ALK point mutations (ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKT1151M, ALKM1166R, ALKF1174I and ALKA1234T) from neuroblastoma patients, with the aim of assessing whether these mutations could drive tumour progression (Table 1). So far, and from our knowledge of neuroblastoma tumour analysis and published reports to date, only one neuroblastoma patient has presented with a homozygous ALK mutation (Martinsson et al., 2011). To date, one mutation (ALKI1250T) has been reported to have defective kinase activity, raising important questions as to the impact, if any, that this mutation has upon neuroblastoma progression (Schönherr et al., 2011a). Signalling studies in the PC12 cell system showed differences in the activation of downstream targets by the various ALK mutants examined. ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP showed little phosphorylation of ERK, which was enhanced by stimulation with agonist antibodies. On the other hand, ALKM1166R and ALKF1174I mediated ligand-independent phosphorylation of ERK and STAT3. Likewise, the ALKM1166R and ALKF1174I mutants were able to mediate neurite outgrowth in PC12 cells in a ligand-independent manner (Table 1). The other ALK mutations (ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP) displayed inducible activity and resulted in neurites only when stimulated with agonist antibodies, which could be abrogated by crizotinib (Table 1). Furthermore, we co-transfected our ligand-dependent mutants together with wild-type ALK. We observed no change in the phosphorylation of ERK or in the levels of neurite outgrowth ability when compared with wild-type ALK alone in PC12 cells (data not shown).  Table 1. Table 1. Characterization of ALK mutations in order to assess their oncogenic potential Interestingly, the ALKM1166R mutant gave rise to weak foci formation in NIH3T3 cells in comparison with the ALKF1174I mutant, which displayed robust foci formation (Table 1). In this assay, the human ALK mutations ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP did not yield any foci as expected. These results thus revealed that only the ALKF1174I and ALKM1166R mutants harbour transforming potential in NIH3T3 cells. To complement these analyses, we employed the Ba/F3 cell model system. This revealed that even though the ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKM1166R, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutant receptors were expressed, they could not substitute for IL-3 to drive proliferation in Ba/F3 cells. Our Ba/F3 results with the ALKT1151M and ALKA1234T mutations are in agreement with earlier reported results (George et al., 2008). However, human ALKF1174I and the human ALKF1174L control, gave rise to IL-3-independent cell lines. Both mutations displayed sensitivity towards crizotinib in a dose-dependent manner, as shown by their different IC50 values (Table 1). These data are in agreement with previous reports showing that different ALK mutations exhibit different levels of sensitivity towards crizotinib (Bresler et al., 2011; Schönherr et al., 2011b). We also show that cell proliferation and phosphorylation of ALK at tyrosine positions 1278 and 1604 are blocked by using crizotinib, as expected (Fig. 4) (Schönherr et al., 2011b; Tartari et al., 2008). These data indicate that the human ALKF1174I mutant is able to mediate neurite outgrowth, transform NIH3T3 cells, activate downstream targets of ALK (such as ERK and STAT3) in a ligand-independent manner and substitute for IL-3 in Ba/F3 cells, giving rise to IL-3-independent cell line. Thus, we conclude that human ALKF1174I is a gain-of-function mutation that is sensitive to crizotinib inhibition.  The ALKM1166R mutation gives rise to neurites in PC12 cells, activates downstream targets (such as ERKs and STAT3) in a ligand-independent manner and shows weak foci formation. However, it fails to substitute for IL-3 and, hence, does not yield any IL-3-independent Ba/F3 cell lines in our hands. This is comparable to the ALKR1275Q mutant, which also displays neurite generating ability but is unable to support Ba/F3 IL-3-independent growth (Schönherr et al., 2011b). Amino acid Met1166 is not conserved in insulin receptor kinase (IRK) family members, perhaps implying that it might have a structural and functional role specific to ALK (Lee et al., 2010). Met1166 is located in the interface between the αC-helix and the DFG-helix and mutations of this residue would probably destabilise the DFG-helix and consequently facilitate the shift of the αC-helix (Fig. 1B) (Bossi et al., 2010). From a structural point of view, both positions 1166 and 1174 are in or very close to the αC-helix, which plays an important role in the activation process of the insulin receptor family members. Upon activation, the αC-helix moves a few degrees closer to the ATP-catalytic site that mediates the γ-phospho-exchange from bound ATP to the interacting substrate (Lemmon and Schlessinger, 2010). Furthermore, it has previously been shown that mutation at position 1174 changes the character of the ALK protein from a ligand-dependent receptor to a receptor exhibiting gain-of-function properties (Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Martinsson et al., 2011). Probably, this mutations results in disruption of the packing, weakening distinctive structural features observed in the ALK structure, such as the unique inhibitory position of the ALK A-loop packing a short proximal A-loop α-helix against the αC-helix of ALK, while a β-turn motif obstructs the substrate binding region (Fig. 1B). In this arrangement, Tyr1278 is inaccessible for phosphorylation because it is engaged in the interaction interface through bonding with Cys1097 in the N-terminal β-sheet (Bossi et al, 2010; Lee et al, 2010). Both Phe1174 and Met1166 mutations can probably weaken auto-inhibitory interactions and allow the ALK kinase domain to more easily adopt its active configuration. However, unlike ALKF1174 mutants, the ALKM1166R mutation is not a robust gain-of-function mutation, although it is able to transform NIH3T3 cells, mediate neurite outgrowth, and activate downstream ALK targets, such as STAT3 and ERK. Moreover, unlike ALKF1174 mutants, ALKM1166R lacks the ability to mediate Il-3 independent growth of Ba/F3 cells. Our analyses suggest that although ALKM1166R is able to weaken the auto-inhibitory interaction, this does not occur to the same degree as with the ALKF1174 mutations. The extent to which an ALKM1166R mutation contributes to neuroblastoma disease progression or tumour initation is unclear from our experiments.  Consideration of the impact of the ALKT1087I and ALKD1091N mutations on ALK kinase activity from a structural point of view is difficult because they have not been included in any structural study to date. Both are located close to the C-terminal of the β1 and β2 sheets in the kinase domain (Bossi et al., 2010; Lee et al, 2010). Another mutation investigated here is at position Ala1099, which is located between the β1' and β2' sheets. Both Lee et al. and Bossi et al. have indicated that nearby Cys1097 plays an important role in mediating a hydrogen bond with the unphosphorylated tyrosine at position 1278 when ALK is in an inactive configuration (Fig. 1B, sticks and dots) (Lee et al, 2010; Bossi et al., 2010). Our analyses of these, together with the location of the ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N and ALKA1099T mutations, indicate that no gross structural conformation changes occur that result in the mutant ALK protein gaining characteristics that differ significantly from the wild-type protein (Table 1). The Thr1151 mutation is located in the β3 sheet, included in the framework of five-stranded, twisted anti-parallel β-sheets that build up predominantly the N-terminal kinase lobe. Apparently, mutation of Thr1151 to methionine (T1151M) does not affect the ability of the ALK kinase domain to be activated upon stimulation. Finally, it is difficult to predict the effect of the 1464STOP mutation, although from our analyses we would speculate that at least in terms of activation it behaves in a manner similar to the wild-type receptor, i.e. the receptor displays ligand-dependent activation. However, the manner and regulation of inactivation of such a truncated receptor might be an important aspect that could be of relevance in neuroblastoma.  The expression of mutants such as ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP neither renders Ba/F3 cells independent of IL-3 for their growth nor exhibits transforming activity. Additionally, the mutants do not form foci in NIH3T3 cells. Importantly, however, they are able to give rise to neurites and stimulate activation of ERK in the presence of agonist antibodies. Furthermore, all the mutations in this study are successfully blocked by crizotinib, which results in a decrease in ALK phosphorylation and its downstream target ERK in a manner similar to the controls employed in this study, i.e. ALKF1174L and ALKF1174S (Martinsson et al., 2011; Schönherr et al., 2011b). A recent study has investigated a number of ALK mutants, which have been identified by the Cancer Genome Project (Sanger Institute, Cambridge, UK) in cell lines from a range of tumour types. This analysis included F1174L, from the SH-SY5Y neuroblastoma cell line, as well as a number of additional previously uncharacterised ALK mutations, and looked at their transfomation potential. Similarly to the mutants investigated here (ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP) the ALK mutants investigated by McDuff and colleagues do not render Ba/F3 cells independent of IL-3 for their growth, exhibit lack of transforming activity and might represent passenger mutations in the evolution of cancer (McDuff et al., 2011). However, this work did not examine whether the various ALK mutants were able to respond to activation by external ligand or agonist antibodies or examine their sensitivity to treatment with crizotinib.  From our present analysis of previously uncharacterised ALK mutants, and in light of other reports concerning ALK mutant variants, the accumulated data suggests that the ALK mutations observed and characterised in neuroblastoma to date fall into three classes. These classes are: (i) gain-of-function ligand-independent mutations of varying activation strength, e.g. ALKF1174; (ii) kinase-dead ALK mutants, e.g. ALKI1250T (Schönherr et al., 2011a); and (iii) ALK mutations that are ligand-dependent in nature and which might represent ‘passenger’ mutations. Irrespective of the nature of the observed ALK mutant, in every case the activity of the mutant ALK receptors can be abrogated by treatment with the ALK inhibitor crizotinib, albeit with differing levels of sensitivity. Present knowledge would predict that these mutants will also be sensitive to inhibition by next generation ALK TKIs. Although a role for the class of ligand-independent ALK mutants such as ALKF1174 and ALKR1275 is simple to rationalise, further work will be required to answer the more challenging issue of the significance of the ligand-dependent class of ALK mutants, if any, in neuroblastoma progression.  Go to: MATERIALS AND METHODS Patients: Case 1 (A1099T) and Case 2 (R1464STOP)  Case report 1 A 14-day-old newborn Japanese boy infant diagnosed with neurblastoma was born to unrelated healthy parents with no neuroblastoma history. The tumour was classified as stage 2 and no MYCN amplification nor ALK amplification were detected by array comparative genomic hybridisation (CGH) analysis. This patient is still alive and disease-free, and at this point is 11 years old. DNA ploidy of the tumour was aneuploidy (DNA index was 1.34) and array CGH showed whole chromosome 17 gain, with the pattern of whole chromosomal gains and losses in other multiple chromosomes. The tumour was morphologically diagnosed as favourable according to the Shimada classification (Shimada et al., 1999). Tropomyosin-receptor-kinase (Trk) A was highly expressed in the tumour. The A1099T (GCT/ACT) ALK variant appeared to be heterozygous and present in both tumour and blood DNA, suggesting that this is a germline mutation.  Case report 2 Tumour and blood DNA from a 21-month-old Caucasian American male with stage 4 neuroblastoma were sequenced as part of the TARGET project. The tumour was characterised by MYCN amplification using fluorescence in situ hybridisation (FISH), unfavourable histology (Shimada et al., 1999) and a DNA index of 1.908. Whole genome, exome, and transcriptome sequencing were performed using the Illumina Genome Analyzer. Data were processed as previously described (Morin et al., 2011; Morozova et al., 2010). Sequencing revealed a heterozygous R1646STOP variant in both tumour and blood DNA. In the blood genome, eight reads (47%) supported the reference allele G, and nine reads (53%) supported the alternative allele A. In the tumour genome, five sequencing reads (31%) supported the G allele, and eleven reads supported the A allele. Both reference and alternative alleles were expressed in the tumour transcriptome, with nine and seven reads (56% and 44%) supporting the reference and mutant alleles, respectively. The variant was independently verified by Sanger sequencing.  Generation of human ALK mutant constructions  ALKwt, ALKF1174L and ALKF1174S have been described earlier (Martinsson et al., 2011). All other ALK mutants employed in this study were created in pcDNA3 by Eurofins MWG/operon (Ebersberg, Germany). The mutations generated in the kinase domain were confirmed by sequencing from both directions.  Antibodies and inhibitors  Primary antibodies used were: anti-pan-ERK (1:5000), purchased from BD Transduction Laboratories (Franklin Lakes, NJ), anti-pALK(Y1278), anti-pALK(Y1604), anti-pERK(T202/Y204) and anti- pSTAT3 (Y705) were from Cell Signaling Technology (Danvers, MA). The activating monoclonal antibody mAb31 has been described previously (Martinsson et al., 2011; Moog-Lutz et al., 2005). Monoclonal antibody 153 (anti-ALK) was produced in the Hallberg laboratory against the extracellular domain of ALK as described (Moog-Lutz et al., 2005). Horseradish-peroxidase-conjugated secondary antibodies goat anti-rabbit IgG and goat anti-mouse IgG (diluted 1:5000) were from Thermo Scientific (Waltham, MA). The ALK inhibitor crizotinib (PF-02341066, Xalkori) was a generous gift from Pfizer, Inc.  Neurite outgrowth assay  PC12 cells (2×106) were transfected by electroporation in an Amaxa electroporator (Amaxa Biosystems, Cologne, Germany) using 0.8 μg of pcDNA3-human ALK and 0.5 μg pEGFPN1 (Clontech, Mountain view, CA) and 100 μl Ingenio electroporation solution (Mirus Bio LCC, Madison, WI). Transfected cells were subsequently seeded into 24-well plates together with mAb31 (1 μg/ml) and the inhibitor crizotinib (250 nM) in complete growth medium (Martinsson et al., 2011). After 48 hours of incubation, the fraction of GFP-positive and neuritecarrying cells versus GFP-positive cells was observed under a Zeiss Axiovert 40 CFL microscope. To be judged as a neurite-carrying cell, the neurite of the cell was required to reach at least twice the length of the diameter of a normal cell body. Experiments were performed in triplicates and each sample within an experiment was assayed in duplicate.  Cell proliferation assay and IC50 determination  Ba/F3 cells expressing either human ALKwt or mutant human ALK were generated by electroporation with pcDNA3-human ALK using Amaxa electroporator (Amaxa Biosystems, Cologne, Germany). Transfectants were selected in RPMI with 10% heat-inactivated foetal bovine serum (FBS) and 2.5 ng/ml IL-3 (Peprotech, Rocky Hill, NJ) in the presence of G418 (600 μg /ml) for 10 days. Cells were washed with PBSA and seeded at 0.5×106 cells/ml in RPMI with 10% FBS and G418 for generation of human ALK-expressing IL-3-independent cells (Schönherr et al., 2011b). For calculation of IC50 values, human ALK-expressing Ba/F3 cells were treated with varying concentrations of crizotinib for 3 days. Cell viability was tested with resazurin (Sigma, Stockholm, Sweden) (O'Brien et al., 2000). The IC50 value was determined for individual cell lines and the experiment was carried out at least three times independently, in triplicate.  Cell lysis and western blotting  PC12 cells expressing human ALK mutants were serum-starved for 36 hours prior to stimulation with 1 μg/ml of the activating mAb31 for 30 minutes (Moog-Lutz et al., 2005; Schönherr et al., 2010; Yang et al., 2007). IL-3-independent human ALK-expressing Ba/F3 cells were treated with crizotinib in complete medium for 3 hours. Cells were washed with PBSA and lysed in SDS-sample buffer. Pre-cleared lysates were run on SDS/PAGE, followed by western blotting using the indicated antibodies. ALK downstream activation was detected by pERK and pSTAT3(Y705); pan-ERK was used as loading control. ALK phosphorylation was analysed with pALK(Y1278) and pALK(Y1604) antibodies. Cell lysis and immunoblotting were performed according to described protocols (Schönherr et al., 2010).  Transformation assay  NIH3T3 cells (4.5×104) were seeded in collagen-coated 12-well plates prior to transfection for 6 hours with 1.75 μg pcDNA3.1-human ALK and 4.4 μl Lipofectamine 2000 (Invitrogen, Paisley, UK) in 0.3 ml Opti-MEM. The next day, 60% of the cells were transferred to six-well plates and maintained in DMEM with 10% heat-inactivated FBS and 0.5 mg/ml G418 until the cells reached confluency. Then, the cells were cultivated in DMEM with 5% heat-inactivated FBS and 0.25 mg/ml G418 for approximately 10 days. The cells were then fixed using methanol and stained with 0.25% crystal violet. The foci visible by the naked eye were subsequently analysed (Schönherr et al., 2011a).  Expression of human ALK mutants in Drosophila eye  The Gal4-UAS expression system was employed to express human ALK in the Drosophila eye (Brand and Perrimon, 1993). DNA encoding ALK1234T and ALK1464STOP were subcloned with EcoRI and NotI from pcDNA3-ALK1234T and pcDNA3-ALK1464STOP, and the resulting fragments were ligated into the EcoRI-NotI site of the pUAST vector. Transgenic flies carrying pUAST-ALK were generated by BestGene (Chino Hills, CA) and crossed with pGMR-Gal4 (Bloomington, stock no. 9146). Offspring were fixed with 4% glutaraldehyde in PBS overnight and subjected to electron microscopic analysis. To confirm the expression of human ALK, eye discs of third instar larva were stained with anti-ALK mAb153 (Schönherr et al., 2011a). Antibody binding was visualised using Cy3-labelled anti-mouse IgG (Amersham). The discs were mounted on slides in Fluoromount-G (Southern Biotechnology Associates, Birmingham, AL) and imaged using a Zeiss Apotome. 
1515||In the era of personalized medicine, understanding the molecular drivers of oncogenesis will be likely to trump morphological characteristics with regard to diagnostics, prognostics and choice of therapies. Identifying single driver mutations from billions of possibilities used to require substantial insight. However, as the cost of deep genomic sequencing goes down each month, clever tricks such as identifying family cohorts may not be as necessary. Family cohorts have driven genetic discovery for decades, including the identification of most tumor suppressor genes and many oncogenes.  Neuroblastoma is a lethal cancer of early childhood that essentially comes in two forms: highly malignant and locally manageable, or, to paraphrase Audrey Evans, an early leader in the field, the ‘good’ies and the ‘bad’ies. The underlying genes responsible for neuroblastoma remain largely unknown, despite the discovery of a handful of genetic changes that have been implicated in neuroblastoma development. For example, Brodeur et al.1 and Look et al.2 correlated MYCN oncogene amplification with aggressive tumors that have a high propensity for metastasis and that cause mortality. Also, very small subsets of familial neuroblastoma were associated with PHOX2B (encoding paired-like homeobox-2) mutations, but these mutations accounted for only very few families (reviewed in ref. 3).  To identify additional oncogenes that cause familial neuroblastoma, Mossé et al.4 returned to old-fashioned family trees. They collected the pedigrees of 20 families that showed an autosomal dominant pattern of neuroblastoma inheritance. Using a genome-wide scan for linkage at 6,000 single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs), these investigators identified a previously unknown series of germline mutations in the ALK gene. Some but not all of these families had genomic amplicons on chromosome 2 that also included MYCN. Among the mutations identified, most were predicted to lead to amino acid substitutions in the ALK tyrosine kinase domain (Fig. 1). Five of the eight pedigrees with germline mutation led to proteins with the same R1275Q mutation. A neuroblastoma cell line containing the R1275Q mutation showed ALK activation, which was indicated by tyrosine phosphorylation at ALK Y1604.  Figure 1 Figure 1 The ALK receptor kinase: its domains, pathways, mutations and inhibitors. The different domains of ALK are shown within their bordering amino-acid positions. The major mutations found by Mossé et al.4, Janoueix-Lerosey et al.5, Chen et al.6 and ... Three additional publications by Janoueix-Lerosey et al.5, Chen et al.6 and George et al.7 used SNP- or amplicon-based sequencing methods to identify similar mutations in ALK (Fig. 1). Each of the three studies showed the effects of a dominant oncogene with a similar pattern of results. Not all mutations resulted in constitutive kinase activity; in fact, only the minority showed clear increases in ALK autophosphorylation and downstream target activation, such as phosphorylation of AKT. The R1275Q and F1174L(V) mutations were shown to have constitutive tyrosine phosphorylation in cell lines that endogenously expressed these mutant forms of ALK, or when expressed in either 3T3 or Ba/F3 cells6,7.  ALK mutations in neuroblastoma tissues account for small survival differences in the whole population of people with neuroblastoma; this is due to their very low incidence in the population. Still, individuals who have neuroblastomas with the ALK F1174 mutation show a significantly worse outcome relative to the overall cohort, suggesting that this mutation has an important impact on malignant progression, whereas the presence of the ALK R1275Q mutation did not make a difference8. Stratification according to ALK expression showed that individuals with high ALK expression in their tumors had a significantly worse overall survival and disease-free survival than those with low tumor ALK expression. Although this type of single-gene analysis can be useful to direct treatment with a targeted therapy, genomic instability in the tumors leads to complex mixtures of clonal cells; therefore, multigene analyses can provide a more robust predictor of disease course and may ultimately provide a more complex insight into pathways activated during tumorigenesis and even predict candidate drug sensitivity8.  The functional role of these ALK mutations was addressed in each of the four studies4–7; however, a deeper understanding will be necessary to optimize any ALK-targeted therapy. Each study used either ALK expression followed by inhibition in non-neuroblastoma cell lines, RNAi-mediated reduction of endogenous ALK expression in cell lines or small-molecule kinase inhibitors. Generally, the results from these studies supported a dominant role for mutant ALK. However, in some cases, RNAi-mediated reduction of wild-type ALK expression also reduced neuroblastoma cell growth, suggesting that the level of ALK expression might be as important as an activating mutation in driving tumorigenesis.  A recent paper by Sasaki et al.9 identified ALK F1174L as a mutation that occurred naturally in an individual with inflammatory myoblastic tumor undergoing treatment with the dual MET and ALK kinase inhibitor crizotinib. This tumor contained a somatic RANBP2-ALK translocation; however, when the person experienced recurrent disease, one ALK locus contained an additional F1174L mutation. An evaluation of the inflammatory myoblastic tumor cells harboring ALK F1174L showed that they had higher levels of phosphorylated ALK along with increased downstream phosphorylation of AKT. Thus, this study supports that F1174L is an activating mutation of ALK.  ALK was independently identified as a molecular target in neuroblastoma by screening >600 human cancer cell lines with pharmacological inhibitors of ALK kinase activity10. This work provided a platform from which to launch inhibitor development when a transforming EML4-ALK fusion gene was identified as a major driver in a subset of approximately 5% of non–small-cell lung cancers11. Indeed, a first clinical trial with crizotinib showed striking efficacy in individuals with non–small-cell lung cancer, providing evidence that a well-defined activated pathway may be targeted effectively12 (Fig. 1). A recent structural study of the ALK kinase domain revealed differences from the same domain in related receptor kinases in the insulin receptor family that will be helpful in designing new inhibitors as resistance to the initial ALK inhibitors emerges13.  As higher ALK receptor expression in neuroblastoma coincides with poorer disease outcome8, overexpressed ALK may thus be a potentially valuable therapeutic target. Indeed, two proteins—pleiotrophin and the related midkine—have been shown to activate mammalian ALK14 through extracellular interactions with it (Fig. 1). Therefore, antibody strategies to target overexpressed ALK in neuroblastoma may be an attractive additional approach. Antibody therapy may even act syn ergistically with small-molecule tyrosine kinase inhibitors.  It is clear that targeting ALK is now open season for the development of new therapies for neuroblastoma, as well as other cancers. The insights gained from ongoing trials are likely to directly benefit both subgroups of individuals whose tumors are driven by ALK and, in general, targeted approaches to cancer treatment. Obviously, genetic mutations can reveal new drivers and pathways activated in cancer and may present new therapeutic opportunities. However, fully validating any new target is a challenge at a new frontier of a deadly cancer.  SUMMARY Neuroblastoma is a childhood extracranial solid tumour that is associated with a number of genetic changes. Included in these genetic alterations are mutations in the kinase domain of the anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK) receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK), which have been found in both somatic and familial neuroblastoma. In order to treat patients accordingly requires characterisation of these mutations in terms of their response to ALK tyrosine kinase inhibitors (TKIs). Here, we report the identification and characterisation of two novel neuroblastoma ALK mutations (A1099T and R1464STOP), which we have investigated together with several previously reported but uncharacterised ALK mutations (T1087I, D1091N, T1151M, M1166R, F1174I and A1234T). In order to understand the potential role of these ALK mutations in neuroblastoma progression, we have employed cell culture-based systems together with the model organism Drosophila as a readout for ligand-independent activity. Mutation of ALK at position 1174 (F1174I) generates a gain-of-function receptor capable of activating intracellular targets such as ERK (extracellular signal regulated kinase) and STAT3 (signal transducer and activator of transcription 3) in a ligand-independent manner. Analysis of these previously uncharacterised ALK mutants and comparison with ALKF1174 mutants suggests that ALK mutations observed in neuroblastoma fall into three classes. These classes are: (i) gain-of-function ligand-independent mutations such as ALKF1174l, (ii) kinase-dead ALK mutants, e.g. ALKI1250T (Schönherr et al., 2011a) and (iii) ALK mutations that are ligand-dependent in nature. Irrespective of the nature of the observed ALK mutants, in every case the activity of the mutant ALK receptors could be abrogated by the ALK inhibitor crizotinib (Xalkori/PF-02341066), albeit with differing levels of sensitivity.  Go to: INTRODUCTION Neuroblastoma is a common childhood cancer that arises in the tissues of the sympathetic nervous system (Maris et al., 2007). It most commonly originates in the adrenal glands, but can also develop at additional sites in the neck, chest and abdomen. It is considered to be a disease of developing tissue because it originates from precursor cells of neural crest tissue that are active during embryonic development. This in part explains the median age of 17 months for occurrence of neuroblastoma (Maris, 2010). Recently, anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK) gain-of-function mutations have been described in both familial (Janoueix-Lerosey et al., 2008; Mossé et al., 2008) and sporadic neuroblastoma (Carén et al., 2008; Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Martinsson et al., 2011; Mossé et al., 2008). Although there is currently no clinically approved treatment for ALK mutations in neuroblastoma, ongoing clinical trials are expected to determine the potential usefulness of ALK-targeted therapies for use in the future. Inhibition of ALK activity using crizotinib (Xalkori/PF-02341066) has been reported in both inflammatory myofibroblastic tumours (IMT) and non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) patients (Butrynski et al., 2010; Kwak et al., 2010). Anti-ALK inhibitor therapy thus appears to offer promise in the treatment of ALK-mediated tumours at this point (Hallberg and Palmer, 2011). It is of future clinical importance to characterise each ALK mutation so that individual patients can be treated accordingly. Furthermore, we have addressed the important issue of whether ALK mutations are resistant to the medicine that is currently in use.  ALK was originally identified as a fusion partner with nucleophosmin or nucleolar protein gene (NPM)-ALK oncogene in anaplastic large cell lymphoma (Morris et al., 1994; Shiota et al., 1994). Later, ALK was reported to be receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK), with a molecular weight of 220 kDa, belonging to the insulin receptor superfamily (Iwahara et al., 1997; Morris et al., 1997). ALK contains an extracellular ligand-binding domain, a transmembrane-spanning domain and an intracellular tyrosine kinase domain (Palmer et al., 2009) and is expressed primarily in the central and peripheral nervous system during embryonic development and at lower concentrations in the nervous system of adults. Its expression is also observed in developing sensory organs, reproductive organs, skin and stomach (Iwahara et al., 1997; Morris et al., 1997; Vernersson et al., 2006) and its physiological function is still enigmatic. It has been associated with multiple translocation events involved in several different human malignancies (Palmer et al., 2009), such as IMT (Griffin et al., 1999), NSCLC (Rikova et al., 2007; Soda et al., 2007), diffuse large B cell lymphomas (DLBCL) (Arber et al., 1996) and renal cell carcinoma (Debelenko et al., 2011) amongst others. Involvement of ALK in a number of human diseases including neuroblastoma has accelerated recent efforts to understand the function of this RTK under both pathological and non-pathological conditions.  In this study, we have characterised a number of novel mutations in the ALK gene from neuroblastoma patients. From analysis of genomic DNA from patient biopsy samples, two novel germ line mutations were identified, leading to A1099T and R1464STOP mutations at the protein level. We have investigated these mutations, looking at whether they could act as driver or passenger mutations in neuroblastoma, with the aim of predicting their potential role in disease progression. Further, we have compared them with a number of other previously reported, but currently uncharacterised, ALK mutations, namely T1087I, D1091N, T1151M, M1166R and F1174I.  Our findings confirm that the ALKF1174I mutation, in keeping with the previously characterised ALKF1174S and ALKF1174L mutants, is a gain-of-function mutation that mediates activation of downstream targets such as ERK and STAT3 in a ligand-independent manner. The ALKF1174I mutant is able to transform both Ba/F3 and NIH3T3 cells. Although we observed that the ALKM1166R mutant is unable to transform Ba/F3 cells, it was able to give rise to foci in NIH3T3 transformation assays. Taken together, our data suggest that the ALK mutations investigated to date fall into three classes: (i) gain-of-function ligand-independent mutations (e.g. F1174I), (ii) kinase-dead ALK mutants (Schönherr et al., 2011a) and (iii) ALK mutations that are ligand-dependent in nature, such as the human ALK mutations (T1087I, D1091N, A1099T, T1151M, M1166R, A1234T, R1464STOP), which are not constitutively active but which display ligand-dependent activation when challenged with agonist antibodies. Importantly, to date, the activity of all ALK mutants tested can be abrogated by treatment with ALK small molecule TKIs.  TRANSLATIONAL IMPACT  Clinical issue  Neuroblastoma is a childhood extracranial solid tumour that has been associated with alterations in several different genes. Among these, are mutations in the kinase domain of the anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK), a receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK). ALK mutations have been reported in both somatic and familial forms of neuroblastoma. Many ALK mutations confer a gain of function to the protein, but mechanistic information is not available for all identified mutations. Optimal treatment of neuroblastoma (e.g. with tyrosine kinase inhibitors) requires a clearer understanding of how different ALK mutations influence protein function and, in turn, contribute to neuroblastoma development. In addition, it is important to investigate whether certain ALK mutations confer resistance to currently available neuroblastoma drugs.  Results  Here, the authors compared signalling mediated by several different ALK mutants identified in patients with neuroblastoma with signalling mediated by wild-type ALK. Their studies aimed to determine whether disease-associated ALK mutations are universally gain-of-function and whether certain ALK mutations can confer resistance to tyrosine kinase inhibitors. Their results, together with existing data, suggest that the neuroblastoma-associated ALK mutations characterised thus far fall into three classes: (i) gain-of-function, ligand-independent mutations of varying activation strength, such as ALKF1174, (ii) kinase-dead ALK mutants, such as ALKI1250T and (iii) ALK mutations that are ligand-dependent and might represent ‘passenger’ mutations. Importantly, the activity of all mutant ALK receptors, irrespective of mutation type, could be abrogated by the ALK inhibitor crizotinib, albeit with differing levels of sensitivity.  Implications and future directions  Characterizing individual ALK mutations is clinically important so that individual neuroblastoma patients can be classified and treated appropriately. These results provide mechanistic information on several neuroblastoma-associated ALK mutations and propose a way to classify all ALK mutants. Encouragingly, these results also indicate that various types of ALK mutations are sensitive to currently available neuroblastoma therapy.  Go to: RESULTS Evaluating the role of human ALK mutations as driver or passenger  We set out to characterise two novel germ line ALK variants identified in patients with neuroblastoma (ALKA1099T and ALKR1464STOP) and their potential roles as driver or passenger mutations in neuroblastoma. ALKA1099T was identified in a Japanese infant diagnosed with neuroblastoma, born to unrelated healthy parents with no neuroblastoma history. No MYCN amplification or ALK amplification was detected in this patient, and the tumour was classified as stage 2. The ALKA1099T variant was heterozygous in both tumour and blood DNA samples. The ALKR1464STOP mutation was observed in the DNA and RNA from a patient sample analysed as part of the TARGET (therapeutically applicable research to generate effective treatments) initiative, which aims to characterise the genomic landscape of the most common childhood cancers, including neuroblastoma. This sequence variant was heterozygous in tumour DNA and RNA, as well as in blood DNA. DNA from the patient's parents was not available for testing.  Also included in this analysis were the earlier reported, but as yet uncharacterised, putative gain-of-function ALK mutations: ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKT1151M, ALKM1166R, ALKF1174I and ALKA1234T (Fig. 1A,B) (Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Mossé et al., 2008). As a positive control, the previously verified constitutively active ALK mutations ALKF1174L and ALKF1174S were also included (Martinsson et al., 2011). Initially, we investigated these eight human neuroblastoma ALK mutations in a PC12 cell culture system, examining both signalling activity and capacity to drive differentiation, as measured by neurite outgrowth. PC12 cells are a clonal rat adrenal pheochromocytoma cell line, which are well characterised as differentiating and extending neurites upon stimulation with nerve growth factor or differentiation factors (Greene and Tischler, 1976). They do not express ALK at detectable levels. We, and others, have previously shown that expression of wild-type ALK (ALKwt), followed by stimulation with ALK agonist monoclonal antibody 31 (mAb31) or expression of activating ALK mutants leads to neurite extension in PC12 cells (Martinsson et al., 2011) (Fig. 1C, lane 1). PC12 cells were transiently transfected with ALK mutants and serum-starved for 48 hours prior to stimulation with mAb31 for 30 minutes. Both human ALKwt and human ALKF1174S were included as controls (Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Martinsson et al., 2011) (Fig. 1). The ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants displayed characteristics similar to that of ALKwt and were able to activate downstream targets such as ERK only upon stimulation with agonist mAb31 (Fig. 1C). In a manner similar to that previously observed for human ALKF1174S, two of the mutants investigated (human ALKM1166R and human ALKF1174I) were able to activate phosphorylation of ERK in the absence of agonist mAb31, suggesting that these two mutants might be constitutively activated in a ligand-independent manner (Fig. 1C). Furthermore, in keeping with this hypothesis, both human ALKM1166R and human ALKF1174I mediated robust phosphorylation of STAT3, as reported for the ALKF1174S mutation (Fig. 1C). Interestingly, none of the other mutants were able to generate STAT3 phosphorylation or activation upon stimulation for up to 30 minutes, as previously shown for wild-type ALK (Schönherr et al., 2011b).  Fig. 1. Fig. 1. Domain structure of ALK mutations and their activation of downstream targets. (A) The extracellular, transmembrane domain and the intracellular domain, which contains the protein tyrosine kinase domain are shown. Mutation residues within the intracellular ... Thus, in this initial analysis, the ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants were found to be inducibly activated by agonist mAb31 and displayed enhanced activation of ERK upon stimulation. However, they were unable to activate STAT3. By contrast, both ALKM1166R and ALKF1174I appeared to be activated in a ligand-independent manner and led to robust activation of downstream targets, such as ERK and STAT3, in a manner similar to the ALKF1174S mutation.  Crizotinib blocks neurite outgrowth activity of human ALK mutants  The PC12 cell system is a sensitive readout for ALK signalling activity as a result of receptor activation (Schönherr et al., 2011b; Yang et al., 2007). Transient transfection of ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP did not stimulate neurite outgrowth in the absence of agonist mAb31. However, addition of agonist antibody lead to significantly increased levels of neurite outgrowth (up to 30-40%) (Fig. 2). The levels of ALK-induced neurite outgrowth were similar to that observed upon stimulation of the wild-type ALK receptor. In agreement with our earlier results, the ALKM1166R and ALKF1174I mutants were capable of mediating neurite outgrowth in a ligand-independent manner, displaying similar percentages of neurite outgrowth in the presence or absence of agonist antibody (Fig. 2). To investigate whether neurite outgrowth could be abrogated by ALK inhibition, we employed crizotinib (Xalkori), an FDA-approved small inhibitor of both ALK and MET receptor tyrosine kinases, which is being employed in phase II and III clinical trials (Butrynski et al., 2010; Kwak et al., 2010; Hallberg and Palmer, 2011). Crizotinib (250 nM) treatment resulted in a significant reduction in ALK-induced neurite outgrowth. Thus, crizotinib is able to effectively block neurite outgrowth mediated by all human ALK mutants investigated here.  Fig. 2. Fig. 2. Crizotinib abrogates ALK-mediated neurite outgrowth in PC12 cells. PC12 cells were co-transfected with pcDNA3-human ALK and pEGFPN1 and seeded out in the presence or absence of crizotinib. Cells were stimulated with 1 μg/ml mAb31. After 48 hours, ... In Ba/F3 cells, crizotinib inhibits constitutively active ALK mutants with varying IC50 values  To confirm and extend our analysis of the inhibition of these ALK mutants by crizotinib, the Ba/F3 cell system was employed (Lu et al., 2009; Schönherr et al., 2011b). Ba/F3 cells, an IL-3-dependent cell line, are often employed in kinase drug discovery, exploiting their characteristic of being able to overcome IL-3 dependence, which allows them to survive and proliferate in the absence of IL-3 when expressing constitutively active tyrosine kinase or other oncogenes (Warmuth et al., 2007). Ba/F3 cells were transfected with human wild-type ALK and the eight different ALK mutants, and subsequently selected with the antibiotic G418 in the presence of IL-3 for 10 days. We observed that Ba/F3 cells expressing the different ALK mutants exhibited variable proliferation ability in the absence of IL-3 (Fig. 3B). At the end of selection in IL-3-free medium, only the human ALKF1174I mutant gave rise to IL-3-independent cell lines, along with the human ALKF1174L positive control. By contrast, ALKwt, ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, human ALKM1166R, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants were unable to substitute for IL-3 to drive proliferation in Ba/F3 cells, even though they expressed ALK protein (Fig. 3A,B and data not shown). To further analyse the responsiveness of these mutants toward crizotinib, the cells were treated with different doses of this ALK inhibitor. Importantly, crizotinib did not inhibit cell growth or cell viability when cells were grown in the presence of IL-3 (Fig. 3C), indicating that it is not toxic to Ba/F3 cells at the levels employed. Proliferation of both human ALKF1174I and human ALKF1174L mutants was blocked by crizotinib (Fig. 4A). IC50 (concentration of drug responsible for 50% inhibition) values show that inhibition of ALKF1174I required similar doses of crizotinib as human ALKF1174L (Fig. 4B). Furthermore, inhibition of ALK mutant activity was also confirmed at the level of ALK tyrosine phosphorylation at position 1278. Tyr1278 corresponds to the first tyrosine of the Y'RAS'YY motif in the A-loop of ALK that is necessary for auto-activation of ALK kinase domain and transformation ability of nucleophosmin (NPM)-ALK (Tartari et al, 2008). Immunoblot analysis performed on Ba/F3 cell lysates showed a reduction in the levels of ALK Tyr1278 phosphorylation in the presence of inhibitor for both human ALKF1174L and human ALKF1174I mutants (Fig. 4C). In agreement with these results, both mutants exhibited decreased ALK Tyr1604 phosphorylation (Fig. 4C). Reduced levels of ERK phosphorylation by both mutants upon treatment with crizotinib confirmed the inhibition of ALK-mediated downstream targets (Fig. 4C). Taken together, these data suggest that crizotinib is able to block the ALK activity of these mutants in a dose-dependent manner.  Fig. 3. Fig. 3. Expression of human ALK in Ba/F3 cells. (A) Ba/F3 cells were transfected with human wild-type or mutant ALKs and selected with G418 in the presence of IL-3. Whole cell lysates were prepared and run on SDS-PAGE, followed by immunoblotting with indicated ... Fig. 4. Fig. 4. Crizotinib inhibits both human ALKF1174-driven proliferation and phosphorylation at Tyr1278 and Tyr1604 of ALK in Ba/F3 cells. (A) IC50 values for crizotinib for both human ALKF1174I and human ALKF1174L were calculated. Values represent mean + s.d. from ... Transforming potential of human ALK mutations  We further examined the transforming ability of human ALK mutants using NIH3T3 cells. Expression of the human ALK mutations ALKwt, ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP were unable to generate formation of foci greater than that of the vector control or ALK wild-type control. By contrast, both ALKF1174I and ALKF1174L displayed robust foci formation, although ALKM1166R showed rather weak foci formation ability in comparison with ALKF1174S (Fig. 5A). These results indicate different degrees of foci formation by the ligand-independent ALK mutations, which is in agreement with our previous results in the Ba/F3 system (Fig. 5B).  Fig. 5. Fig. 5. Transformation potential of human ALK mutants. (A,B) The transforming potential of the mutations was assayed by transfecting NIH3T3 cells with pcDNA3-human ALK (mutant and wild type). Cells were selected with G418 for 3 weeks. (A) Representative images ... Ectopic expression of human ALK mutants in Drosophila melanogaster  Transgenic Drosophila expressing the human ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants were generated to confirm their ligand-dependent characteristics. These were ectopically expressed in Drosophila eye, together with the previously generated human ALKF1174L and ALKwt, employing the pGMR-Gal4 driver line, which directs protein expression in developing photoreceptors of the eye. The expression of human ALK proteins was confirmed by immunostaining of the eye discs by using anti-human ALK antibody. Expression of human ALKF1174L resulted in a rough eye phenotype, whereas expression of human ALKwt, ALKA1234T or ALKR1464STOP did not show any obvious phenotype in adult flies (Martinsson et al., 2011) (Fig. 6). However, the regular hexagonal arrangement of ommatidia was disorganised, with many interommatidial bristles missing in human ALKF1174L. The data strongly support the conclusion that the human ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants are ligand-dependent in nature.  Fig. 6. Fig. 6. Ectopic expression of human ALKA1234T and human ALKR1464STOP in Drosophila eye does not generate the rough eye phenotype. Adult fly eyes (upper) and larval eye discs (lower) ectopically expressing mutant human ALK variants. Human ALKwt and human ALKF1174L ... Go to: DISCUSSION ALK mutations have been reported in both familial (Mossé et al., 2008) and sporadic neuroblastoma (Carén et al., 2008; Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Janoueix-Lerosey et al., 2008; Martinsson et al., 2011; Mossé et al., 2008). The presence of ALK mutations in neuroblastoma draws attention to its possible function and its role in disease progression. Therefore, characterisation of these different ALK mutations is an important exercise in assessing whether the various mutants are functional or not, with potential importance for the patient to be treated accordingly.  In this study, we have investigated two novel mutations of ALK (ALKA1099T and ALKR1464STOP) and compared them with six previously described but uncharacterised human ALK point mutations (ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKT1151M, ALKM1166R, ALKF1174I and ALKA1234T) from neuroblastoma patients, with the aim of assessing whether these mutations could drive tumour progression (Table 1). So far, and from our knowledge of neuroblastoma tumour analysis and published reports to date, only one neuroblastoma patient has presented with a homozygous ALK mutation (Martinsson et al., 2011). To date, one mutation (ALKI1250T) has been reported to have defective kinase activity, raising important questions as to the impact, if any, that this mutation has upon neuroblastoma progression (Schönherr et al., 2011a). Signalling studies in the PC12 cell system showed differences in the activation of downstream targets by the various ALK mutants examined. ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP showed little phosphorylation of ERK, which was enhanced by stimulation with agonist antibodies. On the other hand, ALKM1166R and ALKF1174I mediated ligand-independent phosphorylation of ERK and STAT3. Likewise, the ALKM1166R and ALKF1174I mutants were able to mediate neurite outgrowth in PC12 cells in a ligand-independent manner (Table 1). The other ALK mutations (ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP) displayed inducible activity and resulted in neurites only when stimulated with agonist antibodies, which could be abrogated by crizotinib (Table 1). Furthermore, we co-transfected our ligand-dependent mutants together with wild-type ALK. We observed no change in the phosphorylation of ERK or in the levels of neurite outgrowth ability when compared with wild-type ALK alone in PC12 cells (data not shown).  Table 1. Table 1. Characterization of ALK mutations in order to assess their oncogenic potential Interestingly, the ALKM1166R mutant gave rise to weak foci formation in NIH3T3 cells in comparison with the ALKF1174I mutant, which displayed robust foci formation (Table 1). In this assay, the human ALK mutations ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP did not yield any foci as expected. These results thus revealed that only the ALKF1174I and ALKM1166R mutants harbour transforming potential in NIH3T3 cells. To complement these analyses, we employed the Ba/F3 cell model system. This revealed that even though the ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKM1166R, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutant receptors were expressed, they could not substitute for IL-3 to drive proliferation in Ba/F3 cells. Our Ba/F3 results with the ALKT1151M and ALKA1234T mutations are in agreement with earlier reported results (George et al., 2008). However, human ALKF1174I and the human ALKF1174L control, gave rise to IL-3-independent cell lines. Both mutations displayed sensitivity towards crizotinib in a dose-dependent manner, as shown by their different IC50 values (Table 1). These data are in agreement with previous reports showing that different ALK mutations exhibit different levels of sensitivity towards crizotinib (Bresler et al., 2011; Schönherr et al., 2011b). We also show that cell proliferation and phosphorylation of ALK at tyrosine positions 1278 and 1604 are blocked by using crizotinib, as expected (Fig. 4) (Schönherr et al., 2011b; Tartari et al., 2008). These data indicate that the human ALKF1174I mutant is able to mediate neurite outgrowth, transform NIH3T3 cells, activate downstream targets of ALK (such as ERK and STAT3) in a ligand-independent manner and substitute for IL-3 in Ba/F3 cells, giving rise to IL-3-independent cell line. Thus, we conclude that human ALKF1174I is a gain-of-function mutation that is sensitive to crizotinib inhibition.  The ALKM1166R mutation gives rise to neurites in PC12 cells, activates downstream targets (such as ERKs and STAT3) in a ligand-independent manner and shows weak foci formation. However, it fails to substitute for IL-3 and, hence, does not yield any IL-3-independent Ba/F3 cell lines in our hands. This is comparable to the ALKR1275Q mutant, which also displays neurite generating ability but is unable to support Ba/F3 IL-3-independent growth (Schönherr et al., 2011b). Amino acid Met1166 is not conserved in insulin receptor kinase (IRK) family members, perhaps implying that it might have a structural and functional role specific to ALK (Lee et al., 2010). Met1166 is located in the interface between the αC-helix and the DFG-helix and mutations of this residue would probably destabilise the DFG-helix and consequently facilitate the shift of the αC-helix (Fig. 1B) (Bossi et al., 2010). From a structural point of view, both positions 1166 and 1174 are in or very close to the αC-helix, which plays an important role in the activation process of the insulin receptor family members. Upon activation, the αC-helix moves a few degrees closer to the ATP-catalytic site that mediates the γ-phospho-exchange from bound ATP to the interacting substrate (Lemmon and Schlessinger, 2010). Furthermore, it has previously been shown that mutation at position 1174 changes the character of the ALK protein from a ligand-dependent receptor to a receptor exhibiting gain-of-function properties (Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Martinsson et al., 2011). Probably, this mutations results in disruption of the packing, weakening distinctive structural features observed in the ALK structure, such as the unique inhibitory position of the ALK A-loop packing a short proximal A-loop α-helix against the αC-helix of ALK, while a β-turn motif obstructs the substrate binding region (Fig. 1B). In this arrangement, Tyr1278 is inaccessible for phosphorylation because it is engaged in the interaction interface through bonding with Cys1097 in the N-terminal β-sheet (Bossi et al, 2010; Lee et al, 2010). Both Phe1174 and Met1166 mutations can probably weaken auto-inhibitory interactions and allow the ALK kinase domain to more easily adopt its active configuration. However, unlike ALKF1174 mutants, the ALKM1166R mutation is not a robust gain-of-function mutation, although it is able to transform NIH3T3 cells, mediate neurite outgrowth, and activate downstream ALK targets, such as STAT3 and ERK. Moreover, unlike ALKF1174 mutants, ALKM1166R lacks the ability to mediate Il-3 independent growth of Ba/F3 cells. Our analyses suggest that although ALKM1166R is able to weaken the auto-inhibitory interaction, this does not occur to the same degree as with the ALKF1174 mutations. The extent to which an ALKM1166R mutation contributes to neuroblastoma disease progression or tumour initation is unclear from our experiments.  Consideration of the impact of the ALKT1087I and ALKD1091N mutations on ALK kinase activity from a structural point of view is difficult because they have not been included in any structural study to date. Both are located close to the C-terminal of the β1 and β2 sheets in the kinase domain (Bossi et al., 2010; Lee et al, 2010). Another mutation investigated here is at position Ala1099, which is located between the β1' and β2' sheets. Both Lee et al. and Bossi et al. have indicated that nearby Cys1097 plays an important role in mediating a hydrogen bond with the unphosphorylated tyrosine at position 1278 when ALK is in an inactive configuration (Fig. 1B, sticks and dots) (Lee et al, 2010; Bossi et al., 2010). Our analyses of these, together with the location of the ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N and ALKA1099T mutations, indicate that no gross structural conformation changes occur that result in the mutant ALK protein gaining characteristics that differ significantly from the wild-type protein (Table 1). The Thr1151 mutation is located in the β3 sheet, included in the framework of five-stranded, twisted anti-parallel β-sheets that build up predominantly the N-terminal kinase lobe. Apparently, mutation of Thr1151 to methionine (T1151M) does not affect the ability of the ALK kinase domain to be activated upon stimulation. Finally, it is difficult to predict the effect of the 1464STOP mutation, although from our analyses we would speculate that at least in terms of activation it behaves in a manner similar to the wild-type receptor, i.e. the receptor displays ligand-dependent activation. However, the manner and regulation of inactivation of such a truncated receptor might be an important aspect that could be of relevance in neuroblastoma.  The expression of mutants such as ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP neither renders Ba/F3 cells independent of IL-3 for their growth nor exhibits transforming activity. Additionally, the mutants do not form foci in NIH3T3 cells. Importantly, however, they are able to give rise to neurites and stimulate activation of ERK in the presence of agonist antibodies. Furthermore, all the mutations in this study are successfully blocked by crizotinib, which results in a decrease in ALK phosphorylation and its downstream target ERK in a manner similar to the controls employed in this study, i.e. ALKF1174L and ALKF1174S (Martinsson et al., 2011; Schönherr et al., 2011b). A recent study has investigated a number of ALK mutants, which have been identified by the Cancer Genome Project (Sanger Institute, Cambridge, UK) in cell lines from a range of tumour types. This analysis included F1174L, from the SH-SY5Y neuroblastoma cell line, as well as a number of additional previously uncharacterised ALK mutations, and looked at their transfomation potential. Similarly to the mutants investigated here (ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP) the ALK mutants investigated by McDuff and colleagues do not render Ba/F3 cells independent of IL-3 for their growth, exhibit lack of transforming activity and might represent passenger mutations in the evolution of cancer (McDuff et al., 2011). However, this work did not examine whether the various ALK mutants were able to respond to activation by external ligand or agonist antibodies or examine their sensitivity to treatment with crizotinib.  From our present analysis of previously uncharacterised ALK mutants, and in light of other reports concerning ALK mutant variants, the accumulated data suggests that the ALK mutations observed and characterised in neuroblastoma to date fall into three classes. These classes are: (i) gain-of-function ligand-independent mutations of varying activation strength, e.g. ALKF1174; (ii) kinase-dead ALK mutants, e.g. ALKI1250T (Schönherr et al., 2011a); and (iii) ALK mutations that are ligand-dependent in nature and which might represent ‘passenger’ mutations. Irrespective of the nature of the observed ALK mutant, in every case the activity of the mutant ALK receptors can be abrogated by treatment with the ALK inhibitor crizotinib, albeit with differing levels of sensitivity. Present knowledge would predict that these mutants will also be sensitive to inhibition by next generation ALK TKIs. Although a role for the class of ligand-independent ALK mutants such as ALKF1174 and ALKR1275 is simple to rationalise, further work will be required to answer the more challenging issue of the significance of the ligand-dependent class of ALK mutants, if any, in neuroblastoma progression.  Go to: MATERIALS AND METHODS Patients: Case 1 (A1099T) and Case 2 (R1464STOP)  Case report 1 A 14-day-old newborn Japanese boy infant diagnosed with neurblastoma was born to unrelated healthy parents with no neuroblastoma history. The tumour was classified as stage 2 and no MYCN amplification nor ALK amplification were detected by array comparative genomic hybridisation (CGH) analysis. This patient is still alive and disease-free, and at this point is 11 years old. DNA ploidy of the tumour was aneuploidy (DNA index was 1.34) and array CGH showed whole chromosome 17 gain, with the pattern of whole chromosomal gains and losses in other multiple chromosomes. The tumour was morphologically diagnosed as favourable according to the Shimada classification (Shimada et al., 1999). Tropomyosin-receptor-kinase (Trk) A was highly expressed in the tumour. The A1099T (GCT/ACT) ALK variant appeared to be heterozygous and present in both tumour and blood DNA, suggesting that this is a germline mutation.  Case report 2 Tumour and blood DNA from a 21-month-old Caucasian American male with stage 4 neuroblastoma were sequenced as part of the TARGET project. The tumour was characterised by MYCN amplification using fluorescence in situ hybridisation (FISH), unfavourable histology (Shimada et al., 1999) and a DNA index of 1.908. Whole genome, exome, and transcriptome sequencing were performed using the Illumina Genome Analyzer. Data were processed as previously described (Morin et al., 2011; Morozova et al., 2010). Sequencing revealed a heterozygous R1646STOP variant in both tumour and blood DNA. In the blood genome, eight reads (47%) supported the reference allele G, and nine reads (53%) supported the alternative allele A. In the tumour genome, five sequencing reads (31%) supported the G allele, and eleven reads supported the A allele. Both reference and alternative alleles were expressed in the tumour transcriptome, with nine and seven reads (56% and 44%) supporting the reference and mutant alleles, respectively. The variant was independently verified by Sanger sequencing.  Generation of human ALK mutant constructions  ALKwt, ALKF1174L and ALKF1174S have been described earlier (Martinsson et al., 2011). All other ALK mutants employed in this study were created in pcDNA3 by Eurofins MWG/operon (Ebersberg, Germany). The mutations generated in the kinase domain were confirmed by sequencing from both directions.  Antibodies and inhibitors  Primary antibodies used were: anti-pan-ERK (1:5000), purchased from BD Transduction Laboratories (Franklin Lakes, NJ), anti-pALK(Y1278), anti-pALK(Y1604), anti-pERK(T202/Y204) and anti- pSTAT3 (Y705) were from Cell Signaling Technology (Danvers, MA). The activating monoclonal antibody mAb31 has been described previously (Martinsson et al., 2011; Moog-Lutz et al., 2005). Monoclonal antibody 153 (anti-ALK) was produced in the Hallberg laboratory against the extracellular domain of ALK as described (Moog-Lutz et al., 2005). Horseradish-peroxidase-conjugated secondary antibodies goat anti-rabbit IgG and goat anti-mouse IgG (diluted 1:5000) were from Thermo Scientific (Waltham, MA). The ALK inhibitor crizotinib (PF-02341066, Xalkori) was a generous gift from Pfizer, Inc.  Neurite outgrowth assay  PC12 cells (2×106) were transfected by electroporation in an Amaxa electroporator (Amaxa Biosystems, Cologne, Germany) using 0.8 μg of pcDNA3-human ALK and 0.5 μg pEGFPN1 (Clontech, Mountain view, CA) and 100 μl Ingenio electroporation solution (Mirus Bio LCC, Madison, WI). Transfected cells were subsequently seeded into 24-well plates together with mAb31 (1 μg/ml) and the inhibitor crizotinib (250 nM) in complete growth medium (Martinsson et al., 2011). After 48 hours of incubation, the fraction of GFP-positive and neuritecarrying cells versus GFP-positive cells was observed under a Zeiss Axiovert 40 CFL microscope. To be judged as a neurite-carrying cell, the neurite of the cell was required to reach at least twice the length of the diameter of a normal cell body. Experiments were performed in triplicates and each sample within an experiment was assayed in duplicate.  Cell proliferation assay and IC50 determination  Ba/F3 cells expressing either human ALKwt or mutant human ALK were generated by electroporation with pcDNA3-human ALK using Amaxa electroporator (Amaxa Biosystems, Cologne, Germany). Transfectants were selected in RPMI with 10% heat-inactivated foetal bovine serum (FBS) and 2.5 ng/ml IL-3 (Peprotech, Rocky Hill, NJ) in the presence of G418 (600 μg /ml) for 10 days. Cells were washed with PBSA and seeded at 0.5×106 cells/ml in RPMI with 10% FBS and G418 for generation of human ALK-expressing IL-3-independent cells (Schönherr et al., 2011b). For calculation of IC50 values, human ALK-expressing Ba/F3 cells were treated with varying concentrations of crizotinib for 3 days. Cell viability was tested with resazurin (Sigma, Stockholm, Sweden) (O'Brien et al., 2000). The IC50 value was determined for individual cell lines and the experiment was carried out at least three times independently, in triplicate.  Cell lysis and western blotting  PC12 cells expressing human ALK mutants were serum-starved for 36 hours prior to stimulation with 1 μg/ml of the activating mAb31 for 30 minutes (Moog-Lutz et al., 2005; Schönherr et al., 2010; Yang et al., 2007). IL-3-independent human ALK-expressing Ba/F3 cells were treated with crizotinib in complete medium for 3 hours. Cells were washed with PBSA and lysed in SDS-sample buffer. Pre-cleared lysates were run on SDS/PAGE, followed by western blotting using the indicated antibodies. ALK downstream activation was detected by pERK and pSTAT3(Y705); pan-ERK was used as loading control. ALK phosphorylation was analysed with pALK(Y1278) and pALK(Y1604) antibodies. Cell lysis and immunoblotting were performed according to described protocols (Schönherr et al., 2010).  Transformation assay  NIH3T3 cells (4.5×104) were seeded in collagen-coated 12-well plates prior to transfection for 6 hours with 1.75 μg pcDNA3.1-human ALK and 4.4 μl Lipofectamine 2000 (Invitrogen, Paisley, UK) in 0.3 ml Opti-MEM. The next day, 60% of the cells were transferred to six-well plates and maintained in DMEM with 10% heat-inactivated FBS and 0.5 mg/ml G418 until the cells reached confluency. Then, the cells were cultivated in DMEM with 5% heat-inactivated FBS and 0.25 mg/ml G418 for approximately 10 days. The cells were then fixed using methanol and stained with 0.25% crystal violet. The foci visible by the naked eye were subsequently analysed (Schönherr et al., 2011a).  Expression of human ALK mutants in Drosophila eye  The Gal4-UAS expression system was employed to express human ALK in the Drosophila eye (Brand and Perrimon, 1993). DNA encoding ALK1234T and ALK1464STOP were subcloned with EcoRI and NotI from pcDNA3-ALK1234T and pcDNA3-ALK1464STOP, and the resulting fragments were ligated into the EcoRI-NotI site of the pUAST vector. Transgenic flies carrying pUAST-ALK were generated by BestGene (Chino Hills, CA) and crossed with pGMR-Gal4 (Bloomington, stock no. 9146). Offspring were fixed with 4% glutaraldehyde in PBS overnight and subjected to electron microscopic analysis. To confirm the expression of human ALK, eye discs of third instar larva were stained with anti-ALK mAb153 (Schönherr et al., 2011a). Antibody binding was visualised using Cy3-labelled anti-mouse IgG (Amersham). The discs were mounted on slides in Fluoromount-G (Southern Biotechnology Associates, Birmingham, AL) and imaged using a Zeiss Apotome. 
1549||In the era of personalized medicine, understanding the molecular drivers of oncogenesis will be likely to trump morphological characteristics with regard to diagnostics, prognostics and choice of therapies. Identifying single driver mutations from billions of possibilities used to require substantial insight. However, as the cost of deep genomic sequencing goes down each month, clever tricks such as identifying family cohorts may not be as necessary. Family cohorts have driven genetic discovery for decades, including the identification of most tumor suppressor genes and many oncogenes.  Neuroblastoma is a lethal cancer of early childhood that essentially comes in two forms: highly malignant and locally manageable, or, to paraphrase Audrey Evans, an early leader in the field, the ‘good’ies and the ‘bad’ies. The underlying genes responsible for neuroblastoma remain largely unknown, despite the discovery of a handful of genetic changes that have been implicated in neuroblastoma development. For example, Brodeur et al.1 and Look et al.2 correlated MYCN oncogene amplification with aggressive tumors that have a high propensity for metastasis and that cause mortality. Also, very small subsets of familial neuroblastoma were associated with PHOX2B (encoding paired-like homeobox-2) mutations, but these mutations accounted for only very few families (reviewed in ref. 3).  To identify additional oncogenes that cause familial neuroblastoma, Mossé et al.4 returned to old-fashioned family trees. They collected the pedigrees of 20 families that showed an autosomal dominant pattern of neuroblastoma inheritance. Using a genome-wide scan for linkage at 6,000 single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs), these investigators identified a previously unknown series of germline mutations in the ALK gene. Some but not all of these families had genomic amplicons on chromosome 2 that also included MYCN. Among the mutations identified, most were predicted to lead to amino acid substitutions in the ALK tyrosine kinase domain (Fig. 1). Five of the eight pedigrees with germline mutation led to proteins with the same R1275Q mutation. A neuroblastoma cell line containing the R1275Q mutation showed ALK activation, which was indicated by tyrosine phosphorylation at ALK Y1604.  Figure 1 Figure 1 The ALK receptor kinase: its domains, pathways, mutations and inhibitors. The different domains of ALK are shown within their bordering amino-acid positions. The major mutations found by Mossé et al.4, Janoueix-Lerosey et al.5, Chen et al.6 and ... Three additional publications by Janoueix-Lerosey et al.5, Chen et al.6 and George et al.7 used SNP- or amplicon-based sequencing methods to identify similar mutations in ALK (Fig. 1). Each of the three studies showed the effects of a dominant oncogene with a similar pattern of results. Not all mutations resulted in constitutive kinase activity; in fact, only the minority showed clear increases in ALK autophosphorylation and downstream target activation, such as phosphorylation of AKT. The R1275Q and F1174L(V) mutations were shown to have constitutive tyrosine phosphorylation in cell lines that endogenously expressed these mutant forms of ALK, or when expressed in either 3T3 or Ba/F3 cells6,7.  ALK mutations in neuroblastoma tissues account for small survival differences in the whole population of people with neuroblastoma; this is due to their very low incidence in the population. Still, individuals who have neuroblastomas with the ALK F1174 mutation show a significantly worse outcome relative to the overall cohort, suggesting that this mutation has an important impact on malignant progression, whereas the presence of the ALK R1275Q mutation did not make a difference8. Stratification according to ALK expression showed that individuals with high ALK expression in their tumors had a significantly worse overall survival and disease-free survival than those with low tumor ALK expression. Although this type of single-gene analysis can be useful to direct treatment with a targeted therapy, genomic instability in the tumors leads to complex mixtures of clonal cells; therefore, multigene analyses can provide a more robust predictor of disease course and may ultimately provide a more complex insight into pathways activated during tumorigenesis and even predict candidate drug sensitivity8.  The functional role of these ALK mutations was addressed in each of the four studies4–7; however, a deeper understanding will be necessary to optimize any ALK-targeted therapy. Each study used either ALK expression followed by inhibition in non-neuroblastoma cell lines, RNAi-mediated reduction of endogenous ALK expression in cell lines or small-molecule kinase inhibitors. Generally, the results from these studies supported a dominant role for mutant ALK. However, in some cases, RNAi-mediated reduction of wild-type ALK expression also reduced neuroblastoma cell growth, suggesting that the level of ALK expression might be as important as an activating mutation in driving tumorigenesis.  A recent paper by Sasaki et al.9 identified ALK F1174L as a mutation that occurred naturally in an individual with inflammatory myoblastic tumor undergoing treatment with the dual MET and ALK kinase inhibitor crizotinib. This tumor contained a somatic RANBP2-ALK translocation; however, when the person experienced recurrent disease, one ALK locus contained an additional F1174L mutation. An evaluation of the inflammatory myoblastic tumor cells harboring ALK F1174L showed that they had higher levels of phosphorylated ALK along with increased downstream phosphorylation of AKT. Thus, this study supports that F1174L is an activating mutation of ALK.  ALK was independently identified as a molecular target in neuroblastoma by screening >600 human cancer cell lines with pharmacological inhibitors of ALK kinase activity10. This work provided a platform from which to launch inhibitor development when a transforming EML4-ALK fusion gene was identified as a major driver in a subset of approximately 5% of non–small-cell lung cancers11. Indeed, a first clinical trial with crizotinib showed striking efficacy in individuals with non–small-cell lung cancer, providing evidence that a well-defined activated pathway may be targeted effectively12 (Fig. 1). A recent structural study of the ALK kinase domain revealed differences from the same domain in related receptor kinases in the insulin receptor family that will be helpful in designing new inhibitors as resistance to the initial ALK inhibitors emerges13.  As higher ALK receptor expression in neuroblastoma coincides with poorer disease outcome8, overexpressed ALK may thus be a potentially valuable therapeutic target. Indeed, two proteins—pleiotrophin and the related midkine—have been shown to activate mammalian ALK14 through extracellular interactions with it (Fig. 1). Therefore, antibody strategies to target overexpressed ALK in neuroblastoma may be an attractive additional approach. Antibody therapy may even act syn ergistically with small-molecule tyrosine kinase inhibitors.  It is clear that targeting ALK is now open season for the development of new therapies for neuroblastoma, as well as other cancers. The insights gained from ongoing trials are likely to directly benefit both subgroups of individuals whose tumors are driven by ALK and, in general, targeted approaches to cancer treatment. Obviously, genetic mutations can reveal new drivers and pathways activated in cancer and may present new therapeutic opportunities. However, fully validating any new target is a challenge at a new frontier of a deadly cancer.  SUMMARY Neuroblastoma is a childhood extracranial solid tumour that is associated with a number of genetic changes. Included in these genetic alterations are mutations in the kinase domain of the anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK) receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK), which have been found in both somatic and familial neuroblastoma. In order to treat patients accordingly requires characterisation of these mutations in terms of their response to ALK tyrosine kinase inhibitors (TKIs). Here, we report the identification and characterisation of two novel neuroblastoma ALK mutations (A1099T and R1464STOP), which we have investigated together with several previously reported but uncharacterised ALK mutations (T1087I, D1091N, T1151M, M1166R, F1174I and A1234T). In order to understand the potential role of these ALK mutations in neuroblastoma progression, we have employed cell culture-based systems together with the model organism Drosophila as a readout for ligand-independent activity. Mutation of ALK at position 1174 (F1174I) generates a gain-of-function receptor capable of activating intracellular targets such as ERK (extracellular signal regulated kinase) and STAT3 (signal transducer and activator of transcription 3) in a ligand-independent manner. Analysis of these previously uncharacterised ALK mutants and comparison with ALKF1174 mutants suggests that ALK mutations observed in neuroblastoma fall into three classes. These classes are: (i) gain-of-function ligand-independent mutations such as ALKF1174l, (ii) kinase-dead ALK mutants, e.g. ALKI1250T (Schönherr et al., 2011a) and (iii) ALK mutations that are ligand-dependent in nature. Irrespective of the nature of the observed ALK mutants, in every case the activity of the mutant ALK receptors could be abrogated by the ALK inhibitor crizotinib (Xalkori/PF-02341066), albeit with differing levels of sensitivity.  Go to: INTRODUCTION Neuroblastoma is a common childhood cancer that arises in the tissues of the sympathetic nervous system (Maris et al., 2007). It most commonly originates in the adrenal glands, but can also develop at additional sites in the neck, chest and abdomen. It is considered to be a disease of developing tissue because it originates from precursor cells of neural crest tissue that are active during embryonic development. This in part explains the median age of 17 months for occurrence of neuroblastoma (Maris, 2010). Recently, anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK) gain-of-function mutations have been described in both familial (Janoueix-Lerosey et al., 2008; Mossé et al., 2008) and sporadic neuroblastoma (Carén et al., 2008; Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Martinsson et al., 2011; Mossé et al., 2008). Although there is currently no clinically approved treatment for ALK mutations in neuroblastoma, ongoing clinical trials are expected to determine the potential usefulness of ALK-targeted therapies for use in the future. Inhibition of ALK activity using crizotinib (Xalkori/PF-02341066) has been reported in both inflammatory myofibroblastic tumours (IMT) and non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) patients (Butrynski et al., 2010; Kwak et al., 2010). Anti-ALK inhibitor therapy thus appears to offer promise in the treatment of ALK-mediated tumours at this point (Hallberg and Palmer, 2011). It is of future clinical importance to characterise each ALK mutation so that individual patients can be treated accordingly. Furthermore, we have addressed the important issue of whether ALK mutations are resistant to the medicine that is currently in use.  ALK was originally identified as a fusion partner with nucleophosmin or nucleolar protein gene (NPM)-ALK oncogene in anaplastic large cell lymphoma (Morris et al., 1994; Shiota et al., 1994). Later, ALK was reported to be receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK), with a molecular weight of 220 kDa, belonging to the insulin receptor superfamily (Iwahara et al., 1997; Morris et al., 1997). ALK contains an extracellular ligand-binding domain, a transmembrane-spanning domain and an intracellular tyrosine kinase domain (Palmer et al., 2009) and is expressed primarily in the central and peripheral nervous system during embryonic development and at lower concentrations in the nervous system of adults. Its expression is also observed in developing sensory organs, reproductive organs, skin and stomach (Iwahara et al., 1997; Morris et al., 1997; Vernersson et al., 2006) and its physiological function is still enigmatic. It has been associated with multiple translocation events involved in several different human malignancies (Palmer et al., 2009), such as IMT (Griffin et al., 1999), NSCLC (Rikova et al., 2007; Soda et al., 2007), diffuse large B cell lymphomas (DLBCL) (Arber et al., 1996) and renal cell carcinoma (Debelenko et al., 2011) amongst others. Involvement of ALK in a number of human diseases including neuroblastoma has accelerated recent efforts to understand the function of this RTK under both pathological and non-pathological conditions.  In this study, we have characterised a number of novel mutations in the ALK gene from neuroblastoma patients. From analysis of genomic DNA from patient biopsy samples, two novel germ line mutations were identified, leading to A1099T and R1464STOP mutations at the protein level. We have investigated these mutations, looking at whether they could act as driver or passenger mutations in neuroblastoma, with the aim of predicting their potential role in disease progression. Further, we have compared them with a number of other previously reported, but currently uncharacterised, ALK mutations, namely T1087I, D1091N, T1151M, M1166R and F1174I.  Our findings confirm that the ALKF1174I mutation, in keeping with the previously characterised ALKF1174S and ALKF1174L mutants, is a gain-of-function mutation that mediates activation of downstream targets such as ERK and STAT3 in a ligand-independent manner. The ALKF1174I mutant is able to transform both Ba/F3 and NIH3T3 cells. Although we observed that the ALKM1166R mutant is unable to transform Ba/F3 cells, it was able to give rise to foci in NIH3T3 transformation assays. Taken together, our data suggest that the ALK mutations investigated to date fall into three classes: (i) gain-of-function ligand-independent mutations (e.g. F1174I), (ii) kinase-dead ALK mutants (Schönherr et al., 2011a) and (iii) ALK mutations that are ligand-dependent in nature, such as the human ALK mutations (T1087I, D1091N, A1099T, T1151M, M1166R, A1234T, R1464STOP), which are not constitutively active but which display ligand-dependent activation when challenged with agonist antibodies. Importantly, to date, the activity of all ALK mutants tested can be abrogated by treatment with ALK small molecule TKIs.  TRANSLATIONAL IMPACT  Clinical issue  Neuroblastoma is a childhood extracranial solid tumour that has been associated with alterations in several different genes. Among these, are mutations in the kinase domain of the anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK), a receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK). ALK mutations have been reported in both somatic and familial forms of neuroblastoma. Many ALK mutations confer a gain of function to the protein, but mechanistic information is not available for all identified mutations. Optimal treatment of neuroblastoma (e.g. with tyrosine kinase inhibitors) requires a clearer understanding of how different ALK mutations influence protein function and, in turn, contribute to neuroblastoma development. In addition, it is important to investigate whether certain ALK mutations confer resistance to currently available neuroblastoma drugs.  Results  Here, the authors compared signalling mediated by several different ALK mutants identified in patients with neuroblastoma with signalling mediated by wild-type ALK. Their studies aimed to determine whether disease-associated ALK mutations are universally gain-of-function and whether certain ALK mutations can confer resistance to tyrosine kinase inhibitors. Their results, together with existing data, suggest that the neuroblastoma-associated ALK mutations characterised thus far fall into three classes: (i) gain-of-function, ligand-independent mutations of varying activation strength, such as ALKF1174, (ii) kinase-dead ALK mutants, such as ALKI1250T and (iii) ALK mutations that are ligand-dependent and might represent ‘passenger’ mutations. Importantly, the activity of all mutant ALK receptors, irrespective of mutation type, could be abrogated by the ALK inhibitor crizotinib, albeit with differing levels of sensitivity.  Implications and future directions  Characterizing individual ALK mutations is clinically important so that individual neuroblastoma patients can be classified and treated appropriately. These results provide mechanistic information on several neuroblastoma-associated ALK mutations and propose a way to classify all ALK mutants. Encouragingly, these results also indicate that various types of ALK mutations are sensitive to currently available neuroblastoma therapy.  Go to: RESULTS Evaluating the role of human ALK mutations as driver or passenger  We set out to characterise two novel germ line ALK variants identified in patients with neuroblastoma (ALKA1099T and ALKR1464STOP) and their potential roles as driver or passenger mutations in neuroblastoma. ALKA1099T was identified in a Japanese infant diagnosed with neuroblastoma, born to unrelated healthy parents with no neuroblastoma history. No MYCN amplification or ALK amplification was detected in this patient, and the tumour was classified as stage 2. The ALKA1099T variant was heterozygous in both tumour and blood DNA samples. The ALKR1464STOP mutation was observed in the DNA and RNA from a patient sample analysed as part of the TARGET (therapeutically applicable research to generate effective treatments) initiative, which aims to characterise the genomic landscape of the most common childhood cancers, including neuroblastoma. This sequence variant was heterozygous in tumour DNA and RNA, as well as in blood DNA. DNA from the patient's parents was not available for testing.  Also included in this analysis were the earlier reported, but as yet uncharacterised, putative gain-of-function ALK mutations: ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKT1151M, ALKM1166R, ALKF1174I and ALKA1234T (Fig. 1A,B) (Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Mossé et al., 2008). As a positive control, the previously verified constitutively active ALK mutations ALKF1174L and ALKF1174S were also included (Martinsson et al., 2011). Initially, we investigated these eight human neuroblastoma ALK mutations in a PC12 cell culture system, examining both signalling activity and capacity to drive differentiation, as measured by neurite outgrowth. PC12 cells are a clonal rat adrenal pheochromocytoma cell line, which are well characterised as differentiating and extending neurites upon stimulation with nerve growth factor or differentiation factors (Greene and Tischler, 1976). They do not express ALK at detectable levels. We, and others, have previously shown that expression of wild-type ALK (ALKwt), followed by stimulation with ALK agonist monoclonal antibody 31 (mAb31) or expression of activating ALK mutants leads to neurite extension in PC12 cells (Martinsson et al., 2011) (Fig. 1C, lane 1). PC12 cells were transiently transfected with ALK mutants and serum-starved for 48 hours prior to stimulation with mAb31 for 30 minutes. Both human ALKwt and human ALKF1174S were included as controls (Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Martinsson et al., 2011) (Fig. 1). The ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants displayed characteristics similar to that of ALKwt and were able to activate downstream targets such as ERK only upon stimulation with agonist mAb31 (Fig. 1C). In a manner similar to that previously observed for human ALKF1174S, two of the mutants investigated (human ALKM1166R and human ALKF1174I) were able to activate phosphorylation of ERK in the absence of agonist mAb31, suggesting that these two mutants might be constitutively activated in a ligand-independent manner (Fig. 1C). Furthermore, in keeping with this hypothesis, both human ALKM1166R and human ALKF1174I mediated robust phosphorylation of STAT3, as reported for the ALKF1174S mutation (Fig. 1C). Interestingly, none of the other mutants were able to generate STAT3 phosphorylation or activation upon stimulation for up to 30 minutes, as previously shown for wild-type ALK (Schönherr et al., 2011b).  Fig. 1. Fig. 1. Domain structure of ALK mutations and their activation of downstream targets. (A) The extracellular, transmembrane domain and the intracellular domain, which contains the protein tyrosine kinase domain are shown. Mutation residues within the intracellular ... Thus, in this initial analysis, the ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants were found to be inducibly activated by agonist mAb31 and displayed enhanced activation of ERK upon stimulation. However, they were unable to activate STAT3. By contrast, both ALKM1166R and ALKF1174I appeared to be activated in a ligand-independent manner and led to robust activation of downstream targets, such as ERK and STAT3, in a manner similar to the ALKF1174S mutation.  Crizotinib blocks neurite outgrowth activity of human ALK mutants  The PC12 cell system is a sensitive readout for ALK signalling activity as a result of receptor activation (Schönherr et al., 2011b; Yang et al., 2007). Transient transfection of ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP did not stimulate neurite outgrowth in the absence of agonist mAb31. However, addition of agonist antibody lead to significantly increased levels of neurite outgrowth (up to 30-40%) (Fig. 2). The levels of ALK-induced neurite outgrowth were similar to that observed upon stimulation of the wild-type ALK receptor. In agreement with our earlier results, the ALKM1166R and ALKF1174I mutants were capable of mediating neurite outgrowth in a ligand-independent manner, displaying similar percentages of neurite outgrowth in the presence or absence of agonist antibody (Fig. 2). To investigate whether neurite outgrowth could be abrogated by ALK inhibition, we employed crizotinib (Xalkori), an FDA-approved small inhibitor of both ALK and MET receptor tyrosine kinases, which is being employed in phase II and III clinical trials (Butrynski et al., 2010; Kwak et al., 2010; Hallberg and Palmer, 2011). Crizotinib (250 nM) treatment resulted in a significant reduction in ALK-induced neurite outgrowth. Thus, crizotinib is able to effectively block neurite outgrowth mediated by all human ALK mutants investigated here.  Fig. 2. Fig. 2. Crizotinib abrogates ALK-mediated neurite outgrowth in PC12 cells. PC12 cells were co-transfected with pcDNA3-human ALK and pEGFPN1 and seeded out in the presence or absence of crizotinib. Cells were stimulated with 1 μg/ml mAb31. After 48 hours, ... In Ba/F3 cells, crizotinib inhibits constitutively active ALK mutants with varying IC50 values  To confirm and extend our analysis of the inhibition of these ALK mutants by crizotinib, the Ba/F3 cell system was employed (Lu et al., 2009; Schönherr et al., 2011b). Ba/F3 cells, an IL-3-dependent cell line, are often employed in kinase drug discovery, exploiting their characteristic of being able to overcome IL-3 dependence, which allows them to survive and proliferate in the absence of IL-3 when expressing constitutively active tyrosine kinase or other oncogenes (Warmuth et al., 2007). Ba/F3 cells were transfected with human wild-type ALK and the eight different ALK mutants, and subsequently selected with the antibiotic G418 in the presence of IL-3 for 10 days. We observed that Ba/F3 cells expressing the different ALK mutants exhibited variable proliferation ability in the absence of IL-3 (Fig. 3B). At the end of selection in IL-3-free medium, only the human ALKF1174I mutant gave rise to IL-3-independent cell lines, along with the human ALKF1174L positive control. By contrast, ALKwt, ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, human ALKM1166R, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants were unable to substitute for IL-3 to drive proliferation in Ba/F3 cells, even though they expressed ALK protein (Fig. 3A,B and data not shown). To further analyse the responsiveness of these mutants toward crizotinib, the cells were treated with different doses of this ALK inhibitor. Importantly, crizotinib did not inhibit cell growth or cell viability when cells were grown in the presence of IL-3 (Fig. 3C), indicating that it is not toxic to Ba/F3 cells at the levels employed. Proliferation of both human ALKF1174I and human ALKF1174L mutants was blocked by crizotinib (Fig. 4A). IC50 (concentration of drug responsible for 50% inhibition) values show that inhibition of ALKF1174I required similar doses of crizotinib as human ALKF1174L (Fig. 4B). Furthermore, inhibition of ALK mutant activity was also confirmed at the level of ALK tyrosine phosphorylation at position 1278. Tyr1278 corresponds to the first tyrosine of the Y'RAS'YY motif in the A-loop of ALK that is necessary for auto-activation of ALK kinase domain and transformation ability of nucleophosmin (NPM)-ALK (Tartari et al, 2008). Immunoblot analysis performed on Ba/F3 cell lysates showed a reduction in the levels of ALK Tyr1278 phosphorylation in the presence of inhibitor for both human ALKF1174L and human ALKF1174I mutants (Fig. 4C). In agreement with these results, both mutants exhibited decreased ALK Tyr1604 phosphorylation (Fig. 4C). Reduced levels of ERK phosphorylation by both mutants upon treatment with crizotinib confirmed the inhibition of ALK-mediated downstream targets (Fig. 4C). Taken together, these data suggest that crizotinib is able to block the ALK activity of these mutants in a dose-dependent manner.  Fig. 3. Fig. 3. Expression of human ALK in Ba/F3 cells. (A) Ba/F3 cells were transfected with human wild-type or mutant ALKs and selected with G418 in the presence of IL-3. Whole cell lysates were prepared and run on SDS-PAGE, followed by immunoblotting with indicated ... Fig. 4. Fig. 4. Crizotinib inhibits both human ALKF1174-driven proliferation and phosphorylation at Tyr1278 and Tyr1604 of ALK in Ba/F3 cells. (A) IC50 values for crizotinib for both human ALKF1174I and human ALKF1174L were calculated. Values represent mean + s.d. from ... Transforming potential of human ALK mutations  We further examined the transforming ability of human ALK mutants using NIH3T3 cells. Expression of the human ALK mutations ALKwt, ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP were unable to generate formation of foci greater than that of the vector control or ALK wild-type control. By contrast, both ALKF1174I and ALKF1174L displayed robust foci formation, although ALKM1166R showed rather weak foci formation ability in comparison with ALKF1174S (Fig. 5A). These results indicate different degrees of foci formation by the ligand-independent ALK mutations, which is in agreement with our previous results in the Ba/F3 system (Fig. 5B).  Fig. 5. Fig. 5. Transformation potential of human ALK mutants. (A,B) The transforming potential of the mutations was assayed by transfecting NIH3T3 cells with pcDNA3-human ALK (mutant and wild type). Cells were selected with G418 for 3 weeks. (A) Representative images ... Ectopic expression of human ALK mutants in Drosophila melanogaster  Transgenic Drosophila expressing the human ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants were generated to confirm their ligand-dependent characteristics. These were ectopically expressed in Drosophila eye, together with the previously generated human ALKF1174L and ALKwt, employing the pGMR-Gal4 driver line, which directs protein expression in developing photoreceptors of the eye. The expression of human ALK proteins was confirmed by immunostaining of the eye discs by using anti-human ALK antibody. Expression of human ALKF1174L resulted in a rough eye phenotype, whereas expression of human ALKwt, ALKA1234T or ALKR1464STOP did not show any obvious phenotype in adult flies (Martinsson et al., 2011) (Fig. 6). However, the regular hexagonal arrangement of ommatidia was disorganised, with many interommatidial bristles missing in human ALKF1174L. The data strongly support the conclusion that the human ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants are ligand-dependent in nature.  Fig. 6. Fig. 6. Ectopic expression of human ALKA1234T and human ALKR1464STOP in Drosophila eye does not generate the rough eye phenotype. Adult fly eyes (upper) and larval eye discs (lower) ectopically expressing mutant human ALK variants. Human ALKwt and human ALKF1174L ... Go to: DISCUSSION ALK mutations have been reported in both familial (Mossé et al., 2008) and sporadic neuroblastoma (Carén et al., 2008; Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Janoueix-Lerosey et al., 2008; Martinsson et al., 2011; Mossé et al., 2008). The presence of ALK mutations in neuroblastoma draws attention to its possible function and its role in disease progression. Therefore, characterisation of these different ALK mutations is an important exercise in assessing whether the various mutants are functional or not, with potential importance for the patient to be treated accordingly.  In this study, we have investigated two novel mutations of ALK (ALKA1099T and ALKR1464STOP) and compared them with six previously described but uncharacterised human ALK point mutations (ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKT1151M, ALKM1166R, ALKF1174I and ALKA1234T) from neuroblastoma patients, with the aim of assessing whether these mutations could drive tumour progression (Table 1). So far, and from our knowledge of neuroblastoma tumour analysis and published reports to date, only one neuroblastoma patient has presented with a homozygous ALK mutation (Martinsson et al., 2011). To date, one mutation (ALKI1250T) has been reported to have defective kinase activity, raising important questions as to the impact, if any, that this mutation has upon neuroblastoma progression (Schönherr et al., 2011a). Signalling studies in the PC12 cell system showed differences in the activation of downstream targets by the various ALK mutants examined. ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP showed little phosphorylation of ERK, which was enhanced by stimulation with agonist antibodies. On the other hand, ALKM1166R and ALKF1174I mediated ligand-independent phosphorylation of ERK and STAT3. Likewise, the ALKM1166R and ALKF1174I mutants were able to mediate neurite outgrowth in PC12 cells in a ligand-independent manner (Table 1). The other ALK mutations (ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP) displayed inducible activity and resulted in neurites only when stimulated with agonist antibodies, which could be abrogated by crizotinib (Table 1). Furthermore, we co-transfected our ligand-dependent mutants together with wild-type ALK. We observed no change in the phosphorylation of ERK or in the levels of neurite outgrowth ability when compared with wild-type ALK alone in PC12 cells (data not shown).  Table 1. Table 1. Characterization of ALK mutations in order to assess their oncogenic potential Interestingly, the ALKM1166R mutant gave rise to weak foci formation in NIH3T3 cells in comparison with the ALKF1174I mutant, which displayed robust foci formation (Table 1). In this assay, the human ALK mutations ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP did not yield any foci as expected. These results thus revealed that only the ALKF1174I and ALKM1166R mutants harbour transforming potential in NIH3T3 cells. To complement these analyses, we employed the Ba/F3 cell model system. This revealed that even though the ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKM1166R, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutant receptors were expressed, they could not substitute for IL-3 to drive proliferation in Ba/F3 cells. Our Ba/F3 results with the ALKT1151M and ALKA1234T mutations are in agreement with earlier reported results (George et al., 2008). However, human ALKF1174I and the human ALKF1174L control, gave rise to IL-3-independent cell lines. Both mutations displayed sensitivity towards crizotinib in a dose-dependent manner, as shown by their different IC50 values (Table 1). These data are in agreement with previous reports showing that different ALK mutations exhibit different levels of sensitivity towards crizotinib (Bresler et al., 2011; Schönherr et al., 2011b). We also show that cell proliferation and phosphorylation of ALK at tyrosine positions 1278 and 1604 are blocked by using crizotinib, as expected (Fig. 4) (Schönherr et al., 2011b; Tartari et al., 2008). These data indicate that the human ALKF1174I mutant is able to mediate neurite outgrowth, transform NIH3T3 cells, activate downstream targets of ALK (such as ERK and STAT3) in a ligand-independent manner and substitute for IL-3 in Ba/F3 cells, giving rise to IL-3-independent cell line. Thus, we conclude that human ALKF1174I is a gain-of-function mutation that is sensitive to crizotinib inhibition.  The ALKM1166R mutation gives rise to neurites in PC12 cells, activates downstream targets (such as ERKs and STAT3) in a ligand-independent manner and shows weak foci formation. However, it fails to substitute for IL-3 and, hence, does not yield any IL-3-independent Ba/F3 cell lines in our hands. This is comparable to the ALKR1275Q mutant, which also displays neurite generating ability but is unable to support Ba/F3 IL-3-independent growth (Schönherr et al., 2011b). Amino acid Met1166 is not conserved in insulin receptor kinase (IRK) family members, perhaps implying that it might have a structural and functional role specific to ALK (Lee et al., 2010). Met1166 is located in the interface between the αC-helix and the DFG-helix and mutations of this residue would probably destabilise the DFG-helix and consequently facilitate the shift of the αC-helix (Fig. 1B) (Bossi et al., 2010). From a structural point of view, both positions 1166 and 1174 are in or very close to the αC-helix, which plays an important role in the activation process of the insulin receptor family members. Upon activation, the αC-helix moves a few degrees closer to the ATP-catalytic site that mediates the γ-phospho-exchange from bound ATP to the interacting substrate (Lemmon and Schlessinger, 2010). Furthermore, it has previously been shown that mutation at position 1174 changes the character of the ALK protein from a ligand-dependent receptor to a receptor exhibiting gain-of-function properties (Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Martinsson et al., 2011). Probably, this mutations results in disruption of the packing, weakening distinctive structural features observed in the ALK structure, such as the unique inhibitory position of the ALK A-loop packing a short proximal A-loop α-helix against the αC-helix of ALK, while a β-turn motif obstructs the substrate binding region (Fig. 1B). In this arrangement, Tyr1278 is inaccessible for phosphorylation because it is engaged in the interaction interface through bonding with Cys1097 in the N-terminal β-sheet (Bossi et al, 2010; Lee et al, 2010). Both Phe1174 and Met1166 mutations can probably weaken auto-inhibitory interactions and allow the ALK kinase domain to more easily adopt its active configuration. However, unlike ALKF1174 mutants, the ALKM1166R mutation is not a robust gain-of-function mutation, although it is able to transform NIH3T3 cells, mediate neurite outgrowth, and activate downstream ALK targets, such as STAT3 and ERK. Moreover, unlike ALKF1174 mutants, ALKM1166R lacks the ability to mediate Il-3 independent growth of Ba/F3 cells. Our analyses suggest that although ALKM1166R is able to weaken the auto-inhibitory interaction, this does not occur to the same degree as with the ALKF1174 mutations. The extent to which an ALKM1166R mutation contributes to neuroblastoma disease progression or tumour initation is unclear from our experiments.  Consideration of the impact of the ALKT1087I and ALKD1091N mutations on ALK kinase activity from a structural point of view is difficult because they have not been included in any structural study to date. Both are located close to the C-terminal of the β1 and β2 sheets in the kinase domain (Bossi et al., 2010; Lee et al, 2010). Another mutation investigated here is at position Ala1099, which is located between the β1' and β2' sheets. Both Lee et al. and Bossi et al. have indicated that nearby Cys1097 plays an important role in mediating a hydrogen bond with the unphosphorylated tyrosine at position 1278 when ALK is in an inactive configuration (Fig. 1B, sticks and dots) (Lee et al, 2010; Bossi et al., 2010). Our analyses of these, together with the location of the ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N and ALKA1099T mutations, indicate that no gross structural conformation changes occur that result in the mutant ALK protein gaining characteristics that differ significantly from the wild-type protein (Table 1). The Thr1151 mutation is located in the β3 sheet, included in the framework of five-stranded, twisted anti-parallel β-sheets that build up predominantly the N-terminal kinase lobe. Apparently, mutation of Thr1151 to methionine (T1151M) does not affect the ability of the ALK kinase domain to be activated upon stimulation. Finally, it is difficult to predict the effect of the 1464STOP mutation, although from our analyses we would speculate that at least in terms of activation it behaves in a manner similar to the wild-type receptor, i.e. the receptor displays ligand-dependent activation. However, the manner and regulation of inactivation of such a truncated receptor might be an important aspect that could be of relevance in neuroblastoma.  The expression of mutants such as ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP neither renders Ba/F3 cells independent of IL-3 for their growth nor exhibits transforming activity. Additionally, the mutants do not form foci in NIH3T3 cells. Importantly, however, they are able to give rise to neurites and stimulate activation of ERK in the presence of agonist antibodies. Furthermore, all the mutations in this study are successfully blocked by crizotinib, which results in a decrease in ALK phosphorylation and its downstream target ERK in a manner similar to the controls employed in this study, i.e. ALKF1174L and ALKF1174S (Martinsson et al., 2011; Schönherr et al., 2011b). A recent study has investigated a number of ALK mutants, which have been identified by the Cancer Genome Project (Sanger Institute, Cambridge, UK) in cell lines from a range of tumour types. This analysis included F1174L, from the SH-SY5Y neuroblastoma cell line, as well as a number of additional previously uncharacterised ALK mutations, and looked at their transfomation potential. Similarly to the mutants investigated here (ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP) the ALK mutants investigated by McDuff and colleagues do not render Ba/F3 cells independent of IL-3 for their growth, exhibit lack of transforming activity and might represent passenger mutations in the evolution of cancer (McDuff et al., 2011). However, this work did not examine whether the various ALK mutants were able to respond to activation by external ligand or agonist antibodies or examine their sensitivity to treatment with crizotinib.  From our present analysis of previously uncharacterised ALK mutants, and in light of other reports concerning ALK mutant variants, the accumulated data suggests that the ALK mutations observed and characterised in neuroblastoma to date fall into three classes. These classes are: (i) gain-of-function ligand-independent mutations of varying activation strength, e.g. ALKF1174; (ii) kinase-dead ALK mutants, e.g. ALKI1250T (Schönherr et al., 2011a); and (iii) ALK mutations that are ligand-dependent in nature and which might represent ‘passenger’ mutations. Irrespective of the nature of the observed ALK mutant, in every case the activity of the mutant ALK receptors can be abrogated by treatment with the ALK inhibitor crizotinib, albeit with differing levels of sensitivity. Present knowledge would predict that these mutants will also be sensitive to inhibition by next generation ALK TKIs. Although a role for the class of ligand-independent ALK mutants such as ALKF1174 and ALKR1275 is simple to rationalise, further work will be required to answer the more challenging issue of the significance of the ligand-dependent class of ALK mutants, if any, in neuroblastoma progression.  Go to: MATERIALS AND METHODS Patients: Case 1 (A1099T) and Case 2 (R1464STOP)  Case report 1 A 14-day-old newborn Japanese boy infant diagnosed with neurblastoma was born to unrelated healthy parents with no neuroblastoma history. The tumour was classified as stage 2 and no MYCN amplification nor ALK amplification were detected by array comparative genomic hybridisation (CGH) analysis. This patient is still alive and disease-free, and at this point is 11 years old. DNA ploidy of the tumour was aneuploidy (DNA index was 1.34) and array CGH showed whole chromosome 17 gain, with the pattern of whole chromosomal gains and losses in other multiple chromosomes. The tumour was morphologically diagnosed as favourable according to the Shimada classification (Shimada et al., 1999). Tropomyosin-receptor-kinase (Trk) A was highly expressed in the tumour. The A1099T (GCT/ACT) ALK variant appeared to be heterozygous and present in both tumour and blood DNA, suggesting that this is a germline mutation.  Case report 2 Tumour and blood DNA from a 21-month-old Caucasian American male with stage 4 neuroblastoma were sequenced as part of the TARGET project. The tumour was characterised by MYCN amplification using fluorescence in situ hybridisation (FISH), unfavourable histology (Shimada et al., 1999) and a DNA index of 1.908. Whole genome, exome, and transcriptome sequencing were performed using the Illumina Genome Analyzer. Data were processed as previously described (Morin et al., 2011; Morozova et al., 2010). Sequencing revealed a heterozygous R1646STOP variant in both tumour and blood DNA. In the blood genome, eight reads (47%) supported the reference allele G, and nine reads (53%) supported the alternative allele A. In the tumour genome, five sequencing reads (31%) supported the G allele, and eleven reads supported the A allele. Both reference and alternative alleles were expressed in the tumour transcriptome, with nine and seven reads (56% and 44%) supporting the reference and mutant alleles, respectively. The variant was independently verified by Sanger sequencing.  Generation of human ALK mutant constructions  ALKwt, ALKF1174L and ALKF1174S have been described earlier (Martinsson et al., 2011). All other ALK mutants employed in this study were created in pcDNA3 by Eurofins MWG/operon (Ebersberg, Germany). The mutations generated in the kinase domain were confirmed by sequencing from both directions.  Antibodies and inhibitors  Primary antibodies used were: anti-pan-ERK (1:5000), purchased from BD Transduction Laboratories (Franklin Lakes, NJ), anti-pALK(Y1278), anti-pALK(Y1604), anti-pERK(T202/Y204) and anti- pSTAT3 (Y705) were from Cell Signaling Technology (Danvers, MA). The activating monoclonal antibody mAb31 has been described previously (Martinsson et al., 2011; Moog-Lutz et al., 2005). Monoclonal antibody 153 (anti-ALK) was produced in the Hallberg laboratory against the extracellular domain of ALK as described (Moog-Lutz et al., 2005). Horseradish-peroxidase-conjugated secondary antibodies goat anti-rabbit IgG and goat anti-mouse IgG (diluted 1:5000) were from Thermo Scientific (Waltham, MA). The ALK inhibitor crizotinib (PF-02341066, Xalkori) was a generous gift from Pfizer, Inc.  Neurite outgrowth assay  PC12 cells (2×106) were transfected by electroporation in an Amaxa electroporator (Amaxa Biosystems, Cologne, Germany) using 0.8 μg of pcDNA3-human ALK and 0.5 μg pEGFPN1 (Clontech, Mountain view, CA) and 100 μl Ingenio electroporation solution (Mirus Bio LCC, Madison, WI). Transfected cells were subsequently seeded into 24-well plates together with mAb31 (1 μg/ml) and the inhibitor crizotinib (250 nM) in complete growth medium (Martinsson et al., 2011). After 48 hours of incubation, the fraction of GFP-positive and neuritecarrying cells versus GFP-positive cells was observed under a Zeiss Axiovert 40 CFL microscope. To be judged as a neurite-carrying cell, the neurite of the cell was required to reach at least twice the length of the diameter of a normal cell body. Experiments were performed in triplicates and each sample within an experiment was assayed in duplicate.  Cell proliferation assay and IC50 determination  Ba/F3 cells expressing either human ALKwt or mutant human ALK were generated by electroporation with pcDNA3-human ALK using Amaxa electroporator (Amaxa Biosystems, Cologne, Germany). Transfectants were selected in RPMI with 10% heat-inactivated foetal bovine serum (FBS) and 2.5 ng/ml IL-3 (Peprotech, Rocky Hill, NJ) in the presence of G418 (600 μg /ml) for 10 days. Cells were washed with PBSA and seeded at 0.5×106 cells/ml in RPMI with 10% FBS and G418 for generation of human ALK-expressing IL-3-independent cells (Schönherr et al., 2011b). For calculation of IC50 values, human ALK-expressing Ba/F3 cells were treated with varying concentrations of crizotinib for 3 days. Cell viability was tested with resazurin (Sigma, Stockholm, Sweden) (O'Brien et al., 2000). The IC50 value was determined for individual cell lines and the experiment was carried out at least three times independently, in triplicate.  Cell lysis and western blotting  PC12 cells expressing human ALK mutants were serum-starved for 36 hours prior to stimulation with 1 μg/ml of the activating mAb31 for 30 minutes (Moog-Lutz et al., 2005; Schönherr et al., 2010; Yang et al., 2007). IL-3-independent human ALK-expressing Ba/F3 cells were treated with crizotinib in complete medium for 3 hours. Cells were washed with PBSA and lysed in SDS-sample buffer. Pre-cleared lysates were run on SDS/PAGE, followed by western blotting using the indicated antibodies. ALK downstream activation was detected by pERK and pSTAT3(Y705); pan-ERK was used as loading control. ALK phosphorylation was analysed with pALK(Y1278) and pALK(Y1604) antibodies. Cell lysis and immunoblotting were performed according to described protocols (Schönherr et al., 2010).  Transformation assay  NIH3T3 cells (4.5×104) were seeded in collagen-coated 12-well plates prior to transfection for 6 hours with 1.75 μg pcDNA3.1-human ALK and 4.4 μl Lipofectamine 2000 (Invitrogen, Paisley, UK) in 0.3 ml Opti-MEM. The next day, 60% of the cells were transferred to six-well plates and maintained in DMEM with 10% heat-inactivated FBS and 0.5 mg/ml G418 until the cells reached confluency. Then, the cells were cultivated in DMEM with 5% heat-inactivated FBS and 0.25 mg/ml G418 for approximately 10 days. The cells were then fixed using methanol and stained with 0.25% crystal violet. The foci visible by the naked eye were subsequently analysed (Schönherr et al., 2011a).  Expression of human ALK mutants in Drosophila eye  The Gal4-UAS expression system was employed to express human ALK in the Drosophila eye (Brand and Perrimon, 1993). DNA encoding ALK1234T and ALK1464STOP were subcloned with EcoRI and NotI from pcDNA3-ALK1234T and pcDNA3-ALK1464STOP, and the resulting fragments were ligated into the EcoRI-NotI site of the pUAST vector. Transgenic flies carrying pUAST-ALK were generated by BestGene (Chino Hills, CA) and crossed with pGMR-Gal4 (Bloomington, stock no. 9146). Offspring were fixed with 4% glutaraldehyde in PBS overnight and subjected to electron microscopic analysis. To confirm the expression of human ALK, eye discs of third instar larva were stained with anti-ALK mAb153 (Schönherr et al., 2011a). Antibody binding was visualised using Cy3-labelled anti-mouse IgG (Amersham). The discs were mounted on slides in Fluoromount-G (Southern Biotechnology Associates, Birmingham, AL) and imaged using a Zeiss Apotome. 
1553||In the era of personalized medicine, understanding the molecular drivers of oncogenesis will be likely to trump morphological characteristics with regard to diagnostics, prognostics and choice of therapies. Identifying single driver mutations from billions of possibilities used to require substantial insight. However, as the cost of deep genomic sequencing goes down each month, clever tricks such as identifying family cohorts may not be as necessary. Family cohorts have driven genetic discovery for decades, including the identification of most tumor suppressor genes and many oncogenes.  Neuroblastoma is a lethal cancer of early childhood that essentially comes in two forms: highly malignant and locally manageable, or, to paraphrase Audrey Evans, an early leader in the field, the ‘good’ies and the ‘bad’ies. The underlying genes responsible for neuroblastoma remain largely unknown, despite the discovery of a handful of genetic changes that have been implicated in neuroblastoma development. For example, Brodeur et al.1 and Look et al.2 correlated MYCN oncogene amplification with aggressive tumors that have a high propensity for metastasis and that cause mortality. Also, very small subsets of familial neuroblastoma were associated with PHOX2B (encoding paired-like homeobox-2) mutations, but these mutations accounted for only very few families (reviewed in ref. 3).  To identify additional oncogenes that cause familial neuroblastoma, Mossé et al.4 returned to old-fashioned family trees. They collected the pedigrees of 20 families that showed an autosomal dominant pattern of neuroblastoma inheritance. Using a genome-wide scan for linkage at 6,000 single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs), these investigators identified a previously unknown series of germline mutations in the ALK gene. Some but not all of these families had genomic amplicons on chromosome 2 that also included MYCN. Among the mutations identified, most were predicted to lead to amino acid substitutions in the ALK tyrosine kinase domain (Fig. 1). Five of the eight pedigrees with germline mutation led to proteins with the same R1275Q mutation. A neuroblastoma cell line containing the R1275Q mutation showed ALK activation, which was indicated by tyrosine phosphorylation at ALK Y1604.  Figure 1 Figure 1 The ALK receptor kinase: its domains, pathways, mutations and inhibitors. The different domains of ALK are shown within their bordering amino-acid positions. The major mutations found by Mossé et al.4, Janoueix-Lerosey et al.5, Chen et al.6 and ... Three additional publications by Janoueix-Lerosey et al.5, Chen et al.6 and George et al.7 used SNP- or amplicon-based sequencing methods to identify similar mutations in ALK (Fig. 1). Each of the three studies showed the effects of a dominant oncogene with a similar pattern of results. Not all mutations resulted in constitutive kinase activity; in fact, only the minority showed clear increases in ALK autophosphorylation and downstream target activation, such as phosphorylation of AKT. The R1275Q and F1174L(V) mutations were shown to have constitutive tyrosine phosphorylation in cell lines that endogenously expressed these mutant forms of ALK, or when expressed in either 3T3 or Ba/F3 cells6,7.  ALK mutations in neuroblastoma tissues account for small survival differences in the whole population of people with neuroblastoma; this is due to their very low incidence in the population. Still, individuals who have neuroblastomas with the ALK F1174 mutation show a significantly worse outcome relative to the overall cohort, suggesting that this mutation has an important impact on malignant progression, whereas the presence of the ALK R1275Q mutation did not make a difference8. Stratification according to ALK expression showed that individuals with high ALK expression in their tumors had a significantly worse overall survival and disease-free survival than those with low tumor ALK expression. Although this type of single-gene analysis can be useful to direct treatment with a targeted therapy, genomic instability in the tumors leads to complex mixtures of clonal cells; therefore, multigene analyses can provide a more robust predictor of disease course and may ultimately provide a more complex insight into pathways activated during tumorigenesis and even predict candidate drug sensitivity8.  The functional role of these ALK mutations was addressed in each of the four studies4–7; however, a deeper understanding will be necessary to optimize any ALK-targeted therapy. Each study used either ALK expression followed by inhibition in non-neuroblastoma cell lines, RNAi-mediated reduction of endogenous ALK expression in cell lines or small-molecule kinase inhibitors. Generally, the results from these studies supported a dominant role for mutant ALK. However, in some cases, RNAi-mediated reduction of wild-type ALK expression also reduced neuroblastoma cell growth, suggesting that the level of ALK expression might be as important as an activating mutation in driving tumorigenesis.  A recent paper by Sasaki et al.9 identified ALK F1174L as a mutation that occurred naturally in an individual with inflammatory myoblastic tumor undergoing treatment with the dual MET and ALK kinase inhibitor crizotinib. This tumor contained a somatic RANBP2-ALK translocation; however, when the person experienced recurrent disease, one ALK locus contained an additional F1174L mutation. An evaluation of the inflammatory myoblastic tumor cells harboring ALK F1174L showed that they had higher levels of phosphorylated ALK along with increased downstream phosphorylation of AKT. Thus, this study supports that F1174L is an activating mutation of ALK.  ALK was independently identified as a molecular target in neuroblastoma by screening >600 human cancer cell lines with pharmacological inhibitors of ALK kinase activity10. This work provided a platform from which to launch inhibitor development when a transforming EML4-ALK fusion gene was identified as a major driver in a subset of approximately 5% of non–small-cell lung cancers11. Indeed, a first clinical trial with crizotinib showed striking efficacy in individuals with non–small-cell lung cancer, providing evidence that a well-defined activated pathway may be targeted effectively12 (Fig. 1). A recent structural study of the ALK kinase domain revealed differences from the same domain in related receptor kinases in the insulin receptor family that will be helpful in designing new inhibitors as resistance to the initial ALK inhibitors emerges13.  As higher ALK receptor expression in neuroblastoma coincides with poorer disease outcome8, overexpressed ALK may thus be a potentially valuable therapeutic target. Indeed, two proteins—pleiotrophin and the related midkine—have been shown to activate mammalian ALK14 through extracellular interactions with it (Fig. 1). Therefore, antibody strategies to target overexpressed ALK in neuroblastoma may be an attractive additional approach. Antibody therapy may even act syn ergistically with small-molecule tyrosine kinase inhibitors.  It is clear that targeting ALK is now open season for the development of new therapies for neuroblastoma, as well as other cancers. The insights gained from ongoing trials are likely to directly benefit both subgroups of individuals whose tumors are driven by ALK and, in general, targeted approaches to cancer treatment. Obviously, genetic mutations can reveal new drivers and pathways activated in cancer and may present new therapeutic opportunities. However, fully validating any new target is a challenge at a new frontier of a deadly cancer.  SUMMARY Neuroblastoma is a childhood extracranial solid tumour that is associated with a number of genetic changes. Included in these genetic alterations are mutations in the kinase domain of the anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK) receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK), which have been found in both somatic and familial neuroblastoma. In order to treat patients accordingly requires characterisation of these mutations in terms of their response to ALK tyrosine kinase inhibitors (TKIs). Here, we report the identification and characterisation of two novel neuroblastoma ALK mutations (A1099T and R1464STOP), which we have investigated together with several previously reported but uncharacterised ALK mutations (T1087I, D1091N, T1151M, M1166R, F1174I and A1234T). In order to understand the potential role of these ALK mutations in neuroblastoma progression, we have employed cell culture-based systems together with the model organism Drosophila as a readout for ligand-independent activity. Mutation of ALK at position 1174 (F1174I) generates a gain-of-function receptor capable of activating intracellular targets such as ERK (extracellular signal regulated kinase) and STAT3 (signal transducer and activator of transcription 3) in a ligand-independent manner. Analysis of these previously uncharacterised ALK mutants and comparison with ALKF1174 mutants suggests that ALK mutations observed in neuroblastoma fall into three classes. These classes are: (i) gain-of-function ligand-independent mutations such as ALKF1174l, (ii) kinase-dead ALK mutants, e.g. ALKI1250T (Schönherr et al., 2011a) and (iii) ALK mutations that are ligand-dependent in nature. Irrespective of the nature of the observed ALK mutants, in every case the activity of the mutant ALK receptors could be abrogated by the ALK inhibitor crizotinib (Xalkori/PF-02341066), albeit with differing levels of sensitivity.  Go to: INTRODUCTION Neuroblastoma is a common childhood cancer that arises in the tissues of the sympathetic nervous system (Maris et al., 2007). It most commonly originates in the adrenal glands, but can also develop at additional sites in the neck, chest and abdomen. It is considered to be a disease of developing tissue because it originates from precursor cells of neural crest tissue that are active during embryonic development. This in part explains the median age of 17 months for occurrence of neuroblastoma (Maris, 2010). Recently, anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK) gain-of-function mutations have been described in both familial (Janoueix-Lerosey et al., 2008; Mossé et al., 2008) and sporadic neuroblastoma (Carén et al., 2008; Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Martinsson et al., 2011; Mossé et al., 2008). Although there is currently no clinically approved treatment for ALK mutations in neuroblastoma, ongoing clinical trials are expected to determine the potential usefulness of ALK-targeted therapies for use in the future. Inhibition of ALK activity using crizotinib (Xalkori/PF-02341066) has been reported in both inflammatory myofibroblastic tumours (IMT) and non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) patients (Butrynski et al., 2010; Kwak et al., 2010). Anti-ALK inhibitor therapy thus appears to offer promise in the treatment of ALK-mediated tumours at this point (Hallberg and Palmer, 2011). It is of future clinical importance to characterise each ALK mutation so that individual patients can be treated accordingly. Furthermore, we have addressed the important issue of whether ALK mutations are resistant to the medicine that is currently in use.  ALK was originally identified as a fusion partner with nucleophosmin or nucleolar protein gene (NPM)-ALK oncogene in anaplastic large cell lymphoma (Morris et al., 1994; Shiota et al., 1994). Later, ALK was reported to be receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK), with a molecular weight of 220 kDa, belonging to the insulin receptor superfamily (Iwahara et al., 1997; Morris et al., 1997). ALK contains an extracellular ligand-binding domain, a transmembrane-spanning domain and an intracellular tyrosine kinase domain (Palmer et al., 2009) and is expressed primarily in the central and peripheral nervous system during embryonic development and at lower concentrations in the nervous system of adults. Its expression is also observed in developing sensory organs, reproductive organs, skin and stomach (Iwahara et al., 1997; Morris et al., 1997; Vernersson et al., 2006) and its physiological function is still enigmatic. It has been associated with multiple translocation events involved in several different human malignancies (Palmer et al., 2009), such as IMT (Griffin et al., 1999), NSCLC (Rikova et al., 2007; Soda et al., 2007), diffuse large B cell lymphomas (DLBCL) (Arber et al., 1996) and renal cell carcinoma (Debelenko et al., 2011) amongst others. Involvement of ALK in a number of human diseases including neuroblastoma has accelerated recent efforts to understand the function of this RTK under both pathological and non-pathological conditions.  In this study, we have characterised a number of novel mutations in the ALK gene from neuroblastoma patients. From analysis of genomic DNA from patient biopsy samples, two novel germ line mutations were identified, leading to A1099T and R1464STOP mutations at the protein level. We have investigated these mutations, looking at whether they could act as driver or passenger mutations in neuroblastoma, with the aim of predicting their potential role in disease progression. Further, we have compared them with a number of other previously reported, but currently uncharacterised, ALK mutations, namely T1087I, D1091N, T1151M, M1166R and F1174I.  Our findings confirm that the ALKF1174I mutation, in keeping with the previously characterised ALKF1174S and ALKF1174L mutants, is a gain-of-function mutation that mediates activation of downstream targets such as ERK and STAT3 in a ligand-independent manner. The ALKF1174I mutant is able to transform both Ba/F3 and NIH3T3 cells. Although we observed that the ALKM1166R mutant is unable to transform Ba/F3 cells, it was able to give rise to foci in NIH3T3 transformation assays. Taken together, our data suggest that the ALK mutations investigated to date fall into three classes: (i) gain-of-function ligand-independent mutations (e.g. F1174I), (ii) kinase-dead ALK mutants (Schönherr et al., 2011a) and (iii) ALK mutations that are ligand-dependent in nature, such as the human ALK mutations (T1087I, D1091N, A1099T, T1151M, M1166R, A1234T, R1464STOP), which are not constitutively active but which display ligand-dependent activation when challenged with agonist antibodies. Importantly, to date, the activity of all ALK mutants tested can be abrogated by treatment with ALK small molecule TKIs.  TRANSLATIONAL IMPACT  Clinical issue  Neuroblastoma is a childhood extracranial solid tumour that has been associated with alterations in several different genes. Among these, are mutations in the kinase domain of the anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK), a receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK). ALK mutations have been reported in both somatic and familial forms of neuroblastoma. Many ALK mutations confer a gain of function to the protein, but mechanistic information is not available for all identified mutations. Optimal treatment of neuroblastoma (e.g. with tyrosine kinase inhibitors) requires a clearer understanding of how different ALK mutations influence protein function and, in turn, contribute to neuroblastoma development. In addition, it is important to investigate whether certain ALK mutations confer resistance to currently available neuroblastoma drugs.  Results  Here, the authors compared signalling mediated by several different ALK mutants identified in patients with neuroblastoma with signalling mediated by wild-type ALK. Their studies aimed to determine whether disease-associated ALK mutations are universally gain-of-function and whether certain ALK mutations can confer resistance to tyrosine kinase inhibitors. Their results, together with existing data, suggest that the neuroblastoma-associated ALK mutations characterised thus far fall into three classes: (i) gain-of-function, ligand-independent mutations of varying activation strength, such as ALKF1174, (ii) kinase-dead ALK mutants, such as ALKI1250T and (iii) ALK mutations that are ligand-dependent and might represent ‘passenger’ mutations. Importantly, the activity of all mutant ALK receptors, irrespective of mutation type, could be abrogated by the ALK inhibitor crizotinib, albeit with differing levels of sensitivity.  Implications and future directions  Characterizing individual ALK mutations is clinically important so that individual neuroblastoma patients can be classified and treated appropriately. These results provide mechanistic information on several neuroblastoma-associated ALK mutations and propose a way to classify all ALK mutants. Encouragingly, these results also indicate that various types of ALK mutations are sensitive to currently available neuroblastoma therapy.  Go to: RESULTS Evaluating the role of human ALK mutations as driver or passenger  We set out to characterise two novel germ line ALK variants identified in patients with neuroblastoma (ALKA1099T and ALKR1464STOP) and their potential roles as driver or passenger mutations in neuroblastoma. ALKA1099T was identified in a Japanese infant diagnosed with neuroblastoma, born to unrelated healthy parents with no neuroblastoma history. No MYCN amplification or ALK amplification was detected in this patient, and the tumour was classified as stage 2. The ALKA1099T variant was heterozygous in both tumour and blood DNA samples. The ALKR1464STOP mutation was observed in the DNA and RNA from a patient sample analysed as part of the TARGET (therapeutically applicable research to generate effective treatments) initiative, which aims to characterise the genomic landscape of the most common childhood cancers, including neuroblastoma. This sequence variant was heterozygous in tumour DNA and RNA, as well as in blood DNA. DNA from the patient's parents was not available for testing.  Also included in this analysis were the earlier reported, but as yet uncharacterised, putative gain-of-function ALK mutations: ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKT1151M, ALKM1166R, ALKF1174I and ALKA1234T (Fig. 1A,B) (Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Mossé et al., 2008). As a positive control, the previously verified constitutively active ALK mutations ALKF1174L and ALKF1174S were also included (Martinsson et al., 2011). Initially, we investigated these eight human neuroblastoma ALK mutations in a PC12 cell culture system, examining both signalling activity and capacity to drive differentiation, as measured by neurite outgrowth. PC12 cells are a clonal rat adrenal pheochromocytoma cell line, which are well characterised as differentiating and extending neurites upon stimulation with nerve growth factor or differentiation factors (Greene and Tischler, 1976). They do not express ALK at detectable levels. We, and others, have previously shown that expression of wild-type ALK (ALKwt), followed by stimulation with ALK agonist monoclonal antibody 31 (mAb31) or expression of activating ALK mutants leads to neurite extension in PC12 cells (Martinsson et al., 2011) (Fig. 1C, lane 1). PC12 cells were transiently transfected with ALK mutants and serum-starved for 48 hours prior to stimulation with mAb31 for 30 minutes. Both human ALKwt and human ALKF1174S were included as controls (Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Martinsson et al., 2011) (Fig. 1). The ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants displayed characteristics similar to that of ALKwt and were able to activate downstream targets such as ERK only upon stimulation with agonist mAb31 (Fig. 1C). In a manner similar to that previously observed for human ALKF1174S, two of the mutants investigated (human ALKM1166R and human ALKF1174I) were able to activate phosphorylation of ERK in the absence of agonist mAb31, suggesting that these two mutants might be constitutively activated in a ligand-independent manner (Fig. 1C). Furthermore, in keeping with this hypothesis, both human ALKM1166R and human ALKF1174I mediated robust phosphorylation of STAT3, as reported for the ALKF1174S mutation (Fig. 1C). Interestingly, none of the other mutants were able to generate STAT3 phosphorylation or activation upon stimulation for up to 30 minutes, as previously shown for wild-type ALK (Schönherr et al., 2011b).  Fig. 1. Fig. 1. Domain structure of ALK mutations and their activation of downstream targets. (A) The extracellular, transmembrane domain and the intracellular domain, which contains the protein tyrosine kinase domain are shown. Mutation residues within the intracellular ... Thus, in this initial analysis, the ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants were found to be inducibly activated by agonist mAb31 and displayed enhanced activation of ERK upon stimulation. However, they were unable to activate STAT3. By contrast, both ALKM1166R and ALKF1174I appeared to be activated in a ligand-independent manner and led to robust activation of downstream targets, such as ERK and STAT3, in a manner similar to the ALKF1174S mutation.  Crizotinib blocks neurite outgrowth activity of human ALK mutants  The PC12 cell system is a sensitive readout for ALK signalling activity as a result of receptor activation (Schönherr et al., 2011b; Yang et al., 2007). Transient transfection of ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP did not stimulate neurite outgrowth in the absence of agonist mAb31. However, addition of agonist antibody lead to significantly increased levels of neurite outgrowth (up to 30-40%) (Fig. 2). The levels of ALK-induced neurite outgrowth were similar to that observed upon stimulation of the wild-type ALK receptor. In agreement with our earlier results, the ALKM1166R and ALKF1174I mutants were capable of mediating neurite outgrowth in a ligand-independent manner, displaying similar percentages of neurite outgrowth in the presence or absence of agonist antibody (Fig. 2). To investigate whether neurite outgrowth could be abrogated by ALK inhibition, we employed crizotinib (Xalkori), an FDA-approved small inhibitor of both ALK and MET receptor tyrosine kinases, which is being employed in phase II and III clinical trials (Butrynski et al., 2010; Kwak et al., 2010; Hallberg and Palmer, 2011). Crizotinib (250 nM) treatment resulted in a significant reduction in ALK-induced neurite outgrowth. Thus, crizotinib is able to effectively block neurite outgrowth mediated by all human ALK mutants investigated here.  Fig. 2. Fig. 2. Crizotinib abrogates ALK-mediated neurite outgrowth in PC12 cells. PC12 cells were co-transfected with pcDNA3-human ALK and pEGFPN1 and seeded out in the presence or absence of crizotinib. Cells were stimulated with 1 μg/ml mAb31. After 48 hours, ... In Ba/F3 cells, crizotinib inhibits constitutively active ALK mutants with varying IC50 values  To confirm and extend our analysis of the inhibition of these ALK mutants by crizotinib, the Ba/F3 cell system was employed (Lu et al., 2009; Schönherr et al., 2011b). Ba/F3 cells, an IL-3-dependent cell line, are often employed in kinase drug discovery, exploiting their characteristic of being able to overcome IL-3 dependence, which allows them to survive and proliferate in the absence of IL-3 when expressing constitutively active tyrosine kinase or other oncogenes (Warmuth et al., 2007). Ba/F3 cells were transfected with human wild-type ALK and the eight different ALK mutants, and subsequently selected with the antibiotic G418 in the presence of IL-3 for 10 days. We observed that Ba/F3 cells expressing the different ALK mutants exhibited variable proliferation ability in the absence of IL-3 (Fig. 3B). At the end of selection in IL-3-free medium, only the human ALKF1174I mutant gave rise to IL-3-independent cell lines, along with the human ALKF1174L positive control. By contrast, ALKwt, ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, human ALKM1166R, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants were unable to substitute for IL-3 to drive proliferation in Ba/F3 cells, even though they expressed ALK protein (Fig. 3A,B and data not shown). To further analyse the responsiveness of these mutants toward crizotinib, the cells were treated with different doses of this ALK inhibitor. Importantly, crizotinib did not inhibit cell growth or cell viability when cells were grown in the presence of IL-3 (Fig. 3C), indicating that it is not toxic to Ba/F3 cells at the levels employed. Proliferation of both human ALKF1174I and human ALKF1174L mutants was blocked by crizotinib (Fig. 4A). IC50 (concentration of drug responsible for 50% inhibition) values show that inhibition of ALKF1174I required similar doses of crizotinib as human ALKF1174L (Fig. 4B). Furthermore, inhibition of ALK mutant activity was also confirmed at the level of ALK tyrosine phosphorylation at position 1278. Tyr1278 corresponds to the first tyrosine of the Y'RAS'YY motif in the A-loop of ALK that is necessary for auto-activation of ALK kinase domain and transformation ability of nucleophosmin (NPM)-ALK (Tartari et al, 2008). Immunoblot analysis performed on Ba/F3 cell lysates showed a reduction in the levels of ALK Tyr1278 phosphorylation in the presence of inhibitor for both human ALKF1174L and human ALKF1174I mutants (Fig. 4C). In agreement with these results, both mutants exhibited decreased ALK Tyr1604 phosphorylation (Fig. 4C). Reduced levels of ERK phosphorylation by both mutants upon treatment with crizotinib confirmed the inhibition of ALK-mediated downstream targets (Fig. 4C). Taken together, these data suggest that crizotinib is able to block the ALK activity of these mutants in a dose-dependent manner.  Fig. 3. Fig. 3. Expression of human ALK in Ba/F3 cells. (A) Ba/F3 cells were transfected with human wild-type or mutant ALKs and selected with G418 in the presence of IL-3. Whole cell lysates were prepared and run on SDS-PAGE, followed by immunoblotting with indicated ... Fig. 4. Fig. 4. Crizotinib inhibits both human ALKF1174-driven proliferation and phosphorylation at Tyr1278 and Tyr1604 of ALK in Ba/F3 cells. (A) IC50 values for crizotinib for both human ALKF1174I and human ALKF1174L were calculated. Values represent mean + s.d. from ... Transforming potential of human ALK mutations  We further examined the transforming ability of human ALK mutants using NIH3T3 cells. Expression of the human ALK mutations ALKwt, ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP were unable to generate formation of foci greater than that of the vector control or ALK wild-type control. By contrast, both ALKF1174I and ALKF1174L displayed robust foci formation, although ALKM1166R showed rather weak foci formation ability in comparison with ALKF1174S (Fig. 5A). These results indicate different degrees of foci formation by the ligand-independent ALK mutations, which is in agreement with our previous results in the Ba/F3 system (Fig. 5B).  Fig. 5. Fig. 5. Transformation potential of human ALK mutants. (A,B) The transforming potential of the mutations was assayed by transfecting NIH3T3 cells with pcDNA3-human ALK (mutant and wild type). Cells were selected with G418 for 3 weeks. (A) Representative images ... Ectopic expression of human ALK mutants in Drosophila melanogaster  Transgenic Drosophila expressing the human ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants were generated to confirm their ligand-dependent characteristics. These were ectopically expressed in Drosophila eye, together with the previously generated human ALKF1174L and ALKwt, employing the pGMR-Gal4 driver line, which directs protein expression in developing photoreceptors of the eye. The expression of human ALK proteins was confirmed by immunostaining of the eye discs by using anti-human ALK antibody. Expression of human ALKF1174L resulted in a rough eye phenotype, whereas expression of human ALKwt, ALKA1234T or ALKR1464STOP did not show any obvious phenotype in adult flies (Martinsson et al., 2011) (Fig. 6). However, the regular hexagonal arrangement of ommatidia was disorganised, with many interommatidial bristles missing in human ALKF1174L. The data strongly support the conclusion that the human ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants are ligand-dependent in nature.  Fig. 6. Fig. 6. Ectopic expression of human ALKA1234T and human ALKR1464STOP in Drosophila eye does not generate the rough eye phenotype. Adult fly eyes (upper) and larval eye discs (lower) ectopically expressing mutant human ALK variants. Human ALKwt and human ALKF1174L ... Go to: DISCUSSION ALK mutations have been reported in both familial (Mossé et al., 2008) and sporadic neuroblastoma (Carén et al., 2008; Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Janoueix-Lerosey et al., 2008; Martinsson et al., 2011; Mossé et al., 2008). The presence of ALK mutations in neuroblastoma draws attention to its possible function and its role in disease progression. Therefore, characterisation of these different ALK mutations is an important exercise in assessing whether the various mutants are functional or not, with potential importance for the patient to be treated accordingly.  In this study, we have investigated two novel mutations of ALK (ALKA1099T and ALKR1464STOP) and compared them with six previously described but uncharacterised human ALK point mutations (ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKT1151M, ALKM1166R, ALKF1174I and ALKA1234T) from neuroblastoma patients, with the aim of assessing whether these mutations could drive tumour progression (Table 1). So far, and from our knowledge of neuroblastoma tumour analysis and published reports to date, only one neuroblastoma patient has presented with a homozygous ALK mutation (Martinsson et al., 2011). To date, one mutation (ALKI1250T) has been reported to have defective kinase activity, raising important questions as to the impact, if any, that this mutation has upon neuroblastoma progression (Schönherr et al., 2011a). Signalling studies in the PC12 cell system showed differences in the activation of downstream targets by the various ALK mutants examined. ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP showed little phosphorylation of ERK, which was enhanced by stimulation with agonist antibodies. On the other hand, ALKM1166R and ALKF1174I mediated ligand-independent phosphorylation of ERK and STAT3. Likewise, the ALKM1166R and ALKF1174I mutants were able to mediate neurite outgrowth in PC12 cells in a ligand-independent manner (Table 1). The other ALK mutations (ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP) displayed inducible activity and resulted in neurites only when stimulated with agonist antibodies, which could be abrogated by crizotinib (Table 1). Furthermore, we co-transfected our ligand-dependent mutants together with wild-type ALK. We observed no change in the phosphorylation of ERK or in the levels of neurite outgrowth ability when compared with wild-type ALK alone in PC12 cells (data not shown).  Table 1. Table 1. Characterization of ALK mutations in order to assess their oncogenic potential Interestingly, the ALKM1166R mutant gave rise to weak foci formation in NIH3T3 cells in comparison with the ALKF1174I mutant, which displayed robust foci formation (Table 1). In this assay, the human ALK mutations ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP did not yield any foci as expected. These results thus revealed that only the ALKF1174I and ALKM1166R mutants harbour transforming potential in NIH3T3 cells. To complement these analyses, we employed the Ba/F3 cell model system. This revealed that even though the ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKM1166R, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutant receptors were expressed, they could not substitute for IL-3 to drive proliferation in Ba/F3 cells. Our Ba/F3 results with the ALKT1151M and ALKA1234T mutations are in agreement with earlier reported results (George et al., 2008). However, human ALKF1174I and the human ALKF1174L control, gave rise to IL-3-independent cell lines. Both mutations displayed sensitivity towards crizotinib in a dose-dependent manner, as shown by their different IC50 values (Table 1). These data are in agreement with previous reports showing that different ALK mutations exhibit different levels of sensitivity towards crizotinib (Bresler et al., 2011; Schönherr et al., 2011b). We also show that cell proliferation and phosphorylation of ALK at tyrosine positions 1278 and 1604 are blocked by using crizotinib, as expected (Fig. 4) (Schönherr et al., 2011b; Tartari et al., 2008). These data indicate that the human ALKF1174I mutant is able to mediate neurite outgrowth, transform NIH3T3 cells, activate downstream targets of ALK (such as ERK and STAT3) in a ligand-independent manner and substitute for IL-3 in Ba/F3 cells, giving rise to IL-3-independent cell line. Thus, we conclude that human ALKF1174I is a gain-of-function mutation that is sensitive to crizotinib inhibition.  The ALKM1166R mutation gives rise to neurites in PC12 cells, activates downstream targets (such as ERKs and STAT3) in a ligand-independent manner and shows weak foci formation. However, it fails to substitute for IL-3 and, hence, does not yield any IL-3-independent Ba/F3 cell lines in our hands. This is comparable to the ALKR1275Q mutant, which also displays neurite generating ability but is unable to support Ba/F3 IL-3-independent growth (Schönherr et al., 2011b). Amino acid Met1166 is not conserved in insulin receptor kinase (IRK) family members, perhaps implying that it might have a structural and functional role specific to ALK (Lee et al., 2010). Met1166 is located in the interface between the αC-helix and the DFG-helix and mutations of this residue would probably destabilise the DFG-helix and consequently facilitate the shift of the αC-helix (Fig. 1B) (Bossi et al., 2010). From a structural point of view, both positions 1166 and 1174 are in or very close to the αC-helix, which plays an important role in the activation process of the insulin receptor family members. Upon activation, the αC-helix moves a few degrees closer to the ATP-catalytic site that mediates the γ-phospho-exchange from bound ATP to the interacting substrate (Lemmon and Schlessinger, 2010). Furthermore, it has previously been shown that mutation at position 1174 changes the character of the ALK protein from a ligand-dependent receptor to a receptor exhibiting gain-of-function properties (Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Martinsson et al., 2011). Probably, this mutations results in disruption of the packing, weakening distinctive structural features observed in the ALK structure, such as the unique inhibitory position of the ALK A-loop packing a short proximal A-loop α-helix against the αC-helix of ALK, while a β-turn motif obstructs the substrate binding region (Fig. 1B). In this arrangement, Tyr1278 is inaccessible for phosphorylation because it is engaged in the interaction interface through bonding with Cys1097 in the N-terminal β-sheet (Bossi et al, 2010; Lee et al, 2010). Both Phe1174 and Met1166 mutations can probably weaken auto-inhibitory interactions and allow the ALK kinase domain to more easily adopt its active configuration. However, unlike ALKF1174 mutants, the ALKM1166R mutation is not a robust gain-of-function mutation, although it is able to transform NIH3T3 cells, mediate neurite outgrowth, and activate downstream ALK targets, such as STAT3 and ERK. Moreover, unlike ALKF1174 mutants, ALKM1166R lacks the ability to mediate Il-3 independent growth of Ba/F3 cells. Our analyses suggest that although ALKM1166R is able to weaken the auto-inhibitory interaction, this does not occur to the same degree as with the ALKF1174 mutations. The extent to which an ALKM1166R mutation contributes to neuroblastoma disease progression or tumour initation is unclear from our experiments.  Consideration of the impact of the ALKT1087I and ALKD1091N mutations on ALK kinase activity from a structural point of view is difficult because they have not been included in any structural study to date. Both are located close to the C-terminal of the β1 and β2 sheets in the kinase domain (Bossi et al., 2010; Lee et al, 2010). Another mutation investigated here is at position Ala1099, which is located between the β1' and β2' sheets. Both Lee et al. and Bossi et al. have indicated that nearby Cys1097 plays an important role in mediating a hydrogen bond with the unphosphorylated tyrosine at position 1278 when ALK is in an inactive configuration (Fig. 1B, sticks and dots) (Lee et al, 2010; Bossi et al., 2010). Our analyses of these, together with the location of the ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N and ALKA1099T mutations, indicate that no gross structural conformation changes occur that result in the mutant ALK protein gaining characteristics that differ significantly from the wild-type protein (Table 1). The Thr1151 mutation is located in the β3 sheet, included in the framework of five-stranded, twisted anti-parallel β-sheets that build up predominantly the N-terminal kinase lobe. Apparently, mutation of Thr1151 to methionine (T1151M) does not affect the ability of the ALK kinase domain to be activated upon stimulation. Finally, it is difficult to predict the effect of the 1464STOP mutation, although from our analyses we would speculate that at least in terms of activation it behaves in a manner similar to the wild-type receptor, i.e. the receptor displays ligand-dependent activation. However, the manner and regulation of inactivation of such a truncated receptor might be an important aspect that could be of relevance in neuroblastoma.  The expression of mutants such as ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP neither renders Ba/F3 cells independent of IL-3 for their growth nor exhibits transforming activity. Additionally, the mutants do not form foci in NIH3T3 cells. Importantly, however, they are able to give rise to neurites and stimulate activation of ERK in the presence of agonist antibodies. Furthermore, all the mutations in this study are successfully blocked by crizotinib, which results in a decrease in ALK phosphorylation and its downstream target ERK in a manner similar to the controls employed in this study, i.e. ALKF1174L and ALKF1174S (Martinsson et al., 2011; Schönherr et al., 2011b). A recent study has investigated a number of ALK mutants, which have been identified by the Cancer Genome Project (Sanger Institute, Cambridge, UK) in cell lines from a range of tumour types. This analysis included F1174L, from the SH-SY5Y neuroblastoma cell line, as well as a number of additional previously uncharacterised ALK mutations, and looked at their transfomation potential. Similarly to the mutants investigated here (ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP) the ALK mutants investigated by McDuff and colleagues do not render Ba/F3 cells independent of IL-3 for their growth, exhibit lack of transforming activity and might represent passenger mutations in the evolution of cancer (McDuff et al., 2011). However, this work did not examine whether the various ALK mutants were able to respond to activation by external ligand or agonist antibodies or examine their sensitivity to treatment with crizotinib.  From our present analysis of previously uncharacterised ALK mutants, and in light of other reports concerning ALK mutant variants, the accumulated data suggests that the ALK mutations observed and characterised in neuroblastoma to date fall into three classes. These classes are: (i) gain-of-function ligand-independent mutations of varying activation strength, e.g. ALKF1174; (ii) kinase-dead ALK mutants, e.g. ALKI1250T (Schönherr et al., 2011a); and (iii) ALK mutations that are ligand-dependent in nature and which might represent ‘passenger’ mutations. Irrespective of the nature of the observed ALK mutant, in every case the activity of the mutant ALK receptors can be abrogated by treatment with the ALK inhibitor crizotinib, albeit with differing levels of sensitivity. Present knowledge would predict that these mutants will also be sensitive to inhibition by next generation ALK TKIs. Although a role for the class of ligand-independent ALK mutants such as ALKF1174 and ALKR1275 is simple to rationalise, further work will be required to answer the more challenging issue of the significance of the ligand-dependent class of ALK mutants, if any, in neuroblastoma progression.  Go to: MATERIALS AND METHODS Patients: Case 1 (A1099T) and Case 2 (R1464STOP)  Case report 1 A 14-day-old newborn Japanese boy infant diagnosed with neurblastoma was born to unrelated healthy parents with no neuroblastoma history. The tumour was classified as stage 2 and no MYCN amplification nor ALK amplification were detected by array comparative genomic hybridisation (CGH) analysis. This patient is still alive and disease-free, and at this point is 11 years old. DNA ploidy of the tumour was aneuploidy (DNA index was 1.34) and array CGH showed whole chromosome 17 gain, with the pattern of whole chromosomal gains and losses in other multiple chromosomes. The tumour was morphologically diagnosed as favourable according to the Shimada classification (Shimada et al., 1999). Tropomyosin-receptor-kinase (Trk) A was highly expressed in the tumour. The A1099T (GCT/ACT) ALK variant appeared to be heterozygous and present in both tumour and blood DNA, suggesting that this is a germline mutation.  Case report 2 Tumour and blood DNA from a 21-month-old Caucasian American male with stage 4 neuroblastoma were sequenced as part of the TARGET project. The tumour was characterised by MYCN amplification using fluorescence in situ hybridisation (FISH), unfavourable histology (Shimada et al., 1999) and a DNA index of 1.908. Whole genome, exome, and transcriptome sequencing were performed using the Illumina Genome Analyzer. Data were processed as previously described (Morin et al., 2011; Morozova et al., 2010). Sequencing revealed a heterozygous R1646STOP variant in both tumour and blood DNA. In the blood genome, eight reads (47%) supported the reference allele G, and nine reads (53%) supported the alternative allele A. In the tumour genome, five sequencing reads (31%) supported the G allele, and eleven reads supported the A allele. Both reference and alternative alleles were expressed in the tumour transcriptome, with nine and seven reads (56% and 44%) supporting the reference and mutant alleles, respectively. The variant was independently verified by Sanger sequencing.  Generation of human ALK mutant constructions  ALKwt, ALKF1174L and ALKF1174S have been described earlier (Martinsson et al., 2011). All other ALK mutants employed in this study were created in pcDNA3 by Eurofins MWG/operon (Ebersberg, Germany). The mutations generated in the kinase domain were confirmed by sequencing from both directions.  Antibodies and inhibitors  Primary antibodies used were: anti-pan-ERK (1:5000), purchased from BD Transduction Laboratories (Franklin Lakes, NJ), anti-pALK(Y1278), anti-pALK(Y1604), anti-pERK(T202/Y204) and anti- pSTAT3 (Y705) were from Cell Signaling Technology (Danvers, MA). The activating monoclonal antibody mAb31 has been described previously (Martinsson et al., 2011; Moog-Lutz et al., 2005). Monoclonal antibody 153 (anti-ALK) was produced in the Hallberg laboratory against the extracellular domain of ALK as described (Moog-Lutz et al., 2005). Horseradish-peroxidase-conjugated secondary antibodies goat anti-rabbit IgG and goat anti-mouse IgG (diluted 1:5000) were from Thermo Scientific (Waltham, MA). The ALK inhibitor crizotinib (PF-02341066, Xalkori) was a generous gift from Pfizer, Inc.  Neurite outgrowth assay  PC12 cells (2×106) were transfected by electroporation in an Amaxa electroporator (Amaxa Biosystems, Cologne, Germany) using 0.8 μg of pcDNA3-human ALK and 0.5 μg pEGFPN1 (Clontech, Mountain view, CA) and 100 μl Ingenio electroporation solution (Mirus Bio LCC, Madison, WI). Transfected cells were subsequently seeded into 24-well plates together with mAb31 (1 μg/ml) and the inhibitor crizotinib (250 nM) in complete growth medium (Martinsson et al., 2011). After 48 hours of incubation, the fraction of GFP-positive and neuritecarrying cells versus GFP-positive cells was observed under a Zeiss Axiovert 40 CFL microscope. To be judged as a neurite-carrying cell, the neurite of the cell was required to reach at least twice the length of the diameter of a normal cell body. Experiments were performed in triplicates and each sample within an experiment was assayed in duplicate.  Cell proliferation assay and IC50 determination  Ba/F3 cells expressing either human ALKwt or mutant human ALK were generated by electroporation with pcDNA3-human ALK using Amaxa electroporator (Amaxa Biosystems, Cologne, Germany). Transfectants were selected in RPMI with 10% heat-inactivated foetal bovine serum (FBS) and 2.5 ng/ml IL-3 (Peprotech, Rocky Hill, NJ) in the presence of G418 (600 μg /ml) for 10 days. Cells were washed with PBSA and seeded at 0.5×106 cells/ml in RPMI with 10% FBS and G418 for generation of human ALK-expressing IL-3-independent cells (Schönherr et al., 2011b). For calculation of IC50 values, human ALK-expressing Ba/F3 cells were treated with varying concentrations of crizotinib for 3 days. Cell viability was tested with resazurin (Sigma, Stockholm, Sweden) (O'Brien et al., 2000). The IC50 value was determined for individual cell lines and the experiment was carried out at least three times independently, in triplicate.  Cell lysis and western blotting  PC12 cells expressing human ALK mutants were serum-starved for 36 hours prior to stimulation with 1 μg/ml of the activating mAb31 for 30 minutes (Moog-Lutz et al., 2005; Schönherr et al., 2010; Yang et al., 2007). IL-3-independent human ALK-expressing Ba/F3 cells were treated with crizotinib in complete medium for 3 hours. Cells were washed with PBSA and lysed in SDS-sample buffer. Pre-cleared lysates were run on SDS/PAGE, followed by western blotting using the indicated antibodies. ALK downstream activation was detected by pERK and pSTAT3(Y705); pan-ERK was used as loading control. ALK phosphorylation was analysed with pALK(Y1278) and pALK(Y1604) antibodies. Cell lysis and immunoblotting were performed according to described protocols (Schönherr et al., 2010).  Transformation assay  NIH3T3 cells (4.5×104) were seeded in collagen-coated 12-well plates prior to transfection for 6 hours with 1.75 μg pcDNA3.1-human ALK and 4.4 μl Lipofectamine 2000 (Invitrogen, Paisley, UK) in 0.3 ml Opti-MEM. The next day, 60% of the cells were transferred to six-well plates and maintained in DMEM with 10% heat-inactivated FBS and 0.5 mg/ml G418 until the cells reached confluency. Then, the cells were cultivated in DMEM with 5% heat-inactivated FBS and 0.25 mg/ml G418 for approximately 10 days. The cells were then fixed using methanol and stained with 0.25% crystal violet. The foci visible by the naked eye were subsequently analysed (Schönherr et al., 2011a).  Expression of human ALK mutants in Drosophila eye  The Gal4-UAS expression system was employed to express human ALK in the Drosophila eye (Brand and Perrimon, 1993). DNA encoding ALK1234T and ALK1464STOP were subcloned with EcoRI and NotI from pcDNA3-ALK1234T and pcDNA3-ALK1464STOP, and the resulting fragments were ligated into the EcoRI-NotI site of the pUAST vector. Transgenic flies carrying pUAST-ALK were generated by BestGene (Chino Hills, CA) and crossed with pGMR-Gal4 (Bloomington, stock no. 9146). Offspring were fixed with 4% glutaraldehyde in PBS overnight and subjected to electron microscopic analysis. To confirm the expression of human ALK, eye discs of third instar larva were stained with anti-ALK mAb153 (Schönherr et al., 2011a). Antibody binding was visualised using Cy3-labelled anti-mouse IgG (Amersham). The discs were mounted on slides in Fluoromount-G (Southern Biotechnology Associates, Birmingham, AL) and imaged using a Zeiss Apotome. 
1554||In the era of personalized medicine, understanding the molecular drivers of oncogenesis will be likely to trump morphological characteristics with regard to diagnostics, prognostics and choice of therapies. Identifying single driver mutations from billions of possibilities used to require substantial insight. However, as the cost of deep genomic sequencing goes down each month, clever tricks such as identifying family cohorts may not be as necessary. Family cohorts have driven genetic discovery for decades, including the identification of most tumor suppressor genes and many oncogenes.  Neuroblastoma is a lethal cancer of early childhood that essentially comes in two forms: highly malignant and locally manageable, or, to paraphrase Audrey Evans, an early leader in the field, the ‘good’ies and the ‘bad’ies. The underlying genes responsible for neuroblastoma remain largely unknown, despite the discovery of a handful of genetic changes that have been implicated in neuroblastoma development. For example, Brodeur et al.1 and Look et al.2 correlated MYCN oncogene amplification with aggressive tumors that have a high propensity for metastasis and that cause mortality. Also, very small subsets of familial neuroblastoma were associated with PHOX2B (encoding paired-like homeobox-2) mutations, but these mutations accounted for only very few families (reviewed in ref. 3).  To identify additional oncogenes that cause familial neuroblastoma, Mossé et al.4 returned to old-fashioned family trees. They collected the pedigrees of 20 families that showed an autosomal dominant pattern of neuroblastoma inheritance. Using a genome-wide scan for linkage at 6,000 single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs), these investigators identified a previously unknown series of germline mutations in the ALK gene. Some but not all of these families had genomic amplicons on chromosome 2 that also included MYCN. Among the mutations identified, most were predicted to lead to amino acid substitutions in the ALK tyrosine kinase domain (Fig. 1). Five of the eight pedigrees with germline mutation led to proteins with the same R1275Q mutation. A neuroblastoma cell line containing the R1275Q mutation showed ALK activation, which was indicated by tyrosine phosphorylation at ALK Y1604.  Figure 1 Figure 1 The ALK receptor kinase: its domains, pathways, mutations and inhibitors. The different domains of ALK are shown within their bordering amino-acid positions. The major mutations found by Mossé et al.4, Janoueix-Lerosey et al.5, Chen et al.6 and ... Three additional publications by Janoueix-Lerosey et al.5, Chen et al.6 and George et al.7 used SNP- or amplicon-based sequencing methods to identify similar mutations in ALK (Fig. 1). Each of the three studies showed the effects of a dominant oncogene with a similar pattern of results. Not all mutations resulted in constitutive kinase activity; in fact, only the minority showed clear increases in ALK autophosphorylation and downstream target activation, such as phosphorylation of AKT. The R1275Q and F1174L(V) mutations were shown to have constitutive tyrosine phosphorylation in cell lines that endogenously expressed these mutant forms of ALK, or when expressed in either 3T3 or Ba/F3 cells6,7.  ALK mutations in neuroblastoma tissues account for small survival differences in the whole population of people with neuroblastoma; this is due to their very low incidence in the population. Still, individuals who have neuroblastomas with the ALK F1174 mutation show a significantly worse outcome relative to the overall cohort, suggesting that this mutation has an important impact on malignant progression, whereas the presence of the ALK R1275Q mutation did not make a difference8. Stratification according to ALK expression showed that individuals with high ALK expression in their tumors had a significantly worse overall survival and disease-free survival than those with low tumor ALK expression. Although this type of single-gene analysis can be useful to direct treatment with a targeted therapy, genomic instability in the tumors leads to complex mixtures of clonal cells; therefore, multigene analyses can provide a more robust predictor of disease course and may ultimately provide a more complex insight into pathways activated during tumorigenesis and even predict candidate drug sensitivity8.  The functional role of these ALK mutations was addressed in each of the four studies4–7; however, a deeper understanding will be necessary to optimize any ALK-targeted therapy. Each study used either ALK expression followed by inhibition in non-neuroblastoma cell lines, RNAi-mediated reduction of endogenous ALK expression in cell lines or small-molecule kinase inhibitors. Generally, the results from these studies supported a dominant role for mutant ALK. However, in some cases, RNAi-mediated reduction of wild-type ALK expression also reduced neuroblastoma cell growth, suggesting that the level of ALK expression might be as important as an activating mutation in driving tumorigenesis.  A recent paper by Sasaki et al.9 identified ALK F1174L as a mutation that occurred naturally in an individual with inflammatory myoblastic tumor undergoing treatment with the dual MET and ALK kinase inhibitor crizotinib. This tumor contained a somatic RANBP2-ALK translocation; however, when the person experienced recurrent disease, one ALK locus contained an additional F1174L mutation. An evaluation of the inflammatory myoblastic tumor cells harboring ALK F1174L showed that they had higher levels of phosphorylated ALK along with increased downstream phosphorylation of AKT. Thus, this study supports that F1174L is an activating mutation of ALK.  ALK was independently identified as a molecular target in neuroblastoma by screening >600 human cancer cell lines with pharmacological inhibitors of ALK kinase activity10. This work provided a platform from which to launch inhibitor development when a transforming EML4-ALK fusion gene was identified as a major driver in a subset of approximately 5% of non–small-cell lung cancers11. Indeed, a first clinical trial with crizotinib showed striking efficacy in individuals with non–small-cell lung cancer, providing evidence that a well-defined activated pathway may be targeted effectively12 (Fig. 1). A recent structural study of the ALK kinase domain revealed differences from the same domain in related receptor kinases in the insulin receptor family that will be helpful in designing new inhibitors as resistance to the initial ALK inhibitors emerges13.  As higher ALK receptor expression in neuroblastoma coincides with poorer disease outcome8, overexpressed ALK may thus be a potentially valuable therapeutic target. Indeed, two proteins—pleiotrophin and the related midkine—have been shown to activate mammalian ALK14 through extracellular interactions with it (Fig. 1). Therefore, antibody strategies to target overexpressed ALK in neuroblastoma may be an attractive additional approach. Antibody therapy may even act syn ergistically with small-molecule tyrosine kinase inhibitors.  It is clear that targeting ALK is now open season for the development of new therapies for neuroblastoma, as well as other cancers. The insights gained from ongoing trials are likely to directly benefit both subgroups of individuals whose tumors are driven by ALK and, in general, targeted approaches to cancer treatment. Obviously, genetic mutations can reveal new drivers and pathways activated in cancer and may present new therapeutic opportunities. However, fully validating any new target is a challenge at a new frontier of a deadly cancer. Genetic studies have established anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK), a cell surface receptor tyrosine kinase, as a tractable molecular target in neuroblastoma. We describe comprehensive genomic, biochemical, and computational analyses of ALK mutations across 1596 diagnostic neuroblastoma samples. ALK tyrosine kinase domain mutations occurred in 8% of samples; at three hotspots plus 13 minor sites – and correlated significantly with poorer survival in high- and intermediate-risk neuroblastoma. Biochemical and computational studies distinguished oncogenic (constitutively activating) from non-oncogenic mutations and allowed robust computational prediction of their effects. We also established differential in vitro crizotinib sensitivity of mutated variants. Our studies identify ALK genomic status as a clinically important therapeutic stratification tool in neuroblastoma, and will allow tailoring of ALK-targeted therapy to specific mutations.  Go to: Introduction Neuroblastomas are embryonal tumors that arise from the sympathetic nervous system, and represent the most frequently diagnosed malignancy in the first year of life (Cheung and Dyer, 2013; Maris, 2010). Despite improvements in treatment over recent decades, cure rates for patients with high-risk neuroblastoma (Maris, 2010) lag significantly behind those of other common childhood cancers (Smith et al., 2010). Current treatments rely on dose-intensive chemotherapy, radiation therapy, and immunotherapeutic targeting of the disialoganglioside GD2 (Maris, 2010; Yu et al., 2010). Most recent clinical studies in neuroblastoma have focused on escalating dose intensity in both induction and consolidation therapy, with evidence that this improves outcome (Pearson et al., 2008). The potential long-term adverse effects of increasing treatment intensity on survivors of this childhood cancer are a major concern (Hobbie et al., 2008; Smith et al., 2010), however – making it imperative that more effective treatment strategies are developed.  One promising avenue for targeted therapy in neuroblastoma focuses on anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK), a cell-surface neural receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK) expressed at significant levels only in the developing embryonic and neonatal brain (Iwahara et al., 1997; Morris et al., 1997). Germline mutations in intact ALK were recently identified as the major cause of hereditary neuroblastoma (Mossé et al., 2008). These mutations cause single amino acid missense substitutions in the ALK tyrosine kinase domain (TKD) that promote constitutive, ligand-independent, activation of this RTK. Somatically acquired ALK-activating mutations are also found as oncogenic drivers in neuroblastoma (Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Hallberg and Palmer, 2013; Janoueix-Lerosey et al., 2008; Mossé et al., 2008). In addition, ALK gene amplification imparts an oncogenic dependency in some cases (Janoueix-Lerosey et al., 2008; Mossé et al., 2008). ALK has thus emerged as a tractable oncogene for targeted therapy in neuroblastoma. The same tyrosine kinase is also found in oncogenic ALK fusion proteins that arise from chromosomal translocations in non-small-cell lung cancers (NSCLC) (Soda et al., 2007) and anaplastic large cell lymphomas (Morris et al., 1994), for example, motivating development of small molecule ALK kinase inhibitors. Dramatic response rates to crizotinib (an ALK/Met/Ros1 inhibitor) were seen in pretreated patients with advanced relapsed/refractory NSCLC harboring ALK rearrangements (Kwak et al., 2010; Shaw and Engelman, 2013). These studies validated ALK as a therapeutic target, and led to the expedited FDA approval of crizotinib for ALK-translocated NSCLC.  Rapid clinical translation of findings with ALK in neuroblastoma prompted a phase 1 trial of crizotinib (NCT00939770) in patients with recurrent or refractory cancer. Results from this trial highlighted the differential sensitivity to ALK kinase inhibition of ALK-translocated versus ALK-mutated disease (Mossé et al., 2013). The study also underlined the need for further detailed investigation of ALK mutations in order to optimize clinical application of ALK inhibitors in neuroblastoma. To achieve this goal a detailed analysis of the spectrum of ALK mutations, their clinical significance in neuroblastoma, and their biochemical properties is essential. The resulting data will underpin future approaches for identifying patients likely to benefit from ALK inhibition in neuroblastoma, and for predicting which newly emerging mutations are clinically relevant.  Go to: Results To examine the spectrum of ALK mutations in neuroblastoma, we analyzed germline and somatic ALK DNA alterations – at diagnosis – in samples from a cohort of 1596 neuroblastoma patients assembled in collaboration with the Children's Oncology Group (COG; Table 1).  Table 1 Table 1 Clinical, Genomic, and Survival Characteristics of Overall Patient Cohorta ALK mutations  Sequencing of ALK exons 21-28, encompassing the TKD-encoding region, identified 126 diagnostic samples with at least one mutation, corresponding to 8% of subjects (Table 1). Putative disease-associated mutations were distributed throughout the ALK TKD (Figure 1; Table S1), with an additional mutation at R1060 (between the TKD and transmembrane domain). Three additional ALK TKD sequence variations (R1231Q, I1250T, and D1349H) were observed that had previously been listed in the NCBI database of single nucleotide polymorphisms (dbSNP), but with no known clinical significance or annotation in COSMIC (Forbes et al., 2011).  Figure 1 Figure 1 Distribution of ALK mutations in tumor samples from neuroblastoma patients Three ‘hotspot’ residues accounted for 85% of mutations (Figure 1, Table 1): R1275 (43%), F1174 (30%), and F1245 (12%), consistent with previous studies (Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Hallberg and Palmer, 2013; Janoueix-Lerosey et al., 2008; Mossé et al., 2008). R1275 was substituted with glutamine or leucine in 3.4% of tumors (95% CI: 2.5, 4.3%), F1174 was altered (to L, I, V, C, or S) in 2.4% of tumors (95% CI: 1.6, 3.0%), and F1245 (to L, I, V, or C) in 0.9% (95% CI: 0.5, 1.4%). Two tumor samples harbored mutations at I1170 (to N or S), and another two at I1171 (to N). Single incidences of substitution were seen at a further 15 positions, of which 7 represent mutations not found in current databases (Table S1). Matched constitutional DNA was available for 88 of the 126 ALK-mutated samples, and contained the observed ALK substitution (indicating its presence in the germline) in just 7 cases. Although no information about family history is available, this is an expected rate based on previous analyses (Knudson and Strong, 1972; Mossé et al., 2008). Two were germline R1275Q mutations, and the remaining 5 examples were R1060H, I1183T, L1204F, R1231Q (also in dbSNP), and I1250T (also in dbSNP) mutations (Table S1).  ALK mutations were found in 10.9% of MYCN-amplified tumors, versus 7.2% of those without MYCN amplification. Mutations seen alongside MYCN amplification were biased towards F1174 substitutions (41% in MYCN-amplified cases compared with 30% overall). Further, MYCN amplification occurred in 39% of F1174-mutated tumors, compared with an expected overall frequency of 21% (p<0.01). These data support previous suggestions that F1174 mutations are over-represented in MYCN-amplified tumors, but indicate a less skewed distribution than reported earlier (De Brouwer et al., 2010). Consistent with earlier results, however, patients with both amplified MYCN and F1174-mutated ALK had a significantly worse event-free survival (EFS, p<0.0001) than patients with neither.  ALK copy number  Copy number variation at the ALK locus was observed in 17% of cases for which it was measured (Table 1). Gain of the ALK locus (3-10 copies) was seen in 195 cases (15%), with high-level amplification more rare (24 samples), and whole gene deletion rarer still (6 samples). The ALK gene is located 13.2 megabases centromeric of MYCN. ALK amplification occurred concurrently with MYCN amplification in all but one case – consistent with a previous report (Bagci et al., 2012). Accordingly, since MYCN amplification identifies a patient as a member of the high-risk group (Maris, 2010), ALK amplification occurred exclusively in this group (Table S2) and was associated with inferior outcome (5-year overall survival/OS of 23%, versus 48% in high-risk patients without ALK amplification, p=0.03; Table S3). In the 108/126 ALK-mutated tumors for which we also had copy number data, ALK mutation and high-level gene amplification were mutually exclusive (except for one G1286 variant). Further, 13% of ALK-mutated cases had low-level gain of the ALK locus, similar to the percentage seen in the overall cohort. None demonstrated allelic deletion.  ALK aberration and ALK mutation are prognostic biomarkers of inferior survival  ALK mutations were observed in tumors from all clinical risk groups, and were more commonly observed in those from older patients (Table S2). Across the whole cohort, presence of an ALK aberration (mutation or amplification) correlated with reduced EFS and OS (Figure 2A,B) – as did ALK mutation (Table 1). Presence of any ALK aberration also correlated with reduced EFS and OS in the high-risk group (Figure 2C,D). In univariable analysis, presence of an ALK mutation was also correlated with reduced EFS in intermediate-risk patients (Table S3), a heterogeneous group consisting mainly of very young patients with metastatic disease, or patients of any age with large, unresectable primary tumors. Patient outcome did not differ significantly according to location of the mutation in any analysis. Whereas robust biomarkers to assign outcome probability have been characterized for patients with low- and high-risk disease, the most appropriate therapy for patients with intermediate-risk disease is less well-defined, and our findings suggest that ALK genetic status can be used to identify cases within this group with the highest risk of treatment failure.  Figure 2 Figure 2 Event-free and overall survival based on the presence or absence of an ALK aberration In multivariable analysis of the overall cohort, presence of an ALK mutation was found to have an independent influence on survival, with a 1.4-fold greater risk of an event (or hazard ratio, HR) within 5 years (95% CI: 1.1, 1.9) compared to cases without an ALK mutation (Table 2). Similarly, independent statistically significant correlation with outcome was seen in three separate multivariable models (adjusted for other known prognostic factors) for:  Any ALK aberration (p=0.0006; HR=1.4, 95% CI: 1.2, 1.7) ALK copy number gain (p=0.04; HR=1.3, 95% CI: 1.0, 1.6) ALK amplification (p=0.003; HR=2.2, 95% CI: 1.3, 3.6). Table 2 Table 2 Multivariable Analyses Testing the Independence of Correlations between ALK mutation Status and EFS In a multivariable model adjusted for histologic category (Table 2), ALK mutation status showed statistically significant correlation with reduced EFS in both the intermediate-risk and high-risk patient groups – although not in the low-risk group, again arguing for the utility of ALK mutation status in clinical evaluation.  Predicting signaling consequences of ALK TKD mutations  Our results establish that the presence of an ALK mutation in neuroblastoma is associated with a more aggressive tumor phenotype. Not all ALK substitutions observed in neuroblastoma patients are likely to be oncogenic drivers, however. It will be important in refining therapeutic ALK mutation-based patient stratification to predict as they are observed which mutations are truly drivers that cause ligand-independent ALK signaling, and which are ‘passengers’ or variants of unknown significance. Current methods for predicting functional consequences of patient-derived mutations fall short – especially for activating mutations in kinases. Algorithms such as PolyPhen-2 (Adzhubei et al., 2010), SIFT (Kumar et al., 2009) and the consensus classifier PredictSNP (Bendl et al., 2014) estimate the likelihood of a given mutation having a deleterious effect based on sequence conservation and other criteria. PolyPhen-2 or SIFT (or both) predict that every single ALK substitution listed in Table S1 adversely affects protein function (or is ‘damaging’), except R1060H and R1231Q (a SNP). It seems highly unlikely given our understanding of kinases that even the ALK TKD C-lobe mutations L1204F, T1343I, and D1349H (also in dbSNP) are oncogenic. Moreover, the logic of conservation-based algorithms is not appropriate for predicting gain-of-function mutations in oncogenic kinase domains (Gnad et al., 2013). Indeed, a recent analysis of >400 activating substitutions (Molina-Vila et al., 2014) revealed that most driver mutations in oncogenic kinases do not occur at conserved residues at all, and that their accurate prediction will require explicit attention to kinase regulation mechanisms. Motivated by these considerations, we assessed the effects of all ALK mutations defined here (Figure 1 and Table S1) on in vitro kinase activity – to guide development of better prediction algorithms.  Biochemical effects of clinically-observed ALK TKD mutations  We first monitored autophosphorylation of purified mutated ALK TKDs using native gel electrophoresis (Figure S1) as described (Bresler et al., 2011). The well-studied F1174L and R1275Q mutations greatly accelerated TKD autophosphorylation as expected. So did substitutions at 5 of the other positions listed in Table S1 (M1166, I1170, I1171, F1245, and Y1278), as did the previously reported G1128A and R1192P germline neuroblastoma mutations (Bourdeaut et al., 2011; Janoueix-Lerosey et al., 2008; Mossé et al., 2008). Mutations at T1151, L1196, and G1286 also promoted modest constitutive activation. By contrast, substitutions at five other sites (I1183, A1200, R1231, T1343, and D1349) and those found in dbSNP (R1231Q and D1349H) failed to activate the isolated TKD (Figure S1), signifying that these are unlikely to be clinically significant. D1270G-mutated ALK TKD failed to become autophosphorylated at all, suggesting that this is an inactivating mutation – as expected since D1270 lies in the conserved DFG motif essential for Mg2+-ATP binding to kinases. We did not analyze ALK TKDs harboring L1204F, L1240V, or I1250T mutations in this assay, since they were poorly expressed as recombinant proteins.  For more quantitative analyses, we assayed the ability of the mutated TKDs to phosphorylate a peptide corresponding to ALK's activation loop, and determined values for kcat, KM, ATP, and kcat/KM in vitro. We analyzed both fully auto-phosphorylated ALK TKDs and non-phosphorylated proteins (phosphatase treated as described in Supplemental Experimental Procedures). Non-phosphorylated ALK TKD represents the ‘basal’ kinase state for each receptor variant, whereas autophosphorylated ALK TKDs represent the corresponding activated states – with kcat increased by ∼45-fold in the case of wild-type ALK (Bresler et al., 2011).  Effects of mutations on basal activity of non-phosphorylated ALK TKD The effects of mutations on non-phosphorylated ALK TKD activity vary according to their location in the kinase. F1174 and F1245 mutations have the strongest effect, increasing kcat by 36-39 fold (Figure 3A; Table S4) – close to the 45-fold increase caused by autophosphorylation of wild-type ALK TKD (Bresler et al., 2011). F1174 and F1245 contribute to a cluster of phenylalanine side-chains (red in Figure 3: the ‘Phe core’) that normally stabilizes the autoinhibited TKD conformation (Bossi et al., 2010; Lee et al., 2010). Mutating these residues will destabilize ALK's autoinhibitory interactions and promote activation. Almost all of the other significantly activating mutations (increasing kcat by >10-fold) occur either at residues in the αC-helix (M1166, I1170, I1171) or in the short α-helix within the activation loop of the inactive TKD (R1275, Y1278). These residues (blue in Figure 3) all participate in autoinhibitory interactions between helix αC and the activation loop α-helix that normally stabilize the inactive conformation of non-phosphorylated ALK TKD (Bossi et al., 2010; Lee et al., 2010), and are disrupted by the mutations analyzed here. Mutations in the N-lobe (green) or phosphate-binding P-loop (cyan) have much smaller effects on ALK TKD (Figure 3A). The only exception is the germline R1192P mutation (which increases kcat of non-phosphorylated ALK TKD by 15 fold). Mutations in the ALK TKD active site (magenta) or C-lobe (grey) have little or no influence on kcat (<3-fold increase), except for the L1196M ‘gatekeeper’ mutation, which increases kcat by nearly 5 fold. Peptide phosphorylation studies further confirmed that the D1270G variant is inactive (Table S4), and revealed a reduced activity for the I1250T (SNP) variant, consistent with previous work (Schönherr et al., 2011a).  Figure 3 Figure 3 kcat and KM, ATP values for mutated ALK TKD variants KM, ATP values for non-phosphorylated ALK TKD variants (discussed in more detail below) all fell within a narrow range from 0.13 mM (wild-type) to 0.39 mM (L1196M) – suggesting that all variants are saturated with ATP under physiological conditions (Figure 3B). Accordingly, catalytic efficiencies (kcat/KM, ATP) for non-phosphorylated ALK TKD variants (Figure S2A) follow very similar trends to those seen for kcat. The same is true for kcat/KM, peptide values (Figure S2B).  Effects of neuroblastoma mutations on activity of fully autophosphorylated ALK TKD The effects of patient-derived ALK mutations on the activity of fully autophosphorylated ALK TKD (prepared as described in Supplemental Experimental Procedures) were much more modest. With the exception of the I1170N variant (for which kcat was just 35% of wild-type), no variant was altered by more than 2-fold in kcat (Figure 3C, Table S5). Overall, therefore, neuroblastoma-derived mutations have their greatest effects on the activity of non-phosphorylated ALK TKD, promoting its constitutive autophosphorylation and thus ligand-independent signaling by the intact receptor.  Transforming ability of mutated ALK variants  To assess how biochemical characteristics relate to transforming ability we measured the ability of intact ALK variants harboring the same TKD mutations to induce focus formation in NIH 3T3 cells (Figure 4A). As shown in Figure 4B and C, quantitation of focus formation assays (Table S6) reveals a remarkably close correspondence between transforming potential and in vitro kcat value for the corresponding non-phosphorylated TKD variants (Figure 3A). A plot of transforming ability against kcat for non-phosphorylated TKD (Figure 4C) yields a straight line with correlation coefficient (r) of 0.95 (p<0.0001). Relative outliers were G1128A (in the P-loop) and L1196M (in the active site), which both appeared relatively more transforming than suggested by in vitro biochemical data, and M1166R, which appeared less transforming than expected by this simple correlation. Transforming potential correlates with kcat of the non-phosphorylated TKD slightly better than it does with either measure of catalytic efficiency: kcat/KM, ATP (r=0.88) or kcat/KM, peptide (r=0.89). By contrast, when transforming ability is plotted against kcat for phosphorylated TKD variants, the slope does not deviate significantly from zero (p=0.68), indicating no correlation (Figure 4C, Figure S2C).  Figure 4 Figure 4 Transformation potential of ALK mutants from NIH 3T3 focus formation assays Taken together, the data in Figures 3 and and44 argue that activity of the non-phosphorylated ALK TKD is an excellent predictor of ALK's transforming ability in NIH 3T3 cells. An increase of just 4.6 – 4.8-fold in the kcat of non-phosphorylated ALK TKD appears sufficient for NIH 3T3 cell transformation, judging from results with the G1128A (cyan) and L1196M (magenta) variants (Figure 4, Table S4). The one exception to this correlation is the N-lobe T1151M variant, for which a relatively reduced kcat/KM, peptide value (Figure S2B, Table S4) may explain failure to transform NIH 3T3 cells (presumably because of elevated KM, peptide). It is important to note that none of the three ALK mutations previously reported in dbSNP (R1231Q, I1250T, and D1349H, all in the C-lobe) were associated with ALK activation in transformation or biochemical assays (Figures 3 and and4);4); these are silent or passenger mutations. Moreover, analysis of transforming ability in Figure 4B (as a measure of oncogenicity) paints a very different functional picture from that predicted by PolyPhen-2 or SIFT across the spectrum of ALK mutations. These algorithms predict that all mutations (except R1060H and R1231Q) are damaging or affect function – whereas our experimental analysis shows that 11 of the 24 mutations have no significant activating effect. ALK is unlikely to be an important driver in neuroblastoma cases with any of these non-activating mutations, and crizotinib is very unlikely to be therapeutically useful in these contexts. The ‘silent’ mutations account for one of every ∼11 of ALK-mutated patients, and it is important to identify them.  Crizotinib sensitivities of recombinant ALK TKD variants  At least two of the ALK driver mutations observed in neuroblastoma (F1174L and L1196M) have also arisen as acquired crizotinib resistance mutations in tumors driven by oncogenic ALK fusion proteins (Choi et al., 2010; Sasaki et al., 2010). These findings suggest that primary resistance will be a major concern in crizotinib treatment of ALK-mutated neuroblastoma, as we have discussed previously (Bresler et al., 2011). A mere ∼3-fold reduction in KM, ATP appeared sufficient to impair in vivo crizotinib sensitivity of F1174L-mutated ALK when compared with the R1275Q variant, consistent with the appearance of F1174L as an acquired resistance mutation in both a crizotinib-treated inflammatory myofibroblastic tumor (Sasaki et al., 2010) and in vitro screens for crizotinib-resistance mutations in EML4-ALK (Zhang et al., 2011). Table 3 lists KM, ATP values for the other non-phosphorylated ALK TKD variants described here. Based solely on reduced KM, ATP values (as for F1174L), and assuming unchanged crizotinib affinity, the G1128A, M1166R, F1245C, F1245V, or Y1278S variants would be suggested to be relatively crizotinib resistant, whereas the I1170N, I1170S, I1171N, and L1196M (gatekeeper) variants would be argued to resemble R1275Q in being sensitive to crizotinib (with relatively larger KM, ATP values). R1192P is intermediate.  Table 3 Table 3 Crizotinib Sensitivities of Non-phosphorylated ALK-TKD Mutants at 2.0 mM ATPa Direct measurement of crizotinib IC50 values in vitro (at 2 mM ATP), however, reveals that the correlation with KM, ATP is not simple. The L1196M (gatekeeper) variant is resistant to crizotinib (Figure S3) despite its high KM, ATP – indicating a differential effect of this mutation on ATP and crizotinib binding, as expected from its appearance as an acquired resistance mutation (Katayama et al., 2011). Similarly, I1171N-mutated ALK is less crizotinib sensitive in vitro than a simple view of ATP competition (and KM, ATP) would suggest – further supported by the fact that mutations at I1171 emerged alongside F1174 mutations in screens for crizotinib-resistant variants of EML4-ALK (Zhang et al., 2011). By contrast, the M1166R, F1245V, and F1245C variants are more sensitive to crizotinib in vitro than simple consideration of KM, ATP would suggest – resembling the R1275Q variant in our in vitro crizotinib inhibition studies (Table 3) and NIH 3T3 focus assays (not shown). This finding is particularly important given that F1245 is the third most commonly mutated site in neuroblastoma, accounting for ∼12% of mutations. Our data suggest that cases with F1245 mutations should respond to crizotinib just as well as R1275Q-mutated tumors.  The data in Table 3 make it clear that the individual ALK TKD mutations affect binding of ATP and crizotinib in different ways, and assessment of IC50 values for a selection of mutations in NIH 3T3 focus assays (not shown) concurs. For example, the L1196M mutation impairs crizotinib binding more than ATP binding – thus causing resistance to the drug. It will therefore be important to compare the relative abilities of next generation ALK inhibitors to inhibit the variants studied here. One new inhibitor, called ceritinib, was recently shown to inhibit ALK variants with crizotinib-resistant L1196M, or I1171T mutations (Friboulet et al., 2014), but not to overcome resistance of an F1174 mutation. Other inhibitors are also known to have differential effects on crizotinib-resistance mutations acquired in ALK-rearranged lung cancers (Johnson et al., 2014; Sakamoto et al., 2011). The data in Table 3 suggest that neuroblastoma patients with ALK-activating M1166R, I1170N/S or F1245 mutations should respond to crizotinib just as well as R1275Q-mutated patients. Patients with I1171 or L1196 mutations are likely to respond better to ceritinib, and those with F1174L (and possible other) mutations might be more responsive to the macrocyclic inhibitor PF-06463922 (Johnson et al., 2014). Y1278, R1192 and G1128 mutations appear to be intermediate between these two groups, and comparative studies of ALK inhibitors are needed to determine which inhibitor would be best for these cases.  Computational analysis of mutated ALK TKDs  The poor performance of existing informatics-based approaches in distinguishing activating from non-activating amino acid substitutions prompted us to investigate structure-based computational methods for assessing newly emerging ALK mutations. Importantly, apart from already published data, the computational analysis was done without prior knowledge of biochemical results emerging from this study. As described in Supplemental Experimental Procedures, we simulated molecular dynamics (MD) trajectories for the inactive conformation of all mutated ALK TKD variants, and for wild-type ALK TKD, in both active and inactive conformations. The resulting MD trajectories were analyzed for three key structural properties:  i). Hydrogen bonding network Distinct sets of key intramolecular hydrogen bonds characterize the active and inactive ALK TKD configurations. Those that maintain the (autoinhibited) positions of the activation loop and αC helix in the inactive TKD (in Figure 3D) are absent in the active structure. A simple scoring function (see Supplemental Experimental Procedures) was used to determine whether each mutation promotes a more ‘active-like’ or ‘inactive-like’ hydrogen-bonding network (Table 4).  Table 4 Table 4 Computational Prediction of Effects of ALK TKD Mutations ii). Hydrophobic interaction network As mentioned above, key autoinhibitory interactions are stabilized in the inactive conformation by residues with hydrophobic side-chains – notably those in the Phe-core (red in Figure 3D) and contacts between the αC-helix and short activation-loop helix (blue in Figure 3D). Disruption of these autoinhibitory hydrophobic interactions can be assessed readily by monitoring the solvent-accessible surface area (SASA) of relevant residues throughout the MD trajectories. If SASA increases as a result of a neuroblastoma mutation, the mutation is classed as ‘activating’. To further determine whether observed changes in SASA favor the active state, free energy perturbation (FEP) simulations were used to determine whether each mutation significantly destabilizes the inactive state relative to the active state (in which case it is classed as ‘activating’).  iii). Principal component analysis (PCA) PCA reveals correlated global motions across the MD trajectory. The top 10 dominant modes are considerably different (greater) in the active conformation than in inactive ALK TKD (indicating greater motion), as seen for other kinases (Shih et al., 2011). As outlined in Supplemental Experimental Procedures, each mutant with a top eigenvalue above 200 Å2 is scored as activating (indicating destabilization of key autoinhibitory interactions).  A mutation is predicted to be ‘activating’ overall if it scores as such in one or more of the three criteria outlined above. As shown in Table 4, predictions for each mutated ALK TKD variant studied here agree quite well with our experimental studies. Moreover, the computational analysis suggests a possible mechanism of activation for each mutation, i.e., by perturbing hydrophilic interactions, hydrophobic interactions, or global conformation. All of the mutations that elevate kcat of non-phosphorylated ALK TKD by over 5-fold were predicted correctly except two (I1171N, and F1245C), as listed in Table 4. Perhaps more importantly, our computational analysis correctly predicts the majority of mutations that are not activating – thus showing its value in distinguishing passenger from driver mutations and its potential utility for patient stratification. There are a few exceptions, however. The T1151M mutation was designated as activating in our computational analysis, but did not transform NIH 3T3 cells (Figure 4). Although biochemical analysis indicated an elevated kcat for this variant, it has a reduced kcat/KM, peptide, apparently arising from an elevated KM, peptide that would not be captured computationally. The I1250T and D1270G mutations – both also predicted to be activating using our computational approach – are special cases. D1270 is the conserved DFG aspartate, and loss of its side-chain removes a functional group essential for Mg2+ binding to the TKD. The I1250T mutation impairs protein stability and/or folding (as assessed by poor expression) in a way that the model cannot predict, so no activating effect is seen experimentally. The computational analysis also failed to predict three transforming mutations (Table 4): F1245C, I1171N, and L1196M (the gatekeeper mutation), for reasons that are less clear. Overall, however, our computational approach correctly predicts 75% of the transforming mutations and – importantly – over 75% of silent mutations (excepting special cases). By contrast, PolyPhen-2 (Table 4, right-most column) predicts only one silent mutation correctly and is plagued with false positives. It is important to reiterate that our computational studies were undertaken with no prior knowledge of the results shown in Figures 3 and and44 (with the exception of previously published results).  Go to: Discussion Discovery of activating mutations in the intact ALK gene as drivers in neuroblastoma provided the first example of a pediatric cancer caused by germline mutations in an oncogene, and the only druggable mutation in a pediatric solid tumor. We characterized the spectrum and frequency of germline and somatic alterations in ALK across all neuroblastoma disease subsets in 1596 patients. This dataset is powered to identify ALK mutations in neuroblastoma that, while rare, are still clinically relevant, and to have sufficient power to determine the prognostic capability of ALK alterations within each neuroblastoma risk group (high, intermediate, and low). In addition, cataloguing ALK mutations in these tumors allowed us to correlate sequence variations with oncogenic potency. Some of the observed mutations are unlikely to be oncogenic, and the activated variants differ in their sensitivity to crizotinib – with potentially important therapeutic implications. In multivariable models of the overall cohort, and within each risk group, both the presence of an ALK mutation (except within the low-risk group) and the presence of any ALK aberration were shown to correlate independently with worse EFS. These findings illustrate the value of determining ALK status for prognostic patient stratification, and also support the potential importance of ALK as a therapeutic target.  ALK mutations were observed in 8% of neuroblastoma patients, and span the entire spectrum of disease, including INSS Stage 4 disease, congenital cases, and adolescents/young adults. The fact that ALK mutations occur at the highest frequency (17%) in patients older than 10 suggests differences in the occurrence of genetic mutations based on age, reminiscent of the recently reported age distribution of ATRX mutations in neuroblastoma (Cheung et al., 2012). Within the high-risk subset of neuroblastoma patients the overall frequency of ALK aberration is 14% (10% mutation, 4% amplification). High-risk patients have the poorest outcomes, with approximately only 50% OS despite intensive multi-modal therapy including chemotherapy, surgery, myeloablative conditioning with bone marrow transplant, radiation therapy and immunotherapy plus retinoic acid (Maris, 2010) – making these patients excellent candidates for ALK-targeted therapy. Within the low- and intermediate-risk groups, the frequency of ALK aberration is 6% and 8% respectively. In low-risk cases, therapy usually involves observation, with or without surgical intervention, whereas patients with intermediate-risk disease are treated with conventional cytotoxic chemotherapy and are at risk for the associated late effects. Our results suggest an important opportunity within the intermediate-risk group to identify those with an activating ALK mutation for treatment with ALK inhibitors and de-escalation of traditional cytotoxic therapy.  Of the 24 different patient-derived ALK mutations assessed, only 13 drove transformation of NIH 3T3 cells. Where our studies overlap with other analyses of transformation by ALK variants found in neuroblastoma, they are in complete agreement (Chand et al., 2013; George et al., 2008; Schönherr et al., 2011a; Schönherr et al., 2011b). Importantly, every mutation that promoted transformation also constitutively activated the ALK TKD, with remarkable correlation between transforming activity and in vitro kcat value for the non-phosphorylated TKD. Eleven of the 24 mutations (representing 9% of ALK-mutated patients in this study) appeared silent or even inactivating. Of the activating mutations, in vitro analyses suggest that only 6 (including R1275Q) will be sensitive to inhibition by crizotinib in vivo. Some others are likely to respond better to next generation inhibitors that appear capable of inhibiting L1196M and I1171 variants (ceritinib) or F1174 variants (PF-06463922). Further comparative studies with these inhibitors are required to identify which is optimal for each variant.  Using a molecular dynamics (MD)-based computational approach, we showed that we can predict which mutations are activating – and more importantly which are not activating – with a success rate that greatly exceeds methods such as SIFT, PolyPhen-2, PredictSNP, and others. For example, our method correctly (and blindly) predicted the consequences of all newly described ALK mutations presented in this report, with D1270G as the one exception (where a catalytically crucial residue is mutated). It is important to note that our computational analysis assesses kinase activation, and not transformation itself – but our biochemical data indicate that elevating kcat of non-phosphorylated ALK TKD by 4.6-fold or more causes the receptor to be transforming. Our computational analysis of ALK mutations has significant promise as a clinical tool, and will improve with further training and testing using additional clinically observed (and experimental) mutations. It will also be important to apply computational approaches similar to those that we have employed for EGFR (Park et al., 2012) in efforts to predict inhibitor sensitivity.  Our findings allow us to formulate molecular diagnostic screening recommendations for newly diagnosed neuroblastoma patients, which will be important in clinical evaluation of ALK inhibitors for childhood cancer. We demonstrate that ALK is a predictive therapeutic biomarker of disease status, and also provides a therapeutic target in a select group of patients. With additional molecularly targeted therapeutics and computational models that leverage biochemical understanding to predict the effect of newly emerging ALK mutations, we should now be able to make upfront predictions about which patients are most likely to respond to crizotinib or other ALK inhibitors and (importantly) identify those that will not. Related approaches have been successful with imatinib in chronic myeloid leukemia, gefitinib in NSCLC, and most recently crizotinib in ALK-translocated NSCLC – although functional stratification of individual mutations along the lines described here has not yet been achieved. We are now poised to develop a responder hypothesis as part of a therapeutic strategy that incorporates pharmacologic ALK inhibition into the backbone of contemporary treatment regimens in neuroblastoma. Our phase 1 trial of crizotinib showed some promising responses even in heavily pretreated patients with ALK mutations with recurrent or refractory late-stage disease (Mossé et al., 2013), despite the facts that these heavily pre-treated patients are frequently multi-drug resistant, and also show an increased prevalence of p53 mutations at relapse (Carr-Wilkinson et al., 2010) – confounding factors that were not assessed. In newly diagnosed patients, where these issues are not relevant (and p53 mutations are rare), we expect upfront ALK-targeted treatment guided by the results described here to yield dramatically improved results.  In addition, our findings will help advance the management of individuals with neuroblastoma predisposition. Individuals with a germline ALK variation of unknown significance may have siblings who also harbor these variants, emphasizing the importance of understanding which alleles are indeed risk-alleles so as to determine their risk of developing neuroblastoma, and to offer appropriate clinical screening. No models have yet been established for effective early detection strategies or improving clinical outcomes when germline ALK variations are detected. Implementing clinical surveillance strategies for unaffected children (possibly even adults) with neuroblastoma carrying a germline ALK variant should be guided by data such as those presented here, recognizing the implications of the use of predictive genetic screening and surveillance practices and the absence of evidence of benefit from early detection in these individuals.  
1555||In the era of personalized medicine, understanding the molecular drivers of oncogenesis will be likely to trump morphological characteristics with regard to diagnostics, prognostics and choice of therapies. Identifying single driver mutations from billions of possibilities used to require substantial insight. However, as the cost of deep genomic sequencing goes down each month, clever tricks such as identifying family cohorts may not be as necessary. Family cohorts have driven genetic discovery for decades, including the identification of most tumor suppressor genes and many oncogenes.  Neuroblastoma is a lethal cancer of early childhood that essentially comes in two forms: highly malignant and locally manageable, or, to paraphrase Audrey Evans, an early leader in the field, the ‘good’ies and the ‘bad’ies. The underlying genes responsible for neuroblastoma remain largely unknown, despite the discovery of a handful of genetic changes that have been implicated in neuroblastoma development. For example, Brodeur et al.1 and Look et al.2 correlated MYCN oncogene amplification with aggressive tumors that have a high propensity for metastasis and that cause mortality. Also, very small subsets of familial neuroblastoma were associated with PHOX2B (encoding paired-like homeobox-2) mutations, but these mutations accounted for only very few families (reviewed in ref. 3).  To identify additional oncogenes that cause familial neuroblastoma, Mossé et al.4 returned to old-fashioned family trees. They collected the pedigrees of 20 families that showed an autosomal dominant pattern of neuroblastoma inheritance. Using a genome-wide scan for linkage at 6,000 single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs), these investigators identified a previously unknown series of germline mutations in the ALK gene. Some but not all of these families had genomic amplicons on chromosome 2 that also included MYCN. Among the mutations identified, most were predicted to lead to amino acid substitutions in the ALK tyrosine kinase domain (Fig. 1). Five of the eight pedigrees with germline mutation led to proteins with the same R1275Q mutation. A neuroblastoma cell line containing the R1275Q mutation showed ALK activation, which was indicated by tyrosine phosphorylation at ALK Y1604.  Figure 1 Figure 1 The ALK receptor kinase: its domains, pathways, mutations and inhibitors. The different domains of ALK are shown within their bordering amino-acid positions. The major mutations found by Mossé et al.4, Janoueix-Lerosey et al.5, Chen et al.6 and ... Three additional publications by Janoueix-Lerosey et al.5, Chen et al.6 and George et al.7 used SNP- or amplicon-based sequencing methods to identify similar mutations in ALK (Fig. 1). Each of the three studies showed the effects of a dominant oncogene with a similar pattern of results. Not all mutations resulted in constitutive kinase activity; in fact, only the minority showed clear increases in ALK autophosphorylation and downstream target activation, such as phosphorylation of AKT. The R1275Q and F1174L(V) mutations were shown to have constitutive tyrosine phosphorylation in cell lines that endogenously expressed these mutant forms of ALK, or when expressed in either 3T3 or Ba/F3 cells6,7.  ALK mutations in neuroblastoma tissues account for small survival differences in the whole population of people with neuroblastoma; this is due to their very low incidence in the population. Still, individuals who have neuroblastomas with the ALK F1174 mutation show a significantly worse outcome relative to the overall cohort, suggesting that this mutation has an important impact on malignant progression, whereas the presence of the ALK R1275Q mutation did not make a difference8. Stratification according to ALK expression showed that individuals with high ALK expression in their tumors had a significantly worse overall survival and disease-free survival than those with low tumor ALK expression. Although this type of single-gene analysis can be useful to direct treatment with a targeted therapy, genomic instability in the tumors leads to complex mixtures of clonal cells; therefore, multigene analyses can provide a more robust predictor of disease course and may ultimately provide a more complex insight into pathways activated during tumorigenesis and even predict candidate drug sensitivity8.  The functional role of these ALK mutations was addressed in each of the four studies4–7; however, a deeper understanding will be necessary to optimize any ALK-targeted therapy. Each study used either ALK expression followed by inhibition in non-neuroblastoma cell lines, RNAi-mediated reduction of endogenous ALK expression in cell lines or small-molecule kinase inhibitors. Generally, the results from these studies supported a dominant role for mutant ALK. However, in some cases, RNAi-mediated reduction of wild-type ALK expression also reduced neuroblastoma cell growth, suggesting that the level of ALK expression might be as important as an activating mutation in driving tumorigenesis.  A recent paper by Sasaki et al.9 identified ALK F1174L as a mutation that occurred naturally in an individual with inflammatory myoblastic tumor undergoing treatment with the dual MET and ALK kinase inhibitor crizotinib. This tumor contained a somatic RANBP2-ALK translocation; however, when the person experienced recurrent disease, one ALK locus contained an additional F1174L mutation. An evaluation of the inflammatory myoblastic tumor cells harboring ALK F1174L showed that they had higher levels of phosphorylated ALK along with increased downstream phosphorylation of AKT. Thus, this study supports that F1174L is an activating mutation of ALK.  ALK was independently identified as a molecular target in neuroblastoma by screening >600 human cancer cell lines with pharmacological inhibitors of ALK kinase activity10. This work provided a platform from which to launch inhibitor development when a transforming EML4-ALK fusion gene was identified as a major driver in a subset of approximately 5% of non–small-cell lung cancers11. Indeed, a first clinical trial with crizotinib showed striking efficacy in individuals with non–small-cell lung cancer, providing evidence that a well-defined activated pathway may be targeted effectively12 (Fig. 1). A recent structural study of the ALK kinase domain revealed differences from the same domain in related receptor kinases in the insulin receptor family that will be helpful in designing new inhibitors as resistance to the initial ALK inhibitors emerges13.  As higher ALK receptor expression in neuroblastoma coincides with poorer disease outcome8, overexpressed ALK may thus be a potentially valuable therapeutic target. Indeed, two proteins—pleiotrophin and the related midkine—have been shown to activate mammalian ALK14 through extracellular interactions with it (Fig. 1). Therefore, antibody strategies to target overexpressed ALK in neuroblastoma may be an attractive additional approach. Antibody therapy may even act syn ergistically with small-molecule tyrosine kinase inhibitors.  It is clear that targeting ALK is now open season for the development of new therapies for neuroblastoma, as well as other cancers. The insights gained from ongoing trials are likely to directly benefit both subgroups of individuals whose tumors are driven by ALK and, in general, targeted approaches to cancer treatment. Obviously, genetic mutations can reveal new drivers and pathways activated in cancer and may present new therapeutic opportunities. However, fully validating any new target is a challenge at a new frontier of a deadly cancer.  SUMMARY Neuroblastoma is a childhood extracranial solid tumour that is associated with a number of genetic changes. Included in these genetic alterations are mutations in the kinase domain of the anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK) receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK), which have been found in both somatic and familial neuroblastoma. In order to treat patients accordingly requires characterisation of these mutations in terms of their response to ALK tyrosine kinase inhibitors (TKIs). Here, we report the identification and characterisation of two novel neuroblastoma ALK mutations (A1099T and R1464STOP), which we have investigated together with several previously reported but uncharacterised ALK mutations (T1087I, D1091N, T1151M, M1166R, F1174I and A1234T). In order to understand the potential role of these ALK mutations in neuroblastoma progression, we have employed cell culture-based systems together with the model organism Drosophila as a readout for ligand-independent activity. Mutation of ALK at position 1174 (F1174I) generates a gain-of-function receptor capable of activating intracellular targets such as ERK (extracellular signal regulated kinase) and STAT3 (signal transducer and activator of transcription 3) in a ligand-independent manner. Analysis of these previously uncharacterised ALK mutants and comparison with ALKF1174 mutants suggests that ALK mutations observed in neuroblastoma fall into three classes. These classes are: (i) gain-of-function ligand-independent mutations such as ALKF1174l, (ii) kinase-dead ALK mutants, e.g. ALKI1250T (Schönherr et al., 2011a) and (iii) ALK mutations that are ligand-dependent in nature. Irrespective of the nature of the observed ALK mutants, in every case the activity of the mutant ALK receptors could be abrogated by the ALK inhibitor crizotinib (Xalkori/PF-02341066), albeit with differing levels of sensitivity.  Go to: INTRODUCTION Neuroblastoma is a common childhood cancer that arises in the tissues of the sympathetic nervous system (Maris et al., 2007). It most commonly originates in the adrenal glands, but can also develop at additional sites in the neck, chest and abdomen. It is considered to be a disease of developing tissue because it originates from precursor cells of neural crest tissue that are active during embryonic development. This in part explains the median age of 17 months for occurrence of neuroblastoma (Maris, 2010). Recently, anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK) gain-of-function mutations have been described in both familial (Janoueix-Lerosey et al., 2008; Mossé et al., 2008) and sporadic neuroblastoma (Carén et al., 2008; Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Martinsson et al., 2011; Mossé et al., 2008). Although there is currently no clinically approved treatment for ALK mutations in neuroblastoma, ongoing clinical trials are expected to determine the potential usefulness of ALK-targeted therapies for use in the future. Inhibition of ALK activity using crizotinib (Xalkori/PF-02341066) has been reported in both inflammatory myofibroblastic tumours (IMT) and non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) patients (Butrynski et al., 2010; Kwak et al., 2010). Anti-ALK inhibitor therapy thus appears to offer promise in the treatment of ALK-mediated tumours at this point (Hallberg and Palmer, 2011). It is of future clinical importance to characterise each ALK mutation so that individual patients can be treated accordingly. Furthermore, we have addressed the important issue of whether ALK mutations are resistant to the medicine that is currently in use.  ALK was originally identified as a fusion partner with nucleophosmin or nucleolar protein gene (NPM)-ALK oncogene in anaplastic large cell lymphoma (Morris et al., 1994; Shiota et al., 1994). Later, ALK was reported to be receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK), with a molecular weight of 220 kDa, belonging to the insulin receptor superfamily (Iwahara et al., 1997; Morris et al., 1997). ALK contains an extracellular ligand-binding domain, a transmembrane-spanning domain and an intracellular tyrosine kinase domain (Palmer et al., 2009) and is expressed primarily in the central and peripheral nervous system during embryonic development and at lower concentrations in the nervous system of adults. Its expression is also observed in developing sensory organs, reproductive organs, skin and stomach (Iwahara et al., 1997; Morris et al., 1997; Vernersson et al., 2006) and its physiological function is still enigmatic. It has been associated with multiple translocation events involved in several different human malignancies (Palmer et al., 2009), such as IMT (Griffin et al., 1999), NSCLC (Rikova et al., 2007; Soda et al., 2007), diffuse large B cell lymphomas (DLBCL) (Arber et al., 1996) and renal cell carcinoma (Debelenko et al., 2011) amongst others. Involvement of ALK in a number of human diseases including neuroblastoma has accelerated recent efforts to understand the function of this RTK under both pathological and non-pathological conditions.  In this study, we have characterised a number of novel mutations in the ALK gene from neuroblastoma patients. From analysis of genomic DNA from patient biopsy samples, two novel germ line mutations were identified, leading to A1099T and R1464STOP mutations at the protein level. We have investigated these mutations, looking at whether they could act as driver or passenger mutations in neuroblastoma, with the aim of predicting their potential role in disease progression. Further, we have compared them with a number of other previously reported, but currently uncharacterised, ALK mutations, namely T1087I, D1091N, T1151M, M1166R and F1174I.  Our findings confirm that the ALKF1174I mutation, in keeping with the previously characterised ALKF1174S and ALKF1174L mutants, is a gain-of-function mutation that mediates activation of downstream targets such as ERK and STAT3 in a ligand-independent manner. The ALKF1174I mutant is able to transform both Ba/F3 and NIH3T3 cells. Although we observed that the ALKM1166R mutant is unable to transform Ba/F3 cells, it was able to give rise to foci in NIH3T3 transformation assays. Taken together, our data suggest that the ALK mutations investigated to date fall into three classes: (i) gain-of-function ligand-independent mutations (e.g. F1174I), (ii) kinase-dead ALK mutants (Schönherr et al., 2011a) and (iii) ALK mutations that are ligand-dependent in nature, such as the human ALK mutations (T1087I, D1091N, A1099T, T1151M, M1166R, A1234T, R1464STOP), which are not constitutively active but which display ligand-dependent activation when challenged with agonist antibodies. Importantly, to date, the activity of all ALK mutants tested can be abrogated by treatment with ALK small molecule TKIs.  TRANSLATIONAL IMPACT  Clinical issue  Neuroblastoma is a childhood extracranial solid tumour that has been associated with alterations in several different genes. Among these, are mutations in the kinase domain of the anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK), a receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK). ALK mutations have been reported in both somatic and familial forms of neuroblastoma. Many ALK mutations confer a gain of function to the protein, but mechanistic information is not available for all identified mutations. Optimal treatment of neuroblastoma (e.g. with tyrosine kinase inhibitors) requires a clearer understanding of how different ALK mutations influence protein function and, in turn, contribute to neuroblastoma development. In addition, it is important to investigate whether certain ALK mutations confer resistance to currently available neuroblastoma drugs.  Results  Here, the authors compared signalling mediated by several different ALK mutants identified in patients with neuroblastoma with signalling mediated by wild-type ALK. Their studies aimed to determine whether disease-associated ALK mutations are universally gain-of-function and whether certain ALK mutations can confer resistance to tyrosine kinase inhibitors. Their results, together with existing data, suggest that the neuroblastoma-associated ALK mutations characterised thus far fall into three classes: (i) gain-of-function, ligand-independent mutations of varying activation strength, such as ALKF1174, (ii) kinase-dead ALK mutants, such as ALKI1250T and (iii) ALK mutations that are ligand-dependent and might represent ‘passenger’ mutations. Importantly, the activity of all mutant ALK receptors, irrespective of mutation type, could be abrogated by the ALK inhibitor crizotinib, albeit with differing levels of sensitivity.  Implications and future directions  Characterizing individual ALK mutations is clinically important so that individual neuroblastoma patients can be classified and treated appropriately. These results provide mechanistic information on several neuroblastoma-associated ALK mutations and propose a way to classify all ALK mutants. Encouragingly, these results also indicate that various types of ALK mutations are sensitive to currently available neuroblastoma therapy.  Go to: RESULTS Evaluating the role of human ALK mutations as driver or passenger  We set out to characterise two novel germ line ALK variants identified in patients with neuroblastoma (ALKA1099T and ALKR1464STOP) and their potential roles as driver or passenger mutations in neuroblastoma. ALKA1099T was identified in a Japanese infant diagnosed with neuroblastoma, born to unrelated healthy parents with no neuroblastoma history. No MYCN amplification or ALK amplification was detected in this patient, and the tumour was classified as stage 2. The ALKA1099T variant was heterozygous in both tumour and blood DNA samples. The ALKR1464STOP mutation was observed in the DNA and RNA from a patient sample analysed as part of the TARGET (therapeutically applicable research to generate effective treatments) initiative, which aims to characterise the genomic landscape of the most common childhood cancers, including neuroblastoma. This sequence variant was heterozygous in tumour DNA and RNA, as well as in blood DNA. DNA from the patient's parents was not available for testing.  Also included in this analysis were the earlier reported, but as yet uncharacterised, putative gain-of-function ALK mutations: ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKT1151M, ALKM1166R, ALKF1174I and ALKA1234T (Fig. 1A,B) (Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Mossé et al., 2008). As a positive control, the previously verified constitutively active ALK mutations ALKF1174L and ALKF1174S were also included (Martinsson et al., 2011). Initially, we investigated these eight human neuroblastoma ALK mutations in a PC12 cell culture system, examining both signalling activity and capacity to drive differentiation, as measured by neurite outgrowth. PC12 cells are a clonal rat adrenal pheochromocytoma cell line, which are well characterised as differentiating and extending neurites upon stimulation with nerve growth factor or differentiation factors (Greene and Tischler, 1976). They do not express ALK at detectable levels. We, and others, have previously shown that expression of wild-type ALK (ALKwt), followed by stimulation with ALK agonist monoclonal antibody 31 (mAb31) or expression of activating ALK mutants leads to neurite extension in PC12 cells (Martinsson et al., 2011) (Fig. 1C, lane 1). PC12 cells were transiently transfected with ALK mutants and serum-starved for 48 hours prior to stimulation with mAb31 for 30 minutes. Both human ALKwt and human ALKF1174S were included as controls (Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Martinsson et al., 2011) (Fig. 1). The ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants displayed characteristics similar to that of ALKwt and were able to activate downstream targets such as ERK only upon stimulation with agonist mAb31 (Fig. 1C). In a manner similar to that previously observed for human ALKF1174S, two of the mutants investigated (human ALKM1166R and human ALKF1174I) were able to activate phosphorylation of ERK in the absence of agonist mAb31, suggesting that these two mutants might be constitutively activated in a ligand-independent manner (Fig. 1C). Furthermore, in keeping with this hypothesis, both human ALKM1166R and human ALKF1174I mediated robust phosphorylation of STAT3, as reported for the ALKF1174S mutation (Fig. 1C). Interestingly, none of the other mutants were able to generate STAT3 phosphorylation or activation upon stimulation for up to 30 minutes, as previously shown for wild-type ALK (Schönherr et al., 2011b).  Fig. 1. Fig. 1. Domain structure of ALK mutations and their activation of downstream targets. (A) The extracellular, transmembrane domain and the intracellular domain, which contains the protein tyrosine kinase domain are shown. Mutation residues within the intracellular ... Thus, in this initial analysis, the ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants were found to be inducibly activated by agonist mAb31 and displayed enhanced activation of ERK upon stimulation. However, they were unable to activate STAT3. By contrast, both ALKM1166R and ALKF1174I appeared to be activated in a ligand-independent manner and led to robust activation of downstream targets, such as ERK and STAT3, in a manner similar to the ALKF1174S mutation.  Crizotinib blocks neurite outgrowth activity of human ALK mutants  The PC12 cell system is a sensitive readout for ALK signalling activity as a result of receptor activation (Schönherr et al., 2011b; Yang et al., 2007). Transient transfection of ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP did not stimulate neurite outgrowth in the absence of agonist mAb31. However, addition of agonist antibody lead to significantly increased levels of neurite outgrowth (up to 30-40%) (Fig. 2). The levels of ALK-induced neurite outgrowth were similar to that observed upon stimulation of the wild-type ALK receptor. In agreement with our earlier results, the ALKM1166R and ALKF1174I mutants were capable of mediating neurite outgrowth in a ligand-independent manner, displaying similar percentages of neurite outgrowth in the presence or absence of agonist antibody (Fig. 2). To investigate whether neurite outgrowth could be abrogated by ALK inhibition, we employed crizotinib (Xalkori), an FDA-approved small inhibitor of both ALK and MET receptor tyrosine kinases, which is being employed in phase II and III clinical trials (Butrynski et al., 2010; Kwak et al., 2010; Hallberg and Palmer, 2011). Crizotinib (250 nM) treatment resulted in a significant reduction in ALK-induced neurite outgrowth. Thus, crizotinib is able to effectively block neurite outgrowth mediated by all human ALK mutants investigated here.  Fig. 2. Fig. 2. Crizotinib abrogates ALK-mediated neurite outgrowth in PC12 cells. PC12 cells were co-transfected with pcDNA3-human ALK and pEGFPN1 and seeded out in the presence or absence of crizotinib. Cells were stimulated with 1 μg/ml mAb31. After 48 hours, ... In Ba/F3 cells, crizotinib inhibits constitutively active ALK mutants with varying IC50 values  To confirm and extend our analysis of the inhibition of these ALK mutants by crizotinib, the Ba/F3 cell system was employed (Lu et al., 2009; Schönherr et al., 2011b). Ba/F3 cells, an IL-3-dependent cell line, are often employed in kinase drug discovery, exploiting their characteristic of being able to overcome IL-3 dependence, which allows them to survive and proliferate in the absence of IL-3 when expressing constitutively active tyrosine kinase or other oncogenes (Warmuth et al., 2007). Ba/F3 cells were transfected with human wild-type ALK and the eight different ALK mutants, and subsequently selected with the antibiotic G418 in the presence of IL-3 for 10 days. We observed that Ba/F3 cells expressing the different ALK mutants exhibited variable proliferation ability in the absence of IL-3 (Fig. 3B). At the end of selection in IL-3-free medium, only the human ALKF1174I mutant gave rise to IL-3-independent cell lines, along with the human ALKF1174L positive control. By contrast, ALKwt, ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, human ALKM1166R, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants were unable to substitute for IL-3 to drive proliferation in Ba/F3 cells, even though they expressed ALK protein (Fig. 3A,B and data not shown). To further analyse the responsiveness of these mutants toward crizotinib, the cells were treated with different doses of this ALK inhibitor. Importantly, crizotinib did not inhibit cell growth or cell viability when cells were grown in the presence of IL-3 (Fig. 3C), indicating that it is not toxic to Ba/F3 cells at the levels employed. Proliferation of both human ALKF1174I and human ALKF1174L mutants was blocked by crizotinib (Fig. 4A). IC50 (concentration of drug responsible for 50% inhibition) values show that inhibition of ALKF1174I required similar doses of crizotinib as human ALKF1174L (Fig. 4B). Furthermore, inhibition of ALK mutant activity was also confirmed at the level of ALK tyrosine phosphorylation at position 1278. Tyr1278 corresponds to the first tyrosine of the Y'RAS'YY motif in the A-loop of ALK that is necessary for auto-activation of ALK kinase domain and transformation ability of nucleophosmin (NPM)-ALK (Tartari et al, 2008). Immunoblot analysis performed on Ba/F3 cell lysates showed a reduction in the levels of ALK Tyr1278 phosphorylation in the presence of inhibitor for both human ALKF1174L and human ALKF1174I mutants (Fig. 4C). In agreement with these results, both mutants exhibited decreased ALK Tyr1604 phosphorylation (Fig. 4C). Reduced levels of ERK phosphorylation by both mutants upon treatment with crizotinib confirmed the inhibition of ALK-mediated downstream targets (Fig. 4C). Taken together, these data suggest that crizotinib is able to block the ALK activity of these mutants in a dose-dependent manner.  Fig. 3. Fig. 3. Expression of human ALK in Ba/F3 cells. (A) Ba/F3 cells were transfected with human wild-type or mutant ALKs and selected with G418 in the presence of IL-3. Whole cell lysates were prepared and run on SDS-PAGE, followed by immunoblotting with indicated ... Fig. 4. Fig. 4. Crizotinib inhibits both human ALKF1174-driven proliferation and phosphorylation at Tyr1278 and Tyr1604 of ALK in Ba/F3 cells. (A) IC50 values for crizotinib for both human ALKF1174I and human ALKF1174L were calculated. Values represent mean + s.d. from ... Transforming potential of human ALK mutations  We further examined the transforming ability of human ALK mutants using NIH3T3 cells. Expression of the human ALK mutations ALKwt, ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP were unable to generate formation of foci greater than that of the vector control or ALK wild-type control. By contrast, both ALKF1174I and ALKF1174L displayed robust foci formation, although ALKM1166R showed rather weak foci formation ability in comparison with ALKF1174S (Fig. 5A). These results indicate different degrees of foci formation by the ligand-independent ALK mutations, which is in agreement with our previous results in the Ba/F3 system (Fig. 5B).  Fig. 5. Fig. 5. Transformation potential of human ALK mutants. (A,B) The transforming potential of the mutations was assayed by transfecting NIH3T3 cells with pcDNA3-human ALK (mutant and wild type). Cells were selected with G418 for 3 weeks. (A) Representative images ... Ectopic expression of human ALK mutants in Drosophila melanogaster  Transgenic Drosophila expressing the human ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants were generated to confirm their ligand-dependent characteristics. These were ectopically expressed in Drosophila eye, together with the previously generated human ALKF1174L and ALKwt, employing the pGMR-Gal4 driver line, which directs protein expression in developing photoreceptors of the eye. The expression of human ALK proteins was confirmed by immunostaining of the eye discs by using anti-human ALK antibody. Expression of human ALKF1174L resulted in a rough eye phenotype, whereas expression of human ALKwt, ALKA1234T or ALKR1464STOP did not show any obvious phenotype in adult flies (Martinsson et al., 2011) (Fig. 6). However, the regular hexagonal arrangement of ommatidia was disorganised, with many interommatidial bristles missing in human ALKF1174L. The data strongly support the conclusion that the human ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants are ligand-dependent in nature.  Fig. 6. Fig. 6. Ectopic expression of human ALKA1234T and human ALKR1464STOP in Drosophila eye does not generate the rough eye phenotype. Adult fly eyes (upper) and larval eye discs (lower) ectopically expressing mutant human ALK variants. Human ALKwt and human ALKF1174L ... Go to: DISCUSSION ALK mutations have been reported in both familial (Mossé et al., 2008) and sporadic neuroblastoma (Carén et al., 2008; Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Janoueix-Lerosey et al., 2008; Martinsson et al., 2011; Mossé et al., 2008). The presence of ALK mutations in neuroblastoma draws attention to its possible function and its role in disease progression. Therefore, characterisation of these different ALK mutations is an important exercise in assessing whether the various mutants are functional or not, with potential importance for the patient to be treated accordingly.  In this study, we have investigated two novel mutations of ALK (ALKA1099T and ALKR1464STOP) and compared them with six previously described but uncharacterised human ALK point mutations (ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKT1151M, ALKM1166R, ALKF1174I and ALKA1234T) from neuroblastoma patients, with the aim of assessing whether these mutations could drive tumour progression (Table 1). So far, and from our knowledge of neuroblastoma tumour analysis and published reports to date, only one neuroblastoma patient has presented with a homozygous ALK mutation (Martinsson et al., 2011). To date, one mutation (ALKI1250T) has been reported to have defective kinase activity, raising important questions as to the impact, if any, that this mutation has upon neuroblastoma progression (Schönherr et al., 2011a). Signalling studies in the PC12 cell system showed differences in the activation of downstream targets by the various ALK mutants examined. ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP showed little phosphorylation of ERK, which was enhanced by stimulation with agonist antibodies. On the other hand, ALKM1166R and ALKF1174I mediated ligand-independent phosphorylation of ERK and STAT3. Likewise, the ALKM1166R and ALKF1174I mutants were able to mediate neurite outgrowth in PC12 cells in a ligand-independent manner (Table 1). The other ALK mutations (ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP) displayed inducible activity and resulted in neurites only when stimulated with agonist antibodies, which could be abrogated by crizotinib (Table 1). Furthermore, we co-transfected our ligand-dependent mutants together with wild-type ALK. We observed no change in the phosphorylation of ERK or in the levels of neurite outgrowth ability when compared with wild-type ALK alone in PC12 cells (data not shown).  Table 1. Table 1. Characterization of ALK mutations in order to assess their oncogenic potential Interestingly, the ALKM1166R mutant gave rise to weak foci formation in NIH3T3 cells in comparison with the ALKF1174I mutant, which displayed robust foci formation (Table 1). In this assay, the human ALK mutations ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP did not yield any foci as expected. These results thus revealed that only the ALKF1174I and ALKM1166R mutants harbour transforming potential in NIH3T3 cells. To complement these analyses, we employed the Ba/F3 cell model system. This revealed that even though the ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKM1166R, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutant receptors were expressed, they could not substitute for IL-3 to drive proliferation in Ba/F3 cells. Our Ba/F3 results with the ALKT1151M and ALKA1234T mutations are in agreement with earlier reported results (George et al., 2008). However, human ALKF1174I and the human ALKF1174L control, gave rise to IL-3-independent cell lines. Both mutations displayed sensitivity towards crizotinib in a dose-dependent manner, as shown by their different IC50 values (Table 1). These data are in agreement with previous reports showing that different ALK mutations exhibit different levels of sensitivity towards crizotinib (Bresler et al., 2011; Schönherr et al., 2011b). We also show that cell proliferation and phosphorylation of ALK at tyrosine positions 1278 and 1604 are blocked by using crizotinib, as expected (Fig. 4) (Schönherr et al., 2011b; Tartari et al., 2008). These data indicate that the human ALKF1174I mutant is able to mediate neurite outgrowth, transform NIH3T3 cells, activate downstream targets of ALK (such as ERK and STAT3) in a ligand-independent manner and substitute for IL-3 in Ba/F3 cells, giving rise to IL-3-independent cell line. Thus, we conclude that human ALKF1174I is a gain-of-function mutation that is sensitive to crizotinib inhibition.  The ALKM1166R mutation gives rise to neurites in PC12 cells, activates downstream targets (such as ERKs and STAT3) in a ligand-independent manner and shows weak foci formation. However, it fails to substitute for IL-3 and, hence, does not yield any IL-3-independent Ba/F3 cell lines in our hands. This is comparable to the ALKR1275Q mutant, which also displays neurite generating ability but is unable to support Ba/F3 IL-3-independent growth (Schönherr et al., 2011b). Amino acid Met1166 is not conserved in insulin receptor kinase (IRK) family members, perhaps implying that it might have a structural and functional role specific to ALK (Lee et al., 2010). Met1166 is located in the interface between the αC-helix and the DFG-helix and mutations of this residue would probably destabilise the DFG-helix and consequently facilitate the shift of the αC-helix (Fig. 1B) (Bossi et al., 2010). From a structural point of view, both positions 1166 and 1174 are in or very close to the αC-helix, which plays an important role in the activation process of the insulin receptor family members. Upon activation, the αC-helix moves a few degrees closer to the ATP-catalytic site that mediates the γ-phospho-exchange from bound ATP to the interacting substrate (Lemmon and Schlessinger, 2010). Furthermore, it has previously been shown that mutation at position 1174 changes the character of the ALK protein from a ligand-dependent receptor to a receptor exhibiting gain-of-function properties (Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Martinsson et al., 2011). Probably, this mutations results in disruption of the packing, weakening distinctive structural features observed in the ALK structure, such as the unique inhibitory position of the ALK A-loop packing a short proximal A-loop α-helix against the αC-helix of ALK, while a β-turn motif obstructs the substrate binding region (Fig. 1B). In this arrangement, Tyr1278 is inaccessible for phosphorylation because it is engaged in the interaction interface through bonding with Cys1097 in the N-terminal β-sheet (Bossi et al, 2010; Lee et al, 2010). Both Phe1174 and Met1166 mutations can probably weaken auto-inhibitory interactions and allow the ALK kinase domain to more easily adopt its active configuration. However, unlike ALKF1174 mutants, the ALKM1166R mutation is not a robust gain-of-function mutation, although it is able to transform NIH3T3 cells, mediate neurite outgrowth, and activate downstream ALK targets, such as STAT3 and ERK. Moreover, unlike ALKF1174 mutants, ALKM1166R lacks the ability to mediate Il-3 independent growth of Ba/F3 cells. Our analyses suggest that although ALKM1166R is able to weaken the auto-inhibitory interaction, this does not occur to the same degree as with the ALKF1174 mutations. The extent to which an ALKM1166R mutation contributes to neuroblastoma disease progression or tumour initation is unclear from our experiments.  Consideration of the impact of the ALKT1087I and ALKD1091N mutations on ALK kinase activity from a structural point of view is difficult because they have not been included in any structural study to date. Both are located close to the C-terminal of the β1 and β2 sheets in the kinase domain (Bossi et al., 2010; Lee et al, 2010). Another mutation investigated here is at position Ala1099, which is located between the β1' and β2' sheets. Both Lee et al. and Bossi et al. have indicated that nearby Cys1097 plays an important role in mediating a hydrogen bond with the unphosphorylated tyrosine at position 1278 when ALK is in an inactive configuration (Fig. 1B, sticks and dots) (Lee et al, 2010; Bossi et al., 2010). Our analyses of these, together with the location of the ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N and ALKA1099T mutations, indicate that no gross structural conformation changes occur that result in the mutant ALK protein gaining characteristics that differ significantly from the wild-type protein (Table 1). The Thr1151 mutation is located in the β3 sheet, included in the framework of five-stranded, twisted anti-parallel β-sheets that build up predominantly the N-terminal kinase lobe. Apparently, mutation of Thr1151 to methionine (T1151M) does not affect the ability of the ALK kinase domain to be activated upon stimulation. Finally, it is difficult to predict the effect of the 1464STOP mutation, although from our analyses we would speculate that at least in terms of activation it behaves in a manner similar to the wild-type receptor, i.e. the receptor displays ligand-dependent activation. However, the manner and regulation of inactivation of such a truncated receptor might be an important aspect that could be of relevance in neuroblastoma.  The expression of mutants such as ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP neither renders Ba/F3 cells independent of IL-3 for their growth nor exhibits transforming activity. Additionally, the mutants do not form foci in NIH3T3 cells. Importantly, however, they are able to give rise to neurites and stimulate activation of ERK in the presence of agonist antibodies. Furthermore, all the mutations in this study are successfully blocked by crizotinib, which results in a decrease in ALK phosphorylation and its downstream target ERK in a manner similar to the controls employed in this study, i.e. ALKF1174L and ALKF1174S (Martinsson et al., 2011; Schönherr et al., 2011b). A recent study has investigated a number of ALK mutants, which have been identified by the Cancer Genome Project (Sanger Institute, Cambridge, UK) in cell lines from a range of tumour types. This analysis included F1174L, from the SH-SY5Y neuroblastoma cell line, as well as a number of additional previously uncharacterised ALK mutations, and looked at their transfomation potential. Similarly to the mutants investigated here (ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP) the ALK mutants investigated by McDuff and colleagues do not render Ba/F3 cells independent of IL-3 for their growth, exhibit lack of transforming activity and might represent passenger mutations in the evolution of cancer (McDuff et al., 2011). However, this work did not examine whether the various ALK mutants were able to respond to activation by external ligand or agonist antibodies or examine their sensitivity to treatment with crizotinib.  From our present analysis of previously uncharacterised ALK mutants, and in light of other reports concerning ALK mutant variants, the accumulated data suggests that the ALK mutations observed and characterised in neuroblastoma to date fall into three classes. These classes are: (i) gain-of-function ligand-independent mutations of varying activation strength, e.g. ALKF1174; (ii) kinase-dead ALK mutants, e.g. ALKI1250T (Schönherr et al., 2011a); and (iii) ALK mutations that are ligand-dependent in nature and which might represent ‘passenger’ mutations. Irrespective of the nature of the observed ALK mutant, in every case the activity of the mutant ALK receptors can be abrogated by treatment with the ALK inhibitor crizotinib, albeit with differing levels of sensitivity. Present knowledge would predict that these mutants will also be sensitive to inhibition by next generation ALK TKIs. Although a role for the class of ligand-independent ALK mutants such as ALKF1174 and ALKR1275 is simple to rationalise, further work will be required to answer the more challenging issue of the significance of the ligand-dependent class of ALK mutants, if any, in neuroblastoma progression.  Go to: MATERIALS AND METHODS Patients: Case 1 (A1099T) and Case 2 (R1464STOP)  Case report 1 A 14-day-old newborn Japanese boy infant diagnosed with neurblastoma was born to unrelated healthy parents with no neuroblastoma history. The tumour was classified as stage 2 and no MYCN amplification nor ALK amplification were detected by array comparative genomic hybridisation (CGH) analysis. This patient is still alive and disease-free, and at this point is 11 years old. DNA ploidy of the tumour was aneuploidy (DNA index was 1.34) and array CGH showed whole chromosome 17 gain, with the pattern of whole chromosomal gains and losses in other multiple chromosomes. The tumour was morphologically diagnosed as favourable according to the Shimada classification (Shimada et al., 1999). Tropomyosin-receptor-kinase (Trk) A was highly expressed in the tumour. The A1099T (GCT/ACT) ALK variant appeared to be heterozygous and present in both tumour and blood DNA, suggesting that this is a germline mutation.  Case report 2 Tumour and blood DNA from a 21-month-old Caucasian American male with stage 4 neuroblastoma were sequenced as part of the TARGET project. The tumour was characterised by MYCN amplification using fluorescence in situ hybridisation (FISH), unfavourable histology (Shimada et al., 1999) and a DNA index of 1.908. Whole genome, exome, and transcriptome sequencing were performed using the Illumina Genome Analyzer. Data were processed as previously described (Morin et al., 2011; Morozova et al., 2010). Sequencing revealed a heterozygous R1646STOP variant in both tumour and blood DNA. In the blood genome, eight reads (47%) supported the reference allele G, and nine reads (53%) supported the alternative allele A. In the tumour genome, five sequencing reads (31%) supported the G allele, and eleven reads supported the A allele. Both reference and alternative alleles were expressed in the tumour transcriptome, with nine and seven reads (56% and 44%) supporting the reference and mutant alleles, respectively. The variant was independently verified by Sanger sequencing.  Generation of human ALK mutant constructions  ALKwt, ALKF1174L and ALKF1174S have been described earlier (Martinsson et al., 2011). All other ALK mutants employed in this study were created in pcDNA3 by Eurofins MWG/operon (Ebersberg, Germany). The mutations generated in the kinase domain were confirmed by sequencing from both directions.  Antibodies and inhibitors  Primary antibodies used were: anti-pan-ERK (1:5000), purchased from BD Transduction Laboratories (Franklin Lakes, NJ), anti-pALK(Y1278), anti-pALK(Y1604), anti-pERK(T202/Y204) and anti- pSTAT3 (Y705) were from Cell Signaling Technology (Danvers, MA). The activating monoclonal antibody mAb31 has been described previously (Martinsson et al., 2011; Moog-Lutz et al., 2005). Monoclonal antibody 153 (anti-ALK) was produced in the Hallberg laboratory against the extracellular domain of ALK as described (Moog-Lutz et al., 2005). Horseradish-peroxidase-conjugated secondary antibodies goat anti-rabbit IgG and goat anti-mouse IgG (diluted 1:5000) were from Thermo Scientific (Waltham, MA). The ALK inhibitor crizotinib (PF-02341066, Xalkori) was a generous gift from Pfizer, Inc.  Neurite outgrowth assay  PC12 cells (2×106) were transfected by electroporation in an Amaxa electroporator (Amaxa Biosystems, Cologne, Germany) using 0.8 μg of pcDNA3-human ALK and 0.5 μg pEGFPN1 (Clontech, Mountain view, CA) and 100 μl Ingenio electroporation solution (Mirus Bio LCC, Madison, WI). Transfected cells were subsequently seeded into 24-well plates together with mAb31 (1 μg/ml) and the inhibitor crizotinib (250 nM) in complete growth medium (Martinsson et al., 2011). After 48 hours of incubation, the fraction of GFP-positive and neuritecarrying cells versus GFP-positive cells was observed under a Zeiss Axiovert 40 CFL microscope. To be judged as a neurite-carrying cell, the neurite of the cell was required to reach at least twice the length of the diameter of a normal cell body. Experiments were performed in triplicates and each sample within an experiment was assayed in duplicate.  Cell proliferation assay and IC50 determination  Ba/F3 cells expressing either human ALKwt or mutant human ALK were generated by electroporation with pcDNA3-human ALK using Amaxa electroporator (Amaxa Biosystems, Cologne, Germany). Transfectants were selected in RPMI with 10% heat-inactivated foetal bovine serum (FBS) and 2.5 ng/ml IL-3 (Peprotech, Rocky Hill, NJ) in the presence of G418 (600 μg /ml) for 10 days. Cells were washed with PBSA and seeded at 0.5×106 cells/ml in RPMI with 10% FBS and G418 for generation of human ALK-expressing IL-3-independent cells (Schönherr et al., 2011b). For calculation of IC50 values, human ALK-expressing Ba/F3 cells were treated with varying concentrations of crizotinib for 3 days. Cell viability was tested with resazurin (Sigma, Stockholm, Sweden) (O'Brien et al., 2000). The IC50 value was determined for individual cell lines and the experiment was carried out at least three times independently, in triplicate.  Cell lysis and western blotting  PC12 cells expressing human ALK mutants were serum-starved for 36 hours prior to stimulation with 1 μg/ml of the activating mAb31 for 30 minutes (Moog-Lutz et al., 2005; Schönherr et al., 2010; Yang et al., 2007). IL-3-independent human ALK-expressing Ba/F3 cells were treated with crizotinib in complete medium for 3 hours. Cells were washed with PBSA and lysed in SDS-sample buffer. Pre-cleared lysates were run on SDS/PAGE, followed by western blotting using the indicated antibodies. ALK downstream activation was detected by pERK and pSTAT3(Y705); pan-ERK was used as loading control. ALK phosphorylation was analysed with pALK(Y1278) and pALK(Y1604) antibodies. Cell lysis and immunoblotting were performed according to described protocols (Schönherr et al., 2010).  Transformation assay  NIH3T3 cells (4.5×104) were seeded in collagen-coated 12-well plates prior to transfection for 6 hours with 1.75 μg pcDNA3.1-human ALK and 4.4 μl Lipofectamine 2000 (Invitrogen, Paisley, UK) in 0.3 ml Opti-MEM. The next day, 60% of the cells were transferred to six-well plates and maintained in DMEM with 10% heat-inactivated FBS and 0.5 mg/ml G418 until the cells reached confluency. Then, the cells were cultivated in DMEM with 5% heat-inactivated FBS and 0.25 mg/ml G418 for approximately 10 days. The cells were then fixed using methanol and stained with 0.25% crystal violet. The foci visible by the naked eye were subsequently analysed (Schönherr et al., 2011a).  Expression of human ALK mutants in Drosophila eye  The Gal4-UAS expression system was employed to express human ALK in the Drosophila eye (Brand and Perrimon, 1993). DNA encoding ALK1234T and ALK1464STOP were subcloned with EcoRI and NotI from pcDNA3-ALK1234T and pcDNA3-ALK1464STOP, and the resulting fragments were ligated into the EcoRI-NotI site of the pUAST vector. Transgenic flies carrying pUAST-ALK were generated by BestGene (Chino Hills, CA) and crossed with pGMR-Gal4 (Bloomington, stock no. 9146). Offspring were fixed with 4% glutaraldehyde in PBS overnight and subjected to electron microscopic analysis. To confirm the expression of human ALK, eye discs of third instar larva were stained with anti-ALK mAb153 (Schönherr et al., 2011a). Antibody binding was visualised using Cy3-labelled anti-mouse IgG (Amersham). The discs were mounted on slides in Fluoromount-G (Southern Biotechnology Associates, Birmingham, AL) and imaged using a Zeiss Apotome. 
1556||In the era of personalized medicine, understanding the molecular drivers of oncogenesis will be likely to trump morphological characteristics with regard to diagnostics, prognostics and choice of therapies. Identifying single driver mutations from billions of possibilities used to require substantial insight. However, as the cost of deep genomic sequencing goes down each month, clever tricks such as identifying family cohorts may not be as necessary. Family cohorts have driven genetic discovery for decades, including the identification of most tumor suppressor genes and many oncogenes.  Neuroblastoma is a lethal cancer of early childhood that essentially comes in two forms: highly malignant and locally manageable, or, to paraphrase Audrey Evans, an early leader in the field, the ‘good’ies and the ‘bad’ies. The underlying genes responsible for neuroblastoma remain largely unknown, despite the discovery of a handful of genetic changes that have been implicated in neuroblastoma development. For example, Brodeur et al.1 and Look et al.2 correlated MYCN oncogene amplification with aggressive tumors that have a high propensity for metastasis and that cause mortality. Also, very small subsets of familial neuroblastoma were associated with PHOX2B (encoding paired-like homeobox-2) mutations, but these mutations accounted for only very few families (reviewed in ref. 3).  To identify additional oncogenes that cause familial neuroblastoma, Mossé et al.4 returned to old-fashioned family trees. They collected the pedigrees of 20 families that showed an autosomal dominant pattern of neuroblastoma inheritance. Using a genome-wide scan for linkage at 6,000 single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs), these investigators identified a previously unknown series of germline mutations in the ALK gene. Some but not all of these families had genomic amplicons on chromosome 2 that also included MYCN. Among the mutations identified, most were predicted to lead to amino acid substitutions in the ALK tyrosine kinase domain (Fig. 1). Five of the eight pedigrees with germline mutation led to proteins with the same R1275Q mutation. A neuroblastoma cell line containing the R1275Q mutation showed ALK activation, which was indicated by tyrosine phosphorylation at ALK Y1604.  Figure 1 Figure 1 The ALK receptor kinase: its domains, pathways, mutations and inhibitors. The different domains of ALK are shown within their bordering amino-acid positions. The major mutations found by Mossé et al.4, Janoueix-Lerosey et al.5, Chen et al.6 and ... Three additional publications by Janoueix-Lerosey et al.5, Chen et al.6 and George et al.7 used SNP- or amplicon-based sequencing methods to identify similar mutations in ALK (Fig. 1). Each of the three studies showed the effects of a dominant oncogene with a similar pattern of results. Not all mutations resulted in constitutive kinase activity; in fact, only the minority showed clear increases in ALK autophosphorylation and downstream target activation, such as phosphorylation of AKT. The R1275Q and F1174L(V) mutations were shown to have constitutive tyrosine phosphorylation in cell lines that endogenously expressed these mutant forms of ALK, or when expressed in either 3T3 or Ba/F3 cells6,7.  ALK mutations in neuroblastoma tissues account for small survival differences in the whole population of people with neuroblastoma; this is due to their very low incidence in the population. Still, individuals who have neuroblastomas with the ALK F1174 mutation show a significantly worse outcome relative to the overall cohort, suggesting that this mutation has an important impact on malignant progression, whereas the presence of the ALK R1275Q mutation did not make a difference8. Stratification according to ALK expression showed that individuals with high ALK expression in their tumors had a significantly worse overall survival and disease-free survival than those with low tumor ALK expression. Although this type of single-gene analysis can be useful to direct treatment with a targeted therapy, genomic instability in the tumors leads to complex mixtures of clonal cells; therefore, multigene analyses can provide a more robust predictor of disease course and may ultimately provide a more complex insight into pathways activated during tumorigenesis and even predict candidate drug sensitivity8.  The functional role of these ALK mutations was addressed in each of the four studies4–7; however, a deeper understanding will be necessary to optimize any ALK-targeted therapy. Each study used either ALK expression followed by inhibition in non-neuroblastoma cell lines, RNAi-mediated reduction of endogenous ALK expression in cell lines or small-molecule kinase inhibitors. Generally, the results from these studies supported a dominant role for mutant ALK. However, in some cases, RNAi-mediated reduction of wild-type ALK expression also reduced neuroblastoma cell growth, suggesting that the level of ALK expression might be as important as an activating mutation in driving tumorigenesis.  A recent paper by Sasaki et al.9 identified ALK F1174L as a mutation that occurred naturally in an individual with inflammatory myoblastic tumor undergoing treatment with the dual MET and ALK kinase inhibitor crizotinib. This tumor contained a somatic RANBP2-ALK translocation; however, when the person experienced recurrent disease, one ALK locus contained an additional F1174L mutation. An evaluation of the inflammatory myoblastic tumor cells harboring ALK F1174L showed that they had higher levels of phosphorylated ALK along with increased downstream phosphorylation of AKT. Thus, this study supports that F1174L is an activating mutation of ALK.  ALK was independently identified as a molecular target in neuroblastoma by screening >600 human cancer cell lines with pharmacological inhibitors of ALK kinase activity10. This work provided a platform from which to launch inhibitor development when a transforming EML4-ALK fusion gene was identified as a major driver in a subset of approximately 5% of non–small-cell lung cancers11. Indeed, a first clinical trial with crizotinib showed striking efficacy in individuals with non–small-cell lung cancer, providing evidence that a well-defined activated pathway may be targeted effectively12 (Fig. 1). A recent structural study of the ALK kinase domain revealed differences from the same domain in related receptor kinases in the insulin receptor family that will be helpful in designing new inhibitors as resistance to the initial ALK inhibitors emerges13.  As higher ALK receptor expression in neuroblastoma coincides with poorer disease outcome8, overexpressed ALK may thus be a potentially valuable therapeutic target. Indeed, two proteins—pleiotrophin and the related midkine—have been shown to activate mammalian ALK14 through extracellular interactions with it (Fig. 1). Therefore, antibody strategies to target overexpressed ALK in neuroblastoma may be an attractive additional approach. Antibody therapy may even act syn ergistically with small-molecule tyrosine kinase inhibitors.  It is clear that targeting ALK is now open season for the development of new therapies for neuroblastoma, as well as other cancers. The insights gained from ongoing trials are likely to directly benefit both subgroups of individuals whose tumors are driven by ALK and, in general, targeted approaches to cancer treatment. Obviously, genetic mutations can reveal new drivers and pathways activated in cancer and may present new therapeutic opportunities. However, fully validating any new target is a challenge at a new frontier of a deadly cancer. Genetic studies have established anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK), a cell surface receptor tyrosine kinase, as a tractable molecular target in neuroblastoma. We describe comprehensive genomic, biochemical, and computational analyses of ALK mutations across 1596 diagnostic neuroblastoma samples. ALK tyrosine kinase domain mutations occurred in 8% of samples; at three hotspots plus 13 minor sites – and correlated significantly with poorer survival in high- and intermediate-risk neuroblastoma. Biochemical and computational studies distinguished oncogenic (constitutively activating) from non-oncogenic mutations and allowed robust computational prediction of their effects. We also established differential in vitro crizotinib sensitivity of mutated variants. Our studies identify ALK genomic status as a clinically important therapeutic stratification tool in neuroblastoma, and will allow tailoring of ALK-targeted therapy to specific mutations.  Go to: Introduction Neuroblastomas are embryonal tumors that arise from the sympathetic nervous system, and represent the most frequently diagnosed malignancy in the first year of life (Cheung and Dyer, 2013; Maris, 2010). Despite improvements in treatment over recent decades, cure rates for patients with high-risk neuroblastoma (Maris, 2010) lag significantly behind those of other common childhood cancers (Smith et al., 2010). Current treatments rely on dose-intensive chemotherapy, radiation therapy, and immunotherapeutic targeting of the disialoganglioside GD2 (Maris, 2010; Yu et al., 2010). Most recent clinical studies in neuroblastoma have focused on escalating dose intensity in both induction and consolidation therapy, with evidence that this improves outcome (Pearson et al., 2008). The potential long-term adverse effects of increasing treatment intensity on survivors of this childhood cancer are a major concern (Hobbie et al., 2008; Smith et al., 2010), however – making it imperative that more effective treatment strategies are developed.  One promising avenue for targeted therapy in neuroblastoma focuses on anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK), a cell-surface neural receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK) expressed at significant levels only in the developing embryonic and neonatal brain (Iwahara et al., 1997; Morris et al., 1997). Germline mutations in intact ALK were recently identified as the major cause of hereditary neuroblastoma (Mossé et al., 2008). These mutations cause single amino acid missense substitutions in the ALK tyrosine kinase domain (TKD) that promote constitutive, ligand-independent, activation of this RTK. Somatically acquired ALK-activating mutations are also found as oncogenic drivers in neuroblastoma (Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Hallberg and Palmer, 2013; Janoueix-Lerosey et al., 2008; Mossé et al., 2008). In addition, ALK gene amplification imparts an oncogenic dependency in some cases (Janoueix-Lerosey et al., 2008; Mossé et al., 2008). ALK has thus emerged as a tractable oncogene for targeted therapy in neuroblastoma. The same tyrosine kinase is also found in oncogenic ALK fusion proteins that arise from chromosomal translocations in non-small-cell lung cancers (NSCLC) (Soda et al., 2007) and anaplastic large cell lymphomas (Morris et al., 1994), for example, motivating development of small molecule ALK kinase inhibitors. Dramatic response rates to crizotinib (an ALK/Met/Ros1 inhibitor) were seen in pretreated patients with advanced relapsed/refractory NSCLC harboring ALK rearrangements (Kwak et al., 2010; Shaw and Engelman, 2013). These studies validated ALK as a therapeutic target, and led to the expedited FDA approval of crizotinib for ALK-translocated NSCLC.  Rapid clinical translation of findings with ALK in neuroblastoma prompted a phase 1 trial of crizotinib (NCT00939770) in patients with recurrent or refractory cancer. Results from this trial highlighted the differential sensitivity to ALK kinase inhibition of ALK-translocated versus ALK-mutated disease (Mossé et al., 2013). The study also underlined the need for further detailed investigation of ALK mutations in order to optimize clinical application of ALK inhibitors in neuroblastoma. To achieve this goal a detailed analysis of the spectrum of ALK mutations, their clinical significance in neuroblastoma, and their biochemical properties is essential. The resulting data will underpin future approaches for identifying patients likely to benefit from ALK inhibition in neuroblastoma, and for predicting which newly emerging mutations are clinically relevant.  Go to: Results To examine the spectrum of ALK mutations in neuroblastoma, we analyzed germline and somatic ALK DNA alterations – at diagnosis – in samples from a cohort of 1596 neuroblastoma patients assembled in collaboration with the Children's Oncology Group (COG; Table 1).  Table 1 Table 1 Clinical, Genomic, and Survival Characteristics of Overall Patient Cohorta ALK mutations  Sequencing of ALK exons 21-28, encompassing the TKD-encoding region, identified 126 diagnostic samples with at least one mutation, corresponding to 8% of subjects (Table 1). Putative disease-associated mutations were distributed throughout the ALK TKD (Figure 1; Table S1), with an additional mutation at R1060 (between the TKD and transmembrane domain). Three additional ALK TKD sequence variations (R1231Q, I1250T, and D1349H) were observed that had previously been listed in the NCBI database of single nucleotide polymorphisms (dbSNP), but with no known clinical significance or annotation in COSMIC (Forbes et al., 2011).  Figure 1 Figure 1 Distribution of ALK mutations in tumor samples from neuroblastoma patients Three ‘hotspot’ residues accounted for 85% of mutations (Figure 1, Table 1): R1275 (43%), F1174 (30%), and F1245 (12%), consistent with previous studies (Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Hallberg and Palmer, 2013; Janoueix-Lerosey et al., 2008; Mossé et al., 2008). R1275 was substituted with glutamine or leucine in 3.4% of tumors (95% CI: 2.5, 4.3%), F1174 was altered (to L, I, V, C, or S) in 2.4% of tumors (95% CI: 1.6, 3.0%), and F1245 (to L, I, V, or C) in 0.9% (95% CI: 0.5, 1.4%). Two tumor samples harbored mutations at I1170 (to N or S), and another two at I1171 (to N). Single incidences of substitution were seen at a further 15 positions, of which 7 represent mutations not found in current databases (Table S1). Matched constitutional DNA was available for 88 of the 126 ALK-mutated samples, and contained the observed ALK substitution (indicating its presence in the germline) in just 7 cases. Although no information about family history is available, this is an expected rate based on previous analyses (Knudson and Strong, 1972; Mossé et al., 2008). Two were germline R1275Q mutations, and the remaining 5 examples were R1060H, I1183T, L1204F, R1231Q (also in dbSNP), and I1250T (also in dbSNP) mutations (Table S1).  ALK mutations were found in 10.9% of MYCN-amplified tumors, versus 7.2% of those without MYCN amplification. Mutations seen alongside MYCN amplification were biased towards F1174 substitutions (41% in MYCN-amplified cases compared with 30% overall). Further, MYCN amplification occurred in 39% of F1174-mutated tumors, compared with an expected overall frequency of 21% (p<0.01). These data support previous suggestions that F1174 mutations are over-represented in MYCN-amplified tumors, but indicate a less skewed distribution than reported earlier (De Brouwer et al., 2010). Consistent with earlier results, however, patients with both amplified MYCN and F1174-mutated ALK had a significantly worse event-free survival (EFS, p<0.0001) than patients with neither.  ALK copy number  Copy number variation at the ALK locus was observed in 17% of cases for which it was measured (Table 1). Gain of the ALK locus (3-10 copies) was seen in 195 cases (15%), with high-level amplification more rare (24 samples), and whole gene deletion rarer still (6 samples). The ALK gene is located 13.2 megabases centromeric of MYCN. ALK amplification occurred concurrently with MYCN amplification in all but one case – consistent with a previous report (Bagci et al., 2012). Accordingly, since MYCN amplification identifies a patient as a member of the high-risk group (Maris, 2010), ALK amplification occurred exclusively in this group (Table S2) and was associated with inferior outcome (5-year overall survival/OS of 23%, versus 48% in high-risk patients without ALK amplification, p=0.03; Table S3). In the 108/126 ALK-mutated tumors for which we also had copy number data, ALK mutation and high-level gene amplification were mutually exclusive (except for one G1286 variant). Further, 13% of ALK-mutated cases had low-level gain of the ALK locus, similar to the percentage seen in the overall cohort. None demonstrated allelic deletion.  ALK aberration and ALK mutation are prognostic biomarkers of inferior survival  ALK mutations were observed in tumors from all clinical risk groups, and were more commonly observed in those from older patients (Table S2). Across the whole cohort, presence of an ALK aberration (mutation or amplification) correlated with reduced EFS and OS (Figure 2A,B) – as did ALK mutation (Table 1). Presence of any ALK aberration also correlated with reduced EFS and OS in the high-risk group (Figure 2C,D). In univariable analysis, presence of an ALK mutation was also correlated with reduced EFS in intermediate-risk patients (Table S3), a heterogeneous group consisting mainly of very young patients with metastatic disease, or patients of any age with large, unresectable primary tumors. Patient outcome did not differ significantly according to location of the mutation in any analysis. Whereas robust biomarkers to assign outcome probability have been characterized for patients with low- and high-risk disease, the most appropriate therapy for patients with intermediate-risk disease is less well-defined, and our findings suggest that ALK genetic status can be used to identify cases within this group with the highest risk of treatment failure.  Figure 2 Figure 2 Event-free and overall survival based on the presence or absence of an ALK aberration In multivariable analysis of the overall cohort, presence of an ALK mutation was found to have an independent influence on survival, with a 1.4-fold greater risk of an event (or hazard ratio, HR) within 5 years (95% CI: 1.1, 1.9) compared to cases without an ALK mutation (Table 2). Similarly, independent statistically significant correlation with outcome was seen in three separate multivariable models (adjusted for other known prognostic factors) for:  Any ALK aberration (p=0.0006; HR=1.4, 95% CI: 1.2, 1.7) ALK copy number gain (p=0.04; HR=1.3, 95% CI: 1.0, 1.6) ALK amplification (p=0.003; HR=2.2, 95% CI: 1.3, 3.6). Table 2 Table 2 Multivariable Analyses Testing the Independence of Correlations between ALK mutation Status and EFS In a multivariable model adjusted for histologic category (Table 2), ALK mutation status showed statistically significant correlation with reduced EFS in both the intermediate-risk and high-risk patient groups – although not in the low-risk group, again arguing for the utility of ALK mutation status in clinical evaluation.  Predicting signaling consequences of ALK TKD mutations  Our results establish that the presence of an ALK mutation in neuroblastoma is associated with a more aggressive tumor phenotype. Not all ALK substitutions observed in neuroblastoma patients are likely to be oncogenic drivers, however. It will be important in refining therapeutic ALK mutation-based patient stratification to predict as they are observed which mutations are truly drivers that cause ligand-independent ALK signaling, and which are ‘passengers’ or variants of unknown significance. Current methods for predicting functional consequences of patient-derived mutations fall short – especially for activating mutations in kinases. Algorithms such as PolyPhen-2 (Adzhubei et al., 2010), SIFT (Kumar et al., 2009) and the consensus classifier PredictSNP (Bendl et al., 2014) estimate the likelihood of a given mutation having a deleterious effect based on sequence conservation and other criteria. PolyPhen-2 or SIFT (or both) predict that every single ALK substitution listed in Table S1 adversely affects protein function (or is ‘damaging’), except R1060H and R1231Q (a SNP). It seems highly unlikely given our understanding of kinases that even the ALK TKD C-lobe mutations L1204F, T1343I, and D1349H (also in dbSNP) are oncogenic. Moreover, the logic of conservation-based algorithms is not appropriate for predicting gain-of-function mutations in oncogenic kinase domains (Gnad et al., 2013). Indeed, a recent analysis of >400 activating substitutions (Molina-Vila et al., 2014) revealed that most driver mutations in oncogenic kinases do not occur at conserved residues at all, and that their accurate prediction will require explicit attention to kinase regulation mechanisms. Motivated by these considerations, we assessed the effects of all ALK mutations defined here (Figure 1 and Table S1) on in vitro kinase activity – to guide development of better prediction algorithms.  Biochemical effects of clinically-observed ALK TKD mutations  We first monitored autophosphorylation of purified mutated ALK TKDs using native gel electrophoresis (Figure S1) as described (Bresler et al., 2011). The well-studied F1174L and R1275Q mutations greatly accelerated TKD autophosphorylation as expected. So did substitutions at 5 of the other positions listed in Table S1 (M1166, I1170, I1171, F1245, and Y1278), as did the previously reported G1128A and R1192P germline neuroblastoma mutations (Bourdeaut et al., 2011; Janoueix-Lerosey et al., 2008; Mossé et al., 2008). Mutations at T1151, L1196, and G1286 also promoted modest constitutive activation. By contrast, substitutions at five other sites (I1183, A1200, R1231, T1343, and D1349) and those found in dbSNP (R1231Q and D1349H) failed to activate the isolated TKD (Figure S1), signifying that these are unlikely to be clinically significant. D1270G-mutated ALK TKD failed to become autophosphorylated at all, suggesting that this is an inactivating mutation – as expected since D1270 lies in the conserved DFG motif essential for Mg2+-ATP binding to kinases. We did not analyze ALK TKDs harboring L1204F, L1240V, or I1250T mutations in this assay, since they were poorly expressed as recombinant proteins.  For more quantitative analyses, we assayed the ability of the mutated TKDs to phosphorylate a peptide corresponding to ALK's activation loop, and determined values for kcat, KM, ATP, and kcat/KM in vitro. We analyzed both fully auto-phosphorylated ALK TKDs and non-phosphorylated proteins (phosphatase treated as described in Supplemental Experimental Procedures). Non-phosphorylated ALK TKD represents the ‘basal’ kinase state for each receptor variant, whereas autophosphorylated ALK TKDs represent the corresponding activated states – with kcat increased by ∼45-fold in the case of wild-type ALK (Bresler et al., 2011).  Effects of mutations on basal activity of non-phosphorylated ALK TKD The effects of mutations on non-phosphorylated ALK TKD activity vary according to their location in the kinase. F1174 and F1245 mutations have the strongest effect, increasing kcat by 36-39 fold (Figure 3A; Table S4) – close to the 45-fold increase caused by autophosphorylation of wild-type ALK TKD (Bresler et al., 2011). F1174 and F1245 contribute to a cluster of phenylalanine side-chains (red in Figure 3: the ‘Phe core’) that normally stabilizes the autoinhibited TKD conformation (Bossi et al., 2010; Lee et al., 2010). Mutating these residues will destabilize ALK's autoinhibitory interactions and promote activation. Almost all of the other significantly activating mutations (increasing kcat by >10-fold) occur either at residues in the αC-helix (M1166, I1170, I1171) or in the short α-helix within the activation loop of the inactive TKD (R1275, Y1278). These residues (blue in Figure 3) all participate in autoinhibitory interactions between helix αC and the activation loop α-helix that normally stabilize the inactive conformation of non-phosphorylated ALK TKD (Bossi et al., 2010; Lee et al., 2010), and are disrupted by the mutations analyzed here. Mutations in the N-lobe (green) or phosphate-binding P-loop (cyan) have much smaller effects on ALK TKD (Figure 3A). The only exception is the germline R1192P mutation (which increases kcat of non-phosphorylated ALK TKD by 15 fold). Mutations in the ALK TKD active site (magenta) or C-lobe (grey) have little or no influence on kcat (<3-fold increase), except for the L1196M ‘gatekeeper’ mutation, which increases kcat by nearly 5 fold. Peptide phosphorylation studies further confirmed that the D1270G variant is inactive (Table S4), and revealed a reduced activity for the I1250T (SNP) variant, consistent with previous work (Schönherr et al., 2011a).  Figure 3 Figure 3 kcat and KM, ATP values for mutated ALK TKD variants KM, ATP values for non-phosphorylated ALK TKD variants (discussed in more detail below) all fell within a narrow range from 0.13 mM (wild-type) to 0.39 mM (L1196M) – suggesting that all variants are saturated with ATP under physiological conditions (Figure 3B). Accordingly, catalytic efficiencies (kcat/KM, ATP) for non-phosphorylated ALK TKD variants (Figure S2A) follow very similar trends to those seen for kcat. The same is true for kcat/KM, peptide values (Figure S2B).  Effects of neuroblastoma mutations on activity of fully autophosphorylated ALK TKD The effects of patient-derived ALK mutations on the activity of fully autophosphorylated ALK TKD (prepared as described in Supplemental Experimental Procedures) were much more modest. With the exception of the I1170N variant (for which kcat was just 35% of wild-type), no variant was altered by more than 2-fold in kcat (Figure 3C, Table S5). Overall, therefore, neuroblastoma-derived mutations have their greatest effects on the activity of non-phosphorylated ALK TKD, promoting its constitutive autophosphorylation and thus ligand-independent signaling by the intact receptor.  Transforming ability of mutated ALK variants  To assess how biochemical characteristics relate to transforming ability we measured the ability of intact ALK variants harboring the same TKD mutations to induce focus formation in NIH 3T3 cells (Figure 4A). As shown in Figure 4B and C, quantitation of focus formation assays (Table S6) reveals a remarkably close correspondence between transforming potential and in vitro kcat value for the corresponding non-phosphorylated TKD variants (Figure 3A). A plot of transforming ability against kcat for non-phosphorylated TKD (Figure 4C) yields a straight line with correlation coefficient (r) of 0.95 (p<0.0001). Relative outliers were G1128A (in the P-loop) and L1196M (in the active site), which both appeared relatively more transforming than suggested by in vitro biochemical data, and M1166R, which appeared less transforming than expected by this simple correlation. Transforming potential correlates with kcat of the non-phosphorylated TKD slightly better than it does with either measure of catalytic efficiency: kcat/KM, ATP (r=0.88) or kcat/KM, peptide (r=0.89). By contrast, when transforming ability is plotted against kcat for phosphorylated TKD variants, the slope does not deviate significantly from zero (p=0.68), indicating no correlation (Figure 4C, Figure S2C).  Figure 4 Figure 4 Transformation potential of ALK mutants from NIH 3T3 focus formation assays Taken together, the data in Figures 3 and and44 argue that activity of the non-phosphorylated ALK TKD is an excellent predictor of ALK's transforming ability in NIH 3T3 cells. An increase of just 4.6 – 4.8-fold in the kcat of non-phosphorylated ALK TKD appears sufficient for NIH 3T3 cell transformation, judging from results with the G1128A (cyan) and L1196M (magenta) variants (Figure 4, Table S4). The one exception to this correlation is the N-lobe T1151M variant, for which a relatively reduced kcat/KM, peptide value (Figure S2B, Table S4) may explain failure to transform NIH 3T3 cells (presumably because of elevated KM, peptide). It is important to note that none of the three ALK mutations previously reported in dbSNP (R1231Q, I1250T, and D1349H, all in the C-lobe) were associated with ALK activation in transformation or biochemical assays (Figures 3 and and4);4); these are silent or passenger mutations. Moreover, analysis of transforming ability in Figure 4B (as a measure of oncogenicity) paints a very different functional picture from that predicted by PolyPhen-2 or SIFT across the spectrum of ALK mutations. These algorithms predict that all mutations (except R1060H and R1231Q) are damaging or affect function – whereas our experimental analysis shows that 11 of the 24 mutations have no significant activating effect. ALK is unlikely to be an important driver in neuroblastoma cases with any of these non-activating mutations, and crizotinib is very unlikely to be therapeutically useful in these contexts. The ‘silent’ mutations account for one of every ∼11 of ALK-mutated patients, and it is important to identify them.  Crizotinib sensitivities of recombinant ALK TKD variants  At least two of the ALK driver mutations observed in neuroblastoma (F1174L and L1196M) have also arisen as acquired crizotinib resistance mutations in tumors driven by oncogenic ALK fusion proteins (Choi et al., 2010; Sasaki et al., 2010). These findings suggest that primary resistance will be a major concern in crizotinib treatment of ALK-mutated neuroblastoma, as we have discussed previously (Bresler et al., 2011). A mere ∼3-fold reduction in KM, ATP appeared sufficient to impair in vivo crizotinib sensitivity of F1174L-mutated ALK when compared with the R1275Q variant, consistent with the appearance of F1174L as an acquired resistance mutation in both a crizotinib-treated inflammatory myofibroblastic tumor (Sasaki et al., 2010) and in vitro screens for crizotinib-resistance mutations in EML4-ALK (Zhang et al., 2011). Table 3 lists KM, ATP values for the other non-phosphorylated ALK TKD variants described here. Based solely on reduced KM, ATP values (as for F1174L), and assuming unchanged crizotinib affinity, the G1128A, M1166R, F1245C, F1245V, or Y1278S variants would be suggested to be relatively crizotinib resistant, whereas the I1170N, I1170S, I1171N, and L1196M (gatekeeper) variants would be argued to resemble R1275Q in being sensitive to crizotinib (with relatively larger KM, ATP values). R1192P is intermediate.  Table 3 Table 3 Crizotinib Sensitivities of Non-phosphorylated ALK-TKD Mutants at 2.0 mM ATPa Direct measurement of crizotinib IC50 values in vitro (at 2 mM ATP), however, reveals that the correlation with KM, ATP is not simple. The L1196M (gatekeeper) variant is resistant to crizotinib (Figure S3) despite its high KM, ATP – indicating a differential effect of this mutation on ATP and crizotinib binding, as expected from its appearance as an acquired resistance mutation (Katayama et al., 2011). Similarly, I1171N-mutated ALK is less crizotinib sensitive in vitro than a simple view of ATP competition (and KM, ATP) would suggest – further supported by the fact that mutations at I1171 emerged alongside F1174 mutations in screens for crizotinib-resistant variants of EML4-ALK (Zhang et al., 2011). By contrast, the M1166R, F1245V, and F1245C variants are more sensitive to crizotinib in vitro than simple consideration of KM, ATP would suggest – resembling the R1275Q variant in our in vitro crizotinib inhibition studies (Table 3) and NIH 3T3 focus assays (not shown). This finding is particularly important given that F1245 is the third most commonly mutated site in neuroblastoma, accounting for ∼12% of mutations. Our data suggest that cases with F1245 mutations should respond to crizotinib just as well as R1275Q-mutated tumors.  The data in Table 3 make it clear that the individual ALK TKD mutations affect binding of ATP and crizotinib in different ways, and assessment of IC50 values for a selection of mutations in NIH 3T3 focus assays (not shown) concurs. For example, the L1196M mutation impairs crizotinib binding more than ATP binding – thus causing resistance to the drug. It will therefore be important to compare the relative abilities of next generation ALK inhibitors to inhibit the variants studied here. One new inhibitor, called ceritinib, was recently shown to inhibit ALK variants with crizotinib-resistant L1196M, or I1171T mutations (Friboulet et al., 2014), but not to overcome resistance of an F1174 mutation. Other inhibitors are also known to have differential effects on crizotinib-resistance mutations acquired in ALK-rearranged lung cancers (Johnson et al., 2014; Sakamoto et al., 2011). The data in Table 3 suggest that neuroblastoma patients with ALK-activating M1166R, I1170N/S or F1245 mutations should respond to crizotinib just as well as R1275Q-mutated patients. Patients with I1171 or L1196 mutations are likely to respond better to ceritinib, and those with F1174L (and possible other) mutations might be more responsive to the macrocyclic inhibitor PF-06463922 (Johnson et al., 2014). Y1278, R1192 and G1128 mutations appear to be intermediate between these two groups, and comparative studies of ALK inhibitors are needed to determine which inhibitor would be best for these cases.  Computational analysis of mutated ALK TKDs  The poor performance of existing informatics-based approaches in distinguishing activating from non-activating amino acid substitutions prompted us to investigate structure-based computational methods for assessing newly emerging ALK mutations. Importantly, apart from already published data, the computational analysis was done without prior knowledge of biochemical results emerging from this study. As described in Supplemental Experimental Procedures, we simulated molecular dynamics (MD) trajectories for the inactive conformation of all mutated ALK TKD variants, and for wild-type ALK TKD, in both active and inactive conformations. The resulting MD trajectories were analyzed for three key structural properties:  i). Hydrogen bonding network Distinct sets of key intramolecular hydrogen bonds characterize the active and inactive ALK TKD configurations. Those that maintain the (autoinhibited) positions of the activation loop and αC helix in the inactive TKD (in Figure 3D) are absent in the active structure. A simple scoring function (see Supplemental Experimental Procedures) was used to determine whether each mutation promotes a more ‘active-like’ or ‘inactive-like’ hydrogen-bonding network (Table 4).  Table 4 Table 4 Computational Prediction of Effects of ALK TKD Mutations ii). Hydrophobic interaction network As mentioned above, key autoinhibitory interactions are stabilized in the inactive conformation by residues with hydrophobic side-chains – notably those in the Phe-core (red in Figure 3D) and contacts between the αC-helix and short activation-loop helix (blue in Figure 3D). Disruption of these autoinhibitory hydrophobic interactions can be assessed readily by monitoring the solvent-accessible surface area (SASA) of relevant residues throughout the MD trajectories. If SASA increases as a result of a neuroblastoma mutation, the mutation is classed as ‘activating’. To further determine whether observed changes in SASA favor the active state, free energy perturbation (FEP) simulations were used to determine whether each mutation significantly destabilizes the inactive state relative to the active state (in which case it is classed as ‘activating’).  iii). Principal component analysis (PCA) PCA reveals correlated global motions across the MD trajectory. The top 10 dominant modes are considerably different (greater) in the active conformation than in inactive ALK TKD (indicating greater motion), as seen for other kinases (Shih et al., 2011). As outlined in Supplemental Experimental Procedures, each mutant with a top eigenvalue above 200 Å2 is scored as activating (indicating destabilization of key autoinhibitory interactions).  A mutation is predicted to be ‘activating’ overall if it scores as such in one or more of the three criteria outlined above. As shown in Table 4, predictions for each mutated ALK TKD variant studied here agree quite well with our experimental studies. Moreover, the computational analysis suggests a possible mechanism of activation for each mutation, i.e., by perturbing hydrophilic interactions, hydrophobic interactions, or global conformation. All of the mutations that elevate kcat of non-phosphorylated ALK TKD by over 5-fold were predicted correctly except two (I1171N, and F1245C), as listed in Table 4. Perhaps more importantly, our computational analysis correctly predicts the majority of mutations that are not activating – thus showing its value in distinguishing passenger from driver mutations and its potential utility for patient stratification. There are a few exceptions, however. The T1151M mutation was designated as activating in our computational analysis, but did not transform NIH 3T3 cells (Figure 4). Although biochemical analysis indicated an elevated kcat for this variant, it has a reduced kcat/KM, peptide, apparently arising from an elevated KM, peptide that would not be captured computationally. The I1250T and D1270G mutations – both also predicted to be activating using our computational approach – are special cases. D1270 is the conserved DFG aspartate, and loss of its side-chain removes a functional group essential for Mg2+ binding to the TKD. The I1250T mutation impairs protein stability and/or folding (as assessed by poor expression) in a way that the model cannot predict, so no activating effect is seen experimentally. The computational analysis also failed to predict three transforming mutations (Table 4): F1245C, I1171N, and L1196M (the gatekeeper mutation), for reasons that are less clear. Overall, however, our computational approach correctly predicts 75% of the transforming mutations and – importantly – over 75% of silent mutations (excepting special cases). By contrast, PolyPhen-2 (Table 4, right-most column) predicts only one silent mutation correctly and is plagued with false positives. It is important to reiterate that our computational studies were undertaken with no prior knowledge of the results shown in Figures 3 and and44 (with the exception of previously published results).  Go to: Discussion Discovery of activating mutations in the intact ALK gene as drivers in neuroblastoma provided the first example of a pediatric cancer caused by germline mutations in an oncogene, and the only druggable mutation in a pediatric solid tumor. We characterized the spectrum and frequency of germline and somatic alterations in ALK across all neuroblastoma disease subsets in 1596 patients. This dataset is powered to identify ALK mutations in neuroblastoma that, while rare, are still clinically relevant, and to have sufficient power to determine the prognostic capability of ALK alterations within each neuroblastoma risk group (high, intermediate, and low). In addition, cataloguing ALK mutations in these tumors allowed us to correlate sequence variations with oncogenic potency. Some of the observed mutations are unlikely to be oncogenic, and the activated variants differ in their sensitivity to crizotinib – with potentially important therapeutic implications. In multivariable models of the overall cohort, and within each risk group, both the presence of an ALK mutation (except within the low-risk group) and the presence of any ALK aberration were shown to correlate independently with worse EFS. These findings illustrate the value of determining ALK status for prognostic patient stratification, and also support the potential importance of ALK as a therapeutic target.  ALK mutations were observed in 8% of neuroblastoma patients, and span the entire spectrum of disease, including INSS Stage 4 disease, congenital cases, and adolescents/young adults. The fact that ALK mutations occur at the highest frequency (17%) in patients older than 10 suggests differences in the occurrence of genetic mutations based on age, reminiscent of the recently reported age distribution of ATRX mutations in neuroblastoma (Cheung et al., 2012). Within the high-risk subset of neuroblastoma patients the overall frequency of ALK aberration is 14% (10% mutation, 4% amplification). High-risk patients have the poorest outcomes, with approximately only 50% OS despite intensive multi-modal therapy including chemotherapy, surgery, myeloablative conditioning with bone marrow transplant, radiation therapy and immunotherapy plus retinoic acid (Maris, 2010) – making these patients excellent candidates for ALK-targeted therapy. Within the low- and intermediate-risk groups, the frequency of ALK aberration is 6% and 8% respectively. In low-risk cases, therapy usually involves observation, with or without surgical intervention, whereas patients with intermediate-risk disease are treated with conventional cytotoxic chemotherapy and are at risk for the associated late effects. Our results suggest an important opportunity within the intermediate-risk group to identify those with an activating ALK mutation for treatment with ALK inhibitors and de-escalation of traditional cytotoxic therapy.  Of the 24 different patient-derived ALK mutations assessed, only 13 drove transformation of NIH 3T3 cells. Where our studies overlap with other analyses of transformation by ALK variants found in neuroblastoma, they are in complete agreement (Chand et al., 2013; George et al., 2008; Schönherr et al., 2011a; Schönherr et al., 2011b). Importantly, every mutation that promoted transformation also constitutively activated the ALK TKD, with remarkable correlation between transforming activity and in vitro kcat value for the non-phosphorylated TKD. Eleven of the 24 mutations (representing 9% of ALK-mutated patients in this study) appeared silent or even inactivating. Of the activating mutations, in vitro analyses suggest that only 6 (including R1275Q) will be sensitive to inhibition by crizotinib in vivo. Some others are likely to respond better to next generation inhibitors that appear capable of inhibiting L1196M and I1171 variants (ceritinib) or F1174 variants (PF-06463922). Further comparative studies with these inhibitors are required to identify which is optimal for each variant.  Using a molecular dynamics (MD)-based computational approach, we showed that we can predict which mutations are activating – and more importantly which are not activating – with a success rate that greatly exceeds methods such as SIFT, PolyPhen-2, PredictSNP, and others. For example, our method correctly (and blindly) predicted the consequences of all newly described ALK mutations presented in this report, with D1270G as the one exception (where a catalytically crucial residue is mutated). It is important to note that our computational analysis assesses kinase activation, and not transformation itself – but our biochemical data indicate that elevating kcat of non-phosphorylated ALK TKD by 4.6-fold or more causes the receptor to be transforming. Our computational analysis of ALK mutations has significant promise as a clinical tool, and will improve with further training and testing using additional clinically observed (and experimental) mutations. It will also be important to apply computational approaches similar to those that we have employed for EGFR (Park et al., 2012) in efforts to predict inhibitor sensitivity.  Our findings allow us to formulate molecular diagnostic screening recommendations for newly diagnosed neuroblastoma patients, which will be important in clinical evaluation of ALK inhibitors for childhood cancer. We demonstrate that ALK is a predictive therapeutic biomarker of disease status, and also provides a therapeutic target in a select group of patients. With additional molecularly targeted therapeutics and computational models that leverage biochemical understanding to predict the effect of newly emerging ALK mutations, we should now be able to make upfront predictions about which patients are most likely to respond to crizotinib or other ALK inhibitors and (importantly) identify those that will not. Related approaches have been successful with imatinib in chronic myeloid leukemia, gefitinib in NSCLC, and most recently crizotinib in ALK-translocated NSCLC – although functional stratification of individual mutations along the lines described here has not yet been achieved. We are now poised to develop a responder hypothesis as part of a therapeutic strategy that incorporates pharmacologic ALK inhibition into the backbone of contemporary treatment regimens in neuroblastoma. Our phase 1 trial of crizotinib showed some promising responses even in heavily pretreated patients with ALK mutations with recurrent or refractory late-stage disease (Mossé et al., 2013), despite the facts that these heavily pre-treated patients are frequently multi-drug resistant, and also show an increased prevalence of p53 mutations at relapse (Carr-Wilkinson et al., 2010) – confounding factors that were not assessed. In newly diagnosed patients, where these issues are not relevant (and p53 mutations are rare), we expect upfront ALK-targeted treatment guided by the results described here to yield dramatically improved results.  In addition, our findings will help advance the management of individuals with neuroblastoma predisposition. Individuals with a germline ALK variation of unknown significance may have siblings who also harbor these variants, emphasizing the importance of understanding which alleles are indeed risk-alleles so as to determine their risk of developing neuroblastoma, and to offer appropriate clinical screening. No models have yet been established for effective early detection strategies or improving clinical outcomes when germline ALK variations are detected. Implementing clinical surveillance strategies for unaffected children (possibly even adults) with neuroblastoma carrying a germline ALK variant should be guided by data such as those presented here, recognizing the implications of the use of predictive genetic screening and surveillance practices and the absence of evidence of benefit from early detection in these individuals.  
1562||In the era of personalized medicine, understanding the molecular drivers of oncogenesis will be likely to trump morphological characteristics with regard to diagnostics, prognostics and choice of therapies. Identifying single driver mutations from billions of possibilities used to require substantial insight. However, as the cost of deep genomic sequencing goes down each month, clever tricks such as identifying family cohorts may not be as necessary. Family cohorts have driven genetic discovery for decades, including the identification of most tumor suppressor genes and many oncogenes.  Neuroblastoma is a lethal cancer of early childhood that essentially comes in two forms: highly malignant and locally manageable, or, to paraphrase Audrey Evans, an early leader in the field, the ‘good’ies and the ‘bad’ies. The underlying genes responsible for neuroblastoma remain largely unknown, despite the discovery of a handful of genetic changes that have been implicated in neuroblastoma development. For example, Brodeur et al.1 and Look et al.2 correlated MYCN oncogene amplification with aggressive tumors that have a high propensity for metastasis and that cause mortality. Also, very small subsets of familial neuroblastoma were associated with PHOX2B (encoding paired-like homeobox-2) mutations, but these mutations accounted for only very few families (reviewed in ref. 3).  To identify additional oncogenes that cause familial neuroblastoma, Mossé et al.4 returned to old-fashioned family trees. They collected the pedigrees of 20 families that showed an autosomal dominant pattern of neuroblastoma inheritance. Using a genome-wide scan for linkage at 6,000 single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs), these investigators identified a previously unknown series of germline mutations in the ALK gene. Some but not all of these families had genomic amplicons on chromosome 2 that also included MYCN. Among the mutations identified, most were predicted to lead to amino acid substitutions in the ALK tyrosine kinase domain (Fig. 1). Five of the eight pedigrees with germline mutation led to proteins with the same R1275Q mutation. A neuroblastoma cell line containing the R1275Q mutation showed ALK activation, which was indicated by tyrosine phosphorylation at ALK Y1604.  Figure 1 Figure 1 The ALK receptor kinase: its domains, pathways, mutations and inhibitors. The different domains of ALK are shown within their bordering amino-acid positions. The major mutations found by Mossé et al.4, Janoueix-Lerosey et al.5, Chen et al.6 and ... Three additional publications by Janoueix-Lerosey et al.5, Chen et al.6 and George et al.7 used SNP- or amplicon-based sequencing methods to identify similar mutations in ALK (Fig. 1). Each of the three studies showed the effects of a dominant oncogene with a similar pattern of results. Not all mutations resulted in constitutive kinase activity; in fact, only the minority showed clear increases in ALK autophosphorylation and downstream target activation, such as phosphorylation of AKT. The R1275Q and F1174L(V) mutations were shown to have constitutive tyrosine phosphorylation in cell lines that endogenously expressed these mutant forms of ALK, or when expressed in either 3T3 or Ba/F3 cells6,7.  ALK mutations in neuroblastoma tissues account for small survival differences in the whole population of people with neuroblastoma; this is due to their very low incidence in the population. Still, individuals who have neuroblastomas with the ALK F1174 mutation show a significantly worse outcome relative to the overall cohort, suggesting that this mutation has an important impact on malignant progression, whereas the presence of the ALK R1275Q mutation did not make a difference8. Stratification according to ALK expression showed that individuals with high ALK expression in their tumors had a significantly worse overall survival and disease-free survival than those with low tumor ALK expression. Although this type of single-gene analysis can be useful to direct treatment with a targeted therapy, genomic instability in the tumors leads to complex mixtures of clonal cells; therefore, multigene analyses can provide a more robust predictor of disease course and may ultimately provide a more complex insight into pathways activated during tumorigenesis and even predict candidate drug sensitivity8.  The functional role of these ALK mutations was addressed in each of the four studies4–7; however, a deeper understanding will be necessary to optimize any ALK-targeted therapy. Each study used either ALK expression followed by inhibition in non-neuroblastoma cell lines, RNAi-mediated reduction of endogenous ALK expression in cell lines or small-molecule kinase inhibitors. Generally, the results from these studies supported a dominant role for mutant ALK. However, in some cases, RNAi-mediated reduction of wild-type ALK expression also reduced neuroblastoma cell growth, suggesting that the level of ALK expression might be as important as an activating mutation in driving tumorigenesis.  A recent paper by Sasaki et al.9 identified ALK F1174L as a mutation that occurred naturally in an individual with inflammatory myoblastic tumor undergoing treatment with the dual MET and ALK kinase inhibitor crizotinib. This tumor contained a somatic RANBP2-ALK translocation; however, when the person experienced recurrent disease, one ALK locus contained an additional F1174L mutation. An evaluation of the inflammatory myoblastic tumor cells harboring ALK F1174L showed that they had higher levels of phosphorylated ALK along with increased downstream phosphorylation of AKT. Thus, this study supports that F1174L is an activating mutation of ALK.  ALK was independently identified as a molecular target in neuroblastoma by screening >600 human cancer cell lines with pharmacological inhibitors of ALK kinase activity10. This work provided a platform from which to launch inhibitor development when a transforming EML4-ALK fusion gene was identified as a major driver in a subset of approximately 5% of non–small-cell lung cancers11. Indeed, a first clinical trial with crizotinib showed striking efficacy in individuals with non–small-cell lung cancer, providing evidence that a well-defined activated pathway may be targeted effectively12 (Fig. 1). A recent structural study of the ALK kinase domain revealed differences from the same domain in related receptor kinases in the insulin receptor family that will be helpful in designing new inhibitors as resistance to the initial ALK inhibitors emerges13.  As higher ALK receptor expression in neuroblastoma coincides with poorer disease outcome8, overexpressed ALK may thus be a potentially valuable therapeutic target. Indeed, two proteins—pleiotrophin and the related midkine—have been shown to activate mammalian ALK14 through extracellular interactions with it (Fig. 1). Therefore, antibody strategies to target overexpressed ALK in neuroblastoma may be an attractive additional approach. Antibody therapy may even act syn ergistically with small-molecule tyrosine kinase inhibitors.  It is clear that targeting ALK is now open season for the development of new therapies for neuroblastoma, as well as other cancers. The insights gained from ongoing trials are likely to directly benefit both subgroups of individuals whose tumors are driven by ALK and, in general, targeted approaches to cancer treatment. Obviously, genetic mutations can reveal new drivers and pathways activated in cancer and may present new therapeutic opportunities. However, fully validating any new target is a challenge at a new frontier of a deadly cancer.  SUMMARY Neuroblastoma is a childhood extracranial solid tumour that is associated with a number of genetic changes. Included in these genetic alterations are mutations in the kinase domain of the anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK) receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK), which have been found in both somatic and familial neuroblastoma. In order to treat patients accordingly requires characterisation of these mutations in terms of their response to ALK tyrosine kinase inhibitors (TKIs). Here, we report the identification and characterisation of two novel neuroblastoma ALK mutations (A1099T and R1464STOP), which we have investigated together with several previously reported but uncharacterised ALK mutations (T1087I, D1091N, T1151M, M1166R, F1174I and A1234T). In order to understand the potential role of these ALK mutations in neuroblastoma progression, we have employed cell culture-based systems together with the model organism Drosophila as a readout for ligand-independent activity. Mutation of ALK at position 1174 (F1174I) generates a gain-of-function receptor capable of activating intracellular targets such as ERK (extracellular signal regulated kinase) and STAT3 (signal transducer and activator of transcription 3) in a ligand-independent manner. Analysis of these previously uncharacterised ALK mutants and comparison with ALKF1174 mutants suggests that ALK mutations observed in neuroblastoma fall into three classes. These classes are: (i) gain-of-function ligand-independent mutations such as ALKF1174l, (ii) kinase-dead ALK mutants, e.g. ALKI1250T (Schönherr et al., 2011a) and (iii) ALK mutations that are ligand-dependent in nature. Irrespective of the nature of the observed ALK mutants, in every case the activity of the mutant ALK receptors could be abrogated by the ALK inhibitor crizotinib (Xalkori/PF-02341066), albeit with differing levels of sensitivity.  Go to: INTRODUCTION Neuroblastoma is a common childhood cancer that arises in the tissues of the sympathetic nervous system (Maris et al., 2007). It most commonly originates in the adrenal glands, but can also develop at additional sites in the neck, chest and abdomen. It is considered to be a disease of developing tissue because it originates from precursor cells of neural crest tissue that are active during embryonic development. This in part explains the median age of 17 months for occurrence of neuroblastoma (Maris, 2010). Recently, anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK) gain-of-function mutations have been described in both familial (Janoueix-Lerosey et al., 2008; Mossé et al., 2008) and sporadic neuroblastoma (Carén et al., 2008; Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Martinsson et al., 2011; Mossé et al., 2008). Although there is currently no clinically approved treatment for ALK mutations in neuroblastoma, ongoing clinical trials are expected to determine the potential usefulness of ALK-targeted therapies for use in the future. Inhibition of ALK activity using crizotinib (Xalkori/PF-02341066) has been reported in both inflammatory myofibroblastic tumours (IMT) and non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) patients (Butrynski et al., 2010; Kwak et al., 2010). Anti-ALK inhibitor therapy thus appears to offer promise in the treatment of ALK-mediated tumours at this point (Hallberg and Palmer, 2011). It is of future clinical importance to characterise each ALK mutation so that individual patients can be treated accordingly. Furthermore, we have addressed the important issue of whether ALK mutations are resistant to the medicine that is currently in use.  ALK was originally identified as a fusion partner with nucleophosmin or nucleolar protein gene (NPM)-ALK oncogene in anaplastic large cell lymphoma (Morris et al., 1994; Shiota et al., 1994). Later, ALK was reported to be receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK), with a molecular weight of 220 kDa, belonging to the insulin receptor superfamily (Iwahara et al., 1997; Morris et al., 1997). ALK contains an extracellular ligand-binding domain, a transmembrane-spanning domain and an intracellular tyrosine kinase domain (Palmer et al., 2009) and is expressed primarily in the central and peripheral nervous system during embryonic development and at lower concentrations in the nervous system of adults. Its expression is also observed in developing sensory organs, reproductive organs, skin and stomach (Iwahara et al., 1997; Morris et al., 1997; Vernersson et al., 2006) and its physiological function is still enigmatic. It has been associated with multiple translocation events involved in several different human malignancies (Palmer et al., 2009), such as IMT (Griffin et al., 1999), NSCLC (Rikova et al., 2007; Soda et al., 2007), diffuse large B cell lymphomas (DLBCL) (Arber et al., 1996) and renal cell carcinoma (Debelenko et al., 2011) amongst others. Involvement of ALK in a number of human diseases including neuroblastoma has accelerated recent efforts to understand the function of this RTK under both pathological and non-pathological conditions.  In this study, we have characterised a number of novel mutations in the ALK gene from neuroblastoma patients. From analysis of genomic DNA from patient biopsy samples, two novel germ line mutations were identified, leading to A1099T and R1464STOP mutations at the protein level. We have investigated these mutations, looking at whether they could act as driver or passenger mutations in neuroblastoma, with the aim of predicting their potential role in disease progression. Further, we have compared them with a number of other previously reported, but currently uncharacterised, ALK mutations, namely T1087I, D1091N, T1151M, M1166R and F1174I.  Our findings confirm that the ALKF1174I mutation, in keeping with the previously characterised ALKF1174S and ALKF1174L mutants, is a gain-of-function mutation that mediates activation of downstream targets such as ERK and STAT3 in a ligand-independent manner. The ALKF1174I mutant is able to transform both Ba/F3 and NIH3T3 cells. Although we observed that the ALKM1166R mutant is unable to transform Ba/F3 cells, it was able to give rise to foci in NIH3T3 transformation assays. Taken together, our data suggest that the ALK mutations investigated to date fall into three classes: (i) gain-of-function ligand-independent mutations (e.g. F1174I), (ii) kinase-dead ALK mutants (Schönherr et al., 2011a) and (iii) ALK mutations that are ligand-dependent in nature, such as the human ALK mutations (T1087I, D1091N, A1099T, T1151M, M1166R, A1234T, R1464STOP), which are not constitutively active but which display ligand-dependent activation when challenged with agonist antibodies. Importantly, to date, the activity of all ALK mutants tested can be abrogated by treatment with ALK small molecule TKIs.  TRANSLATIONAL IMPACT  Clinical issue  Neuroblastoma is a childhood extracranial solid tumour that has been associated with alterations in several different genes. Among these, are mutations in the kinase domain of the anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK), a receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK). ALK mutations have been reported in both somatic and familial forms of neuroblastoma. Many ALK mutations confer a gain of function to the protein, but mechanistic information is not available for all identified mutations. Optimal treatment of neuroblastoma (e.g. with tyrosine kinase inhibitors) requires a clearer understanding of how different ALK mutations influence protein function and, in turn, contribute to neuroblastoma development. In addition, it is important to investigate whether certain ALK mutations confer resistance to currently available neuroblastoma drugs.  Results  Here, the authors compared signalling mediated by several different ALK mutants identified in patients with neuroblastoma with signalling mediated by wild-type ALK. Their studies aimed to determine whether disease-associated ALK mutations are universally gain-of-function and whether certain ALK mutations can confer resistance to tyrosine kinase inhibitors. Their results, together with existing data, suggest that the neuroblastoma-associated ALK mutations characterised thus far fall into three classes: (i) gain-of-function, ligand-independent mutations of varying activation strength, such as ALKF1174, (ii) kinase-dead ALK mutants, such as ALKI1250T and (iii) ALK mutations that are ligand-dependent and might represent ‘passenger’ mutations. Importantly, the activity of all mutant ALK receptors, irrespective of mutation type, could be abrogated by the ALK inhibitor crizotinib, albeit with differing levels of sensitivity.  Implications and future directions  Characterizing individual ALK mutations is clinically important so that individual neuroblastoma patients can be classified and treated appropriately. These results provide mechanistic information on several neuroblastoma-associated ALK mutations and propose a way to classify all ALK mutants. Encouragingly, these results also indicate that various types of ALK mutations are sensitive to currently available neuroblastoma therapy.  Go to: RESULTS Evaluating the role of human ALK mutations as driver or passenger  We set out to characterise two novel germ line ALK variants identified in patients with neuroblastoma (ALKA1099T and ALKR1464STOP) and their potential roles as driver or passenger mutations in neuroblastoma. ALKA1099T was identified in a Japanese infant diagnosed with neuroblastoma, born to unrelated healthy parents with no neuroblastoma history. No MYCN amplification or ALK amplification was detected in this patient, and the tumour was classified as stage 2. The ALKA1099T variant was heterozygous in both tumour and blood DNA samples. The ALKR1464STOP mutation was observed in the DNA and RNA from a patient sample analysed as part of the TARGET (therapeutically applicable research to generate effective treatments) initiative, which aims to characterise the genomic landscape of the most common childhood cancers, including neuroblastoma. This sequence variant was heterozygous in tumour DNA and RNA, as well as in blood DNA. DNA from the patient's parents was not available for testing.  Also included in this analysis were the earlier reported, but as yet uncharacterised, putative gain-of-function ALK mutations: ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKT1151M, ALKM1166R, ALKF1174I and ALKA1234T (Fig. 1A,B) (Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Mossé et al., 2008). As a positive control, the previously verified constitutively active ALK mutations ALKF1174L and ALKF1174S were also included (Martinsson et al., 2011). Initially, we investigated these eight human neuroblastoma ALK mutations in a PC12 cell culture system, examining both signalling activity and capacity to drive differentiation, as measured by neurite outgrowth. PC12 cells are a clonal rat adrenal pheochromocytoma cell line, which are well characterised as differentiating and extending neurites upon stimulation with nerve growth factor or differentiation factors (Greene and Tischler, 1976). They do not express ALK at detectable levels. We, and others, have previously shown that expression of wild-type ALK (ALKwt), followed by stimulation with ALK agonist monoclonal antibody 31 (mAb31) or expression of activating ALK mutants leads to neurite extension in PC12 cells (Martinsson et al., 2011) (Fig. 1C, lane 1). PC12 cells were transiently transfected with ALK mutants and serum-starved for 48 hours prior to stimulation with mAb31 for 30 minutes. Both human ALKwt and human ALKF1174S were included as controls (Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Martinsson et al., 2011) (Fig. 1). The ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants displayed characteristics similar to that of ALKwt and were able to activate downstream targets such as ERK only upon stimulation with agonist mAb31 (Fig. 1C). In a manner similar to that previously observed for human ALKF1174S, two of the mutants investigated (human ALKM1166R and human ALKF1174I) were able to activate phosphorylation of ERK in the absence of agonist mAb31, suggesting that these two mutants might be constitutively activated in a ligand-independent manner (Fig. 1C). Furthermore, in keeping with this hypothesis, both human ALKM1166R and human ALKF1174I mediated robust phosphorylation of STAT3, as reported for the ALKF1174S mutation (Fig. 1C). Interestingly, none of the other mutants were able to generate STAT3 phosphorylation or activation upon stimulation for up to 30 minutes, as previously shown for wild-type ALK (Schönherr et al., 2011b).  Fig. 1. Fig. 1. Domain structure of ALK mutations and their activation of downstream targets. (A) The extracellular, transmembrane domain and the intracellular domain, which contains the protein tyrosine kinase domain are shown. Mutation residues within the intracellular ... Thus, in this initial analysis, the ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants were found to be inducibly activated by agonist mAb31 and displayed enhanced activation of ERK upon stimulation. However, they were unable to activate STAT3. By contrast, both ALKM1166R and ALKF1174I appeared to be activated in a ligand-independent manner and led to robust activation of downstream targets, such as ERK and STAT3, in a manner similar to the ALKF1174S mutation.  Crizotinib blocks neurite outgrowth activity of human ALK mutants  The PC12 cell system is a sensitive readout for ALK signalling activity as a result of receptor activation (Schönherr et al., 2011b; Yang et al., 2007). Transient transfection of ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP did not stimulate neurite outgrowth in the absence of agonist mAb31. However, addition of agonist antibody lead to significantly increased levels of neurite outgrowth (up to 30-40%) (Fig. 2). The levels of ALK-induced neurite outgrowth were similar to that observed upon stimulation of the wild-type ALK receptor. In agreement with our earlier results, the ALKM1166R and ALKF1174I mutants were capable of mediating neurite outgrowth in a ligand-independent manner, displaying similar percentages of neurite outgrowth in the presence or absence of agonist antibody (Fig. 2). To investigate whether neurite outgrowth could be abrogated by ALK inhibition, we employed crizotinib (Xalkori), an FDA-approved small inhibitor of both ALK and MET receptor tyrosine kinases, which is being employed in phase II and III clinical trials (Butrynski et al., 2010; Kwak et al., 2010; Hallberg and Palmer, 2011). Crizotinib (250 nM) treatment resulted in a significant reduction in ALK-induced neurite outgrowth. Thus, crizotinib is able to effectively block neurite outgrowth mediated by all human ALK mutants investigated here.  Fig. 2. Fig. 2. Crizotinib abrogates ALK-mediated neurite outgrowth in PC12 cells. PC12 cells were co-transfected with pcDNA3-human ALK and pEGFPN1 and seeded out in the presence or absence of crizotinib. Cells were stimulated with 1 μg/ml mAb31. After 48 hours, ... In Ba/F3 cells, crizotinib inhibits constitutively active ALK mutants with varying IC50 values  To confirm and extend our analysis of the inhibition of these ALK mutants by crizotinib, the Ba/F3 cell system was employed (Lu et al., 2009; Schönherr et al., 2011b). Ba/F3 cells, an IL-3-dependent cell line, are often employed in kinase drug discovery, exploiting their characteristic of being able to overcome IL-3 dependence, which allows them to survive and proliferate in the absence of IL-3 when expressing constitutively active tyrosine kinase or other oncogenes (Warmuth et al., 2007). Ba/F3 cells were transfected with human wild-type ALK and the eight different ALK mutants, and subsequently selected with the antibiotic G418 in the presence of IL-3 for 10 days. We observed that Ba/F3 cells expressing the different ALK mutants exhibited variable proliferation ability in the absence of IL-3 (Fig. 3B). At the end of selection in IL-3-free medium, only the human ALKF1174I mutant gave rise to IL-3-independent cell lines, along with the human ALKF1174L positive control. By contrast, ALKwt, ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, human ALKM1166R, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants were unable to substitute for IL-3 to drive proliferation in Ba/F3 cells, even though they expressed ALK protein (Fig. 3A,B and data not shown). To further analyse the responsiveness of these mutants toward crizotinib, the cells were treated with different doses of this ALK inhibitor. Importantly, crizotinib did not inhibit cell growth or cell viability when cells were grown in the presence of IL-3 (Fig. 3C), indicating that it is not toxic to Ba/F3 cells at the levels employed. Proliferation of both human ALKF1174I and human ALKF1174L mutants was blocked by crizotinib (Fig. 4A). IC50 (concentration of drug responsible for 50% inhibition) values show that inhibition of ALKF1174I required similar doses of crizotinib as human ALKF1174L (Fig. 4B). Furthermore, inhibition of ALK mutant activity was also confirmed at the level of ALK tyrosine phosphorylation at position 1278. Tyr1278 corresponds to the first tyrosine of the Y'RAS'YY motif in the A-loop of ALK that is necessary for auto-activation of ALK kinase domain and transformation ability of nucleophosmin (NPM)-ALK (Tartari et al, 2008). Immunoblot analysis performed on Ba/F3 cell lysates showed a reduction in the levels of ALK Tyr1278 phosphorylation in the presence of inhibitor for both human ALKF1174L and human ALKF1174I mutants (Fig. 4C). In agreement with these results, both mutants exhibited decreased ALK Tyr1604 phosphorylation (Fig. 4C). Reduced levels of ERK phosphorylation by both mutants upon treatment with crizotinib confirmed the inhibition of ALK-mediated downstream targets (Fig. 4C). Taken together, these data suggest that crizotinib is able to block the ALK activity of these mutants in a dose-dependent manner.  Fig. 3. Fig. 3. Expression of human ALK in Ba/F3 cells. (A) Ba/F3 cells were transfected with human wild-type or mutant ALKs and selected with G418 in the presence of IL-3. Whole cell lysates were prepared and run on SDS-PAGE, followed by immunoblotting with indicated ... Fig. 4. Fig. 4. Crizotinib inhibits both human ALKF1174-driven proliferation and phosphorylation at Tyr1278 and Tyr1604 of ALK in Ba/F3 cells. (A) IC50 values for crizotinib for both human ALKF1174I and human ALKF1174L were calculated. Values represent mean + s.d. from ... Transforming potential of human ALK mutations  We further examined the transforming ability of human ALK mutants using NIH3T3 cells. Expression of the human ALK mutations ALKwt, ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP were unable to generate formation of foci greater than that of the vector control or ALK wild-type control. By contrast, both ALKF1174I and ALKF1174L displayed robust foci formation, although ALKM1166R showed rather weak foci formation ability in comparison with ALKF1174S (Fig. 5A). These results indicate different degrees of foci formation by the ligand-independent ALK mutations, which is in agreement with our previous results in the Ba/F3 system (Fig. 5B).  Fig. 5. Fig. 5. Transformation potential of human ALK mutants. (A,B) The transforming potential of the mutations was assayed by transfecting NIH3T3 cells with pcDNA3-human ALK (mutant and wild type). Cells were selected with G418 for 3 weeks. (A) Representative images ... Ectopic expression of human ALK mutants in Drosophila melanogaster  Transgenic Drosophila expressing the human ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants were generated to confirm their ligand-dependent characteristics. These were ectopically expressed in Drosophila eye, together with the previously generated human ALKF1174L and ALKwt, employing the pGMR-Gal4 driver line, which directs protein expression in developing photoreceptors of the eye. The expression of human ALK proteins was confirmed by immunostaining of the eye discs by using anti-human ALK antibody. Expression of human ALKF1174L resulted in a rough eye phenotype, whereas expression of human ALKwt, ALKA1234T or ALKR1464STOP did not show any obvious phenotype in adult flies (Martinsson et al., 2011) (Fig. 6). However, the regular hexagonal arrangement of ommatidia was disorganised, with many interommatidial bristles missing in human ALKF1174L. The data strongly support the conclusion that the human ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants are ligand-dependent in nature.  Fig. 6. Fig. 6. Ectopic expression of human ALKA1234T and human ALKR1464STOP in Drosophila eye does not generate the rough eye phenotype. Adult fly eyes (upper) and larval eye discs (lower) ectopically expressing mutant human ALK variants. Human ALKwt and human ALKF1174L ... Go to: DISCUSSION ALK mutations have been reported in both familial (Mossé et al., 2008) and sporadic neuroblastoma (Carén et al., 2008; Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Janoueix-Lerosey et al., 2008; Martinsson et al., 2011; Mossé et al., 2008). The presence of ALK mutations in neuroblastoma draws attention to its possible function and its role in disease progression. Therefore, characterisation of these different ALK mutations is an important exercise in assessing whether the various mutants are functional or not, with potential importance for the patient to be treated accordingly.  In this study, we have investigated two novel mutations of ALK (ALKA1099T and ALKR1464STOP) and compared them with six previously described but uncharacterised human ALK point mutations (ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKT1151M, ALKM1166R, ALKF1174I and ALKA1234T) from neuroblastoma patients, with the aim of assessing whether these mutations could drive tumour progression (Table 1). So far, and from our knowledge of neuroblastoma tumour analysis and published reports to date, only one neuroblastoma patient has presented with a homozygous ALK mutation (Martinsson et al., 2011). To date, one mutation (ALKI1250T) has been reported to have defective kinase activity, raising important questions as to the impact, if any, that this mutation has upon neuroblastoma progression (Schönherr et al., 2011a). Signalling studies in the PC12 cell system showed differences in the activation of downstream targets by the various ALK mutants examined. ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP showed little phosphorylation of ERK, which was enhanced by stimulation with agonist antibodies. On the other hand, ALKM1166R and ALKF1174I mediated ligand-independent phosphorylation of ERK and STAT3. Likewise, the ALKM1166R and ALKF1174I mutants were able to mediate neurite outgrowth in PC12 cells in a ligand-independent manner (Table 1). The other ALK mutations (ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP) displayed inducible activity and resulted in neurites only when stimulated with agonist antibodies, which could be abrogated by crizotinib (Table 1). Furthermore, we co-transfected our ligand-dependent mutants together with wild-type ALK. We observed no change in the phosphorylation of ERK or in the levels of neurite outgrowth ability when compared with wild-type ALK alone in PC12 cells (data not shown).  Table 1. Table 1. Characterization of ALK mutations in order to assess their oncogenic potential Interestingly, the ALKM1166R mutant gave rise to weak foci formation in NIH3T3 cells in comparison with the ALKF1174I mutant, which displayed robust foci formation (Table 1). In this assay, the human ALK mutations ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP did not yield any foci as expected. These results thus revealed that only the ALKF1174I and ALKM1166R mutants harbour transforming potential in NIH3T3 cells. To complement these analyses, we employed the Ba/F3 cell model system. This revealed that even though the ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKM1166R, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutant receptors were expressed, they could not substitute for IL-3 to drive proliferation in Ba/F3 cells. Our Ba/F3 results with the ALKT1151M and ALKA1234T mutations are in agreement with earlier reported results (George et al., 2008). However, human ALKF1174I and the human ALKF1174L control, gave rise to IL-3-independent cell lines. Both mutations displayed sensitivity towards crizotinib in a dose-dependent manner, as shown by their different IC50 values (Table 1). These data are in agreement with previous reports showing that different ALK mutations exhibit different levels of sensitivity towards crizotinib (Bresler et al., 2011; Schönherr et al., 2011b). We also show that cell proliferation and phosphorylation of ALK at tyrosine positions 1278 and 1604 are blocked by using crizotinib, as expected (Fig. 4) (Schönherr et al., 2011b; Tartari et al., 2008). These data indicate that the human ALKF1174I mutant is able to mediate neurite outgrowth, transform NIH3T3 cells, activate downstream targets of ALK (such as ERK and STAT3) in a ligand-independent manner and substitute for IL-3 in Ba/F3 cells, giving rise to IL-3-independent cell line. Thus, we conclude that human ALKF1174I is a gain-of-function mutation that is sensitive to crizotinib inhibition.  The ALKM1166R mutation gives rise to neurites in PC12 cells, activates downstream targets (such as ERKs and STAT3) in a ligand-independent manner and shows weak foci formation. However, it fails to substitute for IL-3 and, hence, does not yield any IL-3-independent Ba/F3 cell lines in our hands. This is comparable to the ALKR1275Q mutant, which also displays neurite generating ability but is unable to support Ba/F3 IL-3-independent growth (Schönherr et al., 2011b). Amino acid Met1166 is not conserved in insulin receptor kinase (IRK) family members, perhaps implying that it might have a structural and functional role specific to ALK (Lee et al., 2010). Met1166 is located in the interface between the αC-helix and the DFG-helix and mutations of this residue would probably destabilise the DFG-helix and consequently facilitate the shift of the αC-helix (Fig. 1B) (Bossi et al., 2010). From a structural point of view, both positions 1166 and 1174 are in or very close to the αC-helix, which plays an important role in the activation process of the insulin receptor family members. Upon activation, the αC-helix moves a few degrees closer to the ATP-catalytic site that mediates the γ-phospho-exchange from bound ATP to the interacting substrate (Lemmon and Schlessinger, 2010). Furthermore, it has previously been shown that mutation at position 1174 changes the character of the ALK protein from a ligand-dependent receptor to a receptor exhibiting gain-of-function properties (Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Martinsson et al., 2011). Probably, this mutations results in disruption of the packing, weakening distinctive structural features observed in the ALK structure, such as the unique inhibitory position of the ALK A-loop packing a short proximal A-loop α-helix against the αC-helix of ALK, while a β-turn motif obstructs the substrate binding region (Fig. 1B). In this arrangement, Tyr1278 is inaccessible for phosphorylation because it is engaged in the interaction interface through bonding with Cys1097 in the N-terminal β-sheet (Bossi et al, 2010; Lee et al, 2010). Both Phe1174 and Met1166 mutations can probably weaken auto-inhibitory interactions and allow the ALK kinase domain to more easily adopt its active configuration. However, unlike ALKF1174 mutants, the ALKM1166R mutation is not a robust gain-of-function mutation, although it is able to transform NIH3T3 cells, mediate neurite outgrowth, and activate downstream ALK targets, such as STAT3 and ERK. Moreover, unlike ALKF1174 mutants, ALKM1166R lacks the ability to mediate Il-3 independent growth of Ba/F3 cells. Our analyses suggest that although ALKM1166R is able to weaken the auto-inhibitory interaction, this does not occur to the same degree as with the ALKF1174 mutations. The extent to which an ALKM1166R mutation contributes to neuroblastoma disease progression or tumour initation is unclear from our experiments.  Consideration of the impact of the ALKT1087I and ALKD1091N mutations on ALK kinase activity from a structural point of view is difficult because they have not been included in any structural study to date. Both are located close to the C-terminal of the β1 and β2 sheets in the kinase domain (Bossi et al., 2010; Lee et al, 2010). Another mutation investigated here is at position Ala1099, which is located between the β1' and β2' sheets. Both Lee et al. and Bossi et al. have indicated that nearby Cys1097 plays an important role in mediating a hydrogen bond with the unphosphorylated tyrosine at position 1278 when ALK is in an inactive configuration (Fig. 1B, sticks and dots) (Lee et al, 2010; Bossi et al., 2010). Our analyses of these, together with the location of the ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N and ALKA1099T mutations, indicate that no gross structural conformation changes occur that result in the mutant ALK protein gaining characteristics that differ significantly from the wild-type protein (Table 1). The Thr1151 mutation is located in the β3 sheet, included in the framework of five-stranded, twisted anti-parallel β-sheets that build up predominantly the N-terminal kinase lobe. Apparently, mutation of Thr1151 to methionine (T1151M) does not affect the ability of the ALK kinase domain to be activated upon stimulation. Finally, it is difficult to predict the effect of the 1464STOP mutation, although from our analyses we would speculate that at least in terms of activation it behaves in a manner similar to the wild-type receptor, i.e. the receptor displays ligand-dependent activation. However, the manner and regulation of inactivation of such a truncated receptor might be an important aspect that could be of relevance in neuroblastoma.  The expression of mutants such as ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP neither renders Ba/F3 cells independent of IL-3 for their growth nor exhibits transforming activity. Additionally, the mutants do not form foci in NIH3T3 cells. Importantly, however, they are able to give rise to neurites and stimulate activation of ERK in the presence of agonist antibodies. Furthermore, all the mutations in this study are successfully blocked by crizotinib, which results in a decrease in ALK phosphorylation and its downstream target ERK in a manner similar to the controls employed in this study, i.e. ALKF1174L and ALKF1174S (Martinsson et al., 2011; Schönherr et al., 2011b). A recent study has investigated a number of ALK mutants, which have been identified by the Cancer Genome Project (Sanger Institute, Cambridge, UK) in cell lines from a range of tumour types. This analysis included F1174L, from the SH-SY5Y neuroblastoma cell line, as well as a number of additional previously uncharacterised ALK mutations, and looked at their transfomation potential. Similarly to the mutants investigated here (ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP) the ALK mutants investigated by McDuff and colleagues do not render Ba/F3 cells independent of IL-3 for their growth, exhibit lack of transforming activity and might represent passenger mutations in the evolution of cancer (McDuff et al., 2011). However, this work did not examine whether the various ALK mutants were able to respond to activation by external ligand or agonist antibodies or examine their sensitivity to treatment with crizotinib.  From our present analysis of previously uncharacterised ALK mutants, and in light of other reports concerning ALK mutant variants, the accumulated data suggests that the ALK mutations observed and characterised in neuroblastoma to date fall into three classes. These classes are: (i) gain-of-function ligand-independent mutations of varying activation strength, e.g. ALKF1174; (ii) kinase-dead ALK mutants, e.g. ALKI1250T (Schönherr et al., 2011a); and (iii) ALK mutations that are ligand-dependent in nature and which might represent ‘passenger’ mutations. Irrespective of the nature of the observed ALK mutant, in every case the activity of the mutant ALK receptors can be abrogated by treatment with the ALK inhibitor crizotinib, albeit with differing levels of sensitivity. Present knowledge would predict that these mutants will also be sensitive to inhibition by next generation ALK TKIs. Although a role for the class of ligand-independent ALK mutants such as ALKF1174 and ALKR1275 is simple to rationalise, further work will be required to answer the more challenging issue of the significance of the ligand-dependent class of ALK mutants, if any, in neuroblastoma progression.  Go to: MATERIALS AND METHODS Patients: Case 1 (A1099T) and Case 2 (R1464STOP)  Case report 1 A 14-day-old newborn Japanese boy infant diagnosed with neurblastoma was born to unrelated healthy parents with no neuroblastoma history. The tumour was classified as stage 2 and no MYCN amplification nor ALK amplification were detected by array comparative genomic hybridisation (CGH) analysis. This patient is still alive and disease-free, and at this point is 11 years old. DNA ploidy of the tumour was aneuploidy (DNA index was 1.34) and array CGH showed whole chromosome 17 gain, with the pattern of whole chromosomal gains and losses in other multiple chromosomes. The tumour was morphologically diagnosed as favourable according to the Shimada classification (Shimada et al., 1999). Tropomyosin-receptor-kinase (Trk) A was highly expressed in the tumour. The A1099T (GCT/ACT) ALK variant appeared to be heterozygous and present in both tumour and blood DNA, suggesting that this is a germline mutation.  Case report 2 Tumour and blood DNA from a 21-month-old Caucasian American male with stage 4 neuroblastoma were sequenced as part of the TARGET project. The tumour was characterised by MYCN amplification using fluorescence in situ hybridisation (FISH), unfavourable histology (Shimada et al., 1999) and a DNA index of 1.908. Whole genome, exome, and transcriptome sequencing were performed using the Illumina Genome Analyzer. Data were processed as previously described (Morin et al., 2011; Morozova et al., 2010). Sequencing revealed a heterozygous R1646STOP variant in both tumour and blood DNA. In the blood genome, eight reads (47%) supported the reference allele G, and nine reads (53%) supported the alternative allele A. In the tumour genome, five sequencing reads (31%) supported the G allele, and eleven reads supported the A allele. Both reference and alternative alleles were expressed in the tumour transcriptome, with nine and seven reads (56% and 44%) supporting the reference and mutant alleles, respectively. The variant was independently verified by Sanger sequencing.  Generation of human ALK mutant constructions  ALKwt, ALKF1174L and ALKF1174S have been described earlier (Martinsson et al., 2011). All other ALK mutants employed in this study were created in pcDNA3 by Eurofins MWG/operon (Ebersberg, Germany). The mutations generated in the kinase domain were confirmed by sequencing from both directions.  Antibodies and inhibitors  Primary antibodies used were: anti-pan-ERK (1:5000), purchased from BD Transduction Laboratories (Franklin Lakes, NJ), anti-pALK(Y1278), anti-pALK(Y1604), anti-pERK(T202/Y204) and anti- pSTAT3 (Y705) were from Cell Signaling Technology (Danvers, MA). The activating monoclonal antibody mAb31 has been described previously (Martinsson et al., 2011; Moog-Lutz et al., 2005). Monoclonal antibody 153 (anti-ALK) was produced in the Hallberg laboratory against the extracellular domain of ALK as described (Moog-Lutz et al., 2005). Horseradish-peroxidase-conjugated secondary antibodies goat anti-rabbit IgG and goat anti-mouse IgG (diluted 1:5000) were from Thermo Scientific (Waltham, MA). The ALK inhibitor crizotinib (PF-02341066, Xalkori) was a generous gift from Pfizer, Inc.  Neurite outgrowth assay  PC12 cells (2×106) were transfected by electroporation in an Amaxa electroporator (Amaxa Biosystems, Cologne, Germany) using 0.8 μg of pcDNA3-human ALK and 0.5 μg pEGFPN1 (Clontech, Mountain view, CA) and 100 μl Ingenio electroporation solution (Mirus Bio LCC, Madison, WI). Transfected cells were subsequently seeded into 24-well plates together with mAb31 (1 μg/ml) and the inhibitor crizotinib (250 nM) in complete growth medium (Martinsson et al., 2011). After 48 hours of incubation, the fraction of GFP-positive and neuritecarrying cells versus GFP-positive cells was observed under a Zeiss Axiovert 40 CFL microscope. To be judged as a neurite-carrying cell, the neurite of the cell was required to reach at least twice the length of the diameter of a normal cell body. Experiments were performed in triplicates and each sample within an experiment was assayed in duplicate.  Cell proliferation assay and IC50 determination  Ba/F3 cells expressing either human ALKwt or mutant human ALK were generated by electroporation with pcDNA3-human ALK using Amaxa electroporator (Amaxa Biosystems, Cologne, Germany). Transfectants were selected in RPMI with 10% heat-inactivated foetal bovine serum (FBS) and 2.5 ng/ml IL-3 (Peprotech, Rocky Hill, NJ) in the presence of G418 (600 μg /ml) for 10 days. Cells were washed with PBSA and seeded at 0.5×106 cells/ml in RPMI with 10% FBS and G418 for generation of human ALK-expressing IL-3-independent cells (Schönherr et al., 2011b). For calculation of IC50 values, human ALK-expressing Ba/F3 cells were treated with varying concentrations of crizotinib for 3 days. Cell viability was tested with resazurin (Sigma, Stockholm, Sweden) (O'Brien et al., 2000). The IC50 value was determined for individual cell lines and the experiment was carried out at least three times independently, in triplicate.  Cell lysis and western blotting  PC12 cells expressing human ALK mutants were serum-starved for 36 hours prior to stimulation with 1 μg/ml of the activating mAb31 for 30 minutes (Moog-Lutz et al., 2005; Schönherr et al., 2010; Yang et al., 2007). IL-3-independent human ALK-expressing Ba/F3 cells were treated with crizotinib in complete medium for 3 hours. Cells were washed with PBSA and lysed in SDS-sample buffer. Pre-cleared lysates were run on SDS/PAGE, followed by western blotting using the indicated antibodies. ALK downstream activation was detected by pERK and pSTAT3(Y705); pan-ERK was used as loading control. ALK phosphorylation was analysed with pALK(Y1278) and pALK(Y1604) antibodies. Cell lysis and immunoblotting were performed according to described protocols (Schönherr et al., 2010).  Transformation assay  NIH3T3 cells (4.5×104) were seeded in collagen-coated 12-well plates prior to transfection for 6 hours with 1.75 μg pcDNA3.1-human ALK and 4.4 μl Lipofectamine 2000 (Invitrogen, Paisley, UK) in 0.3 ml Opti-MEM. The next day, 60% of the cells were transferred to six-well plates and maintained in DMEM with 10% heat-inactivated FBS and 0.5 mg/ml G418 until the cells reached confluency. Then, the cells were cultivated in DMEM with 5% heat-inactivated FBS and 0.25 mg/ml G418 for approximately 10 days. The cells were then fixed using methanol and stained with 0.25% crystal violet. The foci visible by the naked eye were subsequently analysed (Schönherr et al., 2011a).  Expression of human ALK mutants in Drosophila eye  The Gal4-UAS expression system was employed to express human ALK in the Drosophila eye (Brand and Perrimon, 1993). DNA encoding ALK1234T and ALK1464STOP were subcloned with EcoRI and NotI from pcDNA3-ALK1234T and pcDNA3-ALK1464STOP, and the resulting fragments were ligated into the EcoRI-NotI site of the pUAST vector. Transgenic flies carrying pUAST-ALK were generated by BestGene (Chino Hills, CA) and crossed with pGMR-Gal4 (Bloomington, stock no. 9146). Offspring were fixed with 4% glutaraldehyde in PBS overnight and subjected to electron microscopic analysis. To confirm the expression of human ALK, eye discs of third instar larva were stained with anti-ALK mAb153 (Schönherr et al., 2011a). Antibody binding was visualised using Cy3-labelled anti-mouse IgG (Amersham). The discs were mounted on slides in Fluoromount-G (Southern Biotechnology Associates, Birmingham, AL) and imaged using a Zeiss Apotome. 
1565||In the era of personalized medicine, understanding the molecular drivers of oncogenesis will be likely to trump morphological characteristics with regard to diagnostics, prognostics and choice of therapies. Identifying single driver mutations from billions of possibilities used to require substantial insight. However, as the cost of deep genomic sequencing goes down each month, clever tricks such as identifying family cohorts may not be as necessary. Family cohorts have driven genetic discovery for decades, including the identification of most tumor suppressor genes and many oncogenes.  Neuroblastoma is a lethal cancer of early childhood that essentially comes in two forms: highly malignant and locally manageable, or, to paraphrase Audrey Evans, an early leader in the field, the ‘good’ies and the ‘bad’ies. The underlying genes responsible for neuroblastoma remain largely unknown, despite the discovery of a handful of genetic changes that have been implicated in neuroblastoma development. For example, Brodeur et al.1 and Look et al.2 correlated MYCN oncogene amplification with aggressive tumors that have a high propensity for metastasis and that cause mortality. Also, very small subsets of familial neuroblastoma were associated with PHOX2B (encoding paired-like homeobox-2) mutations, but these mutations accounted for only very few families (reviewed in ref. 3).  To identify additional oncogenes that cause familial neuroblastoma, Mossé et al.4 returned to old-fashioned family trees. They collected the pedigrees of 20 families that showed an autosomal dominant pattern of neuroblastoma inheritance. Using a genome-wide scan for linkage at 6,000 single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs), these investigators identified a previously unknown series of germline mutations in the ALK gene. Some but not all of these families had genomic amplicons on chromosome 2 that also included MYCN. Among the mutations identified, most were predicted to lead to amino acid substitutions in the ALK tyrosine kinase domain (Fig. 1). Five of the eight pedigrees with germline mutation led to proteins with the same R1275Q mutation. A neuroblastoma cell line containing the R1275Q mutation showed ALK activation, which was indicated by tyrosine phosphorylation at ALK Y1604.  Figure 1 Figure 1 The ALK receptor kinase: its domains, pathways, mutations and inhibitors. The different domains of ALK are shown within their bordering amino-acid positions. The major mutations found by Mossé et al.4, Janoueix-Lerosey et al.5, Chen et al.6 and ... Three additional publications by Janoueix-Lerosey et al.5, Chen et al.6 and George et al.7 used SNP- or amplicon-based sequencing methods to identify similar mutations in ALK (Fig. 1). Each of the three studies showed the effects of a dominant oncogene with a similar pattern of results. Not all mutations resulted in constitutive kinase activity; in fact, only the minority showed clear increases in ALK autophosphorylation and downstream target activation, such as phosphorylation of AKT. The R1275Q and F1174L(V) mutations were shown to have constitutive tyrosine phosphorylation in cell lines that endogenously expressed these mutant forms of ALK, or when expressed in either 3T3 or Ba/F3 cells6,7.  ALK mutations in neuroblastoma tissues account for small survival differences in the whole population of people with neuroblastoma; this is due to their very low incidence in the population. Still, individuals who have neuroblastomas with the ALK F1174 mutation show a significantly worse outcome relative to the overall cohort, suggesting that this mutation has an important impact on malignant progression, whereas the presence of the ALK R1275Q mutation did not make a difference8. Stratification according to ALK expression showed that individuals with high ALK expression in their tumors had a significantly worse overall survival and disease-free survival than those with low tumor ALK expression. Although this type of single-gene analysis can be useful to direct treatment with a targeted therapy, genomic instability in the tumors leads to complex mixtures of clonal cells; therefore, multigene analyses can provide a more robust predictor of disease course and may ultimately provide a more complex insight into pathways activated during tumorigenesis and even predict candidate drug sensitivity8.  The functional role of these ALK mutations was addressed in each of the four studies4–7; however, a deeper understanding will be necessary to optimize any ALK-targeted therapy. Each study used either ALK expression followed by inhibition in non-neuroblastoma cell lines, RNAi-mediated reduction of endogenous ALK expression in cell lines or small-molecule kinase inhibitors. Generally, the results from these studies supported a dominant role for mutant ALK. However, in some cases, RNAi-mediated reduction of wild-type ALK expression also reduced neuroblastoma cell growth, suggesting that the level of ALK expression might be as important as an activating mutation in driving tumorigenesis.  A recent paper by Sasaki et al.9 identified ALK F1174L as a mutation that occurred naturally in an individual with inflammatory myoblastic tumor undergoing treatment with the dual MET and ALK kinase inhibitor crizotinib. This tumor contained a somatic RANBP2-ALK translocation; however, when the person experienced recurrent disease, one ALK locus contained an additional F1174L mutation. An evaluation of the inflammatory myoblastic tumor cells harboring ALK F1174L showed that they had higher levels of phosphorylated ALK along with increased downstream phosphorylation of AKT. Thus, this study supports that F1174L is an activating mutation of ALK.  ALK was independently identified as a molecular target in neuroblastoma by screening >600 human cancer cell lines with pharmacological inhibitors of ALK kinase activity10. This work provided a platform from which to launch inhibitor development when a transforming EML4-ALK fusion gene was identified as a major driver in a subset of approximately 5% of non–small-cell lung cancers11. Indeed, a first clinical trial with crizotinib showed striking efficacy in individuals with non–small-cell lung cancer, providing evidence that a well-defined activated pathway may be targeted effectively12 (Fig. 1). A recent structural study of the ALK kinase domain revealed differences from the same domain in related receptor kinases in the insulin receptor family that will be helpful in designing new inhibitors as resistance to the initial ALK inhibitors emerges13.  As higher ALK receptor expression in neuroblastoma coincides with poorer disease outcome8, overexpressed ALK may thus be a potentially valuable therapeutic target. Indeed, two proteins—pleiotrophin and the related midkine—have been shown to activate mammalian ALK14 through extracellular interactions with it (Fig. 1). Therefore, antibody strategies to target overexpressed ALK in neuroblastoma may be an attractive additional approach. Antibody therapy may even act syn ergistically with small-molecule tyrosine kinase inhibitors.  It is clear that targeting ALK is now open season for the development of new therapies for neuroblastoma, as well as other cancers. The insights gained from ongoing trials are likely to directly benefit both subgroups of individuals whose tumors are driven by ALK and, in general, targeted approaches to cancer treatment. Obviously, genetic mutations can reveal new drivers and pathways activated in cancer and may present new therapeutic opportunities. However, fully validating any new target is a challenge at a new frontier of a deadly cancer.  SUMMARY Neuroblastoma is a childhood extracranial solid tumour that is associated with a number of genetic changes. Included in these genetic alterations are mutations in the kinase domain of the anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK) receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK), which have been found in both somatic and familial neuroblastoma. In order to treat patients accordingly requires characterisation of these mutations in terms of their response to ALK tyrosine kinase inhibitors (TKIs). Here, we report the identification and characterisation of two novel neuroblastoma ALK mutations (A1099T and R1464STOP), which we have investigated together with several previously reported but uncharacterised ALK mutations (T1087I, D1091N, T1151M, M1166R, F1174I and A1234T). In order to understand the potential role of these ALK mutations in neuroblastoma progression, we have employed cell culture-based systems together with the model organism Drosophila as a readout for ligand-independent activity. Mutation of ALK at position 1174 (F1174I) generates a gain-of-function receptor capable of activating intracellular targets such as ERK (extracellular signal regulated kinase) and STAT3 (signal transducer and activator of transcription 3) in a ligand-independent manner. Analysis of these previously uncharacterised ALK mutants and comparison with ALKF1174 mutants suggests that ALK mutations observed in neuroblastoma fall into three classes. These classes are: (i) gain-of-function ligand-independent mutations such as ALKF1174l, (ii) kinase-dead ALK mutants, e.g. ALKI1250T (Schönherr et al., 2011a) and (iii) ALK mutations that are ligand-dependent in nature. Irrespective of the nature of the observed ALK mutants, in every case the activity of the mutant ALK receptors could be abrogated by the ALK inhibitor crizotinib (Xalkori/PF-02341066), albeit with differing levels of sensitivity.  Go to: INTRODUCTION Neuroblastoma is a common childhood cancer that arises in the tissues of the sympathetic nervous system (Maris et al., 2007). It most commonly originates in the adrenal glands, but can also develop at additional sites in the neck, chest and abdomen. It is considered to be a disease of developing tissue because it originates from precursor cells of neural crest tissue that are active during embryonic development. This in part explains the median age of 17 months for occurrence of neuroblastoma (Maris, 2010). Recently, anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK) gain-of-function mutations have been described in both familial (Janoueix-Lerosey et al., 2008; Mossé et al., 2008) and sporadic neuroblastoma (Carén et al., 2008; Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Martinsson et al., 2011; Mossé et al., 2008). Although there is currently no clinically approved treatment for ALK mutations in neuroblastoma, ongoing clinical trials are expected to determine the potential usefulness of ALK-targeted therapies for use in the future. Inhibition of ALK activity using crizotinib (Xalkori/PF-02341066) has been reported in both inflammatory myofibroblastic tumours (IMT) and non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) patients (Butrynski et al., 2010; Kwak et al., 2010). Anti-ALK inhibitor therapy thus appears to offer promise in the treatment of ALK-mediated tumours at this point (Hallberg and Palmer, 2011). It is of future clinical importance to characterise each ALK mutation so that individual patients can be treated accordingly. Furthermore, we have addressed the important issue of whether ALK mutations are resistant to the medicine that is currently in use.  ALK was originally identified as a fusion partner with nucleophosmin or nucleolar protein gene (NPM)-ALK oncogene in anaplastic large cell lymphoma (Morris et al., 1994; Shiota et al., 1994). Later, ALK was reported to be receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK), with a molecular weight of 220 kDa, belonging to the insulin receptor superfamily (Iwahara et al., 1997; Morris et al., 1997). ALK contains an extracellular ligand-binding domain, a transmembrane-spanning domain and an intracellular tyrosine kinase domain (Palmer et al., 2009) and is expressed primarily in the central and peripheral nervous system during embryonic development and at lower concentrations in the nervous system of adults. Its expression is also observed in developing sensory organs, reproductive organs, skin and stomach (Iwahara et al., 1997; Morris et al., 1997; Vernersson et al., 2006) and its physiological function is still enigmatic. It has been associated with multiple translocation events involved in several different human malignancies (Palmer et al., 2009), such as IMT (Griffin et al., 1999), NSCLC (Rikova et al., 2007; Soda et al., 2007), diffuse large B cell lymphomas (DLBCL) (Arber et al., 1996) and renal cell carcinoma (Debelenko et al., 2011) amongst others. Involvement of ALK in a number of human diseases including neuroblastoma has accelerated recent efforts to understand the function of this RTK under both pathological and non-pathological conditions.  In this study, we have characterised a number of novel mutations in the ALK gene from neuroblastoma patients. From analysis of genomic DNA from patient biopsy samples, two novel germ line mutations were identified, leading to A1099T and R1464STOP mutations at the protein level. We have investigated these mutations, looking at whether they could act as driver or passenger mutations in neuroblastoma, with the aim of predicting their potential role in disease progression. Further, we have compared them with a number of other previously reported, but currently uncharacterised, ALK mutations, namely T1087I, D1091N, T1151M, M1166R and F1174I.  Our findings confirm that the ALKF1174I mutation, in keeping with the previously characterised ALKF1174S and ALKF1174L mutants, is a gain-of-function mutation that mediates activation of downstream targets such as ERK and STAT3 in a ligand-independent manner. The ALKF1174I mutant is able to transform both Ba/F3 and NIH3T3 cells. Although we observed that the ALKM1166R mutant is unable to transform Ba/F3 cells, it was able to give rise to foci in NIH3T3 transformation assays. Taken together, our data suggest that the ALK mutations investigated to date fall into three classes: (i) gain-of-function ligand-independent mutations (e.g. F1174I), (ii) kinase-dead ALK mutants (Schönherr et al., 2011a) and (iii) ALK mutations that are ligand-dependent in nature, such as the human ALK mutations (T1087I, D1091N, A1099T, T1151M, M1166R, A1234T, R1464STOP), which are not constitutively active but which display ligand-dependent activation when challenged with agonist antibodies. Importantly, to date, the activity of all ALK mutants tested can be abrogated by treatment with ALK small molecule TKIs.  TRANSLATIONAL IMPACT  Clinical issue  Neuroblastoma is a childhood extracranial solid tumour that has been associated with alterations in several different genes. Among these, are mutations in the kinase domain of the anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK), a receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK). ALK mutations have been reported in both somatic and familial forms of neuroblastoma. Many ALK mutations confer a gain of function to the protein, but mechanistic information is not available for all identified mutations. Optimal treatment of neuroblastoma (e.g. with tyrosine kinase inhibitors) requires a clearer understanding of how different ALK mutations influence protein function and, in turn, contribute to neuroblastoma development. In addition, it is important to investigate whether certain ALK mutations confer resistance to currently available neuroblastoma drugs.  Results  Here, the authors compared signalling mediated by several different ALK mutants identified in patients with neuroblastoma with signalling mediated by wild-type ALK. Their studies aimed to determine whether disease-associated ALK mutations are universally gain-of-function and whether certain ALK mutations can confer resistance to tyrosine kinase inhibitors. Their results, together with existing data, suggest that the neuroblastoma-associated ALK mutations characterised thus far fall into three classes: (i) gain-of-function, ligand-independent mutations of varying activation strength, such as ALKF1174, (ii) kinase-dead ALK mutants, such as ALKI1250T and (iii) ALK mutations that are ligand-dependent and might represent ‘passenger’ mutations. Importantly, the activity of all mutant ALK receptors, irrespective of mutation type, could be abrogated by the ALK inhibitor crizotinib, albeit with differing levels of sensitivity.  Implications and future directions  Characterizing individual ALK mutations is clinically important so that individual neuroblastoma patients can be classified and treated appropriately. These results provide mechanistic information on several neuroblastoma-associated ALK mutations and propose a way to classify all ALK mutants. Encouragingly, these results also indicate that various types of ALK mutations are sensitive to currently available neuroblastoma therapy.  Go to: RESULTS Evaluating the role of human ALK mutations as driver or passenger  We set out to characterise two novel germ line ALK variants identified in patients with neuroblastoma (ALKA1099T and ALKR1464STOP) and their potential roles as driver or passenger mutations in neuroblastoma. ALKA1099T was identified in a Japanese infant diagnosed with neuroblastoma, born to unrelated healthy parents with no neuroblastoma history. No MYCN amplification or ALK amplification was detected in this patient, and the tumour was classified as stage 2. The ALKA1099T variant was heterozygous in both tumour and blood DNA samples. The ALKR1464STOP mutation was observed in the DNA and RNA from a patient sample analysed as part of the TARGET (therapeutically applicable research to generate effective treatments) initiative, which aims to characterise the genomic landscape of the most common childhood cancers, including neuroblastoma. This sequence variant was heterozygous in tumour DNA and RNA, as well as in blood DNA. DNA from the patient's parents was not available for testing.  Also included in this analysis were the earlier reported, but as yet uncharacterised, putative gain-of-function ALK mutations: ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKT1151M, ALKM1166R, ALKF1174I and ALKA1234T (Fig. 1A,B) (Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Mossé et al., 2008). As a positive control, the previously verified constitutively active ALK mutations ALKF1174L and ALKF1174S were also included (Martinsson et al., 2011). Initially, we investigated these eight human neuroblastoma ALK mutations in a PC12 cell culture system, examining both signalling activity and capacity to drive differentiation, as measured by neurite outgrowth. PC12 cells are a clonal rat adrenal pheochromocytoma cell line, which are well characterised as differentiating and extending neurites upon stimulation with nerve growth factor or differentiation factors (Greene and Tischler, 1976). They do not express ALK at detectable levels. We, and others, have previously shown that expression of wild-type ALK (ALKwt), followed by stimulation with ALK agonist monoclonal antibody 31 (mAb31) or expression of activating ALK mutants leads to neurite extension in PC12 cells (Martinsson et al., 2011) (Fig. 1C, lane 1). PC12 cells were transiently transfected with ALK mutants and serum-starved for 48 hours prior to stimulation with mAb31 for 30 minutes. Both human ALKwt and human ALKF1174S were included as controls (Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Martinsson et al., 2011) (Fig. 1). The ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants displayed characteristics similar to that of ALKwt and were able to activate downstream targets such as ERK only upon stimulation with agonist mAb31 (Fig. 1C). In a manner similar to that previously observed for human ALKF1174S, two of the mutants investigated (human ALKM1166R and human ALKF1174I) were able to activate phosphorylation of ERK in the absence of agonist mAb31, suggesting that these two mutants might be constitutively activated in a ligand-independent manner (Fig. 1C). Furthermore, in keeping with this hypothesis, both human ALKM1166R and human ALKF1174I mediated robust phosphorylation of STAT3, as reported for the ALKF1174S mutation (Fig. 1C). Interestingly, none of the other mutants were able to generate STAT3 phosphorylation or activation upon stimulation for up to 30 minutes, as previously shown for wild-type ALK (Schönherr et al., 2011b).  Fig. 1. Fig. 1. Domain structure of ALK mutations and their activation of downstream targets. (A) The extracellular, transmembrane domain and the intracellular domain, which contains the protein tyrosine kinase domain are shown. Mutation residues within the intracellular ... Thus, in this initial analysis, the ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants were found to be inducibly activated by agonist mAb31 and displayed enhanced activation of ERK upon stimulation. However, they were unable to activate STAT3. By contrast, both ALKM1166R and ALKF1174I appeared to be activated in a ligand-independent manner and led to robust activation of downstream targets, such as ERK and STAT3, in a manner similar to the ALKF1174S mutation.  Crizotinib blocks neurite outgrowth activity of human ALK mutants  The PC12 cell system is a sensitive readout for ALK signalling activity as a result of receptor activation (Schönherr et al., 2011b; Yang et al., 2007). Transient transfection of ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP did not stimulate neurite outgrowth in the absence of agonist mAb31. However, addition of agonist antibody lead to significantly increased levels of neurite outgrowth (up to 30-40%) (Fig. 2). The levels of ALK-induced neurite outgrowth were similar to that observed upon stimulation of the wild-type ALK receptor. In agreement with our earlier results, the ALKM1166R and ALKF1174I mutants were capable of mediating neurite outgrowth in a ligand-independent manner, displaying similar percentages of neurite outgrowth in the presence or absence of agonist antibody (Fig. 2). To investigate whether neurite outgrowth could be abrogated by ALK inhibition, we employed crizotinib (Xalkori), an FDA-approved small inhibitor of both ALK and MET receptor tyrosine kinases, which is being employed in phase II and III clinical trials (Butrynski et al., 2010; Kwak et al., 2010; Hallberg and Palmer, 2011). Crizotinib (250 nM) treatment resulted in a significant reduction in ALK-induced neurite outgrowth. Thus, crizotinib is able to effectively block neurite outgrowth mediated by all human ALK mutants investigated here.  Fig. 2. Fig. 2. Crizotinib abrogates ALK-mediated neurite outgrowth in PC12 cells. PC12 cells were co-transfected with pcDNA3-human ALK and pEGFPN1 and seeded out in the presence or absence of crizotinib. Cells were stimulated with 1 μg/ml mAb31. After 48 hours, ... In Ba/F3 cells, crizotinib inhibits constitutively active ALK mutants with varying IC50 values  To confirm and extend our analysis of the inhibition of these ALK mutants by crizotinib, the Ba/F3 cell system was employed (Lu et al., 2009; Schönherr et al., 2011b). Ba/F3 cells, an IL-3-dependent cell line, are often employed in kinase drug discovery, exploiting their characteristic of being able to overcome IL-3 dependence, which allows them to survive and proliferate in the absence of IL-3 when expressing constitutively active tyrosine kinase or other oncogenes (Warmuth et al., 2007). Ba/F3 cells were transfected with human wild-type ALK and the eight different ALK mutants, and subsequently selected with the antibiotic G418 in the presence of IL-3 for 10 days. We observed that Ba/F3 cells expressing the different ALK mutants exhibited variable proliferation ability in the absence of IL-3 (Fig. 3B). At the end of selection in IL-3-free medium, only the human ALKF1174I mutant gave rise to IL-3-independent cell lines, along with the human ALKF1174L positive control. By contrast, ALKwt, ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, human ALKM1166R, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants were unable to substitute for IL-3 to drive proliferation in Ba/F3 cells, even though they expressed ALK protein (Fig. 3A,B and data not shown). To further analyse the responsiveness of these mutants toward crizotinib, the cells were treated with different doses of this ALK inhibitor. Importantly, crizotinib did not inhibit cell growth or cell viability when cells were grown in the presence of IL-3 (Fig. 3C), indicating that it is not toxic to Ba/F3 cells at the levels employed. Proliferation of both human ALKF1174I and human ALKF1174L mutants was blocked by crizotinib (Fig. 4A). IC50 (concentration of drug responsible for 50% inhibition) values show that inhibition of ALKF1174I required similar doses of crizotinib as human ALKF1174L (Fig. 4B). Furthermore, inhibition of ALK mutant activity was also confirmed at the level of ALK tyrosine phosphorylation at position 1278. Tyr1278 corresponds to the first tyrosine of the Y'RAS'YY motif in the A-loop of ALK that is necessary for auto-activation of ALK kinase domain and transformation ability of nucleophosmin (NPM)-ALK (Tartari et al, 2008). Immunoblot analysis performed on Ba/F3 cell lysates showed a reduction in the levels of ALK Tyr1278 phosphorylation in the presence of inhibitor for both human ALKF1174L and human ALKF1174I mutants (Fig. 4C). In agreement with these results, both mutants exhibited decreased ALK Tyr1604 phosphorylation (Fig. 4C). Reduced levels of ERK phosphorylation by both mutants upon treatment with crizotinib confirmed the inhibition of ALK-mediated downstream targets (Fig. 4C). Taken together, these data suggest that crizotinib is able to block the ALK activity of these mutants in a dose-dependent manner.  Fig. 3. Fig. 3. Expression of human ALK in Ba/F3 cells. (A) Ba/F3 cells were transfected with human wild-type or mutant ALKs and selected with G418 in the presence of IL-3. Whole cell lysates were prepared and run on SDS-PAGE, followed by immunoblotting with indicated ... Fig. 4. Fig. 4. Crizotinib inhibits both human ALKF1174-driven proliferation and phosphorylation at Tyr1278 and Tyr1604 of ALK in Ba/F3 cells. (A) IC50 values for crizotinib for both human ALKF1174I and human ALKF1174L were calculated. Values represent mean + s.d. from ... Transforming potential of human ALK mutations  We further examined the transforming ability of human ALK mutants using NIH3T3 cells. Expression of the human ALK mutations ALKwt, ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP were unable to generate formation of foci greater than that of the vector control or ALK wild-type control. By contrast, both ALKF1174I and ALKF1174L displayed robust foci formation, although ALKM1166R showed rather weak foci formation ability in comparison with ALKF1174S (Fig. 5A). These results indicate different degrees of foci formation by the ligand-independent ALK mutations, which is in agreement with our previous results in the Ba/F3 system (Fig. 5B).  Fig. 5. Fig. 5. Transformation potential of human ALK mutants. (A,B) The transforming potential of the mutations was assayed by transfecting NIH3T3 cells with pcDNA3-human ALK (mutant and wild type). Cells were selected with G418 for 3 weeks. (A) Representative images ... Ectopic expression of human ALK mutants in Drosophila melanogaster  Transgenic Drosophila expressing the human ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants were generated to confirm their ligand-dependent characteristics. These were ectopically expressed in Drosophila eye, together with the previously generated human ALKF1174L and ALKwt, employing the pGMR-Gal4 driver line, which directs protein expression in developing photoreceptors of the eye. The expression of human ALK proteins was confirmed by immunostaining of the eye discs by using anti-human ALK antibody. Expression of human ALKF1174L resulted in a rough eye phenotype, whereas expression of human ALKwt, ALKA1234T or ALKR1464STOP did not show any obvious phenotype in adult flies (Martinsson et al., 2011) (Fig. 6). However, the regular hexagonal arrangement of ommatidia was disorganised, with many interommatidial bristles missing in human ALKF1174L. The data strongly support the conclusion that the human ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutants are ligand-dependent in nature.  Fig. 6. Fig. 6. Ectopic expression of human ALKA1234T and human ALKR1464STOP in Drosophila eye does not generate the rough eye phenotype. Adult fly eyes (upper) and larval eye discs (lower) ectopically expressing mutant human ALK variants. Human ALKwt and human ALKF1174L ... Go to: DISCUSSION ALK mutations have been reported in both familial (Mossé et al., 2008) and sporadic neuroblastoma (Carén et al., 2008; Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Janoueix-Lerosey et al., 2008; Martinsson et al., 2011; Mossé et al., 2008). The presence of ALK mutations in neuroblastoma draws attention to its possible function and its role in disease progression. Therefore, characterisation of these different ALK mutations is an important exercise in assessing whether the various mutants are functional or not, with potential importance for the patient to be treated accordingly.  In this study, we have investigated two novel mutations of ALK (ALKA1099T and ALKR1464STOP) and compared them with six previously described but uncharacterised human ALK point mutations (ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKT1151M, ALKM1166R, ALKF1174I and ALKA1234T) from neuroblastoma patients, with the aim of assessing whether these mutations could drive tumour progression (Table 1). So far, and from our knowledge of neuroblastoma tumour analysis and published reports to date, only one neuroblastoma patient has presented with a homozygous ALK mutation (Martinsson et al., 2011). To date, one mutation (ALKI1250T) has been reported to have defective kinase activity, raising important questions as to the impact, if any, that this mutation has upon neuroblastoma progression (Schönherr et al., 2011a). Signalling studies in the PC12 cell system showed differences in the activation of downstream targets by the various ALK mutants examined. ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP showed little phosphorylation of ERK, which was enhanced by stimulation with agonist antibodies. On the other hand, ALKM1166R and ALKF1174I mediated ligand-independent phosphorylation of ERK and STAT3. Likewise, the ALKM1166R and ALKF1174I mutants were able to mediate neurite outgrowth in PC12 cells in a ligand-independent manner (Table 1). The other ALK mutations (ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP) displayed inducible activity and resulted in neurites only when stimulated with agonist antibodies, which could be abrogated by crizotinib (Table 1). Furthermore, we co-transfected our ligand-dependent mutants together with wild-type ALK. We observed no change in the phosphorylation of ERK or in the levels of neurite outgrowth ability when compared with wild-type ALK alone in PC12 cells (data not shown).  Table 1. Table 1. Characterization of ALK mutations in order to assess their oncogenic potential Interestingly, the ALKM1166R mutant gave rise to weak foci formation in NIH3T3 cells in comparison with the ALKF1174I mutant, which displayed robust foci formation (Table 1). In this assay, the human ALK mutations ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP did not yield any foci as expected. These results thus revealed that only the ALKF1174I and ALKM1166R mutants harbour transforming potential in NIH3T3 cells. To complement these analyses, we employed the Ba/F3 cell model system. This revealed that even though the ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKM1166R, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP mutant receptors were expressed, they could not substitute for IL-3 to drive proliferation in Ba/F3 cells. Our Ba/F3 results with the ALKT1151M and ALKA1234T mutations are in agreement with earlier reported results (George et al., 2008). However, human ALKF1174I and the human ALKF1174L control, gave rise to IL-3-independent cell lines. Both mutations displayed sensitivity towards crizotinib in a dose-dependent manner, as shown by their different IC50 values (Table 1). These data are in agreement with previous reports showing that different ALK mutations exhibit different levels of sensitivity towards crizotinib (Bresler et al., 2011; Schönherr et al., 2011b). We also show that cell proliferation and phosphorylation of ALK at tyrosine positions 1278 and 1604 are blocked by using crizotinib, as expected (Fig. 4) (Schönherr et al., 2011b; Tartari et al., 2008). These data indicate that the human ALKF1174I mutant is able to mediate neurite outgrowth, transform NIH3T3 cells, activate downstream targets of ALK (such as ERK and STAT3) in a ligand-independent manner and substitute for IL-3 in Ba/F3 cells, giving rise to IL-3-independent cell line. Thus, we conclude that human ALKF1174I is a gain-of-function mutation that is sensitive to crizotinib inhibition.  The ALKM1166R mutation gives rise to neurites in PC12 cells, activates downstream targets (such as ERKs and STAT3) in a ligand-independent manner and shows weak foci formation. However, it fails to substitute for IL-3 and, hence, does not yield any IL-3-independent Ba/F3 cell lines in our hands. This is comparable to the ALKR1275Q mutant, which also displays neurite generating ability but is unable to support Ba/F3 IL-3-independent growth (Schönherr et al., 2011b). Amino acid Met1166 is not conserved in insulin receptor kinase (IRK) family members, perhaps implying that it might have a structural and functional role specific to ALK (Lee et al., 2010). Met1166 is located in the interface between the αC-helix and the DFG-helix and mutations of this residue would probably destabilise the DFG-helix and consequently facilitate the shift of the αC-helix (Fig. 1B) (Bossi et al., 2010). From a structural point of view, both positions 1166 and 1174 are in or very close to the αC-helix, which plays an important role in the activation process of the insulin receptor family members. Upon activation, the αC-helix moves a few degrees closer to the ATP-catalytic site that mediates the γ-phospho-exchange from bound ATP to the interacting substrate (Lemmon and Schlessinger, 2010). Furthermore, it has previously been shown that mutation at position 1174 changes the character of the ALK protein from a ligand-dependent receptor to a receptor exhibiting gain-of-function properties (Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Martinsson et al., 2011). Probably, this mutations results in disruption of the packing, weakening distinctive structural features observed in the ALK structure, such as the unique inhibitory position of the ALK A-loop packing a short proximal A-loop α-helix against the αC-helix of ALK, while a β-turn motif obstructs the substrate binding region (Fig. 1B). In this arrangement, Tyr1278 is inaccessible for phosphorylation because it is engaged in the interaction interface through bonding with Cys1097 in the N-terminal β-sheet (Bossi et al, 2010; Lee et al, 2010). Both Phe1174 and Met1166 mutations can probably weaken auto-inhibitory interactions and allow the ALK kinase domain to more easily adopt its active configuration. However, unlike ALKF1174 mutants, the ALKM1166R mutation is not a robust gain-of-function mutation, although it is able to transform NIH3T3 cells, mediate neurite outgrowth, and activate downstream ALK targets, such as STAT3 and ERK. Moreover, unlike ALKF1174 mutants, ALKM1166R lacks the ability to mediate Il-3 independent growth of Ba/F3 cells. Our analyses suggest that although ALKM1166R is able to weaken the auto-inhibitory interaction, this does not occur to the same degree as with the ALKF1174 mutations. The extent to which an ALKM1166R mutation contributes to neuroblastoma disease progression or tumour initation is unclear from our experiments.  Consideration of the impact of the ALKT1087I and ALKD1091N mutations on ALK kinase activity from a structural point of view is difficult because they have not been included in any structural study to date. Both are located close to the C-terminal of the β1 and β2 sheets in the kinase domain (Bossi et al., 2010; Lee et al, 2010). Another mutation investigated here is at position Ala1099, which is located between the β1' and β2' sheets. Both Lee et al. and Bossi et al. have indicated that nearby Cys1097 plays an important role in mediating a hydrogen bond with the unphosphorylated tyrosine at position 1278 when ALK is in an inactive configuration (Fig. 1B, sticks and dots) (Lee et al, 2010; Bossi et al., 2010). Our analyses of these, together with the location of the ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N and ALKA1099T mutations, indicate that no gross structural conformation changes occur that result in the mutant ALK protein gaining characteristics that differ significantly from the wild-type protein (Table 1). The Thr1151 mutation is located in the β3 sheet, included in the framework of five-stranded, twisted anti-parallel β-sheets that build up predominantly the N-terminal kinase lobe. Apparently, mutation of Thr1151 to methionine (T1151M) does not affect the ability of the ALK kinase domain to be activated upon stimulation. Finally, it is difficult to predict the effect of the 1464STOP mutation, although from our analyses we would speculate that at least in terms of activation it behaves in a manner similar to the wild-type receptor, i.e. the receptor displays ligand-dependent activation. However, the manner and regulation of inactivation of such a truncated receptor might be an important aspect that could be of relevance in neuroblastoma.  The expression of mutants such as ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP neither renders Ba/F3 cells independent of IL-3 for their growth nor exhibits transforming activity. Additionally, the mutants do not form foci in NIH3T3 cells. Importantly, however, they are able to give rise to neurites and stimulate activation of ERK in the presence of agonist antibodies. Furthermore, all the mutations in this study are successfully blocked by crizotinib, which results in a decrease in ALK phosphorylation and its downstream target ERK in a manner similar to the controls employed in this study, i.e. ALKF1174L and ALKF1174S (Martinsson et al., 2011; Schönherr et al., 2011b). A recent study has investigated a number of ALK mutants, which have been identified by the Cancer Genome Project (Sanger Institute, Cambridge, UK) in cell lines from a range of tumour types. This analysis included F1174L, from the SH-SY5Y neuroblastoma cell line, as well as a number of additional previously uncharacterised ALK mutations, and looked at their transfomation potential. Similarly to the mutants investigated here (ALKT1087I, ALKD1091N, ALKA1099T, ALKT1151M, ALKA1234T and ALKR1464STOP) the ALK mutants investigated by McDuff and colleagues do not render Ba/F3 cells independent of IL-3 for their growth, exhibit lack of transforming activity and might represent passenger mutations in the evolution of cancer (McDuff et al., 2011). However, this work did not examine whether the various ALK mutants were able to respond to activation by external ligand or agonist antibodies or examine their sensitivity to treatment with crizotinib.  From our present analysis of previously uncharacterised ALK mutants, and in light of other reports concerning ALK mutant variants, the accumulated data suggests that the ALK mutations observed and characterised in neuroblastoma to date fall into three classes. These classes are: (i) gain-of-function ligand-independent mutations of varying activation strength, e.g. ALKF1174; (ii) kinase-dead ALK mutants, e.g. ALKI1250T (Schönherr et al., 2011a); and (iii) ALK mutations that are ligand-dependent in nature and which might represent ‘passenger’ mutations. Irrespective of the nature of the observed ALK mutant, in every case the activity of the mutant ALK receptors can be abrogated by treatment with the ALK inhibitor crizotinib, albeit with differing levels of sensitivity. Present knowledge would predict that these mutants will also be sensitive to inhibition by next generation ALK TKIs. Although a role for the class of ligand-independent ALK mutants such as ALKF1174 and ALKR1275 is simple to rationalise, further work will be required to answer the more challenging issue of the significance of the ligand-dependent class of ALK mutants, if any, in neuroblastoma progression.  Go to: MATERIALS AND METHODS Patients: Case 1 (A1099T) and Case 2 (R1464STOP)  Case report 1 A 14-day-old newborn Japanese boy infant diagnosed with neurblastoma was born to unrelated healthy parents with no neuroblastoma history. The tumour was classified as stage 2 and no MYCN amplification nor ALK amplification were detected by array comparative genomic hybridisation (CGH) analysis. This patient is still alive and disease-free, and at this point is 11 years old. DNA ploidy of the tumour was aneuploidy (DNA index was 1.34) and array CGH showed whole chromosome 17 gain, with the pattern of whole chromosomal gains and losses in other multiple chromosomes. The tumour was morphologically diagnosed as favourable according to the Shimada classification (Shimada et al., 1999). Tropomyosin-receptor-kinase (Trk) A was highly expressed in the tumour. The A1099T (GCT/ACT) ALK variant appeared to be heterozygous and present in both tumour and blood DNA, suggesting that this is a germline mutation.  Case report 2 Tumour and blood DNA from a 21-month-old Caucasian American male with stage 4 neuroblastoma were sequenced as part of the TARGET project. The tumour was characterised by MYCN amplification using fluorescence in situ hybridisation (FISH), unfavourable histology (Shimada et al., 1999) and a DNA index of 1.908. Whole genome, exome, and transcriptome sequencing were performed using the Illumina Genome Analyzer. Data were processed as previously described (Morin et al., 2011; Morozova et al., 2010). Sequencing revealed a heterozygous R1646STOP variant in both tumour and blood DNA. In the blood genome, eight reads (47%) supported the reference allele G, and nine reads (53%) supported the alternative allele A. In the tumour genome, five sequencing reads (31%) supported the G allele, and eleven reads supported the A allele. Both reference and alternative alleles were expressed in the tumour transcriptome, with nine and seven reads (56% and 44%) supporting the reference and mutant alleles, respectively. The variant was independently verified by Sanger sequencing.  Generation of human ALK mutant constructions  ALKwt, ALKF1174L and ALKF1174S have been described earlier (Martinsson et al., 2011). All other ALK mutants employed in this study were created in pcDNA3 by Eurofins MWG/operon (Ebersberg, Germany). The mutations generated in the kinase domain were confirmed by sequencing from both directions.  Antibodies and inhibitors  Primary antibodies used were: anti-pan-ERK (1:5000), purchased from BD Transduction Laboratories (Franklin Lakes, NJ), anti-pALK(Y1278), anti-pALK(Y1604), anti-pERK(T202/Y204) and anti- pSTAT3 (Y705) were from Cell Signaling Technology (Danvers, MA). The activating monoclonal antibody mAb31 has been described previously (Martinsson et al., 2011; Moog-Lutz et al., 2005). Monoclonal antibody 153 (anti-ALK) was produced in the Hallberg laboratory against the extracellular domain of ALK as described (Moog-Lutz et al., 2005). Horseradish-peroxidase-conjugated secondary antibodies goat anti-rabbit IgG and goat anti-mouse IgG (diluted 1:5000) were from Thermo Scientific (Waltham, MA). The ALK inhibitor crizotinib (PF-02341066, Xalkori) was a generous gift from Pfizer, Inc.  Neurite outgrowth assay  PC12 cells (2×106) were transfected by electroporation in an Amaxa electroporator (Amaxa Biosystems, Cologne, Germany) using 0.8 μg of pcDNA3-human ALK and 0.5 μg pEGFPN1 (Clontech, Mountain view, CA) and 100 μl Ingenio electroporation solution (Mirus Bio LCC, Madison, WI). Transfected cells were subsequently seeded into 24-well plates together with mAb31 (1 μg/ml) and the inhibitor crizotinib (250 nM) in complete growth medium (Martinsson et al., 2011). After 48 hours of incubation, the fraction of GFP-positive and neuritecarrying cells versus GFP-positive cells was observed under a Zeiss Axiovert 40 CFL microscope. To be judged as a neurite-carrying cell, the neurite of the cell was required to reach at least twice the length of the diameter of a normal cell body. Experiments were performed in triplicates and each sample within an experiment was assayed in duplicate.  Cell proliferation assay and IC50 determination  Ba/F3 cells expressing either human ALKwt or mutant human ALK were generated by electroporation with pcDNA3-human ALK using Amaxa electroporator (Amaxa Biosystems, Cologne, Germany). Transfectants were selected in RPMI with 10% heat-inactivated foetal bovine serum (FBS) and 2.5 ng/ml IL-3 (Peprotech, Rocky Hill, NJ) in the presence of G418 (600 μg /ml) for 10 days. Cells were washed with PBSA and seeded at 0.5×106 cells/ml in RPMI with 10% FBS and G418 for generation of human ALK-expressing IL-3-independent cells (Schönherr et al., 2011b). For calculation of IC50 values, human ALK-expressing Ba/F3 cells were treated with varying concentrations of crizotinib for 3 days. Cell viability was tested with resazurin (Sigma, Stockholm, Sweden) (O'Brien et al., 2000). The IC50 value was determined for individual cell lines and the experiment was carried out at least three times independently, in triplicate.  Cell lysis and western blotting  PC12 cells expressing human ALK mutants were serum-starved for 36 hours prior to stimulation with 1 μg/ml of the activating mAb31 for 30 minutes (Moog-Lutz et al., 2005; Schönherr et al., 2010; Yang et al., 2007). IL-3-independent human ALK-expressing Ba/F3 cells were treated with crizotinib in complete medium for 3 hours. Cells were washed with PBSA and lysed in SDS-sample buffer. Pre-cleared lysates were run on SDS/PAGE, followed by western blotting using the indicated antibodies. ALK downstream activation was detected by pERK and pSTAT3(Y705); pan-ERK was used as loading control. ALK phosphorylation was analysed with pALK(Y1278) and pALK(Y1604) antibodies. Cell lysis and immunoblotting were performed according to described protocols (Schönherr et al., 2010).  Transformation assay  NIH3T3 cells (4.5×104) were seeded in collagen-coated 12-well plates prior to transfection for 6 hours with 1.75 μg pcDNA3.1-human ALK and 4.4 μl Lipofectamine 2000 (Invitrogen, Paisley, UK) in 0.3 ml Opti-MEM. The next day, 60% of the cells were transferred to six-well plates and maintained in DMEM with 10% heat-inactivated FBS and 0.5 mg/ml G418 until the cells reached confluency. Then, the cells were cultivated in DMEM with 5% heat-inactivated FBS and 0.25 mg/ml G418 for approximately 10 days. The cells were then fixed using methanol and stained with 0.25% crystal violet. The foci visible by the naked eye were subsequently analysed (Schönherr et al., 2011a).  Expression of human ALK mutants in Drosophila eye  The Gal4-UAS expression system was employed to express human ALK in the Drosophila eye (Brand and Perrimon, 1993). DNA encoding ALK1234T and ALK1464STOP were subcloned with EcoRI and NotI from pcDNA3-ALK1234T and pcDNA3-ALK1464STOP, and the resulting fragments were ligated into the EcoRI-NotI site of the pUAST vector. Transgenic flies carrying pUAST-ALK were generated by BestGene (Chino Hills, CA) and crossed with pGMR-Gal4 (Bloomington, stock no. 9146). Offspring were fixed with 4% glutaraldehyde in PBS overnight and subjected to electron microscopic analysis. To confirm the expression of human ALK, eye discs of third instar larva were stained with anti-ALK mAb153 (Schönherr et al., 2011a). Antibody binding was visualised using Cy3-labelled anti-mouse IgG (Amersham). The discs were mounted on slides in Fluoromount-G (Southern Biotechnology Associates, Birmingham, AL) and imaged using a Zeiss Apotome. 
1566||In the era of personalized medicine, understanding the molecular drivers of oncogenesis will be likely to trump morphological characteristics with regard to diagnostics, prognostics and choice of therapies. Identifying single driver mutations from billions of possibilities used to require substantial insight. However, as the cost of deep genomic sequencing goes down each month, clever tricks such as identifying family cohorts may not be as necessary. Family cohorts have driven genetic discovery for decades, including the identification of most tumor suppressor genes and many oncogenes.  Neuroblastoma is a lethal cancer of early childhood that essentially comes in two forms: highly malignant and locally manageable, or, to paraphrase Audrey Evans, an early leader in the field, the ‘good’ies and the ‘bad’ies. The underlying genes responsible for neuroblastoma remain largely unknown, despite the discovery of a handful of genetic changes that have been implicated in neuroblastoma development. For example, Brodeur et al.1 and Look et al.2 correlated MYCN oncogene amplification with aggressive tumors that have a high propensity for metastasis and that cause mortality. Also, very small subsets of familial neuroblastoma were associated with PHOX2B (encoding paired-like homeobox-2) mutations, but these mutations accounted for only very few families (reviewed in ref. 3).  To identify additional oncogenes that cause familial neuroblastoma, Mossé et al.4 returned to old-fashioned family trees. They collected the pedigrees of 20 families that showed an autosomal dominant pattern of neuroblastoma inheritance. Using a genome-wide scan for linkage at 6,000 single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs), these investigators identified a previously unknown series of germline mutations in the ALK gene. Some but not all of these families had genomic amplicons on chromosome 2 that also included MYCN. Among the mutations identified, most were predicted to lead to amino acid substitutions in the ALK tyrosine kinase domain (Fig. 1). Five of the eight pedigrees with germline mutation led to proteins with the same R1275Q mutation. A neuroblastoma cell line containing the R1275Q mutation showed ALK activation, which was indicated by tyrosine phosphorylation at ALK Y1604.  Figure 1 Figure 1 The ALK receptor kinase: its domains, pathways, mutations and inhibitors. The different domains of ALK are shown within their bordering amino-acid positions. The major mutations found by Mossé et al.4, Janoueix-Lerosey et al.5, Chen et al.6 and ... Three additional publications by Janoueix-Lerosey et al.5, Chen et al.6 and George et al.7 used SNP- or amplicon-based sequencing methods to identify similar mutations in ALK (Fig. 1). Each of the three studies showed the effects of a dominant oncogene with a similar pattern of results. Not all mutations resulted in constitutive kinase activity; in fact, only the minority showed clear increases in ALK autophosphorylation and downstream target activation, such as phosphorylation of AKT. The R1275Q and F1174L(V) mutations were shown to have constitutive tyrosine phosphorylation in cell lines that endogenously expressed these mutant forms of ALK, or when expressed in either 3T3 or Ba/F3 cells6,7.  ALK mutations in neuroblastoma tissues account for small survival differences in the whole population of people with neuroblastoma; this is due to their very low incidence in the population. Still, individuals who have neuroblastomas with the ALK F1174 mutation show a significantly worse outcome relative to the overall cohort, suggesting that this mutation has an important impact on malignant progression, whereas the presence of the ALK R1275Q mutation did not make a difference8. Stratification according to ALK expression showed that individuals with high ALK expression in their tumors had a significantly worse overall survival and disease-free survival than those with low tumor ALK expression. Although this type of single-gene analysis can be useful to direct treatment with a targeted therapy, genomic instability in the tumors leads to complex mixtures of clonal cells; therefore, multigene analyses can provide a more robust predictor of disease course and may ultimately provide a more complex insight into pathways activated during tumorigenesis and even predict candidate drug sensitivity8.  The functional role of these ALK mutations was addressed in each of the four studies4–7; however, a deeper understanding will be necessary to optimize any ALK-targeted therapy. Each study used either ALK expression followed by inhibition in non-neuroblastoma cell lines, RNAi-mediated reduction of endogenous ALK expression in cell lines or small-molecule kinase inhibitors. Generally, the results from these studies supported a dominant role for mutant ALK. However, in some cases, RNAi-mediated reduction of wild-type ALK expression also reduced neuroblastoma cell growth, suggesting that the level of ALK expression might be as important as an activating mutation in driving tumorigenesis.  A recent paper by Sasaki et al.9 identified ALK F1174L as a mutation that occurred naturally in an individual with inflammatory myoblastic tumor undergoing treatment with the dual MET and ALK kinase inhibitor crizotinib. This tumor contained a somatic RANBP2-ALK translocation; however, when the person experienced recurrent disease, one ALK locus contained an additional F1174L mutation. An evaluation of the inflammatory myoblastic tumor cells harboring ALK F1174L showed that they had higher levels of phosphorylated ALK along with increased downstream phosphorylation of AKT. Thus, this study supports that F1174L is an activating mutation of ALK.  ALK was independently identified as a molecular target in neuroblastoma by screening >600 human cancer cell lines with pharmacological inhibitors of ALK kinase activity10. This work provided a platform from which to launch inhibitor development when a transforming EML4-ALK fusion gene was identified as a major driver in a subset of approximately 5% of non–small-cell lung cancers11. Indeed, a first clinical trial with crizotinib showed striking efficacy in individuals with non–small-cell lung cancer, providing evidence that a well-defined activated pathway may be targeted effectively12 (Fig. 1). A recent structural study of the ALK kinase domain revealed differences from the same domain in related receptor kinases in the insulin receptor family that will be helpful in designing new inhibitors as resistance to the initial ALK inhibitors emerges13.  As higher ALK receptor expression in neuroblastoma coincides with poorer disease outcome8, overexpressed ALK may thus be a potentially valuable therapeutic target. Indeed, two proteins—pleiotrophin and the related midkine—have been shown to activate mammalian ALK14 through extracellular interactions with it (Fig. 1). Therefore, antibody strategies to target overexpressed ALK in neuroblastoma may be an attractive additional approach. Antibody therapy may even act syn ergistically with small-molecule tyrosine kinase inhibitors.  It is clear that targeting ALK is now open season for the development of new therapies for neuroblastoma, as well as other cancers. The insights gained from ongoing trials are likely to directly benefit both subgroups of individuals whose tumors are driven by ALK and, in general, targeted approaches to cancer treatment. Obviously, genetic mutations can reveal new drivers and pathways activated in cancer and may present new therapeutic opportunities. However, fully validating any new target is a challenge at a new frontier of a deadly cancer. Genetic studies have established anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK), a cell surface receptor tyrosine kinase, as a tractable molecular target in neuroblastoma. We describe comprehensive genomic, biochemical, and computational analyses of ALK mutations across 1596 diagnostic neuroblastoma samples. ALK tyrosine kinase domain mutations occurred in 8% of samples; at three hotspots plus 13 minor sites – and correlated significantly with poorer survival in high- and intermediate-risk neuroblastoma. Biochemical and computational studies distinguished oncogenic (constitutively activating) from non-oncogenic mutations and allowed robust computational prediction of their effects. We also established differential in vitro crizotinib sensitivity of mutated variants. Our studies identify ALK genomic status as a clinically important therapeutic stratification tool in neuroblastoma, and will allow tailoring of ALK-targeted therapy to specific mutations.  Go to: Introduction Neuroblastomas are embryonal tumors that arise from the sympathetic nervous system, and represent the most frequently diagnosed malignancy in the first year of life (Cheung and Dyer, 2013; Maris, 2010). Despite improvements in treatment over recent decades, cure rates for patients with high-risk neuroblastoma (Maris, 2010) lag significantly behind those of other common childhood cancers (Smith et al., 2010). Current treatments rely on dose-intensive chemotherapy, radiation therapy, and immunotherapeutic targeting of the disialoganglioside GD2 (Maris, 2010; Yu et al., 2010). Most recent clinical studies in neuroblastoma have focused on escalating dose intensity in both induction and consolidation therapy, with evidence that this improves outcome (Pearson et al., 2008). The potential long-term adverse effects of increasing treatment intensity on survivors of this childhood cancer are a major concern (Hobbie et al., 2008; Smith et al., 2010), however – making it imperative that more effective treatment strategies are developed.  One promising avenue for targeted therapy in neuroblastoma focuses on anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK), a cell-surface neural receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK) expressed at significant levels only in the developing embryonic and neonatal brain (Iwahara et al., 1997; Morris et al., 1997). Germline mutations in intact ALK were recently identified as the major cause of hereditary neuroblastoma (Mossé et al., 2008). These mutations cause single amino acid missense substitutions in the ALK tyrosine kinase domain (TKD) that promote constitutive, ligand-independent, activation of this RTK. Somatically acquired ALK-activating mutations are also found as oncogenic drivers in neuroblastoma (Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Hallberg and Palmer, 2013; Janoueix-Lerosey et al., 2008; Mossé et al., 2008). In addition, ALK gene amplification imparts an oncogenic dependency in some cases (Janoueix-Lerosey et al., 2008; Mossé et al., 2008). ALK has thus emerged as a tractable oncogene for targeted therapy in neuroblastoma. The same tyrosine kinase is also found in oncogenic ALK fusion proteins that arise from chromosomal translocations in non-small-cell lung cancers (NSCLC) (Soda et al., 2007) and anaplastic large cell lymphomas (Morris et al., 1994), for example, motivating development of small molecule ALK kinase inhibitors. Dramatic response rates to crizotinib (an ALK/Met/Ros1 inhibitor) were seen in pretreated patients with advanced relapsed/refractory NSCLC harboring ALK rearrangements (Kwak et al., 2010; Shaw and Engelman, 2013). These studies validated ALK as a therapeutic target, and led to the expedited FDA approval of crizotinib for ALK-translocated NSCLC.  Rapid clinical translation of findings with ALK in neuroblastoma prompted a phase 1 trial of crizotinib (NCT00939770) in patients with recurrent or refractory cancer. Results from this trial highlighted the differential sensitivity to ALK kinase inhibition of ALK-translocated versus ALK-mutated disease (Mossé et al., 2013). The study also underlined the need for further detailed investigation of ALK mutations in order to optimize clinical application of ALK inhibitors in neuroblastoma. To achieve this goal a detailed analysis of the spectrum of ALK mutations, their clinical significance in neuroblastoma, and their biochemical properties is essential. The resulting data will underpin future approaches for identifying patients likely to benefit from ALK inhibition in neuroblastoma, and for predicting which newly emerging mutations are clinically relevant.  Go to: Results To examine the spectrum of ALK mutations in neuroblastoma, we analyzed germline and somatic ALK DNA alterations – at diagnosis – in samples from a cohort of 1596 neuroblastoma patients assembled in collaboration with the Children's Oncology Group (COG; Table 1).  Table 1 Table 1 Clinical, Genomic, and Survival Characteristics of Overall Patient Cohorta ALK mutations  Sequencing of ALK exons 21-28, encompassing the TKD-encoding region, identified 126 diagnostic samples with at least one mutation, corresponding to 8% of subjects (Table 1). Putative disease-associated mutations were distributed throughout the ALK TKD (Figure 1; Table S1), with an additional mutation at R1060 (between the TKD and transmembrane domain). Three additional ALK TKD sequence variations (R1231Q, I1250T, and D1349H) were observed that had previously been listed in the NCBI database of single nucleotide polymorphisms (dbSNP), but with no known clinical significance or annotation in COSMIC (Forbes et al., 2011).  Figure 1 Figure 1 Distribution of ALK mutations in tumor samples from neuroblastoma patients Three ‘hotspot’ residues accounted for 85% of mutations (Figure 1, Table 1): R1275 (43%), F1174 (30%), and F1245 (12%), consistent with previous studies (Chen et al., 2008; George et al., 2008; Hallberg and Palmer, 2013; Janoueix-Lerosey et al., 2008; Mossé et al., 2008). R1275 was substituted with glutamine or leucine in 3.4% of tumors (95% CI: 2.5, 4.3%), F1174 was altered (to L, I, V, C, or S) in 2.4% of tumors (95% CI: 1.6, 3.0%), and F1245 (to L, I, V, or C) in 0.9% (95% CI: 0.5, 1.4%). Two tumor samples harbored mutations at I1170 (to N or S), and another two at I1171 (to N). Single incidences of substitution were seen at a further 15 positions, of which 7 represent mutations not found in current databases (Table S1). Matched constitutional DNA was available for 88 of the 126 ALK-mutated samples, and contained the observed ALK substitution (indicating its presence in the germline) in just 7 cases. Although no information about family history is available, this is an expected rate based on previous analyses (Knudson and Strong, 1972; Mossé et al., 2008). Two were germline R1275Q mutations, and the remaining 5 examples were R1060H, I1183T, L1204F, R1231Q (also in dbSNP), and I1250T (also in dbSNP) mutations (Table S1).  ALK mutations were found in 10.9% of MYCN-amplified tumors, versus 7.2% of those without MYCN amplification. Mutations seen alongside MYCN amplification were biased towards F1174 substitutions (41% in MYCN-amplified cases compared with 30% overall). Further, MYCN amplification occurred in 39% of F1174-mutated tumors, compared with an expected overall frequency of 21% (p<0.01). These data support previous suggestions that F1174 mutations are over-represented in MYCN-amplified tumors, but indicate a less skewed distribution than reported earlier (De Brouwer et al., 2010). Consistent with earlier results, however, patients with both amplified MYCN and F1174-mutated ALK had a significantly worse event-free survival (EFS, p<0.0001) than patients with neither.  ALK copy number  Copy number variation at the ALK locus was observed in 17% of cases for which it was measured (Table 1). Gain of the ALK locus (3-10 copies) was seen in 195 cases (15%), with high-level amplification more rare (24 samples), and whole gene deletion rarer still (6 samples). The ALK gene is located 13.2 megabases centromeric of MYCN. ALK amplification occurred concurrently with MYCN amplification in all but one case – consistent with a previous report (Bagci et al., 2012). Accordingly, since MYCN amplification identifies a patient as a member of the high-risk group (Maris, 2010), ALK amplification occurred exclusively in this group (Table S2) and was associated with inferior outcome (5-year overall survival/OS of 23%, versus 48% in high-risk patients without ALK amplification, p=0.03; Table S3). In the 108/126 ALK-mutated tumors for which we also had copy number data, ALK mutation and high-level gene amplification were mutually exclusive (except for one G1286 variant). Further, 13% of ALK-mutated cases had low-level gain of the ALK locus, similar to the percentage seen in the overall cohort. None demonstrated allelic deletion.  ALK aberration and ALK mutation are prognostic biomarkers of inferior survival  ALK mutations were observed in tumors from all clinical risk groups, and were more commonly observed in those from older patients (Table S2). Across the whole cohort, presence of an ALK aberration (mutation or amplification) correlated with reduced EFS and OS (Figure 2A,B) – as did ALK mutation (Table 1). Presence of any ALK aberration also correlated with reduced EFS and OS in the high-risk group (Figure 2C,D). In univariable analysis, presence of an ALK mutation was also correlated with reduced EFS in intermediate-risk patients (Table S3), a heterogeneous group consisting mainly of very young patients with metastatic disease, or patients of any age with large, unresectable primary tumors. Patient outcome did not differ significantly according to location of the mutation in any analysis. Whereas robust biomarkers to assign outcome probability have been characterized for patients with low- and high-risk disease, the most appropriate therapy for patients with intermediate-risk disease is less well-defined, and our findings suggest that ALK genetic status can be used to identify cases within this group with the highest risk of treatment failure.  Figure 2 Figure 2 Event-free and overall survival based on the presence or absence of an ALK aberration In multivariable analysis of the overall cohort, presence of an ALK mutation was found to have an independent influence on survival, with a 1.4-fold greater risk of an event (or hazard ratio, HR) within 5 years (95% CI: 1.1, 1.9) compared to cases without an ALK mutation (Table 2). Similarly, independent statistically significant correlation with outcome was seen in three separate multivariable models (adjusted for other known prognostic factors) for:  Any ALK aberration (p=0.0006; HR=1.4, 95% CI: 1.2, 1.7) ALK copy number gain (p=0.04; HR=1.3, 95% CI: 1.0, 1.6) ALK amplification (p=0.003; HR=2.2, 95% CI: 1.3, 3.6). Table 2 Table 2 Multivariable Analyses Testing the Independence of Correlations between ALK mutation Status and EFS In a multivariable model adjusted for histologic category (Table 2), ALK mutation status showed statistically significant correlation with reduced EFS in both the intermediate-risk and high-risk patient groups – although not in the low-risk group, again arguing for the utility of ALK mutation status in clinical evaluation.  Predicting signaling consequences of ALK TKD mutations  Our results establish that the presence of an ALK mutation in neuroblastoma is associated with a more aggressive tumor phenotype. Not all ALK substitutions observed in neuroblastoma patients are likely to be oncogenic drivers, however. It will be important in refining therapeutic ALK mutation-based patient stratification to predict as they are observed which mutations are truly drivers that cause ligand-independent ALK signaling, and which are ‘passengers’ or variants of unknown significance. Current methods for predicting functional consequences of patient-derived mutations fall short – especially for activating mutations in kinases. Algorithms such as PolyPhen-2 (Adzhubei et al., 2010), SIFT (Kumar et al., 2009) and the consensus classifier PredictSNP (Bendl et al., 2014) estimate the likelihood of a given mutation having a deleterious effect based on sequence conservation and other criteria. PolyPhen-2 or SIFT (or both) predict that every single ALK substitution listed in Table S1 adversely affects protein function (or is ‘damaging’), except R1060H and R1231Q (a SNP). It seems highly unlikely given our understanding of kinases that even the ALK TKD C-lobe mutations L1204F, T1343I, and D1349H (also in dbSNP) are oncogenic. Moreover, the logic of conservation-based algorithms is not appropriate for predicting gain-of-function mutations in oncogenic kinase domains (Gnad et al., 2013). Indeed, a recent analysis of >400 activating substitutions (Molina-Vila et al., 2014) revealed that most driver mutations in oncogenic kinases do not occur at conserved residues at all, and that their accurate prediction will require explicit attention to kinase regulation mechanisms. Motivated by these considerations, we assessed the effects of all ALK mutations defined here (Figure 1 and Table S1) on in vitro kinase activity – to guide development of better prediction algorithms.  Biochemical effects of clinically-observed ALK TKD mutations  We first monitored autophosphorylation of purified mutated ALK TKDs using native gel electrophoresis (Figure S1) as described (Bresler et al., 2011). The well-studied F1174L and R1275Q mutations greatly accelerated TKD autophosphorylation as expected. So did substitutions at 5 of the other positions listed in Table S1 (M1166, I1170, I1171, F1245, and Y1278), as did the previously reported G1128A and R1192P germline neuroblastoma mutations (Bourdeaut et al., 2011; Janoueix-Lerosey et al., 2008; Mossé et al., 2008). Mutations at T1151, L1196, and G1286 also promoted modest constitutive activation. By contrast, substitutions at five other sites (I1183, A1200, R1231, T1343, and D1349) and those found in dbSNP (R1231Q and D1349H) failed to activate the isolated TKD (Figure S1), signifying that these are unlikely to be clinically significant. D1270G-mutated ALK TKD failed to become autophosphorylated at all, suggesting that this is an inactivating mutation – as expected since D1270 lies in the conserved DFG motif essential for Mg2+-ATP binding to kinases. We did not analyze ALK TKDs harboring L1204F, L1240V, or I1250T mutations in this assay, since they were poorly expressed as recombinant proteins.  For more quantitative analyses, we assayed the ability of the mutated TKDs to phosphorylate a peptide corresponding to ALK's activation loop, and determined values for kcat, KM, ATP, and kcat/KM in vitro. We analyzed both fully auto-phosphorylated ALK TKDs and non-phosphorylated proteins (phosphatase treated as described in Supplemental Experimental Procedures). Non-phosphorylated ALK TKD represents the ‘basal’ kinase state for each receptor variant, whereas autophosphorylated ALK TKDs represent the corresponding activated states – with kcat increased by ∼45-fold in the case of wild-type ALK (Bresler et al., 2011).  Effects of mutations on basal activity of non-phosphorylated ALK TKD The effects of mutations on non-phosphorylated ALK TKD activity vary according to their location in the kinase. F1174 and F1245 mutations have the strongest effect, increasing kcat by 36-39 fold (Figure 3A; Table S4) – close to the 45-fold increase caused by autophosphorylation of wild-type ALK TKD (Bresler et al., 2011). F1174 and F1245 contribute to a cluster of phenylalanine side-chains (red in Figure 3: the ‘Phe core’) that normally stabilizes the autoinhibited TKD conformation (Bossi et al., 2010; Lee et al., 2010). Mutating these residues will destabilize ALK's autoinhibitory interactions and promote activation. Almost all of the other significantly activating mutations (increasing kcat by >10-fold) occur either at residues in the αC-helix (M1166, I1170, I1171) or in the short α-helix within the activation loop of the inactive TKD (R1275, Y1278). These residues (blue in Figure 3) all participate in autoinhibitory interactions between helix αC and the activation loop α-helix that normally stabilize the inactive conformation of non-phosphorylated ALK TKD (Bossi et al., 2010; Lee et al., 2010), and are disrupted by the mutations analyzed here. Mutations in the N-lobe (green) or phosphate-binding P-loop (cyan) have much smaller effects on ALK TKD (Figure 3A). The only exception is the germline R1192P mutation (which increases kcat of non-phosphorylated ALK TKD by 15 fold). Mutations in the ALK TKD active site (magenta) or C-lobe (grey) have little or no influence on kcat (<3-fold increase), except for the L1196M ‘gatekeeper’ mutation, which increases kcat by nearly 5 fold. Peptide phosphorylation studies further confirmed that the D1270G variant is inactive (Table S4), and revealed a reduced activity for the I1250T (SNP) variant, consistent with previous work (Schönherr et al., 2011a).  Figure 3 Figure 3 kcat and KM, ATP values for mutated ALK TKD variants KM, ATP values for non-phosphorylated ALK TKD variants (discussed in more detail below) all fell within a narrow range from 0.13 mM (wild-type) to 0.39 mM (L1196M) – suggesting that all variants are saturated with ATP under physiological conditions (Figure 3B). Accordingly, catalytic efficiencies (kcat/KM, ATP) for non-phosphorylated ALK TKD variants (Figure S2A) follow very similar trends to those seen for kcat. The same is true for kcat/KM, peptide values (Figure S2B).  Effects of neuroblastoma mutations on activity of fully autophosphorylated ALK TKD The effects of patient-derived ALK mutations on the activity of fully autophosphorylated ALK TKD (prepared as described in Supplemental Experimental Procedures) were much more modest. With the exception of the I1170N variant (for which kcat was just 35% of wild-type), no variant was altered by more than 2-fold in kcat (Figure 3C, Table S5). Overall, therefore, neuroblastoma-derived mutations have their greatest effects on the activity of non-phosphorylated ALK TKD, promoting its constitutive autophosphorylation and thus ligand-independent signaling by the intact receptor.  Transforming ability of mutated ALK variants  To assess how biochemical characteristics relate to transforming ability we measured the ability of intact ALK variants harboring the same TKD mutations to induce focus formation in NIH 3T3 cells (Figure 4A). As shown in Figure 4B and C, quantitation of focus formation assays (Table S6) reveals a remarkably close correspondence between transforming potential and in vitro kcat value for the corresponding non-phosphorylated TKD variants (Figure 3A). A plot of transforming ability against kcat for non-phosphorylated TKD (Figure 4C) yields a straight line with correlation coefficient (r) of 0.95 (p<0.0001). Relative outliers were G1128A (in the P-loop) and L1196M (in the active site), which both appeared relatively more transforming than suggested by in vitro biochemical data, and M1166R, which appeared less transforming than expected by this simple correlation. Transforming potential correlates with kcat of the non-phosphorylated TKD slightly better than it does with either measure of catalytic efficiency: kcat/KM, ATP (r=0.88) or kcat/KM, peptide (r=0.89). By contrast, when transforming ability is plotted against kcat for phosphorylated TKD variants, the slope does not deviate significantly from zero (p=0.68), indicating no correlation (Figure 4C, Figure S2C).  Figure 4 Figure 4 Transformation potential of ALK mutants from NIH 3T3 focus formation assays Taken together, the data in Figures 3 and and44 argue that activity of the non-phosphorylated ALK TKD is an excellent predictor of ALK's transforming ability in NIH 3T3 cells. An increase of just 4.6 – 4.8-fold in the kcat of non-phosphorylated ALK TKD appears sufficient for NIH 3T3 cell transformation, judging from results with the G1128A (cyan) and L1196M (magenta) variants (Figure 4, Table S4). The one exception to this correlation is the N-lobe T1151M variant, for which a relatively reduced kcat/KM, peptide value (Figure S2B, Table S4) may explain failure to transform NIH 3T3 cells (presumably because of elevated KM, peptide). It is important to note that none of the three ALK mutations previously reported in dbSNP (R1231Q, I1250T, and D1349H, all in the C-lobe) were associated with ALK activation in transformation or biochemical assays (Figures 3 and and4);4); these are silent or passenger mutations. Moreover, analysis of transforming ability in Figure 4B (as a measure of oncogenicity) paints a very different functional picture from that predicted by PolyPhen-2 or SIFT across the spectrum of ALK mutations. These algorithms predict that all mutations (except R1060H and R1231Q) are damaging or affect function – whereas our experimental analysis shows that 11 of the 24 mutations have no significant activating effect. ALK is unlikely to be an important driver in neuroblastoma cases with any of these non-activating mutations, and crizotinib is very unlikely to be therapeutically useful in these contexts. The ‘silent’ mutations account for one of every ∼11 of ALK-mutated patients, and it is important to identify them.  Crizotinib sensitivities of recombinant ALK TKD variants  At least two of the ALK driver mutations observed in neuroblastoma (F1174L and L1196M) have also arisen as acquired crizotinib resistance mutations in tumors driven by oncogenic ALK fusion proteins (Choi et al., 2010; Sasaki et al., 2010). These findings suggest that primary resistance will be a major concern in crizotinib treatment of ALK-mutated neuroblastoma, as we have discussed previously (Bresler et al., 2011). A mere ∼3-fold reduction in KM, ATP appeared sufficient to impair in vivo crizotinib sensitivity of F1174L-mutated ALK when compared with the R1275Q variant, consistent with the appearance of F1174L as an acquired resistance mutation in both a crizotinib-treated inflammatory myofibroblastic tumor (Sasaki et al., 2010) and in vitro screens for crizotinib-resistance mutations in EML4-ALK (Zhang et al., 2011). Table 3 lists KM, ATP values for the other non-phosphorylated ALK TKD variants described here. Based solely on reduced KM, ATP values (as for F1174L), and assuming unchanged crizotinib affinity, the G1128A, M1166R, F1245C, F1245V, or Y1278S variants would be suggested to be relatively crizotinib resistant, whereas the I1170N, I1170S, I1171N, and L1196M (gatekeeper) variants would be argued to resemble R1275Q in being sensitive to crizotinib (with relatively larger KM, ATP values). R1192P is intermediate.  Table 3 Table 3 Crizotinib Sensitivities of Non-phosphorylated ALK-TKD Mutants at 2.0 mM ATPa Direct measurement of crizotinib IC50 values in vitro (at 2 mM ATP), however, reveals that the correlation with KM, ATP is not simple. The L1196M (gatekeeper) variant is resistant to crizotinib (Figure S3) despite its high KM, ATP – indicating a differential effect of this mutation on ATP and crizotinib binding, as expected from its appearance as an acquired resistance mutation (Katayama et al., 2011). Similarly, I1171N-mutated ALK is less crizotinib sensitive in vitro than a simple view of ATP competition (and KM, ATP) would suggest – further supported by the fact that mutations at I1171 emerged alongside F1174 mutations in screens for crizotinib-resistant variants of EML4-ALK (Zhang et al., 2011). By contrast, the M1166R, F1245V, and F1245C variants are more sensitive to crizotinib in vitro than simple consideration of KM, ATP would suggest – resembling the R1275Q variant in our in vitro crizotinib inhibition studies (Table 3) and NIH 3T3 focus assays (not shown). This finding is particularly important given that F1245 is the third most commonly mutated site in neuroblastoma, accounting for ∼12% of mutations. Our data suggest that cases with F1245 mutations should respond to crizotinib just as well as R1275Q-mutated tumors.  The data in Table 3 make it clear that the individual ALK TKD mutations affect binding of ATP and crizotinib in different ways, and assessment of IC50 values for a selection of mutations in NIH 3T3 focus assays (not shown) concurs. For example, the L1196M mutation impairs crizotinib binding more than ATP binding – thus causing resistance to the drug. It will therefore be important to compare the relative abilities of next generation ALK inhibitors to inhibit the variants studied here. One new inhibitor, called ceritinib, was recently shown to inhibit ALK variants with crizotinib-resistant L1196M, or I1171T mutations (Friboulet et al., 2014), but not to overcome resistance of an F1174 mutation. Other inhibitors are also known to have differential effects on crizotinib-resistance mutations acquired in ALK-rearranged lung cancers (Johnson et al., 2014; Sakamoto et al., 2011). The data in Table 3 suggest that neuroblastoma patients with ALK-activating M1166R, I1170N/S or F1245 mutations should respond to crizotinib just as well as R1275Q-mutated patients. Patients with I1171 or L1196 mutations are likely to respond better to ceritinib, and those with F1174L (and possible other) mutations might be more responsive to the macrocyclic inhibitor PF-06463922 (Johnson et al., 2014). Y1278, R1192 and G1128 mutations appear to be intermediate between these two groups, and comparative studies of ALK inhibitors are needed to determine which inhibitor would be best for these cases.  Computational analysis of mutated ALK TKDs  The poor performance of existing informatics-based approaches in distinguishing activating from non-activating amino acid substitutions prompted us to investigate structure-based computational methods for assessing newly emerging ALK mutations. Importantly, apart from already published data, the computational analysis was done without prior knowledge of biochemical results emerging from this study. As described in Supplemental Experimental Procedures, we simulated molecular dynamics (MD) trajectories for the inactive conformation of all mutated ALK TKD variants, and for wild-type ALK TKD, in both active and inactive conformations. The resulting MD trajectories were analyzed for three key structural properties:  i). Hydrogen bonding network Distinct sets of key intramolecular hydrogen bonds characterize the active and inactive ALK TKD configurations. Those that maintain the (autoinhibited) positions of the activation loop and αC helix in the inactive TKD (in Figure 3D) are absent in the active structure. A simple scoring function (see Supplemental Experimental Procedures) was used to determine whether each mutation promotes a more ‘active-like’ or ‘inactive-like’ hydrogen-bonding network (Table 4).  Table 4 Table 4 Computational Prediction of Effects of ALK TKD Mutations ii). Hydrophobic interaction network As mentioned above, key autoinhibitory interactions are stabilized in the inactive conformation by residues with hydrophobic side-chains – notably those in the Phe-core (red in Figure 3D) and contacts between the αC-helix and short activation-loop helix (blue in Figure 3D). Disruption of these autoinhibitory hydrophobic interactions can be assessed readily by monitoring the solvent-accessible surface area (SASA) of relevant residues throughout the MD trajectories. If SASA increases as a result of a neuroblastoma mutation, the mutation is classed as ‘activating’. To further determine whether observed changes in SASA favor the active state, free energy perturbation (FEP) simulations were used to determine whether each mutation significantly destabilizes the inactive state relative to the active state (in which case it is classed as ‘activating’).  iii). Principal component analysis (PCA) PCA reveals correlated global motions across the MD trajectory. The top 10 dominant modes are considerably different (greater) in the active conformation than in inactive ALK TKD (indicating greater motion), as seen for other kinases (Shih et al., 2011). As outlined in Supplemental Experimental Procedures, each mutant with a top eigenvalue above 200 Å2 is scored as activating (indicating destabilization of key autoinhibitory interactions).  A mutation is predicted to be ‘activating’ overall if it scores as such in one or more of the three criteria outlined above. As shown in Table 4, predictions for each mutated ALK TKD variant studied here agree quite well with our experimental studies. Moreover, the computational analysis suggests a possible mechanism of activation for each mutation, i.e., by perturbing hydrophilic interactions, hydrophobic interactions, or global conformation. All of the mutations that elevate kcat of non-phosphorylated ALK TKD by over 5-fold were predicted correctly except two (I1171N, and F1245C), as listed in Table 4. Perhaps more importantly, our computational analysis correctly predicts the majority of mutations that are not activating – thus showing its value in distinguishing passenger from driver mutations and its potential utility for patient stratification. There are a few exceptions, however. The T1151M mutation was designated as activating in our computational analysis, but did not transform NIH 3T3 cells (Figure 4). Although biochemical analysis indicated an elevated kcat for this variant, it has a reduced kcat/KM, peptide, apparently arising from an elevated KM, peptide that would not be captured computationally. The I1250T and D1270G mutations – both also predicted to be activating using our computational approach – are special cases. D1270 is the conserved DFG aspartate, and loss of its side-chain removes a functional group essential for Mg2+ binding to the TKD. The I1250T mutation impairs protein stability and/or folding (as assessed by poor expression) in a way that the model cannot predict, so no activating effect is seen experimentally. The computational analysis also failed to predict three transforming mutations (Table 4): F1245C, I1171N, and L1196M (the gatekeeper mutation), for reasons that are less clear. Overall, however, our computational approach correctly predicts 75% of the transforming mutations and – importantly – over 75% of silent mutations (excepting special cases). By contrast, PolyPhen-2 (Table 4, right-most column) predicts only one silent mutation correctly and is plagued with false positives. It is important to reiterate that our computational studies were undertaken with no prior knowledge of the results shown in Figures 3 and and44 (with the exception of previously published results).  Go to: Discussion Discovery of activating mutations in the intact ALK gene as drivers in neuroblastoma provided the first example of a pediatric cancer caused by germline mutations in an oncogene, and the only druggable mutation in a pediatric solid tumor. We characterized the spectrum and frequency of germline and somatic alterations in ALK across all neuroblastoma disease subsets in 1596 patients. This dataset is powered to identify ALK mutations in neuroblastoma that, while rare, are still clinically relevant, and to have sufficient power to determine the prognostic capability of ALK alterations within each neuroblastoma risk group (high, intermediate, and low). In addition, cataloguing ALK mutations in these tumors allowed us to correlate sequence variations with oncogenic potency. Some of the observed mutations are unlikely to be oncogenic, and the activated variants differ in their sensitivity to crizotinib – with potentially important therapeutic implications. In multivariable models of the overall cohort, and within each risk group, both the presence of an ALK mutation (except within the low-risk group) and the presence of any ALK aberration were shown to correlate independently with worse EFS. These findings illustrate the value of determining ALK status for prognostic patient stratification, and also support the potential importance of ALK as a therapeutic target.  ALK mutations were observed in 8% of neuroblastoma patients, and span the entire spectrum of disease, including INSS Stage 4 disease, congenital cases, and adolescents/young adults. The fact that ALK mutations occur at the highest frequency (17%) in patients older than 10 suggests differences in the occurrence of genetic mutations based on age, reminiscent of the recently reported age distribution of ATRX mutations in neuroblastoma (Cheung et al., 2012). Within the high-risk subset of neuroblastoma patients the overall frequency of ALK aberration is 14% (10% mutation, 4% amplification). High-risk patients have the poorest outcomes, with approximately only 50% OS despite intensive multi-modal therapy including chemotherapy, surgery, myeloablative conditioning with bone marrow transplant, radiation therapy and immunotherapy plus retinoic acid (Maris, 2010) – making these patients excellent candidates for ALK-targeted therapy. Within the low- and intermediate-risk groups, the frequency of ALK aberration is 6% and 8% respectively. In low-risk cases, therapy usually involves observation, with or without surgical intervention, whereas patients with intermediate-risk disease are treated with conventional cytotoxic chemotherapy and are at risk for the associated late effects. Our results suggest an important opportunity within the intermediate-risk group to identify those with an activating ALK mutation for treatment with ALK inhibitors and de-escalation of traditional cytotoxic therapy.  Of the 24 different patient-derived ALK mutations assessed, only 13 drove transformation of NIH 3T3 cells. Where our studies overlap with other analyses of transformation by ALK variants found in neuroblastoma, they are in complete agreement (Chand et al., 2013; George et al., 2008; Schönherr et al., 2011a; Schönherr et al., 2011b). Importantly, every mutation that promoted transformation also constitutively activated the ALK TKD, with remarkable correlation between transforming activity and in vitro kcat value for the non-phosphorylated TKD. Eleven of the 24 mutations (representing 9% of ALK-mutated patients in this study) appeared silent or even inactivating. Of the activating mutations, in vitro analyses suggest that only 6 (including R1275Q) will be sensitive to inhibition by crizotinib in vivo. Some others are likely to respond better to next generation inhibitors that appear capable of inhibiting L1196M and I1171 variants (ceritinib) or F1174 variants (PF-06463922). Further comparative studies with these inhibitors are required to identify which is optimal for each variant.  Using a molecular dynamics (MD)-based computational approach, we showed that we can predict which mutations are activating – and more importantly which are not activating – with a success rate that greatly exceeds methods such as SIFT, PolyPhen-2, PredictSNP, and others. For example, our method correctly (and blindly) predicted the consequences of all newly described ALK mutations presented in this report, with D1270G as the one exception (where a catalytically crucial residue is mutated). It is important to note that our computational analysis assesses kinase activation, and not transformation itself – but our biochemical data indicate that elevating kcat of non-phosphorylated ALK TKD by 4.6-fold or more causes the receptor to be transforming. Our computational analysis of ALK mutations has significant promise as a clinical tool, and will improve with further training and testing using additional clinically observed (and experimental) mutations. It will also be important to apply computational approaches similar to those that we have employed for EGFR (Park et al., 2012) in efforts to predict inhibitor sensitivity.  Our findings allow us to formulate molecular diagnostic screening recommendations for newly diagnosed neuroblastoma patients, which will be important in clinical evaluation of ALK inhibitors for childhood cancer. We demonstrate that ALK is a predictive therapeutic biomarker of disease status, and also provides a therapeutic target in a select group of patients. With additional molecularly targeted therapeutics and computational models that leverage biochemical understanding to predict the effect of newly emerging ALK mutations, we should now be able to make upfront predictions about which patients are most likely to respond to crizotinib or other ALK inhibitors and (importantly) identify those that will not. Related approaches have been successful with imatinib in chronic myeloid leukemia, gefitinib in NSCLC, and most recently crizotinib in ALK-translocated NSCLC – although functional stratification of individual mutations along the lines described here has not yet been achieved. We are now poised to develop a responder hypothesis as part of a therapeutic strategy that incorporates pharmacologic ALK inhibition into the backbone of contemporary treatment regimens in neuroblastoma. Our phase 1 trial of crizotinib showed some promising responses even in heavily pretreated patients with ALK mutations with recurrent or refractory late-stage disease (Mossé et al., 2013), despite the facts that these heavily pre-treated patients are frequently multi-drug resistant, and also show an increased prevalence of p53 mutations at relapse (Carr-Wilkinson et al., 2010) – confounding factors that were not assessed. In newly diagnosed patients, where these issues are not relevant (and p53 mutations are rare), we expect upfront ALK-targeted treatment guided by the results described here to yield dramatically improved results.  In addition, our findings will help advance the management of individuals with neuroblastoma predisposition. Individuals with a germline ALK variation of unknown significance may have siblings who also harbor these variants, emphasizing the importance of understanding which alleles are indeed risk-alleles so as to determine their risk of developing neuroblastoma, and to offer appropriate clinical screening. No models have yet been established for effective early detection strategies or improving clinical outcomes when germline ALK variations are detected. Implementing clinical surveillance strategies for unaffected children (possibly even adults) with neuroblastoma carrying a germline ALK variant should be guided by data such as those presented here, recognizing the implications of the use of predictive genetic screening and surveillance practices and the absence of evidence of benefit from early detection in these individuals.  
1646||Mutations in the juxtamembrane and kinase domains of FLT3 are common in AML, but it is not known whether alterations outside these regions contribute to leukemogenesis. We used a high-throughput platform to interrogate the entire FLT3 coding sequence in AML patients without known FLT3 mutations and experimentally tested the consequences of each candidate leukemogenic allele. This approach identified gain-of-function mutations that activated downstream signaling and conferred sensitivity to FLT3 inhibition and alleles that were not associated with kinase activation, including mutations in the catalytic domain. These findings support the concept that acquired mutations in cancer may not contribute to malignant transformation and underscore the importance of functional studies to distinguish “driver” mutations underlying tumorigenesis from biologically neutral “passenger” alterations.  Author Keywords CELLCYCLE SIGNIFICANCE High-throughput DNA sequencing has provided insights into the mutational profiles of human cancers and represents a promising strategy for the identification of therapeutic targets. However, recognizing the subset of functionally relevant mutations has proven difficult. We used a combined genetic and functional approach to evaluate a series of candidate mutations in the receptor tyrosine kinase FLT3 that were identified in patients with AML. This strategy enabled distinction between activating alleles that conferred sensitivity to a small-molecule inhibitor and bystander mutations that did not result in kinase activation. Remarkably, these latter alterations included mutations in key functional domains of FLT3. These results emphasize that complementary functional studies are critical for validation of suspected oncogenic alleles from large-scale genomic screens.  Introduction The receptor tyrosine kinase (TK) FLT3 and its cognate ligand are important for the expansion of early hematopoietic progenitor cells and for the generation of mature natural killer cells and dendritic cells. Binding of FLT3 ligand to the extracellular (EC) domain of FLT3 induces receptor dimerization, which promotes phosphorylation of the FLT3 kinase domain, thereby activating the receptor and several downstream signaling pathways, primarily the PI3K/AKT pathway and the RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK cascade (Parcells et al., 2006).  In patients with acute myeloid leukemia (AML), somatic mutations that result in constitutive activation of FLT3 have been identified in two functional domains of the receptor, the juxtamembrane (JM) domain and the kinase domain. The JM domain, which has been shown to be critical for kinase autoinhibition (Griffith et al., 2004), is disrupted by internal tandem duplications (ITDs) in 25%–30% of adult AML patients (Stirewalt and Radich, 2003), whereas JM domain point mutations have been described in approximately 1% of cases (Reindl et al., 2006 ;  Stirewalt et al., 2004). FLT3 ITDs induce constitutive phosphorylation of several signal transduction intermediates, including STAT5, AKT, and ERK1/2 (Parcells et al., 2006) and cause myeloproliferative disease in various murine models (Kelly et al., 2002 ;  Lee et al., 2005). JM domain point mutations also result in constitutive activation of STAT5 and AKT (Reindl et al., 2006), but their in vivo transforming potential has not been studied.  The activation loop (AL) in the carboxy-terminal lobe of the kinase domain is affected by point mutations, insertions, or deletions in approximately 7% of AML cases (Frohling et al., 2005). AL mutations share several signal transduction properties with FLT3 ITDs, for example, constitutive phosphorylation of AKT and ERK1/2 (Choudhary et al., 2005 ;  Spiekermann et al., 2003). However, substantial differences between the two mutation types in the activation of STAT5 have been observed in some studies (Choudhary et al., 2005; Grundler et al., 2005 ;  Rocnik et al., 2006), but not in others (Bagrintseva et al., 2004; Grundler et al., 2003 ;  Spiekermann et al., 2003), and mice transplanted with BM expressing FLT3 AL mutations do not develop myeloid disease but rather, a T cell lymphoproliferative disorder with longer latency (Grundler et al., 2005). A mutation in the amino-terminal lobe of the kinase domain was found to induce constitutive activation of AKT, ERK1/2, and STAT5 (Schittenhelm et al., 2006).  From a clinical perspective, FLT3 mutations are important as a result of their prognostic relevance and because constitutively activated FLT3 is an attractive therapeutic target. FLT3 ITDs are associated with an increased risk of relapse and short survival (Yanada et al., 2005), and patients with low or absent levels of wild-type (WT) FLT3 appear to have a particularly dismal outcome (Thiede et al., 2002 ;  Whitman et al., 2001). In contrast, the prognostic relevance of FLT3 AL mutations remains controversial despite several studies on large patient series (Yanada et al., 2005). Currently, there are four selective FLT3 inhibitors at various stages of clinical development, including PKC412 (midostaurin), CEP-701 (lestaurtinib), MLN518 (tandutinib), and SU11248 (sunitinib) (Knapper, 2007). These compounds are well tolerated at doses that achieve inhibition of FLT3 and have shown moderate activity in relapsed or refractory AML patients with activating FLT3 mutations. In addition, some patients without FLT3 ITDs or known AL mutations have responded to FLT3 inhibitors, suggesting the possibility of other mutations that result in constitutive activation of FLT3. Ongoing clinical trials are evaluating the use of FLT3 inhibitors in combination with chemotherapy.  Previous studies have focused on the detection of mutations in the JM and kinase domains of FLT3, whereas the frequency and spectrum of sequence alterations outside these regions have not been systematically studied. We therefore performed high-throughput DNA sequencing of all coding exons of FLT3 in AML patients without FLT3 ITDs or known AL mutations. The primary aim of such a genomic screen is to identify “driver” mutations that are causally implicated in cancer development. However, recent large-scale sequencing studies in solid tumors that used statistical approaches to evaluate the impact of DNA sequence variants have demonstrated the difficulties in distinguishing driver mutations from “passenger” alterations that confer no clonal growth advantage ( Forrest and Cavet, 2007; Getz et al., 2007; Greenman et al., 2007; Rubin and Green, 2007; Sjoblom et al., 2006 ;  Wood et al., 2007). To address this problem, we experimentally tested the consequences of each candidate oncogenic allele identified in our mutation screen. This combined genetic and functional approach successfully identified gain-of-function mutations in the EC domain, the JM domain, and the AL of FLT3 and several passenger alterations that did not result in constitutive kinase activity. Furthermore, we investigated the structural implications, signal transduction properties, and sensitivity to FLT3 inhibition of the activating alleles.  Results High-Throughput DNA Sequence Analysis of FLT3  We performed bidirectional sequencing of all FLT3 coding exons in pretreatment samples from 222 adult AML patients without known activating mutations of FLT3, KIT, and NRAS. Sequence data were evaluated for quality and coverage within the region of interest of each exon that included all coding bases and the five flanking intronic bases at the 5′ and 3′ ends. High-quality, bidirectional sequence reads were obtained for more than 90% of all samples analyzed (see Table S1 in the Supplemental Data available with this article online).  FLT3 Sequence Variants in Patients with AML  We identified a total of 17 heterozygous nucleotide changes. Five of these changes corresponded to germline variants listed in single-nucleotide polymorphism (SNP) databases. Of the remaining 12 sequence alterations, 9 were predicted to change the amino acid sequence of FLT3 (nonsynonymous substitutions; Table 1 and Figure S1), whereas 3 were annotated as synonymous substitutions, resulting in a ratio of nonsynonymous to synonymous mutations of 3.  Table 1. Nonsynonymous Sequence Variants Identified by High-Throughput Sequencing of FLT3 in 222 AML Patients DNA	Exon	Protein	Domain 581A > G	5	T167A	extracellular 662G > A	5	V194M	extracellular 1052G > A	8	D324N	extracellular 1172T > C	9	Y364H	extracellular 1434C > T	11	S451F	extracellular 1751G > A	13	V557I	transmembrane 1797A > G	14	Y572C	juxtamembrane 1857T > G	14	V592G	juxtamembrane 2293G > C	18	M737I	kinase 2574G > A	20	G831E	activation loop 2583G > A	20	R834Q	activation loop Sequence numbering is according to Ensembl Transcript/Peptide ID ENST00000241453. D324N (refSNP ID rs35602083) and V557I (refSNP ID rs35958982) are known germline polymorphisms. Different mutations involving amino acids V592 and R834 (V592A, R834_D835 del, R834_D835insALG) are reported in the COSMIC database (version 30; http://www.sanger.ac.uk/genetics/CGP/cosmic/).  Table options The nine nonsynonymous sequence variants that were not known SNPs have not been observed in 48 normal control samples in which the entire coding region of FLT3 had previously been sequenced ( Ley et al., 2003) and were not among the germline variants identified in a mutation screen of all protein kinase genes in 210 human cancers (Greenman et al., 2007). These alterations were, therefore, considered to be candidate leukemogenic mutations that warrant experimental validation. Paired diagnostic and remission material was available from a patient with an M737I substitution in the FLT3 kinase domain. This variant was present at diagnosis but not in the remission sample, demonstrating that it was somatically acquired (Figure S1). The three synonymous sequence variants that were not known SNPs were considered to be nonfunctional and were, therefore, not further investigated.  FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q Are Gain-of-Function Mutations that Induce Constitutive Kinase Activation  To determine the functional consequences of all nine candidate mutations, we tested their ability to transform murine hematopoietic BaF3 cells to cytokine-independent growth, a property conferred by a broad spectrum of oncogenic TK alleles. Cells expressing S451F in the EC domain, Y572C or V592G in the JM domain, and R834Q in the AL were able to grow in the absence of interleukin-3 (IL-3; Figure 1A). Immunoprecipitation of FLT3 followed by western blotting with a phosphotyrosine-specific antibody demonstrated that these mutant kinases induced constitutive phosphorylation of FLT3 (Figure 1B). These results indicate that the S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q alleles are gain-of-function mutations that result in constitutive kinase activation. To perform a rapid and inexpensive secondary screen for these mutations, we designed allele-specific primer extension assays and performed genotype determination in an independent cohort of 127 adult AML cases. This analysis identified one additional case positive for the S451F substitution and one additional case with the R834Q allele. Thus, the overall prevalence of activating FLT3 mutations in this study was 1.7% (6 of 349 cases).  Constitutive Kinase Activation by FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q(A) ... Figure 1.  Constitutive Kinase Activation by FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q (A) Expression of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q resulted in IL-3-independent growth of BaF3 cells. Cells expressing the known AL mutation D835Y were used as positive control. Cells expressing WT FLT3 were used as negative control. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (B) Expression of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q in BaF3 cells resulted in constitutive FLT3 autophosphorylation. Cells were maintained in IL-3-free medium for 6 hr, FLT3 was immunoprecipitated from whole-cell lysates, and immunoprecipitates were analyzed by western blotting with an anti-phosphotyrosine antibody. Cells expressing a FLT3 ITD mutation (W51) or FLT3 D835Y were used as positive controls. Cells expressing WT FLT3 or the nontransforming G831E allele were used as negative controls. (C) Expression of FLT3 T167A, V194M, Y364H, M737I, and G831E did not result in IL-3-independent growth of BaF3 cells. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. Figure options Cells expressing any of the remaining five nonsynonymous sequence variants in the EC domain, the kinase domain, and the AL underwent apoptosis when cultured in the absence of exogenous cytokines, and constitutive phosphorylation of FLT3 was not observed (Figures 1B and 1C). These results indicate that a substantial proportion of the nonsynonymous sequence variants detected in FLT3 are likely to be passenger mutations. To increase confidence that the four presumed passenger mutations for which no matched normal DNA sample was available (T167A, V194M, Y364H, and G831E) did not represent germline polymorphisms or sequence artifacts, the following steps were taken. First, we sequenced the corresponding exons of FLT3 in 102 normal DNA samples and detected no abnormalities. Second, we determined by mass spectrometry genotyping that the G831E allele in the FLT3 AL was not present in the panel of 270 normal individuals collected by the International HapMap Consortium (2003). Third, we introduced PCR-amplified genomic DNA from each case into a cloning vector and sequenced between 50 and 55 individual transformants. In two cases (T167A and G831E), the observed mutant-to-wild-type allelic ratio was substantially different from 1 (0.19 and 3.2, respectively), suggesting that these alleles did not represent heterozygous SNPs. In the remaining two cases (V194M and Y364H), the number of recombinant clones carrying the mutant allele was similar to that of clones harboring the WT sequence (24 versus 27 and 31 versus 21, respectively), a finding compatible with either a somatic mutation that was present in most of the cells from which the original DNA sample was derived or with a heterozygous germline variant.  For comparison with our functional analyses, we also predicted the effects of all nine candidate mutations in silico using the SIFT (http://blocks.fhcrc.org/sift/SIFT.html) and PMut (http://mmb2.pcb.ub.es:8080/PMut) software programs (Table S2). Three sequence variants (S451F, G831E, and R834Q) were predicted to affect the function of FLT3, whereas four changes (T167A, V194M, Y364H, and M737I) were predicted to be tolerated. The remaining two mutations (Y572C and V592G) had conflicting results between the SIFT and PMut algorithms. These findings illustrate that bioinformatics approaches and functional assays provide complementary information as to the potential impact of mutations identified in large-scale genomic screens.  Ortholog alignments for all nonsynonymous sequence variants identified in this study, as well as relevant sequence alignments of all five class III receptor TKs (PDGFRA, PDGFRB, KIT, CSF1R, and FLT3) and other TKs with a known role in cancer (EGFR, ERBB2, RET, MET, and ABL1), are shown in Figure S2. Clinical characteristics of the patients with activating FLT3 mutations are given in Tables S3 and S4.  FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q Differentially Activate Downstream Signaling Pathways  To examine the signal transduction properties of the four activating mutations, BaF3 cells expressing FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, or R834Q were deprived of IL-3 and then analyzed by western blotting for phosphorylation of signaling proteins (Figure 2 and Table 2).  Differential Activation of Signal Transduction Pathways by FLT3 S451F, Y572C, ... Figure 2.  Differential Activation of Signal Transduction Pathways by FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q Expression of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q in BaF3 cells resulted in constitutive phosphorylation of varying signaling proteins. Cells were maintained in IL-3-free medium for 6 hr, and whole-cell lysates or immunoprecipitates from whole-cell lysates were analyzed by western blotting as indicated. The signaling characteristics of the four mutations were compared with those of FLT3 D835Y and the FLT3 ITD mutation W51. Cells expressing WT FLT3 or the nontransforming G831E allele were used as negative controls. Expression of FLT3 in the different stable cell lines was confirmed by reprobing the blot demonstrating constitutive phosphorylation of AKT with an anti-FLT3 antibody. Figure options Table 2. Constitutive Phosphorylation of Signaling Molecules in BaF3 Cells Expressing Activating FLT3 Mutations FLT3 Mutation Signaling molecule	S451F	Y572C	V592G	R834Q	D835Y	W51 FLT3	+	+	+	+	+	+ STAT5	−	+	+	−	−	+ ERK1/2	+	+	+	+	+	+ AKT	−	+	+	−	+	− STAT3	−	+	+	−	+	− S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q were identified in this study; D835Y and W51 are known activating FLT3 mutations that have been described previously. +, constitutive phosphorylation; −, no constitutive phosphorylation.  Table options Expression of the JM domain mutations Y572C and V592G resulted in constitutive phosphorylation of ERK1/2, AKT, STAT3, and STAT5. We recently identified Y589 and Y591 as sites in the JM domain that are necessary for aberrant activation of STAT5 in cells expressing a FLT3 ITD mutation (Rocnik et al., 2006). To investigate whether these residues are also required for signal transduction mediated by JM domain point mutations, we generated Y589/591F double substitutions in the cDNAs encoding FLT3 Y572C and V592G. Coexpression of Y589/591F delayed the induction of IL-3-independent growth in BaF3 cells (Figure S3A), decreased the proliferation rate of BaF3 cells in the absence of IL-3 (Figure S3B), and altered the signaling properties of the two alleles (Figure S3C). The Y589/591F mutations strongly reduced constitutive phosphorylation of ERK1/2, STAT3, and STAT5 and attenuated aberrant activation of AKT. These results, along with our analysis of the FLT3 structure (see below), support the hypothesis that point mutations in the JM domain, like FLT3 ITD mutations, can alter the conformation of the JM domain, potentially resulting in exposure of occult docking sites such as Y589 and Y591, in turn enabling recruitment and activation of specific downstream signaling proteins.  The signaling properties of the R834Q substitution were compared to those of the most frequent AL mutation, D835Y. Consistent with previous reports (Choudhary et al., 2005; Grundler et al., 2005 ;  Rocnik et al., 2006), BaF3 cells expressing D835Y showed constitutive activation of ERK1/2 and AKT, but not STAT5. Furthermore, we found that expression of D835Y was associated with constitutive phosphorylation of STAT3. The R834Q mutation, on the other hand, resulted in phosphorylation of ERK1/2 but not AKT, STAT3, or STAT5. This signaling pattern was associated with increased sensitivity to growth inhibition by the MEK inhibitor PD98059 as compared to cells harboring the D835Y mutation (Figures 3A and 3B), indicating a higher relative contribution of ERK signaling to the transforming activity of the R834Q allele. Similar to R834Q-positive cells, cells expressing the S451F mutation also showed constitutive phosphorylation of ERK1/2, but no induction of AKT, STAT3, or STAT5. These results suggest that activation of the MAPK pathway in the absence of PI3K/AKT, STAT3, or STAT5 signaling is sufficient for transformation of hematopoietic cells by specific FLT3 alleles and that cells carrying different FLT3 mutations are differentially dependent on signaling mechanisms that involve the MEK/ERK cascade.  Varying Sensitivity of Different FLT3 AL Mutations to MEK Inhibition(A) ... Figure 3.  Varying Sensitivity of Different FLT3 AL Mutations to MEK Inhibition (A) Expression of FLT3 R834Q was associated with a higher sensitivity to MEK inhibition as compared to FLT3 D835Y. BaF3 cells stably expressing FLT3 R834Q or D835Y and growing in the absence of IL-3 were treated with PD98059 as indicated. Cell viability was measured after 48 hr, and the proportion of viable cells relative to the control (no inhibitor) was plotted. IC50 values are indicated. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (B) PD98059 treatment of BaF3 cells expressing FLT3 R834Q or D835Y resulted in dose-dependent inhibition of ERK1/2 phosphorylation. Cells were incubated with varying drug concentrations for 15 min, and whole-cell lysates were analyzed by western blotting as indicated. Figure options FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q Confer Varying Sensitivity to the TK Inhibitor PKC412  To determine the sensitivity of the four activating mutations to FLT3 inhibition, BaF3 cells expressing FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, or R834Q were treated with increasing concentrations of the small-molecule TK inhibitor PKC412. FLT3 Y572C, V592G, and R834Q conferred high sensitivity to PKC412 (inhibitory concentration of 50% [IC50], 2.5 nM, 5 nM, and 2.3 nM, respectively), whereas a considerably higher IC50 (48 nM) was observed for FLT3 S451F (Figure 4A). Western blot analysis showed that treatment with PKC412 led to dose-dependent decreases in FLT3 autophosphorylation and in phosphorylation of ERK1/2 that correlated with inhibition of cell growth (Figure 4B). WT FLT3-expressing BaF3 cells grown in the presence of IL-3 were used as a control for toxicity unrelated to FLT3 inhibition, and no antiproliferative effect was observed for concentrations of PKC412 up to 50 nM (Figure 4A). These data show that the four activating FLT3 mutations identified in our mutation screen can be inhibited by PKC412 and that Y572C, V592G, and R834Q are considerably more sensitive to this compound than S451F.  Varying Sensitivity of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q to Kinase Inhibition ... Figure 4.  Varying Sensitivity of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q to Kinase Inhibition by PKC412 (A) Expression of FLT3 Y572C, V592G, or R834Q was associated with higher sensitivity to FLT3 inhibition as compared to FLT3 S451F. BaF3 cells growing in the absence of IL-3 were treated with PKC412 as indicated. Cell viability was measured after 48 hr, and the proportion of viable cells relative to the control (no inhibitor) was plotted. IC50 values are indicated. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (B) PKC412 treatment of BaF3 cells expressing FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q resulted in dose-dependent decreases in FLT3 and ERK1/2 phosphorylation. Cells were incubated with varying drug concentrations for 2 hr, and whole-cell lysates were analyzed by western blotting as indicated. Figure options Mutation of FLT3 V592 Promotes Aberrant Signal Transduction and Proliferation of Human AML Cells  To investigate the role of mutant FLT3 in human AML cells, we analyzed the MONO-MAC-6 cell line that has been reported to contain a V592A substitution in the FLT3 JM domain (Spiekermann et al., 2003). DNA sequence analysis confirmed the presence of a homozygous V592A mutation in this cell line (data not shown). Lentiviral transduction of MONO-MAC-6 cells with two short hairpin RNA (shRNA) constructs targeting different regions of the FLT3 transcript resulted in stable downregulation of FLT3 mRNA (Figure 5B) and reduced levels of FLT3 protein (Figure 5C). Knockdown of FLT3 was associated with a substantial reduction in cell viability as compared to cells transduced with a nontargeting control shRNA (Figure 5A). Western blot analysis showed that suppression of FLT3 resulted in loss of STAT5 phosphorylation (Figure 5C), indicating that STAT5 is a downstream target of mutations involving FLT3 V592, consistent with our signaling studies in BaF3 cells. These results suggest that endogenous point mutations of FLT3 V592 promote the growth and survival of human AML cells and that this effect is mediated through aberrant STAT5 activation.  Effects of FLT3 Knockdown in Human AML Cells(A) Downregulation of FLT3 using ... Figure 5.  Effects of FLT3 Knockdown in Human AML Cells (A) Downregulation of FLT3 using shRNA constructs TRCN 772 and TRCN 773 inhibited the growth of a human AML cell line, MONO-MAC-6, that harbors a homozyogus V592A mutation in the FLT3 JM domain. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (B) Transduction of MONO-MAC-6 cells with shRNA constructs TRCN 772 and TRCN 773 resulted in decreased FLT3 mRNA levels as compared to a nontargeting control construct. Experiments were performed in duplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (C) Suppression of FLT3 mRNA was associated with a reduction in FLT3 protein (upper panels) and with loss of STAT5 phosphorylation (lower panels). Figure options Structural Analysis of FLT3 Mutations  Based on the crystal structure of the intracellular domains of FLT3 (Protein Data Bank accession code 1RJB; Figure 6A), we assessed the potential mechanism by which point mutations in the JM domain and in the AL result in constitutive FLT3 kinase activity. Residues Y572 and R834 seem to be involved in maintaining the energetic favorability of the autoinhibited conformation of FLT3. Loss of the stabilizing effects of these residues should favor the active conformation. Y572, which has thus far not been found mutated in AML, is described as the first amino-terminal residue visible in the electron density of the crystal structure (Griffith et al., 2004). It is a key “hook” for the JM domain and is critical to maintain the autoinhibited conformation of FLT3 (Figure 6B). The Y572C substitution is expected to result in a substantial loss of hydrogen bonding networks and extensive hydrophobic interactions, with a consequent reduction in the energetic favorability of this conformation. Likewise, loss of hydrogen bonding networks that would result from the R834Q and D835Y mutations is expected to destabilize the autoinhibited kinase conformation (Figures 6C and 6D).  Structural Analysis of FLT3 Mutations(A) Ribbon representation of the crystal ... Figure 6.  Structural Analysis of FLT3 Mutations (A) Ribbon representation of the crystal structure of the FLT3 kinase domain (Protein Data Bank, accession code 1RJB). The structure is a typical kinase fold crystallized in the autoinhibited conformation with the JM domain packing closely to the kinase domain and locking the protein in this conformation. (B) Hydrogen bonding network formed by FLT3 Y572. Y572 inserts into the catalytic cleft of FLT3, where the phenolic hydroxyl oxygen forms hydrogen bonds to the catalytic glutamic acid, E661, and an ordered water molecule. The aromatic ring also makes extensive hydrophobic contacts. The Y572C mutation will disrupt this “hook” that locks the JM domain in the autoinhibited conformation. (C) Hydrogen bonding network formed by FLT3 R834. R834 is critical to the formation of a hydrogen bonding network that incorporates interactions with the side chains of residues N816, R815, Y842, D811, the backbone carbonyl oxygen of R815, and two water molecules. This network is directly adjacent to a hydrogen bonding network in which N841 plays a critical role. (D) Hydrogen bonding network formed by FLT3 D835. D835 is an integral part of a hydrogen bonding network that seems to stabilize the AL backbone in the autoinhibited conformation. There is a hydrogen bond directly between the carboxyl group and the backbone amide of residue S836. There is also an indirect hydrogen bond between the caryboxyl group and the backbone amide of M837 mediated by a water molecule. (E) Surface representation of the region proximal to G831. The molecular surface of FLT3 protein atoms is shown as a transparent gray surface. The surface is colored green where it contacts G831, and water molecules are shown as red spheres. The G831E mutation may not disrupt this conformation due to the proximity of a water-filled cavity adjacent to G831. In this figure, amino acid residues are shown in stick representation with nitrogen atoms in blue, oxygen in red, and carbon atoms the same color as the corresponding domain. Water molecules are shown as red spheres and hydrogen bonds as dashed red lines with their lengths labeled in Å. This figure was made using the program PyMOL (www.pymol.org). Figure options Conversely, structural analysis suggests that the nontransforming G831E substitution may not deleteriously affect the stability of the autoinhibited conformation. The molecular surface of autoinhibited FLT3 shows that there is a cavity directly adjacent to G831. This cavity is filled with water molecules and falls between the autoinhibited-conformation AL and JM domain (Figure 6E). Even though mutation of this glycine residue to glutamic acid is a substantial change, the glutamic acid residue should be able to be accommodated in the autoinhibited conformation by displacement of a number of water molecules. G831 lies within the invariant protein kinase DFG motif required for correct Mg2+•ATP coordination (Karlsson et al., 1993) and is important for conformational movements of the DFG motif between active and inactive states (Levinson et al., 2006). Consequently, the G831E mutation may stabilize FLT3 in the autoinhibited conformation and result in reduced kinase activity, consistent with our data showing a lack of FLT3 autophosphorylation in cells expressing FLT3 G831E.  Discussion We have used high-throughput DNA sequence analysis to determine the frequency and spectrum of mutations in the FLT3 gene in adult AML patients without known FLT3 ITDs or AL mutations. Sequencing of all FLT3 coding exons identified nine candidate leukemogenic alleles in six exons corresponding to different domains of the FLT3 receptor.  Large-scale mutational profiling studies in cancer typically result in extensive lists of validated nonsynonymous sequence variants. A major challenge of these studies is to distinguish driver mutations that are responsible for malignant transformation from nonfunctional passenger alterations that arise in the malignant clone by chance and accumulate during repeated rounds of cell division. To identify genetic changes with a role in tumorigenesis, statistical models have been developed that incorporate mutational frequency and distribution, and it has been inferred from such approaches that nonsynonymous passenger mutations are present at a higher frequency than previously anticipated (Greenman et al., 2007; Sjoblom et al., 2006 ;  Wood et al., 2007). We provide functional documentation of this concept by using a different strategy that combined both high-throughput DNA sequence analysis of FLT3 in primary AML samples with experimental validation of all potential driver mutations identified. Cytokine independence assays and biochemical analysis revealed that of the 9 candidate leukemogenic alleles, 4 are gain-of-function mutations that result in constitutive kinase activation and stimulation of downstream signaling pathways, properties that are relevant to leukemogenesis and can be exploited therapeutically, whereas the remaining 5 alleles were not associated with increased kinase activity and aberrant signal transduction.  These results also indicate that functional analyses can provide information beyond that derived from statistical methods for identifying driver mutations. First, we show that rare sequence variants occurring at frequencies that would not allow them to be distinguished from unselected passenger changes can be drivers. Second, we report that alleles in the kinase domain and in the AL—highly conserved and functionally relevant domains that, based on mathematical approaches, are likely to harbor driver mutations—may not be associated with a detectable gain of function. Third, statistical techniques result in identification of candidate cancer genes, but do not predict the ability of individual alleles to contribute to transformation. Our analysis of a series of nonsynonymous sequence variants in FLT3, a validated cancer gene ( Futreal et al., 2004), indicates that functional studies are needed to complement the bioinformatic approaches that have been described to date.  In addition to mutational frequency and distribution, statistical methods for assessing the functional relevance of DNA sequence variants in cancer rely on discerning acquired mutations from inherited polymorphisms. While the analysis of germline DNA is essential to assess the origin of cancer-associated genomic alterations and to determine whether a mutation has been selected for during tumorigenesis, previous findings in solid tumors indicate that the presence of a kinase mutation in constitutional DNA does not exclude the possibility that it has a potential role in malignant transformation (Bell et al., 2005; Jeffers et al., 1997; Mulloy et al., 2007 ;  Plaza-Menacho et al., 2006). These data further support the conclusion that the interpretation of high-throughput sequencing studies can be improved through functional assessment of candidate oncogenic alleles.  The four activating mutations that were identified in our screen are located in the EC domain (S451F), the JM domain (Y572C and V592G), and the AL (R834Q) of FLT3. Sequence variants in the EC region (D324N and N520Y) have been described previously in patients with AML (Ley et al., 2003 ;  Syampurnawati et al., 2007). However, D324N is also present in normal individuals and in nonhematopoietic tissues from AML patients and does not confer cytokine-independent growth to BaF3 cells (Schnittger et al., 2006), whereas the functional consequences of N520Y have not been assessed. Our results thus document that FLT3, like EGFR and KIT (Gari et al., 1999 ;  Lee et al., 2006), can be activated by mutations in the EC domain. To determine the mechanism by which the S451F mutation results in constitutive FLT3 kinase activity, structural analysis of a larger FLT3 molecule that includes the EC domain will be required.  Point mutations in the region between amino acids 579 and 594 in the FLT3 JM domain have been detected in a small proportion of AML cases (Reindl et al., 2006 ;  Stirewalt et al., 2004). We have found a valine to glycine substitution involving residue 592 and a mutation involving Y572. Y572 is the first amino acid of the JM domain, and analysis of the crystal structure of the FLT3 cytoplasmic domain has suggested a key role for this residue in kinase autoinhibition (Griffith et al., 2004). Our structural analysis suggests that mutation of Y572 would result in disruption of its extensive interactions with the surrounding FLT3 subdomains and consequent destabilization of the inactive kinase conformation. In support of this hypothesis, the Y572C substitution that was identified in our mutation screen results in constitutive FLT3 kinase activity. These data provide genetic evidence for the importance of Y572 in maintaining the autoinhibited conformation of FLT3 and suggest that any mutation that interferes with the stability of the JM domain in this conformation is likely to be transforming.  The signaling properties of the two JM domain point mutations are similar to those of FLT3 ITDs (Parcells et al., 2006). In particular, aberrant activation of STAT5 by JM domain point mutations appears to involve two tyrosine residues, Y589 and Y591, that are essential for FLT3 ITD-mediated induction of STAT5 and leukemic transformation in vivo (Rocnik et al., 2006). Analysis of the role of Y589 and Y591 also provided insights into the deregulation of other signaling pathways by mutant FLT3. For example, the majority of primary AML samples are characterized by activated MAPK and PI3K/AKT signaling; however, the fact that dysregulation of various upstream effectors can result in aberrant phosphorylation of ERK1/2 and AKT indicates that the MAPK and PI3K/AKT cascades may be activated through a variety of different mechanisms (Martelli et al., 2006 ;  Platanias, 2003). In support of the hypothesis that mutant TKs activate downstream signaling pathways by distinct mechanisms, phosphorylation of ERK1/2 and AKT by FLT3 JM domain point mutations also requires Y589 and Y591, and similar observations were made for constitutive activation of STAT3. These results suggest that the different types of JM domain mutations (ITDs and point mutations) contribute in similar ways to myeloid leukemogenesis and demonstrate that Y589 and Y591 are critical for the induction of several signaling pathways that are activated in leukemias with FLT3 JM domain mutations. Furthermore, these findings illustrate the potential of point mutations to alter the substrate specificity of protein kinases. Whether FLT3 Y589/591-mediated signal transduction in AML involves direct engagement of downstream effectors by these residues or requires additional adaptor molecules is currently unknown.  Previously described mutations in the FLT3 AL include substitutions, insertions, or deletions within a region between amino acids 834 and 842, with D835 being the most commonly affected residue (Frohling et al., 2005). We identified nonsynonymous substitutions at codons 831 and 834. Analysis of the crystal structure of the FLT3 kinase domain suggests that mutation of residue R834 would interfere with the stability of the autoinhibited conformation, and in agreement with this hypothesis, FLT3 R834Q has constitutive kinase activity and confers IL-3-independent growth to BaF3 cells. In contrast, mutation of the conserved DFG motif G831 to glutamic acid may deleteriously affect the structural requirements for enzymatic activity, is expected to be compatible with the autoinhibited conformation, and does not result in transformation of hematopoietic cells. These results illustrate the value of structural analysis for understanding the atomic-level mechanisms by which TK mutations associated with human leukemias function. In addition, these data indicate that the autoinhibited conformation of FLT3 is critically dependent on the stabilizing contacts of a limited number of specific amino acids, whereas mutation of other residues within the AL does not alter the structure and function of the FLT3 kinase.  Analysis of the signaling properties of FLT3 R834Q demonstrated that this mutation, unlike the more common D835Y allele, results in activation of ERK1/2, but not AKT, STAT3, or STAT5. Consistent with this observation, the R834Q mutation is associated with enhanced sensitivity to MEK inhibition, indicating that cells expressing R834Q are more reliant on MAPK signaling than are D835Y-expressing cells that constitutively phosphorylate multiple signaling proteins. These results suggest that there are not only differences in signal transduction between various FLT3 mutation classes, for example, ITDs and AL mutations (Choudhary et al., 2005 ;  Grundler et al., 2005), but also between distinct alleles within a given mutation class and that cells carrying different FLT3 mutations are differentially dependent on certain signaling pathways.  To determine the functional consequences of candidate mutations, we used an in vitro assay that is based on exogenous expression of mutated alleles in murine hematopoietic cells. This assay has proved to be of value for the assessment of increased TK activity and perturbed signal transduction and has been validated for numerous TK alleles identified in human hematologic malignancies, including FLT3 ITDs and AL mutations (Clark et al., 2004 ;  Weisberg et al., 2002), as well as for TK alleles associated with solid tumors, such as mutations in the EGFR kinase domain and the recently discovered EML4-ALK fusion in patients with non-small-cell lung cancer (Jiang et al., 2005 ;  Soda et al., 2007). On the other hand, conversion of BaF3 cells to cytokine independence may not faithfully assess the functional implications of certain mutations, either because they require expression of additional proteins (Lu et al., 2005) or because cooperativity between two or more mutations is required for signaling pathway activation. Lastly, this assay may fail to detect a gain of function conferred by kinase mutations that do not result in increased enzymatic activity. For instance, Wan et al. (2004) described three mutants of the serine-threonine kinase BRAF with impaired catalytic activity that are capable of stimulating downstream signaling through transactivation of CRAF. Although we observed no activation of ERK1/2, AKT, STAT3, or STAT5 in cells expressing FLT3 mutations that read out as nonfunctional in the BaF3 assay, it is possible that some of these alleles stimulate other effector molecules that were not analyzed in our study. We recognize that it is impossible to definitively exclude any conceivable function of a given mutation. Nonetheless, the nontransforming mutations identified in our screen do not meet conventional criteria for effects on kinase activation.  The activating mutations identified in our study conferred varying degrees of sensitivity to the small-molecule TK inhibitor PKC412. Cells expressing Y572C, V592G, or R834Q were highly sensitive to this compound, as has been reported for other JM domain (Reindl et al., 2006) and AL mutations (Choudhary et al., 2005; Grundler et al., 2003 ;  Weisberg et al., 2002). In contrast, cytotoxic responses in S451F-expressing cells required substantially higher drug concentrations. The determinants of response to pharmacologic inhibition of FLT3 are diverse and remain only partly understood. In general, the presence of mutant FLT3 is associated with increased drug sensitivity (DeAngelo et al., 2006 ;  Fiedler et al., 2005), yet there appears to be substantial variation among the different mutation types (Choudhary et al., 2005; Grundler et al., 2003 ;  Weisberg et al., 2002) as well as between individual alleles within the same mutation class (Clark et al., 2004 ;  Grundler et al., 2003). In addition, it has been observed that patients without FLT3 ITDs or any of the known AL mutations may also derive benefit from FLT3 inhibitor therapy, which might be related to the presence of previously unrecognized mutations (Schittenhelm et al., 2006), and in vitro studies in primary AML samples have shown that there is substantial interpatient variation in the degree of dependency on FLT3 signaling (Knapper et al., 2006). Our findings further illustrate the complex relationship between FLT3 mutation status and response to pharmacologic FLT3 inhibition.  In summary, our results demonstrate that previously unrecognized activating FLT3 mutations in the EC domain, the JM domain, and the AL occur in patients with AML, albeit at a low frequency. Since mutations lying outside the usually studied mutational hotspots may confer sensitivity to small-molecule TK inhibitors, eligibility for clinical trials of FLT3-targeted therapies should not be based on diagnostic screens that are limited to the detection of only a fraction of the FLT3 mutations associated with AML. The development of sensitive, allele-specific assays, such as mass spectrometry-based genotyping (Thomas et al., 2007), will allow all patients enrolled on trials of FLT3 inhibitors to be genotyped for all known FLT3 alleles, and it is hoped that similar strategies will be used in trials of molecularly targeted therapies for patients with different hematopoietic malignancies and solid tumors.  FLT3 is a highly annotated and well-studied cancer gene known to play a key role in myeloid leukemogenesis. The finding that only a fraction of the nonsynonymous FLT3 mutations associated with AML result in constitutive kinase activity illustrates the challenge in distinguishing between sequence variants that contribute to malignant transformation and nonfunctional passenger mutations. Given that the increasing throughput of DNA sequencing technologies will allow improved characterization of somatic cancer genomes, these data demonstrate that a combination of genetic and functional approaches will be crucial in order to identify the mutations that truly drive the development of cancer and to validate the potential of suspected oncogenic alleles as therapeutic targets.  Experimental Procedures Patient Samples  This study included 349 adult patients with AML, de novo or secondary after treatment for a primary malignancy or following myelodysplasia, as defined by French-American-British Cooperative Group criteria or the World Health Organization classification (Bennett et al., 1985 ;  Harris et al., 1999). Diagnostic BM and peripheral blood samples were collected after obtaining informed consent according to the Declaration of Helsinki and with institutional review board approval of the relevant institutions. All samples were enriched for mononuclear cells by density centrifugation before banking. Only samples with more than 50% blasts were included for DNA sequence analysis, and more than 80% of the samples had at least 80% blasts. All specimens that were analyzed by DNA sequencing were negative for FLT3 ITDs, as assessed by PCR amplification of exons 14 and 15; for FLT3 AL mutations involving codons 835 and 836, as assessed by PCR amplification of exon 20 followed by EcoRV digestion; for activating KIT mutations, as assessed by sequencing of exons 8 and 17; and for mutations involving NRAS codons 12, 13, and 61, as assessed by sequencing of exons 1 and 2.  FLT3 Mutational Analysis and Selection of Candidate Mutations  Extraction of genomic DNA, amplification of FLT3 exons, bidirectional sequencing, and sequence detection were performed using a high-throughput resequencing approach as previously described ( Levine et al., 2005). External gene-specific primers and internal M13-appended primers are listed in Table S5. Analysis of sequence traces was performed using Mutation Surveyor version 2.28 (SoftGenetics, State College, PA). Five steps were used to identify mutations of interest. First, any synonymous substitutions were not analyzed further. Second, known SNPs were excluded by comparison to the dbSNP database (release 127; http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/projects/SNP). Third, published data sets ( Greenman et al., 2007 ;  Ley et al., 2003) were queried to exclude any nonsynonymous substitutions in the FLT3 coding sequence that have been detected in DNA samples derived from normal tissues. Fourth, sequence chromatograms were visually inspected to remove false positive calls in the automated analysis. Fifth, candidate mutations were reamplified and sequenced from the original DNA sample for independent verification. Leukemic cells at diagnosis and a matched remission sample were analyzed in one case with a presumptive leukemogenic mutation in the FLT3 kinase domain, M737I.  Genotyping  Mass spectrometry genotyping was performed as previously described (Levine et al., 2005). Primers and primer extension probes for detection of the different FLT3 alleles are listed in Table S6.  DNA Constructs and Retrovirus Production  Sequence variants were introduced into the full-length FLT3 cDNA using the QuikChange XL Site-Directed Mutagenesis Kit (Stratagene, La Jolla, CA). All mutations were confirmed by sequencing of the entire FLT3 open reading frame. The mutant cDNAs were cloned into the MSCV-PGK-neo retroviral vector, and full-length protein expression was documented by western blotting. Generation of retroviral supernatants and infection of BaF3 cells were performed as described previously ( Rocnik et al., 2006). BaF3 cells transduced with MSCV-PGK-neo constructs were selected with G418 in the presence of IL-3 for 14 days.  Cell Culture  BaF3 cells were maintained in RPMI-1640 supplemented with 10% fetal calf serum and 10% WEHI-conditioned medium as a source of IL-3. For cytokine independence assays, cells transduced with each of the MSCV-PGK-neo retroviral contructs were seeded at a density of 0.33 × 106/ml in IL-3-free medium, and the number of viable cells was determined daily by trypan blue exclusion. For growth inhibition assays, cells were seeded at a density of 1 × 105/ml in IL-3-free medium with various concentrations of PKC412 (Novartis, Basel, Switzerland) or PD98059 (Calbiochem, San Diego, CA), and the number of viable cells was determined after 48 hr using the CellTiter 96AQueous One Solution Proliferation Assay (Promega, Madison, WI).  Immunoprecipitation and Western Blotting  Immunoprecipitation and western blotting were performed as described previously (Rocnik et al., 2006) using the following antibodies: anti-FLT3, anti-STAT5, anti-phospho-ERK1/2 (T202/Y204) (Santa Cruz Biotechnology, Santa Cruz, CA); anti-STAT3, anti-phospho-STAT3 (Y705), anti-phospho-STAT5 (Y694), anti-ERK1/2, anti-AKT, anti-phospho-AKT (S473) (Cell Signaling Technology, Beverly, MA); and anti-phosphotyrosine (4G10) (Upstate, Lake Placid, NY).  Knockdown of FLT3 Expression  Two pLKO.1-based lentiviral vectors encoding shRNAs targeted to the 3′ untranslated region (TRCN 772) or the coding sequence (TRCN 773) of the human FLT3 mRNA, and a pLKO.1 construct containing a nontargeting shRNA sequence were obtained from the MISSION TRC-Hs 1.0 (Human) shRNA library ( Root et al., 2006). The oligonucleotide sequences of the shRNAs were as follows (21-nucleotide stem sequences matching the target transcript underlined; noncomplementary 6-nucleotide loop sequences italicized): TRCN 772, 5′-CCG GCG TCT GCG TTT ACT CTT GTT TCT CGA GAA ACA AGA GTA AAC GCA GAC GTT TTT-3′; TRCN 773, 5′-CCG GGC TAA CTT CTA CAA ACT GAT TCT CGA GAA TCA GTT TGT AGA AGT TAG CTT TTT-3′. Generation of lentiviral supernatants and infection of human AML cells were performed as described previously (Scholl et al., 2007).  
1647||Mutations in the juxtamembrane and kinase domains of FLT3 are common in AML, but it is not known whether alterations outside these regions contribute to leukemogenesis. We used a high-throughput platform to interrogate the entire FLT3 coding sequence in AML patients without known FLT3 mutations and experimentally tested the consequences of each candidate leukemogenic allele. This approach identified gain-of-function mutations that activated downstream signaling and conferred sensitivity to FLT3 inhibition and alleles that were not associated with kinase activation, including mutations in the catalytic domain. These findings support the concept that acquired mutations in cancer may not contribute to malignant transformation and underscore the importance of functional studies to distinguish “driver” mutations underlying tumorigenesis from biologically neutral “passenger” alterations.  Author Keywords CELLCYCLE SIGNIFICANCE High-throughput DNA sequencing has provided insights into the mutational profiles of human cancers and represents a promising strategy for the identification of therapeutic targets. However, recognizing the subset of functionally relevant mutations has proven difficult. We used a combined genetic and functional approach to evaluate a series of candidate mutations in the receptor tyrosine kinase FLT3 that were identified in patients with AML. This strategy enabled distinction between activating alleles that conferred sensitivity to a small-molecule inhibitor and bystander mutations that did not result in kinase activation. Remarkably, these latter alterations included mutations in key functional domains of FLT3. These results emphasize that complementary functional studies are critical for validation of suspected oncogenic alleles from large-scale genomic screens.  Introduction The receptor tyrosine kinase (TK) FLT3 and its cognate ligand are important for the expansion of early hematopoietic progenitor cells and for the generation of mature natural killer cells and dendritic cells. Binding of FLT3 ligand to the extracellular (EC) domain of FLT3 induces receptor dimerization, which promotes phosphorylation of the FLT3 kinase domain, thereby activating the receptor and several downstream signaling pathways, primarily the PI3K/AKT pathway and the RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK cascade (Parcells et al., 2006).  In patients with acute myeloid leukemia (AML), somatic mutations that result in constitutive activation of FLT3 have been identified in two functional domains of the receptor, the juxtamembrane (JM) domain and the kinase domain. The JM domain, which has been shown to be critical for kinase autoinhibition (Griffith et al., 2004), is disrupted by internal tandem duplications (ITDs) in 25%–30% of adult AML patients (Stirewalt and Radich, 2003), whereas JM domain point mutations have been described in approximately 1% of cases (Reindl et al., 2006 ;  Stirewalt et al., 2004). FLT3 ITDs induce constitutive phosphorylation of several signal transduction intermediates, including STAT5, AKT, and ERK1/2 (Parcells et al., 2006) and cause myeloproliferative disease in various murine models (Kelly et al., 2002 ;  Lee et al., 2005). JM domain point mutations also result in constitutive activation of STAT5 and AKT (Reindl et al., 2006), but their in vivo transforming potential has not been studied.  The activation loop (AL) in the carboxy-terminal lobe of the kinase domain is affected by point mutations, insertions, or deletions in approximately 7% of AML cases (Frohling et al., 2005). AL mutations share several signal transduction properties with FLT3 ITDs, for example, constitutive phosphorylation of AKT and ERK1/2 (Choudhary et al., 2005 ;  Spiekermann et al., 2003). However, substantial differences between the two mutation types in the activation of STAT5 have been observed in some studies (Choudhary et al., 2005; Grundler et al., 2005 ;  Rocnik et al., 2006), but not in others (Bagrintseva et al., 2004; Grundler et al., 2003 ;  Spiekermann et al., 2003), and mice transplanted with BM expressing FLT3 AL mutations do not develop myeloid disease but rather, a T cell lymphoproliferative disorder with longer latency (Grundler et al., 2005). A mutation in the amino-terminal lobe of the kinase domain was found to induce constitutive activation of AKT, ERK1/2, and STAT5 (Schittenhelm et al., 2006).  From a clinical perspective, FLT3 mutations are important as a result of their prognostic relevance and because constitutively activated FLT3 is an attractive therapeutic target. FLT3 ITDs are associated with an increased risk of relapse and short survival (Yanada et al., 2005), and patients with low or absent levels of wild-type (WT) FLT3 appear to have a particularly dismal outcome (Thiede et al., 2002 ;  Whitman et al., 2001). In contrast, the prognostic relevance of FLT3 AL mutations remains controversial despite several studies on large patient series (Yanada et al., 2005). Currently, there are four selective FLT3 inhibitors at various stages of clinical development, including PKC412 (midostaurin), CEP-701 (lestaurtinib), MLN518 (tandutinib), and SU11248 (sunitinib) (Knapper, 2007). These compounds are well tolerated at doses that achieve inhibition of FLT3 and have shown moderate activity in relapsed or refractory AML patients with activating FLT3 mutations. In addition, some patients without FLT3 ITDs or known AL mutations have responded to FLT3 inhibitors, suggesting the possibility of other mutations that result in constitutive activation of FLT3. Ongoing clinical trials are evaluating the use of FLT3 inhibitors in combination with chemotherapy.  Previous studies have focused on the detection of mutations in the JM and kinase domains of FLT3, whereas the frequency and spectrum of sequence alterations outside these regions have not been systematically studied. We therefore performed high-throughput DNA sequencing of all coding exons of FLT3 in AML patients without FLT3 ITDs or known AL mutations. The primary aim of such a genomic screen is to identify “driver” mutations that are causally implicated in cancer development. However, recent large-scale sequencing studies in solid tumors that used statistical approaches to evaluate the impact of DNA sequence variants have demonstrated the difficulties in distinguishing driver mutations from “passenger” alterations that confer no clonal growth advantage ( Forrest and Cavet, 2007; Getz et al., 2007; Greenman et al., 2007; Rubin and Green, 2007; Sjoblom et al., 2006 ;  Wood et al., 2007). To address this problem, we experimentally tested the consequences of each candidate oncogenic allele identified in our mutation screen. This combined genetic and functional approach successfully identified gain-of-function mutations in the EC domain, the JM domain, and the AL of FLT3 and several passenger alterations that did not result in constitutive kinase activity. Furthermore, we investigated the structural implications, signal transduction properties, and sensitivity to FLT3 inhibition of the activating alleles.  Results High-Throughput DNA Sequence Analysis of FLT3  We performed bidirectional sequencing of all FLT3 coding exons in pretreatment samples from 222 adult AML patients without known activating mutations of FLT3, KIT, and NRAS. Sequence data were evaluated for quality and coverage within the region of interest of each exon that included all coding bases and the five flanking intronic bases at the 5′ and 3′ ends. High-quality, bidirectional sequence reads were obtained for more than 90% of all samples analyzed (see Table S1 in the Supplemental Data available with this article online).  FLT3 Sequence Variants in Patients with AML  We identified a total of 17 heterozygous nucleotide changes. Five of these changes corresponded to germline variants listed in single-nucleotide polymorphism (SNP) databases. Of the remaining 12 sequence alterations, 9 were predicted to change the amino acid sequence of FLT3 (nonsynonymous substitutions; Table 1 and Figure S1), whereas 3 were annotated as synonymous substitutions, resulting in a ratio of nonsynonymous to synonymous mutations of 3.  Table 1. Nonsynonymous Sequence Variants Identified by High-Throughput Sequencing of FLT3 in 222 AML Patients DNA	Exon	Protein	Domain 581A > G	5	T167A	extracellular 662G > A	5	V194M	extracellular 1052G > A	8	D324N	extracellular 1172T > C	9	Y364H	extracellular 1434C > T	11	S451F	extracellular 1751G > A	13	V557I	transmembrane 1797A > G	14	Y572C	juxtamembrane 1857T > G	14	V592G	juxtamembrane 2293G > C	18	M737I	kinase 2574G > A	20	G831E	activation loop 2583G > A	20	R834Q	activation loop Sequence numbering is according to Ensembl Transcript/Peptide ID ENST00000241453. D324N (refSNP ID rs35602083) and V557I (refSNP ID rs35958982) are known germline polymorphisms. Different mutations involving amino acids V592 and R834 (V592A, R834_D835 del, R834_D835insALG) are reported in the COSMIC database (version 30; http://www.sanger.ac.uk/genetics/CGP/cosmic/).  Table options The nine nonsynonymous sequence variants that were not known SNPs have not been observed in 48 normal control samples in which the entire coding region of FLT3 had previously been sequenced ( Ley et al., 2003) and were not among the germline variants identified in a mutation screen of all protein kinase genes in 210 human cancers (Greenman et al., 2007). These alterations were, therefore, considered to be candidate leukemogenic mutations that warrant experimental validation. Paired diagnostic and remission material was available from a patient with an M737I substitution in the FLT3 kinase domain. This variant was present at diagnosis but not in the remission sample, demonstrating that it was somatically acquired (Figure S1). The three synonymous sequence variants that were not known SNPs were considered to be nonfunctional and were, therefore, not further investigated.  FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q Are Gain-of-Function Mutations that Induce Constitutive Kinase Activation  To determine the functional consequences of all nine candidate mutations, we tested their ability to transform murine hematopoietic BaF3 cells to cytokine-independent growth, a property conferred by a broad spectrum of oncogenic TK alleles. Cells expressing S451F in the EC domain, Y572C or V592G in the JM domain, and R834Q in the AL were able to grow in the absence of interleukin-3 (IL-3; Figure 1A). Immunoprecipitation of FLT3 followed by western blotting with a phosphotyrosine-specific antibody demonstrated that these mutant kinases induced constitutive phosphorylation of FLT3 (Figure 1B). These results indicate that the S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q alleles are gain-of-function mutations that result in constitutive kinase activation. To perform a rapid and inexpensive secondary screen for these mutations, we designed allele-specific primer extension assays and performed genotype determination in an independent cohort of 127 adult AML cases. This analysis identified one additional case positive for the S451F substitution and one additional case with the R834Q allele. Thus, the overall prevalence of activating FLT3 mutations in this study was 1.7% (6 of 349 cases).  Constitutive Kinase Activation by FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q(A) ... Figure 1.  Constitutive Kinase Activation by FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q (A) Expression of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q resulted in IL-3-independent growth of BaF3 cells. Cells expressing the known AL mutation D835Y were used as positive control. Cells expressing WT FLT3 were used as negative control. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (B) Expression of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q in BaF3 cells resulted in constitutive FLT3 autophosphorylation. Cells were maintained in IL-3-free medium for 6 hr, FLT3 was immunoprecipitated from whole-cell lysates, and immunoprecipitates were analyzed by western blotting with an anti-phosphotyrosine antibody. Cells expressing a FLT3 ITD mutation (W51) or FLT3 D835Y were used as positive controls. Cells expressing WT FLT3 or the nontransforming G831E allele were used as negative controls. (C) Expression of FLT3 T167A, V194M, Y364H, M737I, and G831E did not result in IL-3-independent growth of BaF3 cells. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. Figure options Cells expressing any of the remaining five nonsynonymous sequence variants in the EC domain, the kinase domain, and the AL underwent apoptosis when cultured in the absence of exogenous cytokines, and constitutive phosphorylation of FLT3 was not observed (Figures 1B and 1C). These results indicate that a substantial proportion of the nonsynonymous sequence variants detected in FLT3 are likely to be passenger mutations. To increase confidence that the four presumed passenger mutations for which no matched normal DNA sample was available (T167A, V194M, Y364H, and G831E) did not represent germline polymorphisms or sequence artifacts, the following steps were taken. First, we sequenced the corresponding exons of FLT3 in 102 normal DNA samples and detected no abnormalities. Second, we determined by mass spectrometry genotyping that the G831E allele in the FLT3 AL was not present in the panel of 270 normal individuals collected by the International HapMap Consortium (2003). Third, we introduced PCR-amplified genomic DNA from each case into a cloning vector and sequenced between 50 and 55 individual transformants. In two cases (T167A and G831E), the observed mutant-to-wild-type allelic ratio was substantially different from 1 (0.19 and 3.2, respectively), suggesting that these alleles did not represent heterozygous SNPs. In the remaining two cases (V194M and Y364H), the number of recombinant clones carrying the mutant allele was similar to that of clones harboring the WT sequence (24 versus 27 and 31 versus 21, respectively), a finding compatible with either a somatic mutation that was present in most of the cells from which the original DNA sample was derived or with a heterozygous germline variant.  For comparison with our functional analyses, we also predicted the effects of all nine candidate mutations in silico using the SIFT (http://blocks.fhcrc.org/sift/SIFT.html) and PMut (http://mmb2.pcb.ub.es:8080/PMut) software programs (Table S2). Three sequence variants (S451F, G831E, and R834Q) were predicted to affect the function of FLT3, whereas four changes (T167A, V194M, Y364H, and M737I) were predicted to be tolerated. The remaining two mutations (Y572C and V592G) had conflicting results between the SIFT and PMut algorithms. These findings illustrate that bioinformatics approaches and functional assays provide complementary information as to the potential impact of mutations identified in large-scale genomic screens.  Ortholog alignments for all nonsynonymous sequence variants identified in this study, as well as relevant sequence alignments of all five class III receptor TKs (PDGFRA, PDGFRB, KIT, CSF1R, and FLT3) and other TKs with a known role in cancer (EGFR, ERBB2, RET, MET, and ABL1), are shown in Figure S2. Clinical characteristics of the patients with activating FLT3 mutations are given in Tables S3 and S4.  FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q Differentially Activate Downstream Signaling Pathways  To examine the signal transduction properties of the four activating mutations, BaF3 cells expressing FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, or R834Q were deprived of IL-3 and then analyzed by western blotting for phosphorylation of signaling proteins (Figure 2 and Table 2).  Differential Activation of Signal Transduction Pathways by FLT3 S451F, Y572C, ... Figure 2.  Differential Activation of Signal Transduction Pathways by FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q Expression of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q in BaF3 cells resulted in constitutive phosphorylation of varying signaling proteins. Cells were maintained in IL-3-free medium for 6 hr, and whole-cell lysates or immunoprecipitates from whole-cell lysates were analyzed by western blotting as indicated. The signaling characteristics of the four mutations were compared with those of FLT3 D835Y and the FLT3 ITD mutation W51. Cells expressing WT FLT3 or the nontransforming G831E allele were used as negative controls. Expression of FLT3 in the different stable cell lines was confirmed by reprobing the blot demonstrating constitutive phosphorylation of AKT with an anti-FLT3 antibody. Figure options Table 2. Constitutive Phosphorylation of Signaling Molecules in BaF3 Cells Expressing Activating FLT3 Mutations FLT3 Mutation Signaling molecule	S451F	Y572C	V592G	R834Q	D835Y	W51 FLT3	+	+	+	+	+	+ STAT5	−	+	+	−	−	+ ERK1/2	+	+	+	+	+	+ AKT	−	+	+	−	+	− STAT3	−	+	+	−	+	− S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q were identified in this study; D835Y and W51 are known activating FLT3 mutations that have been described previously. +, constitutive phosphorylation; −, no constitutive phosphorylation.  Table options Expression of the JM domain mutations Y572C and V592G resulted in constitutive phosphorylation of ERK1/2, AKT, STAT3, and STAT5. We recently identified Y589 and Y591 as sites in the JM domain that are necessary for aberrant activation of STAT5 in cells expressing a FLT3 ITD mutation (Rocnik et al., 2006). To investigate whether these residues are also required for signal transduction mediated by JM domain point mutations, we generated Y589/591F double substitutions in the cDNAs encoding FLT3 Y572C and V592G. Coexpression of Y589/591F delayed the induction of IL-3-independent growth in BaF3 cells (Figure S3A), decreased the proliferation rate of BaF3 cells in the absence of IL-3 (Figure S3B), and altered the signaling properties of the two alleles (Figure S3C). The Y589/591F mutations strongly reduced constitutive phosphorylation of ERK1/2, STAT3, and STAT5 and attenuated aberrant activation of AKT. These results, along with our analysis of the FLT3 structure (see below), support the hypothesis that point mutations in the JM domain, like FLT3 ITD mutations, can alter the conformation of the JM domain, potentially resulting in exposure of occult docking sites such as Y589 and Y591, in turn enabling recruitment and activation of specific downstream signaling proteins.  The signaling properties of the R834Q substitution were compared to those of the most frequent AL mutation, D835Y. Consistent with previous reports (Choudhary et al., 2005; Grundler et al., 2005 ;  Rocnik et al., 2006), BaF3 cells expressing D835Y showed constitutive activation of ERK1/2 and AKT, but not STAT5. Furthermore, we found that expression of D835Y was associated with constitutive phosphorylation of STAT3. The R834Q mutation, on the other hand, resulted in phosphorylation of ERK1/2 but not AKT, STAT3, or STAT5. This signaling pattern was associated with increased sensitivity to growth inhibition by the MEK inhibitor PD98059 as compared to cells harboring the D835Y mutation (Figures 3A and 3B), indicating a higher relative contribution of ERK signaling to the transforming activity of the R834Q allele. Similar to R834Q-positive cells, cells expressing the S451F mutation also showed constitutive phosphorylation of ERK1/2, but no induction of AKT, STAT3, or STAT5. These results suggest that activation of the MAPK pathway in the absence of PI3K/AKT, STAT3, or STAT5 signaling is sufficient for transformation of hematopoietic cells by specific FLT3 alleles and that cells carrying different FLT3 mutations are differentially dependent on signaling mechanisms that involve the MEK/ERK cascade.  Varying Sensitivity of Different FLT3 AL Mutations to MEK Inhibition(A) ... Figure 3.  Varying Sensitivity of Different FLT3 AL Mutations to MEK Inhibition (A) Expression of FLT3 R834Q was associated with a higher sensitivity to MEK inhibition as compared to FLT3 D835Y. BaF3 cells stably expressing FLT3 R834Q or D835Y and growing in the absence of IL-3 were treated with PD98059 as indicated. Cell viability was measured after 48 hr, and the proportion of viable cells relative to the control (no inhibitor) was plotted. IC50 values are indicated. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (B) PD98059 treatment of BaF3 cells expressing FLT3 R834Q or D835Y resulted in dose-dependent inhibition of ERK1/2 phosphorylation. Cells were incubated with varying drug concentrations for 15 min, and whole-cell lysates were analyzed by western blotting as indicated. Figure options FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q Confer Varying Sensitivity to the TK Inhibitor PKC412  To determine the sensitivity of the four activating mutations to FLT3 inhibition, BaF3 cells expressing FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, or R834Q were treated with increasing concentrations of the small-molecule TK inhibitor PKC412. FLT3 Y572C, V592G, and R834Q conferred high sensitivity to PKC412 (inhibitory concentration of 50% [IC50], 2.5 nM, 5 nM, and 2.3 nM, respectively), whereas a considerably higher IC50 (48 nM) was observed for FLT3 S451F (Figure 4A). Western blot analysis showed that treatment with PKC412 led to dose-dependent decreases in FLT3 autophosphorylation and in phosphorylation of ERK1/2 that correlated with inhibition of cell growth (Figure 4B). WT FLT3-expressing BaF3 cells grown in the presence of IL-3 were used as a control for toxicity unrelated to FLT3 inhibition, and no antiproliferative effect was observed for concentrations of PKC412 up to 50 nM (Figure 4A). These data show that the four activating FLT3 mutations identified in our mutation screen can be inhibited by PKC412 and that Y572C, V592G, and R834Q are considerably more sensitive to this compound than S451F.  Varying Sensitivity of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q to Kinase Inhibition ... Figure 4.  Varying Sensitivity of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q to Kinase Inhibition by PKC412 (A) Expression of FLT3 Y572C, V592G, or R834Q was associated with higher sensitivity to FLT3 inhibition as compared to FLT3 S451F. BaF3 cells growing in the absence of IL-3 were treated with PKC412 as indicated. Cell viability was measured after 48 hr, and the proportion of viable cells relative to the control (no inhibitor) was plotted. IC50 values are indicated. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (B) PKC412 treatment of BaF3 cells expressing FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q resulted in dose-dependent decreases in FLT3 and ERK1/2 phosphorylation. Cells were incubated with varying drug concentrations for 2 hr, and whole-cell lysates were analyzed by western blotting as indicated. Figure options Mutation of FLT3 V592 Promotes Aberrant Signal Transduction and Proliferation of Human AML Cells  To investigate the role of mutant FLT3 in human AML cells, we analyzed the MONO-MAC-6 cell line that has been reported to contain a V592A substitution in the FLT3 JM domain (Spiekermann et al., 2003). DNA sequence analysis confirmed the presence of a homozygous V592A mutation in this cell line (data not shown). Lentiviral transduction of MONO-MAC-6 cells with two short hairpin RNA (shRNA) constructs targeting different regions of the FLT3 transcript resulted in stable downregulation of FLT3 mRNA (Figure 5B) and reduced levels of FLT3 protein (Figure 5C). Knockdown of FLT3 was associated with a substantial reduction in cell viability as compared to cells transduced with a nontargeting control shRNA (Figure 5A). Western blot analysis showed that suppression of FLT3 resulted in loss of STAT5 phosphorylation (Figure 5C), indicating that STAT5 is a downstream target of mutations involving FLT3 V592, consistent with our signaling studies in BaF3 cells. These results suggest that endogenous point mutations of FLT3 V592 promote the growth and survival of human AML cells and that this effect is mediated through aberrant STAT5 activation.  Effects of FLT3 Knockdown in Human AML Cells(A) Downregulation of FLT3 using ... Figure 5.  Effects of FLT3 Knockdown in Human AML Cells (A) Downregulation of FLT3 using shRNA constructs TRCN 772 and TRCN 773 inhibited the growth of a human AML cell line, MONO-MAC-6, that harbors a homozyogus V592A mutation in the FLT3 JM domain. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (B) Transduction of MONO-MAC-6 cells with shRNA constructs TRCN 772 and TRCN 773 resulted in decreased FLT3 mRNA levels as compared to a nontargeting control construct. Experiments were performed in duplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (C) Suppression of FLT3 mRNA was associated with a reduction in FLT3 protein (upper panels) and with loss of STAT5 phosphorylation (lower panels). Figure options Structural Analysis of FLT3 Mutations  Based on the crystal structure of the intracellular domains of FLT3 (Protein Data Bank accession code 1RJB; Figure 6A), we assessed the potential mechanism by which point mutations in the JM domain and in the AL result in constitutive FLT3 kinase activity. Residues Y572 and R834 seem to be involved in maintaining the energetic favorability of the autoinhibited conformation of FLT3. Loss of the stabilizing effects of these residues should favor the active conformation. Y572, which has thus far not been found mutated in AML, is described as the first amino-terminal residue visible in the electron density of the crystal structure (Griffith et al., 2004). It is a key “hook” for the JM domain and is critical to maintain the autoinhibited conformation of FLT3 (Figure 6B). The Y572C substitution is expected to result in a substantial loss of hydrogen bonding networks and extensive hydrophobic interactions, with a consequent reduction in the energetic favorability of this conformation. Likewise, loss of hydrogen bonding networks that would result from the R834Q and D835Y mutations is expected to destabilize the autoinhibited kinase conformation (Figures 6C and 6D).  Structural Analysis of FLT3 Mutations(A) Ribbon representation of the crystal ... Figure 6.  Structural Analysis of FLT3 Mutations (A) Ribbon representation of the crystal structure of the FLT3 kinase domain (Protein Data Bank, accession code 1RJB). The structure is a typical kinase fold crystallized in the autoinhibited conformation with the JM domain packing closely to the kinase domain and locking the protein in this conformation. (B) Hydrogen bonding network formed by FLT3 Y572. Y572 inserts into the catalytic cleft of FLT3, where the phenolic hydroxyl oxygen forms hydrogen bonds to the catalytic glutamic acid, E661, and an ordered water molecule. The aromatic ring also makes extensive hydrophobic contacts. The Y572C mutation will disrupt this “hook” that locks the JM domain in the autoinhibited conformation. (C) Hydrogen bonding network formed by FLT3 R834. R834 is critical to the formation of a hydrogen bonding network that incorporates interactions with the side chains of residues N816, R815, Y842, D811, the backbone carbonyl oxygen of R815, and two water molecules. This network is directly adjacent to a hydrogen bonding network in which N841 plays a critical role. (D) Hydrogen bonding network formed by FLT3 D835. D835 is an integral part of a hydrogen bonding network that seems to stabilize the AL backbone in the autoinhibited conformation. There is a hydrogen bond directly between the carboxyl group and the backbone amide of residue S836. There is also an indirect hydrogen bond between the caryboxyl group and the backbone amide of M837 mediated by a water molecule. (E) Surface representation of the region proximal to G831. The molecular surface of FLT3 protein atoms is shown as a transparent gray surface. The surface is colored green where it contacts G831, and water molecules are shown as red spheres. The G831E mutation may not disrupt this conformation due to the proximity of a water-filled cavity adjacent to G831. In this figure, amino acid residues are shown in stick representation with nitrogen atoms in blue, oxygen in red, and carbon atoms the same color as the corresponding domain. Water molecules are shown as red spheres and hydrogen bonds as dashed red lines with their lengths labeled in Å. This figure was made using the program PyMOL (www.pymol.org). Figure options Conversely, structural analysis suggests that the nontransforming G831E substitution may not deleteriously affect the stability of the autoinhibited conformation. The molecular surface of autoinhibited FLT3 shows that there is a cavity directly adjacent to G831. This cavity is filled with water molecules and falls between the autoinhibited-conformation AL and JM domain (Figure 6E). Even though mutation of this glycine residue to glutamic acid is a substantial change, the glutamic acid residue should be able to be accommodated in the autoinhibited conformation by displacement of a number of water molecules. G831 lies within the invariant protein kinase DFG motif required for correct Mg2+•ATP coordination (Karlsson et al., 1993) and is important for conformational movements of the DFG motif between active and inactive states (Levinson et al., 2006). Consequently, the G831E mutation may stabilize FLT3 in the autoinhibited conformation and result in reduced kinase activity, consistent with our data showing a lack of FLT3 autophosphorylation in cells expressing FLT3 G831E.  Discussion We have used high-throughput DNA sequence analysis to determine the frequency and spectrum of mutations in the FLT3 gene in adult AML patients without known FLT3 ITDs or AL mutations. Sequencing of all FLT3 coding exons identified nine candidate leukemogenic alleles in six exons corresponding to different domains of the FLT3 receptor.  Large-scale mutational profiling studies in cancer typically result in extensive lists of validated nonsynonymous sequence variants. A major challenge of these studies is to distinguish driver mutations that are responsible for malignant transformation from nonfunctional passenger alterations that arise in the malignant clone by chance and accumulate during repeated rounds of cell division. To identify genetic changes with a role in tumorigenesis, statistical models have been developed that incorporate mutational frequency and distribution, and it has been inferred from such approaches that nonsynonymous passenger mutations are present at a higher frequency than previously anticipated (Greenman et al., 2007; Sjoblom et al., 2006 ;  Wood et al., 2007). We provide functional documentation of this concept by using a different strategy that combined both high-throughput DNA sequence analysis of FLT3 in primary AML samples with experimental validation of all potential driver mutations identified. Cytokine independence assays and biochemical analysis revealed that of the 9 candidate leukemogenic alleles, 4 are gain-of-function mutations that result in constitutive kinase activation and stimulation of downstream signaling pathways, properties that are relevant to leukemogenesis and can be exploited therapeutically, whereas the remaining 5 alleles were not associated with increased kinase activity and aberrant signal transduction.  These results also indicate that functional analyses can provide information beyond that derived from statistical methods for identifying driver mutations. First, we show that rare sequence variants occurring at frequencies that would not allow them to be distinguished from unselected passenger changes can be drivers. Second, we report that alleles in the kinase domain and in the AL—highly conserved and functionally relevant domains that, based on mathematical approaches, are likely to harbor driver mutations—may not be associated with a detectable gain of function. Third, statistical techniques result in identification of candidate cancer genes, but do not predict the ability of individual alleles to contribute to transformation. Our analysis of a series of nonsynonymous sequence variants in FLT3, a validated cancer gene ( Futreal et al., 2004), indicates that functional studies are needed to complement the bioinformatic approaches that have been described to date.  In addition to mutational frequency and distribution, statistical methods for assessing the functional relevance of DNA sequence variants in cancer rely on discerning acquired mutations from inherited polymorphisms. While the analysis of germline DNA is essential to assess the origin of cancer-associated genomic alterations and to determine whether a mutation has been selected for during tumorigenesis, previous findings in solid tumors indicate that the presence of a kinase mutation in constitutional DNA does not exclude the possibility that it has a potential role in malignant transformation (Bell et al., 2005; Jeffers et al., 1997; Mulloy et al., 2007 ;  Plaza-Menacho et al., 2006). These data further support the conclusion that the interpretation of high-throughput sequencing studies can be improved through functional assessment of candidate oncogenic alleles.  The four activating mutations that were identified in our screen are located in the EC domain (S451F), the JM domain (Y572C and V592G), and the AL (R834Q) of FLT3. Sequence variants in the EC region (D324N and N520Y) have been described previously in patients with AML (Ley et al., 2003 ;  Syampurnawati et al., 2007). However, D324N is also present in normal individuals and in nonhematopoietic tissues from AML patients and does not confer cytokine-independent growth to BaF3 cells (Schnittger et al., 2006), whereas the functional consequences of N520Y have not been assessed. Our results thus document that FLT3, like EGFR and KIT (Gari et al., 1999 ;  Lee et al., 2006), can be activated by mutations in the EC domain. To determine the mechanism by which the S451F mutation results in constitutive FLT3 kinase activity, structural analysis of a larger FLT3 molecule that includes the EC domain will be required.  Point mutations in the region between amino acids 579 and 594 in the FLT3 JM domain have been detected in a small proportion of AML cases (Reindl et al., 2006 ;  Stirewalt et al., 2004). We have found a valine to glycine substitution involving residue 592 and a mutation involving Y572. Y572 is the first amino acid of the JM domain, and analysis of the crystal structure of the FLT3 cytoplasmic domain has suggested a key role for this residue in kinase autoinhibition (Griffith et al., 2004). Our structural analysis suggests that mutation of Y572 would result in disruption of its extensive interactions with the surrounding FLT3 subdomains and consequent destabilization of the inactive kinase conformation. In support of this hypothesis, the Y572C substitution that was identified in our mutation screen results in constitutive FLT3 kinase activity. These data provide genetic evidence for the importance of Y572 in maintaining the autoinhibited conformation of FLT3 and suggest that any mutation that interferes with the stability of the JM domain in this conformation is likely to be transforming.  The signaling properties of the two JM domain point mutations are similar to those of FLT3 ITDs (Parcells et al., 2006). In particular, aberrant activation of STAT5 by JM domain point mutations appears to involve two tyrosine residues, Y589 and Y591, that are essential for FLT3 ITD-mediated induction of STAT5 and leukemic transformation in vivo (Rocnik et al., 2006). Analysis of the role of Y589 and Y591 also provided insights into the deregulation of other signaling pathways by mutant FLT3. For example, the majority of primary AML samples are characterized by activated MAPK and PI3K/AKT signaling; however, the fact that dysregulation of various upstream effectors can result in aberrant phosphorylation of ERK1/2 and AKT indicates that the MAPK and PI3K/AKT cascades may be activated through a variety of different mechanisms (Martelli et al., 2006 ;  Platanias, 2003). In support of the hypothesis that mutant TKs activate downstream signaling pathways by distinct mechanisms, phosphorylation of ERK1/2 and AKT by FLT3 JM domain point mutations also requires Y589 and Y591, and similar observations were made for constitutive activation of STAT3. These results suggest that the different types of JM domain mutations (ITDs and point mutations) contribute in similar ways to myeloid leukemogenesis and demonstrate that Y589 and Y591 are critical for the induction of several signaling pathways that are activated in leukemias with FLT3 JM domain mutations. Furthermore, these findings illustrate the potential of point mutations to alter the substrate specificity of protein kinases. Whether FLT3 Y589/591-mediated signal transduction in AML involves direct engagement of downstream effectors by these residues or requires additional adaptor molecules is currently unknown.  Previously described mutations in the FLT3 AL include substitutions, insertions, or deletions within a region between amino acids 834 and 842, with D835 being the most commonly affected residue (Frohling et al., 2005). We identified nonsynonymous substitutions at codons 831 and 834. Analysis of the crystal structure of the FLT3 kinase domain suggests that mutation of residue R834 would interfere with the stability of the autoinhibited conformation, and in agreement with this hypothesis, FLT3 R834Q has constitutive kinase activity and confers IL-3-independent growth to BaF3 cells. In contrast, mutation of the conserved DFG motif G831 to glutamic acid may deleteriously affect the structural requirements for enzymatic activity, is expected to be compatible with the autoinhibited conformation, and does not result in transformation of hematopoietic cells. These results illustrate the value of structural analysis for understanding the atomic-level mechanisms by which TK mutations associated with human leukemias function. In addition, these data indicate that the autoinhibited conformation of FLT3 is critically dependent on the stabilizing contacts of a limited number of specific amino acids, whereas mutation of other residues within the AL does not alter the structure and function of the FLT3 kinase.  Analysis of the signaling properties of FLT3 R834Q demonstrated that this mutation, unlike the more common D835Y allele, results in activation of ERK1/2, but not AKT, STAT3, or STAT5. Consistent with this observation, the R834Q mutation is associated with enhanced sensitivity to MEK inhibition, indicating that cells expressing R834Q are more reliant on MAPK signaling than are D835Y-expressing cells that constitutively phosphorylate multiple signaling proteins. These results suggest that there are not only differences in signal transduction between various FLT3 mutation classes, for example, ITDs and AL mutations (Choudhary et al., 2005 ;  Grundler et al., 2005), but also between distinct alleles within a given mutation class and that cells carrying different FLT3 mutations are differentially dependent on certain signaling pathways.  To determine the functional consequences of candidate mutations, we used an in vitro assay that is based on exogenous expression of mutated alleles in murine hematopoietic cells. This assay has proved to be of value for the assessment of increased TK activity and perturbed signal transduction and has been validated for numerous TK alleles identified in human hematologic malignancies, including FLT3 ITDs and AL mutations (Clark et al., 2004 ;  Weisberg et al., 2002), as well as for TK alleles associated with solid tumors, such as mutations in the EGFR kinase domain and the recently discovered EML4-ALK fusion in patients with non-small-cell lung cancer (Jiang et al., 2005 ;  Soda et al., 2007). On the other hand, conversion of BaF3 cells to cytokine independence may not faithfully assess the functional implications of certain mutations, either because they require expression of additional proteins (Lu et al., 2005) or because cooperativity between two or more mutations is required for signaling pathway activation. Lastly, this assay may fail to detect a gain of function conferred by kinase mutations that do not result in increased enzymatic activity. For instance, Wan et al. (2004) described three mutants of the serine-threonine kinase BRAF with impaired catalytic activity that are capable of stimulating downstream signaling through transactivation of CRAF. Although we observed no activation of ERK1/2, AKT, STAT3, or STAT5 in cells expressing FLT3 mutations that read out as nonfunctional in the BaF3 assay, it is possible that some of these alleles stimulate other effector molecules that were not analyzed in our study. We recognize that it is impossible to definitively exclude any conceivable function of a given mutation. Nonetheless, the nontransforming mutations identified in our screen do not meet conventional criteria for effects on kinase activation.  The activating mutations identified in our study conferred varying degrees of sensitivity to the small-molecule TK inhibitor PKC412. Cells expressing Y572C, V592G, or R834Q were highly sensitive to this compound, as has been reported for other JM domain (Reindl et al., 2006) and AL mutations (Choudhary et al., 2005; Grundler et al., 2003 ;  Weisberg et al., 2002). In contrast, cytotoxic responses in S451F-expressing cells required substantially higher drug concentrations. The determinants of response to pharmacologic inhibition of FLT3 are diverse and remain only partly understood. In general, the presence of mutant FLT3 is associated with increased drug sensitivity (DeAngelo et al., 2006 ;  Fiedler et al., 2005), yet there appears to be substantial variation among the different mutation types (Choudhary et al., 2005; Grundler et al., 2003 ;  Weisberg et al., 2002) as well as between individual alleles within the same mutation class (Clark et al., 2004 ;  Grundler et al., 2003). In addition, it has been observed that patients without FLT3 ITDs or any of the known AL mutations may also derive benefit from FLT3 inhibitor therapy, which might be related to the presence of previously unrecognized mutations (Schittenhelm et al., 2006), and in vitro studies in primary AML samples have shown that there is substantial interpatient variation in the degree of dependency on FLT3 signaling (Knapper et al., 2006). Our findings further illustrate the complex relationship between FLT3 mutation status and response to pharmacologic FLT3 inhibition.  In summary, our results demonstrate that previously unrecognized activating FLT3 mutations in the EC domain, the JM domain, and the AL occur in patients with AML, albeit at a low frequency. Since mutations lying outside the usually studied mutational hotspots may confer sensitivity to small-molecule TK inhibitors, eligibility for clinical trials of FLT3-targeted therapies should not be based on diagnostic screens that are limited to the detection of only a fraction of the FLT3 mutations associated with AML. The development of sensitive, allele-specific assays, such as mass spectrometry-based genotyping (Thomas et al., 2007), will allow all patients enrolled on trials of FLT3 inhibitors to be genotyped for all known FLT3 alleles, and it is hoped that similar strategies will be used in trials of molecularly targeted therapies for patients with different hematopoietic malignancies and solid tumors.  FLT3 is a highly annotated and well-studied cancer gene known to play a key role in myeloid leukemogenesis. The finding that only a fraction of the nonsynonymous FLT3 mutations associated with AML result in constitutive kinase activity illustrates the challenge in distinguishing between sequence variants that contribute to malignant transformation and nonfunctional passenger mutations. Given that the increasing throughput of DNA sequencing technologies will allow improved characterization of somatic cancer genomes, these data demonstrate that a combination of genetic and functional approaches will be crucial in order to identify the mutations that truly drive the development of cancer and to validate the potential of suspected oncogenic alleles as therapeutic targets.  Experimental Procedures Patient Samples  This study included 349 adult patients with AML, de novo or secondary after treatment for a primary malignancy or following myelodysplasia, as defined by French-American-British Cooperative Group criteria or the World Health Organization classification (Bennett et al., 1985 ;  Harris et al., 1999). Diagnostic BM and peripheral blood samples were collected after obtaining informed consent according to the Declaration of Helsinki and with institutional review board approval of the relevant institutions. All samples were enriched for mononuclear cells by density centrifugation before banking. Only samples with more than 50% blasts were included for DNA sequence analysis, and more than 80% of the samples had at least 80% blasts. All specimens that were analyzed by DNA sequencing were negative for FLT3 ITDs, as assessed by PCR amplification of exons 14 and 15; for FLT3 AL mutations involving codons 835 and 836, as assessed by PCR amplification of exon 20 followed by EcoRV digestion; for activating KIT mutations, as assessed by sequencing of exons 8 and 17; and for mutations involving NRAS codons 12, 13, and 61, as assessed by sequencing of exons 1 and 2.  FLT3 Mutational Analysis and Selection of Candidate Mutations  Extraction of genomic DNA, amplification of FLT3 exons, bidirectional sequencing, and sequence detection were performed using a high-throughput resequencing approach as previously described ( Levine et al., 2005). External gene-specific primers and internal M13-appended primers are listed in Table S5. Analysis of sequence traces was performed using Mutation Surveyor version 2.28 (SoftGenetics, State College, PA). Five steps were used to identify mutations of interest. First, any synonymous substitutions were not analyzed further. Second, known SNPs were excluded by comparison to the dbSNP database (release 127; http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/projects/SNP). Third, published data sets ( Greenman et al., 2007 ;  Ley et al., 2003) were queried to exclude any nonsynonymous substitutions in the FLT3 coding sequence that have been detected in DNA samples derived from normal tissues. Fourth, sequence chromatograms were visually inspected to remove false positive calls in the automated analysis. Fifth, candidate mutations were reamplified and sequenced from the original DNA sample for independent verification. Leukemic cells at diagnosis and a matched remission sample were analyzed in one case with a presumptive leukemogenic mutation in the FLT3 kinase domain, M737I.  Genotyping  Mass spectrometry genotyping was performed as previously described (Levine et al., 2005). Primers and primer extension probes for detection of the different FLT3 alleles are listed in Table S6.  DNA Constructs and Retrovirus Production  Sequence variants were introduced into the full-length FLT3 cDNA using the QuikChange XL Site-Directed Mutagenesis Kit (Stratagene, La Jolla, CA). All mutations were confirmed by sequencing of the entire FLT3 open reading frame. The mutant cDNAs were cloned into the MSCV-PGK-neo retroviral vector, and full-length protein expression was documented by western blotting. Generation of retroviral supernatants and infection of BaF3 cells were performed as described previously ( Rocnik et al., 2006). BaF3 cells transduced with MSCV-PGK-neo constructs were selected with G418 in the presence of IL-3 for 14 days.  Cell Culture  BaF3 cells were maintained in RPMI-1640 supplemented with 10% fetal calf serum and 10% WEHI-conditioned medium as a source of IL-3. For cytokine independence assays, cells transduced with each of the MSCV-PGK-neo retroviral contructs were seeded at a density of 0.33 × 106/ml in IL-3-free medium, and the number of viable cells was determined daily by trypan blue exclusion. For growth inhibition assays, cells were seeded at a density of 1 × 105/ml in IL-3-free medium with various concentrations of PKC412 (Novartis, Basel, Switzerland) or PD98059 (Calbiochem, San Diego, CA), and the number of viable cells was determined after 48 hr using the CellTiter 96AQueous One Solution Proliferation Assay (Promega, Madison, WI).  Immunoprecipitation and Western Blotting  Immunoprecipitation and western blotting were performed as described previously (Rocnik et al., 2006) using the following antibodies: anti-FLT3, anti-STAT5, anti-phospho-ERK1/2 (T202/Y204) (Santa Cruz Biotechnology, Santa Cruz, CA); anti-STAT3, anti-phospho-STAT3 (Y705), anti-phospho-STAT5 (Y694), anti-ERK1/2, anti-AKT, anti-phospho-AKT (S473) (Cell Signaling Technology, Beverly, MA); and anti-phosphotyrosine (4G10) (Upstate, Lake Placid, NY).  Knockdown of FLT3 Expression  Two pLKO.1-based lentiviral vectors encoding shRNAs targeted to the 3′ untranslated region (TRCN 772) or the coding sequence (TRCN 773) of the human FLT3 mRNA, and a pLKO.1 construct containing a nontargeting shRNA sequence were obtained from the MISSION TRC-Hs 1.0 (Human) shRNA library ( Root et al., 2006). The oligonucleotide sequences of the shRNAs were as follows (21-nucleotide stem sequences matching the target transcript underlined; noncomplementary 6-nucleotide loop sequences italicized): TRCN 772, 5′-CCG GCG TCT GCG TTT ACT CTT GTT TCT CGA GAA ACA AGA GTA AAC GCA GAC GTT TTT-3′; TRCN 773, 5′-CCG GGC TAA CTT CTA CAA ACT GAT TCT CGA GAA TCA GTT TGT AGA AGT TAG CTT TTT-3′. Generation of lentiviral supernatants and infection of human AML cells were performed as described previously (Scholl et al., 2007).  
1650||Mutations in the juxtamembrane and kinase domains of FLT3 are common in AML, but it is not known whether alterations outside these regions contribute to leukemogenesis. We used a high-throughput platform to interrogate the entire FLT3 coding sequence in AML patients without known FLT3 mutations and experimentally tested the consequences of each candidate leukemogenic allele. This approach identified gain-of-function mutations that activated downstream signaling and conferred sensitivity to FLT3 inhibition and alleles that were not associated with kinase activation, including mutations in the catalytic domain. These findings support the concept that acquired mutations in cancer may not contribute to malignant transformation and underscore the importance of functional studies to distinguish “driver” mutations underlying tumorigenesis from biologically neutral “passenger” alterations.  Author Keywords CELLCYCLE SIGNIFICANCE High-throughput DNA sequencing has provided insights into the mutational profiles of human cancers and represents a promising strategy for the identification of therapeutic targets. However, recognizing the subset of functionally relevant mutations has proven difficult. We used a combined genetic and functional approach to evaluate a series of candidate mutations in the receptor tyrosine kinase FLT3 that were identified in patients with AML. This strategy enabled distinction between activating alleles that conferred sensitivity to a small-molecule inhibitor and bystander mutations that did not result in kinase activation. Remarkably, these latter alterations included mutations in key functional domains of FLT3. These results emphasize that complementary functional studies are critical for validation of suspected oncogenic alleles from large-scale genomic screens.  Introduction The receptor tyrosine kinase (TK) FLT3 and its cognate ligand are important for the expansion of early hematopoietic progenitor cells and for the generation of mature natural killer cells and dendritic cells. Binding of FLT3 ligand to the extracellular (EC) domain of FLT3 induces receptor dimerization, which promotes phosphorylation of the FLT3 kinase domain, thereby activating the receptor and several downstream signaling pathways, primarily the PI3K/AKT pathway and the RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK cascade (Parcells et al., 2006).  In patients with acute myeloid leukemia (AML), somatic mutations that result in constitutive activation of FLT3 have been identified in two functional domains of the receptor, the juxtamembrane (JM) domain and the kinase domain. The JM domain, which has been shown to be critical for kinase autoinhibition (Griffith et al., 2004), is disrupted by internal tandem duplications (ITDs) in 25%–30% of adult AML patients (Stirewalt and Radich, 2003), whereas JM domain point mutations have been described in approximately 1% of cases (Reindl et al., 2006 ;  Stirewalt et al., 2004). FLT3 ITDs induce constitutive phosphorylation of several signal transduction intermediates, including STAT5, AKT, and ERK1/2 (Parcells et al., 2006) and cause myeloproliferative disease in various murine models (Kelly et al., 2002 ;  Lee et al., 2005). JM domain point mutations also result in constitutive activation of STAT5 and AKT (Reindl et al., 2006), but their in vivo transforming potential has not been studied.  The activation loop (AL) in the carboxy-terminal lobe of the kinase domain is affected by point mutations, insertions, or deletions in approximately 7% of AML cases (Frohling et al., 2005). AL mutations share several signal transduction properties with FLT3 ITDs, for example, constitutive phosphorylation of AKT and ERK1/2 (Choudhary et al., 2005 ;  Spiekermann et al., 2003). However, substantial differences between the two mutation types in the activation of STAT5 have been observed in some studies (Choudhary et al., 2005; Grundler et al., 2005 ;  Rocnik et al., 2006), but not in others (Bagrintseva et al., 2004; Grundler et al., 2003 ;  Spiekermann et al., 2003), and mice transplanted with BM expressing FLT3 AL mutations do not develop myeloid disease but rather, a T cell lymphoproliferative disorder with longer latency (Grundler et al., 2005). A mutation in the amino-terminal lobe of the kinase domain was found to induce constitutive activation of AKT, ERK1/2, and STAT5 (Schittenhelm et al., 2006).  From a clinical perspective, FLT3 mutations are important as a result of their prognostic relevance and because constitutively activated FLT3 is an attractive therapeutic target. FLT3 ITDs are associated with an increased risk of relapse and short survival (Yanada et al., 2005), and patients with low or absent levels of wild-type (WT) FLT3 appear to have a particularly dismal outcome (Thiede et al., 2002 ;  Whitman et al., 2001). In contrast, the prognostic relevance of FLT3 AL mutations remains controversial despite several studies on large patient series (Yanada et al., 2005). Currently, there are four selective FLT3 inhibitors at various stages of clinical development, including PKC412 (midostaurin), CEP-701 (lestaurtinib), MLN518 (tandutinib), and SU11248 (sunitinib) (Knapper, 2007). These compounds are well tolerated at doses that achieve inhibition of FLT3 and have shown moderate activity in relapsed or refractory AML patients with activating FLT3 mutations. In addition, some patients without FLT3 ITDs or known AL mutations have responded to FLT3 inhibitors, suggesting the possibility of other mutations that result in constitutive activation of FLT3. Ongoing clinical trials are evaluating the use of FLT3 inhibitors in combination with chemotherapy.  Previous studies have focused on the detection of mutations in the JM and kinase domains of FLT3, whereas the frequency and spectrum of sequence alterations outside these regions have not been systematically studied. We therefore performed high-throughput DNA sequencing of all coding exons of FLT3 in AML patients without FLT3 ITDs or known AL mutations. The primary aim of such a genomic screen is to identify “driver” mutations that are causally implicated in cancer development. However, recent large-scale sequencing studies in solid tumors that used statistical approaches to evaluate the impact of DNA sequence variants have demonstrated the difficulties in distinguishing driver mutations from “passenger” alterations that confer no clonal growth advantage ( Forrest and Cavet, 2007; Getz et al., 2007; Greenman et al., 2007; Rubin and Green, 2007; Sjoblom et al., 2006 ;  Wood et al., 2007). To address this problem, we experimentally tested the consequences of each candidate oncogenic allele identified in our mutation screen. This combined genetic and functional approach successfully identified gain-of-function mutations in the EC domain, the JM domain, and the AL of FLT3 and several passenger alterations that did not result in constitutive kinase activity. Furthermore, we investigated the structural implications, signal transduction properties, and sensitivity to FLT3 inhibition of the activating alleles.  Results High-Throughput DNA Sequence Analysis of FLT3  We performed bidirectional sequencing of all FLT3 coding exons in pretreatment samples from 222 adult AML patients without known activating mutations of FLT3, KIT, and NRAS. Sequence data were evaluated for quality and coverage within the region of interest of each exon that included all coding bases and the five flanking intronic bases at the 5′ and 3′ ends. High-quality, bidirectional sequence reads were obtained for more than 90% of all samples analyzed (see Table S1 in the Supplemental Data available with this article online).  FLT3 Sequence Variants in Patients with AML  We identified a total of 17 heterozygous nucleotide changes. Five of these changes corresponded to germline variants listed in single-nucleotide polymorphism (SNP) databases. Of the remaining 12 sequence alterations, 9 were predicted to change the amino acid sequence of FLT3 (nonsynonymous substitutions; Table 1 and Figure S1), whereas 3 were annotated as synonymous substitutions, resulting in a ratio of nonsynonymous to synonymous mutations of 3.  Table 1. Nonsynonymous Sequence Variants Identified by High-Throughput Sequencing of FLT3 in 222 AML Patients DNA	Exon	Protein	Domain 581A > G	5	T167A	extracellular 662G > A	5	V194M	extracellular 1052G > A	8	D324N	extracellular 1172T > C	9	Y364H	extracellular 1434C > T	11	S451F	extracellular 1751G > A	13	V557I	transmembrane 1797A > G	14	Y572C	juxtamembrane 1857T > G	14	V592G	juxtamembrane 2293G > C	18	M737I	kinase 2574G > A	20	G831E	activation loop 2583G > A	20	R834Q	activation loop Sequence numbering is according to Ensembl Transcript/Peptide ID ENST00000241453. D324N (refSNP ID rs35602083) and V557I (refSNP ID rs35958982) are known germline polymorphisms. Different mutations involving amino acids V592 and R834 (V592A, R834_D835 del, R834_D835insALG) are reported in the COSMIC database (version 30; http://www.sanger.ac.uk/genetics/CGP/cosmic/).  Table options The nine nonsynonymous sequence variants that were not known SNPs have not been observed in 48 normal control samples in which the entire coding region of FLT3 had previously been sequenced ( Ley et al., 2003) and were not among the germline variants identified in a mutation screen of all protein kinase genes in 210 human cancers (Greenman et al., 2007). These alterations were, therefore, considered to be candidate leukemogenic mutations that warrant experimental validation. Paired diagnostic and remission material was available from a patient with an M737I substitution in the FLT3 kinase domain. This variant was present at diagnosis but not in the remission sample, demonstrating that it was somatically acquired (Figure S1). The three synonymous sequence variants that were not known SNPs were considered to be nonfunctional and were, therefore, not further investigated.  FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q Are Gain-of-Function Mutations that Induce Constitutive Kinase Activation  To determine the functional consequences of all nine candidate mutations, we tested their ability to transform murine hematopoietic BaF3 cells to cytokine-independent growth, a property conferred by a broad spectrum of oncogenic TK alleles. Cells expressing S451F in the EC domain, Y572C or V592G in the JM domain, and R834Q in the AL were able to grow in the absence of interleukin-3 (IL-3; Figure 1A). Immunoprecipitation of FLT3 followed by western blotting with a phosphotyrosine-specific antibody demonstrated that these mutant kinases induced constitutive phosphorylation of FLT3 (Figure 1B). These results indicate that the S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q alleles are gain-of-function mutations that result in constitutive kinase activation. To perform a rapid and inexpensive secondary screen for these mutations, we designed allele-specific primer extension assays and performed genotype determination in an independent cohort of 127 adult AML cases. This analysis identified one additional case positive for the S451F substitution and one additional case with the R834Q allele. Thus, the overall prevalence of activating FLT3 mutations in this study was 1.7% (6 of 349 cases).  Constitutive Kinase Activation by FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q(A) ... Figure 1.  Constitutive Kinase Activation by FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q (A) Expression of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q resulted in IL-3-independent growth of BaF3 cells. Cells expressing the known AL mutation D835Y were used as positive control. Cells expressing WT FLT3 were used as negative control. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (B) Expression of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q in BaF3 cells resulted in constitutive FLT3 autophosphorylation. Cells were maintained in IL-3-free medium for 6 hr, FLT3 was immunoprecipitated from whole-cell lysates, and immunoprecipitates were analyzed by western blotting with an anti-phosphotyrosine antibody. Cells expressing a FLT3 ITD mutation (W51) or FLT3 D835Y were used as positive controls. Cells expressing WT FLT3 or the nontransforming G831E allele were used as negative controls. (C) Expression of FLT3 T167A, V194M, Y364H, M737I, and G831E did not result in IL-3-independent growth of BaF3 cells. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. Figure options Cells expressing any of the remaining five nonsynonymous sequence variants in the EC domain, the kinase domain, and the AL underwent apoptosis when cultured in the absence of exogenous cytokines, and constitutive phosphorylation of FLT3 was not observed (Figures 1B and 1C). These results indicate that a substantial proportion of the nonsynonymous sequence variants detected in FLT3 are likely to be passenger mutations. To increase confidence that the four presumed passenger mutations for which no matched normal DNA sample was available (T167A, V194M, Y364H, and G831E) did not represent germline polymorphisms or sequence artifacts, the following steps were taken. First, we sequenced the corresponding exons of FLT3 in 102 normal DNA samples and detected no abnormalities. Second, we determined by mass spectrometry genotyping that the G831E allele in the FLT3 AL was not present in the panel of 270 normal individuals collected by the International HapMap Consortium (2003). Third, we introduced PCR-amplified genomic DNA from each case into a cloning vector and sequenced between 50 and 55 individual transformants. In two cases (T167A and G831E), the observed mutant-to-wild-type allelic ratio was substantially different from 1 (0.19 and 3.2, respectively), suggesting that these alleles did not represent heterozygous SNPs. In the remaining two cases (V194M and Y364H), the number of recombinant clones carrying the mutant allele was similar to that of clones harboring the WT sequence (24 versus 27 and 31 versus 21, respectively), a finding compatible with either a somatic mutation that was present in most of the cells from which the original DNA sample was derived or with a heterozygous germline variant.  For comparison with our functional analyses, we also predicted the effects of all nine candidate mutations in silico using the SIFT (http://blocks.fhcrc.org/sift/SIFT.html) and PMut (http://mmb2.pcb.ub.es:8080/PMut) software programs (Table S2). Three sequence variants (S451F, G831E, and R834Q) were predicted to affect the function of FLT3, whereas four changes (T167A, V194M, Y364H, and M737I) were predicted to be tolerated. The remaining two mutations (Y572C and V592G) had conflicting results between the SIFT and PMut algorithms. These findings illustrate that bioinformatics approaches and functional assays provide complementary information as to the potential impact of mutations identified in large-scale genomic screens.  Ortholog alignments for all nonsynonymous sequence variants identified in this study, as well as relevant sequence alignments of all five class III receptor TKs (PDGFRA, PDGFRB, KIT, CSF1R, and FLT3) and other TKs with a known role in cancer (EGFR, ERBB2, RET, MET, and ABL1), are shown in Figure S2. Clinical characteristics of the patients with activating FLT3 mutations are given in Tables S3 and S4.  FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q Differentially Activate Downstream Signaling Pathways  To examine the signal transduction properties of the four activating mutations, BaF3 cells expressing FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, or R834Q were deprived of IL-3 and then analyzed by western blotting for phosphorylation of signaling proteins (Figure 2 and Table 2).  Differential Activation of Signal Transduction Pathways by FLT3 S451F, Y572C, ... Figure 2.  Differential Activation of Signal Transduction Pathways by FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q Expression of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q in BaF3 cells resulted in constitutive phosphorylation of varying signaling proteins. Cells were maintained in IL-3-free medium for 6 hr, and whole-cell lysates or immunoprecipitates from whole-cell lysates were analyzed by western blotting as indicated. The signaling characteristics of the four mutations were compared with those of FLT3 D835Y and the FLT3 ITD mutation W51. Cells expressing WT FLT3 or the nontransforming G831E allele were used as negative controls. Expression of FLT3 in the different stable cell lines was confirmed by reprobing the blot demonstrating constitutive phosphorylation of AKT with an anti-FLT3 antibody. Figure options Table 2. Constitutive Phosphorylation of Signaling Molecules in BaF3 Cells Expressing Activating FLT3 Mutations FLT3 Mutation Signaling molecule	S451F	Y572C	V592G	R834Q	D835Y	W51 FLT3	+	+	+	+	+	+ STAT5	−	+	+	−	−	+ ERK1/2	+	+	+	+	+	+ AKT	−	+	+	−	+	− STAT3	−	+	+	−	+	− S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q were identified in this study; D835Y and W51 are known activating FLT3 mutations that have been described previously. +, constitutive phosphorylation; −, no constitutive phosphorylation.  Table options Expression of the JM domain mutations Y572C and V592G resulted in constitutive phosphorylation of ERK1/2, AKT, STAT3, and STAT5. We recently identified Y589 and Y591 as sites in the JM domain that are necessary for aberrant activation of STAT5 in cells expressing a FLT3 ITD mutation (Rocnik et al., 2006). To investigate whether these residues are also required for signal transduction mediated by JM domain point mutations, we generated Y589/591F double substitutions in the cDNAs encoding FLT3 Y572C and V592G. Coexpression of Y589/591F delayed the induction of IL-3-independent growth in BaF3 cells (Figure S3A), decreased the proliferation rate of BaF3 cells in the absence of IL-3 (Figure S3B), and altered the signaling properties of the two alleles (Figure S3C). The Y589/591F mutations strongly reduced constitutive phosphorylation of ERK1/2, STAT3, and STAT5 and attenuated aberrant activation of AKT. These results, along with our analysis of the FLT3 structure (see below), support the hypothesis that point mutations in the JM domain, like FLT3 ITD mutations, can alter the conformation of the JM domain, potentially resulting in exposure of occult docking sites such as Y589 and Y591, in turn enabling recruitment and activation of specific downstream signaling proteins.  The signaling properties of the R834Q substitution were compared to those of the most frequent AL mutation, D835Y. Consistent with previous reports (Choudhary et al., 2005; Grundler et al., 2005 ;  Rocnik et al., 2006), BaF3 cells expressing D835Y showed constitutive activation of ERK1/2 and AKT, but not STAT5. Furthermore, we found that expression of D835Y was associated with constitutive phosphorylation of STAT3. The R834Q mutation, on the other hand, resulted in phosphorylation of ERK1/2 but not AKT, STAT3, or STAT5. This signaling pattern was associated with increased sensitivity to growth inhibition by the MEK inhibitor PD98059 as compared to cells harboring the D835Y mutation (Figures 3A and 3B), indicating a higher relative contribution of ERK signaling to the transforming activity of the R834Q allele. Similar to R834Q-positive cells, cells expressing the S451F mutation also showed constitutive phosphorylation of ERK1/2, but no induction of AKT, STAT3, or STAT5. These results suggest that activation of the MAPK pathway in the absence of PI3K/AKT, STAT3, or STAT5 signaling is sufficient for transformation of hematopoietic cells by specific FLT3 alleles and that cells carrying different FLT3 mutations are differentially dependent on signaling mechanisms that involve the MEK/ERK cascade.  Varying Sensitivity of Different FLT3 AL Mutations to MEK Inhibition(A) ... Figure 3.  Varying Sensitivity of Different FLT3 AL Mutations to MEK Inhibition (A) Expression of FLT3 R834Q was associated with a higher sensitivity to MEK inhibition as compared to FLT3 D835Y. BaF3 cells stably expressing FLT3 R834Q or D835Y and growing in the absence of IL-3 were treated with PD98059 as indicated. Cell viability was measured after 48 hr, and the proportion of viable cells relative to the control (no inhibitor) was plotted. IC50 values are indicated. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (B) PD98059 treatment of BaF3 cells expressing FLT3 R834Q or D835Y resulted in dose-dependent inhibition of ERK1/2 phosphorylation. Cells were incubated with varying drug concentrations for 15 min, and whole-cell lysates were analyzed by western blotting as indicated. Figure options FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q Confer Varying Sensitivity to the TK Inhibitor PKC412  To determine the sensitivity of the four activating mutations to FLT3 inhibition, BaF3 cells expressing FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, or R834Q were treated with increasing concentrations of the small-molecule TK inhibitor PKC412. FLT3 Y572C, V592G, and R834Q conferred high sensitivity to PKC412 (inhibitory concentration of 50% [IC50], 2.5 nM, 5 nM, and 2.3 nM, respectively), whereas a considerably higher IC50 (48 nM) was observed for FLT3 S451F (Figure 4A). Western blot analysis showed that treatment with PKC412 led to dose-dependent decreases in FLT3 autophosphorylation and in phosphorylation of ERK1/2 that correlated with inhibition of cell growth (Figure 4B). WT FLT3-expressing BaF3 cells grown in the presence of IL-3 were used as a control for toxicity unrelated to FLT3 inhibition, and no antiproliferative effect was observed for concentrations of PKC412 up to 50 nM (Figure 4A). These data show that the four activating FLT3 mutations identified in our mutation screen can be inhibited by PKC412 and that Y572C, V592G, and R834Q are considerably more sensitive to this compound than S451F.  Varying Sensitivity of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q to Kinase Inhibition ... Figure 4.  Varying Sensitivity of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q to Kinase Inhibition by PKC412 (A) Expression of FLT3 Y572C, V592G, or R834Q was associated with higher sensitivity to FLT3 inhibition as compared to FLT3 S451F. BaF3 cells growing in the absence of IL-3 were treated with PKC412 as indicated. Cell viability was measured after 48 hr, and the proportion of viable cells relative to the control (no inhibitor) was plotted. IC50 values are indicated. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (B) PKC412 treatment of BaF3 cells expressing FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q resulted in dose-dependent decreases in FLT3 and ERK1/2 phosphorylation. Cells were incubated with varying drug concentrations for 2 hr, and whole-cell lysates were analyzed by western blotting as indicated. Figure options Mutation of FLT3 V592 Promotes Aberrant Signal Transduction and Proliferation of Human AML Cells  To investigate the role of mutant FLT3 in human AML cells, we analyzed the MONO-MAC-6 cell line that has been reported to contain a V592A substitution in the FLT3 JM domain (Spiekermann et al., 2003). DNA sequence analysis confirmed the presence of a homozygous V592A mutation in this cell line (data not shown). Lentiviral transduction of MONO-MAC-6 cells with two short hairpin RNA (shRNA) constructs targeting different regions of the FLT3 transcript resulted in stable downregulation of FLT3 mRNA (Figure 5B) and reduced levels of FLT3 protein (Figure 5C). Knockdown of FLT3 was associated with a substantial reduction in cell viability as compared to cells transduced with a nontargeting control shRNA (Figure 5A). Western blot analysis showed that suppression of FLT3 resulted in loss of STAT5 phosphorylation (Figure 5C), indicating that STAT5 is a downstream target of mutations involving FLT3 V592, consistent with our signaling studies in BaF3 cells. These results suggest that endogenous point mutations of FLT3 V592 promote the growth and survival of human AML cells and that this effect is mediated through aberrant STAT5 activation.  Effects of FLT3 Knockdown in Human AML Cells(A) Downregulation of FLT3 using ... Figure 5.  Effects of FLT3 Knockdown in Human AML Cells (A) Downregulation of FLT3 using shRNA constructs TRCN 772 and TRCN 773 inhibited the growth of a human AML cell line, MONO-MAC-6, that harbors a homozyogus V592A mutation in the FLT3 JM domain. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (B) Transduction of MONO-MAC-6 cells with shRNA constructs TRCN 772 and TRCN 773 resulted in decreased FLT3 mRNA levels as compared to a nontargeting control construct. Experiments were performed in duplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (C) Suppression of FLT3 mRNA was associated with a reduction in FLT3 protein (upper panels) and with loss of STAT5 phosphorylation (lower panels). Figure options Structural Analysis of FLT3 Mutations  Based on the crystal structure of the intracellular domains of FLT3 (Protein Data Bank accession code 1RJB; Figure 6A), we assessed the potential mechanism by which point mutations in the JM domain and in the AL result in constitutive FLT3 kinase activity. Residues Y572 and R834 seem to be involved in maintaining the energetic favorability of the autoinhibited conformation of FLT3. Loss of the stabilizing effects of these residues should favor the active conformation. Y572, which has thus far not been found mutated in AML, is described as the first amino-terminal residue visible in the electron density of the crystal structure (Griffith et al., 2004). It is a key “hook” for the JM domain and is critical to maintain the autoinhibited conformation of FLT3 (Figure 6B). The Y572C substitution is expected to result in a substantial loss of hydrogen bonding networks and extensive hydrophobic interactions, with a consequent reduction in the energetic favorability of this conformation. Likewise, loss of hydrogen bonding networks that would result from the R834Q and D835Y mutations is expected to destabilize the autoinhibited kinase conformation (Figures 6C and 6D).  Structural Analysis of FLT3 Mutations(A) Ribbon representation of the crystal ... Figure 6.  Structural Analysis of FLT3 Mutations (A) Ribbon representation of the crystal structure of the FLT3 kinase domain (Protein Data Bank, accession code 1RJB). The structure is a typical kinase fold crystallized in the autoinhibited conformation with the JM domain packing closely to the kinase domain and locking the protein in this conformation. (B) Hydrogen bonding network formed by FLT3 Y572. Y572 inserts into the catalytic cleft of FLT3, where the phenolic hydroxyl oxygen forms hydrogen bonds to the catalytic glutamic acid, E661, and an ordered water molecule. The aromatic ring also makes extensive hydrophobic contacts. The Y572C mutation will disrupt this “hook” that locks the JM domain in the autoinhibited conformation. (C) Hydrogen bonding network formed by FLT3 R834. R834 is critical to the formation of a hydrogen bonding network that incorporates interactions with the side chains of residues N816, R815, Y842, D811, the backbone carbonyl oxygen of R815, and two water molecules. This network is directly adjacent to a hydrogen bonding network in which N841 plays a critical role. (D) Hydrogen bonding network formed by FLT3 D835. D835 is an integral part of a hydrogen bonding network that seems to stabilize the AL backbone in the autoinhibited conformation. There is a hydrogen bond directly between the carboxyl group and the backbone amide of residue S836. There is also an indirect hydrogen bond between the caryboxyl group and the backbone amide of M837 mediated by a water molecule. (E) Surface representation of the region proximal to G831. The molecular surface of FLT3 protein atoms is shown as a transparent gray surface. The surface is colored green where it contacts G831, and water molecules are shown as red spheres. The G831E mutation may not disrupt this conformation due to the proximity of a water-filled cavity adjacent to G831. In this figure, amino acid residues are shown in stick representation with nitrogen atoms in blue, oxygen in red, and carbon atoms the same color as the corresponding domain. Water molecules are shown as red spheres and hydrogen bonds as dashed red lines with their lengths labeled in Å. This figure was made using the program PyMOL (www.pymol.org). Figure options Conversely, structural analysis suggests that the nontransforming G831E substitution may not deleteriously affect the stability of the autoinhibited conformation. The molecular surface of autoinhibited FLT3 shows that there is a cavity directly adjacent to G831. This cavity is filled with water molecules and falls between the autoinhibited-conformation AL and JM domain (Figure 6E). Even though mutation of this glycine residue to glutamic acid is a substantial change, the glutamic acid residue should be able to be accommodated in the autoinhibited conformation by displacement of a number of water molecules. G831 lies within the invariant protein kinase DFG motif required for correct Mg2+•ATP coordination (Karlsson et al., 1993) and is important for conformational movements of the DFG motif between active and inactive states (Levinson et al., 2006). Consequently, the G831E mutation may stabilize FLT3 in the autoinhibited conformation and result in reduced kinase activity, consistent with our data showing a lack of FLT3 autophosphorylation in cells expressing FLT3 G831E.  Discussion We have used high-throughput DNA sequence analysis to determine the frequency and spectrum of mutations in the FLT3 gene in adult AML patients without known FLT3 ITDs or AL mutations. Sequencing of all FLT3 coding exons identified nine candidate leukemogenic alleles in six exons corresponding to different domains of the FLT3 receptor.  Large-scale mutational profiling studies in cancer typically result in extensive lists of validated nonsynonymous sequence variants. A major challenge of these studies is to distinguish driver mutations that are responsible for malignant transformation from nonfunctional passenger alterations that arise in the malignant clone by chance and accumulate during repeated rounds of cell division. To identify genetic changes with a role in tumorigenesis, statistical models have been developed that incorporate mutational frequency and distribution, and it has been inferred from such approaches that nonsynonymous passenger mutations are present at a higher frequency than previously anticipated (Greenman et al., 2007; Sjoblom et al., 2006 ;  Wood et al., 2007). We provide functional documentation of this concept by using a different strategy that combined both high-throughput DNA sequence analysis of FLT3 in primary AML samples with experimental validation of all potential driver mutations identified. Cytokine independence assays and biochemical analysis revealed that of the 9 candidate leukemogenic alleles, 4 are gain-of-function mutations that result in constitutive kinase activation and stimulation of downstream signaling pathways, properties that are relevant to leukemogenesis and can be exploited therapeutically, whereas the remaining 5 alleles were not associated with increased kinase activity and aberrant signal transduction.  These results also indicate that functional analyses can provide information beyond that derived from statistical methods for identifying driver mutations. First, we show that rare sequence variants occurring at frequencies that would not allow them to be distinguished from unselected passenger changes can be drivers. Second, we report that alleles in the kinase domain and in the AL—highly conserved and functionally relevant domains that, based on mathematical approaches, are likely to harbor driver mutations—may not be associated with a detectable gain of function. Third, statistical techniques result in identification of candidate cancer genes, but do not predict the ability of individual alleles to contribute to transformation. Our analysis of a series of nonsynonymous sequence variants in FLT3, a validated cancer gene ( Futreal et al., 2004), indicates that functional studies are needed to complement the bioinformatic approaches that have been described to date.  In addition to mutational frequency and distribution, statistical methods for assessing the functional relevance of DNA sequence variants in cancer rely on discerning acquired mutations from inherited polymorphisms. While the analysis of germline DNA is essential to assess the origin of cancer-associated genomic alterations and to determine whether a mutation has been selected for during tumorigenesis, previous findings in solid tumors indicate that the presence of a kinase mutation in constitutional DNA does not exclude the possibility that it has a potential role in malignant transformation (Bell et al., 2005; Jeffers et al., 1997; Mulloy et al., 2007 ;  Plaza-Menacho et al., 2006). These data further support the conclusion that the interpretation of high-throughput sequencing studies can be improved through functional assessment of candidate oncogenic alleles.  The four activating mutations that were identified in our screen are located in the EC domain (S451F), the JM domain (Y572C and V592G), and the AL (R834Q) of FLT3. Sequence variants in the EC region (D324N and N520Y) have been described previously in patients with AML (Ley et al., 2003 ;  Syampurnawati et al., 2007). However, D324N is also present in normal individuals and in nonhematopoietic tissues from AML patients and does not confer cytokine-independent growth to BaF3 cells (Schnittger et al., 2006), whereas the functional consequences of N520Y have not been assessed. Our results thus document that FLT3, like EGFR and KIT (Gari et al., 1999 ;  Lee et al., 2006), can be activated by mutations in the EC domain. To determine the mechanism by which the S451F mutation results in constitutive FLT3 kinase activity, structural analysis of a larger FLT3 molecule that includes the EC domain will be required.  Point mutations in the region between amino acids 579 and 594 in the FLT3 JM domain have been detected in a small proportion of AML cases (Reindl et al., 2006 ;  Stirewalt et al., 2004). We have found a valine to glycine substitution involving residue 592 and a mutation involving Y572. Y572 is the first amino acid of the JM domain, and analysis of the crystal structure of the FLT3 cytoplasmic domain has suggested a key role for this residue in kinase autoinhibition (Griffith et al., 2004). Our structural analysis suggests that mutation of Y572 would result in disruption of its extensive interactions with the surrounding FLT3 subdomains and consequent destabilization of the inactive kinase conformation. In support of this hypothesis, the Y572C substitution that was identified in our mutation screen results in constitutive FLT3 kinase activity. These data provide genetic evidence for the importance of Y572 in maintaining the autoinhibited conformation of FLT3 and suggest that any mutation that interferes with the stability of the JM domain in this conformation is likely to be transforming.  The signaling properties of the two JM domain point mutations are similar to those of FLT3 ITDs (Parcells et al., 2006). In particular, aberrant activation of STAT5 by JM domain point mutations appears to involve two tyrosine residues, Y589 and Y591, that are essential for FLT3 ITD-mediated induction of STAT5 and leukemic transformation in vivo (Rocnik et al., 2006). Analysis of the role of Y589 and Y591 also provided insights into the deregulation of other signaling pathways by mutant FLT3. For example, the majority of primary AML samples are characterized by activated MAPK and PI3K/AKT signaling; however, the fact that dysregulation of various upstream effectors can result in aberrant phosphorylation of ERK1/2 and AKT indicates that the MAPK and PI3K/AKT cascades may be activated through a variety of different mechanisms (Martelli et al., 2006 ;  Platanias, 2003). In support of the hypothesis that mutant TKs activate downstream signaling pathways by distinct mechanisms, phosphorylation of ERK1/2 and AKT by FLT3 JM domain point mutations also requires Y589 and Y591, and similar observations were made for constitutive activation of STAT3. These results suggest that the different types of JM domain mutations (ITDs and point mutations) contribute in similar ways to myeloid leukemogenesis and demonstrate that Y589 and Y591 are critical for the induction of several signaling pathways that are activated in leukemias with FLT3 JM domain mutations. Furthermore, these findings illustrate the potential of point mutations to alter the substrate specificity of protein kinases. Whether FLT3 Y589/591-mediated signal transduction in AML involves direct engagement of downstream effectors by these residues or requires additional adaptor molecules is currently unknown.  Previously described mutations in the FLT3 AL include substitutions, insertions, or deletions within a region between amino acids 834 and 842, with D835 being the most commonly affected residue (Frohling et al., 2005). We identified nonsynonymous substitutions at codons 831 and 834. Analysis of the crystal structure of the FLT3 kinase domain suggests that mutation of residue R834 would interfere with the stability of the autoinhibited conformation, and in agreement with this hypothesis, FLT3 R834Q has constitutive kinase activity and confers IL-3-independent growth to BaF3 cells. In contrast, mutation of the conserved DFG motif G831 to glutamic acid may deleteriously affect the structural requirements for enzymatic activity, is expected to be compatible with the autoinhibited conformation, and does not result in transformation of hematopoietic cells. These results illustrate the value of structural analysis for understanding the atomic-level mechanisms by which TK mutations associated with human leukemias function. In addition, these data indicate that the autoinhibited conformation of FLT3 is critically dependent on the stabilizing contacts of a limited number of specific amino acids, whereas mutation of other residues within the AL does not alter the structure and function of the FLT3 kinase.  Analysis of the signaling properties of FLT3 R834Q demonstrated that this mutation, unlike the more common D835Y allele, results in activation of ERK1/2, but not AKT, STAT3, or STAT5. Consistent with this observation, the R834Q mutation is associated with enhanced sensitivity to MEK inhibition, indicating that cells expressing R834Q are more reliant on MAPK signaling than are D835Y-expressing cells that constitutively phosphorylate multiple signaling proteins. These results suggest that there are not only differences in signal transduction between various FLT3 mutation classes, for example, ITDs and AL mutations (Choudhary et al., 2005 ;  Grundler et al., 2005), but also between distinct alleles within a given mutation class and that cells carrying different FLT3 mutations are differentially dependent on certain signaling pathways.  To determine the functional consequences of candidate mutations, we used an in vitro assay that is based on exogenous expression of mutated alleles in murine hematopoietic cells. This assay has proved to be of value for the assessment of increased TK activity and perturbed signal transduction and has been validated for numerous TK alleles identified in human hematologic malignancies, including FLT3 ITDs and AL mutations (Clark et al., 2004 ;  Weisberg et al., 2002), as well as for TK alleles associated with solid tumors, such as mutations in the EGFR kinase domain and the recently discovered EML4-ALK fusion in patients with non-small-cell lung cancer (Jiang et al., 2005 ;  Soda et al., 2007). On the other hand, conversion of BaF3 cells to cytokine independence may not faithfully assess the functional implications of certain mutations, either because they require expression of additional proteins (Lu et al., 2005) or because cooperativity between two or more mutations is required for signaling pathway activation. Lastly, this assay may fail to detect a gain of function conferred by kinase mutations that do not result in increased enzymatic activity. For instance, Wan et al. (2004) described three mutants of the serine-threonine kinase BRAF with impaired catalytic activity that are capable of stimulating downstream signaling through transactivation of CRAF. Although we observed no activation of ERK1/2, AKT, STAT3, or STAT5 in cells expressing FLT3 mutations that read out as nonfunctional in the BaF3 assay, it is possible that some of these alleles stimulate other effector molecules that were not analyzed in our study. We recognize that it is impossible to definitively exclude any conceivable function of a given mutation. Nonetheless, the nontransforming mutations identified in our screen do not meet conventional criteria for effects on kinase activation.  The activating mutations identified in our study conferred varying degrees of sensitivity to the small-molecule TK inhibitor PKC412. Cells expressing Y572C, V592G, or R834Q were highly sensitive to this compound, as has been reported for other JM domain (Reindl et al., 2006) and AL mutations (Choudhary et al., 2005; Grundler et al., 2003 ;  Weisberg et al., 2002). In contrast, cytotoxic responses in S451F-expressing cells required substantially higher drug concentrations. The determinants of response to pharmacologic inhibition of FLT3 are diverse and remain only partly understood. In general, the presence of mutant FLT3 is associated with increased drug sensitivity (DeAngelo et al., 2006 ;  Fiedler et al., 2005), yet there appears to be substantial variation among the different mutation types (Choudhary et al., 2005; Grundler et al., 2003 ;  Weisberg et al., 2002) as well as between individual alleles within the same mutation class (Clark et al., 2004 ;  Grundler et al., 2003). In addition, it has been observed that patients without FLT3 ITDs or any of the known AL mutations may also derive benefit from FLT3 inhibitor therapy, which might be related to the presence of previously unrecognized mutations (Schittenhelm et al., 2006), and in vitro studies in primary AML samples have shown that there is substantial interpatient variation in the degree of dependency on FLT3 signaling (Knapper et al., 2006). Our findings further illustrate the complex relationship between FLT3 mutation status and response to pharmacologic FLT3 inhibition.  In summary, our results demonstrate that previously unrecognized activating FLT3 mutations in the EC domain, the JM domain, and the AL occur in patients with AML, albeit at a low frequency. Since mutations lying outside the usually studied mutational hotspots may confer sensitivity to small-molecule TK inhibitors, eligibility for clinical trials of FLT3-targeted therapies should not be based on diagnostic screens that are limited to the detection of only a fraction of the FLT3 mutations associated with AML. The development of sensitive, allele-specific assays, such as mass spectrometry-based genotyping (Thomas et al., 2007), will allow all patients enrolled on trials of FLT3 inhibitors to be genotyped for all known FLT3 alleles, and it is hoped that similar strategies will be used in trials of molecularly targeted therapies for patients with different hematopoietic malignancies and solid tumors.  FLT3 is a highly annotated and well-studied cancer gene known to play a key role in myeloid leukemogenesis. The finding that only a fraction of the nonsynonymous FLT3 mutations associated with AML result in constitutive kinase activity illustrates the challenge in distinguishing between sequence variants that contribute to malignant transformation and nonfunctional passenger mutations. Given that the increasing throughput of DNA sequencing technologies will allow improved characterization of somatic cancer genomes, these data demonstrate that a combination of genetic and functional approaches will be crucial in order to identify the mutations that truly drive the development of cancer and to validate the potential of suspected oncogenic alleles as therapeutic targets.  Experimental Procedures Patient Samples  This study included 349 adult patients with AML, de novo or secondary after treatment for a primary malignancy or following myelodysplasia, as defined by French-American-British Cooperative Group criteria or the World Health Organization classification (Bennett et al., 1985 ;  Harris et al., 1999). Diagnostic BM and peripheral blood samples were collected after obtaining informed consent according to the Declaration of Helsinki and with institutional review board approval of the relevant institutions. All samples were enriched for mononuclear cells by density centrifugation before banking. Only samples with more than 50% blasts were included for DNA sequence analysis, and more than 80% of the samples had at least 80% blasts. All specimens that were analyzed by DNA sequencing were negative for FLT3 ITDs, as assessed by PCR amplification of exons 14 and 15; for FLT3 AL mutations involving codons 835 and 836, as assessed by PCR amplification of exon 20 followed by EcoRV digestion; for activating KIT mutations, as assessed by sequencing of exons 8 and 17; and for mutations involving NRAS codons 12, 13, and 61, as assessed by sequencing of exons 1 and 2.  FLT3 Mutational Analysis and Selection of Candidate Mutations  Extraction of genomic DNA, amplification of FLT3 exons, bidirectional sequencing, and sequence detection were performed using a high-throughput resequencing approach as previously described ( Levine et al., 2005). External gene-specific primers and internal M13-appended primers are listed in Table S5. Analysis of sequence traces was performed using Mutation Surveyor version 2.28 (SoftGenetics, State College, PA). Five steps were used to identify mutations of interest. First, any synonymous substitutions were not analyzed further. Second, known SNPs were excluded by comparison to the dbSNP database (release 127; http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/projects/SNP). Third, published data sets ( Greenman et al., 2007 ;  Ley et al., 2003) were queried to exclude any nonsynonymous substitutions in the FLT3 coding sequence that have been detected in DNA samples derived from normal tissues. Fourth, sequence chromatograms were visually inspected to remove false positive calls in the automated analysis. Fifth, candidate mutations were reamplified and sequenced from the original DNA sample for independent verification. Leukemic cells at diagnosis and a matched remission sample were analyzed in one case with a presumptive leukemogenic mutation in the FLT3 kinase domain, M737I.  Genotyping  Mass spectrometry genotyping was performed as previously described (Levine et al., 2005). Primers and primer extension probes for detection of the different FLT3 alleles are listed in Table S6.  DNA Constructs and Retrovirus Production  Sequence variants were introduced into the full-length FLT3 cDNA using the QuikChange XL Site-Directed Mutagenesis Kit (Stratagene, La Jolla, CA). All mutations were confirmed by sequencing of the entire FLT3 open reading frame. The mutant cDNAs were cloned into the MSCV-PGK-neo retroviral vector, and full-length protein expression was documented by western blotting. Generation of retroviral supernatants and infection of BaF3 cells were performed as described previously ( Rocnik et al., 2006). BaF3 cells transduced with MSCV-PGK-neo constructs were selected with G418 in the presence of IL-3 for 14 days.  Cell Culture  BaF3 cells were maintained in RPMI-1640 supplemented with 10% fetal calf serum and 10% WEHI-conditioned medium as a source of IL-3. For cytokine independence assays, cells transduced with each of the MSCV-PGK-neo retroviral contructs were seeded at a density of 0.33 × 106/ml in IL-3-free medium, and the number of viable cells was determined daily by trypan blue exclusion. For growth inhibition assays, cells were seeded at a density of 1 × 105/ml in IL-3-free medium with various concentrations of PKC412 (Novartis, Basel, Switzerland) or PD98059 (Calbiochem, San Diego, CA), and the number of viable cells was determined after 48 hr using the CellTiter 96AQueous One Solution Proliferation Assay (Promega, Madison, WI).  Immunoprecipitation and Western Blotting  Immunoprecipitation and western blotting were performed as described previously (Rocnik et al., 2006) using the following antibodies: anti-FLT3, anti-STAT5, anti-phospho-ERK1/2 (T202/Y204) (Santa Cruz Biotechnology, Santa Cruz, CA); anti-STAT3, anti-phospho-STAT3 (Y705), anti-phospho-STAT5 (Y694), anti-ERK1/2, anti-AKT, anti-phospho-AKT (S473) (Cell Signaling Technology, Beverly, MA); and anti-phosphotyrosine (4G10) (Upstate, Lake Placid, NY).  Knockdown of FLT3 Expression  Two pLKO.1-based lentiviral vectors encoding shRNAs targeted to the 3′ untranslated region (TRCN 772) or the coding sequence (TRCN 773) of the human FLT3 mRNA, and a pLKO.1 construct containing a nontargeting shRNA sequence were obtained from the MISSION TRC-Hs 1.0 (Human) shRNA library ( Root et al., 2006). The oligonucleotide sequences of the shRNAs were as follows (21-nucleotide stem sequences matching the target transcript underlined; noncomplementary 6-nucleotide loop sequences italicized): TRCN 772, 5′-CCG GCG TCT GCG TTT ACT CTT GTT TCT CGA GAA ACA AGA GTA AAC GCA GAC GTT TTT-3′; TRCN 773, 5′-CCG GGC TAA CTT CTA CAA ACT GAT TCT CGA GAA TCA GTT TGT AGA AGT TAG CTT TTT-3′. Generation of lentiviral supernatants and infection of human AML cells were performed as described previously (Scholl et al., 2007).  
1660||Mutations in the juxtamembrane and kinase domains of FLT3 are common in AML, but it is not known whether alterations outside these regions contribute to leukemogenesis. We used a high-throughput platform to interrogate the entire FLT3 coding sequence in AML patients without known FLT3 mutations and experimentally tested the consequences of each candidate leukemogenic allele. This approach identified gain-of-function mutations that activated downstream signaling and conferred sensitivity to FLT3 inhibition and alleles that were not associated with kinase activation, including mutations in the catalytic domain. These findings support the concept that acquired mutations in cancer may not contribute to malignant transformation and underscore the importance of functional studies to distinguish “driver” mutations underlying tumorigenesis from biologically neutral “passenger” alterations.  Author Keywords CELLCYCLE SIGNIFICANCE High-throughput DNA sequencing has provided insights into the mutational profiles of human cancers and represents a promising strategy for the identification of therapeutic targets. However, recognizing the subset of functionally relevant mutations has proven difficult. We used a combined genetic and functional approach to evaluate a series of candidate mutations in the receptor tyrosine kinase FLT3 that were identified in patients with AML. This strategy enabled distinction between activating alleles that conferred sensitivity to a small-molecule inhibitor and bystander mutations that did not result in kinase activation. Remarkably, these latter alterations included mutations in key functional domains of FLT3. These results emphasize that complementary functional studies are critical for validation of suspected oncogenic alleles from large-scale genomic screens.  Introduction The receptor tyrosine kinase (TK) FLT3 and its cognate ligand are important for the expansion of early hematopoietic progenitor cells and for the generation of mature natural killer cells and dendritic cells. Binding of FLT3 ligand to the extracellular (EC) domain of FLT3 induces receptor dimerization, which promotes phosphorylation of the FLT3 kinase domain, thereby activating the receptor and several downstream signaling pathways, primarily the PI3K/AKT pathway and the RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK cascade (Parcells et al., 2006).  In patients with acute myeloid leukemia (AML), somatic mutations that result in constitutive activation of FLT3 have been identified in two functional domains of the receptor, the juxtamembrane (JM) domain and the kinase domain. The JM domain, which has been shown to be critical for kinase autoinhibition (Griffith et al., 2004), is disrupted by internal tandem duplications (ITDs) in 25%–30% of adult AML patients (Stirewalt and Radich, 2003), whereas JM domain point mutations have been described in approximately 1% of cases (Reindl et al., 2006 ;  Stirewalt et al., 2004). FLT3 ITDs induce constitutive phosphorylation of several signal transduction intermediates, including STAT5, AKT, and ERK1/2 (Parcells et al., 2006) and cause myeloproliferative disease in various murine models (Kelly et al., 2002 ;  Lee et al., 2005). JM domain point mutations also result in constitutive activation of STAT5 and AKT (Reindl et al., 2006), but their in vivo transforming potential has not been studied.  The activation loop (AL) in the carboxy-terminal lobe of the kinase domain is affected by point mutations, insertions, or deletions in approximately 7% of AML cases (Frohling et al., 2005). AL mutations share several signal transduction properties with FLT3 ITDs, for example, constitutive phosphorylation of AKT and ERK1/2 (Choudhary et al., 2005 ;  Spiekermann et al., 2003). However, substantial differences between the two mutation types in the activation of STAT5 have been observed in some studies (Choudhary et al., 2005; Grundler et al., 2005 ;  Rocnik et al., 2006), but not in others (Bagrintseva et al., 2004; Grundler et al., 2003 ;  Spiekermann et al., 2003), and mice transplanted with BM expressing FLT3 AL mutations do not develop myeloid disease but rather, a T cell lymphoproliferative disorder with longer latency (Grundler et al., 2005). A mutation in the amino-terminal lobe of the kinase domain was found to induce constitutive activation of AKT, ERK1/2, and STAT5 (Schittenhelm et al., 2006).  From a clinical perspective, FLT3 mutations are important as a result of their prognostic relevance and because constitutively activated FLT3 is an attractive therapeutic target. FLT3 ITDs are associated with an increased risk of relapse and short survival (Yanada et al., 2005), and patients with low or absent levels of wild-type (WT) FLT3 appear to have a particularly dismal outcome (Thiede et al., 2002 ;  Whitman et al., 2001). In contrast, the prognostic relevance of FLT3 AL mutations remains controversial despite several studies on large patient series (Yanada et al., 2005). Currently, there are four selective FLT3 inhibitors at various stages of clinical development, including PKC412 (midostaurin), CEP-701 (lestaurtinib), MLN518 (tandutinib), and SU11248 (sunitinib) (Knapper, 2007). These compounds are well tolerated at doses that achieve inhibition of FLT3 and have shown moderate activity in relapsed or refractory AML patients with activating FLT3 mutations. In addition, some patients without FLT3 ITDs or known AL mutations have responded to FLT3 inhibitors, suggesting the possibility of other mutations that result in constitutive activation of FLT3. Ongoing clinical trials are evaluating the use of FLT3 inhibitors in combination with chemotherapy.  Previous studies have focused on the detection of mutations in the JM and kinase domains of FLT3, whereas the frequency and spectrum of sequence alterations outside these regions have not been systematically studied. We therefore performed high-throughput DNA sequencing of all coding exons of FLT3 in AML patients without FLT3 ITDs or known AL mutations. The primary aim of such a genomic screen is to identify “driver” mutations that are causally implicated in cancer development. However, recent large-scale sequencing studies in solid tumors that used statistical approaches to evaluate the impact of DNA sequence variants have demonstrated the difficulties in distinguishing driver mutations from “passenger” alterations that confer no clonal growth advantage ( Forrest and Cavet, 2007; Getz et al., 2007; Greenman et al., 2007; Rubin and Green, 2007; Sjoblom et al., 2006 ;  Wood et al., 2007). To address this problem, we experimentally tested the consequences of each candidate oncogenic allele identified in our mutation screen. This combined genetic and functional approach successfully identified gain-of-function mutations in the EC domain, the JM domain, and the AL of FLT3 and several passenger alterations that did not result in constitutive kinase activity. Furthermore, we investigated the structural implications, signal transduction properties, and sensitivity to FLT3 inhibition of the activating alleles.  Results High-Throughput DNA Sequence Analysis of FLT3  We performed bidirectional sequencing of all FLT3 coding exons in pretreatment samples from 222 adult AML patients without known activating mutations of FLT3, KIT, and NRAS. Sequence data were evaluated for quality and coverage within the region of interest of each exon that included all coding bases and the five flanking intronic bases at the 5′ and 3′ ends. High-quality, bidirectional sequence reads were obtained for more than 90% of all samples analyzed (see Table S1 in the Supplemental Data available with this article online).  FLT3 Sequence Variants in Patients with AML  We identified a total of 17 heterozygous nucleotide changes. Five of these changes corresponded to germline variants listed in single-nucleotide polymorphism (SNP) databases. Of the remaining 12 sequence alterations, 9 were predicted to change the amino acid sequence of FLT3 (nonsynonymous substitutions; Table 1 and Figure S1), whereas 3 were annotated as synonymous substitutions, resulting in a ratio of nonsynonymous to synonymous mutations of 3.  Table 1. Nonsynonymous Sequence Variants Identified by High-Throughput Sequencing of FLT3 in 222 AML Patients DNA	Exon	Protein	Domain 581A > G	5	T167A	extracellular 662G > A	5	V194M	extracellular 1052G > A	8	D324N	extracellular 1172T > C	9	Y364H	extracellular 1434C > T	11	S451F	extracellular 1751G > A	13	V557I	transmembrane 1797A > G	14	Y572C	juxtamembrane 1857T > G	14	V592G	juxtamembrane 2293G > C	18	M737I	kinase 2574G > A	20	G831E	activation loop 2583G > A	20	R834Q	activation loop Sequence numbering is according to Ensembl Transcript/Peptide ID ENST00000241453. D324N (refSNP ID rs35602083) and V557I (refSNP ID rs35958982) are known germline polymorphisms. Different mutations involving amino acids V592 and R834 (V592A, R834_D835 del, R834_D835insALG) are reported in the COSMIC database (version 30; http://www.sanger.ac.uk/genetics/CGP/cosmic/).  Table options The nine nonsynonymous sequence variants that were not known SNPs have not been observed in 48 normal control samples in which the entire coding region of FLT3 had previously been sequenced ( Ley et al., 2003) and were not among the germline variants identified in a mutation screen of all protein kinase genes in 210 human cancers (Greenman et al., 2007). These alterations were, therefore, considered to be candidate leukemogenic mutations that warrant experimental validation. Paired diagnostic and remission material was available from a patient with an M737I substitution in the FLT3 kinase domain. This variant was present at diagnosis but not in the remission sample, demonstrating that it was somatically acquired (Figure S1). The three synonymous sequence variants that were not known SNPs were considered to be nonfunctional and were, therefore, not further investigated.  FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q Are Gain-of-Function Mutations that Induce Constitutive Kinase Activation  To determine the functional consequences of all nine candidate mutations, we tested their ability to transform murine hematopoietic BaF3 cells to cytokine-independent growth, a property conferred by a broad spectrum of oncogenic TK alleles. Cells expressing S451F in the EC domain, Y572C or V592G in the JM domain, and R834Q in the AL were able to grow in the absence of interleukin-3 (IL-3; Figure 1A). Immunoprecipitation of FLT3 followed by western blotting with a phosphotyrosine-specific antibody demonstrated that these mutant kinases induced constitutive phosphorylation of FLT3 (Figure 1B). These results indicate that the S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q alleles are gain-of-function mutations that result in constitutive kinase activation. To perform a rapid and inexpensive secondary screen for these mutations, we designed allele-specific primer extension assays and performed genotype determination in an independent cohort of 127 adult AML cases. This analysis identified one additional case positive for the S451F substitution and one additional case with the R834Q allele. Thus, the overall prevalence of activating FLT3 mutations in this study was 1.7% (6 of 349 cases).  Constitutive Kinase Activation by FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q(A) ... Figure 1.  Constitutive Kinase Activation by FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q (A) Expression of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q resulted in IL-3-independent growth of BaF3 cells. Cells expressing the known AL mutation D835Y were used as positive control. Cells expressing WT FLT3 were used as negative control. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (B) Expression of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q in BaF3 cells resulted in constitutive FLT3 autophosphorylation. Cells were maintained in IL-3-free medium for 6 hr, FLT3 was immunoprecipitated from whole-cell lysates, and immunoprecipitates were analyzed by western blotting with an anti-phosphotyrosine antibody. Cells expressing a FLT3 ITD mutation (W51) or FLT3 D835Y were used as positive controls. Cells expressing WT FLT3 or the nontransforming G831E allele were used as negative controls. (C) Expression of FLT3 T167A, V194M, Y364H, M737I, and G831E did not result in IL-3-independent growth of BaF3 cells. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. Figure options Cells expressing any of the remaining five nonsynonymous sequence variants in the EC domain, the kinase domain, and the AL underwent apoptosis when cultured in the absence of exogenous cytokines, and constitutive phosphorylation of FLT3 was not observed (Figures 1B and 1C). These results indicate that a substantial proportion of the nonsynonymous sequence variants detected in FLT3 are likely to be passenger mutations. To increase confidence that the four presumed passenger mutations for which no matched normal DNA sample was available (T167A, V194M, Y364H, and G831E) did not represent germline polymorphisms or sequence artifacts, the following steps were taken. First, we sequenced the corresponding exons of FLT3 in 102 normal DNA samples and detected no abnormalities. Second, we determined by mass spectrometry genotyping that the G831E allele in the FLT3 AL was not present in the panel of 270 normal individuals collected by the International HapMap Consortium (2003). Third, we introduced PCR-amplified genomic DNA from each case into a cloning vector and sequenced between 50 and 55 individual transformants. In two cases (T167A and G831E), the observed mutant-to-wild-type allelic ratio was substantially different from 1 (0.19 and 3.2, respectively), suggesting that these alleles did not represent heterozygous SNPs. In the remaining two cases (V194M and Y364H), the number of recombinant clones carrying the mutant allele was similar to that of clones harboring the WT sequence (24 versus 27 and 31 versus 21, respectively), a finding compatible with either a somatic mutation that was present in most of the cells from which the original DNA sample was derived or with a heterozygous germline variant.  For comparison with our functional analyses, we also predicted the effects of all nine candidate mutations in silico using the SIFT (http://blocks.fhcrc.org/sift/SIFT.html) and PMut (http://mmb2.pcb.ub.es:8080/PMut) software programs (Table S2). Three sequence variants (S451F, G831E, and R834Q) were predicted to affect the function of FLT3, whereas four changes (T167A, V194M, Y364H, and M737I) were predicted to be tolerated. The remaining two mutations (Y572C and V592G) had conflicting results between the SIFT and PMut algorithms. These findings illustrate that bioinformatics approaches and functional assays provide complementary information as to the potential impact of mutations identified in large-scale genomic screens.  Ortholog alignments for all nonsynonymous sequence variants identified in this study, as well as relevant sequence alignments of all five class III receptor TKs (PDGFRA, PDGFRB, KIT, CSF1R, and FLT3) and other TKs with a known role in cancer (EGFR, ERBB2, RET, MET, and ABL1), are shown in Figure S2. Clinical characteristics of the patients with activating FLT3 mutations are given in Tables S3 and S4.  FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q Differentially Activate Downstream Signaling Pathways  To examine the signal transduction properties of the four activating mutations, BaF3 cells expressing FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, or R834Q were deprived of IL-3 and then analyzed by western blotting for phosphorylation of signaling proteins (Figure 2 and Table 2).  Differential Activation of Signal Transduction Pathways by FLT3 S451F, Y572C, ... Figure 2.  Differential Activation of Signal Transduction Pathways by FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q Expression of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q in BaF3 cells resulted in constitutive phosphorylation of varying signaling proteins. Cells were maintained in IL-3-free medium for 6 hr, and whole-cell lysates or immunoprecipitates from whole-cell lysates were analyzed by western blotting as indicated. The signaling characteristics of the four mutations were compared with those of FLT3 D835Y and the FLT3 ITD mutation W51. Cells expressing WT FLT3 or the nontransforming G831E allele were used as negative controls. Expression of FLT3 in the different stable cell lines was confirmed by reprobing the blot demonstrating constitutive phosphorylation of AKT with an anti-FLT3 antibody. Figure options Table 2. Constitutive Phosphorylation of Signaling Molecules in BaF3 Cells Expressing Activating FLT3 Mutations FLT3 Mutation Signaling molecule	S451F	Y572C	V592G	R834Q	D835Y	W51 FLT3	+	+	+	+	+	+ STAT5	−	+	+	−	−	+ ERK1/2	+	+	+	+	+	+ AKT	−	+	+	−	+	− STAT3	−	+	+	−	+	− S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q were identified in this study; D835Y and W51 are known activating FLT3 mutations that have been described previously. +, constitutive phosphorylation; −, no constitutive phosphorylation.  Table options Expression of the JM domain mutations Y572C and V592G resulted in constitutive phosphorylation of ERK1/2, AKT, STAT3, and STAT5. We recently identified Y589 and Y591 as sites in the JM domain that are necessary for aberrant activation of STAT5 in cells expressing a FLT3 ITD mutation (Rocnik et al., 2006). To investigate whether these residues are also required for signal transduction mediated by JM domain point mutations, we generated Y589/591F double substitutions in the cDNAs encoding FLT3 Y572C and V592G. Coexpression of Y589/591F delayed the induction of IL-3-independent growth in BaF3 cells (Figure S3A), decreased the proliferation rate of BaF3 cells in the absence of IL-3 (Figure S3B), and altered the signaling properties of the two alleles (Figure S3C). The Y589/591F mutations strongly reduced constitutive phosphorylation of ERK1/2, STAT3, and STAT5 and attenuated aberrant activation of AKT. These results, along with our analysis of the FLT3 structure (see below), support the hypothesis that point mutations in the JM domain, like FLT3 ITD mutations, can alter the conformation of the JM domain, potentially resulting in exposure of occult docking sites such as Y589 and Y591, in turn enabling recruitment and activation of specific downstream signaling proteins.  The signaling properties of the R834Q substitution were compared to those of the most frequent AL mutation, D835Y. Consistent with previous reports (Choudhary et al., 2005; Grundler et al., 2005 ;  Rocnik et al., 2006), BaF3 cells expressing D835Y showed constitutive activation of ERK1/2 and AKT, but not STAT5. Furthermore, we found that expression of D835Y was associated with constitutive phosphorylation of STAT3. The R834Q mutation, on the other hand, resulted in phosphorylation of ERK1/2 but not AKT, STAT3, or STAT5. This signaling pattern was associated with increased sensitivity to growth inhibition by the MEK inhibitor PD98059 as compared to cells harboring the D835Y mutation (Figures 3A and 3B), indicating a higher relative contribution of ERK signaling to the transforming activity of the R834Q allele. Similar to R834Q-positive cells, cells expressing the S451F mutation also showed constitutive phosphorylation of ERK1/2, but no induction of AKT, STAT3, or STAT5. These results suggest that activation of the MAPK pathway in the absence of PI3K/AKT, STAT3, or STAT5 signaling is sufficient for transformation of hematopoietic cells by specific FLT3 alleles and that cells carrying different FLT3 mutations are differentially dependent on signaling mechanisms that involve the MEK/ERK cascade.  Varying Sensitivity of Different FLT3 AL Mutations to MEK Inhibition(A) ... Figure 3.  Varying Sensitivity of Different FLT3 AL Mutations to MEK Inhibition (A) Expression of FLT3 R834Q was associated with a higher sensitivity to MEK inhibition as compared to FLT3 D835Y. BaF3 cells stably expressing FLT3 R834Q or D835Y and growing in the absence of IL-3 were treated with PD98059 as indicated. Cell viability was measured after 48 hr, and the proportion of viable cells relative to the control (no inhibitor) was plotted. IC50 values are indicated. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (B) PD98059 treatment of BaF3 cells expressing FLT3 R834Q or D835Y resulted in dose-dependent inhibition of ERK1/2 phosphorylation. Cells were incubated with varying drug concentrations for 15 min, and whole-cell lysates were analyzed by western blotting as indicated. Figure options FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q Confer Varying Sensitivity to the TK Inhibitor PKC412  To determine the sensitivity of the four activating mutations to FLT3 inhibition, BaF3 cells expressing FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, or R834Q were treated with increasing concentrations of the small-molecule TK inhibitor PKC412. FLT3 Y572C, V592G, and R834Q conferred high sensitivity to PKC412 (inhibitory concentration of 50% [IC50], 2.5 nM, 5 nM, and 2.3 nM, respectively), whereas a considerably higher IC50 (48 nM) was observed for FLT3 S451F (Figure 4A). Western blot analysis showed that treatment with PKC412 led to dose-dependent decreases in FLT3 autophosphorylation and in phosphorylation of ERK1/2 that correlated with inhibition of cell growth (Figure 4B). WT FLT3-expressing BaF3 cells grown in the presence of IL-3 were used as a control for toxicity unrelated to FLT3 inhibition, and no antiproliferative effect was observed for concentrations of PKC412 up to 50 nM (Figure 4A). These data show that the four activating FLT3 mutations identified in our mutation screen can be inhibited by PKC412 and that Y572C, V592G, and R834Q are considerably more sensitive to this compound than S451F.  Varying Sensitivity of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q to Kinase Inhibition ... Figure 4.  Varying Sensitivity of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q to Kinase Inhibition by PKC412 (A) Expression of FLT3 Y572C, V592G, or R834Q was associated with higher sensitivity to FLT3 inhibition as compared to FLT3 S451F. BaF3 cells growing in the absence of IL-3 were treated with PKC412 as indicated. Cell viability was measured after 48 hr, and the proportion of viable cells relative to the control (no inhibitor) was plotted. IC50 values are indicated. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (B) PKC412 treatment of BaF3 cells expressing FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q resulted in dose-dependent decreases in FLT3 and ERK1/2 phosphorylation. Cells were incubated with varying drug concentrations for 2 hr, and whole-cell lysates were analyzed by western blotting as indicated. Figure options Mutation of FLT3 V592 Promotes Aberrant Signal Transduction and Proliferation of Human AML Cells  To investigate the role of mutant FLT3 in human AML cells, we analyzed the MONO-MAC-6 cell line that has been reported to contain a V592A substitution in the FLT3 JM domain (Spiekermann et al., 2003). DNA sequence analysis confirmed the presence of a homozygous V592A mutation in this cell line (data not shown). Lentiviral transduction of MONO-MAC-6 cells with two short hairpin RNA (shRNA) constructs targeting different regions of the FLT3 transcript resulted in stable downregulation of FLT3 mRNA (Figure 5B) and reduced levels of FLT3 protein (Figure 5C). Knockdown of FLT3 was associated with a substantial reduction in cell viability as compared to cells transduced with a nontargeting control shRNA (Figure 5A). Western blot analysis showed that suppression of FLT3 resulted in loss of STAT5 phosphorylation (Figure 5C), indicating that STAT5 is a downstream target of mutations involving FLT3 V592, consistent with our signaling studies in BaF3 cells. These results suggest that endogenous point mutations of FLT3 V592 promote the growth and survival of human AML cells and that this effect is mediated through aberrant STAT5 activation.  Effects of FLT3 Knockdown in Human AML Cells(A) Downregulation of FLT3 using ... Figure 5.  Effects of FLT3 Knockdown in Human AML Cells (A) Downregulation of FLT3 using shRNA constructs TRCN 772 and TRCN 773 inhibited the growth of a human AML cell line, MONO-MAC-6, that harbors a homozyogus V592A mutation in the FLT3 JM domain. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (B) Transduction of MONO-MAC-6 cells with shRNA constructs TRCN 772 and TRCN 773 resulted in decreased FLT3 mRNA levels as compared to a nontargeting control construct. Experiments were performed in duplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (C) Suppression of FLT3 mRNA was associated with a reduction in FLT3 protein (upper panels) and with loss of STAT5 phosphorylation (lower panels). Figure options Structural Analysis of FLT3 Mutations  Based on the crystal structure of the intracellular domains of FLT3 (Protein Data Bank accession code 1RJB; Figure 6A), we assessed the potential mechanism by which point mutations in the JM domain and in the AL result in constitutive FLT3 kinase activity. Residues Y572 and R834 seem to be involved in maintaining the energetic favorability of the autoinhibited conformation of FLT3. Loss of the stabilizing effects of these residues should favor the active conformation. Y572, which has thus far not been found mutated in AML, is described as the first amino-terminal residue visible in the electron density of the crystal structure (Griffith et al., 2004). It is a key “hook” for the JM domain and is critical to maintain the autoinhibited conformation of FLT3 (Figure 6B). The Y572C substitution is expected to result in a substantial loss of hydrogen bonding networks and extensive hydrophobic interactions, with a consequent reduction in the energetic favorability of this conformation. Likewise, loss of hydrogen bonding networks that would result from the R834Q and D835Y mutations is expected to destabilize the autoinhibited kinase conformation (Figures 6C and 6D).  Structural Analysis of FLT3 Mutations(A) Ribbon representation of the crystal ... Figure 6.  Structural Analysis of FLT3 Mutations (A) Ribbon representation of the crystal structure of the FLT3 kinase domain (Protein Data Bank, accession code 1RJB). The structure is a typical kinase fold crystallized in the autoinhibited conformation with the JM domain packing closely to the kinase domain and locking the protein in this conformation. (B) Hydrogen bonding network formed by FLT3 Y572. Y572 inserts into the catalytic cleft of FLT3, where the phenolic hydroxyl oxygen forms hydrogen bonds to the catalytic glutamic acid, E661, and an ordered water molecule. The aromatic ring also makes extensive hydrophobic contacts. The Y572C mutation will disrupt this “hook” that locks the JM domain in the autoinhibited conformation. (C) Hydrogen bonding network formed by FLT3 R834. R834 is critical to the formation of a hydrogen bonding network that incorporates interactions with the side chains of residues N816, R815, Y842, D811, the backbone carbonyl oxygen of R815, and two water molecules. This network is directly adjacent to a hydrogen bonding network in which N841 plays a critical role. (D) Hydrogen bonding network formed by FLT3 D835. D835 is an integral part of a hydrogen bonding network that seems to stabilize the AL backbone in the autoinhibited conformation. There is a hydrogen bond directly between the carboxyl group and the backbone amide of residue S836. There is also an indirect hydrogen bond between the caryboxyl group and the backbone amide of M837 mediated by a water molecule. (E) Surface representation of the region proximal to G831. The molecular surface of FLT3 protein atoms is shown as a transparent gray surface. The surface is colored green where it contacts G831, and water molecules are shown as red spheres. The G831E mutation may not disrupt this conformation due to the proximity of a water-filled cavity adjacent to G831. In this figure, amino acid residues are shown in stick representation with nitrogen atoms in blue, oxygen in red, and carbon atoms the same color as the corresponding domain. Water molecules are shown as red spheres and hydrogen bonds as dashed red lines with their lengths labeled in Å. This figure was made using the program PyMOL (www.pymol.org). Figure options Conversely, structural analysis suggests that the nontransforming G831E substitution may not deleteriously affect the stability of the autoinhibited conformation. The molecular surface of autoinhibited FLT3 shows that there is a cavity directly adjacent to G831. This cavity is filled with water molecules and falls between the autoinhibited-conformation AL and JM domain (Figure 6E). Even though mutation of this glycine residue to glutamic acid is a substantial change, the glutamic acid residue should be able to be accommodated in the autoinhibited conformation by displacement of a number of water molecules. G831 lies within the invariant protein kinase DFG motif required for correct Mg2+•ATP coordination (Karlsson et al., 1993) and is important for conformational movements of the DFG motif between active and inactive states (Levinson et al., 2006). Consequently, the G831E mutation may stabilize FLT3 in the autoinhibited conformation and result in reduced kinase activity, consistent with our data showing a lack of FLT3 autophosphorylation in cells expressing FLT3 G831E.  Discussion We have used high-throughput DNA sequence analysis to determine the frequency and spectrum of mutations in the FLT3 gene in adult AML patients without known FLT3 ITDs or AL mutations. Sequencing of all FLT3 coding exons identified nine candidate leukemogenic alleles in six exons corresponding to different domains of the FLT3 receptor.  Large-scale mutational profiling studies in cancer typically result in extensive lists of validated nonsynonymous sequence variants. A major challenge of these studies is to distinguish driver mutations that are responsible for malignant transformation from nonfunctional passenger alterations that arise in the malignant clone by chance and accumulate during repeated rounds of cell division. To identify genetic changes with a role in tumorigenesis, statistical models have been developed that incorporate mutational frequency and distribution, and it has been inferred from such approaches that nonsynonymous passenger mutations are present at a higher frequency than previously anticipated (Greenman et al., 2007; Sjoblom et al., 2006 ;  Wood et al., 2007). We provide functional documentation of this concept by using a different strategy that combined both high-throughput DNA sequence analysis of FLT3 in primary AML samples with experimental validation of all potential driver mutations identified. Cytokine independence assays and biochemical analysis revealed that of the 9 candidate leukemogenic alleles, 4 are gain-of-function mutations that result in constitutive kinase activation and stimulation of downstream signaling pathways, properties that are relevant to leukemogenesis and can be exploited therapeutically, whereas the remaining 5 alleles were not associated with increased kinase activity and aberrant signal transduction.  These results also indicate that functional analyses can provide information beyond that derived from statistical methods for identifying driver mutations. First, we show that rare sequence variants occurring at frequencies that would not allow them to be distinguished from unselected passenger changes can be drivers. Second, we report that alleles in the kinase domain and in the AL—highly conserved and functionally relevant domains that, based on mathematical approaches, are likely to harbor driver mutations—may not be associated with a detectable gain of function. Third, statistical techniques result in identification of candidate cancer genes, but do not predict the ability of individual alleles to contribute to transformation. Our analysis of a series of nonsynonymous sequence variants in FLT3, a validated cancer gene ( Futreal et al., 2004), indicates that functional studies are needed to complement the bioinformatic approaches that have been described to date.  In addition to mutational frequency and distribution, statistical methods for assessing the functional relevance of DNA sequence variants in cancer rely on discerning acquired mutations from inherited polymorphisms. While the analysis of germline DNA is essential to assess the origin of cancer-associated genomic alterations and to determine whether a mutation has been selected for during tumorigenesis, previous findings in solid tumors indicate that the presence of a kinase mutation in constitutional DNA does not exclude the possibility that it has a potential role in malignant transformation (Bell et al., 2005; Jeffers et al., 1997; Mulloy et al., 2007 ;  Plaza-Menacho et al., 2006). These data further support the conclusion that the interpretation of high-throughput sequencing studies can be improved through functional assessment of candidate oncogenic alleles.  The four activating mutations that were identified in our screen are located in the EC domain (S451F), the JM domain (Y572C and V592G), and the AL (R834Q) of FLT3. Sequence variants in the EC region (D324N and N520Y) have been described previously in patients with AML (Ley et al., 2003 ;  Syampurnawati et al., 2007). However, D324N is also present in normal individuals and in nonhematopoietic tissues from AML patients and does not confer cytokine-independent growth to BaF3 cells (Schnittger et al., 2006), whereas the functional consequences of N520Y have not been assessed. Our results thus document that FLT3, like EGFR and KIT (Gari et al., 1999 ;  Lee et al., 2006), can be activated by mutations in the EC domain. To determine the mechanism by which the S451F mutation results in constitutive FLT3 kinase activity, structural analysis of a larger FLT3 molecule that includes the EC domain will be required.  Point mutations in the region between amino acids 579 and 594 in the FLT3 JM domain have been detected in a small proportion of AML cases (Reindl et al., 2006 ;  Stirewalt et al., 2004). We have found a valine to glycine substitution involving residue 592 and a mutation involving Y572. Y572 is the first amino acid of the JM domain, and analysis of the crystal structure of the FLT3 cytoplasmic domain has suggested a key role for this residue in kinase autoinhibition (Griffith et al., 2004). Our structural analysis suggests that mutation of Y572 would result in disruption of its extensive interactions with the surrounding FLT3 subdomains and consequent destabilization of the inactive kinase conformation. In support of this hypothesis, the Y572C substitution that was identified in our mutation screen results in constitutive FLT3 kinase activity. These data provide genetic evidence for the importance of Y572 in maintaining the autoinhibited conformation of FLT3 and suggest that any mutation that interferes with the stability of the JM domain in this conformation is likely to be transforming.  The signaling properties of the two JM domain point mutations are similar to those of FLT3 ITDs (Parcells et al., 2006). In particular, aberrant activation of STAT5 by JM domain point mutations appears to involve two tyrosine residues, Y589 and Y591, that are essential for FLT3 ITD-mediated induction of STAT5 and leukemic transformation in vivo (Rocnik et al., 2006). Analysis of the role of Y589 and Y591 also provided insights into the deregulation of other signaling pathways by mutant FLT3. For example, the majority of primary AML samples are characterized by activated MAPK and PI3K/AKT signaling; however, the fact that dysregulation of various upstream effectors can result in aberrant phosphorylation of ERK1/2 and AKT indicates that the MAPK and PI3K/AKT cascades may be activated through a variety of different mechanisms (Martelli et al., 2006 ;  Platanias, 2003). In support of the hypothesis that mutant TKs activate downstream signaling pathways by distinct mechanisms, phosphorylation of ERK1/2 and AKT by FLT3 JM domain point mutations also requires Y589 and Y591, and similar observations were made for constitutive activation of STAT3. These results suggest that the different types of JM domain mutations (ITDs and point mutations) contribute in similar ways to myeloid leukemogenesis and demonstrate that Y589 and Y591 are critical for the induction of several signaling pathways that are activated in leukemias with FLT3 JM domain mutations. Furthermore, these findings illustrate the potential of point mutations to alter the substrate specificity of protein kinases. Whether FLT3 Y589/591-mediated signal transduction in AML involves direct engagement of downstream effectors by these residues or requires additional adaptor molecules is currently unknown.  Previously described mutations in the FLT3 AL include substitutions, insertions, or deletions within a region between amino acids 834 and 842, with D835 being the most commonly affected residue (Frohling et al., 2005). We identified nonsynonymous substitutions at codons 831 and 834. Analysis of the crystal structure of the FLT3 kinase domain suggests that mutation of residue R834 would interfere with the stability of the autoinhibited conformation, and in agreement with this hypothesis, FLT3 R834Q has constitutive kinase activity and confers IL-3-independent growth to BaF3 cells. In contrast, mutation of the conserved DFG motif G831 to glutamic acid may deleteriously affect the structural requirements for enzymatic activity, is expected to be compatible with the autoinhibited conformation, and does not result in transformation of hematopoietic cells. These results illustrate the value of structural analysis for understanding the atomic-level mechanisms by which TK mutations associated with human leukemias function. In addition, these data indicate that the autoinhibited conformation of FLT3 is critically dependent on the stabilizing contacts of a limited number of specific amino acids, whereas mutation of other residues within the AL does not alter the structure and function of the FLT3 kinase.  Analysis of the signaling properties of FLT3 R834Q demonstrated that this mutation, unlike the more common D835Y allele, results in activation of ERK1/2, but not AKT, STAT3, or STAT5. Consistent with this observation, the R834Q mutation is associated with enhanced sensitivity to MEK inhibition, indicating that cells expressing R834Q are more reliant on MAPK signaling than are D835Y-expressing cells that constitutively phosphorylate multiple signaling proteins. These results suggest that there are not only differences in signal transduction between various FLT3 mutation classes, for example, ITDs and AL mutations (Choudhary et al., 2005 ;  Grundler et al., 2005), but also between distinct alleles within a given mutation class and that cells carrying different FLT3 mutations are differentially dependent on certain signaling pathways.  To determine the functional consequences of candidate mutations, we used an in vitro assay that is based on exogenous expression of mutated alleles in murine hematopoietic cells. This assay has proved to be of value for the assessment of increased TK activity and perturbed signal transduction and has been validated for numerous TK alleles identified in human hematologic malignancies, including FLT3 ITDs and AL mutations (Clark et al., 2004 ;  Weisberg et al., 2002), as well as for TK alleles associated with solid tumors, such as mutations in the EGFR kinase domain and the recently discovered EML4-ALK fusion in patients with non-small-cell lung cancer (Jiang et al., 2005 ;  Soda et al., 2007). On the other hand, conversion of BaF3 cells to cytokine independence may not faithfully assess the functional implications of certain mutations, either because they require expression of additional proteins (Lu et al., 2005) or because cooperativity between two or more mutations is required for signaling pathway activation. Lastly, this assay may fail to detect a gain of function conferred by kinase mutations that do not result in increased enzymatic activity. For instance, Wan et al. (2004) described three mutants of the serine-threonine kinase BRAF with impaired catalytic activity that are capable of stimulating downstream signaling through transactivation of CRAF. Although we observed no activation of ERK1/2, AKT, STAT3, or STAT5 in cells expressing FLT3 mutations that read out as nonfunctional in the BaF3 assay, it is possible that some of these alleles stimulate other effector molecules that were not analyzed in our study. We recognize that it is impossible to definitively exclude any conceivable function of a given mutation. Nonetheless, the nontransforming mutations identified in our screen do not meet conventional criteria for effects on kinase activation.  The activating mutations identified in our study conferred varying degrees of sensitivity to the small-molecule TK inhibitor PKC412. Cells expressing Y572C, V592G, or R834Q were highly sensitive to this compound, as has been reported for other JM domain (Reindl et al., 2006) and AL mutations (Choudhary et al., 2005; Grundler et al., 2003 ;  Weisberg et al., 2002). In contrast, cytotoxic responses in S451F-expressing cells required substantially higher drug concentrations. The determinants of response to pharmacologic inhibition of FLT3 are diverse and remain only partly understood. In general, the presence of mutant FLT3 is associated with increased drug sensitivity (DeAngelo et al., 2006 ;  Fiedler et al., 2005), yet there appears to be substantial variation among the different mutation types (Choudhary et al., 2005; Grundler et al., 2003 ;  Weisberg et al., 2002) as well as between individual alleles within the same mutation class (Clark et al., 2004 ;  Grundler et al., 2003). In addition, it has been observed that patients without FLT3 ITDs or any of the known AL mutations may also derive benefit from FLT3 inhibitor therapy, which might be related to the presence of previously unrecognized mutations (Schittenhelm et al., 2006), and in vitro studies in primary AML samples have shown that there is substantial interpatient variation in the degree of dependency on FLT3 signaling (Knapper et al., 2006). Our findings further illustrate the complex relationship between FLT3 mutation status and response to pharmacologic FLT3 inhibition.  In summary, our results demonstrate that previously unrecognized activating FLT3 mutations in the EC domain, the JM domain, and the AL occur in patients with AML, albeit at a low frequency. Since mutations lying outside the usually studied mutational hotspots may confer sensitivity to small-molecule TK inhibitors, eligibility for clinical trials of FLT3-targeted therapies should not be based on diagnostic screens that are limited to the detection of only a fraction of the FLT3 mutations associated with AML. The development of sensitive, allele-specific assays, such as mass spectrometry-based genotyping (Thomas et al., 2007), will allow all patients enrolled on trials of FLT3 inhibitors to be genotyped for all known FLT3 alleles, and it is hoped that similar strategies will be used in trials of molecularly targeted therapies for patients with different hematopoietic malignancies and solid tumors.  FLT3 is a highly annotated and well-studied cancer gene known to play a key role in myeloid leukemogenesis. The finding that only a fraction of the nonsynonymous FLT3 mutations associated with AML result in constitutive kinase activity illustrates the challenge in distinguishing between sequence variants that contribute to malignant transformation and nonfunctional passenger mutations. Given that the increasing throughput of DNA sequencing technologies will allow improved characterization of somatic cancer genomes, these data demonstrate that a combination of genetic and functional approaches will be crucial in order to identify the mutations that truly drive the development of cancer and to validate the potential of suspected oncogenic alleles as therapeutic targets.  Experimental Procedures Patient Samples  This study included 349 adult patients with AML, de novo or secondary after treatment for a primary malignancy or following myelodysplasia, as defined by French-American-British Cooperative Group criteria or the World Health Organization classification (Bennett et al., 1985 ;  Harris et al., 1999). Diagnostic BM and peripheral blood samples were collected after obtaining informed consent according to the Declaration of Helsinki and with institutional review board approval of the relevant institutions. All samples were enriched for mononuclear cells by density centrifugation before banking. Only samples with more than 50% blasts were included for DNA sequence analysis, and more than 80% of the samples had at least 80% blasts. All specimens that were analyzed by DNA sequencing were negative for FLT3 ITDs, as assessed by PCR amplification of exons 14 and 15; for FLT3 AL mutations involving codons 835 and 836, as assessed by PCR amplification of exon 20 followed by EcoRV digestion; for activating KIT mutations, as assessed by sequencing of exons 8 and 17; and for mutations involving NRAS codons 12, 13, and 61, as assessed by sequencing of exons 1 and 2.  FLT3 Mutational Analysis and Selection of Candidate Mutations  Extraction of genomic DNA, amplification of FLT3 exons, bidirectional sequencing, and sequence detection were performed using a high-throughput resequencing approach as previously described ( Levine et al., 2005). External gene-specific primers and internal M13-appended primers are listed in Table S5. Analysis of sequence traces was performed using Mutation Surveyor version 2.28 (SoftGenetics, State College, PA). Five steps were used to identify mutations of interest. First, any synonymous substitutions were not analyzed further. Second, known SNPs were excluded by comparison to the dbSNP database (release 127; http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/projects/SNP). Third, published data sets ( Greenman et al., 2007 ;  Ley et al., 2003) were queried to exclude any nonsynonymous substitutions in the FLT3 coding sequence that have been detected in DNA samples derived from normal tissues. Fourth, sequence chromatograms were visually inspected to remove false positive calls in the automated analysis. Fifth, candidate mutations were reamplified and sequenced from the original DNA sample for independent verification. Leukemic cells at diagnosis and a matched remission sample were analyzed in one case with a presumptive leukemogenic mutation in the FLT3 kinase domain, M737I.  Genotyping  Mass spectrometry genotyping was performed as previously described (Levine et al., 2005). Primers and primer extension probes for detection of the different FLT3 alleles are listed in Table S6.  DNA Constructs and Retrovirus Production  Sequence variants were introduced into the full-length FLT3 cDNA using the QuikChange XL Site-Directed Mutagenesis Kit (Stratagene, La Jolla, CA). All mutations were confirmed by sequencing of the entire FLT3 open reading frame. The mutant cDNAs were cloned into the MSCV-PGK-neo retroviral vector, and full-length protein expression was documented by western blotting. Generation of retroviral supernatants and infection of BaF3 cells were performed as described previously ( Rocnik et al., 2006). BaF3 cells transduced with MSCV-PGK-neo constructs were selected with G418 in the presence of IL-3 for 14 days.  Cell Culture  BaF3 cells were maintained in RPMI-1640 supplemented with 10% fetal calf serum and 10% WEHI-conditioned medium as a source of IL-3. For cytokine independence assays, cells transduced with each of the MSCV-PGK-neo retroviral contructs were seeded at a density of 0.33 × 106/ml in IL-3-free medium, and the number of viable cells was determined daily by trypan blue exclusion. For growth inhibition assays, cells were seeded at a density of 1 × 105/ml in IL-3-free medium with various concentrations of PKC412 (Novartis, Basel, Switzerland) or PD98059 (Calbiochem, San Diego, CA), and the number of viable cells was determined after 48 hr using the CellTiter 96AQueous One Solution Proliferation Assay (Promega, Madison, WI).  Immunoprecipitation and Western Blotting  Immunoprecipitation and western blotting were performed as described previously (Rocnik et al., 2006) using the following antibodies: anti-FLT3, anti-STAT5, anti-phospho-ERK1/2 (T202/Y204) (Santa Cruz Biotechnology, Santa Cruz, CA); anti-STAT3, anti-phospho-STAT3 (Y705), anti-phospho-STAT5 (Y694), anti-ERK1/2, anti-AKT, anti-phospho-AKT (S473) (Cell Signaling Technology, Beverly, MA); and anti-phosphotyrosine (4G10) (Upstate, Lake Placid, NY).  Knockdown of FLT3 Expression  Two pLKO.1-based lentiviral vectors encoding shRNAs targeted to the 3′ untranslated region (TRCN 772) or the coding sequence (TRCN 773) of the human FLT3 mRNA, and a pLKO.1 construct containing a nontargeting shRNA sequence were obtained from the MISSION TRC-Hs 1.0 (Human) shRNA library ( Root et al., 2006). The oligonucleotide sequences of the shRNAs were as follows (21-nucleotide stem sequences matching the target transcript underlined; noncomplementary 6-nucleotide loop sequences italicized): TRCN 772, 5′-CCG GCG TCT GCG TTT ACT CTT GTT TCT CGA GAA ACA AGA GTA AAC GCA GAC GTT TTT-3′; TRCN 773, 5′-CCG GGC TAA CTT CTA CAA ACT GAT TCT CGA GAA TCA GTT TGT AGA AGT TAG CTT TTT-3′. Generation of lentiviral supernatants and infection of human AML cells were performed as described previously (Scholl et al., 2007).  
1665||Mutations in the juxtamembrane and kinase domains of FLT3 are common in AML, but it is not known whether alterations outside these regions contribute to leukemogenesis. We used a high-throughput platform to interrogate the entire FLT3 coding sequence in AML patients without known FLT3 mutations and experimentally tested the consequences of each candidate leukemogenic allele. This approach identified gain-of-function mutations that activated downstream signaling and conferred sensitivity to FLT3 inhibition and alleles that were not associated with kinase activation, including mutations in the catalytic domain. These findings support the concept that acquired mutations in cancer may not contribute to malignant transformation and underscore the importance of functional studies to distinguish “driver” mutations underlying tumorigenesis from biologically neutral “passenger” alterations.  Author Keywords CELLCYCLE SIGNIFICANCE High-throughput DNA sequencing has provided insights into the mutational profiles of human cancers and represents a promising strategy for the identification of therapeutic targets. However, recognizing the subset of functionally relevant mutations has proven difficult. We used a combined genetic and functional approach to evaluate a series of candidate mutations in the receptor tyrosine kinase FLT3 that were identified in patients with AML. This strategy enabled distinction between activating alleles that conferred sensitivity to a small-molecule inhibitor and bystander mutations that did not result in kinase activation. Remarkably, these latter alterations included mutations in key functional domains of FLT3. These results emphasize that complementary functional studies are critical for validation of suspected oncogenic alleles from large-scale genomic screens.  Introduction The receptor tyrosine kinase (TK) FLT3 and its cognate ligand are important for the expansion of early hematopoietic progenitor cells and for the generation of mature natural killer cells and dendritic cells. Binding of FLT3 ligand to the extracellular (EC) domain of FLT3 induces receptor dimerization, which promotes phosphorylation of the FLT3 kinase domain, thereby activating the receptor and several downstream signaling pathways, primarily the PI3K/AKT pathway and the RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK cascade (Parcells et al., 2006).  In patients with acute myeloid leukemia (AML), somatic mutations that result in constitutive activation of FLT3 have been identified in two functional domains of the receptor, the juxtamembrane (JM) domain and the kinase domain. The JM domain, which has been shown to be critical for kinase autoinhibition (Griffith et al., 2004), is disrupted by internal tandem duplications (ITDs) in 25%–30% of adult AML patients (Stirewalt and Radich, 2003), whereas JM domain point mutations have been described in approximately 1% of cases (Reindl et al., 2006 ;  Stirewalt et al., 2004). FLT3 ITDs induce constitutive phosphorylation of several signal transduction intermediates, including STAT5, AKT, and ERK1/2 (Parcells et al., 2006) and cause myeloproliferative disease in various murine models (Kelly et al., 2002 ;  Lee et al., 2005). JM domain point mutations also result in constitutive activation of STAT5 and AKT (Reindl et al., 2006), but their in vivo transforming potential has not been studied.  The activation loop (AL) in the carboxy-terminal lobe of the kinase domain is affected by point mutations, insertions, or deletions in approximately 7% of AML cases (Frohling et al., 2005). AL mutations share several signal transduction properties with FLT3 ITDs, for example, constitutive phosphorylation of AKT and ERK1/2 (Choudhary et al., 2005 ;  Spiekermann et al., 2003). However, substantial differences between the two mutation types in the activation of STAT5 have been observed in some studies (Choudhary et al., 2005; Grundler et al., 2005 ;  Rocnik et al., 2006), but not in others (Bagrintseva et al., 2004; Grundler et al., 2003 ;  Spiekermann et al., 2003), and mice transplanted with BM expressing FLT3 AL mutations do not develop myeloid disease but rather, a T cell lymphoproliferative disorder with longer latency (Grundler et al., 2005). A mutation in the amino-terminal lobe of the kinase domain was found to induce constitutive activation of AKT, ERK1/2, and STAT5 (Schittenhelm et al., 2006).  From a clinical perspective, FLT3 mutations are important as a result of their prognostic relevance and because constitutively activated FLT3 is an attractive therapeutic target. FLT3 ITDs are associated with an increased risk of relapse and short survival (Yanada et al., 2005), and patients with low or absent levels of wild-type (WT) FLT3 appear to have a particularly dismal outcome (Thiede et al., 2002 ;  Whitman et al., 2001). In contrast, the prognostic relevance of FLT3 AL mutations remains controversial despite several studies on large patient series (Yanada et al., 2005). Currently, there are four selective FLT3 inhibitors at various stages of clinical development, including PKC412 (midostaurin), CEP-701 (lestaurtinib), MLN518 (tandutinib), and SU11248 (sunitinib) (Knapper, 2007). These compounds are well tolerated at doses that achieve inhibition of FLT3 and have shown moderate activity in relapsed or refractory AML patients with activating FLT3 mutations. In addition, some patients without FLT3 ITDs or known AL mutations have responded to FLT3 inhibitors, suggesting the possibility of other mutations that result in constitutive activation of FLT3. Ongoing clinical trials are evaluating the use of FLT3 inhibitors in combination with chemotherapy.  Previous studies have focused on the detection of mutations in the JM and kinase domains of FLT3, whereas the frequency and spectrum of sequence alterations outside these regions have not been systematically studied. We therefore performed high-throughput DNA sequencing of all coding exons of FLT3 in AML patients without FLT3 ITDs or known AL mutations. The primary aim of such a genomic screen is to identify “driver” mutations that are causally implicated in cancer development. However, recent large-scale sequencing studies in solid tumors that used statistical approaches to evaluate the impact of DNA sequence variants have demonstrated the difficulties in distinguishing driver mutations from “passenger” alterations that confer no clonal growth advantage ( Forrest and Cavet, 2007; Getz et al., 2007; Greenman et al., 2007; Rubin and Green, 2007; Sjoblom et al., 2006 ;  Wood et al., 2007). To address this problem, we experimentally tested the consequences of each candidate oncogenic allele identified in our mutation screen. This combined genetic and functional approach successfully identified gain-of-function mutations in the EC domain, the JM domain, and the AL of FLT3 and several passenger alterations that did not result in constitutive kinase activity. Furthermore, we investigated the structural implications, signal transduction properties, and sensitivity to FLT3 inhibition of the activating alleles.  Results High-Throughput DNA Sequence Analysis of FLT3  We performed bidirectional sequencing of all FLT3 coding exons in pretreatment samples from 222 adult AML patients without known activating mutations of FLT3, KIT, and NRAS. Sequence data were evaluated for quality and coverage within the region of interest of each exon that included all coding bases and the five flanking intronic bases at the 5′ and 3′ ends. High-quality, bidirectional sequence reads were obtained for more than 90% of all samples analyzed (see Table S1 in the Supplemental Data available with this article online).  FLT3 Sequence Variants in Patients with AML  We identified a total of 17 heterozygous nucleotide changes. Five of these changes corresponded to germline variants listed in single-nucleotide polymorphism (SNP) databases. Of the remaining 12 sequence alterations, 9 were predicted to change the amino acid sequence of FLT3 (nonsynonymous substitutions; Table 1 and Figure S1), whereas 3 were annotated as synonymous substitutions, resulting in a ratio of nonsynonymous to synonymous mutations of 3.  Table 1. Nonsynonymous Sequence Variants Identified by High-Throughput Sequencing of FLT3 in 222 AML Patients DNA	Exon	Protein	Domain 581A > G	5	T167A	extracellular 662G > A	5	V194M	extracellular 1052G > A	8	D324N	extracellular 1172T > C	9	Y364H	extracellular 1434C > T	11	S451F	extracellular 1751G > A	13	V557I	transmembrane 1797A > G	14	Y572C	juxtamembrane 1857T > G	14	V592G	juxtamembrane 2293G > C	18	M737I	kinase 2574G > A	20	G831E	activation loop 2583G > A	20	R834Q	activation loop Sequence numbering is according to Ensembl Transcript/Peptide ID ENST00000241453. D324N (refSNP ID rs35602083) and V557I (refSNP ID rs35958982) are known germline polymorphisms. Different mutations involving amino acids V592 and R834 (V592A, R834_D835 del, R834_D835insALG) are reported in the COSMIC database (version 30; http://www.sanger.ac.uk/genetics/CGP/cosmic/).  Table options The nine nonsynonymous sequence variants that were not known SNPs have not been observed in 48 normal control samples in which the entire coding region of FLT3 had previously been sequenced ( Ley et al., 2003) and were not among the germline variants identified in a mutation screen of all protein kinase genes in 210 human cancers (Greenman et al., 2007). These alterations were, therefore, considered to be candidate leukemogenic mutations that warrant experimental validation. Paired diagnostic and remission material was available from a patient with an M737I substitution in the FLT3 kinase domain. This variant was present at diagnosis but not in the remission sample, demonstrating that it was somatically acquired (Figure S1). The three synonymous sequence variants that were not known SNPs were considered to be nonfunctional and were, therefore, not further investigated.  FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q Are Gain-of-Function Mutations that Induce Constitutive Kinase Activation  To determine the functional consequences of all nine candidate mutations, we tested their ability to transform murine hematopoietic BaF3 cells to cytokine-independent growth, a property conferred by a broad spectrum of oncogenic TK alleles. Cells expressing S451F in the EC domain, Y572C or V592G in the JM domain, and R834Q in the AL were able to grow in the absence of interleukin-3 (IL-3; Figure 1A). Immunoprecipitation of FLT3 followed by western blotting with a phosphotyrosine-specific antibody demonstrated that these mutant kinases induced constitutive phosphorylation of FLT3 (Figure 1B). These results indicate that the S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q alleles are gain-of-function mutations that result in constitutive kinase activation. To perform a rapid and inexpensive secondary screen for these mutations, we designed allele-specific primer extension assays and performed genotype determination in an independent cohort of 127 adult AML cases. This analysis identified one additional case positive for the S451F substitution and one additional case with the R834Q allele. Thus, the overall prevalence of activating FLT3 mutations in this study was 1.7% (6 of 349 cases).  Constitutive Kinase Activation by FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q(A) ... Figure 1.  Constitutive Kinase Activation by FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q (A) Expression of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q resulted in IL-3-independent growth of BaF3 cells. Cells expressing the known AL mutation D835Y were used as positive control. Cells expressing WT FLT3 were used as negative control. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (B) Expression of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q in BaF3 cells resulted in constitutive FLT3 autophosphorylation. Cells were maintained in IL-3-free medium for 6 hr, FLT3 was immunoprecipitated from whole-cell lysates, and immunoprecipitates were analyzed by western blotting with an anti-phosphotyrosine antibody. Cells expressing a FLT3 ITD mutation (W51) or FLT3 D835Y were used as positive controls. Cells expressing WT FLT3 or the nontransforming G831E allele were used as negative controls. (C) Expression of FLT3 T167A, V194M, Y364H, M737I, and G831E did not result in IL-3-independent growth of BaF3 cells. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. Figure options Cells expressing any of the remaining five nonsynonymous sequence variants in the EC domain, the kinase domain, and the AL underwent apoptosis when cultured in the absence of exogenous cytokines, and constitutive phosphorylation of FLT3 was not observed (Figures 1B and 1C). These results indicate that a substantial proportion of the nonsynonymous sequence variants detected in FLT3 are likely to be passenger mutations. To increase confidence that the four presumed passenger mutations for which no matched normal DNA sample was available (T167A, V194M, Y364H, and G831E) did not represent germline polymorphisms or sequence artifacts, the following steps were taken. First, we sequenced the corresponding exons of FLT3 in 102 normal DNA samples and detected no abnormalities. Second, we determined by mass spectrometry genotyping that the G831E allele in the FLT3 AL was not present in the panel of 270 normal individuals collected by the International HapMap Consortium (2003). Third, we introduced PCR-amplified genomic DNA from each case into a cloning vector and sequenced between 50 and 55 individual transformants. In two cases (T167A and G831E), the observed mutant-to-wild-type allelic ratio was substantially different from 1 (0.19 and 3.2, respectively), suggesting that these alleles did not represent heterozygous SNPs. In the remaining two cases (V194M and Y364H), the number of recombinant clones carrying the mutant allele was similar to that of clones harboring the WT sequence (24 versus 27 and 31 versus 21, respectively), a finding compatible with either a somatic mutation that was present in most of the cells from which the original DNA sample was derived or with a heterozygous germline variant.  For comparison with our functional analyses, we also predicted the effects of all nine candidate mutations in silico using the SIFT (http://blocks.fhcrc.org/sift/SIFT.html) and PMut (http://mmb2.pcb.ub.es:8080/PMut) software programs (Table S2). Three sequence variants (S451F, G831E, and R834Q) were predicted to affect the function of FLT3, whereas four changes (T167A, V194M, Y364H, and M737I) were predicted to be tolerated. The remaining two mutations (Y572C and V592G) had conflicting results between the SIFT and PMut algorithms. These findings illustrate that bioinformatics approaches and functional assays provide complementary information as to the potential impact of mutations identified in large-scale genomic screens.  Ortholog alignments for all nonsynonymous sequence variants identified in this study, as well as relevant sequence alignments of all five class III receptor TKs (PDGFRA, PDGFRB, KIT, CSF1R, and FLT3) and other TKs with a known role in cancer (EGFR, ERBB2, RET, MET, and ABL1), are shown in Figure S2. Clinical characteristics of the patients with activating FLT3 mutations are given in Tables S3 and S4.  FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q Differentially Activate Downstream Signaling Pathways  To examine the signal transduction properties of the four activating mutations, BaF3 cells expressing FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, or R834Q were deprived of IL-3 and then analyzed by western blotting for phosphorylation of signaling proteins (Figure 2 and Table 2).  Differential Activation of Signal Transduction Pathways by FLT3 S451F, Y572C, ... Figure 2.  Differential Activation of Signal Transduction Pathways by FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q Expression of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q in BaF3 cells resulted in constitutive phosphorylation of varying signaling proteins. Cells were maintained in IL-3-free medium for 6 hr, and whole-cell lysates or immunoprecipitates from whole-cell lysates were analyzed by western blotting as indicated. The signaling characteristics of the four mutations were compared with those of FLT3 D835Y and the FLT3 ITD mutation W51. Cells expressing WT FLT3 or the nontransforming G831E allele were used as negative controls. Expression of FLT3 in the different stable cell lines was confirmed by reprobing the blot demonstrating constitutive phosphorylation of AKT with an anti-FLT3 antibody. Figure options Table 2. Constitutive Phosphorylation of Signaling Molecules in BaF3 Cells Expressing Activating FLT3 Mutations FLT3 Mutation Signaling molecule	S451F	Y572C	V592G	R834Q	D835Y	W51 FLT3	+	+	+	+	+	+ STAT5	−	+	+	−	−	+ ERK1/2	+	+	+	+	+	+ AKT	−	+	+	−	+	− STAT3	−	+	+	−	+	− S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q were identified in this study; D835Y and W51 are known activating FLT3 mutations that have been described previously. +, constitutive phosphorylation; −, no constitutive phosphorylation.  Table options Expression of the JM domain mutations Y572C and V592G resulted in constitutive phosphorylation of ERK1/2, AKT, STAT3, and STAT5. We recently identified Y589 and Y591 as sites in the JM domain that are necessary for aberrant activation of STAT5 in cells expressing a FLT3 ITD mutation (Rocnik et al., 2006). To investigate whether these residues are also required for signal transduction mediated by JM domain point mutations, we generated Y589/591F double substitutions in the cDNAs encoding FLT3 Y572C and V592G. Coexpression of Y589/591F delayed the induction of IL-3-independent growth in BaF3 cells (Figure S3A), decreased the proliferation rate of BaF3 cells in the absence of IL-3 (Figure S3B), and altered the signaling properties of the two alleles (Figure S3C). The Y589/591F mutations strongly reduced constitutive phosphorylation of ERK1/2, STAT3, and STAT5 and attenuated aberrant activation of AKT. These results, along with our analysis of the FLT3 structure (see below), support the hypothesis that point mutations in the JM domain, like FLT3 ITD mutations, can alter the conformation of the JM domain, potentially resulting in exposure of occult docking sites such as Y589 and Y591, in turn enabling recruitment and activation of specific downstream signaling proteins.  The signaling properties of the R834Q substitution were compared to those of the most frequent AL mutation, D835Y. Consistent with previous reports (Choudhary et al., 2005; Grundler et al., 2005 ;  Rocnik et al., 2006), BaF3 cells expressing D835Y showed constitutive activation of ERK1/2 and AKT, but not STAT5. Furthermore, we found that expression of D835Y was associated with constitutive phosphorylation of STAT3. The R834Q mutation, on the other hand, resulted in phosphorylation of ERK1/2 but not AKT, STAT3, or STAT5. This signaling pattern was associated with increased sensitivity to growth inhibition by the MEK inhibitor PD98059 as compared to cells harboring the D835Y mutation (Figures 3A and 3B), indicating a higher relative contribution of ERK signaling to the transforming activity of the R834Q allele. Similar to R834Q-positive cells, cells expressing the S451F mutation also showed constitutive phosphorylation of ERK1/2, but no induction of AKT, STAT3, or STAT5. These results suggest that activation of the MAPK pathway in the absence of PI3K/AKT, STAT3, or STAT5 signaling is sufficient for transformation of hematopoietic cells by specific FLT3 alleles and that cells carrying different FLT3 mutations are differentially dependent on signaling mechanisms that involve the MEK/ERK cascade.  Varying Sensitivity of Different FLT3 AL Mutations to MEK Inhibition(A) ... Figure 3.  Varying Sensitivity of Different FLT3 AL Mutations to MEK Inhibition (A) Expression of FLT3 R834Q was associated with a higher sensitivity to MEK inhibition as compared to FLT3 D835Y. BaF3 cells stably expressing FLT3 R834Q or D835Y and growing in the absence of IL-3 were treated with PD98059 as indicated. Cell viability was measured after 48 hr, and the proportion of viable cells relative to the control (no inhibitor) was plotted. IC50 values are indicated. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (B) PD98059 treatment of BaF3 cells expressing FLT3 R834Q or D835Y resulted in dose-dependent inhibition of ERK1/2 phosphorylation. Cells were incubated with varying drug concentrations for 15 min, and whole-cell lysates were analyzed by western blotting as indicated. Figure options FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q Confer Varying Sensitivity to the TK Inhibitor PKC412  To determine the sensitivity of the four activating mutations to FLT3 inhibition, BaF3 cells expressing FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, or R834Q were treated with increasing concentrations of the small-molecule TK inhibitor PKC412. FLT3 Y572C, V592G, and R834Q conferred high sensitivity to PKC412 (inhibitory concentration of 50% [IC50], 2.5 nM, 5 nM, and 2.3 nM, respectively), whereas a considerably higher IC50 (48 nM) was observed for FLT3 S451F (Figure 4A). Western blot analysis showed that treatment with PKC412 led to dose-dependent decreases in FLT3 autophosphorylation and in phosphorylation of ERK1/2 that correlated with inhibition of cell growth (Figure 4B). WT FLT3-expressing BaF3 cells grown in the presence of IL-3 were used as a control for toxicity unrelated to FLT3 inhibition, and no antiproliferative effect was observed for concentrations of PKC412 up to 50 nM (Figure 4A). These data show that the four activating FLT3 mutations identified in our mutation screen can be inhibited by PKC412 and that Y572C, V592G, and R834Q are considerably more sensitive to this compound than S451F.  Varying Sensitivity of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q to Kinase Inhibition ... Figure 4.  Varying Sensitivity of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q to Kinase Inhibition by PKC412 (A) Expression of FLT3 Y572C, V592G, or R834Q was associated with higher sensitivity to FLT3 inhibition as compared to FLT3 S451F. BaF3 cells growing in the absence of IL-3 were treated with PKC412 as indicated. Cell viability was measured after 48 hr, and the proportion of viable cells relative to the control (no inhibitor) was plotted. IC50 values are indicated. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (B) PKC412 treatment of BaF3 cells expressing FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q resulted in dose-dependent decreases in FLT3 and ERK1/2 phosphorylation. Cells were incubated with varying drug concentrations for 2 hr, and whole-cell lysates were analyzed by western blotting as indicated. Figure options Mutation of FLT3 V592 Promotes Aberrant Signal Transduction and Proliferation of Human AML Cells  To investigate the role of mutant FLT3 in human AML cells, we analyzed the MONO-MAC-6 cell line that has been reported to contain a V592A substitution in the FLT3 JM domain (Spiekermann et al., 2003). DNA sequence analysis confirmed the presence of a homozygous V592A mutation in this cell line (data not shown). Lentiviral transduction of MONO-MAC-6 cells with two short hairpin RNA (shRNA) constructs targeting different regions of the FLT3 transcript resulted in stable downregulation of FLT3 mRNA (Figure 5B) and reduced levels of FLT3 protein (Figure 5C). Knockdown of FLT3 was associated with a substantial reduction in cell viability as compared to cells transduced with a nontargeting control shRNA (Figure 5A). Western blot analysis showed that suppression of FLT3 resulted in loss of STAT5 phosphorylation (Figure 5C), indicating that STAT5 is a downstream target of mutations involving FLT3 V592, consistent with our signaling studies in BaF3 cells. These results suggest that endogenous point mutations of FLT3 V592 promote the growth and survival of human AML cells and that this effect is mediated through aberrant STAT5 activation.  Effects of FLT3 Knockdown in Human AML Cells(A) Downregulation of FLT3 using ... Figure 5.  Effects of FLT3 Knockdown in Human AML Cells (A) Downregulation of FLT3 using shRNA constructs TRCN 772 and TRCN 773 inhibited the growth of a human AML cell line, MONO-MAC-6, that harbors a homozyogus V592A mutation in the FLT3 JM domain. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (B) Transduction of MONO-MAC-6 cells with shRNA constructs TRCN 772 and TRCN 773 resulted in decreased FLT3 mRNA levels as compared to a nontargeting control construct. Experiments were performed in duplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (C) Suppression of FLT3 mRNA was associated with a reduction in FLT3 protein (upper panels) and with loss of STAT5 phosphorylation (lower panels). Figure options Structural Analysis of FLT3 Mutations  Based on the crystal structure of the intracellular domains of FLT3 (Protein Data Bank accession code 1RJB; Figure 6A), we assessed the potential mechanism by which point mutations in the JM domain and in the AL result in constitutive FLT3 kinase activity. Residues Y572 and R834 seem to be involved in maintaining the energetic favorability of the autoinhibited conformation of FLT3. Loss of the stabilizing effects of these residues should favor the active conformation. Y572, which has thus far not been found mutated in AML, is described as the first amino-terminal residue visible in the electron density of the crystal structure (Griffith et al., 2004). It is a key “hook” for the JM domain and is critical to maintain the autoinhibited conformation of FLT3 (Figure 6B). The Y572C substitution is expected to result in a substantial loss of hydrogen bonding networks and extensive hydrophobic interactions, with a consequent reduction in the energetic favorability of this conformation. Likewise, loss of hydrogen bonding networks that would result from the R834Q and D835Y mutations is expected to destabilize the autoinhibited kinase conformation (Figures 6C and 6D).  Structural Analysis of FLT3 Mutations(A) Ribbon representation of the crystal ... Figure 6.  Structural Analysis of FLT3 Mutations (A) Ribbon representation of the crystal structure of the FLT3 kinase domain (Protein Data Bank, accession code 1RJB). The structure is a typical kinase fold crystallized in the autoinhibited conformation with the JM domain packing closely to the kinase domain and locking the protein in this conformation. (B) Hydrogen bonding network formed by FLT3 Y572. Y572 inserts into the catalytic cleft of FLT3, where the phenolic hydroxyl oxygen forms hydrogen bonds to the catalytic glutamic acid, E661, and an ordered water molecule. The aromatic ring also makes extensive hydrophobic contacts. The Y572C mutation will disrupt this “hook” that locks the JM domain in the autoinhibited conformation. (C) Hydrogen bonding network formed by FLT3 R834. R834 is critical to the formation of a hydrogen bonding network that incorporates interactions with the side chains of residues N816, R815, Y842, D811, the backbone carbonyl oxygen of R815, and two water molecules. This network is directly adjacent to a hydrogen bonding network in which N841 plays a critical role. (D) Hydrogen bonding network formed by FLT3 D835. D835 is an integral part of a hydrogen bonding network that seems to stabilize the AL backbone in the autoinhibited conformation. There is a hydrogen bond directly between the carboxyl group and the backbone amide of residue S836. There is also an indirect hydrogen bond between the caryboxyl group and the backbone amide of M837 mediated by a water molecule. (E) Surface representation of the region proximal to G831. The molecular surface of FLT3 protein atoms is shown as a transparent gray surface. The surface is colored green where it contacts G831, and water molecules are shown as red spheres. The G831E mutation may not disrupt this conformation due to the proximity of a water-filled cavity adjacent to G831. In this figure, amino acid residues are shown in stick representation with nitrogen atoms in blue, oxygen in red, and carbon atoms the same color as the corresponding domain. Water molecules are shown as red spheres and hydrogen bonds as dashed red lines with their lengths labeled in Å. This figure was made using the program PyMOL (www.pymol.org). Figure options Conversely, structural analysis suggests that the nontransforming G831E substitution may not deleteriously affect the stability of the autoinhibited conformation. The molecular surface of autoinhibited FLT3 shows that there is a cavity directly adjacent to G831. This cavity is filled with water molecules and falls between the autoinhibited-conformation AL and JM domain (Figure 6E). Even though mutation of this glycine residue to glutamic acid is a substantial change, the glutamic acid residue should be able to be accommodated in the autoinhibited conformation by displacement of a number of water molecules. G831 lies within the invariant protein kinase DFG motif required for correct Mg2+•ATP coordination (Karlsson et al., 1993) and is important for conformational movements of the DFG motif between active and inactive states (Levinson et al., 2006). Consequently, the G831E mutation may stabilize FLT3 in the autoinhibited conformation and result in reduced kinase activity, consistent with our data showing a lack of FLT3 autophosphorylation in cells expressing FLT3 G831E.  Discussion We have used high-throughput DNA sequence analysis to determine the frequency and spectrum of mutations in the FLT3 gene in adult AML patients without known FLT3 ITDs or AL mutations. Sequencing of all FLT3 coding exons identified nine candidate leukemogenic alleles in six exons corresponding to different domains of the FLT3 receptor.  Large-scale mutational profiling studies in cancer typically result in extensive lists of validated nonsynonymous sequence variants. A major challenge of these studies is to distinguish driver mutations that are responsible for malignant transformation from nonfunctional passenger alterations that arise in the malignant clone by chance and accumulate during repeated rounds of cell division. To identify genetic changes with a role in tumorigenesis, statistical models have been developed that incorporate mutational frequency and distribution, and it has been inferred from such approaches that nonsynonymous passenger mutations are present at a higher frequency than previously anticipated (Greenman et al., 2007; Sjoblom et al., 2006 ;  Wood et al., 2007). We provide functional documentation of this concept by using a different strategy that combined both high-throughput DNA sequence analysis of FLT3 in primary AML samples with experimental validation of all potential driver mutations identified. Cytokine independence assays and biochemical analysis revealed that of the 9 candidate leukemogenic alleles, 4 are gain-of-function mutations that result in constitutive kinase activation and stimulation of downstream signaling pathways, properties that are relevant to leukemogenesis and can be exploited therapeutically, whereas the remaining 5 alleles were not associated with increased kinase activity and aberrant signal transduction.  These results also indicate that functional analyses can provide information beyond that derived from statistical methods for identifying driver mutations. First, we show that rare sequence variants occurring at frequencies that would not allow them to be distinguished from unselected passenger changes can be drivers. Second, we report that alleles in the kinase domain and in the AL—highly conserved and functionally relevant domains that, based on mathematical approaches, are likely to harbor driver mutations—may not be associated with a detectable gain of function. Third, statistical techniques result in identification of candidate cancer genes, but do not predict the ability of individual alleles to contribute to transformation. Our analysis of a series of nonsynonymous sequence variants in FLT3, a validated cancer gene ( Futreal et al., 2004), indicates that functional studies are needed to complement the bioinformatic approaches that have been described to date.  In addition to mutational frequency and distribution, statistical methods for assessing the functional relevance of DNA sequence variants in cancer rely on discerning acquired mutations from inherited polymorphisms. While the analysis of germline DNA is essential to assess the origin of cancer-associated genomic alterations and to determine whether a mutation has been selected for during tumorigenesis, previous findings in solid tumors indicate that the presence of a kinase mutation in constitutional DNA does not exclude the possibility that it has a potential role in malignant transformation (Bell et al., 2005; Jeffers et al., 1997; Mulloy et al., 2007 ;  Plaza-Menacho et al., 2006). These data further support the conclusion that the interpretation of high-throughput sequencing studies can be improved through functional assessment of candidate oncogenic alleles.  The four activating mutations that were identified in our screen are located in the EC domain (S451F), the JM domain (Y572C and V592G), and the AL (R834Q) of FLT3. Sequence variants in the EC region (D324N and N520Y) have been described previously in patients with AML (Ley et al., 2003 ;  Syampurnawati et al., 2007). However, D324N is also present in normal individuals and in nonhematopoietic tissues from AML patients and does not confer cytokine-independent growth to BaF3 cells (Schnittger et al., 2006), whereas the functional consequences of N520Y have not been assessed. Our results thus document that FLT3, like EGFR and KIT (Gari et al., 1999 ;  Lee et al., 2006), can be activated by mutations in the EC domain. To determine the mechanism by which the S451F mutation results in constitutive FLT3 kinase activity, structural analysis of a larger FLT3 molecule that includes the EC domain will be required.  Point mutations in the region between amino acids 579 and 594 in the FLT3 JM domain have been detected in a small proportion of AML cases (Reindl et al., 2006 ;  Stirewalt et al., 2004). We have found a valine to glycine substitution involving residue 592 and a mutation involving Y572. Y572 is the first amino acid of the JM domain, and analysis of the crystal structure of the FLT3 cytoplasmic domain has suggested a key role for this residue in kinase autoinhibition (Griffith et al., 2004). Our structural analysis suggests that mutation of Y572 would result in disruption of its extensive interactions with the surrounding FLT3 subdomains and consequent destabilization of the inactive kinase conformation. In support of this hypothesis, the Y572C substitution that was identified in our mutation screen results in constitutive FLT3 kinase activity. These data provide genetic evidence for the importance of Y572 in maintaining the autoinhibited conformation of FLT3 and suggest that any mutation that interferes with the stability of the JM domain in this conformation is likely to be transforming.  The signaling properties of the two JM domain point mutations are similar to those of FLT3 ITDs (Parcells et al., 2006). In particular, aberrant activation of STAT5 by JM domain point mutations appears to involve two tyrosine residues, Y589 and Y591, that are essential for FLT3 ITD-mediated induction of STAT5 and leukemic transformation in vivo (Rocnik et al., 2006). Analysis of the role of Y589 and Y591 also provided insights into the deregulation of other signaling pathways by mutant FLT3. For example, the majority of primary AML samples are characterized by activated MAPK and PI3K/AKT signaling; however, the fact that dysregulation of various upstream effectors can result in aberrant phosphorylation of ERK1/2 and AKT indicates that the MAPK and PI3K/AKT cascades may be activated through a variety of different mechanisms (Martelli et al., 2006 ;  Platanias, 2003). In support of the hypothesis that mutant TKs activate downstream signaling pathways by distinct mechanisms, phosphorylation of ERK1/2 and AKT by FLT3 JM domain point mutations also requires Y589 and Y591, and similar observations were made for constitutive activation of STAT3. These results suggest that the different types of JM domain mutations (ITDs and point mutations) contribute in similar ways to myeloid leukemogenesis and demonstrate that Y589 and Y591 are critical for the induction of several signaling pathways that are activated in leukemias with FLT3 JM domain mutations. Furthermore, these findings illustrate the potential of point mutations to alter the substrate specificity of protein kinases. Whether FLT3 Y589/591-mediated signal transduction in AML involves direct engagement of downstream effectors by these residues or requires additional adaptor molecules is currently unknown.  Previously described mutations in the FLT3 AL include substitutions, insertions, or deletions within a region between amino acids 834 and 842, with D835 being the most commonly affected residue (Frohling et al., 2005). We identified nonsynonymous substitutions at codons 831 and 834. Analysis of the crystal structure of the FLT3 kinase domain suggests that mutation of residue R834 would interfere with the stability of the autoinhibited conformation, and in agreement with this hypothesis, FLT3 R834Q has constitutive kinase activity and confers IL-3-independent growth to BaF3 cells. In contrast, mutation of the conserved DFG motif G831 to glutamic acid may deleteriously affect the structural requirements for enzymatic activity, is expected to be compatible with the autoinhibited conformation, and does not result in transformation of hematopoietic cells. These results illustrate the value of structural analysis for understanding the atomic-level mechanisms by which TK mutations associated with human leukemias function. In addition, these data indicate that the autoinhibited conformation of FLT3 is critically dependent on the stabilizing contacts of a limited number of specific amino acids, whereas mutation of other residues within the AL does not alter the structure and function of the FLT3 kinase.  Analysis of the signaling properties of FLT3 R834Q demonstrated that this mutation, unlike the more common D835Y allele, results in activation of ERK1/2, but not AKT, STAT3, or STAT5. Consistent with this observation, the R834Q mutation is associated with enhanced sensitivity to MEK inhibition, indicating that cells expressing R834Q are more reliant on MAPK signaling than are D835Y-expressing cells that constitutively phosphorylate multiple signaling proteins. These results suggest that there are not only differences in signal transduction between various FLT3 mutation classes, for example, ITDs and AL mutations (Choudhary et al., 2005 ;  Grundler et al., 2005), but also between distinct alleles within a given mutation class and that cells carrying different FLT3 mutations are differentially dependent on certain signaling pathways.  To determine the functional consequences of candidate mutations, we used an in vitro assay that is based on exogenous expression of mutated alleles in murine hematopoietic cells. This assay has proved to be of value for the assessment of increased TK activity and perturbed signal transduction and has been validated for numerous TK alleles identified in human hematologic malignancies, including FLT3 ITDs and AL mutations (Clark et al., 2004 ;  Weisberg et al., 2002), as well as for TK alleles associated with solid tumors, such as mutations in the EGFR kinase domain and the recently discovered EML4-ALK fusion in patients with non-small-cell lung cancer (Jiang et al., 2005 ;  Soda et al., 2007). On the other hand, conversion of BaF3 cells to cytokine independence may not faithfully assess the functional implications of certain mutations, either because they require expression of additional proteins (Lu et al., 2005) or because cooperativity between two or more mutations is required for signaling pathway activation. Lastly, this assay may fail to detect a gain of function conferred by kinase mutations that do not result in increased enzymatic activity. For instance, Wan et al. (2004) described three mutants of the serine-threonine kinase BRAF with impaired catalytic activity that are capable of stimulating downstream signaling through transactivation of CRAF. Although we observed no activation of ERK1/2, AKT, STAT3, or STAT5 in cells expressing FLT3 mutations that read out as nonfunctional in the BaF3 assay, it is possible that some of these alleles stimulate other effector molecules that were not analyzed in our study. We recognize that it is impossible to definitively exclude any conceivable function of a given mutation. Nonetheless, the nontransforming mutations identified in our screen do not meet conventional criteria for effects on kinase activation.  The activating mutations identified in our study conferred varying degrees of sensitivity to the small-molecule TK inhibitor PKC412. Cells expressing Y572C, V592G, or R834Q were highly sensitive to this compound, as has been reported for other JM domain (Reindl et al., 2006) and AL mutations (Choudhary et al., 2005; Grundler et al., 2003 ;  Weisberg et al., 2002). In contrast, cytotoxic responses in S451F-expressing cells required substantially higher drug concentrations. The determinants of response to pharmacologic inhibition of FLT3 are diverse and remain only partly understood. In general, the presence of mutant FLT3 is associated with increased drug sensitivity (DeAngelo et al., 2006 ;  Fiedler et al., 2005), yet there appears to be substantial variation among the different mutation types (Choudhary et al., 2005; Grundler et al., 2003 ;  Weisberg et al., 2002) as well as between individual alleles within the same mutation class (Clark et al., 2004 ;  Grundler et al., 2003). In addition, it has been observed that patients without FLT3 ITDs or any of the known AL mutations may also derive benefit from FLT3 inhibitor therapy, which might be related to the presence of previously unrecognized mutations (Schittenhelm et al., 2006), and in vitro studies in primary AML samples have shown that there is substantial interpatient variation in the degree of dependency on FLT3 signaling (Knapper et al., 2006). Our findings further illustrate the complex relationship between FLT3 mutation status and response to pharmacologic FLT3 inhibition.  In summary, our results demonstrate that previously unrecognized activating FLT3 mutations in the EC domain, the JM domain, and the AL occur in patients with AML, albeit at a low frequency. Since mutations lying outside the usually studied mutational hotspots may confer sensitivity to small-molecule TK inhibitors, eligibility for clinical trials of FLT3-targeted therapies should not be based on diagnostic screens that are limited to the detection of only a fraction of the FLT3 mutations associated with AML. The development of sensitive, allele-specific assays, such as mass spectrometry-based genotyping (Thomas et al., 2007), will allow all patients enrolled on trials of FLT3 inhibitors to be genotyped for all known FLT3 alleles, and it is hoped that similar strategies will be used in trials of molecularly targeted therapies for patients with different hematopoietic malignancies and solid tumors.  FLT3 is a highly annotated and well-studied cancer gene known to play a key role in myeloid leukemogenesis. The finding that only a fraction of the nonsynonymous FLT3 mutations associated with AML result in constitutive kinase activity illustrates the challenge in distinguishing between sequence variants that contribute to malignant transformation and nonfunctional passenger mutations. Given that the increasing throughput of DNA sequencing technologies will allow improved characterization of somatic cancer genomes, these data demonstrate that a combination of genetic and functional approaches will be crucial in order to identify the mutations that truly drive the development of cancer and to validate the potential of suspected oncogenic alleles as therapeutic targets.  Experimental Procedures Patient Samples  This study included 349 adult patients with AML, de novo or secondary after treatment for a primary malignancy or following myelodysplasia, as defined by French-American-British Cooperative Group criteria or the World Health Organization classification (Bennett et al., 1985 ;  Harris et al., 1999). Diagnostic BM and peripheral blood samples were collected after obtaining informed consent according to the Declaration of Helsinki and with institutional review board approval of the relevant institutions. All samples were enriched for mononuclear cells by density centrifugation before banking. Only samples with more than 50% blasts were included for DNA sequence analysis, and more than 80% of the samples had at least 80% blasts. All specimens that were analyzed by DNA sequencing were negative for FLT3 ITDs, as assessed by PCR amplification of exons 14 and 15; for FLT3 AL mutations involving codons 835 and 836, as assessed by PCR amplification of exon 20 followed by EcoRV digestion; for activating KIT mutations, as assessed by sequencing of exons 8 and 17; and for mutations involving NRAS codons 12, 13, and 61, as assessed by sequencing of exons 1 and 2.  FLT3 Mutational Analysis and Selection of Candidate Mutations  Extraction of genomic DNA, amplification of FLT3 exons, bidirectional sequencing, and sequence detection were performed using a high-throughput resequencing approach as previously described ( Levine et al., 2005). External gene-specific primers and internal M13-appended primers are listed in Table S5. Analysis of sequence traces was performed using Mutation Surveyor version 2.28 (SoftGenetics, State College, PA). Five steps were used to identify mutations of interest. First, any synonymous substitutions were not analyzed further. Second, known SNPs were excluded by comparison to the dbSNP database (release 127; http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/projects/SNP). Third, published data sets ( Greenman et al., 2007 ;  Ley et al., 2003) were queried to exclude any nonsynonymous substitutions in the FLT3 coding sequence that have been detected in DNA samples derived from normal tissues. Fourth, sequence chromatograms were visually inspected to remove false positive calls in the automated analysis. Fifth, candidate mutations were reamplified and sequenced from the original DNA sample for independent verification. Leukemic cells at diagnosis and a matched remission sample were analyzed in one case with a presumptive leukemogenic mutation in the FLT3 kinase domain, M737I.  Genotyping  Mass spectrometry genotyping was performed as previously described (Levine et al., 2005). Primers and primer extension probes for detection of the different FLT3 alleles are listed in Table S6.  DNA Constructs and Retrovirus Production  Sequence variants were introduced into the full-length FLT3 cDNA using the QuikChange XL Site-Directed Mutagenesis Kit (Stratagene, La Jolla, CA). All mutations were confirmed by sequencing of the entire FLT3 open reading frame. The mutant cDNAs were cloned into the MSCV-PGK-neo retroviral vector, and full-length protein expression was documented by western blotting. Generation of retroviral supernatants and infection of BaF3 cells were performed as described previously ( Rocnik et al., 2006). BaF3 cells transduced with MSCV-PGK-neo constructs were selected with G418 in the presence of IL-3 for 14 days.  Cell Culture  BaF3 cells were maintained in RPMI-1640 supplemented with 10% fetal calf serum and 10% WEHI-conditioned medium as a source of IL-3. For cytokine independence assays, cells transduced with each of the MSCV-PGK-neo retroviral contructs were seeded at a density of 0.33 × 106/ml in IL-3-free medium, and the number of viable cells was determined daily by trypan blue exclusion. For growth inhibition assays, cells were seeded at a density of 1 × 105/ml in IL-3-free medium with various concentrations of PKC412 (Novartis, Basel, Switzerland) or PD98059 (Calbiochem, San Diego, CA), and the number of viable cells was determined after 48 hr using the CellTiter 96AQueous One Solution Proliferation Assay (Promega, Madison, WI).  Immunoprecipitation and Western Blotting  Immunoprecipitation and western blotting were performed as described previously (Rocnik et al., 2006) using the following antibodies: anti-FLT3, anti-STAT5, anti-phospho-ERK1/2 (T202/Y204) (Santa Cruz Biotechnology, Santa Cruz, CA); anti-STAT3, anti-phospho-STAT3 (Y705), anti-phospho-STAT5 (Y694), anti-ERK1/2, anti-AKT, anti-phospho-AKT (S473) (Cell Signaling Technology, Beverly, MA); and anti-phosphotyrosine (4G10) (Upstate, Lake Placid, NY).  Knockdown of FLT3 Expression  Two pLKO.1-based lentiviral vectors encoding shRNAs targeted to the 3′ untranslated region (TRCN 772) or the coding sequence (TRCN 773) of the human FLT3 mRNA, and a pLKO.1 construct containing a nontargeting shRNA sequence were obtained from the MISSION TRC-Hs 1.0 (Human) shRNA library ( Root et al., 2006). The oligonucleotide sequences of the shRNAs were as follows (21-nucleotide stem sequences matching the target transcript underlined; noncomplementary 6-nucleotide loop sequences italicized): TRCN 772, 5′-CCG GCG TCT GCG TTT ACT CTT GTT TCT CGA GAA ACA AGA GTA AAC GCA GAC GTT TTT-3′; TRCN 773, 5′-CCG GGC TAA CTT CTA CAA ACT GAT TCT CGA GAA TCA GTT TGT AGA AGT TAG CTT TTT-3′. Generation of lentiviral supernatants and infection of human AML cells were performed as described previously (Scholl et al., 2007).  
1666||Mutations in the juxtamembrane and kinase domains of FLT3 are common in AML, but it is not known whether alterations outside these regions contribute to leukemogenesis. We used a high-throughput platform to interrogate the entire FLT3 coding sequence in AML patients without known FLT3 mutations and experimentally tested the consequences of each candidate leukemogenic allele. This approach identified gain-of-function mutations that activated downstream signaling and conferred sensitivity to FLT3 inhibition and alleles that were not associated with kinase activation, including mutations in the catalytic domain. These findings support the concept that acquired mutations in cancer may not contribute to malignant transformation and underscore the importance of functional studies to distinguish “driver” mutations underlying tumorigenesis from biologically neutral “passenger” alterations.  Author Keywords CELLCYCLE SIGNIFICANCE High-throughput DNA sequencing has provided insights into the mutational profiles of human cancers and represents a promising strategy for the identification of therapeutic targets. However, recognizing the subset of functionally relevant mutations has proven difficult. We used a combined genetic and functional approach to evaluate a series of candidate mutations in the receptor tyrosine kinase FLT3 that were identified in patients with AML. This strategy enabled distinction between activating alleles that conferred sensitivity to a small-molecule inhibitor and bystander mutations that did not result in kinase activation. Remarkably, these latter alterations included mutations in key functional domains of FLT3. These results emphasize that complementary functional studies are critical for validation of suspected oncogenic alleles from large-scale genomic screens.  Introduction The receptor tyrosine kinase (TK) FLT3 and its cognate ligand are important for the expansion of early hematopoietic progenitor cells and for the generation of mature natural killer cells and dendritic cells. Binding of FLT3 ligand to the extracellular (EC) domain of FLT3 induces receptor dimerization, which promotes phosphorylation of the FLT3 kinase domain, thereby activating the receptor and several downstream signaling pathways, primarily the PI3K/AKT pathway and the RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK cascade (Parcells et al., 2006).  In patients with acute myeloid leukemia (AML), somatic mutations that result in constitutive activation of FLT3 have been identified in two functional domains of the receptor, the juxtamembrane (JM) domain and the kinase domain. The JM domain, which has been shown to be critical for kinase autoinhibition (Griffith et al., 2004), is disrupted by internal tandem duplications (ITDs) in 25%–30% of adult AML patients (Stirewalt and Radich, 2003), whereas JM domain point mutations have been described in approximately 1% of cases (Reindl et al., 2006 ;  Stirewalt et al., 2004). FLT3 ITDs induce constitutive phosphorylation of several signal transduction intermediates, including STAT5, AKT, and ERK1/2 (Parcells et al., 2006) and cause myeloproliferative disease in various murine models (Kelly et al., 2002 ;  Lee et al., 2005). JM domain point mutations also result in constitutive activation of STAT5 and AKT (Reindl et al., 2006), but their in vivo transforming potential has not been studied.  The activation loop (AL) in the carboxy-terminal lobe of the kinase domain is affected by point mutations, insertions, or deletions in approximately 7% of AML cases (Frohling et al., 2005). AL mutations share several signal transduction properties with FLT3 ITDs, for example, constitutive phosphorylation of AKT and ERK1/2 (Choudhary et al., 2005 ;  Spiekermann et al., 2003). However, substantial differences between the two mutation types in the activation of STAT5 have been observed in some studies (Choudhary et al., 2005; Grundler et al., 2005 ;  Rocnik et al., 2006), but not in others (Bagrintseva et al., 2004; Grundler et al., 2003 ;  Spiekermann et al., 2003), and mice transplanted with BM expressing FLT3 AL mutations do not develop myeloid disease but rather, a T cell lymphoproliferative disorder with longer latency (Grundler et al., 2005). A mutation in the amino-terminal lobe of the kinase domain was found to induce constitutive activation of AKT, ERK1/2, and STAT5 (Schittenhelm et al., 2006).  From a clinical perspective, FLT3 mutations are important as a result of their prognostic relevance and because constitutively activated FLT3 is an attractive therapeutic target. FLT3 ITDs are associated with an increased risk of relapse and short survival (Yanada et al., 2005), and patients with low or absent levels of wild-type (WT) FLT3 appear to have a particularly dismal outcome (Thiede et al., 2002 ;  Whitman et al., 2001). In contrast, the prognostic relevance of FLT3 AL mutations remains controversial despite several studies on large patient series (Yanada et al., 2005). Currently, there are four selective FLT3 inhibitors at various stages of clinical development, including PKC412 (midostaurin), CEP-701 (lestaurtinib), MLN518 (tandutinib), and SU11248 (sunitinib) (Knapper, 2007). These compounds are well tolerated at doses that achieve inhibition of FLT3 and have shown moderate activity in relapsed or refractory AML patients with activating FLT3 mutations. In addition, some patients without FLT3 ITDs or known AL mutations have responded to FLT3 inhibitors, suggesting the possibility of other mutations that result in constitutive activation of FLT3. Ongoing clinical trials are evaluating the use of FLT3 inhibitors in combination with chemotherapy.  Previous studies have focused on the detection of mutations in the JM and kinase domains of FLT3, whereas the frequency and spectrum of sequence alterations outside these regions have not been systematically studied. We therefore performed high-throughput DNA sequencing of all coding exons of FLT3 in AML patients without FLT3 ITDs or known AL mutations. The primary aim of such a genomic screen is to identify “driver” mutations that are causally implicated in cancer development. However, recent large-scale sequencing studies in solid tumors that used statistical approaches to evaluate the impact of DNA sequence variants have demonstrated the difficulties in distinguishing driver mutations from “passenger” alterations that confer no clonal growth advantage ( Forrest and Cavet, 2007; Getz et al., 2007; Greenman et al., 2007; Rubin and Green, 2007; Sjoblom et al., 2006 ;  Wood et al., 2007). To address this problem, we experimentally tested the consequences of each candidate oncogenic allele identified in our mutation screen. This combined genetic and functional approach successfully identified gain-of-function mutations in the EC domain, the JM domain, and the AL of FLT3 and several passenger alterations that did not result in constitutive kinase activity. Furthermore, we investigated the structural implications, signal transduction properties, and sensitivity to FLT3 inhibition of the activating alleles.  Results High-Throughput DNA Sequence Analysis of FLT3  We performed bidirectional sequencing of all FLT3 coding exons in pretreatment samples from 222 adult AML patients without known activating mutations of FLT3, KIT, and NRAS. Sequence data were evaluated for quality and coverage within the region of interest of each exon that included all coding bases and the five flanking intronic bases at the 5′ and 3′ ends. High-quality, bidirectional sequence reads were obtained for more than 90% of all samples analyzed (see Table S1 in the Supplemental Data available with this article online).  FLT3 Sequence Variants in Patients with AML  We identified a total of 17 heterozygous nucleotide changes. Five of these changes corresponded to germline variants listed in single-nucleotide polymorphism (SNP) databases. Of the remaining 12 sequence alterations, 9 were predicted to change the amino acid sequence of FLT3 (nonsynonymous substitutions; Table 1 and Figure S1), whereas 3 were annotated as synonymous substitutions, resulting in a ratio of nonsynonymous to synonymous mutations of 3.  Table 1. Nonsynonymous Sequence Variants Identified by High-Throughput Sequencing of FLT3 in 222 AML Patients DNA	Exon	Protein	Domain 581A > G	5	T167A	extracellular 662G > A	5	V194M	extracellular 1052G > A	8	D324N	extracellular 1172T > C	9	Y364H	extracellular 1434C > T	11	S451F	extracellular 1751G > A	13	V557I	transmembrane 1797A > G	14	Y572C	juxtamembrane 1857T > G	14	V592G	juxtamembrane 2293G > C	18	M737I	kinase 2574G > A	20	G831E	activation loop 2583G > A	20	R834Q	activation loop Sequence numbering is according to Ensembl Transcript/Peptide ID ENST00000241453. D324N (refSNP ID rs35602083) and V557I (refSNP ID rs35958982) are known germline polymorphisms. Different mutations involving amino acids V592 and R834 (V592A, R834_D835 del, R834_D835insALG) are reported in the COSMIC database (version 30; http://www.sanger.ac.uk/genetics/CGP/cosmic/).  Table options The nine nonsynonymous sequence variants that were not known SNPs have not been observed in 48 normal control samples in which the entire coding region of FLT3 had previously been sequenced ( Ley et al., 2003) and were not among the germline variants identified in a mutation screen of all protein kinase genes in 210 human cancers (Greenman et al., 2007). These alterations were, therefore, considered to be candidate leukemogenic mutations that warrant experimental validation. Paired diagnostic and remission material was available from a patient with an M737I substitution in the FLT3 kinase domain. This variant was present at diagnosis but not in the remission sample, demonstrating that it was somatically acquired (Figure S1). The three synonymous sequence variants that were not known SNPs were considered to be nonfunctional and were, therefore, not further investigated.  FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q Are Gain-of-Function Mutations that Induce Constitutive Kinase Activation  To determine the functional consequences of all nine candidate mutations, we tested their ability to transform murine hematopoietic BaF3 cells to cytokine-independent growth, a property conferred by a broad spectrum of oncogenic TK alleles. Cells expressing S451F in the EC domain, Y572C or V592G in the JM domain, and R834Q in the AL were able to grow in the absence of interleukin-3 (IL-3; Figure 1A). Immunoprecipitation of FLT3 followed by western blotting with a phosphotyrosine-specific antibody demonstrated that these mutant kinases induced constitutive phosphorylation of FLT3 (Figure 1B). These results indicate that the S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q alleles are gain-of-function mutations that result in constitutive kinase activation. To perform a rapid and inexpensive secondary screen for these mutations, we designed allele-specific primer extension assays and performed genotype determination in an independent cohort of 127 adult AML cases. This analysis identified one additional case positive for the S451F substitution and one additional case with the R834Q allele. Thus, the overall prevalence of activating FLT3 mutations in this study was 1.7% (6 of 349 cases).  Constitutive Kinase Activation by FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q(A) ... Figure 1.  Constitutive Kinase Activation by FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q (A) Expression of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q resulted in IL-3-independent growth of BaF3 cells. Cells expressing the known AL mutation D835Y were used as positive control. Cells expressing WT FLT3 were used as negative control. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (B) Expression of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q in BaF3 cells resulted in constitutive FLT3 autophosphorylation. Cells were maintained in IL-3-free medium for 6 hr, FLT3 was immunoprecipitated from whole-cell lysates, and immunoprecipitates were analyzed by western blotting with an anti-phosphotyrosine antibody. Cells expressing a FLT3 ITD mutation (W51) or FLT3 D835Y were used as positive controls. Cells expressing WT FLT3 or the nontransforming G831E allele were used as negative controls. (C) Expression of FLT3 T167A, V194M, Y364H, M737I, and G831E did not result in IL-3-independent growth of BaF3 cells. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. Figure options Cells expressing any of the remaining five nonsynonymous sequence variants in the EC domain, the kinase domain, and the AL underwent apoptosis when cultured in the absence of exogenous cytokines, and constitutive phosphorylation of FLT3 was not observed (Figures 1B and 1C). These results indicate that a substantial proportion of the nonsynonymous sequence variants detected in FLT3 are likely to be passenger mutations. To increase confidence that the four presumed passenger mutations for which no matched normal DNA sample was available (T167A, V194M, Y364H, and G831E) did not represent germline polymorphisms or sequence artifacts, the following steps were taken. First, we sequenced the corresponding exons of FLT3 in 102 normal DNA samples and detected no abnormalities. Second, we determined by mass spectrometry genotyping that the G831E allele in the FLT3 AL was not present in the panel of 270 normal individuals collected by the International HapMap Consortium (2003). Third, we introduced PCR-amplified genomic DNA from each case into a cloning vector and sequenced between 50 and 55 individual transformants. In two cases (T167A and G831E), the observed mutant-to-wild-type allelic ratio was substantially different from 1 (0.19 and 3.2, respectively), suggesting that these alleles did not represent heterozygous SNPs. In the remaining two cases (V194M and Y364H), the number of recombinant clones carrying the mutant allele was similar to that of clones harboring the WT sequence (24 versus 27 and 31 versus 21, respectively), a finding compatible with either a somatic mutation that was present in most of the cells from which the original DNA sample was derived or with a heterozygous germline variant.  For comparison with our functional analyses, we also predicted the effects of all nine candidate mutations in silico using the SIFT (http://blocks.fhcrc.org/sift/SIFT.html) and PMut (http://mmb2.pcb.ub.es:8080/PMut) software programs (Table S2). Three sequence variants (S451F, G831E, and R834Q) were predicted to affect the function of FLT3, whereas four changes (T167A, V194M, Y364H, and M737I) were predicted to be tolerated. The remaining two mutations (Y572C and V592G) had conflicting results between the SIFT and PMut algorithms. These findings illustrate that bioinformatics approaches and functional assays provide complementary information as to the potential impact of mutations identified in large-scale genomic screens.  Ortholog alignments for all nonsynonymous sequence variants identified in this study, as well as relevant sequence alignments of all five class III receptor TKs (PDGFRA, PDGFRB, KIT, CSF1R, and FLT3) and other TKs with a known role in cancer (EGFR, ERBB2, RET, MET, and ABL1), are shown in Figure S2. Clinical characteristics of the patients with activating FLT3 mutations are given in Tables S3 and S4.  FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q Differentially Activate Downstream Signaling Pathways  To examine the signal transduction properties of the four activating mutations, BaF3 cells expressing FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, or R834Q were deprived of IL-3 and then analyzed by western blotting for phosphorylation of signaling proteins (Figure 2 and Table 2).  Differential Activation of Signal Transduction Pathways by FLT3 S451F, Y572C, ... Figure 2.  Differential Activation of Signal Transduction Pathways by FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q Expression of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q in BaF3 cells resulted in constitutive phosphorylation of varying signaling proteins. Cells were maintained in IL-3-free medium for 6 hr, and whole-cell lysates or immunoprecipitates from whole-cell lysates were analyzed by western blotting as indicated. The signaling characteristics of the four mutations were compared with those of FLT3 D835Y and the FLT3 ITD mutation W51. Cells expressing WT FLT3 or the nontransforming G831E allele were used as negative controls. Expression of FLT3 in the different stable cell lines was confirmed by reprobing the blot demonstrating constitutive phosphorylation of AKT with an anti-FLT3 antibody. Figure options Table 2. Constitutive Phosphorylation of Signaling Molecules in BaF3 Cells Expressing Activating FLT3 Mutations FLT3 Mutation Signaling molecule	S451F	Y572C	V592G	R834Q	D835Y	W51 FLT3	+	+	+	+	+	+ STAT5	−	+	+	−	−	+ ERK1/2	+	+	+	+	+	+ AKT	−	+	+	−	+	− STAT3	−	+	+	−	+	− S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q were identified in this study; D835Y and W51 are known activating FLT3 mutations that have been described previously. +, constitutive phosphorylation; −, no constitutive phosphorylation.  Table options Expression of the JM domain mutations Y572C and V592G resulted in constitutive phosphorylation of ERK1/2, AKT, STAT3, and STAT5. We recently identified Y589 and Y591 as sites in the JM domain that are necessary for aberrant activation of STAT5 in cells expressing a FLT3 ITD mutation (Rocnik et al., 2006). To investigate whether these residues are also required for signal transduction mediated by JM domain point mutations, we generated Y589/591F double substitutions in the cDNAs encoding FLT3 Y572C and V592G. Coexpression of Y589/591F delayed the induction of IL-3-independent growth in BaF3 cells (Figure S3A), decreased the proliferation rate of BaF3 cells in the absence of IL-3 (Figure S3B), and altered the signaling properties of the two alleles (Figure S3C). The Y589/591F mutations strongly reduced constitutive phosphorylation of ERK1/2, STAT3, and STAT5 and attenuated aberrant activation of AKT. These results, along with our analysis of the FLT3 structure (see below), support the hypothesis that point mutations in the JM domain, like FLT3 ITD mutations, can alter the conformation of the JM domain, potentially resulting in exposure of occult docking sites such as Y589 and Y591, in turn enabling recruitment and activation of specific downstream signaling proteins.  The signaling properties of the R834Q substitution were compared to those of the most frequent AL mutation, D835Y. Consistent with previous reports (Choudhary et al., 2005; Grundler et al., 2005 ;  Rocnik et al., 2006), BaF3 cells expressing D835Y showed constitutive activation of ERK1/2 and AKT, but not STAT5. Furthermore, we found that expression of D835Y was associated with constitutive phosphorylation of STAT3. The R834Q mutation, on the other hand, resulted in phosphorylation of ERK1/2 but not AKT, STAT3, or STAT5. This signaling pattern was associated with increased sensitivity to growth inhibition by the MEK inhibitor PD98059 as compared to cells harboring the D835Y mutation (Figures 3A and 3B), indicating a higher relative contribution of ERK signaling to the transforming activity of the R834Q allele. Similar to R834Q-positive cells, cells expressing the S451F mutation also showed constitutive phosphorylation of ERK1/2, but no induction of AKT, STAT3, or STAT5. These results suggest that activation of the MAPK pathway in the absence of PI3K/AKT, STAT3, or STAT5 signaling is sufficient for transformation of hematopoietic cells by specific FLT3 alleles and that cells carrying different FLT3 mutations are differentially dependent on signaling mechanisms that involve the MEK/ERK cascade.  Varying Sensitivity of Different FLT3 AL Mutations to MEK Inhibition(A) ... Figure 3.  Varying Sensitivity of Different FLT3 AL Mutations to MEK Inhibition (A) Expression of FLT3 R834Q was associated with a higher sensitivity to MEK inhibition as compared to FLT3 D835Y. BaF3 cells stably expressing FLT3 R834Q or D835Y and growing in the absence of IL-3 were treated with PD98059 as indicated. Cell viability was measured after 48 hr, and the proportion of viable cells relative to the control (no inhibitor) was plotted. IC50 values are indicated. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (B) PD98059 treatment of BaF3 cells expressing FLT3 R834Q or D835Y resulted in dose-dependent inhibition of ERK1/2 phosphorylation. Cells were incubated with varying drug concentrations for 15 min, and whole-cell lysates were analyzed by western blotting as indicated. Figure options FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q Confer Varying Sensitivity to the TK Inhibitor PKC412  To determine the sensitivity of the four activating mutations to FLT3 inhibition, BaF3 cells expressing FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, or R834Q were treated with increasing concentrations of the small-molecule TK inhibitor PKC412. FLT3 Y572C, V592G, and R834Q conferred high sensitivity to PKC412 (inhibitory concentration of 50% [IC50], 2.5 nM, 5 nM, and 2.3 nM, respectively), whereas a considerably higher IC50 (48 nM) was observed for FLT3 S451F (Figure 4A). Western blot analysis showed that treatment with PKC412 led to dose-dependent decreases in FLT3 autophosphorylation and in phosphorylation of ERK1/2 that correlated with inhibition of cell growth (Figure 4B). WT FLT3-expressing BaF3 cells grown in the presence of IL-3 were used as a control for toxicity unrelated to FLT3 inhibition, and no antiproliferative effect was observed for concentrations of PKC412 up to 50 nM (Figure 4A). These data show that the four activating FLT3 mutations identified in our mutation screen can be inhibited by PKC412 and that Y572C, V592G, and R834Q are considerably more sensitive to this compound than S451F.  Varying Sensitivity of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q to Kinase Inhibition ... Figure 4.  Varying Sensitivity of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q to Kinase Inhibition by PKC412 (A) Expression of FLT3 Y572C, V592G, or R834Q was associated with higher sensitivity to FLT3 inhibition as compared to FLT3 S451F. BaF3 cells growing in the absence of IL-3 were treated with PKC412 as indicated. Cell viability was measured after 48 hr, and the proportion of viable cells relative to the control (no inhibitor) was plotted. IC50 values are indicated. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (B) PKC412 treatment of BaF3 cells expressing FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q resulted in dose-dependent decreases in FLT3 and ERK1/2 phosphorylation. Cells were incubated with varying drug concentrations for 2 hr, and whole-cell lysates were analyzed by western blotting as indicated. Figure options Mutation of FLT3 V592 Promotes Aberrant Signal Transduction and Proliferation of Human AML Cells  To investigate the role of mutant FLT3 in human AML cells, we analyzed the MONO-MAC-6 cell line that has been reported to contain a V592A substitution in the FLT3 JM domain (Spiekermann et al., 2003). DNA sequence analysis confirmed the presence of a homozygous V592A mutation in this cell line (data not shown). Lentiviral transduction of MONO-MAC-6 cells with two short hairpin RNA (shRNA) constructs targeting different regions of the FLT3 transcript resulted in stable downregulation of FLT3 mRNA (Figure 5B) and reduced levels of FLT3 protein (Figure 5C). Knockdown of FLT3 was associated with a substantial reduction in cell viability as compared to cells transduced with a nontargeting control shRNA (Figure 5A). Western blot analysis showed that suppression of FLT3 resulted in loss of STAT5 phosphorylation (Figure 5C), indicating that STAT5 is a downstream target of mutations involving FLT3 V592, consistent with our signaling studies in BaF3 cells. These results suggest that endogenous point mutations of FLT3 V592 promote the growth and survival of human AML cells and that this effect is mediated through aberrant STAT5 activation.  Effects of FLT3 Knockdown in Human AML Cells(A) Downregulation of FLT3 using ... Figure 5.  Effects of FLT3 Knockdown in Human AML Cells (A) Downregulation of FLT3 using shRNA constructs TRCN 772 and TRCN 773 inhibited the growth of a human AML cell line, MONO-MAC-6, that harbors a homozyogus V592A mutation in the FLT3 JM domain. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (B) Transduction of MONO-MAC-6 cells with shRNA constructs TRCN 772 and TRCN 773 resulted in decreased FLT3 mRNA levels as compared to a nontargeting control construct. Experiments were performed in duplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (C) Suppression of FLT3 mRNA was associated with a reduction in FLT3 protein (upper panels) and with loss of STAT5 phosphorylation (lower panels). Figure options Structural Analysis of FLT3 Mutations  Based on the crystal structure of the intracellular domains of FLT3 (Protein Data Bank accession code 1RJB; Figure 6A), we assessed the potential mechanism by which point mutations in the JM domain and in the AL result in constitutive FLT3 kinase activity. Residues Y572 and R834 seem to be involved in maintaining the energetic favorability of the autoinhibited conformation of FLT3. Loss of the stabilizing effects of these residues should favor the active conformation. Y572, which has thus far not been found mutated in AML, is described as the first amino-terminal residue visible in the electron density of the crystal structure (Griffith et al., 2004). It is a key “hook” for the JM domain and is critical to maintain the autoinhibited conformation of FLT3 (Figure 6B). The Y572C substitution is expected to result in a substantial loss of hydrogen bonding networks and extensive hydrophobic interactions, with a consequent reduction in the energetic favorability of this conformation. Likewise, loss of hydrogen bonding networks that would result from the R834Q and D835Y mutations is expected to destabilize the autoinhibited kinase conformation (Figures 6C and 6D).  Structural Analysis of FLT3 Mutations(A) Ribbon representation of the crystal ... Figure 6.  Structural Analysis of FLT3 Mutations (A) Ribbon representation of the crystal structure of the FLT3 kinase domain (Protein Data Bank, accession code 1RJB). The structure is a typical kinase fold crystallized in the autoinhibited conformation with the JM domain packing closely to the kinase domain and locking the protein in this conformation. (B) Hydrogen bonding network formed by FLT3 Y572. Y572 inserts into the catalytic cleft of FLT3, where the phenolic hydroxyl oxygen forms hydrogen bonds to the catalytic glutamic acid, E661, and an ordered water molecule. The aromatic ring also makes extensive hydrophobic contacts. The Y572C mutation will disrupt this “hook” that locks the JM domain in the autoinhibited conformation. (C) Hydrogen bonding network formed by FLT3 R834. R834 is critical to the formation of a hydrogen bonding network that incorporates interactions with the side chains of residues N816, R815, Y842, D811, the backbone carbonyl oxygen of R815, and two water molecules. This network is directly adjacent to a hydrogen bonding network in which N841 plays a critical role. (D) Hydrogen bonding network formed by FLT3 D835. D835 is an integral part of a hydrogen bonding network that seems to stabilize the AL backbone in the autoinhibited conformation. There is a hydrogen bond directly between the carboxyl group and the backbone amide of residue S836. There is also an indirect hydrogen bond between the caryboxyl group and the backbone amide of M837 mediated by a water molecule. (E) Surface representation of the region proximal to G831. The molecular surface of FLT3 protein atoms is shown as a transparent gray surface. The surface is colored green where it contacts G831, and water molecules are shown as red spheres. The G831E mutation may not disrupt this conformation due to the proximity of a water-filled cavity adjacent to G831. In this figure, amino acid residues are shown in stick representation with nitrogen atoms in blue, oxygen in red, and carbon atoms the same color as the corresponding domain. Water molecules are shown as red spheres and hydrogen bonds as dashed red lines with their lengths labeled in Å. This figure was made using the program PyMOL (www.pymol.org). Figure options Conversely, structural analysis suggests that the nontransforming G831E substitution may not deleteriously affect the stability of the autoinhibited conformation. The molecular surface of autoinhibited FLT3 shows that there is a cavity directly adjacent to G831. This cavity is filled with water molecules and falls between the autoinhibited-conformation AL and JM domain (Figure 6E). Even though mutation of this glycine residue to glutamic acid is a substantial change, the glutamic acid residue should be able to be accommodated in the autoinhibited conformation by displacement of a number of water molecules. G831 lies within the invariant protein kinase DFG motif required for correct Mg2+•ATP coordination (Karlsson et al., 1993) and is important for conformational movements of the DFG motif between active and inactive states (Levinson et al., 2006). Consequently, the G831E mutation may stabilize FLT3 in the autoinhibited conformation and result in reduced kinase activity, consistent with our data showing a lack of FLT3 autophosphorylation in cells expressing FLT3 G831E.  Discussion We have used high-throughput DNA sequence analysis to determine the frequency and spectrum of mutations in the FLT3 gene in adult AML patients without known FLT3 ITDs or AL mutations. Sequencing of all FLT3 coding exons identified nine candidate leukemogenic alleles in six exons corresponding to different domains of the FLT3 receptor.  Large-scale mutational profiling studies in cancer typically result in extensive lists of validated nonsynonymous sequence variants. A major challenge of these studies is to distinguish driver mutations that are responsible for malignant transformation from nonfunctional passenger alterations that arise in the malignant clone by chance and accumulate during repeated rounds of cell division. To identify genetic changes with a role in tumorigenesis, statistical models have been developed that incorporate mutational frequency and distribution, and it has been inferred from such approaches that nonsynonymous passenger mutations are present at a higher frequency than previously anticipated (Greenman et al., 2007; Sjoblom et al., 2006 ;  Wood et al., 2007). We provide functional documentation of this concept by using a different strategy that combined both high-throughput DNA sequence analysis of FLT3 in primary AML samples with experimental validation of all potential driver mutations identified. Cytokine independence assays and biochemical analysis revealed that of the 9 candidate leukemogenic alleles, 4 are gain-of-function mutations that result in constitutive kinase activation and stimulation of downstream signaling pathways, properties that are relevant to leukemogenesis and can be exploited therapeutically, whereas the remaining 5 alleles were not associated with increased kinase activity and aberrant signal transduction.  These results also indicate that functional analyses can provide information beyond that derived from statistical methods for identifying driver mutations. First, we show that rare sequence variants occurring at frequencies that would not allow them to be distinguished from unselected passenger changes can be drivers. Second, we report that alleles in the kinase domain and in the AL—highly conserved and functionally relevant domains that, based on mathematical approaches, are likely to harbor driver mutations—may not be associated with a detectable gain of function. Third, statistical techniques result in identification of candidate cancer genes, but do not predict the ability of individual alleles to contribute to transformation. Our analysis of a series of nonsynonymous sequence variants in FLT3, a validated cancer gene ( Futreal et al., 2004), indicates that functional studies are needed to complement the bioinformatic approaches that have been described to date.  In addition to mutational frequency and distribution, statistical methods for assessing the functional relevance of DNA sequence variants in cancer rely on discerning acquired mutations from inherited polymorphisms. While the analysis of germline DNA is essential to assess the origin of cancer-associated genomic alterations and to determine whether a mutation has been selected for during tumorigenesis, previous findings in solid tumors indicate that the presence of a kinase mutation in constitutional DNA does not exclude the possibility that it has a potential role in malignant transformation (Bell et al., 2005; Jeffers et al., 1997; Mulloy et al., 2007 ;  Plaza-Menacho et al., 2006). These data further support the conclusion that the interpretation of high-throughput sequencing studies can be improved through functional assessment of candidate oncogenic alleles.  The four activating mutations that were identified in our screen are located in the EC domain (S451F), the JM domain (Y572C and V592G), and the AL (R834Q) of FLT3. Sequence variants in the EC region (D324N and N520Y) have been described previously in patients with AML (Ley et al., 2003 ;  Syampurnawati et al., 2007). However, D324N is also present in normal individuals and in nonhematopoietic tissues from AML patients and does not confer cytokine-independent growth to BaF3 cells (Schnittger et al., 2006), whereas the functional consequences of N520Y have not been assessed. Our results thus document that FLT3, like EGFR and KIT (Gari et al., 1999 ;  Lee et al., 2006), can be activated by mutations in the EC domain. To determine the mechanism by which the S451F mutation results in constitutive FLT3 kinase activity, structural analysis of a larger FLT3 molecule that includes the EC domain will be required.  Point mutations in the region between amino acids 579 and 594 in the FLT3 JM domain have been detected in a small proportion of AML cases (Reindl et al., 2006 ;  Stirewalt et al., 2004). We have found a valine to glycine substitution involving residue 592 and a mutation involving Y572. Y572 is the first amino acid of the JM domain, and analysis of the crystal structure of the FLT3 cytoplasmic domain has suggested a key role for this residue in kinase autoinhibition (Griffith et al., 2004). Our structural analysis suggests that mutation of Y572 would result in disruption of its extensive interactions with the surrounding FLT3 subdomains and consequent destabilization of the inactive kinase conformation. In support of this hypothesis, the Y572C substitution that was identified in our mutation screen results in constitutive FLT3 kinase activity. These data provide genetic evidence for the importance of Y572 in maintaining the autoinhibited conformation of FLT3 and suggest that any mutation that interferes with the stability of the JM domain in this conformation is likely to be transforming.  The signaling properties of the two JM domain point mutations are similar to those of FLT3 ITDs (Parcells et al., 2006). In particular, aberrant activation of STAT5 by JM domain point mutations appears to involve two tyrosine residues, Y589 and Y591, that are essential for FLT3 ITD-mediated induction of STAT5 and leukemic transformation in vivo (Rocnik et al., 2006). Analysis of the role of Y589 and Y591 also provided insights into the deregulation of other signaling pathways by mutant FLT3. For example, the majority of primary AML samples are characterized by activated MAPK and PI3K/AKT signaling; however, the fact that dysregulation of various upstream effectors can result in aberrant phosphorylation of ERK1/2 and AKT indicates that the MAPK and PI3K/AKT cascades may be activated through a variety of different mechanisms (Martelli et al., 2006 ;  Platanias, 2003). In support of the hypothesis that mutant TKs activate downstream signaling pathways by distinct mechanisms, phosphorylation of ERK1/2 and AKT by FLT3 JM domain point mutations also requires Y589 and Y591, and similar observations were made for constitutive activation of STAT3. These results suggest that the different types of JM domain mutations (ITDs and point mutations) contribute in similar ways to myeloid leukemogenesis and demonstrate that Y589 and Y591 are critical for the induction of several signaling pathways that are activated in leukemias with FLT3 JM domain mutations. Furthermore, these findings illustrate the potential of point mutations to alter the substrate specificity of protein kinases. Whether FLT3 Y589/591-mediated signal transduction in AML involves direct engagement of downstream effectors by these residues or requires additional adaptor molecules is currently unknown.  Previously described mutations in the FLT3 AL include substitutions, insertions, or deletions within a region between amino acids 834 and 842, with D835 being the most commonly affected residue (Frohling et al., 2005). We identified nonsynonymous substitutions at codons 831 and 834. Analysis of the crystal structure of the FLT3 kinase domain suggests that mutation of residue R834 would interfere with the stability of the autoinhibited conformation, and in agreement with this hypothesis, FLT3 R834Q has constitutive kinase activity and confers IL-3-independent growth to BaF3 cells. In contrast, mutation of the conserved DFG motif G831 to glutamic acid may deleteriously affect the structural requirements for enzymatic activity, is expected to be compatible with the autoinhibited conformation, and does not result in transformation of hematopoietic cells. These results illustrate the value of structural analysis for understanding the atomic-level mechanisms by which TK mutations associated with human leukemias function. In addition, these data indicate that the autoinhibited conformation of FLT3 is critically dependent on the stabilizing contacts of a limited number of specific amino acids, whereas mutation of other residues within the AL does not alter the structure and function of the FLT3 kinase.  Analysis of the signaling properties of FLT3 R834Q demonstrated that this mutation, unlike the more common D835Y allele, results in activation of ERK1/2, but not AKT, STAT3, or STAT5. Consistent with this observation, the R834Q mutation is associated with enhanced sensitivity to MEK inhibition, indicating that cells expressing R834Q are more reliant on MAPK signaling than are D835Y-expressing cells that constitutively phosphorylate multiple signaling proteins. These results suggest that there are not only differences in signal transduction between various FLT3 mutation classes, for example, ITDs and AL mutations (Choudhary et al., 2005 ;  Grundler et al., 2005), but also between distinct alleles within a given mutation class and that cells carrying different FLT3 mutations are differentially dependent on certain signaling pathways.  To determine the functional consequences of candidate mutations, we used an in vitro assay that is based on exogenous expression of mutated alleles in murine hematopoietic cells. This assay has proved to be of value for the assessment of increased TK activity and perturbed signal transduction and has been validated for numerous TK alleles identified in human hematologic malignancies, including FLT3 ITDs and AL mutations (Clark et al., 2004 ;  Weisberg et al., 2002), as well as for TK alleles associated with solid tumors, such as mutations in the EGFR kinase domain and the recently discovered EML4-ALK fusion in patients with non-small-cell lung cancer (Jiang et al., 2005 ;  Soda et al., 2007). On the other hand, conversion of BaF3 cells to cytokine independence may not faithfully assess the functional implications of certain mutations, either because they require expression of additional proteins (Lu et al., 2005) or because cooperativity between two or more mutations is required for signaling pathway activation. Lastly, this assay may fail to detect a gain of function conferred by kinase mutations that do not result in increased enzymatic activity. For instance, Wan et al. (2004) described three mutants of the serine-threonine kinase BRAF with impaired catalytic activity that are capable of stimulating downstream signaling through transactivation of CRAF. Although we observed no activation of ERK1/2, AKT, STAT3, or STAT5 in cells expressing FLT3 mutations that read out as nonfunctional in the BaF3 assay, it is possible that some of these alleles stimulate other effector molecules that were not analyzed in our study. We recognize that it is impossible to definitively exclude any conceivable function of a given mutation. Nonetheless, the nontransforming mutations identified in our screen do not meet conventional criteria for effects on kinase activation.  The activating mutations identified in our study conferred varying degrees of sensitivity to the small-molecule TK inhibitor PKC412. Cells expressing Y572C, V592G, or R834Q were highly sensitive to this compound, as has been reported for other JM domain (Reindl et al., 2006) and AL mutations (Choudhary et al., 2005; Grundler et al., 2003 ;  Weisberg et al., 2002). In contrast, cytotoxic responses in S451F-expressing cells required substantially higher drug concentrations. The determinants of response to pharmacologic inhibition of FLT3 are diverse and remain only partly understood. In general, the presence of mutant FLT3 is associated with increased drug sensitivity (DeAngelo et al., 2006 ;  Fiedler et al., 2005), yet there appears to be substantial variation among the different mutation types (Choudhary et al., 2005; Grundler et al., 2003 ;  Weisberg et al., 2002) as well as between individual alleles within the same mutation class (Clark et al., 2004 ;  Grundler et al., 2003). In addition, it has been observed that patients without FLT3 ITDs or any of the known AL mutations may also derive benefit from FLT3 inhibitor therapy, which might be related to the presence of previously unrecognized mutations (Schittenhelm et al., 2006), and in vitro studies in primary AML samples have shown that there is substantial interpatient variation in the degree of dependency on FLT3 signaling (Knapper et al., 2006). Our findings further illustrate the complex relationship between FLT3 mutation status and response to pharmacologic FLT3 inhibition.  In summary, our results demonstrate that previously unrecognized activating FLT3 mutations in the EC domain, the JM domain, and the AL occur in patients with AML, albeit at a low frequency. Since mutations lying outside the usually studied mutational hotspots may confer sensitivity to small-molecule TK inhibitors, eligibility for clinical trials of FLT3-targeted therapies should not be based on diagnostic screens that are limited to the detection of only a fraction of the FLT3 mutations associated with AML. The development of sensitive, allele-specific assays, such as mass spectrometry-based genotyping (Thomas et al., 2007), will allow all patients enrolled on trials of FLT3 inhibitors to be genotyped for all known FLT3 alleles, and it is hoped that similar strategies will be used in trials of molecularly targeted therapies for patients with different hematopoietic malignancies and solid tumors.  FLT3 is a highly annotated and well-studied cancer gene known to play a key role in myeloid leukemogenesis. The finding that only a fraction of the nonsynonymous FLT3 mutations associated with AML result in constitutive kinase activity illustrates the challenge in distinguishing between sequence variants that contribute to malignant transformation and nonfunctional passenger mutations. Given that the increasing throughput of DNA sequencing technologies will allow improved characterization of somatic cancer genomes, these data demonstrate that a combination of genetic and functional approaches will be crucial in order to identify the mutations that truly drive the development of cancer and to validate the potential of suspected oncogenic alleles as therapeutic targets.  Experimental Procedures Patient Samples  This study included 349 adult patients with AML, de novo or secondary after treatment for a primary malignancy or following myelodysplasia, as defined by French-American-British Cooperative Group criteria or the World Health Organization classification (Bennett et al., 1985 ;  Harris et al., 1999). Diagnostic BM and peripheral blood samples were collected after obtaining informed consent according to the Declaration of Helsinki and with institutional review board approval of the relevant institutions. All samples were enriched for mononuclear cells by density centrifugation before banking. Only samples with more than 50% blasts were included for DNA sequence analysis, and more than 80% of the samples had at least 80% blasts. All specimens that were analyzed by DNA sequencing were negative for FLT3 ITDs, as assessed by PCR amplification of exons 14 and 15; for FLT3 AL mutations involving codons 835 and 836, as assessed by PCR amplification of exon 20 followed by EcoRV digestion; for activating KIT mutations, as assessed by sequencing of exons 8 and 17; and for mutations involving NRAS codons 12, 13, and 61, as assessed by sequencing of exons 1 and 2.  FLT3 Mutational Analysis and Selection of Candidate Mutations  Extraction of genomic DNA, amplification of FLT3 exons, bidirectional sequencing, and sequence detection were performed using a high-throughput resequencing approach as previously described ( Levine et al., 2005). External gene-specific primers and internal M13-appended primers are listed in Table S5. Analysis of sequence traces was performed using Mutation Surveyor version 2.28 (SoftGenetics, State College, PA). Five steps were used to identify mutations of interest. First, any synonymous substitutions were not analyzed further. Second, known SNPs were excluded by comparison to the dbSNP database (release 127; http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/projects/SNP). Third, published data sets ( Greenman et al., 2007 ;  Ley et al., 2003) were queried to exclude any nonsynonymous substitutions in the FLT3 coding sequence that have been detected in DNA samples derived from normal tissues. Fourth, sequence chromatograms were visually inspected to remove false positive calls in the automated analysis. Fifth, candidate mutations were reamplified and sequenced from the original DNA sample for independent verification. Leukemic cells at diagnosis and a matched remission sample were analyzed in one case with a presumptive leukemogenic mutation in the FLT3 kinase domain, M737I.  Genotyping  Mass spectrometry genotyping was performed as previously described (Levine et al., 2005). Primers and primer extension probes for detection of the different FLT3 alleles are listed in Table S6.  DNA Constructs and Retrovirus Production  Sequence variants were introduced into the full-length FLT3 cDNA using the QuikChange XL Site-Directed Mutagenesis Kit (Stratagene, La Jolla, CA). All mutations were confirmed by sequencing of the entire FLT3 open reading frame. The mutant cDNAs were cloned into the MSCV-PGK-neo retroviral vector, and full-length protein expression was documented by western blotting. Generation of retroviral supernatants and infection of BaF3 cells were performed as described previously ( Rocnik et al., 2006). BaF3 cells transduced with MSCV-PGK-neo constructs were selected with G418 in the presence of IL-3 for 14 days.  Cell Culture  BaF3 cells were maintained in RPMI-1640 supplemented with 10% fetal calf serum and 10% WEHI-conditioned medium as a source of IL-3. For cytokine independence assays, cells transduced with each of the MSCV-PGK-neo retroviral contructs were seeded at a density of 0.33 × 106/ml in IL-3-free medium, and the number of viable cells was determined daily by trypan blue exclusion. For growth inhibition assays, cells were seeded at a density of 1 × 105/ml in IL-3-free medium with various concentrations of PKC412 (Novartis, Basel, Switzerland) or PD98059 (Calbiochem, San Diego, CA), and the number of viable cells was determined after 48 hr using the CellTiter 96AQueous One Solution Proliferation Assay (Promega, Madison, WI).  Immunoprecipitation and Western Blotting  Immunoprecipitation and western blotting were performed as described previously (Rocnik et al., 2006) using the following antibodies: anti-FLT3, anti-STAT5, anti-phospho-ERK1/2 (T202/Y204) (Santa Cruz Biotechnology, Santa Cruz, CA); anti-STAT3, anti-phospho-STAT3 (Y705), anti-phospho-STAT5 (Y694), anti-ERK1/2, anti-AKT, anti-phospho-AKT (S473) (Cell Signaling Technology, Beverly, MA); and anti-phosphotyrosine (4G10) (Upstate, Lake Placid, NY).  Knockdown of FLT3 Expression  Two pLKO.1-based lentiviral vectors encoding shRNAs targeted to the 3′ untranslated region (TRCN 772) or the coding sequence (TRCN 773) of the human FLT3 mRNA, and a pLKO.1 construct containing a nontargeting shRNA sequence were obtained from the MISSION TRC-Hs 1.0 (Human) shRNA library ( Root et al., 2006). The oligonucleotide sequences of the shRNAs were as follows (21-nucleotide stem sequences matching the target transcript underlined; noncomplementary 6-nucleotide loop sequences italicized): TRCN 772, 5′-CCG GCG TCT GCG TTT ACT CTT GTT TCT CGA GAA ACA AGA GTA AAC GCA GAC GTT TTT-3′; TRCN 773, 5′-CCG GGC TAA CTT CTA CAA ACT GAT TCT CGA GAA TCA GTT TGT AGA AGT TAG CTT TTT-3′. Generation of lentiviral supernatants and infection of human AML cells were performed as described previously (Scholl et al., 2007).  
1673||Mutations in the juxtamembrane and kinase domains of FLT3 are common in AML, but it is not known whether alterations outside these regions contribute to leukemogenesis. We used a high-throughput platform to interrogate the entire FLT3 coding sequence in AML patients without known FLT3 mutations and experimentally tested the consequences of each candidate leukemogenic allele. This approach identified gain-of-function mutations that activated downstream signaling and conferred sensitivity to FLT3 inhibition and alleles that were not associated with kinase activation, including mutations in the catalytic domain. These findings support the concept that acquired mutations in cancer may not contribute to malignant transformation and underscore the importance of functional studies to distinguish “driver” mutations underlying tumorigenesis from biologically neutral “passenger” alterations.  Author Keywords CELLCYCLE SIGNIFICANCE High-throughput DNA sequencing has provided insights into the mutational profiles of human cancers and represents a promising strategy for the identification of therapeutic targets. However, recognizing the subset of functionally relevant mutations has proven difficult. We used a combined genetic and functional approach to evaluate a series of candidate mutations in the receptor tyrosine kinase FLT3 that were identified in patients with AML. This strategy enabled distinction between activating alleles that conferred sensitivity to a small-molecule inhibitor and bystander mutations that did not result in kinase activation. Remarkably, these latter alterations included mutations in key functional domains of FLT3. These results emphasize that complementary functional studies are critical for validation of suspected oncogenic alleles from large-scale genomic screens.  Introduction The receptor tyrosine kinase (TK) FLT3 and its cognate ligand are important for the expansion of early hematopoietic progenitor cells and for the generation of mature natural killer cells and dendritic cells. Binding of FLT3 ligand to the extracellular (EC) domain of FLT3 induces receptor dimerization, which promotes phosphorylation of the FLT3 kinase domain, thereby activating the receptor and several downstream signaling pathways, primarily the PI3K/AKT pathway and the RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK cascade (Parcells et al., 2006).  In patients with acute myeloid leukemia (AML), somatic mutations that result in constitutive activation of FLT3 have been identified in two functional domains of the receptor, the juxtamembrane (JM) domain and the kinase domain. The JM domain, which has been shown to be critical for kinase autoinhibition (Griffith et al., 2004), is disrupted by internal tandem duplications (ITDs) in 25%–30% of adult AML patients (Stirewalt and Radich, 2003), whereas JM domain point mutations have been described in approximately 1% of cases (Reindl et al., 2006 ;  Stirewalt et al., 2004). FLT3 ITDs induce constitutive phosphorylation of several signal transduction intermediates, including STAT5, AKT, and ERK1/2 (Parcells et al., 2006) and cause myeloproliferative disease in various murine models (Kelly et al., 2002 ;  Lee et al., 2005). JM domain point mutations also result in constitutive activation of STAT5 and AKT (Reindl et al., 2006), but their in vivo transforming potential has not been studied.  The activation loop (AL) in the carboxy-terminal lobe of the kinase domain is affected by point mutations, insertions, or deletions in approximately 7% of AML cases (Frohling et al., 2005). AL mutations share several signal transduction properties with FLT3 ITDs, for example, constitutive phosphorylation of AKT and ERK1/2 (Choudhary et al., 2005 ;  Spiekermann et al., 2003). However, substantial differences between the two mutation types in the activation of STAT5 have been observed in some studies (Choudhary et al., 2005; Grundler et al., 2005 ;  Rocnik et al., 2006), but not in others (Bagrintseva et al., 2004; Grundler et al., 2003 ;  Spiekermann et al., 2003), and mice transplanted with BM expressing FLT3 AL mutations do not develop myeloid disease but rather, a T cell lymphoproliferative disorder with longer latency (Grundler et al., 2005). A mutation in the amino-terminal lobe of the kinase domain was found to induce constitutive activation of AKT, ERK1/2, and STAT5 (Schittenhelm et al., 2006).  From a clinical perspective, FLT3 mutations are important as a result of their prognostic relevance and because constitutively activated FLT3 is an attractive therapeutic target. FLT3 ITDs are associated with an increased risk of relapse and short survival (Yanada et al., 2005), and patients with low or absent levels of wild-type (WT) FLT3 appear to have a particularly dismal outcome (Thiede et al., 2002 ;  Whitman et al., 2001). In contrast, the prognostic relevance of FLT3 AL mutations remains controversial despite several studies on large patient series (Yanada et al., 2005). Currently, there are four selective FLT3 inhibitors at various stages of clinical development, including PKC412 (midostaurin), CEP-701 (lestaurtinib), MLN518 (tandutinib), and SU11248 (sunitinib) (Knapper, 2007). These compounds are well tolerated at doses that achieve inhibition of FLT3 and have shown moderate activity in relapsed or refractory AML patients with activating FLT3 mutations. In addition, some patients without FLT3 ITDs or known AL mutations have responded to FLT3 inhibitors, suggesting the possibility of other mutations that result in constitutive activation of FLT3. Ongoing clinical trials are evaluating the use of FLT3 inhibitors in combination with chemotherapy.  Previous studies have focused on the detection of mutations in the JM and kinase domains of FLT3, whereas the frequency and spectrum of sequence alterations outside these regions have not been systematically studied. We therefore performed high-throughput DNA sequencing of all coding exons of FLT3 in AML patients without FLT3 ITDs or known AL mutations. The primary aim of such a genomic screen is to identify “driver” mutations that are causally implicated in cancer development. However, recent large-scale sequencing studies in solid tumors that used statistical approaches to evaluate the impact of DNA sequence variants have demonstrated the difficulties in distinguishing driver mutations from “passenger” alterations that confer no clonal growth advantage ( Forrest and Cavet, 2007; Getz et al., 2007; Greenman et al., 2007; Rubin and Green, 2007; Sjoblom et al., 2006 ;  Wood et al., 2007). To address this problem, we experimentally tested the consequences of each candidate oncogenic allele identified in our mutation screen. This combined genetic and functional approach successfully identified gain-of-function mutations in the EC domain, the JM domain, and the AL of FLT3 and several passenger alterations that did not result in constitutive kinase activity. Furthermore, we investigated the structural implications, signal transduction properties, and sensitivity to FLT3 inhibition of the activating alleles.  Results High-Throughput DNA Sequence Analysis of FLT3  We performed bidirectional sequencing of all FLT3 coding exons in pretreatment samples from 222 adult AML patients without known activating mutations of FLT3, KIT, and NRAS. Sequence data were evaluated for quality and coverage within the region of interest of each exon that included all coding bases and the five flanking intronic bases at the 5′ and 3′ ends. High-quality, bidirectional sequence reads were obtained for more than 90% of all samples analyzed (see Table S1 in the Supplemental Data available with this article online).  FLT3 Sequence Variants in Patients with AML  We identified a total of 17 heterozygous nucleotide changes. Five of these changes corresponded to germline variants listed in single-nucleotide polymorphism (SNP) databases. Of the remaining 12 sequence alterations, 9 were predicted to change the amino acid sequence of FLT3 (nonsynonymous substitutions; Table 1 and Figure S1), whereas 3 were annotated as synonymous substitutions, resulting in a ratio of nonsynonymous to synonymous mutations of 3.  Table 1. Nonsynonymous Sequence Variants Identified by High-Throughput Sequencing of FLT3 in 222 AML Patients DNA	Exon	Protein	Domain 581A > G	5	T167A	extracellular 662G > A	5	V194M	extracellular 1052G > A	8	D324N	extracellular 1172T > C	9	Y364H	extracellular 1434C > T	11	S451F	extracellular 1751G > A	13	V557I	transmembrane 1797A > G	14	Y572C	juxtamembrane 1857T > G	14	V592G	juxtamembrane 2293G > C	18	M737I	kinase 2574G > A	20	G831E	activation loop 2583G > A	20	R834Q	activation loop Sequence numbering is according to Ensembl Transcript/Peptide ID ENST00000241453. D324N (refSNP ID rs35602083) and V557I (refSNP ID rs35958982) are known germline polymorphisms. Different mutations involving amino acids V592 and R834 (V592A, R834_D835 del, R834_D835insALG) are reported in the COSMIC database (version 30; http://www.sanger.ac.uk/genetics/CGP/cosmic/).  Table options The nine nonsynonymous sequence variants that were not known SNPs have not been observed in 48 normal control samples in which the entire coding region of FLT3 had previously been sequenced ( Ley et al., 2003) and were not among the germline variants identified in a mutation screen of all protein kinase genes in 210 human cancers (Greenman et al., 2007). These alterations were, therefore, considered to be candidate leukemogenic mutations that warrant experimental validation. Paired diagnostic and remission material was available from a patient with an M737I substitution in the FLT3 kinase domain. This variant was present at diagnosis but not in the remission sample, demonstrating that it was somatically acquired (Figure S1). The three synonymous sequence variants that were not known SNPs were considered to be nonfunctional and were, therefore, not further investigated.  FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q Are Gain-of-Function Mutations that Induce Constitutive Kinase Activation  To determine the functional consequences of all nine candidate mutations, we tested their ability to transform murine hematopoietic BaF3 cells to cytokine-independent growth, a property conferred by a broad spectrum of oncogenic TK alleles. Cells expressing S451F in the EC domain, Y572C or V592G in the JM domain, and R834Q in the AL were able to grow in the absence of interleukin-3 (IL-3; Figure 1A). Immunoprecipitation of FLT3 followed by western blotting with a phosphotyrosine-specific antibody demonstrated that these mutant kinases induced constitutive phosphorylation of FLT3 (Figure 1B). These results indicate that the S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q alleles are gain-of-function mutations that result in constitutive kinase activation. To perform a rapid and inexpensive secondary screen for these mutations, we designed allele-specific primer extension assays and performed genotype determination in an independent cohort of 127 adult AML cases. This analysis identified one additional case positive for the S451F substitution and one additional case with the R834Q allele. Thus, the overall prevalence of activating FLT3 mutations in this study was 1.7% (6 of 349 cases).  Constitutive Kinase Activation by FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q(A) ... Figure 1.  Constitutive Kinase Activation by FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q (A) Expression of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q resulted in IL-3-independent growth of BaF3 cells. Cells expressing the known AL mutation D835Y were used as positive control. Cells expressing WT FLT3 were used as negative control. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (B) Expression of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q in BaF3 cells resulted in constitutive FLT3 autophosphorylation. Cells were maintained in IL-3-free medium for 6 hr, FLT3 was immunoprecipitated from whole-cell lysates, and immunoprecipitates were analyzed by western blotting with an anti-phosphotyrosine antibody. Cells expressing a FLT3 ITD mutation (W51) or FLT3 D835Y were used as positive controls. Cells expressing WT FLT3 or the nontransforming G831E allele were used as negative controls. (C) Expression of FLT3 T167A, V194M, Y364H, M737I, and G831E did not result in IL-3-independent growth of BaF3 cells. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. Figure options Cells expressing any of the remaining five nonsynonymous sequence variants in the EC domain, the kinase domain, and the AL underwent apoptosis when cultured in the absence of exogenous cytokines, and constitutive phosphorylation of FLT3 was not observed (Figures 1B and 1C). These results indicate that a substantial proportion of the nonsynonymous sequence variants detected in FLT3 are likely to be passenger mutations. To increase confidence that the four presumed passenger mutations for which no matched normal DNA sample was available (T167A, V194M, Y364H, and G831E) did not represent germline polymorphisms or sequence artifacts, the following steps were taken. First, we sequenced the corresponding exons of FLT3 in 102 normal DNA samples and detected no abnormalities. Second, we determined by mass spectrometry genotyping that the G831E allele in the FLT3 AL was not present in the panel of 270 normal individuals collected by the International HapMap Consortium (2003). Third, we introduced PCR-amplified genomic DNA from each case into a cloning vector and sequenced between 50 and 55 individual transformants. In two cases (T167A and G831E), the observed mutant-to-wild-type allelic ratio was substantially different from 1 (0.19 and 3.2, respectively), suggesting that these alleles did not represent heterozygous SNPs. In the remaining two cases (V194M and Y364H), the number of recombinant clones carrying the mutant allele was similar to that of clones harboring the WT sequence (24 versus 27 and 31 versus 21, respectively), a finding compatible with either a somatic mutation that was present in most of the cells from which the original DNA sample was derived or with a heterozygous germline variant.  For comparison with our functional analyses, we also predicted the effects of all nine candidate mutations in silico using the SIFT (http://blocks.fhcrc.org/sift/SIFT.html) and PMut (http://mmb2.pcb.ub.es:8080/PMut) software programs (Table S2). Three sequence variants (S451F, G831E, and R834Q) were predicted to affect the function of FLT3, whereas four changes (T167A, V194M, Y364H, and M737I) were predicted to be tolerated. The remaining two mutations (Y572C and V592G) had conflicting results between the SIFT and PMut algorithms. These findings illustrate that bioinformatics approaches and functional assays provide complementary information as to the potential impact of mutations identified in large-scale genomic screens.  Ortholog alignments for all nonsynonymous sequence variants identified in this study, as well as relevant sequence alignments of all five class III receptor TKs (PDGFRA, PDGFRB, KIT, CSF1R, and FLT3) and other TKs with a known role in cancer (EGFR, ERBB2, RET, MET, and ABL1), are shown in Figure S2. Clinical characteristics of the patients with activating FLT3 mutations are given in Tables S3 and S4.  FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q Differentially Activate Downstream Signaling Pathways  To examine the signal transduction properties of the four activating mutations, BaF3 cells expressing FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, or R834Q were deprived of IL-3 and then analyzed by western blotting for phosphorylation of signaling proteins (Figure 2 and Table 2).  Differential Activation of Signal Transduction Pathways by FLT3 S451F, Y572C, ... Figure 2.  Differential Activation of Signal Transduction Pathways by FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q Expression of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q in BaF3 cells resulted in constitutive phosphorylation of varying signaling proteins. Cells were maintained in IL-3-free medium for 6 hr, and whole-cell lysates or immunoprecipitates from whole-cell lysates were analyzed by western blotting as indicated. The signaling characteristics of the four mutations were compared with those of FLT3 D835Y and the FLT3 ITD mutation W51. Cells expressing WT FLT3 or the nontransforming G831E allele were used as negative controls. Expression of FLT3 in the different stable cell lines was confirmed by reprobing the blot demonstrating constitutive phosphorylation of AKT with an anti-FLT3 antibody. Figure options Table 2. Constitutive Phosphorylation of Signaling Molecules in BaF3 Cells Expressing Activating FLT3 Mutations FLT3 Mutation Signaling molecule	S451F	Y572C	V592G	R834Q	D835Y	W51 FLT3	+	+	+	+	+	+ STAT5	−	+	+	−	−	+ ERK1/2	+	+	+	+	+	+ AKT	−	+	+	−	+	− STAT3	−	+	+	−	+	− S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q were identified in this study; D835Y and W51 are known activating FLT3 mutations that have been described previously. +, constitutive phosphorylation; −, no constitutive phosphorylation.  Table options Expression of the JM domain mutations Y572C and V592G resulted in constitutive phosphorylation of ERK1/2, AKT, STAT3, and STAT5. We recently identified Y589 and Y591 as sites in the JM domain that are necessary for aberrant activation of STAT5 in cells expressing a FLT3 ITD mutation (Rocnik et al., 2006). To investigate whether these residues are also required for signal transduction mediated by JM domain point mutations, we generated Y589/591F double substitutions in the cDNAs encoding FLT3 Y572C and V592G. Coexpression of Y589/591F delayed the induction of IL-3-independent growth in BaF3 cells (Figure S3A), decreased the proliferation rate of BaF3 cells in the absence of IL-3 (Figure S3B), and altered the signaling properties of the two alleles (Figure S3C). The Y589/591F mutations strongly reduced constitutive phosphorylation of ERK1/2, STAT3, and STAT5 and attenuated aberrant activation of AKT. These results, along with our analysis of the FLT3 structure (see below), support the hypothesis that point mutations in the JM domain, like FLT3 ITD mutations, can alter the conformation of the JM domain, potentially resulting in exposure of occult docking sites such as Y589 and Y591, in turn enabling recruitment and activation of specific downstream signaling proteins.  The signaling properties of the R834Q substitution were compared to those of the most frequent AL mutation, D835Y. Consistent with previous reports (Choudhary et al., 2005; Grundler et al., 2005 ;  Rocnik et al., 2006), BaF3 cells expressing D835Y showed constitutive activation of ERK1/2 and AKT, but not STAT5. Furthermore, we found that expression of D835Y was associated with constitutive phosphorylation of STAT3. The R834Q mutation, on the other hand, resulted in phosphorylation of ERK1/2 but not AKT, STAT3, or STAT5. This signaling pattern was associated with increased sensitivity to growth inhibition by the MEK inhibitor PD98059 as compared to cells harboring the D835Y mutation (Figures 3A and 3B), indicating a higher relative contribution of ERK signaling to the transforming activity of the R834Q allele. Similar to R834Q-positive cells, cells expressing the S451F mutation also showed constitutive phosphorylation of ERK1/2, but no induction of AKT, STAT3, or STAT5. These results suggest that activation of the MAPK pathway in the absence of PI3K/AKT, STAT3, or STAT5 signaling is sufficient for transformation of hematopoietic cells by specific FLT3 alleles and that cells carrying different FLT3 mutations are differentially dependent on signaling mechanisms that involve the MEK/ERK cascade.  Varying Sensitivity of Different FLT3 AL Mutations to MEK Inhibition(A) ... Figure 3.  Varying Sensitivity of Different FLT3 AL Mutations to MEK Inhibition (A) Expression of FLT3 R834Q was associated with a higher sensitivity to MEK inhibition as compared to FLT3 D835Y. BaF3 cells stably expressing FLT3 R834Q or D835Y and growing in the absence of IL-3 were treated with PD98059 as indicated. Cell viability was measured after 48 hr, and the proportion of viable cells relative to the control (no inhibitor) was plotted. IC50 values are indicated. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (B) PD98059 treatment of BaF3 cells expressing FLT3 R834Q or D835Y resulted in dose-dependent inhibition of ERK1/2 phosphorylation. Cells were incubated with varying drug concentrations for 15 min, and whole-cell lysates were analyzed by western blotting as indicated. Figure options FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q Confer Varying Sensitivity to the TK Inhibitor PKC412  To determine the sensitivity of the four activating mutations to FLT3 inhibition, BaF3 cells expressing FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, or R834Q were treated with increasing concentrations of the small-molecule TK inhibitor PKC412. FLT3 Y572C, V592G, and R834Q conferred high sensitivity to PKC412 (inhibitory concentration of 50% [IC50], 2.5 nM, 5 nM, and 2.3 nM, respectively), whereas a considerably higher IC50 (48 nM) was observed for FLT3 S451F (Figure 4A). Western blot analysis showed that treatment with PKC412 led to dose-dependent decreases in FLT3 autophosphorylation and in phosphorylation of ERK1/2 that correlated with inhibition of cell growth (Figure 4B). WT FLT3-expressing BaF3 cells grown in the presence of IL-3 were used as a control for toxicity unrelated to FLT3 inhibition, and no antiproliferative effect was observed for concentrations of PKC412 up to 50 nM (Figure 4A). These data show that the four activating FLT3 mutations identified in our mutation screen can be inhibited by PKC412 and that Y572C, V592G, and R834Q are considerably more sensitive to this compound than S451F.  Varying Sensitivity of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q to Kinase Inhibition ... Figure 4.  Varying Sensitivity of FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q to Kinase Inhibition by PKC412 (A) Expression of FLT3 Y572C, V592G, or R834Q was associated with higher sensitivity to FLT3 inhibition as compared to FLT3 S451F. BaF3 cells growing in the absence of IL-3 were treated with PKC412 as indicated. Cell viability was measured after 48 hr, and the proportion of viable cells relative to the control (no inhibitor) was plotted. IC50 values are indicated. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (B) PKC412 treatment of BaF3 cells expressing FLT3 S451F, Y572C, V592G, and R834Q resulted in dose-dependent decreases in FLT3 and ERK1/2 phosphorylation. Cells were incubated with varying drug concentrations for 2 hr, and whole-cell lysates were analyzed by western blotting as indicated. Figure options Mutation of FLT3 V592 Promotes Aberrant Signal Transduction and Proliferation of Human AML Cells  To investigate the role of mutant FLT3 in human AML cells, we analyzed the MONO-MAC-6 cell line that has been reported to contain a V592A substitution in the FLT3 JM domain (Spiekermann et al., 2003). DNA sequence analysis confirmed the presence of a homozygous V592A mutation in this cell line (data not shown). Lentiviral transduction of MONO-MAC-6 cells with two short hairpin RNA (shRNA) constructs targeting different regions of the FLT3 transcript resulted in stable downregulation of FLT3 mRNA (Figure 5B) and reduced levels of FLT3 protein (Figure 5C). Knockdown of FLT3 was associated with a substantial reduction in cell viability as compared to cells transduced with a nontargeting control shRNA (Figure 5A). Western blot analysis showed that suppression of FLT3 resulted in loss of STAT5 phosphorylation (Figure 5C), indicating that STAT5 is a downstream target of mutations involving FLT3 V592, consistent with our signaling studies in BaF3 cells. These results suggest that endogenous point mutations of FLT3 V592 promote the growth and survival of human AML cells and that this effect is mediated through aberrant STAT5 activation.  Effects of FLT3 Knockdown in Human AML Cells(A) Downregulation of FLT3 using ... Figure 5.  Effects of FLT3 Knockdown in Human AML Cells (A) Downregulation of FLT3 using shRNA constructs TRCN 772 and TRCN 773 inhibited the growth of a human AML cell line, MONO-MAC-6, that harbors a homozyogus V592A mutation in the FLT3 JM domain. Experiments were performed in triplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (B) Transduction of MONO-MAC-6 cells with shRNA constructs TRCN 772 and TRCN 773 resulted in decreased FLT3 mRNA levels as compared to a nontargeting control construct. Experiments were performed in duplicate. Values are represented as mean ± SEM. (C) Suppression of FLT3 mRNA was associated with a reduction in FLT3 protein (upper panels) and with loss of STAT5 phosphorylation (lower panels). Figure options Structural Analysis of FLT3 Mutations  Based on the crystal structure of the intracellular domains of FLT3 (Protein Data Bank accession code 1RJB; Figure 6A), we assessed the potential mechanism by which point mutations in the JM domain and in the AL result in constitutive FLT3 kinase activity. Residues Y572 and R834 seem to be involved in maintaining the energetic favorability of the autoinhibited conformation of FLT3. Loss of the stabilizing effects of these residues should favor the active conformation. Y572, which has thus far not been found mutated in AML, is described as the first amino-terminal residue visible in the electron density of the crystal structure (Griffith et al., 2004). It is a key “hook” for the JM domain and is critical to maintain the autoinhibited conformation of FLT3 (Figure 6B). The Y572C substitution is expected to result in a substantial loss of hydrogen bonding networks and extensive hydrophobic interactions, with a consequent reduction in the energetic favorability of this conformation. Likewise, loss of hydrogen bonding networks that would result from the R834Q and D835Y mutations is expected to destabilize the autoinhibited kinase conformation (Figures 6C and 6D).  Structural Analysis of FLT3 Mutations(A) Ribbon representation of the crystal ... Figure 6.  Structural Analysis of FLT3 Mutations (A) Ribbon representation of the crystal structure of the FLT3 kinase domain (Protein Data Bank, accession code 1RJB). The structure is a typical kinase fold crystallized in the autoinhibited conformation with the JM domain packing closely to the kinase domain and locking the protein in this conformation. (B) Hydrogen bonding network formed by FLT3 Y572. Y572 inserts into the catalytic cleft of FLT3, where the phenolic hydroxyl oxygen forms hydrogen bonds to the catalytic glutamic acid, E661, and an ordered water molecule. The aromatic ring also makes extensive hydrophobic contacts. The Y572C mutation will disrupt this “hook” that locks the JM domain in the autoinhibited conformation. (C) Hydrogen bonding network formed by FLT3 R834. R834 is critical to the formation of a hydrogen bonding network that incorporates interactions with the side chains of residues N816, R815, Y842, D811, the backbone carbonyl oxygen of R815, and two water molecules. This network is directly adjacent to a hydrogen bonding network in which N841 plays a critical role. (D) Hydrogen bonding network formed by FLT3 D835. D835 is an integral part of a hydrogen bonding network that seems to stabilize the AL backbone in the autoinhibited conformation. There is a hydrogen bond directly between the carboxyl group and the backbone amide of residue S836. There is also an indirect hydrogen bond between the caryboxyl group and the backbone amide of M837 mediated by a water molecule. (E) Surface representation of the region proximal to G831. The molecular surface of FLT3 protein atoms is shown as a transparent gray surface. The surface is colored green where it contacts G831, and water molecules are shown as red spheres. The G831E mutation may not disrupt this conformation due to the proximity of a water-filled cavity adjacent to G831. In this figure, amino acid residues are shown in stick representation with nitrogen atoms in blue, oxygen in red, and carbon atoms the same color as the corresponding domain. Water molecules are shown as red spheres and hydrogen bonds as dashed red lines with their lengths labeled in Å. This figure was made using the program PyMOL (www.pymol.org). Figure options Conversely, structural analysis suggests that the nontransforming G831E substitution may not deleteriously affect the stability of the autoinhibited conformation. The molecular surface of autoinhibited FLT3 shows that there is a cavity directly adjacent to G831. This cavity is filled with water molecules and falls between the autoinhibited-conformation AL and JM domain (Figure 6E). Even though mutation of this glycine residue to glutamic acid is a substantial change, the glutamic acid residue should be able to be accommodated in the autoinhibited conformation by displacement of a number of water molecules. G831 lies within the invariant protein kinase DFG motif required for correct Mg2+•ATP coordination (Karlsson et al., 1993) and is important for conformational movements of the DFG motif between active and inactive states (Levinson et al., 2006). Consequently, the G831E mutation may stabilize FLT3 in the autoinhibited conformation and result in reduced kinase activity, consistent with our data showing a lack of FLT3 autophosphorylation in cells expressing FLT3 G831E.  Discussion We have used high-throughput DNA sequence analysis to determine the frequency and spectrum of mutations in the FLT3 gene in adult AML patients without known FLT3 ITDs or AL mutations. Sequencing of all FLT3 coding exons identified nine candidate leukemogenic alleles in six exons corresponding to different domains of the FLT3 receptor.  Large-scale mutational profiling studies in cancer typically result in extensive lists of validated nonsynonymous sequence variants. A major challenge of these studies is to distinguish driver mutations that are responsible for malignant transformation from nonfunctional passenger alterations that arise in the malignant clone by chance and accumulate during repeated rounds of cell division. To identify genetic changes with a role in tumorigenesis, statistical models have been developed that incorporate mutational frequency and distribution, and it has been inferred from such approaches that nonsynonymous passenger mutations are present at a higher frequency than previously anticipated (Greenman et al., 2007; Sjoblom et al., 2006 ;  Wood et al., 2007). We provide functional documentation of this concept by using a different strategy that combined both high-throughput DNA sequence analysis of FLT3 in primary AML samples with experimental validation of all potential driver mutations identified. Cytokine independence assays and biochemical analysis revealed that of the 9 candidate leukemogenic alleles, 4 are gain-of-function mutations that result in constitutive kinase activation and stimulation of downstream signaling pathways, properties that are relevant to leukemogenesis and can be exploited therapeutically, whereas the remaining 5 alleles were not associated with increased kinase activity and aberrant signal transduction.  These results also indicate that functional analyses can provide information beyond that derived from statistical methods for identifying driver mutations. First, we show that rare sequence variants occurring at frequencies that would not allow them to be distinguished from unselected passenger changes can be drivers. Second, we report that alleles in the kinase domain and in the AL—highly conserved and functionally relevant domains that, based on mathematical approaches, are likely to harbor driver mutations—may not be associated with a detectable gain of function. Third, statistical techniques result in identification of candidate cancer genes, but do not predict the ability of individual alleles to contribute to transformation. Our analysis of a series of nonsynonymous sequence variants in FLT3, a validated cancer gene ( Futreal et al., 2004), indicates that functional studies are needed to complement the bioinformatic approaches that have been described to date.  In addition to mutational frequency and distribution, statistical methods for assessing the functional relevance of DNA sequence variants in cancer rely on discerning acquired mutations from inherited polymorphisms. While the analysis of germline DNA is essential to assess the origin of cancer-associated genomic alterations and to determine whether a mutation has been selected for during tumorigenesis, previous findings in solid tumors indicate that the presence of a kinase mutation in constitutional DNA does not exclude the possibility that it has a potential role in malignant transformation (Bell et al., 2005; Jeffers et al., 1997; Mulloy et al., 2007 ;  Plaza-Menacho et al., 2006). These data further support the conclusion that the interpretation of high-throughput sequencing studies can be improved through functional assessment of candidate oncogenic alleles.  The four activating mutations that were identified in our screen are located in the EC domain (S451F), the JM domain (Y572C and V592G), and the AL (R834Q) of FLT3. Sequence variants in the EC region (D324N and N520Y) have been described previously in patients with AML (Ley et al., 2003 ;  Syampurnawati et al., 2007). However, D324N is also present in normal individuals and in nonhematopoietic tissues from AML patients and does not confer cytokine-independent growth to BaF3 cells (Schnittger et al., 2006), whereas the functional consequences of N520Y have not been assessed. Our results thus document that FLT3, like EGFR and KIT (Gari et al., 1999 ;  Lee et al., 2006), can be activated by mutations in the EC domain. To determine the mechanism by which the S451F mutation results in constitutive FLT3 kinase activity, structural analysis of a larger FLT3 molecule that includes the EC domain will be required.  Point mutations in the region between amino acids 579 and 594 in the FLT3 JM domain have been detected in a small proportion of AML cases (Reindl et al., 2006 ;  Stirewalt et al., 2004). We have found a valine to glycine substitution involving residue 592 and a mutation involving Y572. Y572 is the first amino acid of the JM domain, and analysis of the crystal structure of the FLT3 cytoplasmic domain has suggested a key role for this residue in kinase autoinhibition (Griffith et al., 2004). Our structural analysis suggests that mutation of Y572 would result in disruption of its extensive interactions with the surrounding FLT3 subdomains and consequent destabilization of the inactive kinase conformation. In support of this hypothesis, the Y572C substitution that was identified in our mutation screen results in constitutive FLT3 kinase activity. These data provide genetic evidence for the importance of Y572 in maintaining the autoinhibited conformation of FLT3 and suggest that any mutation that interferes with the stability of the JM domain in this conformation is likely to be transforming.  The signaling properties of the two JM domain point mutations are similar to those of FLT3 ITDs (Parcells et al., 2006). In particular, aberrant activation of STAT5 by JM domain point mutations appears to involve two tyrosine residues, Y589 and Y591, that are essential for FLT3 ITD-mediated induction of STAT5 and leukemic transformation in vivo (Rocnik et al., 2006). Analysis of the role of Y589 and Y591 also provided insights into the deregulation of other signaling pathways by mutant FLT3. For example, the majority of primary AML samples are characterized by activated MAPK and PI3K/AKT signaling; however, the fact that dysregulation of various upstream effectors can result in aberrant phosphorylation of ERK1/2 and AKT indicates that the MAPK and PI3K/AKT cascades may be activated through a variety of different mechanisms (Martelli et al., 2006 ;  Platanias, 2003). In support of the hypothesis that mutant TKs activate downstream signaling pathways by distinct mechanisms, phosphorylation of ERK1/2 and AKT by FLT3 JM domain point mutations also requires Y589 and Y591, and similar observations were made for constitutive activation of STAT3. These results suggest that the different types of JM domain mutations (ITDs and point mutations) contribute in similar ways to myeloid leukemogenesis and demonstrate that Y589 and Y591 are critical for the induction of several signaling pathways that are activated in leukemias with FLT3 JM domain mutations. Furthermore, these findings illustrate the potential of point mutations to alter the substrate specificity of protein kinases. Whether FLT3 Y589/591-mediated signal transduction in AML involves direct engagement of downstream effectors by these residues or requires additional adaptor molecules is currently unknown.  Previously described mutations in the FLT3 AL include substitutions, insertions, or deletions within a region between amino acids 834 and 842, with D835 being the most commonly affected residue (Frohling et al., 2005). We identified nonsynonymous substitutions at codons 831 and 834. Analysis of the crystal structure of the FLT3 kinase domain suggests that mutation of residue R834 would interfere with the stability of the autoinhibited conformation, and in agreement with this hypothesis, FLT3 R834Q has constitutive kinase activity and confers IL-3-independent growth to BaF3 cells. In contrast, mutation of the conserved DFG motif G831 to glutamic acid may deleteriously affect the structural requirements for enzymatic activity, is expected to be compatible with the autoinhibited conformation, and does not result in transformation of hematopoietic cells. These results illustrate the value of structural analysis for understanding the atomic-level mechanisms by which TK mutations associated with human leukemias function. In addition, these data indicate that the autoinhibited conformation of FLT3 is critically dependent on the stabilizing contacts of a limited number of specific amino acids, whereas mutation of other residues within the AL does not alter the structure and function of the FLT3 kinase.  Analysis of the signaling properties of FLT3 R834Q demonstrated that this mutation, unlike the more common D835Y allele, results in activation of ERK1/2, but not AKT, STAT3, or STAT5. Consistent with this observation, the R834Q mutation is associated with enhanced sensitivity to MEK inhibition, indicating that cells expressing R834Q are more reliant on MAPK signaling than are D835Y-expressing cells that constitutively phosphorylate multiple signaling proteins. These results suggest that there are not only differences in signal transduction between various FLT3 mutation classes, for example, ITDs and AL mutations (Choudhary et al., 2005 ;  Grundler et al., 2005), but also between distinct alleles within a given mutation class and that cells carrying different FLT3 mutations are differentially dependent on certain signaling pathways.  To determine the functional consequences of candidate mutations, we used an in vitro assay that is based on exogenous expression of mutated alleles in murine hematopoietic cells. This assay has proved to be of value for the assessment of increased TK activity and perturbed signal transduction and has been validated for numerous TK alleles identified in human hematologic malignancies, including FLT3 ITDs and AL mutations (Clark et al., 2004 ;  Weisberg et al., 2002), as well as for TK alleles associated with solid tumors, such as mutations in the EGFR kinase domain and the recently discovered EML4-ALK fusion in patients with non-small-cell lung cancer (Jiang et al., 2005 ;  Soda et al., 2007). On the other hand, conversion of BaF3 cells to cytokine independence may not faithfully assess the functional implications of certain mutations, either because they require expression of additional proteins (Lu et al., 2005) or because cooperativity between two or more mutations is required for signaling pathway activation. Lastly, this assay may fail to detect a gain of function conferred by kinase mutations that do not result in increased enzymatic activity. For instance, Wan et al. (2004) described three mutants of the serine-threonine kinase BRAF with impaired catalytic activity that are capable of stimulating downstream signaling through transactivation of CRAF. Although we observed no activation of ERK1/2, AKT, STAT3, or STAT5 in cells expressing FLT3 mutations that read out as nonfunctional in the BaF3 assay, it is possible that some of these alleles stimulate other effector molecules that were not analyzed in our study. We recognize that it is impossible to definitively exclude any conceivable function of a given mutation. Nonetheless, the nontransforming mutations identified in our screen do not meet conventional criteria for effects on kinase activation.  The activating mutations identified in our study conferred varying degrees of sensitivity to the small-molecule TK inhibitor PKC412. Cells expressing Y572C, V592G, or R834Q were highly sensitive to this compound, as has been reported for other JM domain (Reindl et al., 2006) and AL mutations (Choudhary et al., 2005; Grundler et al., 2003 ;  Weisberg et al., 2002). In contrast, cytotoxic responses in S451F-expressing cells required substantially higher drug concentrations. The determinants of response to pharmacologic inhibition of FLT3 are diverse and remain only partly understood. In general, the presence of mutant FLT3 is associated with increased drug sensitivity (DeAngelo et al., 2006 ;  Fiedler et al., 2005), yet there appears to be substantial variation among the different mutation types (Choudhary et al., 2005; Grundler et al., 2003 ;  Weisberg et al., 2002) as well as between individual alleles within the same mutation class (Clark et al., 2004 ;  Grundler et al., 2003). In addition, it has been observed that patients without FLT3 ITDs or any of the known AL mutations may also derive benefit from FLT3 inhibitor therapy, which might be related to the presence of previously unrecognized mutations (Schittenhelm et al., 2006), and in vitro studies in primary AML samples have shown that there is substantial interpatient variation in the degree of dependency on FLT3 signaling (Knapper et al., 2006). Our findings further illustrate the complex relationship between FLT3 mutation status and response to pharmacologic FLT3 inhibition.  In summary, our results demonstrate that previously unrecognized activating FLT3 mutations in the EC domain, the JM domain, and the AL occur in patients with AML, albeit at a low frequency. Since mutations lying outside the usually studied mutational hotspots may confer sensitivity to small-molecule TK inhibitors, eligibility for clinical trials of FLT3-targeted therapies should not be based on diagnostic screens that are limited to the detection of only a fraction of the FLT3 mutations associated with AML. The development of sensitive, allele-specific assays, such as mass spectrometry-based genotyping (Thomas et al., 2007), will allow all patients enrolled on trials of FLT3 inhibitors to be genotyped for all known FLT3 alleles, and it is hoped that similar strategies will be used in trials of molecularly targeted therapies for patients with different hematopoietic malignancies and solid tumors.  FLT3 is a highly annotated and well-studied cancer gene known to play a key role in myeloid leukemogenesis. The finding that only a fraction of the nonsynonymous FLT3 mutations associated with AML result in constitutive kinase activity illustrates the challenge in distinguishing between sequence variants that contribute to malignant transformation and nonfunctional passenger mutations. Given that the increasing throughput of DNA sequencing technologies will allow improved characterization of somatic cancer genomes, these data demonstrate that a combination of genetic and functional approaches will be crucial in order to identify the mutations that truly drive the development of cancer and to validate the potential of suspected oncogenic alleles as therapeutic targets.  Experimental Procedures Patient Samples  This study included 349 adult patients with AML, de novo or secondary after treatment for a primary malignancy or following myelodysplasia, as defined by French-American-British Cooperative Group criteria or the World Health Organization classification (Bennett et al., 1985 ;  Harris et al., 1999). Diagnostic BM and peripheral blood samples were collected after obtaining informed consent according to the Declaration of Helsinki and with institutional review board approval of the relevant institutions. All samples were enriched for mononuclear cells by density centrifugation before banking. Only samples with more than 50% blasts were included for DNA sequence analysis, and more than 80% of the samples had at least 80% blasts. All specimens that were analyzed by DNA sequencing were negative for FLT3 ITDs, as assessed by PCR amplification of exons 14 and 15; for FLT3 AL mutations involving codons 835 and 836, as assessed by PCR amplification of exon 20 followed by EcoRV digestion; for activating KIT mutations, as assessed by sequencing of exons 8 and 17; and for mutations involving NRAS codons 12, 13, and 61, as assessed by sequencing of exons 1 and 2.  FLT3 Mutational Analysis and Selection of Candidate Mutations  Extraction of genomic DNA, amplification of FLT3 exons, bidirectional sequencing, and sequence detection were performed using a high-throughput resequencing approach as previously described ( Levine et al., 2005). External gene-specific primers and internal M13-appended primers are listed in Table S5. Analysis of sequence traces was performed using Mutation Surveyor version 2.28 (SoftGenetics, State College, PA). Five steps were used to identify mutations of interest. First, any synonymous substitutions were not analyzed further. Second, known SNPs were excluded by comparison to the dbSNP database (release 127; http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/projects/SNP). Third, published data sets ( Greenman et al., 2007 ;  Ley et al., 2003) were queried to exclude any nonsynonymous substitutions in the FLT3 coding sequence that have been detected in DNA samples derived from normal tissues. Fourth, sequence chromatograms were visually inspected to remove false positive calls in the automated analysis. Fifth, candidate mutations were reamplified and sequenced from the original DNA sample for independent verification. Leukemic cells at diagnosis and a matched remission sample were analyzed in one case with a presumptive leukemogenic mutation in the FLT3 kinase domain, M737I.  Genotyping  Mass spectrometry genotyping was performed as previously described (Levine et al., 2005). Primers and primer extension probes for detection of the different FLT3 alleles are listed in Table S6.  DNA Constructs and Retrovirus Production  Sequence variants were introduced into the full-length FLT3 cDNA using the QuikChange XL Site-Directed Mutagenesis Kit (Stratagene, La Jolla, CA). All mutations were confirmed by sequencing of the entire FLT3 open reading frame. The mutant cDNAs were cloned into the MSCV-PGK-neo retroviral vector, and full-length protein expression was documented by western blotting. Generation of retroviral supernatants and infection of BaF3 cells were performed as described previously ( Rocnik et al., 2006). BaF3 cells transduced with MSCV-PGK-neo constructs were selected with G418 in the presence of IL-3 for 14 days.  Cell Culture  BaF3 cells were maintained in RPMI-1640 supplemented with 10% fetal calf serum and 10% WEHI-conditioned medium as a source of IL-3. For cytokine independence assays, cells transduced with each of the MSCV-PGK-neo retroviral contructs were seeded at a density of 0.33 × 106/ml in IL-3-free medium, and the number of viable cells was determined daily by trypan blue exclusion. For growth inhibition assays, cells were seeded at a density of 1 × 105/ml in IL-3-free medium with various concentrations of PKC412 (Novartis, Basel, Switzerland) or PD98059 (Calbiochem, San Diego, CA), and the number of viable cells was determined after 48 hr using the CellTiter 96AQueous One Solution Proliferation Assay (Promega, Madison, WI).  Immunoprecipitation and Western Blotting  Immunoprecipitation and western blotting were performed as described previously (Rocnik et al., 2006) using the following antibodies: anti-FLT3, anti-STAT5, anti-phospho-ERK1/2 (T202/Y204) (Santa Cruz Biotechnology, Santa Cruz, CA); anti-STAT3, anti-phospho-STAT3 (Y705), anti-phospho-STAT5 (Y694), anti-ERK1/2, anti-AKT, anti-phospho-AKT (S473) (Cell Signaling Technology, Beverly, MA); and anti-phosphotyrosine (4G10) (Upstate, Lake Placid, NY).  Knockdown of FLT3 Expression  Two pLKO.1-based lentiviral vectors encoding shRNAs targeted to the 3′ untranslated region (TRCN 772) or the coding sequence (TRCN 773) of the human FLT3 mRNA, and a pLKO.1 construct containing a nontargeting shRNA sequence were obtained from the MISSION TRC-Hs 1.0 (Human) shRNA library ( Root et al., 2006). The oligonucleotide sequences of the shRNAs were as follows (21-nucleotide stem sequences matching the target transcript underlined; noncomplementary 6-nucleotide loop sequences italicized): TRCN 772, 5′-CCG GCG TCT GCG TTT ACT CTT GTT TCT CGA GAA ACA AGA GTA AAC GCA GAC GTT TTT-3′; TRCN 773, 5′-CCG GGC TAA CTT CTA CAA ACT GAT TCT CGA GAA TCA GTT TGT AGA AGT TAG CTT TTT-3′. Generation of lentiviral supernatants and infection of human AML cells were performed as described previously (Scholl et al., 2007).  
1698||Identification of a high-risk disease-causing constitutional mutation in a cancer patient guides the clinical management of their whole family, with implications for counseling, cancer treatment options and presymptomatic surveillance, and considerations of risk-reducing surgery and/or medication regimens1. Carriers of mutations in the mismatch repair (MMR) genes MLH1, MSH2, MSH6 and PMS2 causing Lynch syndrome1 have a substantially increased risk of colorectal and endometrial cancers, along with increased risk of ovarian, gastric, small bowel, urothelial, brain, hepatobiliary, pancreatic, bladder, kidney, prostate and breast cancers1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8. However, intensive management reduces mortality9.  Sequence variants of uncertain functional and clinical relevance are common in genetic test reports. Although several lines of evidence can be evaluated to assess the clinical implications of these variants, usually none of these approaches can be used on its own to obtain clinically useful interpretations and, for many variants, comprehensive data are lacking. Laboratories are generally conservative in designating pathogenic variants, defining variants as being of 'uncertain significance' unless overwhelming evidence of pathogenicity exists. Several schemes for the classification of variants in genes associated with mendelian conditions have been proposed for use in the clinical setting. Because clinically useful actions are currently only considered for high-penetrance mutations, all of these systems are aimed at differentiating high-penetrance from low-penetrance and neutral variants and do not consider variants of intermediate risk. These schemes differ in the range and format of data used for classification and in the number of variant classes10, 11, 12. The International Agency for Research on Cancer (IARC) classification system, endorsed by the Human Variome Project (HVP), facilitates standardized categorization by defining classes that can be linked to validated quantitative measures of causality and/or pathogenicity from statistical models13, 14, 15, 16 or to validated interpretation of qualitative data17. Importantly, only the five-class IARC system has been linked to clinical recommendations for all classes, including clinical testing and full high-risk surveillance guidelines for class 5 (pathogenic) and class 4 (likely pathogenic) variants; advice to treat as if “no mutation associated with disease has been detected” for class 1 (not pathogenic) and class 2 (likely not pathogenic) variants; and acquisition of additional data to provide more robust classification for class 2 (likely not pathogenic), class 3 (uncertain) and class 4 (likely pathogenic) variants.  Locus-specific databases (LSDBs) are an important source of information for clinicians and researchers in assessing data and forming opinions on the clinical relevance of disease-associated gene sequence variants, and these databases have a fundamental role in variant classification owing to their added value from having aggregated data. Consistent and normalized data curation is critical to the value derived from databases in categorizing the relationship between genetic variation and disease—especially for clinical applications. It has previously been recommended by the IARC Working Group that a panel covering a range of expertise in variant classification provide consensus opinion on variant pathogenicity before publicly accessible display of such information18. Another important component of the classifications provided by LSDBs is transparency regarding the criteria and supporting information used for classification, which allows LSDB users to consider the information for their own applications in research or clinical settings18.   InSiGHT has merged multiple gene mutation and variant repositories to create the InSiGHT Colon Cancer Gene Variant Database for MMR and other colon cancer susceptibility genes19, 20, 21, 22, 23, hosted by the Leiden Open Variation Database (LOVD). Following recommendations for LSDB curation18, InSiGHT formed an international panel of researchers and clinicians to review MMR gene variants submitted to the database. To encourage the submission of unpublished clinical and research data to further facilitate variant classification, the microattribution approach24 was implemented using Open Researcher and Contributor Identification (ORCID). Here we present the results of the InSiGHT Variant Interpretation Committee (VIC) effort to develop, test and apply a 5-tiered scheme to classify 2,360 unique constitutional MMR gene variants.  Results Abstract• Introduction• Results• Discussion• Methods• Accession codes• References• Acknowledgments• Author information• Supplementary information Curation of MMR gene variants As of the end of December 2012, after 3,458 alterations to standardize nomenclature had been made, there were 12,635 submissions of 2,730 unique MMR gene variants lodged in the InSiGHT database. Furthermore, 370 unique variants (13.6%) were not identified in constitutional (germline) DNA (see Supplementary Fig. 1 and Supplementary Table 1 for details) and were excluded from further analyses because (i) no evidence existed that these occurred as constitutional variants and (ii) no clinical information was available to assess their potential roles in hereditary disease. The 2,360 constitutional variants included 932 MLH1 (39%), 842 MSH2 (36%), 449 MSH6 (19%) and 137 PMS2 (6%) variants. Most variants (800; 34%) were nonsense or frameshift changes predicted to cause protein truncation, with the next largest group (746; 32%) consisting of nonsynonymous variants that were not obviously truncating, including missense substitutions, small in-frame insertion-deletion mutations (indels) and read-through alterations of the translation termination codon.  Variants had originally been assigned a classification by submitters according to the following classes: pathogenic, probably pathogenic, no known pathogenicity, probably no pathogenicity or effect unknown. No information was recorded to document the rationale for classification or the standards used to classify variants. When considering the 1,382 constitutional variants with multiple entries in the InSiGHT database, discordance in classification between submitters was found for 869 variants. Some of this discordance arose because of classification based on single data points or references, such as results from a single functional assay22 or inferences from individual publications originally lodged in the Mismatch Repair Genes Variant Database23 (see the example in Supplementary Table 2).  Development of a five-tiered system for classification The InSiGHT VIC (Online Methods) was established in 2007 to address discrepancies in the classification of MMR gene variants lodged in the InSiGHT database. Since March 2011, the VIC has made a concerted effort to develop standardized criteria for variant classification, employing a modified Delphi consensus process25 to evaluate current scientific evidence and reach consensus. In line with HVP26, the IARC classification system10 for variant categorization (Table 1) was adopted by InSiGHT for the classification of MMR gene variants. Briefly, multiple lines of evidence were required for classification, and evidence for each variant had to include data associating the variant with both clinical and functional consequences (Online Methods).  Table 1: InSiGHT variant classification scheme with accompanying recommendations for family management, adapted from the IARC five-tiered classification system Full table Figures/tables index The scheme was first tested on a subset of 117 MMR gene variants, and the criteria evolved and were refined by consensus to accommodate new data and inconsistencies over multiple classification teleconferences and face-to-face meetings. Final criteria were then applied retrospectively and to all remaining unique variants listed in the database (Supplementary Table 3). An overview of the InSiGHT classification criteria is shown in Figure 1 (see Supplementary Table 4 and the Supplementary Note for detailed criteria and justifications). At the close of each VIC teleconference or meeting, consensus classifications were noted. Where necessary, action items to improve or clarify classification included (i) calls for missing clinical and functional information for specific variants to committee members and the general InSiGHT membership; (ii) requests for more detailed data or data clarification from the authors of original publications; and (iii) reassessment of classification after additional data were obtained. At the end of the process, the InSiGHT database was updated with the final consensus classifications and the supporting data to ensure transparency.  Figure 1: Overview of the five-tiered InSiGHT classification guidelines. Overview of the five-tiered InSiGHT classification guidelines. (a) Simplified guidelines describing the levels and types of evidence required for each tier of the classification. Full guidelines are described in the Supplementary Note, and the detailed rationale behind each criterion is provided in Supplementary Table 3. The Lynch syndrome molecular phenotype described in classes 4 and 5 includes information on MSI and/or loss of expression of relevant protein(s), as determined by immunohistochemistry. In this study, variants resulting in the introduction of a premature termination codon or large genomic deletions affecting functionally important domains, generally considered pathogenic on the basis of DNA sequence alone, are referred to as class 5a (assumed pathogenic) variants. All other variants categorized in class 5 are termed class 5b variants. (b) Flowchart used to assist in the interpretation of available data from functional assays. Assays reviewed for classification are shown in Supplementary Table 4, and the values used to define abrogated or normal function are shown in Supplementary Table 5. Cutoffs of <25% and >75% protein expression, as used in previous publications47, 48, are very conservative given that abrogated function has been reported to be associated with a decrease in MLH1 expression of ~50% or more49. For variants that had normal, inconclusive or intermediate MMR activity in two independent assays but were deficient in protein function in two independent assays, abrogated function was assigned. AF, allele frequency; PP, posterior probability of pathogenicity derived by multifactorial likelihood analysis; CMMRD, constitutional MMR deficiency (MIM 276300); LR, likelihood ratio; LS, Lynch syndrome; MSS, microsatellite stable; CRC, colorectal cancer; IHC, immunohistochemistry; NMD, nonsense-mediated decay.  Full size image (421 KB) Figures/tables index Next The major issues faced by the committee in the review process included redundancy across multiple sources (resolved through discussion with the authors of original publications), paucity of information, incomplete or inaccurate data and difficulties in the interpretation of the results of functional assays. To facilitate the interpretation of findings from functional assays, supporting information and flowcharts were developed (Fig. 1b and Supplementary Tables 5 and 6), and multiple meetings were coordinated that were dedicated to the review of variants with apparently discordant results from functional assays (Supplementary Table 3).  Validation of the InSiGHT qualitative classification criteria Nonsense or frameshift alterations or large genomic deletions interrupting functionally important domains are generally considered pathogenic on the basis of DNA sequence alone; these variants were designated here as class 5a (assumed pathogenic). There were 990 assumed pathogenic variants in the database, 640 of which were private mutations. To demonstrate the robustness of the qualitative classification criteria, 170 assumed pathogenic variants (68 MLH1, 75 MSH2, 13 MSH6 and 14 PMS2) were reviewed as a validation set against the class 5 (pathogenic) qualitative criteria required for the assignment of variants to class 5b (Online Methods and Supplementary Table 7). Designation of a variant as class 5b required evidence of abrogated protein function, at least two tumors with microsatellite instability (MSI) or appropriate loss of MMR protein expression and a segregation likelihood ratio of >10:1 (incorporating gene-specific cumulative risks27) or variant cosegregation with disease reported in at least two Amsterdam criteria–positive families. Class 5b was attained by all 60 validation set variants that had sufficient clinical data to assess these required criteria. The other 110 validation set variants could not be assigned to class 5b, largely because family cosegregation and tumor data were scarce or unobtainable—presumably because these variants are accepted as disease causing and are routinely used for clinical presymptomatic testing in families (Online Methods). Of these variants, 72 were assigned to class 4 owing to lack of only 1 point of evidence, and 38 variants were assigned to class 3 owing to insufficient data. However, only 2 of 13 MSH6 and 2 of 14 PMS2 variants fulfilled class 5b criteria, reflecting the lower penetrance and later age of onset associated with deleterious variants in PMS2 (ref. 28) and MSH6 (ref. 29). Together, these results indicate that the criteria for classification using qualitative data were sufficiently stringent to ensure conservative classification.  Classification of 2,360 constitutional MMR gene variants Of the 12,006 eligible variant entries in the InSIGHT database, submitter and final classifications differed for 7,935 (66%), including changes from class 1 (not pathogenic) to class 5 (pathogenic) and vice versa (Fig. 2a). The overall breakdown of final classifications is shown in Figure 2b. In addition to the 990 assumed pathogenic truncating or large-deletion variants (class 5a), consistent medical management is now also possible for the remaining 1,370 not obviously truncating variants; these include 167 class 5 (pathogenic) variants (class 5b) (12%), 183 class 4 (likely pathogenic) variants (14%), 86 class 2 (likely not pathogenic) variants (6%) and 169 class 1 (not pathogenic) variants (12%).  Figure 2: Outcome of standardized five-tiered InSiGHT classification of constitutional MMR gene variants. Outcome of standardized five-tiered InSiGHT classification of constitutional MMR gene variants. (a) The graph plots the proportion of five-tiered classifications for all documented constitutional variants in the database against the original LOVD database classifications assigned by submitters. Class 5a is a subset of class 5 containing assumed pathogenic nonsense mutations, small frameshift indels and large deletions. Class 5b includes variants that are not obviously truncating but are considered to be pathogenic on the basis of combined evidence (Supplementary Note). Results show that standardized classification led to altered classifications for a considerable proportion of variant entries, including the downgrading of variants submitted as pathogenic (24%) and the upgrading of variants with unknown pathogenicity to likely pathogenic (5.6%) or pathogenic (48%). In addition, clinically important misclassifications were identified for unique variants initially submitted as not pathogenic (54 unique variants reclassified as class 5b variants and 25 reclassified as class 4 variants) and unique variants submitted as pathogenic (28 unique variants reclassified as class 1 variants, 16 reclassified as class 2 variants and 218 reclassified as class 3 variants). (b) Pie chart showing the distribution of final InSiGHT VIC consensus classifications.  Full size image (214 KB) Download Excel source data (40 KB) Previous Figures/tables index Next Nonsynonymous variants made up the majority of class 3 variants (524/765; 68%) and newly assigned class 5b variants (91/167; 54%) (Fig. 3 and Supplementary Fig. 2; see Supplementary Table 8 for detailed information supporting classifications). Substitutions at canonical dinucleotide splice sites fell predominantly in class 4 owing to lack of functional RNA analyses; however, if experimentally tested, these variants would likely be moved to class 5b. Intronic variants outside of conserved splice sites were the most prevalent variant type in class 1.  Figure 3: Classifications of all documented unique variants by variant type. Classifications of all documented unique variants by variant type. The plot represents the proportion of the different variant types within the five classes. Class 5a is a subset of class 5 containing assumed pathogenic mutations (nonsense mutations, small frameshift indels and large deletions). All other variants placed in class 5 are termed class 5b variants (Supplementary Note). The different variant types include the following: ATG/UTR, variants in the initiation codon and the 5′ or 3′ UTR; I, intronic variants outside of the canonical splice-site dinucleotides; S, synonymous variants; NS, not obviously truncating nonsynonymous variants outside of the Kozak consensus sequence, i.e., missense, small in-frame indel and read-through translation termination codon alterations; SS, variants in the canonical splice-site dinucleotides; LGDup, large genomic duplications; LGDel, large genomic deletions or disrupting inversions; PTC, variants that introduce premature termination codons, i.e., nonsense mutations and small frameshift indels. See Supplementary Figure 2 for further details of variant types by MMR gene.  Full size image (144 KB) Download Excel source data (34 KB) Previous Figures/tables index Next Final categorization (Online Methods) of not obviously truncating variants as class 1, 2, 4 or 5 was achieved by applying qualitative criteria for 391 variants, quantitative multifactorial likelihood analysis methodology (based on bioinformatic prior probabilities and evidence from segregation and/or tumor data; see Thompson et al.16) for 192 variants and either quantitative or qualitative criteria for 26 variants. Where classifications derived using quantitative criteria differed from those generated with qualitative criteria, this difference reflected the amount of data available rather than deficiencies in the classification criteria, with no variants considered to fall into class 1 or 2 using one approach and class 4 or 5 using the other. Six synonymous variants were categorized in class 5b owing to their effects on splicing. Of the substitutions occurring in initiation codons (often assumed to be pathogenic30, 31, 32), only one of nine had sufficient evidence to determine pathogenicity.  Implementing microattribution Microattribution is a means to incentivize the placement of unpublished data in the public domain by assigning scholarly contribution to authors similar to the citation conventions afforded to journal articles33. Retrospective and prospective microattribution was implemented to acknowledge and encourage the submission of unpublished data to the InSiGHT database, including the submission of additional detailed clinical information from authors of published reports. Microattribution was assigned for initial variant submission, segregation and family history data, pathology diagnostics (MSI analysis and immunohistochemistry) information, data from in vitro functional assays (mainly RNA splicing) and the determination of variant frequencies in normal individuals. As of July 2013, a total of 6,015 microattributions were conferred, including 3,763 for variant submission, 2,111 for family and tumor pathology data, 97 for data from in vitro assays and 25 for frequency data. Notably, 19% of the microattributions for clinical and functional data contributed additional information critical for the classification of variants in the class 5a (assumed pathogenic) validation subset. These data also highlighted the fact that clinical testing for these assumed pathogenic variants is mostly undertaken in the presymptomatic setting. The contribution of microattribution to the final classification of not obviously truncating variants is shown in Figure 4. Notably, classification was altered for 57 of 169 (34%) variants for which unpublished data were obtained. Moreover, implementation of microattribution stimulated the submission of 128 new MMR gene variants yet to be classified.  Figure 4: Contribution of microattribution to the classification of variants that are not obviously truncating. Contribution of microattribution to the classification of variants that are not obviously truncating. Dark shading (yes) indicates the proportion of total variants for each class where the additional data obtained through microattribution contributed to final classification.  Full size image (98 KB) Download Excel source data (32 KB) Previous Figures/tables index Next Class 3 variants of uncertain relevance Missense variants in MMR genes are abundant among class 3 (uncertain) variants and present a considerable clinical problem. Quantitative multifactorial likelihood analysis is an effective approach for the classification of missense variants, as validated bioinformatic predictions34 based on amino acid conservation and physicochemical properties can be used as a surrogate for the in vitro effects of variants on protein function. In silico analyses previously shown to be highly accurate (area under receiving operator characteristic (ROC) curve of 0.93)34 were used to estimate the prior probability of pathogenicity for all 481 class 3 (uncertain) missense variants (Fig. 5) to prioritize requests for data to facilitate future multifactorial analysis. The distribution of prior probabilities for MLH1 and MSH2 class 3 variants was clearly bimodal, suggesting that ~50% of MLH1 and MSH2 missense variants may be classified as pathogenic after further investigation. In total, 401 missense variants had extreme prior probabilities of ≤20% or ≥80%, with 270 having probabilities of <10% or >90%, indicating that classification of a variant as class 1 or class 5 could be easily performed by incorporating segregation or tumor information. It is also possible that some class 3 variants with low prior probability of pathogenicity based on the predicted missense alteration would cause splicing aberrations, as already observed for 42 of the 746 not obviously truncating nonsynonymous variants. Incorporation of validated bioinformatic splicing prediction tools into the MMR gene multifactorial model, as is under development for BRCA1 and BRCA2 (ref. 35), will assist in the prioritization of variants with the potential to disrupt splicing.  Figure 5: Probabilities of pathogenicity for 481 class 3 missense variants of uncertain effect derived by in silico analysis. Probabilities of pathogenicity for 481 class 3 missense variants of uncertain effect derived by in silico analysis. (a–e) Distribution of probabilities of pathogenicity as estimated from a calibrated algorithm based on customized MAPP and PolyPhen-2 scores34 for MLH1, n = 186 (a), MSH2, n = 169 (b), MSH6, n = 145 (c), PMS2, n = 24 (d) and all four MMR genes (e), showing stratification of variants with prior probabilities of ≤20% or ≥80% to prioritize variants for further investigation and classification.  Full size image (69 KB) Download Excel source data (36 KB) Previous Figures/tables index In investigation of the potential effects of class 3 regulatory variants (Online Methods), all 15 5′ UTR variants fell within multiple transcription factor binding sites, but no evidence for interruption of microRNA binding was found for 6 variants in the 3′ UTR (data not shown). Multifactorial analyses and transcription assays would help elucidate whether these variants affect gene function.  Discussion Abstract• Introduction• Results• Discussion• Methods• Accession codes• References• Acknowledgments• Author information• Supplementary information The InSiGHT VIC has successfully undertaken a collaborative effort to establish standardized variant interpretation guidelines, encourage data submission and provide objective assessment of MMR gene variants involved in Lynch syndrome. The criteria developed provide a basis for the standardized clinical classification of variants to inform patient and family management through genetic counseling10. This initiative has achieved the systematic evaluation of 2,360 constitutional variants, which will benefit thousands of families internationally. Notably, 605 variants not resulting in the introduction of a premature termination codon, including 217 nonsynonymous substitutions, have now been assigned to class 5 (pathogenic) and class 4 (likely pathogenic) or to class 1 (not pathogenic) and class 2 (likely not pathogenic). The assigned classes of these variants can now also be used as standards for the calibration of functional assays36, 37.  The clinical relevance of 32% of the variants investigated remains uncertain. A large proportion of these (71%) were private variants occurring in only one family, and these variants are difficult to classify owing to the paucity of available clinical information. Clinicians have a fundamental role in promoting the collection of segregation information and other data relevant for classification. We anticipate that the development of this interpretation scheme, along with the implementation of microattribution, will incentivize assistance in the accumulation of clinical data. The value of microattribution for data accrual has previously been demonstrated for hemoglobinopathies24, and the InSiGHT initiative now demonstrates the clinical usefulness of data collection. The promotion of standardized data formats will assist in the transition to fully quantitative, unbiased classification, eventually incorporating other components of the qualitative guidelines. In addition, the difficulties experienced in interpreting apparently discordant data from functional assays emphasize the importance of assay validation and standardization38, 39. Such experience will be directly applicable to the functional analysis of deep intronic and regulatory variants, which are increasingly detected with the advancement of DNA sequencing technologies.  To accommodate the lower penetrance and reported lower degrees of tumor MSI associated with MSH6 and PMS2 mutations28, 29, 40, 41, 42, 43, 44, gene-specific criteria should also be considered for future iterations of the classification guidelines, for example, stipulating the inclusion of segregation odds for MSH6 and PMS2 variants for classification or using modified panels to detect MSI status.  Another challenging issue to contemplate will be incorporating alleles of intermediate risk45 into classification schemes, including the clinical recommendations that might be linked to such variants. The identification of a subset of MMR gene alleles with apparently discordant clinical and functional features that renders them resistant to classification will provide the basis for future studies to define the most appropriate methodology and criteria to identify such variants. Further studies will also be required to assess whether variants resulting in abrogated DNA damage response but normal MMR46 are associated with the same clinical features as classical pathogenic mutations in MMR genes.  The InSiGHT database is a well-recognized resource for the clinical and research communities, receiving over 20,000 hits per month. The development and adoption of standard templates allows transparency in the review process. Database users can view relevant information and sources in relation to information on guideline interpretation when considering the classification provided by the committee. The guidelines must evolve to accommodate additional kinds of evidence, but we anticipate no clinical issues as long as variant classifications are dated and linked to a dated set of guidelines with the supporting information used to derive classifications. Final classifications have also been submitted to the NCBI ClinVar database for higher exposure, but expert classifications and underlying data rest with InSiGHT.  To our knowledge, this is the first large-scale comprehensive classification effort demonstrating the value of evaluation by expert panel in the curation of an LSDB and providing summary information used to assign variant pathogenicity. This initiative also shows how classification may be assisted by promoting standardized data submission from stakeholders in the clinical and research settings, thereby allowing access to unpublished clinical and functional information used to facilitate variant classification. Thus, the InSiGHT initiative provides a key model of LSDB-centric multidisciplinary collaboration for the transparent interpretation of DNA variants.  Methods Abstract• Introduction• Results• Discussion• Methods• Accession codes• References• Acknowledgments• Author information• Supplementary information InSiGHT Variant Interpretation Committee expertise. The InSiGHT VIC (current chair, M.G.) includes 40 multidisciplinary experts from 5 continents (see Supplementary Table 9 for disciplines covered by VIC members). The committee is responsible to its Governance Committee, which in turn is responsible to the InSiGHT Council. InSiGHT has recently joined HVP and is a founding member of its Gene and Disease Specific Council. The InSiGHT Council specifically considered the need and responsibility associated with classification assignment on its database and took all reasonable steps to both invite the highest possible expertise to contribute to the classification process and to ensure that its processes and legal standing are robust.  InSiGHT database curation. Mutalyzer50 was used to standardize the nomenclature of all variants present in the database as of December 2012. Variants with multiple submissions that were originally assigned a classification of pathogenic or probably pathogenic as well as no known pathogenicity or probably no pathogenicity were included in the group of discordant variants used to test the classification criteria. All unique variants identified in the database were assigned to one of the following sources: constitutional, somatic, artificial or unknown.  Development of five-tiered InSiGHT classification criteria. The InSiGHT classification criteria were developed using the Delphi method25. A five-tiered classification system originally developed for consistent classification of MMR gene variants identified in participants of the Colon Cancer Family Registry16, 34 was selected as a baseline for the InSiGHT classification criteria. This system included the option of classification on the basis of the posterior probabilities arising from multifactorial likelihood analysis15, 16, 51, 52 as well as multiple combinations of qualitative data not yet calibrated for inclusion in quantitative analyses but that are often reported in the literature or available from clinical sources. These baseline classification criteria were critically reviewed by InSiGHT VIC members attending the InSiGHT San Antonio meeting in April 2011 and by VIC members via e-mail. In response to comment, the rules were amended for clarity, to apply a more stringent interpretation of functional assay data and to consider additional points of evidence. These InSiGHT rules were used for variant classification over a series of 11 meetings (10 teleconferences and 1 face-to-face meeting), with further changes incorporated after each meeting to include additional points of evidence identified to be relevant during the review process as the committee encountered different combinations of useful data from published and unpublished sources. For example, after discussion, co-occurrence of a variant with a pathogenic mutation in the same gene with clinical information regarding a constitutional MMR deficiency phenotype53 was included as an in vivo test of MMR function, and 1000 Genomes Project data54 were accepted as a test for population frequency. Consistency of the accumulative evidence required for a given class was reviewed by presentation of the rules at a face-to-face meeting of committee members. Supporting documentation was developed to assist in the interpretation of splicing and functional assay results by B.A.T. in consultation with a subset of committee members with specific expertise in this field (Fig. 1b and Supplementary Tables 4 and 5). Where necessary, rule alterations were applied retrospectively to variants evaluated in previous meetings. The finalized rules (shown in simplified format in Fig. 1 and detailed in the Supplementary Note) were then used to assess all remaining variants lodged in the InSiGHT database.  Classification of MMR gene variants by literature review and data collation. Variants occurring in the 1000 Genomes Project54 with allele frequency greater than 1% were automatically classified as class 1 variants. Committee members were invited to participate in at least one classification meeting. A core group participated in each meeting, with attendance invited from VIC membership to make up the balance. Before each meeting, participants were assigned, through randomization, a subset of variants to be assessed. Each attendee was provided literature pertaining to the list of variants to be discussed and, where relevant, additional unpublished clinical or research information submitted by committee members to InSiGHT curator J.-P.P. Meeting attendees were requested to thoroughly review and summarize all information pertaining to the subset of variants in a spreadsheet template and to provide a class assignment based on their interpretation of the information accessed. All reviewer summaries, submitted clinical information and results from causality analysis were compiled into a single file to allow the comparison of data and class assignments for each variant and were circulated to the teleconference participants. During committee meetings, variants were discussed one at a time, assessing the following: class assigned by each reviewer; rationale for classification according to the classification guidelines; difficulties in interpreting specific data sources; assessment of possible redundancy of information due to multiple publications including all or some of the same information pertaining to a variant; differences in interpretation of the guidelines as provided and adjustments required to improve their clarity; the consensus view on variant class considering the preceding discussion; and action required to obtain additional information for refining the classification of variants that remained in class 2, 3 or 4 at the close of discussion. Where classifications differed using qualitative and quantitative criteria, these differences were due to differences in the availability of specific data types for the two approaches, and the most extreme classification was assigned for relevant variants. B.A.T. prioritized variants for examination by identifying and classifying any variants for which rules-based classification could be applied, such as variants that were truncating or comprised a large deletion from nomenclature, canonical splice site with no splicing data or frequency of >1% in a control reference group. B.A.T. then collated all information for all remaining unique variants (including those reviewed previously in teleconferences) and determined which variants had sufficient information to allow classification outside of class 3. Summary information for these variants was circulated for independent class assignment by at least three reviewers from the VIC, and classification was finalized at teleconferences or by e-mail.  Validation of qualitative criteria. A subset of truncating variants and large genomic deletions was selected to validate the qualitative classification criteria. Variants were selected on the basis of the availability of data from the first point of evidence in the qualitative class 5 criterion, i.e., in vitro functional assay results (for example, protein truncation test or genomic or mRNA confirmation of large deletions); Constitutional MMR Deficiency Syndrome phenotype; or different haplotypes across multiple families. Published and unpublished data for these variants were then used to validate the other points of evidence required for classification as a class 5 (pathogenic) variant.  Preliminary analysis of class 3 (uncertain) variants. In silico probabilities of pathogenicity were estimated for all class 3 missense variants, as described elsewhere34. Preliminary bioinformatic analysis of class 3 regulatory variants was undertaken using Encyclopedia of DNA Elements (ENCODE) data55 on the UCSC Genome Browser.  Implementation of the microattribution process. The variant interpretation process uses both published and unpublished data. For published literature, the PubMed ID (PMID) was used to reference the original work. Some unpublished data were recorded in the InSiGHT database at study initiation, and InSiGHT members were also requested by e-mail to contribute information important for variant classification using a standardized submission template. Data submitters were requested to provide a permanent, publicly searchable unique ID, preferably from the ORCID system, to facilitate the adoption of the microattribution approach. Microattribution was assigned for the different types of information corresponding to the points of evidence required for classification—namely, submitters were allocated one credit of microattribution for each type of information received, including (i) a variant (mandatory), (ii) family history or pedigree, (iii) MSI information, (iv) immunohistochemistry data, (v) in vitro functional data, (vi) data from RNA splicing assays and (vii) population frequency data. All unpublished data received by the VIC were recorded in microattribution tables for each element type, with each microattribution table listing a unique researcher ID along with submitted information. Microattribution counts for submitters are publically available on the InSiGHT website. Additionally, the data will be made available in nanopublication format.  Statistical analysis. Multifactorial likelihood analysis was performed for variants with appropriate tumor and segregation data available, using previously reported methods16, 34, 51 that are described briefly as follows. Bayes factor analysis was conducted by B.A.T. to assess MLH1, MSH2, MSH6 and PMS2 variant causality from segregation data16, 51 for both published and unpublished pedigrees with sufficient relevant information on cancer and variant carrier status. Penetrance estimates from Senter et al.28 were used in the Bayes segregation analysis27 of PMS2 variants. Where family relationship status was unknown, a conservative segregation likelihood ratio was derived—i.e., setting affected carriers as first-degree relatives—which is less informative than segregation between second-degree relatives. Colorectal tumor MSI and somatic BRAF mutation status were used to assign likelihood ratios according to tumor phenotype16. For each variant, the individual likelihood ratios (cosegregation, tumor) were multiplied to calculate the odds for causality. Then, a posterior probability was calculated by combining the prior probability (in silico for missense variants34 or on the basis of sequence location for all other variants13) and the odds for causality using Bayes rule where posterior = (prior × odds × (1/(1−prior)))/(prior × odds × (1/(1 − prior)) + 1). STATA 11 was used to calculate the sample size for the truncating variant validation set, H0: P = 0.01, assuming α = 0.05 (one-sided) and power = 0.95.  All other analyses were completed using the statistical package R and GraphPad Prism 6. For meta-analysis of population frequency data, the proportions were combined using an inverse variance random-effects model to account for heterogeneity between studies. Lynch syndrome (LS) is a common cancer predisposition caused by an inactivating mutation in one of four DNA mismatch repair (MMR) genes. Frequently a variant of uncertain significance (VUS), rather than an obviously pathogenic mutation, is identified in one of these genes. The inability to define pathogenicity of such variants precludes targeted healthcare. Here, we have modified a cell-free assay to test VUS in the MMR gene PMS2 for functional activity We have analyzed nearly all VUS in PMS2 found thus far and describe loss of MMR activity for five, suggesting the applicability of the assay for diagnosis of LS.  Keywords: Lynch Syndrome, DNA Mismatch Repair, VUS, PMS2 LS predisposes to various cancers, most notably to colon and ovarian cancer [de la Chapelle, 2004]. LS is caused by heterozygous inactivating mutations in one of the MMR genes MSH2 (MIM# 609309), MSH6 (MIM# 600678), MLH1 (MIM# 120436) or PMS2 (MIM# 600259) [de la Chapelle, 2004]. Inadvertent loss of the second, wild type, allele in somatic cells results in MMR deficiency, which underlies the accumulation of spontaneous genomic mutations and the rapid development of cancer [de la Chapelle, 2004]. Confirmed LS patients enroll in lifelong preventive surveillance programs and may benefit from personalized chemoprevention and chemotherapy [Hewish et al., 2010; Burn et al., 2011]. Unfortunately, genetic diagnosis of LS patients is complicated by the fact that a significant fraction of all MMR gene alterations found are so-called Variants of Uncertain Significance (VUS) [de la Chapelle, 2004]. In the absence of data on the impact of the VUS on gene function, it is often difficult to interpret their pathogenicity. Moreover, the incidence of VUS is believed to increase steeply with the advent of personalized genomics [Rasmussen et al., 2012]. To enable personalized healthcare for carriers of pathogenic variants and to liberate unaffected relatives from the burden associated with the uncertain pathogenicity of the VUS, it is of great importance to develop procedures to evaluate their pathogenicity [Rasmussen et al., 2012].  Of all MMR genes, VUS in PMS2 have the highest incidence, comprising ~49% of all alterations described in this gene (http://www.med.mun.ca/MMRvariants/statistics.aspx). We have recently described a cell-free assay to measure the functional activity of VUS in the MMR genes MSH2, MLH1 and MSH6 [Drost et al., 2010, 2012]. To facilitate the assessment of pathogenicity of VUS in PMS2 we have modified the cell-free assay to analyze their functional activity. In this assay the mutated cDNA is recreated by PCR, followed by in vitro transcription/translation of the variant PMS2 protein and of its wild type heterodimeric partner MLH1 (Figure 1A). To serve as template for the generation of the variant PMS2 alleles we used a wild type PMS2 fused to short S and thrombin tags, as this fusion protein displayed higher in vitro expression than the native PMS2 (Supp. Figure S1A, compare the first two lanes), while it did not affect its activity (Supp. Figure S1B). The variant MLH1/PMS2 heterodimer is added to an MLH1/PMS2-deficient cell extract and tested for its ability to restore a HinDIII restriction enzyme recognition site that is disrupted by an embedded G·T mismatch (Figure 1B). The inability to restore repair of the mismatch is indicative of the pathogenicity of a PMS2 VUS. All experimental procedures are described in the Supp. Materials & Methods. The assay appeared relatively insensitive to the amount of PMS2 included in the reaction, contributing to its robustness (Supp. Figure S1). The absolute repair efficiency of tagged wild type PMS2 under the conditions used in this assay is 43.5%±4.2 (mean±S.E.M.) and this is highly reproducible (Supp. Figure 1B). As the substrate concentration is in excess, absolute repair efficiencies are not a relevant measure for defects of a VUS. For this reason the in vitro MMR assay data is expressed as percentage of repair relative to wild type.  Figure 1 Figure 1 Mismatch repair activity of PMS2 VUS To test the applicability of the assay we have determined repair efficiencies of 27 VUS in PMS2, representing the large majority of all VUS registered in the Leiden Open Variation Database (LOVD; Table 1). Of these, variant E705K served as an MMR-deficient, pathogenic, control [Deschênes et al., 2007; van Oers et al., 2010]. Additionally, variants E541K and G857A were included as innocuous polymorphisms, as judged from their high allele frequencies (dbSNP rs2228006 and rs1802683, respectively). PMS2 variants registered in the LOVD as PMS2 pseudogene-derived were excluded from analysis. All alleles were recreated by PCR and protein was produced in vitro (Figure 1C).  Table 1 Table 1 Pathology data and references for PMS2 VUS tested in this work As the polymorphic PMS2 alleles enabled repair activities significantly higher than the known pathogenic control E705K, the assay has sufficient resolution to distinguish repair-proficient from repair-deficient VUS (Figure 1D). Variants with repair efficiencies not significantly higher than the pathogenic control (E41A, S46I, S46N and C843Y) were considered repair deficient and therefore presumably are pathogenic (Figure 1D). We conclude that this assay effectively identifies repair-deficient PMS2 variants. Variants such as Q205P, T511M and G750D that display repair efficiencies significantly higher than E705K but are compromised compared to wild type were not classified as repair deficient and we surmise that these variants might be pathogenic with reduced penetrance. Extensive calibration of the assay with clinical data is required to assess pathogenicity of alleles displaying such intermediate repair efficiencies.  For some of these VUS microsatellite instability (MSI), a hallmark of MMR deficient cancer, was previously investigated. Indeed, the MSI of a tumor carrying the S46I allele corresponds with its deficiency in MMR (Table 1). However, the MSI in tumors of carriers of the R20Q, G207E, T485K or T511A alleles is in apparent contrast with their normal MMR activity in vitro (Table 1). Possibly these patients carry another, yet unidentified MMR gene defect. Contrariwise, we cannot exclude that these alleles cause a defect that is only apparent in vivo. For this reason, all variants that are repair proficient in this assay cannot be classified as neutral, but may require additional analyses such as splicing assays, protein stability assays or nuclear localization assays [Rasmussen et al., 2012]. Ultimately, after the calibration of the assay, it may become a part of an integrated Bayesian analysis that determines pathogenicity of MMR gene VUS, as proposed by us and others [Goldgar et al., 2008; Rasmussen et al., 2012].  
1857||Genes encoding components of the PI3K-Akt-mTOR signaling axis are frequently mutated in cancer, but few mutations have been characterized in MTOR, the gene for the mTOR kinase. Using publicly available tumor genome sequencing data, we generated a comprehensive catalog of mTOR pathway mutations in cancer, identifying 33 MTOR mutations that confer pathway hyperactivation. The mutations cluster in six distinct regions in the C-terminal half of mTOR and occur in multiple cancer types, with one cluster particularly prominent in kidney cancer. The activating mutations do not affect mTOR complex assembly, but a subset reduces binding to the mTOR inhibitor Deptor. mTORC1 signaling in cells expressing various activating mutations remains sensitive to pharmacological mTOR inhibition, but is partially resistant to nutrient deprivation. Lastly, cancer cell lines with hyperactivating MTOR mutations display heightened sensitivity to rapamycin both in culture and as in vivo xenografts, suggesting that such mutations confer mTOR pathway dependency.  Keywords: personalized, mTOR, mutations, biomarker, deptor Go to: Introduction In mammals, the PI3K-Akt-mTOR pathway regulates cell size, mRNA translation, autophagy and many metabolic processes, including lipid synthesis (1). A variety of upstream regulators control the activity of the serine/threonine protein kinase mTOR and many of these are deregulated in cancer, resulting in pathway hyperactivation. Such activation occurs most commonly through loss-of-function mutations in tumor suppressors, such as phosphatase and tensin homolog (PTEN), tuberous sclerosis 1/2 (TSC1/2), neurofibromin 1/2 (NF1/2), or oncogenic mutations in KRAS, PIK3CA, or AKT (2). However, few cancer-associated mutations have been functionally characterized in MTOR itself, with only two reports thus far describing such mutations. In the first report, the authors tested six cancer-associated MTOR mutations and observed that two (S2215Y from a colorectal sample and R2505P from a kidney sample) conferred mTOR complex 1 (mTORC1) activation (3). In the second report, the authors identified an mTORC1 activating MTOR mutation (L2431P) that was present in a portion but not the entirety of a primary kidney tumor (4). Although these initial reports establish that activating MTOR mutations do arise in cancer, they were based upon limited sample sets that do not reflect the diverse subtypes of cancer. More recently, cancer genome sequencing projects, such as The Cancer Genome Atlas (TCGA) and the Cancer Cell Line Encyclopedia (CCLE), have identified a vast number of somatic mutations in thousands of tumors from more than 40 cancer subtypes (5-7).  Using publicly available databases of cancer genome sequence data, we cataloged all mutations in mTOR pathway components. We annotated over 400 samples with missense mutations in the MTOR gene from dozens of cancer subtypes, most of which lie within six clusters in the part of the gene that encodes the C-terminal portion of mTOR. Furthermore, through functional analyses, we identify 33 novel mTOR pathway-activating mutations, some of which affect the capacity of mTOR to interact with its partner proteins. None of the activating mutations impact the sensitivity of mTORC1 activity in cells to mTOR inhibitors but a subset confer mTORC1 signaling resistance to nutrient deprivation. Importantly, cancer cells that naturally express a subset of the mutations are hypersensitive to the mTOR inhibitor rapamycin. These findings may have translational relevance as rapamycin analogs (rapalogs) are clinically approved for the treatment of cancer, and several ATP-competitive mTOR kinase inhibitors are in development (8). As tumor biopsies are increasingly subjected to whole exome sequencing, the hyperactivating MTOR mutations we characterize may serve as biomarkers in predicting cancer response to mTOR-targeting drugs.  Go to: Results Catalog of recurring mutations in genes encoding mTOR pathway components  To generate a comprehensive catalog of all cancer-associated missense mutations in canonical genes of the mTOR pathway, we analyzed partial genome sequencing data from the TCGA, CCLE, International Cancer Genome Consortium (ICGC) and Catalogue of Somatic Mutations in Cancer (COSMIC) databases (5-7, 9, 10). This analysis revealed that almost every gene in the mTOR pathway harbored somatic point mutations (Supplementary Table 1). To enrich for mutations that are more likely to affect pathway function, only mutations that alter the same codon more than once were counted. When normalized for gene length, this analysis revealed that MTOR contained the highest percentage of recurring mutations, and thus we focused most of our attention on these mutations (Supplementary Figure 1). Collectively, through data mining and a literature search, we curated over 400 samples with non-synonymous MTOR point mutations (Figure 1B and Supplementary Table 2) (11-17). While the majority of these mutations are represented by only one sample in our database, approximately 40% are recurrent, most of which have not been previously described. Additionally, the mutations cluster in six distinct regions of mTOR centered on highly recurrent mutations that alter amino acids C1483, E1799, T1977, S2215, L2427 and R2505 (Figure 1C). The presence of these clusters suggests that there is a selective advantage to acquiring mutations in certain regions of the mTOR protein. Furthermore, these mutations are present in multiple cancer subtypes, with the highest number in colorectal, endometrial, and lung cancers, although these cancer subtypes are also considered to have the highest mutation rates (Figures 1D and 1E) (18). Interestingly, a random mutagenesis screen in the S. pombe mTOR homolog (tor2) identified activating mutations in homologous amino acid positions to many of those we find in MTOR to be recurrently mutated in cancer (19) (Supplementary Table 3).  Figure 1 Figure 1 Cancer-associated MTOR mutations mTORC1/2 activating mutations in MTOR  The prevalence of the recurrent mutations, their clustering, and correlation with activating tor2 mutations strongly suggested that the MTOR mutations impact mTOR pathway activity. To test this possibility, wild-type (WT) or ten different mutants of mTOR (L1460P, C1483F, E1799K, F1888L, T1977R, V2006I, S2215Y, I2500F, R2505P, and D2512H) were expressed in cells and phosphorylation of the mTORC1/2 substrates S6K1, 4EBP1, or Akt1 examined (Figures 2A, 2B, and 2C). All the mTOR mutants conferred varying degrees of pathway activation, and, interestingly, a few displayed some substrate preference (L1460P, C1483F, S2215Y, and R2505P towards S6K1/4EBP1 or V2006I towards Akt1), implying that these mutations have greater effects on mTORC1 or mTORC2. Thus, while three pathway activating MTOR mutations have previously been identified (3, 4), our initial analyses uncovered an additional eight recurrent MTOR mutations which activate mTORC1 and/or mTORC2.  Figure 2 Figure 2 mTORC1 and mTORC2 activating mutations in MTOR and RHEB It is well established that two activating mutations (E545K and H1047R) within the phosphatidylinositol-4,5-bisphosphate 3-kinase, catalytic subunit alpha (PI3K-p110α), encoded by the PIK3CA gene, can lead to mTOR pathway activation (20). To determine the degree of mTOR pathway activation conferred by mTOR mutation, S6K1 phosphorylation from cells expressing WT or S2215Y mTOR was compared to cells expressing WT or mutant PI3K-p110α (Supplementary Figures 2A and 2B). This revealed that while expression of only mutant mTOR conferred mTORC1 activation, expression of either WT or mutant PI3K-p110α induced mTORC1 activity.  Non-recurrent MTOR mutations that activate mTORC1 signaling  We next examined in more detail the nature of the activating MTOR mutations, and observed that while some codons are mutated to only one other residue (e.g. E1799K), others are mutated to several different amino acids (e.g. S2215F/P/T/Y). This is reminiscent of the diverse amino acids to which the G12 residue of KRAS is mutated in cancers (21). We expressed 20 such MTOR mutations and found that many (C1483R/W/Y, F1888I, T1977K, S2215F/P, I2500M), but not all (A41P/S/T, F1888V, T1977S, V2006L, S2215T, R2505Q/*, D2512G/Y), led to increased S6K1 phosphorylation (Supplementary Figures 3 and 5, and data not shown). Given that most of these activating mutations are found only once in our dataset implies that other non-recurrent mutations may also activate mTORC1 signaling. To identify other such mutations, we turned our attention to the mutational clusters identified in Figure 1, and observed that while most are represented by several tissue types, those in the C1483 cluster are particularly prevalent in kidney cancer (Figure 1E and Supplementary Figure 3D). Interestingly, two recent cancer genome sequencing efforts reported that kidney cancers have an increased percentage of mutations in mTOR pathway genes, but the functional consequences of these mutations were not evaluated (13, 22). Expression of the ten kidney cancer-associated MTOR mutations from the C1483 cluster revealed that in addition to the previously evaluated L1460P and C1483F/Y mutants (Figure 1B and Supplemental Figure 2), three non-recurrent mutants (L1433S, A1459P, and E1519T) also induced mTORC1 pathway activity (Figure 2D). Similarly, expression of eight non-recurrent mutations from the S2215 cluster (N2206S, L2209V, A2210P, L2216P, R2217W, L2220F, Q2223K, and A2226S) activated mTORC1 signaling as measured by S6K1 phosphorylation, with the L2209V mutant conferring higher activation than even S2215Y (Supplementary Figure 3E). Lastly, other than the S2215Y and R2505P mutations, the only other cancer-associated MTOR mutation previously characterized is L2431P from a kidney cancer patient (4). Expression of mTOR containing this non-recurrent mutation caused mTORC1 activation that was much weaker than that caused by expression of the S2215Y mutant (Supplementary Figure 3F). Collectively, these results suggest that while most non-recurrent MTOR mutations found in cancer are part of the mutational “noise”, there exists a diverse set of MTOR mutations that can drive mTORC1 pathway activity. Likely, as more cancer genomes are sequenced, the activating non-recurrent mutations we identified will prove to be recurrent.  Recurrent mutations in RHEB activate mTORC1  We also observed that other mTOR pathway genes such as Raptor, Rictor, and Rheb1 harbored recurrent mutations (Supplemental Table 1). Expression of Rheb1 Y35N/C/H and to a lesser degree E139K increased phosphorylation of endogenous S6K1 more than that of WT Rheb1 (Figure 2E), while recurrent mutations in Raptor (R788C) or Rictor (S1101L) failed to induce any mTORC1 or mTORC2 activity (data not shown). In support of the relevance of these mutations to cancer, RHEB was recently highlighted as a novel cancer gene due to the presence of the Y35N mutation (23). Thus, cancer associated mutations in either MTOR or RHEB can induce mTORC1 activity; whether this is true of other mTOR pathway genes remains to be determined.  mTORC1/2 hyperactivating mutants bind less Deptor  One potential mechanism through which the mutations in mTOR (Figure 2) might increase S6K1/Akt1 phosphorylation is by altering mTORC1 or mTORC2 assembly. Alternatively or in addition, the mTOR mutations may diminish the binding of mTOR to its endogenous inhibitor Deptor, which binds to the FAT domain of mTOR (24). To test these possibilities, the interactions of exogenously expressed WT or mutant mTORs with endogenous Raptor, Rictor, and Deptor were measured. All mutant mTOR proteins bound equally well to Raptor and Rictor, suggesting that the mutations do not affect formation of either mTOR complex (Figure 3A). In contrast, Deptor binding to the immunoprecipitated mTOR proteins was reduced in cells expressing the mTOR mutants as compared to WT mTOR (Figure 3A). Given that increased mTOR pathway activity correlates with a reduction in the mTOR-Deptor interaction (24), it is likely that the observed decrease in Deptor binding reflects the increased mTOR pathway activity caused by the MTOR mutations. However, two mTORC1 activating mutations that are in the FAT domain of mTOR, L1460P and C1483Y, bound much less Deptor than the other mutants tested (Figure 3A), suggesting that these mutations directly perturb the Deptor binding site on mTOR. Consistent with this, examination of the mutations from the C1483 cluster described in figure 2D revealed that two other highly activating mutations in the FAT domain (A1459P and C1483Y) also strongly reduced the mTOR-Deptor interaction (Supplementary Figure 4A). While these results suggest a possible mechanism of action for a subset of activating mTOR mutations, they do not preclude other mechanism by which MTOR mutations may impact mTORC1 signaling, such as by increasing the activity of the mTOR kinase domain.  Figure 3 Figure 3 mTOR mutants bind less Deptor and cells expressing the mTOR S2215Y mutation are resistant to nutrient deprivation MTOR mutations do not affect mTORC1 sensitivity to mTOR inhibitors but can affect the pathway response to nutrient deprivation  We next considered the possibility that the mTORC1-activating MTOR mutants have altered sensitivity to established mTOR inhibitors. Engineered mutations in the FRB domain of mTOR, which binds the FKBP12-rapamycin complex, confer marked rapamycin resistance to mTOR (25). To test whether mTOR mutation alters pathway inhibition by rapamycin or Torin1 (an investigational ATP-competitive mTOR inhibitor), we used HEK-293 cells with an integrated FLP recombination site (TREX cells) to stably express WT or several different mutants of mTOR (A1459P, C1483Y, E1799K, F1888I, L2209V, S2215Y, L2431P, I2500F, and R2505P), as the mTOR cDNA is too large to be packaged and expressed via a lentiviral delivery system (Supplementary Figure 4B). Baseline phosphorylation of endogenous S6K1 was higher in TREX cells expressing the A1459P, L2209V, S2215Y, I2500F and R2505P mTOR mutants than in parental or WT-expressing cells (Figure 3B and Supplementary Figures 4C and 4D), consistent with the results obtained upon transient expression of these mutants (Figures 2A and 2D, and Supplementary Figure 3D). Importantly, mTORC1 activity in none of the TREX cells was resistant to rapamycin, Torin1, MLN0128 (an mTOR ATP-competitive inhibitor), GDC0980 (a dual PI3K/mTOR ATP-competitive inhibitor), (Figure 3B and Supplementary Figures 4C and 4D). Thus, on a molecular level, while cells with mTOR mutations may display high levels of mTORC1/2 activity, this activity is still sensitive to pharmacological mTOR inhibition.  The kinase activity of mTOR is tightly regulated by nutrient availability; when cells are starved of nutrients (specifically glucose and amino acids), they downregulate mTORC1 signaling, while retreatment of cells with these nutrients restores mTORC1-mediated signaling (26). Given this, we sought to determine whether any of the activating mTOR mutants affect the sensitivity of mTORC1 signaling to amino acid or glucose withdrawal. Indeed, S6K1 phosphorylation was highly resistant to deprivation of either nutrient in cells expressing several mutants (A1459P, S2215Y, I2500F and R2505P) (Figure 3C and Supplementary Figures 4E and 4F). This observation may be relevant in the context of developing tumors, which are often glucose starved (27, 28), where inappropriate mTORC1 activity may provide a growth advantage.  Cancer cells with hyperactivating MTOR mutations are hypersensitive to rapamycin in vitro and in vivo  To determine if cancer cells with MTOR mutations are dependent on mTORC1 activity, we evaluated the impact of rapamycin on the proliferation of set of cancer cell lines harboring WT or mutant mTOR (Figure 4A). We identified four cell lines with mTORC1-activating MTOR mutations (C1483Y in MOLT16; E1799K in HEC59 and SNU349; and S2215Y in JHUEM7) and two with MTOR mutations that have no apparent impact on mTORC1 signaling (V2006L in TUHR10TKB; and R2152C in A375) (Supplementary Figures 5A and 5B). HeLa cells were used as a negative control cell line, as they are mildly rapamycin sensitive and are wild-type for mTOR (7, 29). MCF7 and SW780 cells, which are also wild-type for mTOR, served as positive controls for rapamycin sensitivity because the MCF7 cells harbor an activating PI3K-p110α mutation (E545K) while the SW780 cells lack NPRL2, which encodes a component of the GATOR1 negative regulator of the amino acid-sensing pathway (30, 31). Importantly, only the cell lines with activating MTOR mutations, the PI3K-p110α mutant, or the NPRL2-null SW780 cells were hypersensitive to rapamycin treatment (Figure 4B). Consistent with these and published results, the growth of HeLa xenografts was partially rapamycin sensitive, while rapamycin completely halted the growth of HEC59 xenografts, which carry the hyperactivating mTOR E1799K mutation (Figure 4C) (32, 33). These results suggest that the presence of hyperactivating MTOR mutations in cancer cells may serve as biomarkers to identify tumors that are likely to respond to mTOR inhibitors.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Rapamycin inhibits the proliferation of cancer cell lines with hyperactivating MTOR mutations Go to: Discussion Early cancer genome sequencing projects led to the identification of three mutations in MTOR that were shown to activate mTORC1 signaling (3, 4). Here, we have identified an additional 33 previously unknown activating MTOR mutations (some are recurrent, others are not) (Supplementary Table 4). Mechanistically, we find that the activating mutations diminish the mTOR-Deptor interaction and interestingly, when mapped onto the recently solved crystal structure of mTOR, the mutations cluster in several distinct locations within the protein itself, suggesting that other activating mechanisms may exist (Supplementary Figure 6) (34). While the mutations do not prevent pharmacological mTOR inhibition, a subset protect against the effects of nutrient deprivation on mTORC1 signaling. Lastly, we demonstrate that cell lines with activating MTOR mutations are particularly sensitive to rapamycin in cell culture and in xenografts, likely due to mTOR pathway dependency.  The diversity of activating MTOR mutations we characterized is reminiscent of the various activating mutations in the prototypical lipid kinase PIK3CA, which encodes for the PI3K catalytic subunit p110α (35). However, unlike the activating PIK3CA mutations, which confer equal activation of PI3K-mediated signaling pathways, the diverse MTOR mutations can differentially activate mTORC1 or mTORC2, leading to either S6K1/4EBP1 or Akt1 phosphorylation, respectively. This finding is particularly relevant in a clinical setting, as patients with mTORC1 activating mutations may respond well to FDA-approved rapalogs, while patients with mTORC2 activating mutations might best be treated with ATP-competitive mTOR inhibitors, although such inhibitors are still in clinical trials. This distinction is especially relevant for patients with mTORC2 activating mutations, because rapalogs can in some cases upregulate mTORC2 signaling through modulation of an mTORC1-dependent feedback loop (36).  Rapalog-based therapies are currently approved or in clinical trials for several cancer subtypes, and some patients have had dramatic and durable responses to these therapies (37). Given that some cells with activating MTOR mutations are particularly rapamycin sensitive (Figure 4), it is possible that some of the rapalog-responsive patients had tumors with similar mutations. Indeed, it was recently found that the tumor of a bladder cancer patient with two activating MTOR mutations displayed exquisite sensitivity to rapalog-based therapy (38). Many more cancer-associated MTOR mutations will likely be identified in future studies, but functional evaluation of these mutations will be required to determine their impact on the mTOR pathway. As tumor sequencing becomes more commonplace, functional studies such as ours may aid in arriving at a more personalized treatment regimen that eventually promotes patient survival.  Go to: Methods Data acquisition and cluster analysis  All mutations in genes of the mTOR pathway were acquired from the cBIO, COSMIC, and ICGC databases or through a literature search with a data-freeze date of September 1, 2013. To identify regions of mTOR significantly enriched for somatic point mutations, we determined the probability of seeing at least the observed number of mutations in a 50 amino acid sliding window with the null hypothesis being all 463 MTOR mutations randomly occurring across the 2549 amino acid protein. Specifically, we calculated a threshold for significance of at least 15 mutations per 50 amino acids by the formula:  p=∑n=k463(463k)∗(1−502549)463−k∗(502549)k which equals 0.043 for k = at least 15 mutations per 50 amino acids.  Materials  Reagents were obtained from the following sources: antibodies to HA (clone C29F4), S6K1 (clone 49D7), phospho-T389-S6K1 (clone 108D2), and phospho-S473-Akt1 (clone D9E) from Cell Signaling Technology; antibody to GAPDH (clone GT239) from Genetex; antibodies to Deptor and Raptor, X-ray film, and PVDF membrane were from Millipore; antibody to Rictor from Bethyl; antibody to the Flag epitope (clone M2), Flag M2-coupled agarose beads, glucose and amino acid mixtures from Sigma; horseradish-peroxidase-labeled anti-mouse and anti-rabbit secondary antibodies from Santa Cruz Biotechnology; FuGENE HD and Cell Titer Glo from Promega; X-tremeGENE 9 and Complete Protease Mixture from Roche Applied Science; QuikChange II XL from Stratagene; enhanced chemiluminescence reagent and glutathione-coupled agarose beads from Thermo; 8-week-old nude mice from Taconic; rapamycin from LC Labs; MLN0128 and GDC0980 from Selleckchem; and Torin1 was synthesized in the Gray laboratory (39). cDNAs for mTOR and PI3K-p110α were from Addgene; expression vectors for HAGST-S6K1, HA-GST-Akt1, and HA-GST-Rheb1 were described previously (24, 40, 41) and Flag-14-3-3α was a generous gift from the Yaffe lab. The primers used to generate the mTOR and Rheb1 mutations were from Integrated DNA Technologies and are listed in supplemental table 5. HEK-293T-TREX cell system, 4-12% bis-tris SDS-PAGE gels, and 20x MOPS buffers were from Invitrogen.  Tissue culture and cell lines  MCF7, HELA, HEK-293T, HCT116, A375 and SW780 cells were from ATCC; JHUEM7, MOLT16, NCIH446, SNU349, and TUHR10TKB cells were from the Broad Institute Cancer Cell Line Encyclopedia; HEK-293E cells were a generous gift of the Blenis lab; and the HEC59 cells were a generous gift of the Lippard lab. The cell lines have not been re-authenticated, although those from ATCC and the Broad were used within 6 months of resuscitation. The HEK-293T, HEK-293E, HCT116, A375, HEC59, and TUHR10TKB cells were cultured in DMEM; JHUEM7 and MOLT16 cells were cultured in RPMI; and the SW780 cells were cultured in IMDM. All media was prepared with 10% heat inactivated FBS and 1% Penicillin/Streptomycin. All cell lines were maintained at 37°C, 5% CO2.  Site-directed mutagenesis, cloning, and TREX cell line generation  All MTOR and RHEB point mutations were generated in the parental vectors using site-directed mutagenesis with the QuikChange II XL kit according to the manufacturer’s protocol. Primer sequences are listed in Supplementary Table 5. Point mutations were verified using Sanger sequencing as conducted by Eton Biosciences. The HA-GST-4EBP1 reporter vector was generated by synthesizing a gBlock from IDT encoding for 4EBP1 and cloning it into the pRK5-HA-GST vector using SalI and NotI restriction digestion followed by ligation. WT and mutant mTOR cDNAs were subcloned directly from the pcDNA3 vector into the pcDNA5/FRT/TO vector using single site NotI restriction digestion followed by ligation. Flag-mTOR-expressing TREX cells were generated according to the manufacturer's protocol.  Cell treatments, lysis, and immunoprecipitations  For S6K1 and Akt1 co-transfection assays, 3×105 HEK-293T or HEK-293E cells per well were seeded into 6-well tissue culture plates, transfected 24 hours later with 2 μg of mTOR-encoding plasmid and 1 ng of S6K1- or Akt1-encoding plasmid using X-tremeGENE 9 or FuGENE HD, followed by whole cell lysis 48 hours after transfection in NP-40 lysis buffer (50 mM Tris-HCl at pH 7.5, 150 mM NaCl, 1% NP-40 substitute, 1 mM EDTA at pH8.0, 50 mM NaF, 10 mM Na-pyrophosphate, 15 mM Na3VO4, 100 mM β-glycerophosphate, and 1 tablet of protease inhibitor per 50 mL of buffer). 200-400 μg of whole cell lysates were mixed with 5x SDS-sample buffer to a final concentration of 1-2 μg/μL, boiled for 5 minutes, and then used directly for immunoblotting or frozen at −20°C. For glutathione pull down assays, 2×106 HEK-293T cells were seeded onto 10 cm tissue culture plates, transfected 24 hours later with 10 μg of mTOR-encoding plasmid and 2 ng of S6K1-encoding plasmid using X-tremeGENE 9, and lysed 48-72 hours after transfection in NP-40 lysis buffer. 2-3 mg of the resultant whole-cell lysates were incubated with 30 μL of pre-washed glutathione-coupled agarose beads in a 1 mL volume, which were rotated at 4°C for two hours, spun at 2,500 RCF for one minute, washed in 500 μL lysis buffer three times, and the beads directly boiled in 50 μL of 2x SDS-sample buffer. For mTOR immunoprecipitations, the cells were treated as with the glutathione pulldown, except they were lysed/washed in CHAPS buffer (50 mM HEPES at pH 7.4, 150 mM NaCl, 0.4% CHAPS, 50 mM NaF, 10 mM Na-pyrophosphate, 100 mM β-glycerophosphate, and 1 tablet of protease inhibitor per 50 mL of buffer) and incubated with Flag-M2-coupled agarose beads.  Immunoblotting  10-50 μg of whole cell lysates, 10-30 μL of glutathione pulldown samples, or 10-30 μL of Flag-M2 immunoprecipitates were loaded into lanes of 4-12% bis-tris SDS-PAGE gels, run at 120 volts for 2 hours in 1x MOPS buffer, and then transferred to 0.45 μm PVDF membrane at 60 volts for 2 hours in 1x transfer buffer (100 mM CAPS, 123 mM NaOH, 10% Ethanol). The membranes were then immunoblotted for the indicated proteins. All primary antibodies were diluted 1:1000 in 5% BSA W/V TBST, with the exception of GAPDH and Flag antibodies which were diluted 1:2000. All secondary antibodies were diluted 1:5000 in 5% milk W/V TBST. Densitometry was performed using ImageJ and a student's T test was used to determine statistical significance.  Rapamycin, Torin1, MLN0128, GDC0980, and nutrient starvation/re-stimulation treatments  For the mTOR inhibitor experiments, 3×105 TREX cells per well were seeded into 6-well plates, grown for one day, treated with 100 nM rapamycin, 250 nM Torin1, 250 nM MLN0128, 250 nM GDC0980, or DMSO for 60 minutes. The cells were then lysed as above. For the nutrient deprivation experiments, 3×105 TREX cells per well were seeded into 6-well plates, grown for one day, rinsed briefly in 1x amino acid- or glucose-free RPMI, incubated in 1x amino acid- or glucose-free RPMI for 60 minutes, and then stimulated with free amino acids or glucose to the levels in complete RPMI for 15 minutes.  In vitro proliferation assays  Six replicates each of 800-1200 cells were seeded into 96-well plates, treated with 8 doses of rapamycin 24 hours later, and assayed for ATP content using Cell Titer Glo 96 hours following rapamycin treatment according to the manufacturer's protocol.  In vivo xenograft assays  3×106 cells per injection site were implanted subcutaneously into the right and left flanks of nude mice. Once tumors were palpable in all animals (>50 mm3 volume by caliper measurements), mice were assigned randomly into rapamycin treated or untreated groups and caliper measurements were taken every 3-4 days until tumor burden approached the limits set by institutional guidelines. Tumor volume was assessed according to the formula (0.5)(W)(W)(L), and a student's T test was used to determine the p-values. Rapamycin (4 mg/kg) or vehicle was delivered by daily IP injection, 100 mL per injection. All experiments involving mice were carried out with approval from the Committee for Animal Care at MIT and under supervision of the Department of Comparative Medicine at MIT.   Significance  We report that a diverse set of cancer-associated MTOR mutations confer increased mTORC1/2 pathway activity and that cells harboring these mutations are highly sensitive to rapamycin in culture and in vivo. These findings are clinically relevant as the MTOR mutations characterized herein may serve as biomarkers for predicting tumor responses to mTOR inhibitors.  
1862||Genes encoding components of the PI3K-Akt-mTOR signaling axis are frequently mutated in cancer, but few mutations have been characterized in MTOR, the gene for the mTOR kinase. Using publicly available tumor genome sequencing data, we generated a comprehensive catalog of mTOR pathway mutations in cancer, identifying 33 MTOR mutations that confer pathway hyperactivation. The mutations cluster in six distinct regions in the C-terminal half of mTOR and occur in multiple cancer types, with one cluster particularly prominent in kidney cancer. The activating mutations do not affect mTOR complex assembly, but a subset reduces binding to the mTOR inhibitor Deptor. mTORC1 signaling in cells expressing various activating mutations remains sensitive to pharmacological mTOR inhibition, but is partially resistant to nutrient deprivation. Lastly, cancer cell lines with hyperactivating MTOR mutations display heightened sensitivity to rapamycin both in culture and as in vivo xenografts, suggesting that such mutations confer mTOR pathway dependency.  Keywords: personalized, mTOR, mutations, biomarker, deptor Go to: Introduction In mammals, the PI3K-Akt-mTOR pathway regulates cell size, mRNA translation, autophagy and many metabolic processes, including lipid synthesis (1). A variety of upstream regulators control the activity of the serine/threonine protein kinase mTOR and many of these are deregulated in cancer, resulting in pathway hyperactivation. Such activation occurs most commonly through loss-of-function mutations in tumor suppressors, such as phosphatase and tensin homolog (PTEN), tuberous sclerosis 1/2 (TSC1/2), neurofibromin 1/2 (NF1/2), or oncogenic mutations in KRAS, PIK3CA, or AKT (2). However, few cancer-associated mutations have been functionally characterized in MTOR itself, with only two reports thus far describing such mutations. In the first report, the authors tested six cancer-associated MTOR mutations and observed that two (S2215Y from a colorectal sample and R2505P from a kidney sample) conferred mTOR complex 1 (mTORC1) activation (3). In the second report, the authors identified an mTORC1 activating MTOR mutation (L2431P) that was present in a portion but not the entirety of a primary kidney tumor (4). Although these initial reports establish that activating MTOR mutations do arise in cancer, they were based upon limited sample sets that do not reflect the diverse subtypes of cancer. More recently, cancer genome sequencing projects, such as The Cancer Genome Atlas (TCGA) and the Cancer Cell Line Encyclopedia (CCLE), have identified a vast number of somatic mutations in thousands of tumors from more than 40 cancer subtypes (5-7).  Using publicly available databases of cancer genome sequence data, we cataloged all mutations in mTOR pathway components. We annotated over 400 samples with missense mutations in the MTOR gene from dozens of cancer subtypes, most of which lie within six clusters in the part of the gene that encodes the C-terminal portion of mTOR. Furthermore, through functional analyses, we identify 33 novel mTOR pathway-activating mutations, some of which affect the capacity of mTOR to interact with its partner proteins. None of the activating mutations impact the sensitivity of mTORC1 activity in cells to mTOR inhibitors but a subset confer mTORC1 signaling resistance to nutrient deprivation. Importantly, cancer cells that naturally express a subset of the mutations are hypersensitive to the mTOR inhibitor rapamycin. These findings may have translational relevance as rapamycin analogs (rapalogs) are clinically approved for the treatment of cancer, and several ATP-competitive mTOR kinase inhibitors are in development (8). As tumor biopsies are increasingly subjected to whole exome sequencing, the hyperactivating MTOR mutations we characterize may serve as biomarkers in predicting cancer response to mTOR-targeting drugs.  Go to: Results Catalog of recurring mutations in genes encoding mTOR pathway components  To generate a comprehensive catalog of all cancer-associated missense mutations in canonical genes of the mTOR pathway, we analyzed partial genome sequencing data from the TCGA, CCLE, International Cancer Genome Consortium (ICGC) and Catalogue of Somatic Mutations in Cancer (COSMIC) databases (5-7, 9, 10). This analysis revealed that almost every gene in the mTOR pathway harbored somatic point mutations (Supplementary Table 1). To enrich for mutations that are more likely to affect pathway function, only mutations that alter the same codon more than once were counted. When normalized for gene length, this analysis revealed that MTOR contained the highest percentage of recurring mutations, and thus we focused most of our attention on these mutations (Supplementary Figure 1). Collectively, through data mining and a literature search, we curated over 400 samples with non-synonymous MTOR point mutations (Figure 1B and Supplementary Table 2) (11-17). While the majority of these mutations are represented by only one sample in our database, approximately 40% are recurrent, most of which have not been previously described. Additionally, the mutations cluster in six distinct regions of mTOR centered on highly recurrent mutations that alter amino acids C1483, E1799, T1977, S2215, L2427 and R2505 (Figure 1C). The presence of these clusters suggests that there is a selective advantage to acquiring mutations in certain regions of the mTOR protein. Furthermore, these mutations are present in multiple cancer subtypes, with the highest number in colorectal, endometrial, and lung cancers, although these cancer subtypes are also considered to have the highest mutation rates (Figures 1D and 1E) (18). Interestingly, a random mutagenesis screen in the S. pombe mTOR homolog (tor2) identified activating mutations in homologous amino acid positions to many of those we find in MTOR to be recurrently mutated in cancer (19) (Supplementary Table 3).  Figure 1 Figure 1 Cancer-associated MTOR mutations mTORC1/2 activating mutations in MTOR  The prevalence of the recurrent mutations, their clustering, and correlation with activating tor2 mutations strongly suggested that the MTOR mutations impact mTOR pathway activity. To test this possibility, wild-type (WT) or ten different mutants of mTOR (L1460P, C1483F, E1799K, F1888L, T1977R, V2006I, S2215Y, I2500F, R2505P, and D2512H) were expressed in cells and phosphorylation of the mTORC1/2 substrates S6K1, 4EBP1, or Akt1 examined (Figures 2A, 2B, and 2C). All the mTOR mutants conferred varying degrees of pathway activation, and, interestingly, a few displayed some substrate preference (L1460P, C1483F, S2215Y, and R2505P towards S6K1/4EBP1 or V2006I towards Akt1), implying that these mutations have greater effects on mTORC1 or mTORC2. Thus, while three pathway activating MTOR mutations have previously been identified (3, 4), our initial analyses uncovered an additional eight recurrent MTOR mutations which activate mTORC1 and/or mTORC2.  Figure 2 Figure 2 mTORC1 and mTORC2 activating mutations in MTOR and RHEB It is well established that two activating mutations (E545K and H1047R) within the phosphatidylinositol-4,5-bisphosphate 3-kinase, catalytic subunit alpha (PI3K-p110α), encoded by the PIK3CA gene, can lead to mTOR pathway activation (20). To determine the degree of mTOR pathway activation conferred by mTOR mutation, S6K1 phosphorylation from cells expressing WT or S2215Y mTOR was compared to cells expressing WT or mutant PI3K-p110α (Supplementary Figures 2A and 2B). This revealed that while expression of only mutant mTOR conferred mTORC1 activation, expression of either WT or mutant PI3K-p110α induced mTORC1 activity.  Non-recurrent MTOR mutations that activate mTORC1 signaling  We next examined in more detail the nature of the activating MTOR mutations, and observed that while some codons are mutated to only one other residue (e.g. E1799K), others are mutated to several different amino acids (e.g. S2215F/P/T/Y). This is reminiscent of the diverse amino acids to which the G12 residue of KRAS is mutated in cancers (21). We expressed 20 such MTOR mutations and found that many (C1483R/W/Y, F1888I, T1977K, S2215F/P, I2500M), but not all (A41P/S/T, F1888V, T1977S, V2006L, S2215T, R2505Q/*, D2512G/Y), led to increased S6K1 phosphorylation (Supplementary Figures 3 and 5, and data not shown). Given that most of these activating mutations are found only once in our dataset implies that other non-recurrent mutations may also activate mTORC1 signaling. To identify other such mutations, we turned our attention to the mutational clusters identified in Figure 1, and observed that while most are represented by several tissue types, those in the C1483 cluster are particularly prevalent in kidney cancer (Figure 1E and Supplementary Figure 3D). Interestingly, two recent cancer genome sequencing efforts reported that kidney cancers have an increased percentage of mutations in mTOR pathway genes, but the functional consequences of these mutations were not evaluated (13, 22). Expression of the ten kidney cancer-associated MTOR mutations from the C1483 cluster revealed that in addition to the previously evaluated L1460P and C1483F/Y mutants (Figure 1B and Supplemental Figure 2), three non-recurrent mutants (L1433S, A1459P, and E1519T) also induced mTORC1 pathway activity (Figure 2D). Similarly, expression of eight non-recurrent mutations from the S2215 cluster (N2206S, L2209V, A2210P, L2216P, R2217W, L2220F, Q2223K, and A2226S) activated mTORC1 signaling as measured by S6K1 phosphorylation, with the L2209V mutant conferring higher activation than even S2215Y (Supplementary Figure 3E). Lastly, other than the S2215Y and R2505P mutations, the only other cancer-associated MTOR mutation previously characterized is L2431P from a kidney cancer patient (4). Expression of mTOR containing this non-recurrent mutation caused mTORC1 activation that was much weaker than that caused by expression of the S2215Y mutant (Supplementary Figure 3F). Collectively, these results suggest that while most non-recurrent MTOR mutations found in cancer are part of the mutational “noise”, there exists a diverse set of MTOR mutations that can drive mTORC1 pathway activity. Likely, as more cancer genomes are sequenced, the activating non-recurrent mutations we identified will prove to be recurrent.  Recurrent mutations in RHEB activate mTORC1  We also observed that other mTOR pathway genes such as Raptor, Rictor, and Rheb1 harbored recurrent mutations (Supplemental Table 1). Expression of Rheb1 Y35N/C/H and to a lesser degree E139K increased phosphorylation of endogenous S6K1 more than that of WT Rheb1 (Figure 2E), while recurrent mutations in Raptor (R788C) or Rictor (S1101L) failed to induce any mTORC1 or mTORC2 activity (data not shown). In support of the relevance of these mutations to cancer, RHEB was recently highlighted as a novel cancer gene due to the presence of the Y35N mutation (23). Thus, cancer associated mutations in either MTOR or RHEB can induce mTORC1 activity; whether this is true of other mTOR pathway genes remains to be determined.  mTORC1/2 hyperactivating mutants bind less Deptor  One potential mechanism through which the mutations in mTOR (Figure 2) might increase S6K1/Akt1 phosphorylation is by altering mTORC1 or mTORC2 assembly. Alternatively or in addition, the mTOR mutations may diminish the binding of mTOR to its endogenous inhibitor Deptor, which binds to the FAT domain of mTOR (24). To test these possibilities, the interactions of exogenously expressed WT or mutant mTORs with endogenous Raptor, Rictor, and Deptor were measured. All mutant mTOR proteins bound equally well to Raptor and Rictor, suggesting that the mutations do not affect formation of either mTOR complex (Figure 3A). In contrast, Deptor binding to the immunoprecipitated mTOR proteins was reduced in cells expressing the mTOR mutants as compared to WT mTOR (Figure 3A). Given that increased mTOR pathway activity correlates with a reduction in the mTOR-Deptor interaction (24), it is likely that the observed decrease in Deptor binding reflects the increased mTOR pathway activity caused by the MTOR mutations. However, two mTORC1 activating mutations that are in the FAT domain of mTOR, L1460P and C1483Y, bound much less Deptor than the other mutants tested (Figure 3A), suggesting that these mutations directly perturb the Deptor binding site on mTOR. Consistent with this, examination of the mutations from the C1483 cluster described in figure 2D revealed that two other highly activating mutations in the FAT domain (A1459P and C1483Y) also strongly reduced the mTOR-Deptor interaction (Supplementary Figure 4A). While these results suggest a possible mechanism of action for a subset of activating mTOR mutations, they do not preclude other mechanism by which MTOR mutations may impact mTORC1 signaling, such as by increasing the activity of the mTOR kinase domain.  Figure 3 Figure 3 mTOR mutants bind less Deptor and cells expressing the mTOR S2215Y mutation are resistant to nutrient deprivation MTOR mutations do not affect mTORC1 sensitivity to mTOR inhibitors but can affect the pathway response to nutrient deprivation  We next considered the possibility that the mTORC1-activating MTOR mutants have altered sensitivity to established mTOR inhibitors. Engineered mutations in the FRB domain of mTOR, which binds the FKBP12-rapamycin complex, confer marked rapamycin resistance to mTOR (25). To test whether mTOR mutation alters pathway inhibition by rapamycin or Torin1 (an investigational ATP-competitive mTOR inhibitor), we used HEK-293 cells with an integrated FLP recombination site (TREX cells) to stably express WT or several different mutants of mTOR (A1459P, C1483Y, E1799K, F1888I, L2209V, S2215Y, L2431P, I2500F, and R2505P), as the mTOR cDNA is too large to be packaged and expressed via a lentiviral delivery system (Supplementary Figure 4B). Baseline phosphorylation of endogenous S6K1 was higher in TREX cells expressing the A1459P, L2209V, S2215Y, I2500F and R2505P mTOR mutants than in parental or WT-expressing cells (Figure 3B and Supplementary Figures 4C and 4D), consistent with the results obtained upon transient expression of these mutants (Figures 2A and 2D, and Supplementary Figure 3D). Importantly, mTORC1 activity in none of the TREX cells was resistant to rapamycin, Torin1, MLN0128 (an mTOR ATP-competitive inhibitor), GDC0980 (a dual PI3K/mTOR ATP-competitive inhibitor), (Figure 3B and Supplementary Figures 4C and 4D). Thus, on a molecular level, while cells with mTOR mutations may display high levels of mTORC1/2 activity, this activity is still sensitive to pharmacological mTOR inhibition.  The kinase activity of mTOR is tightly regulated by nutrient availability; when cells are starved of nutrients (specifically glucose and amino acids), they downregulate mTORC1 signaling, while retreatment of cells with these nutrients restores mTORC1-mediated signaling (26). Given this, we sought to determine whether any of the activating mTOR mutants affect the sensitivity of mTORC1 signaling to amino acid or glucose withdrawal. Indeed, S6K1 phosphorylation was highly resistant to deprivation of either nutrient in cells expressing several mutants (A1459P, S2215Y, I2500F and R2505P) (Figure 3C and Supplementary Figures 4E and 4F). This observation may be relevant in the context of developing tumors, which are often glucose starved (27, 28), where inappropriate mTORC1 activity may provide a growth advantage.  Cancer cells with hyperactivating MTOR mutations are hypersensitive to rapamycin in vitro and in vivo  To determine if cancer cells with MTOR mutations are dependent on mTORC1 activity, we evaluated the impact of rapamycin on the proliferation of set of cancer cell lines harboring WT or mutant mTOR (Figure 4A). We identified four cell lines with mTORC1-activating MTOR mutations (C1483Y in MOLT16; E1799K in HEC59 and SNU349; and S2215Y in JHUEM7) and two with MTOR mutations that have no apparent impact on mTORC1 signaling (V2006L in TUHR10TKB; and R2152C in A375) (Supplementary Figures 5A and 5B). HeLa cells were used as a negative control cell line, as they are mildly rapamycin sensitive and are wild-type for mTOR (7, 29). MCF7 and SW780 cells, which are also wild-type for mTOR, served as positive controls for rapamycin sensitivity because the MCF7 cells harbor an activating PI3K-p110α mutation (E545K) while the SW780 cells lack NPRL2, which encodes a component of the GATOR1 negative regulator of the amino acid-sensing pathway (30, 31). Importantly, only the cell lines with activating MTOR mutations, the PI3K-p110α mutant, or the NPRL2-null SW780 cells were hypersensitive to rapamycin treatment (Figure 4B). Consistent with these and published results, the growth of HeLa xenografts was partially rapamycin sensitive, while rapamycin completely halted the growth of HEC59 xenografts, which carry the hyperactivating mTOR E1799K mutation (Figure 4C) (32, 33). These results suggest that the presence of hyperactivating MTOR mutations in cancer cells may serve as biomarkers to identify tumors that are likely to respond to mTOR inhibitors.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Rapamycin inhibits the proliferation of cancer cell lines with hyperactivating MTOR mutations Go to: Discussion Early cancer genome sequencing projects led to the identification of three mutations in MTOR that were shown to activate mTORC1 signaling (3, 4). Here, we have identified an additional 33 previously unknown activating MTOR mutations (some are recurrent, others are not) (Supplementary Table 4). Mechanistically, we find that the activating mutations diminish the mTOR-Deptor interaction and interestingly, when mapped onto the recently solved crystal structure of mTOR, the mutations cluster in several distinct locations within the protein itself, suggesting that other activating mechanisms may exist (Supplementary Figure 6) (34). While the mutations do not prevent pharmacological mTOR inhibition, a subset protect against the effects of nutrient deprivation on mTORC1 signaling. Lastly, we demonstrate that cell lines with activating MTOR mutations are particularly sensitive to rapamycin in cell culture and in xenografts, likely due to mTOR pathway dependency.  The diversity of activating MTOR mutations we characterized is reminiscent of the various activating mutations in the prototypical lipid kinase PIK3CA, which encodes for the PI3K catalytic subunit p110α (35). However, unlike the activating PIK3CA mutations, which confer equal activation of PI3K-mediated signaling pathways, the diverse MTOR mutations can differentially activate mTORC1 or mTORC2, leading to either S6K1/4EBP1 or Akt1 phosphorylation, respectively. This finding is particularly relevant in a clinical setting, as patients with mTORC1 activating mutations may respond well to FDA-approved rapalogs, while patients with mTORC2 activating mutations might best be treated with ATP-competitive mTOR inhibitors, although such inhibitors are still in clinical trials. This distinction is especially relevant for patients with mTORC2 activating mutations, because rapalogs can in some cases upregulate mTORC2 signaling through modulation of an mTORC1-dependent feedback loop (36).  Rapalog-based therapies are currently approved or in clinical trials for several cancer subtypes, and some patients have had dramatic and durable responses to these therapies (37). Given that some cells with activating MTOR mutations are particularly rapamycin sensitive (Figure 4), it is possible that some of the rapalog-responsive patients had tumors with similar mutations. Indeed, it was recently found that the tumor of a bladder cancer patient with two activating MTOR mutations displayed exquisite sensitivity to rapalog-based therapy (38). Many more cancer-associated MTOR mutations will likely be identified in future studies, but functional evaluation of these mutations will be required to determine their impact on the mTOR pathway. As tumor sequencing becomes more commonplace, functional studies such as ours may aid in arriving at a more personalized treatment regimen that eventually promotes patient survival.  Go to: Methods Data acquisition and cluster analysis  All mutations in genes of the mTOR pathway were acquired from the cBIO, COSMIC, and ICGC databases or through a literature search with a data-freeze date of September 1, 2013. To identify regions of mTOR significantly enriched for somatic point mutations, we determined the probability of seeing at least the observed number of mutations in a 50 amino acid sliding window with the null hypothesis being all 463 MTOR mutations randomly occurring across the 2549 amino acid protein. Specifically, we calculated a threshold for significance of at least 15 mutations per 50 amino acids by the formula:  p=∑n=k463(463k)∗(1−502549)463−k∗(502549)k which equals 0.043 for k = at least 15 mutations per 50 amino acids.  Materials  Reagents were obtained from the following sources: antibodies to HA (clone C29F4), S6K1 (clone 49D7), phospho-T389-S6K1 (clone 108D2), and phospho-S473-Akt1 (clone D9E) from Cell Signaling Technology; antibody to GAPDH (clone GT239) from Genetex; antibodies to Deptor and Raptor, X-ray film, and PVDF membrane were from Millipore; antibody to Rictor from Bethyl; antibody to the Flag epitope (clone M2), Flag M2-coupled agarose beads, glucose and amino acid mixtures from Sigma; horseradish-peroxidase-labeled anti-mouse and anti-rabbit secondary antibodies from Santa Cruz Biotechnology; FuGENE HD and Cell Titer Glo from Promega; X-tremeGENE 9 and Complete Protease Mixture from Roche Applied Science; QuikChange II XL from Stratagene; enhanced chemiluminescence reagent and glutathione-coupled agarose beads from Thermo; 8-week-old nude mice from Taconic; rapamycin from LC Labs; MLN0128 and GDC0980 from Selleckchem; and Torin1 was synthesized in the Gray laboratory (39). cDNAs for mTOR and PI3K-p110α were from Addgene; expression vectors for HAGST-S6K1, HA-GST-Akt1, and HA-GST-Rheb1 were described previously (24, 40, 41) and Flag-14-3-3α was a generous gift from the Yaffe lab. The primers used to generate the mTOR and Rheb1 mutations were from Integrated DNA Technologies and are listed in supplemental table 5. HEK-293T-TREX cell system, 4-12% bis-tris SDS-PAGE gels, and 20x MOPS buffers were from Invitrogen.  Tissue culture and cell lines  MCF7, HELA, HEK-293T, HCT116, A375 and SW780 cells were from ATCC; JHUEM7, MOLT16, NCIH446, SNU349, and TUHR10TKB cells were from the Broad Institute Cancer Cell Line Encyclopedia; HEK-293E cells were a generous gift of the Blenis lab; and the HEC59 cells were a generous gift of the Lippard lab. The cell lines have not been re-authenticated, although those from ATCC and the Broad were used within 6 months of resuscitation. The HEK-293T, HEK-293E, HCT116, A375, HEC59, and TUHR10TKB cells were cultured in DMEM; JHUEM7 and MOLT16 cells were cultured in RPMI; and the SW780 cells were cultured in IMDM. All media was prepared with 10% heat inactivated FBS and 1% Penicillin/Streptomycin. All cell lines were maintained at 37°C, 5% CO2.  Site-directed mutagenesis, cloning, and TREX cell line generation  All MTOR and RHEB point mutations were generated in the parental vectors using site-directed mutagenesis with the QuikChange II XL kit according to the manufacturer’s protocol. Primer sequences are listed in Supplementary Table 5. Point mutations were verified using Sanger sequencing as conducted by Eton Biosciences. The HA-GST-4EBP1 reporter vector was generated by synthesizing a gBlock from IDT encoding for 4EBP1 and cloning it into the pRK5-HA-GST vector using SalI and NotI restriction digestion followed by ligation. WT and mutant mTOR cDNAs were subcloned directly from the pcDNA3 vector into the pcDNA5/FRT/TO vector using single site NotI restriction digestion followed by ligation. Flag-mTOR-expressing TREX cells were generated according to the manufacturer's protocol.  Cell treatments, lysis, and immunoprecipitations  For S6K1 and Akt1 co-transfection assays, 3×105 HEK-293T or HEK-293E cells per well were seeded into 6-well tissue culture plates, transfected 24 hours later with 2 μg of mTOR-encoding plasmid and 1 ng of S6K1- or Akt1-encoding plasmid using X-tremeGENE 9 or FuGENE HD, followed by whole cell lysis 48 hours after transfection in NP-40 lysis buffer (50 mM Tris-HCl at pH 7.5, 150 mM NaCl, 1% NP-40 substitute, 1 mM EDTA at pH8.0, 50 mM NaF, 10 mM Na-pyrophosphate, 15 mM Na3VO4, 100 mM β-glycerophosphate, and 1 tablet of protease inhibitor per 50 mL of buffer). 200-400 μg of whole cell lysates were mixed with 5x SDS-sample buffer to a final concentration of 1-2 μg/μL, boiled for 5 minutes, and then used directly for immunoblotting or frozen at −20°C. For glutathione pull down assays, 2×106 HEK-293T cells were seeded onto 10 cm tissue culture plates, transfected 24 hours later with 10 μg of mTOR-encoding plasmid and 2 ng of S6K1-encoding plasmid using X-tremeGENE 9, and lysed 48-72 hours after transfection in NP-40 lysis buffer. 2-3 mg of the resultant whole-cell lysates were incubated with 30 μL of pre-washed glutathione-coupled agarose beads in a 1 mL volume, which were rotated at 4°C for two hours, spun at 2,500 RCF for one minute, washed in 500 μL lysis buffer three times, and the beads directly boiled in 50 μL of 2x SDS-sample buffer. For mTOR immunoprecipitations, the cells were treated as with the glutathione pulldown, except they were lysed/washed in CHAPS buffer (50 mM HEPES at pH 7.4, 150 mM NaCl, 0.4% CHAPS, 50 mM NaF, 10 mM Na-pyrophosphate, 100 mM β-glycerophosphate, and 1 tablet of protease inhibitor per 50 mL of buffer) and incubated with Flag-M2-coupled agarose beads.  Immunoblotting  10-50 μg of whole cell lysates, 10-30 μL of glutathione pulldown samples, or 10-30 μL of Flag-M2 immunoprecipitates were loaded into lanes of 4-12% bis-tris SDS-PAGE gels, run at 120 volts for 2 hours in 1x MOPS buffer, and then transferred to 0.45 μm PVDF membrane at 60 volts for 2 hours in 1x transfer buffer (100 mM CAPS, 123 mM NaOH, 10% Ethanol). The membranes were then immunoblotted for the indicated proteins. All primary antibodies were diluted 1:1000 in 5% BSA W/V TBST, with the exception of GAPDH and Flag antibodies which were diluted 1:2000. All secondary antibodies were diluted 1:5000 in 5% milk W/V TBST. Densitometry was performed using ImageJ and a student's T test was used to determine statistical significance.  Rapamycin, Torin1, MLN0128, GDC0980, and nutrient starvation/re-stimulation treatments  For the mTOR inhibitor experiments, 3×105 TREX cells per well were seeded into 6-well plates, grown for one day, treated with 100 nM rapamycin, 250 nM Torin1, 250 nM MLN0128, 250 nM GDC0980, or DMSO for 60 minutes. The cells were then lysed as above. For the nutrient deprivation experiments, 3×105 TREX cells per well were seeded into 6-well plates, grown for one day, rinsed briefly in 1x amino acid- or glucose-free RPMI, incubated in 1x amino acid- or glucose-free RPMI for 60 minutes, and then stimulated with free amino acids or glucose to the levels in complete RPMI for 15 minutes.  In vitro proliferation assays  Six replicates each of 800-1200 cells were seeded into 96-well plates, treated with 8 doses of rapamycin 24 hours later, and assayed for ATP content using Cell Titer Glo 96 hours following rapamycin treatment according to the manufacturer's protocol.  In vivo xenograft assays  3×106 cells per injection site were implanted subcutaneously into the right and left flanks of nude mice. Once tumors were palpable in all animals (>50 mm3 volume by caliper measurements), mice were assigned randomly into rapamycin treated or untreated groups and caliper measurements were taken every 3-4 days until tumor burden approached the limits set by institutional guidelines. Tumor volume was assessed according to the formula (0.5)(W)(W)(L), and a student's T test was used to determine the p-values. Rapamycin (4 mg/kg) or vehicle was delivered by daily IP injection, 100 mL per injection. All experiments involving mice were carried out with approval from the Committee for Animal Care at MIT and under supervision of the Department of Comparative Medicine at MIT.   Significance  We report that a diverse set of cancer-associated MTOR mutations confer increased mTORC1/2 pathway activity and that cells harboring these mutations are highly sensitive to rapamycin in culture and in vivo. These findings are clinically relevant as the MTOR mutations characterized herein may serve as biomarkers for predicting tumor responses to mTOR inhibitors.  
1865||Genes encoding components of the PI3K-Akt-mTOR signaling axis are frequently mutated in cancer, but few mutations have been characterized in MTOR, the gene for the mTOR kinase. Using publicly available tumor genome sequencing data, we generated a comprehensive catalog of mTOR pathway mutations in cancer, identifying 33 MTOR mutations that confer pathway hyperactivation. The mutations cluster in six distinct regions in the C-terminal half of mTOR and occur in multiple cancer types, with one cluster particularly prominent in kidney cancer. The activating mutations do not affect mTOR complex assembly, but a subset reduces binding to the mTOR inhibitor Deptor. mTORC1 signaling in cells expressing various activating mutations remains sensitive to pharmacological mTOR inhibition, but is partially resistant to nutrient deprivation. Lastly, cancer cell lines with hyperactivating MTOR mutations display heightened sensitivity to rapamycin both in culture and as in vivo xenografts, suggesting that such mutations confer mTOR pathway dependency.  Keywords: personalized, mTOR, mutations, biomarker, deptor Go to: Introduction In mammals, the PI3K-Akt-mTOR pathway regulates cell size, mRNA translation, autophagy and many metabolic processes, including lipid synthesis (1). A variety of upstream regulators control the activity of the serine/threonine protein kinase mTOR and many of these are deregulated in cancer, resulting in pathway hyperactivation. Such activation occurs most commonly through loss-of-function mutations in tumor suppressors, such as phosphatase and tensin homolog (PTEN), tuberous sclerosis 1/2 (TSC1/2), neurofibromin 1/2 (NF1/2), or oncogenic mutations in KRAS, PIK3CA, or AKT (2). However, few cancer-associated mutations have been functionally characterized in MTOR itself, with only two reports thus far describing such mutations. In the first report, the authors tested six cancer-associated MTOR mutations and observed that two (S2215Y from a colorectal sample and R2505P from a kidney sample) conferred mTOR complex 1 (mTORC1) activation (3). In the second report, the authors identified an mTORC1 activating MTOR mutation (L2431P) that was present in a portion but not the entirety of a primary kidney tumor (4). Although these initial reports establish that activating MTOR mutations do arise in cancer, they were based upon limited sample sets that do not reflect the diverse subtypes of cancer. More recently, cancer genome sequencing projects, such as The Cancer Genome Atlas (TCGA) and the Cancer Cell Line Encyclopedia (CCLE), have identified a vast number of somatic mutations in thousands of tumors from more than 40 cancer subtypes (5-7).  Using publicly available databases of cancer genome sequence data, we cataloged all mutations in mTOR pathway components. We annotated over 400 samples with missense mutations in the MTOR gene from dozens of cancer subtypes, most of which lie within six clusters in the part of the gene that encodes the C-terminal portion of mTOR. Furthermore, through functional analyses, we identify 33 novel mTOR pathway-activating mutations, some of which affect the capacity of mTOR to interact with its partner proteins. None of the activating mutations impact the sensitivity of mTORC1 activity in cells to mTOR inhibitors but a subset confer mTORC1 signaling resistance to nutrient deprivation. Importantly, cancer cells that naturally express a subset of the mutations are hypersensitive to the mTOR inhibitor rapamycin. These findings may have translational relevance as rapamycin analogs (rapalogs) are clinically approved for the treatment of cancer, and several ATP-competitive mTOR kinase inhibitors are in development (8). As tumor biopsies are increasingly subjected to whole exome sequencing, the hyperactivating MTOR mutations we characterize may serve as biomarkers in predicting cancer response to mTOR-targeting drugs.  Go to: Results Catalog of recurring mutations in genes encoding mTOR pathway components  To generate a comprehensive catalog of all cancer-associated missense mutations in canonical genes of the mTOR pathway, we analyzed partial genome sequencing data from the TCGA, CCLE, International Cancer Genome Consortium (ICGC) and Catalogue of Somatic Mutations in Cancer (COSMIC) databases (5-7, 9, 10). This analysis revealed that almost every gene in the mTOR pathway harbored somatic point mutations (Supplementary Table 1). To enrich for mutations that are more likely to affect pathway function, only mutations that alter the same codon more than once were counted. When normalized for gene length, this analysis revealed that MTOR contained the highest percentage of recurring mutations, and thus we focused most of our attention on these mutations (Supplementary Figure 1). Collectively, through data mining and a literature search, we curated over 400 samples with non-synonymous MTOR point mutations (Figure 1B and Supplementary Table 2) (11-17). While the majority of these mutations are represented by only one sample in our database, approximately 40% are recurrent, most of which have not been previously described. Additionally, the mutations cluster in six distinct regions of mTOR centered on highly recurrent mutations that alter amino acids C1483, E1799, T1977, S2215, L2427 and R2505 (Figure 1C). The presence of these clusters suggests that there is a selective advantage to acquiring mutations in certain regions of the mTOR protein. Furthermore, these mutations are present in multiple cancer subtypes, with the highest number in colorectal, endometrial, and lung cancers, although these cancer subtypes are also considered to have the highest mutation rates (Figures 1D and 1E) (18). Interestingly, a random mutagenesis screen in the S. pombe mTOR homolog (tor2) identified activating mutations in homologous amino acid positions to many of those we find in MTOR to be recurrently mutated in cancer (19) (Supplementary Table 3).  Figure 1 Figure 1 Cancer-associated MTOR mutations mTORC1/2 activating mutations in MTOR  The prevalence of the recurrent mutations, their clustering, and correlation with activating tor2 mutations strongly suggested that the MTOR mutations impact mTOR pathway activity. To test this possibility, wild-type (WT) or ten different mutants of mTOR (L1460P, C1483F, E1799K, F1888L, T1977R, V2006I, S2215Y, I2500F, R2505P, and D2512H) were expressed in cells and phosphorylation of the mTORC1/2 substrates S6K1, 4EBP1, or Akt1 examined (Figures 2A, 2B, and 2C). All the mTOR mutants conferred varying degrees of pathway activation, and, interestingly, a few displayed some substrate preference (L1460P, C1483F, S2215Y, and R2505P towards S6K1/4EBP1 or V2006I towards Akt1), implying that these mutations have greater effects on mTORC1 or mTORC2. Thus, while three pathway activating MTOR mutations have previously been identified (3, 4), our initial analyses uncovered an additional eight recurrent MTOR mutations which activate mTORC1 and/or mTORC2.  Figure 2 Figure 2 mTORC1 and mTORC2 activating mutations in MTOR and RHEB It is well established that two activating mutations (E545K and H1047R) within the phosphatidylinositol-4,5-bisphosphate 3-kinase, catalytic subunit alpha (PI3K-p110α), encoded by the PIK3CA gene, can lead to mTOR pathway activation (20). To determine the degree of mTOR pathway activation conferred by mTOR mutation, S6K1 phosphorylation from cells expressing WT or S2215Y mTOR was compared to cells expressing WT or mutant PI3K-p110α (Supplementary Figures 2A and 2B). This revealed that while expression of only mutant mTOR conferred mTORC1 activation, expression of either WT or mutant PI3K-p110α induced mTORC1 activity.  Non-recurrent MTOR mutations that activate mTORC1 signaling  We next examined in more detail the nature of the activating MTOR mutations, and observed that while some codons are mutated to only one other residue (e.g. E1799K), others are mutated to several different amino acids (e.g. S2215F/P/T/Y). This is reminiscent of the diverse amino acids to which the G12 residue of KRAS is mutated in cancers (21). We expressed 20 such MTOR mutations and found that many (C1483R/W/Y, F1888I, T1977K, S2215F/P, I2500M), but not all (A41P/S/T, F1888V, T1977S, V2006L, S2215T, R2505Q/*, D2512G/Y), led to increased S6K1 phosphorylation (Supplementary Figures 3 and 5, and data not shown). Given that most of these activating mutations are found only once in our dataset implies that other non-recurrent mutations may also activate mTORC1 signaling. To identify other such mutations, we turned our attention to the mutational clusters identified in Figure 1, and observed that while most are represented by several tissue types, those in the C1483 cluster are particularly prevalent in kidney cancer (Figure 1E and Supplementary Figure 3D). Interestingly, two recent cancer genome sequencing efforts reported that kidney cancers have an increased percentage of mutations in mTOR pathway genes, but the functional consequences of these mutations were not evaluated (13, 22). Expression of the ten kidney cancer-associated MTOR mutations from the C1483 cluster revealed that in addition to the previously evaluated L1460P and C1483F/Y mutants (Figure 1B and Supplemental Figure 2), three non-recurrent mutants (L1433S, A1459P, and E1519T) also induced mTORC1 pathway activity (Figure 2D). Similarly, expression of eight non-recurrent mutations from the S2215 cluster (N2206S, L2209V, A2210P, L2216P, R2217W, L2220F, Q2223K, and A2226S) activated mTORC1 signaling as measured by S6K1 phosphorylation, with the L2209V mutant conferring higher activation than even S2215Y (Supplementary Figure 3E). Lastly, other than the S2215Y and R2505P mutations, the only other cancer-associated MTOR mutation previously characterized is L2431P from a kidney cancer patient (4). Expression of mTOR containing this non-recurrent mutation caused mTORC1 activation that was much weaker than that caused by expression of the S2215Y mutant (Supplementary Figure 3F). Collectively, these results suggest that while most non-recurrent MTOR mutations found in cancer are part of the mutational “noise”, there exists a diverse set of MTOR mutations that can drive mTORC1 pathway activity. Likely, as more cancer genomes are sequenced, the activating non-recurrent mutations we identified will prove to be recurrent.  Recurrent mutations in RHEB activate mTORC1  We also observed that other mTOR pathway genes such as Raptor, Rictor, and Rheb1 harbored recurrent mutations (Supplemental Table 1). Expression of Rheb1 Y35N/C/H and to a lesser degree E139K increased phosphorylation of endogenous S6K1 more than that of WT Rheb1 (Figure 2E), while recurrent mutations in Raptor (R788C) or Rictor (S1101L) failed to induce any mTORC1 or mTORC2 activity (data not shown). In support of the relevance of these mutations to cancer, RHEB was recently highlighted as a novel cancer gene due to the presence of the Y35N mutation (23). Thus, cancer associated mutations in either MTOR or RHEB can induce mTORC1 activity; whether this is true of other mTOR pathway genes remains to be determined.  mTORC1/2 hyperactivating mutants bind less Deptor  One potential mechanism through which the mutations in mTOR (Figure 2) might increase S6K1/Akt1 phosphorylation is by altering mTORC1 or mTORC2 assembly. Alternatively or in addition, the mTOR mutations may diminish the binding of mTOR to its endogenous inhibitor Deptor, which binds to the FAT domain of mTOR (24). To test these possibilities, the interactions of exogenously expressed WT or mutant mTORs with endogenous Raptor, Rictor, and Deptor were measured. All mutant mTOR proteins bound equally well to Raptor and Rictor, suggesting that the mutations do not affect formation of either mTOR complex (Figure 3A). In contrast, Deptor binding to the immunoprecipitated mTOR proteins was reduced in cells expressing the mTOR mutants as compared to WT mTOR (Figure 3A). Given that increased mTOR pathway activity correlates with a reduction in the mTOR-Deptor interaction (24), it is likely that the observed decrease in Deptor binding reflects the increased mTOR pathway activity caused by the MTOR mutations. However, two mTORC1 activating mutations that are in the FAT domain of mTOR, L1460P and C1483Y, bound much less Deptor than the other mutants tested (Figure 3A), suggesting that these mutations directly perturb the Deptor binding site on mTOR. Consistent with this, examination of the mutations from the C1483 cluster described in figure 2D revealed that two other highly activating mutations in the FAT domain (A1459P and C1483Y) also strongly reduced the mTOR-Deptor interaction (Supplementary Figure 4A). While these results suggest a possible mechanism of action for a subset of activating mTOR mutations, they do not preclude other mechanism by which MTOR mutations may impact mTORC1 signaling, such as by increasing the activity of the mTOR kinase domain.  Figure 3 Figure 3 mTOR mutants bind less Deptor and cells expressing the mTOR S2215Y mutation are resistant to nutrient deprivation MTOR mutations do not affect mTORC1 sensitivity to mTOR inhibitors but can affect the pathway response to nutrient deprivation  We next considered the possibility that the mTORC1-activating MTOR mutants have altered sensitivity to established mTOR inhibitors. Engineered mutations in the FRB domain of mTOR, which binds the FKBP12-rapamycin complex, confer marked rapamycin resistance to mTOR (25). To test whether mTOR mutation alters pathway inhibition by rapamycin or Torin1 (an investigational ATP-competitive mTOR inhibitor), we used HEK-293 cells with an integrated FLP recombination site (TREX cells) to stably express WT or several different mutants of mTOR (A1459P, C1483Y, E1799K, F1888I, L2209V, S2215Y, L2431P, I2500F, and R2505P), as the mTOR cDNA is too large to be packaged and expressed via a lentiviral delivery system (Supplementary Figure 4B). Baseline phosphorylation of endogenous S6K1 was higher in TREX cells expressing the A1459P, L2209V, S2215Y, I2500F and R2505P mTOR mutants than in parental or WT-expressing cells (Figure 3B and Supplementary Figures 4C and 4D), consistent with the results obtained upon transient expression of these mutants (Figures 2A and 2D, and Supplementary Figure 3D). Importantly, mTORC1 activity in none of the TREX cells was resistant to rapamycin, Torin1, MLN0128 (an mTOR ATP-competitive inhibitor), GDC0980 (a dual PI3K/mTOR ATP-competitive inhibitor), (Figure 3B and Supplementary Figures 4C and 4D). Thus, on a molecular level, while cells with mTOR mutations may display high levels of mTORC1/2 activity, this activity is still sensitive to pharmacological mTOR inhibition.  The kinase activity of mTOR is tightly regulated by nutrient availability; when cells are starved of nutrients (specifically glucose and amino acids), they downregulate mTORC1 signaling, while retreatment of cells with these nutrients restores mTORC1-mediated signaling (26). Given this, we sought to determine whether any of the activating mTOR mutants affect the sensitivity of mTORC1 signaling to amino acid or glucose withdrawal. Indeed, S6K1 phosphorylation was highly resistant to deprivation of either nutrient in cells expressing several mutants (A1459P, S2215Y, I2500F and R2505P) (Figure 3C and Supplementary Figures 4E and 4F). This observation may be relevant in the context of developing tumors, which are often glucose starved (27, 28), where inappropriate mTORC1 activity may provide a growth advantage.  Cancer cells with hyperactivating MTOR mutations are hypersensitive to rapamycin in vitro and in vivo  To determine if cancer cells with MTOR mutations are dependent on mTORC1 activity, we evaluated the impact of rapamycin on the proliferation of set of cancer cell lines harboring WT or mutant mTOR (Figure 4A). We identified four cell lines with mTORC1-activating MTOR mutations (C1483Y in MOLT16; E1799K in HEC59 and SNU349; and S2215Y in JHUEM7) and two with MTOR mutations that have no apparent impact on mTORC1 signaling (V2006L in TUHR10TKB; and R2152C in A375) (Supplementary Figures 5A and 5B). HeLa cells were used as a negative control cell line, as they are mildly rapamycin sensitive and are wild-type for mTOR (7, 29). MCF7 and SW780 cells, which are also wild-type for mTOR, served as positive controls for rapamycin sensitivity because the MCF7 cells harbor an activating PI3K-p110α mutation (E545K) while the SW780 cells lack NPRL2, which encodes a component of the GATOR1 negative regulator of the amino acid-sensing pathway (30, 31). Importantly, only the cell lines with activating MTOR mutations, the PI3K-p110α mutant, or the NPRL2-null SW780 cells were hypersensitive to rapamycin treatment (Figure 4B). Consistent with these and published results, the growth of HeLa xenografts was partially rapamycin sensitive, while rapamycin completely halted the growth of HEC59 xenografts, which carry the hyperactivating mTOR E1799K mutation (Figure 4C) (32, 33). These results suggest that the presence of hyperactivating MTOR mutations in cancer cells may serve as biomarkers to identify tumors that are likely to respond to mTOR inhibitors.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Rapamycin inhibits the proliferation of cancer cell lines with hyperactivating MTOR mutations Go to: Discussion Early cancer genome sequencing projects led to the identification of three mutations in MTOR that were shown to activate mTORC1 signaling (3, 4). Here, we have identified an additional 33 previously unknown activating MTOR mutations (some are recurrent, others are not) (Supplementary Table 4). Mechanistically, we find that the activating mutations diminish the mTOR-Deptor interaction and interestingly, when mapped onto the recently solved crystal structure of mTOR, the mutations cluster in several distinct locations within the protein itself, suggesting that other activating mechanisms may exist (Supplementary Figure 6) (34). While the mutations do not prevent pharmacological mTOR inhibition, a subset protect against the effects of nutrient deprivation on mTORC1 signaling. Lastly, we demonstrate that cell lines with activating MTOR mutations are particularly sensitive to rapamycin in cell culture and in xenografts, likely due to mTOR pathway dependency.  The diversity of activating MTOR mutations we characterized is reminiscent of the various activating mutations in the prototypical lipid kinase PIK3CA, which encodes for the PI3K catalytic subunit p110α (35). However, unlike the activating PIK3CA mutations, which confer equal activation of PI3K-mediated signaling pathways, the diverse MTOR mutations can differentially activate mTORC1 or mTORC2, leading to either S6K1/4EBP1 or Akt1 phosphorylation, respectively. This finding is particularly relevant in a clinical setting, as patients with mTORC1 activating mutations may respond well to FDA-approved rapalogs, while patients with mTORC2 activating mutations might best be treated with ATP-competitive mTOR inhibitors, although such inhibitors are still in clinical trials. This distinction is especially relevant for patients with mTORC2 activating mutations, because rapalogs can in some cases upregulate mTORC2 signaling through modulation of an mTORC1-dependent feedback loop (36).  Rapalog-based therapies are currently approved or in clinical trials for several cancer subtypes, and some patients have had dramatic and durable responses to these therapies (37). Given that some cells with activating MTOR mutations are particularly rapamycin sensitive (Figure 4), it is possible that some of the rapalog-responsive patients had tumors with similar mutations. Indeed, it was recently found that the tumor of a bladder cancer patient with two activating MTOR mutations displayed exquisite sensitivity to rapalog-based therapy (38). Many more cancer-associated MTOR mutations will likely be identified in future studies, but functional evaluation of these mutations will be required to determine their impact on the mTOR pathway. As tumor sequencing becomes more commonplace, functional studies such as ours may aid in arriving at a more personalized treatment regimen that eventually promotes patient survival.  Go to: Methods Data acquisition and cluster analysis  All mutations in genes of the mTOR pathway were acquired from the cBIO, COSMIC, and ICGC databases or through a literature search with a data-freeze date of September 1, 2013. To identify regions of mTOR significantly enriched for somatic point mutations, we determined the probability of seeing at least the observed number of mutations in a 50 amino acid sliding window with the null hypothesis being all 463 MTOR mutations randomly occurring across the 2549 amino acid protein. Specifically, we calculated a threshold for significance of at least 15 mutations per 50 amino acids by the formula:  p=∑n=k463(463k)∗(1−502549)463−k∗(502549)k which equals 0.043 for k = at least 15 mutations per 50 amino acids.  Materials  Reagents were obtained from the following sources: antibodies to HA (clone C29F4), S6K1 (clone 49D7), phospho-T389-S6K1 (clone 108D2), and phospho-S473-Akt1 (clone D9E) from Cell Signaling Technology; antibody to GAPDH (clone GT239) from Genetex; antibodies to Deptor and Raptor, X-ray film, and PVDF membrane were from Millipore; antibody to Rictor from Bethyl; antibody to the Flag epitope (clone M2), Flag M2-coupled agarose beads, glucose and amino acid mixtures from Sigma; horseradish-peroxidase-labeled anti-mouse and anti-rabbit secondary antibodies from Santa Cruz Biotechnology; FuGENE HD and Cell Titer Glo from Promega; X-tremeGENE 9 and Complete Protease Mixture from Roche Applied Science; QuikChange II XL from Stratagene; enhanced chemiluminescence reagent and glutathione-coupled agarose beads from Thermo; 8-week-old nude mice from Taconic; rapamycin from LC Labs; MLN0128 and GDC0980 from Selleckchem; and Torin1 was synthesized in the Gray laboratory (39). cDNAs for mTOR and PI3K-p110α were from Addgene; expression vectors for HAGST-S6K1, HA-GST-Akt1, and HA-GST-Rheb1 were described previously (24, 40, 41) and Flag-14-3-3α was a generous gift from the Yaffe lab. The primers used to generate the mTOR and Rheb1 mutations were from Integrated DNA Technologies and are listed in supplemental table 5. HEK-293T-TREX cell system, 4-12% bis-tris SDS-PAGE gels, and 20x MOPS buffers were from Invitrogen.  Tissue culture and cell lines  MCF7, HELA, HEK-293T, HCT116, A375 and SW780 cells were from ATCC; JHUEM7, MOLT16, NCIH446, SNU349, and TUHR10TKB cells were from the Broad Institute Cancer Cell Line Encyclopedia; HEK-293E cells were a generous gift of the Blenis lab; and the HEC59 cells were a generous gift of the Lippard lab. The cell lines have not been re-authenticated, although those from ATCC and the Broad were used within 6 months of resuscitation. The HEK-293T, HEK-293E, HCT116, A375, HEC59, and TUHR10TKB cells were cultured in DMEM; JHUEM7 and MOLT16 cells were cultured in RPMI; and the SW780 cells were cultured in IMDM. All media was prepared with 10% heat inactivated FBS and 1% Penicillin/Streptomycin. All cell lines were maintained at 37°C, 5% CO2.  Site-directed mutagenesis, cloning, and TREX cell line generation  All MTOR and RHEB point mutations were generated in the parental vectors using site-directed mutagenesis with the QuikChange II XL kit according to the manufacturer’s protocol. Primer sequences are listed in Supplementary Table 5. Point mutations were verified using Sanger sequencing as conducted by Eton Biosciences. The HA-GST-4EBP1 reporter vector was generated by synthesizing a gBlock from IDT encoding for 4EBP1 and cloning it into the pRK5-HA-GST vector using SalI and NotI restriction digestion followed by ligation. WT and mutant mTOR cDNAs were subcloned directly from the pcDNA3 vector into the pcDNA5/FRT/TO vector using single site NotI restriction digestion followed by ligation. Flag-mTOR-expressing TREX cells were generated according to the manufacturer's protocol.  Cell treatments, lysis, and immunoprecipitations  For S6K1 and Akt1 co-transfection assays, 3×105 HEK-293T or HEK-293E cells per well were seeded into 6-well tissue culture plates, transfected 24 hours later with 2 μg of mTOR-encoding plasmid and 1 ng of S6K1- or Akt1-encoding plasmid using X-tremeGENE 9 or FuGENE HD, followed by whole cell lysis 48 hours after transfection in NP-40 lysis buffer (50 mM Tris-HCl at pH 7.5, 150 mM NaCl, 1% NP-40 substitute, 1 mM EDTA at pH8.0, 50 mM NaF, 10 mM Na-pyrophosphate, 15 mM Na3VO4, 100 mM β-glycerophosphate, and 1 tablet of protease inhibitor per 50 mL of buffer). 200-400 μg of whole cell lysates were mixed with 5x SDS-sample buffer to a final concentration of 1-2 μg/μL, boiled for 5 minutes, and then used directly for immunoblotting or frozen at −20°C. For glutathione pull down assays, 2×106 HEK-293T cells were seeded onto 10 cm tissue culture plates, transfected 24 hours later with 10 μg of mTOR-encoding plasmid and 2 ng of S6K1-encoding plasmid using X-tremeGENE 9, and lysed 48-72 hours after transfection in NP-40 lysis buffer. 2-3 mg of the resultant whole-cell lysates were incubated with 30 μL of pre-washed glutathione-coupled agarose beads in a 1 mL volume, which were rotated at 4°C for two hours, spun at 2,500 RCF for one minute, washed in 500 μL lysis buffer three times, and the beads directly boiled in 50 μL of 2x SDS-sample buffer. For mTOR immunoprecipitations, the cells were treated as with the glutathione pulldown, except they were lysed/washed in CHAPS buffer (50 mM HEPES at pH 7.4, 150 mM NaCl, 0.4% CHAPS, 50 mM NaF, 10 mM Na-pyrophosphate, 100 mM β-glycerophosphate, and 1 tablet of protease inhibitor per 50 mL of buffer) and incubated with Flag-M2-coupled agarose beads.  Immunoblotting  10-50 μg of whole cell lysates, 10-30 μL of glutathione pulldown samples, or 10-30 μL of Flag-M2 immunoprecipitates were loaded into lanes of 4-12% bis-tris SDS-PAGE gels, run at 120 volts for 2 hours in 1x MOPS buffer, and then transferred to 0.45 μm PVDF membrane at 60 volts for 2 hours in 1x transfer buffer (100 mM CAPS, 123 mM NaOH, 10% Ethanol). The membranes were then immunoblotted for the indicated proteins. All primary antibodies were diluted 1:1000 in 5% BSA W/V TBST, with the exception of GAPDH and Flag antibodies which were diluted 1:2000. All secondary antibodies were diluted 1:5000 in 5% milk W/V TBST. Densitometry was performed using ImageJ and a student's T test was used to determine statistical significance.  Rapamycin, Torin1, MLN0128, GDC0980, and nutrient starvation/re-stimulation treatments  For the mTOR inhibitor experiments, 3×105 TREX cells per well were seeded into 6-well plates, grown for one day, treated with 100 nM rapamycin, 250 nM Torin1, 250 nM MLN0128, 250 nM GDC0980, or DMSO for 60 minutes. The cells were then lysed as above. For the nutrient deprivation experiments, 3×105 TREX cells per well were seeded into 6-well plates, grown for one day, rinsed briefly in 1x amino acid- or glucose-free RPMI, incubated in 1x amino acid- or glucose-free RPMI for 60 minutes, and then stimulated with free amino acids or glucose to the levels in complete RPMI for 15 minutes.  In vitro proliferation assays  Six replicates each of 800-1200 cells were seeded into 96-well plates, treated with 8 doses of rapamycin 24 hours later, and assayed for ATP content using Cell Titer Glo 96 hours following rapamycin treatment according to the manufacturer's protocol.  In vivo xenograft assays  3×106 cells per injection site were implanted subcutaneously into the right and left flanks of nude mice. Once tumors were palpable in all animals (>50 mm3 volume by caliper measurements), mice were assigned randomly into rapamycin treated or untreated groups and caliper measurements were taken every 3-4 days until tumor burden approached the limits set by institutional guidelines. Tumor volume was assessed according to the formula (0.5)(W)(W)(L), and a student's T test was used to determine the p-values. Rapamycin (4 mg/kg) or vehicle was delivered by daily IP injection, 100 mL per injection. All experiments involving mice were carried out with approval from the Committee for Animal Care at MIT and under supervision of the Department of Comparative Medicine at MIT.   Significance  We report that a diverse set of cancer-associated MTOR mutations confer increased mTORC1/2 pathway activity and that cells harboring these mutations are highly sensitive to rapamycin in culture and in vivo. These findings are clinically relevant as the MTOR mutations characterized herein may serve as biomarkers for predicting tumor responses to mTOR inhibitors.  
1873||Genes encoding components of the PI3K-Akt-mTOR signaling axis are frequently mutated in cancer, but few mutations have been characterized in MTOR, the gene for the mTOR kinase. Using publicly available tumor genome sequencing data, we generated a comprehensive catalog of mTOR pathway mutations in cancer, identifying 33 MTOR mutations that confer pathway hyperactivation. The mutations cluster in six distinct regions in the C-terminal half of mTOR and occur in multiple cancer types, with one cluster particularly prominent in kidney cancer. The activating mutations do not affect mTOR complex assembly, but a subset reduces binding to the mTOR inhibitor Deptor. mTORC1 signaling in cells expressing various activating mutations remains sensitive to pharmacological mTOR inhibition, but is partially resistant to nutrient deprivation. Lastly, cancer cell lines with hyperactivating MTOR mutations display heightened sensitivity to rapamycin both in culture and as in vivo xenografts, suggesting that such mutations confer mTOR pathway dependency.  Keywords: personalized, mTOR, mutations, biomarker, deptor Go to: Introduction In mammals, the PI3K-Akt-mTOR pathway regulates cell size, mRNA translation, autophagy and many metabolic processes, including lipid synthesis (1). A variety of upstream regulators control the activity of the serine/threonine protein kinase mTOR and many of these are deregulated in cancer, resulting in pathway hyperactivation. Such activation occurs most commonly through loss-of-function mutations in tumor suppressors, such as phosphatase and tensin homolog (PTEN), tuberous sclerosis 1/2 (TSC1/2), neurofibromin 1/2 (NF1/2), or oncogenic mutations in KRAS, PIK3CA, or AKT (2). However, few cancer-associated mutations have been functionally characterized in MTOR itself, with only two reports thus far describing such mutations. In the first report, the authors tested six cancer-associated MTOR mutations and observed that two (S2215Y from a colorectal sample and R2505P from a kidney sample) conferred mTOR complex 1 (mTORC1) activation (3). In the second report, the authors identified an mTORC1 activating MTOR mutation (L2431P) that was present in a portion but not the entirety of a primary kidney tumor (4). Although these initial reports establish that activating MTOR mutations do arise in cancer, they were based upon limited sample sets that do not reflect the diverse subtypes of cancer. More recently, cancer genome sequencing projects, such as The Cancer Genome Atlas (TCGA) and the Cancer Cell Line Encyclopedia (CCLE), have identified a vast number of somatic mutations in thousands of tumors from more than 40 cancer subtypes (5-7).  Using publicly available databases of cancer genome sequence data, we cataloged all mutations in mTOR pathway components. We annotated over 400 samples with missense mutations in the MTOR gene from dozens of cancer subtypes, most of which lie within six clusters in the part of the gene that encodes the C-terminal portion of mTOR. Furthermore, through functional analyses, we identify 33 novel mTOR pathway-activating mutations, some of which affect the capacity of mTOR to interact with its partner proteins. None of the activating mutations impact the sensitivity of mTORC1 activity in cells to mTOR inhibitors but a subset confer mTORC1 signaling resistance to nutrient deprivation. Importantly, cancer cells that naturally express a subset of the mutations are hypersensitive to the mTOR inhibitor rapamycin. These findings may have translational relevance as rapamycin analogs (rapalogs) are clinically approved for the treatment of cancer, and several ATP-competitive mTOR kinase inhibitors are in development (8). As tumor biopsies are increasingly subjected to whole exome sequencing, the hyperactivating MTOR mutations we characterize may serve as biomarkers in predicting cancer response to mTOR-targeting drugs.  Go to: Results Catalog of recurring mutations in genes encoding mTOR pathway components  To generate a comprehensive catalog of all cancer-associated missense mutations in canonical genes of the mTOR pathway, we analyzed partial genome sequencing data from the TCGA, CCLE, International Cancer Genome Consortium (ICGC) and Catalogue of Somatic Mutations in Cancer (COSMIC) databases (5-7, 9, 10). This analysis revealed that almost every gene in the mTOR pathway harbored somatic point mutations (Supplementary Table 1). To enrich for mutations that are more likely to affect pathway function, only mutations that alter the same codon more than once were counted. When normalized for gene length, this analysis revealed that MTOR contained the highest percentage of recurring mutations, and thus we focused most of our attention on these mutations (Supplementary Figure 1). Collectively, through data mining and a literature search, we curated over 400 samples with non-synonymous MTOR point mutations (Figure 1B and Supplementary Table 2) (11-17). While the majority of these mutations are represented by only one sample in our database, approximately 40% are recurrent, most of which have not been previously described. Additionally, the mutations cluster in six distinct regions of mTOR centered on highly recurrent mutations that alter amino acids C1483, E1799, T1977, S2215, L2427 and R2505 (Figure 1C). The presence of these clusters suggests that there is a selective advantage to acquiring mutations in certain regions of the mTOR protein. Furthermore, these mutations are present in multiple cancer subtypes, with the highest number in colorectal, endometrial, and lung cancers, although these cancer subtypes are also considered to have the highest mutation rates (Figures 1D and 1E) (18). Interestingly, a random mutagenesis screen in the S. pombe mTOR homolog (tor2) identified activating mutations in homologous amino acid positions to many of those we find in MTOR to be recurrently mutated in cancer (19) (Supplementary Table 3).  Figure 1 Figure 1 Cancer-associated MTOR mutations mTORC1/2 activating mutations in MTOR  The prevalence of the recurrent mutations, their clustering, and correlation with activating tor2 mutations strongly suggested that the MTOR mutations impact mTOR pathway activity. To test this possibility, wild-type (WT) or ten different mutants of mTOR (L1460P, C1483F, E1799K, F1888L, T1977R, V2006I, S2215Y, I2500F, R2505P, and D2512H) were expressed in cells and phosphorylation of the mTORC1/2 substrates S6K1, 4EBP1, or Akt1 examined (Figures 2A, 2B, and 2C). All the mTOR mutants conferred varying degrees of pathway activation, and, interestingly, a few displayed some substrate preference (L1460P, C1483F, S2215Y, and R2505P towards S6K1/4EBP1 or V2006I towards Akt1), implying that these mutations have greater effects on mTORC1 or mTORC2. Thus, while three pathway activating MTOR mutations have previously been identified (3, 4), our initial analyses uncovered an additional eight recurrent MTOR mutations which activate mTORC1 and/or mTORC2.  Figure 2 Figure 2 mTORC1 and mTORC2 activating mutations in MTOR and RHEB It is well established that two activating mutations (E545K and H1047R) within the phosphatidylinositol-4,5-bisphosphate 3-kinase, catalytic subunit alpha (PI3K-p110α), encoded by the PIK3CA gene, can lead to mTOR pathway activation (20). To determine the degree of mTOR pathway activation conferred by mTOR mutation, S6K1 phosphorylation from cells expressing WT or S2215Y mTOR was compared to cells expressing WT or mutant PI3K-p110α (Supplementary Figures 2A and 2B). This revealed that while expression of only mutant mTOR conferred mTORC1 activation, expression of either WT or mutant PI3K-p110α induced mTORC1 activity.  Non-recurrent MTOR mutations that activate mTORC1 signaling  We next examined in more detail the nature of the activating MTOR mutations, and observed that while some codons are mutated to only one other residue (e.g. E1799K), others are mutated to several different amino acids (e.g. S2215F/P/T/Y). This is reminiscent of the diverse amino acids to which the G12 residue of KRAS is mutated in cancers (21). We expressed 20 such MTOR mutations and found that many (C1483R/W/Y, F1888I, T1977K, S2215F/P, I2500M), but not all (A41P/S/T, F1888V, T1977S, V2006L, S2215T, R2505Q/*, D2512G/Y), led to increased S6K1 phosphorylation (Supplementary Figures 3 and 5, and data not shown). Given that most of these activating mutations are found only once in our dataset implies that other non-recurrent mutations may also activate mTORC1 signaling. To identify other such mutations, we turned our attention to the mutational clusters identified in Figure 1, and observed that while most are represented by several tissue types, those in the C1483 cluster are particularly prevalent in kidney cancer (Figure 1E and Supplementary Figure 3D). Interestingly, two recent cancer genome sequencing efforts reported that kidney cancers have an increased percentage of mutations in mTOR pathway genes, but the functional consequences of these mutations were not evaluated (13, 22). Expression of the ten kidney cancer-associated MTOR mutations from the C1483 cluster revealed that in addition to the previously evaluated L1460P and C1483F/Y mutants (Figure 1B and Supplemental Figure 2), three non-recurrent mutants (L1433S, A1459P, and E1519T) also induced mTORC1 pathway activity (Figure 2D). Similarly, expression of eight non-recurrent mutations from the S2215 cluster (N2206S, L2209V, A2210P, L2216P, R2217W, L2220F, Q2223K, and A2226S) activated mTORC1 signaling as measured by S6K1 phosphorylation, with the L2209V mutant conferring higher activation than even S2215Y (Supplementary Figure 3E). Lastly, other than the S2215Y and R2505P mutations, the only other cancer-associated MTOR mutation previously characterized is L2431P from a kidney cancer patient (4). Expression of mTOR containing this non-recurrent mutation caused mTORC1 activation that was much weaker than that caused by expression of the S2215Y mutant (Supplementary Figure 3F). Collectively, these results suggest that while most non-recurrent MTOR mutations found in cancer are part of the mutational “noise”, there exists a diverse set of MTOR mutations that can drive mTORC1 pathway activity. Likely, as more cancer genomes are sequenced, the activating non-recurrent mutations we identified will prove to be recurrent.  Recurrent mutations in RHEB activate mTORC1  We also observed that other mTOR pathway genes such as Raptor, Rictor, and Rheb1 harbored recurrent mutations (Supplemental Table 1). Expression of Rheb1 Y35N/C/H and to a lesser degree E139K increased phosphorylation of endogenous S6K1 more than that of WT Rheb1 (Figure 2E), while recurrent mutations in Raptor (R788C) or Rictor (S1101L) failed to induce any mTORC1 or mTORC2 activity (data not shown). In support of the relevance of these mutations to cancer, RHEB was recently highlighted as a novel cancer gene due to the presence of the Y35N mutation (23). Thus, cancer associated mutations in either MTOR or RHEB can induce mTORC1 activity; whether this is true of other mTOR pathway genes remains to be determined.  mTORC1/2 hyperactivating mutants bind less Deptor  One potential mechanism through which the mutations in mTOR (Figure 2) might increase S6K1/Akt1 phosphorylation is by altering mTORC1 or mTORC2 assembly. Alternatively or in addition, the mTOR mutations may diminish the binding of mTOR to its endogenous inhibitor Deptor, which binds to the FAT domain of mTOR (24). To test these possibilities, the interactions of exogenously expressed WT or mutant mTORs with endogenous Raptor, Rictor, and Deptor were measured. All mutant mTOR proteins bound equally well to Raptor and Rictor, suggesting that the mutations do not affect formation of either mTOR complex (Figure 3A). In contrast, Deptor binding to the immunoprecipitated mTOR proteins was reduced in cells expressing the mTOR mutants as compared to WT mTOR (Figure 3A). Given that increased mTOR pathway activity correlates with a reduction in the mTOR-Deptor interaction (24), it is likely that the observed decrease in Deptor binding reflects the increased mTOR pathway activity caused by the MTOR mutations. However, two mTORC1 activating mutations that are in the FAT domain of mTOR, L1460P and C1483Y, bound much less Deptor than the other mutants tested (Figure 3A), suggesting that these mutations directly perturb the Deptor binding site on mTOR. Consistent with this, examination of the mutations from the C1483 cluster described in figure 2D revealed that two other highly activating mutations in the FAT domain (A1459P and C1483Y) also strongly reduced the mTOR-Deptor interaction (Supplementary Figure 4A). While these results suggest a possible mechanism of action for a subset of activating mTOR mutations, they do not preclude other mechanism by which MTOR mutations may impact mTORC1 signaling, such as by increasing the activity of the mTOR kinase domain.  Figure 3 Figure 3 mTOR mutants bind less Deptor and cells expressing the mTOR S2215Y mutation are resistant to nutrient deprivation MTOR mutations do not affect mTORC1 sensitivity to mTOR inhibitors but can affect the pathway response to nutrient deprivation  We next considered the possibility that the mTORC1-activating MTOR mutants have altered sensitivity to established mTOR inhibitors. Engineered mutations in the FRB domain of mTOR, which binds the FKBP12-rapamycin complex, confer marked rapamycin resistance to mTOR (25). To test whether mTOR mutation alters pathway inhibition by rapamycin or Torin1 (an investigational ATP-competitive mTOR inhibitor), we used HEK-293 cells with an integrated FLP recombination site (TREX cells) to stably express WT or several different mutants of mTOR (A1459P, C1483Y, E1799K, F1888I, L2209V, S2215Y, L2431P, I2500F, and R2505P), as the mTOR cDNA is too large to be packaged and expressed via a lentiviral delivery system (Supplementary Figure 4B). Baseline phosphorylation of endogenous S6K1 was higher in TREX cells expressing the A1459P, L2209V, S2215Y, I2500F and R2505P mTOR mutants than in parental or WT-expressing cells (Figure 3B and Supplementary Figures 4C and 4D), consistent with the results obtained upon transient expression of these mutants (Figures 2A and 2D, and Supplementary Figure 3D). Importantly, mTORC1 activity in none of the TREX cells was resistant to rapamycin, Torin1, MLN0128 (an mTOR ATP-competitive inhibitor), GDC0980 (a dual PI3K/mTOR ATP-competitive inhibitor), (Figure 3B and Supplementary Figures 4C and 4D). Thus, on a molecular level, while cells with mTOR mutations may display high levels of mTORC1/2 activity, this activity is still sensitive to pharmacological mTOR inhibition.  The kinase activity of mTOR is tightly regulated by nutrient availability; when cells are starved of nutrients (specifically glucose and amino acids), they downregulate mTORC1 signaling, while retreatment of cells with these nutrients restores mTORC1-mediated signaling (26). Given this, we sought to determine whether any of the activating mTOR mutants affect the sensitivity of mTORC1 signaling to amino acid or glucose withdrawal. Indeed, S6K1 phosphorylation was highly resistant to deprivation of either nutrient in cells expressing several mutants (A1459P, S2215Y, I2500F and R2505P) (Figure 3C and Supplementary Figures 4E and 4F). This observation may be relevant in the context of developing tumors, which are often glucose starved (27, 28), where inappropriate mTORC1 activity may provide a growth advantage.  Cancer cells with hyperactivating MTOR mutations are hypersensitive to rapamycin in vitro and in vivo  To determine if cancer cells with MTOR mutations are dependent on mTORC1 activity, we evaluated the impact of rapamycin on the proliferation of set of cancer cell lines harboring WT or mutant mTOR (Figure 4A). We identified four cell lines with mTORC1-activating MTOR mutations (C1483Y in MOLT16; E1799K in HEC59 and SNU349; and S2215Y in JHUEM7) and two with MTOR mutations that have no apparent impact on mTORC1 signaling (V2006L in TUHR10TKB; and R2152C in A375) (Supplementary Figures 5A and 5B). HeLa cells were used as a negative control cell line, as they are mildly rapamycin sensitive and are wild-type for mTOR (7, 29). MCF7 and SW780 cells, which are also wild-type for mTOR, served as positive controls for rapamycin sensitivity because the MCF7 cells harbor an activating PI3K-p110α mutation (E545K) while the SW780 cells lack NPRL2, which encodes a component of the GATOR1 negative regulator of the amino acid-sensing pathway (30, 31). Importantly, only the cell lines with activating MTOR mutations, the PI3K-p110α mutant, or the NPRL2-null SW780 cells were hypersensitive to rapamycin treatment (Figure 4B). Consistent with these and published results, the growth of HeLa xenografts was partially rapamycin sensitive, while rapamycin completely halted the growth of HEC59 xenografts, which carry the hyperactivating mTOR E1799K mutation (Figure 4C) (32, 33). These results suggest that the presence of hyperactivating MTOR mutations in cancer cells may serve as biomarkers to identify tumors that are likely to respond to mTOR inhibitors.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Rapamycin inhibits the proliferation of cancer cell lines with hyperactivating MTOR mutations Go to: Discussion Early cancer genome sequencing projects led to the identification of three mutations in MTOR that were shown to activate mTORC1 signaling (3, 4). Here, we have identified an additional 33 previously unknown activating MTOR mutations (some are recurrent, others are not) (Supplementary Table 4). Mechanistically, we find that the activating mutations diminish the mTOR-Deptor interaction and interestingly, when mapped onto the recently solved crystal structure of mTOR, the mutations cluster in several distinct locations within the protein itself, suggesting that other activating mechanisms may exist (Supplementary Figure 6) (34). While the mutations do not prevent pharmacological mTOR inhibition, a subset protect against the effects of nutrient deprivation on mTORC1 signaling. Lastly, we demonstrate that cell lines with activating MTOR mutations are particularly sensitive to rapamycin in cell culture and in xenografts, likely due to mTOR pathway dependency.  The diversity of activating MTOR mutations we characterized is reminiscent of the various activating mutations in the prototypical lipid kinase PIK3CA, which encodes for the PI3K catalytic subunit p110α (35). However, unlike the activating PIK3CA mutations, which confer equal activation of PI3K-mediated signaling pathways, the diverse MTOR mutations can differentially activate mTORC1 or mTORC2, leading to either S6K1/4EBP1 or Akt1 phosphorylation, respectively. This finding is particularly relevant in a clinical setting, as patients with mTORC1 activating mutations may respond well to FDA-approved rapalogs, while patients with mTORC2 activating mutations might best be treated with ATP-competitive mTOR inhibitors, although such inhibitors are still in clinical trials. This distinction is especially relevant for patients with mTORC2 activating mutations, because rapalogs can in some cases upregulate mTORC2 signaling through modulation of an mTORC1-dependent feedback loop (36).  Rapalog-based therapies are currently approved or in clinical trials for several cancer subtypes, and some patients have had dramatic and durable responses to these therapies (37). Given that some cells with activating MTOR mutations are particularly rapamycin sensitive (Figure 4), it is possible that some of the rapalog-responsive patients had tumors with similar mutations. Indeed, it was recently found that the tumor of a bladder cancer patient with two activating MTOR mutations displayed exquisite sensitivity to rapalog-based therapy (38). Many more cancer-associated MTOR mutations will likely be identified in future studies, but functional evaluation of these mutations will be required to determine their impact on the mTOR pathway. As tumor sequencing becomes more commonplace, functional studies such as ours may aid in arriving at a more personalized treatment regimen that eventually promotes patient survival.  Go to: Methods Data acquisition and cluster analysis  All mutations in genes of the mTOR pathway were acquired from the cBIO, COSMIC, and ICGC databases or through a literature search with a data-freeze date of September 1, 2013. To identify regions of mTOR significantly enriched for somatic point mutations, we determined the probability of seeing at least the observed number of mutations in a 50 amino acid sliding window with the null hypothesis being all 463 MTOR mutations randomly occurring across the 2549 amino acid protein. Specifically, we calculated a threshold for significance of at least 15 mutations per 50 amino acids by the formula:  p=∑n=k463(463k)∗(1−502549)463−k∗(502549)k which equals 0.043 for k = at least 15 mutations per 50 amino acids.  Materials  Reagents were obtained from the following sources: antibodies to HA (clone C29F4), S6K1 (clone 49D7), phospho-T389-S6K1 (clone 108D2), and phospho-S473-Akt1 (clone D9E) from Cell Signaling Technology; antibody to GAPDH (clone GT239) from Genetex; antibodies to Deptor and Raptor, X-ray film, and PVDF membrane were from Millipore; antibody to Rictor from Bethyl; antibody to the Flag epitope (clone M2), Flag M2-coupled agarose beads, glucose and amino acid mixtures from Sigma; horseradish-peroxidase-labeled anti-mouse and anti-rabbit secondary antibodies from Santa Cruz Biotechnology; FuGENE HD and Cell Titer Glo from Promega; X-tremeGENE 9 and Complete Protease Mixture from Roche Applied Science; QuikChange II XL from Stratagene; enhanced chemiluminescence reagent and glutathione-coupled agarose beads from Thermo; 8-week-old nude mice from Taconic; rapamycin from LC Labs; MLN0128 and GDC0980 from Selleckchem; and Torin1 was synthesized in the Gray laboratory (39). cDNAs for mTOR and PI3K-p110α were from Addgene; expression vectors for HAGST-S6K1, HA-GST-Akt1, and HA-GST-Rheb1 were described previously (24, 40, 41) and Flag-14-3-3α was a generous gift from the Yaffe lab. The primers used to generate the mTOR and Rheb1 mutations were from Integrated DNA Technologies and are listed in supplemental table 5. HEK-293T-TREX cell system, 4-12% bis-tris SDS-PAGE gels, and 20x MOPS buffers were from Invitrogen.  Tissue culture and cell lines  MCF7, HELA, HEK-293T, HCT116, A375 and SW780 cells were from ATCC; JHUEM7, MOLT16, NCIH446, SNU349, and TUHR10TKB cells were from the Broad Institute Cancer Cell Line Encyclopedia; HEK-293E cells were a generous gift of the Blenis lab; and the HEC59 cells were a generous gift of the Lippard lab. The cell lines have not been re-authenticated, although those from ATCC and the Broad were used within 6 months of resuscitation. The HEK-293T, HEK-293E, HCT116, A375, HEC59, and TUHR10TKB cells were cultured in DMEM; JHUEM7 and MOLT16 cells were cultured in RPMI; and the SW780 cells were cultured in IMDM. All media was prepared with 10% heat inactivated FBS and 1% Penicillin/Streptomycin. All cell lines were maintained at 37°C, 5% CO2.  Site-directed mutagenesis, cloning, and TREX cell line generation  All MTOR and RHEB point mutations were generated in the parental vectors using site-directed mutagenesis with the QuikChange II XL kit according to the manufacturer’s protocol. Primer sequences are listed in Supplementary Table 5. Point mutations were verified using Sanger sequencing as conducted by Eton Biosciences. The HA-GST-4EBP1 reporter vector was generated by synthesizing a gBlock from IDT encoding for 4EBP1 and cloning it into the pRK5-HA-GST vector using SalI and NotI restriction digestion followed by ligation. WT and mutant mTOR cDNAs were subcloned directly from the pcDNA3 vector into the pcDNA5/FRT/TO vector using single site NotI restriction digestion followed by ligation. Flag-mTOR-expressing TREX cells were generated according to the manufacturer's protocol.  Cell treatments, lysis, and immunoprecipitations  For S6K1 and Akt1 co-transfection assays, 3×105 HEK-293T or HEK-293E cells per well were seeded into 6-well tissue culture plates, transfected 24 hours later with 2 μg of mTOR-encoding plasmid and 1 ng of S6K1- or Akt1-encoding plasmid using X-tremeGENE 9 or FuGENE HD, followed by whole cell lysis 48 hours after transfection in NP-40 lysis buffer (50 mM Tris-HCl at pH 7.5, 150 mM NaCl, 1% NP-40 substitute, 1 mM EDTA at pH8.0, 50 mM NaF, 10 mM Na-pyrophosphate, 15 mM Na3VO4, 100 mM β-glycerophosphate, and 1 tablet of protease inhibitor per 50 mL of buffer). 200-400 μg of whole cell lysates were mixed with 5x SDS-sample buffer to a final concentration of 1-2 μg/μL, boiled for 5 minutes, and then used directly for immunoblotting or frozen at −20°C. For glutathione pull down assays, 2×106 HEK-293T cells were seeded onto 10 cm tissue culture plates, transfected 24 hours later with 10 μg of mTOR-encoding plasmid and 2 ng of S6K1-encoding plasmid using X-tremeGENE 9, and lysed 48-72 hours after transfection in NP-40 lysis buffer. 2-3 mg of the resultant whole-cell lysates were incubated with 30 μL of pre-washed glutathione-coupled agarose beads in a 1 mL volume, which were rotated at 4°C for two hours, spun at 2,500 RCF for one minute, washed in 500 μL lysis buffer three times, and the beads directly boiled in 50 μL of 2x SDS-sample buffer. For mTOR immunoprecipitations, the cells were treated as with the glutathione pulldown, except they were lysed/washed in CHAPS buffer (50 mM HEPES at pH 7.4, 150 mM NaCl, 0.4% CHAPS, 50 mM NaF, 10 mM Na-pyrophosphate, 100 mM β-glycerophosphate, and 1 tablet of protease inhibitor per 50 mL of buffer) and incubated with Flag-M2-coupled agarose beads.  Immunoblotting  10-50 μg of whole cell lysates, 10-30 μL of glutathione pulldown samples, or 10-30 μL of Flag-M2 immunoprecipitates were loaded into lanes of 4-12% bis-tris SDS-PAGE gels, run at 120 volts for 2 hours in 1x MOPS buffer, and then transferred to 0.45 μm PVDF membrane at 60 volts for 2 hours in 1x transfer buffer (100 mM CAPS, 123 mM NaOH, 10% Ethanol). The membranes were then immunoblotted for the indicated proteins. All primary antibodies were diluted 1:1000 in 5% BSA W/V TBST, with the exception of GAPDH and Flag antibodies which were diluted 1:2000. All secondary antibodies were diluted 1:5000 in 5% milk W/V TBST. Densitometry was performed using ImageJ and a student's T test was used to determine statistical significance.  Rapamycin, Torin1, MLN0128, GDC0980, and nutrient starvation/re-stimulation treatments  For the mTOR inhibitor experiments, 3×105 TREX cells per well were seeded into 6-well plates, grown for one day, treated with 100 nM rapamycin, 250 nM Torin1, 250 nM MLN0128, 250 nM GDC0980, or DMSO for 60 minutes. The cells were then lysed as above. For the nutrient deprivation experiments, 3×105 TREX cells per well were seeded into 6-well plates, grown for one day, rinsed briefly in 1x amino acid- or glucose-free RPMI, incubated in 1x amino acid- or glucose-free RPMI for 60 minutes, and then stimulated with free amino acids or glucose to the levels in complete RPMI for 15 minutes.  In vitro proliferation assays  Six replicates each of 800-1200 cells were seeded into 96-well plates, treated with 8 doses of rapamycin 24 hours later, and assayed for ATP content using Cell Titer Glo 96 hours following rapamycin treatment according to the manufacturer's protocol.  In vivo xenograft assays  3×106 cells per injection site were implanted subcutaneously into the right and left flanks of nude mice. Once tumors were palpable in all animals (>50 mm3 volume by caliper measurements), mice were assigned randomly into rapamycin treated or untreated groups and caliper measurements were taken every 3-4 days until tumor burden approached the limits set by institutional guidelines. Tumor volume was assessed according to the formula (0.5)(W)(W)(L), and a student's T test was used to determine the p-values. Rapamycin (4 mg/kg) or vehicle was delivered by daily IP injection, 100 mL per injection. All experiments involving mice were carried out with approval from the Committee for Animal Care at MIT and under supervision of the Department of Comparative Medicine at MIT.   Significance  We report that a diverse set of cancer-associated MTOR mutations confer increased mTORC1/2 pathway activity and that cells harboring these mutations are highly sensitive to rapamycin in culture and in vivo. These findings are clinically relevant as the MTOR mutations characterized herein may serve as biomarkers for predicting tumor responses to mTOR inhibitors.  
1874||Genes encoding components of the PI3K-Akt-mTOR signaling axis are frequently mutated in cancer, but few mutations have been characterized in MTOR, the gene for the mTOR kinase. Using publicly available tumor genome sequencing data, we generated a comprehensive catalog of mTOR pathway mutations in cancer, identifying 33 MTOR mutations that confer pathway hyperactivation. The mutations cluster in six distinct regions in the C-terminal half of mTOR and occur in multiple cancer types, with one cluster particularly prominent in kidney cancer. The activating mutations do not affect mTOR complex assembly, but a subset reduces binding to the mTOR inhibitor Deptor. mTORC1 signaling in cells expressing various activating mutations remains sensitive to pharmacological mTOR inhibition, but is partially resistant to nutrient deprivation. Lastly, cancer cell lines with hyperactivating MTOR mutations display heightened sensitivity to rapamycin both in culture and as in vivo xenografts, suggesting that such mutations confer mTOR pathway dependency.  Keywords: personalized, mTOR, mutations, biomarker, deptor Go to: Introduction In mammals, the PI3K-Akt-mTOR pathway regulates cell size, mRNA translation, autophagy and many metabolic processes, including lipid synthesis (1). A variety of upstream regulators control the activity of the serine/threonine protein kinase mTOR and many of these are deregulated in cancer, resulting in pathway hyperactivation. Such activation occurs most commonly through loss-of-function mutations in tumor suppressors, such as phosphatase and tensin homolog (PTEN), tuberous sclerosis 1/2 (TSC1/2), neurofibromin 1/2 (NF1/2), or oncogenic mutations in KRAS, PIK3CA, or AKT (2). However, few cancer-associated mutations have been functionally characterized in MTOR itself, with only two reports thus far describing such mutations. In the first report, the authors tested six cancer-associated MTOR mutations and observed that two (S2215Y from a colorectal sample and R2505P from a kidney sample) conferred mTOR complex 1 (mTORC1) activation (3). In the second report, the authors identified an mTORC1 activating MTOR mutation (L2431P) that was present in a portion but not the entirety of a primary kidney tumor (4). Although these initial reports establish that activating MTOR mutations do arise in cancer, they were based upon limited sample sets that do not reflect the diverse subtypes of cancer. More recently, cancer genome sequencing projects, such as The Cancer Genome Atlas (TCGA) and the Cancer Cell Line Encyclopedia (CCLE), have identified a vast number of somatic mutations in thousands of tumors from more than 40 cancer subtypes (5-7).  Using publicly available databases of cancer genome sequence data, we cataloged all mutations in mTOR pathway components. We annotated over 400 samples with missense mutations in the MTOR gene from dozens of cancer subtypes, most of which lie within six clusters in the part of the gene that encodes the C-terminal portion of mTOR. Furthermore, through functional analyses, we identify 33 novel mTOR pathway-activating mutations, some of which affect the capacity of mTOR to interact with its partner proteins. None of the activating mutations impact the sensitivity of mTORC1 activity in cells to mTOR inhibitors but a subset confer mTORC1 signaling resistance to nutrient deprivation. Importantly, cancer cells that naturally express a subset of the mutations are hypersensitive to the mTOR inhibitor rapamycin. These findings may have translational relevance as rapamycin analogs (rapalogs) are clinically approved for the treatment of cancer, and several ATP-competitive mTOR kinase inhibitors are in development (8). As tumor biopsies are increasingly subjected to whole exome sequencing, the hyperactivating MTOR mutations we characterize may serve as biomarkers in predicting cancer response to mTOR-targeting drugs.  Go to: Results Catalog of recurring mutations in genes encoding mTOR pathway components  To generate a comprehensive catalog of all cancer-associated missense mutations in canonical genes of the mTOR pathway, we analyzed partial genome sequencing data from the TCGA, CCLE, International Cancer Genome Consortium (ICGC) and Catalogue of Somatic Mutations in Cancer (COSMIC) databases (5-7, 9, 10). This analysis revealed that almost every gene in the mTOR pathway harbored somatic point mutations (Supplementary Table 1). To enrich for mutations that are more likely to affect pathway function, only mutations that alter the same codon more than once were counted. When normalized for gene length, this analysis revealed that MTOR contained the highest percentage of recurring mutations, and thus we focused most of our attention on these mutations (Supplementary Figure 1). Collectively, through data mining and a literature search, we curated over 400 samples with non-synonymous MTOR point mutations (Figure 1B and Supplementary Table 2) (11-17). While the majority of these mutations are represented by only one sample in our database, approximately 40% are recurrent, most of which have not been previously described. Additionally, the mutations cluster in six distinct regions of mTOR centered on highly recurrent mutations that alter amino acids C1483, E1799, T1977, S2215, L2427 and R2505 (Figure 1C). The presence of these clusters suggests that there is a selective advantage to acquiring mutations in certain regions of the mTOR protein. Furthermore, these mutations are present in multiple cancer subtypes, with the highest number in colorectal, endometrial, and lung cancers, although these cancer subtypes are also considered to have the highest mutation rates (Figures 1D and 1E) (18). Interestingly, a random mutagenesis screen in the S. pombe mTOR homolog (tor2) identified activating mutations in homologous amino acid positions to many of those we find in MTOR to be recurrently mutated in cancer (19) (Supplementary Table 3).  Figure 1 Figure 1 Cancer-associated MTOR mutations mTORC1/2 activating mutations in MTOR  The prevalence of the recurrent mutations, their clustering, and correlation with activating tor2 mutations strongly suggested that the MTOR mutations impact mTOR pathway activity. To test this possibility, wild-type (WT) or ten different mutants of mTOR (L1460P, C1483F, E1799K, F1888L, T1977R, V2006I, S2215Y, I2500F, R2505P, and D2512H) were expressed in cells and phosphorylation of the mTORC1/2 substrates S6K1, 4EBP1, or Akt1 examined (Figures 2A, 2B, and 2C). All the mTOR mutants conferred varying degrees of pathway activation, and, interestingly, a few displayed some substrate preference (L1460P, C1483F, S2215Y, and R2505P towards S6K1/4EBP1 or V2006I towards Akt1), implying that these mutations have greater effects on mTORC1 or mTORC2. Thus, while three pathway activating MTOR mutations have previously been identified (3, 4), our initial analyses uncovered an additional eight recurrent MTOR mutations which activate mTORC1 and/or mTORC2.  Figure 2 Figure 2 mTORC1 and mTORC2 activating mutations in MTOR and RHEB It is well established that two activating mutations (E545K and H1047R) within the phosphatidylinositol-4,5-bisphosphate 3-kinase, catalytic subunit alpha (PI3K-p110α), encoded by the PIK3CA gene, can lead to mTOR pathway activation (20). To determine the degree of mTOR pathway activation conferred by mTOR mutation, S6K1 phosphorylation from cells expressing WT or S2215Y mTOR was compared to cells expressing WT or mutant PI3K-p110α (Supplementary Figures 2A and 2B). This revealed that while expression of only mutant mTOR conferred mTORC1 activation, expression of either WT or mutant PI3K-p110α induced mTORC1 activity.  Non-recurrent MTOR mutations that activate mTORC1 signaling  We next examined in more detail the nature of the activating MTOR mutations, and observed that while some codons are mutated to only one other residue (e.g. E1799K), others are mutated to several different amino acids (e.g. S2215F/P/T/Y). This is reminiscent of the diverse amino acids to which the G12 residue of KRAS is mutated in cancers (21). We expressed 20 such MTOR mutations and found that many (C1483R/W/Y, F1888I, T1977K, S2215F/P, I2500M), but not all (A41P/S/T, F1888V, T1977S, V2006L, S2215T, R2505Q/*, D2512G/Y), led to increased S6K1 phosphorylation (Supplementary Figures 3 and 5, and data not shown). Given that most of these activating mutations are found only once in our dataset implies that other non-recurrent mutations may also activate mTORC1 signaling. To identify other such mutations, we turned our attention to the mutational clusters identified in Figure 1, and observed that while most are represented by several tissue types, those in the C1483 cluster are particularly prevalent in kidney cancer (Figure 1E and Supplementary Figure 3D). Interestingly, two recent cancer genome sequencing efforts reported that kidney cancers have an increased percentage of mutations in mTOR pathway genes, but the functional consequences of these mutations were not evaluated (13, 22). Expression of the ten kidney cancer-associated MTOR mutations from the C1483 cluster revealed that in addition to the previously evaluated L1460P and C1483F/Y mutants (Figure 1B and Supplemental Figure 2), three non-recurrent mutants (L1433S, A1459P, and E1519T) also induced mTORC1 pathway activity (Figure 2D). Similarly, expression of eight non-recurrent mutations from the S2215 cluster (N2206S, L2209V, A2210P, L2216P, R2217W, L2220F, Q2223K, and A2226S) activated mTORC1 signaling as measured by S6K1 phosphorylation, with the L2209V mutant conferring higher activation than even S2215Y (Supplementary Figure 3E). Lastly, other than the S2215Y and R2505P mutations, the only other cancer-associated MTOR mutation previously characterized is L2431P from a kidney cancer patient (4). Expression of mTOR containing this non-recurrent mutation caused mTORC1 activation that was much weaker than that caused by expression of the S2215Y mutant (Supplementary Figure 3F). Collectively, these results suggest that while most non-recurrent MTOR mutations found in cancer are part of the mutational “noise”, there exists a diverse set of MTOR mutations that can drive mTORC1 pathway activity. Likely, as more cancer genomes are sequenced, the activating non-recurrent mutations we identified will prove to be recurrent.  Recurrent mutations in RHEB activate mTORC1  We also observed that other mTOR pathway genes such as Raptor, Rictor, and Rheb1 harbored recurrent mutations (Supplemental Table 1). Expression of Rheb1 Y35N/C/H and to a lesser degree E139K increased phosphorylation of endogenous S6K1 more than that of WT Rheb1 (Figure 2E), while recurrent mutations in Raptor (R788C) or Rictor (S1101L) failed to induce any mTORC1 or mTORC2 activity (data not shown). In support of the relevance of these mutations to cancer, RHEB was recently highlighted as a novel cancer gene due to the presence of the Y35N mutation (23). Thus, cancer associated mutations in either MTOR or RHEB can induce mTORC1 activity; whether this is true of other mTOR pathway genes remains to be determined.  mTORC1/2 hyperactivating mutants bind less Deptor  One potential mechanism through which the mutations in mTOR (Figure 2) might increase S6K1/Akt1 phosphorylation is by altering mTORC1 or mTORC2 assembly. Alternatively or in addition, the mTOR mutations may diminish the binding of mTOR to its endogenous inhibitor Deptor, which binds to the FAT domain of mTOR (24). To test these possibilities, the interactions of exogenously expressed WT or mutant mTORs with endogenous Raptor, Rictor, and Deptor were measured. All mutant mTOR proteins bound equally well to Raptor and Rictor, suggesting that the mutations do not affect formation of either mTOR complex (Figure 3A). In contrast, Deptor binding to the immunoprecipitated mTOR proteins was reduced in cells expressing the mTOR mutants as compared to WT mTOR (Figure 3A). Given that increased mTOR pathway activity correlates with a reduction in the mTOR-Deptor interaction (24), it is likely that the observed decrease in Deptor binding reflects the increased mTOR pathway activity caused by the MTOR mutations. However, two mTORC1 activating mutations that are in the FAT domain of mTOR, L1460P and C1483Y, bound much less Deptor than the other mutants tested (Figure 3A), suggesting that these mutations directly perturb the Deptor binding site on mTOR. Consistent with this, examination of the mutations from the C1483 cluster described in figure 2D revealed that two other highly activating mutations in the FAT domain (A1459P and C1483Y) also strongly reduced the mTOR-Deptor interaction (Supplementary Figure 4A). While these results suggest a possible mechanism of action for a subset of activating mTOR mutations, they do not preclude other mechanism by which MTOR mutations may impact mTORC1 signaling, such as by increasing the activity of the mTOR kinase domain.  Figure 3 Figure 3 mTOR mutants bind less Deptor and cells expressing the mTOR S2215Y mutation are resistant to nutrient deprivation MTOR mutations do not affect mTORC1 sensitivity to mTOR inhibitors but can affect the pathway response to nutrient deprivation  We next considered the possibility that the mTORC1-activating MTOR mutants have altered sensitivity to established mTOR inhibitors. Engineered mutations in the FRB domain of mTOR, which binds the FKBP12-rapamycin complex, confer marked rapamycin resistance to mTOR (25). To test whether mTOR mutation alters pathway inhibition by rapamycin or Torin1 (an investigational ATP-competitive mTOR inhibitor), we used HEK-293 cells with an integrated FLP recombination site (TREX cells) to stably express WT or several different mutants of mTOR (A1459P, C1483Y, E1799K, F1888I, L2209V, S2215Y, L2431P, I2500F, and R2505P), as the mTOR cDNA is too large to be packaged and expressed via a lentiviral delivery system (Supplementary Figure 4B). Baseline phosphorylation of endogenous S6K1 was higher in TREX cells expressing the A1459P, L2209V, S2215Y, I2500F and R2505P mTOR mutants than in parental or WT-expressing cells (Figure 3B and Supplementary Figures 4C and 4D), consistent with the results obtained upon transient expression of these mutants (Figures 2A and 2D, and Supplementary Figure 3D). Importantly, mTORC1 activity in none of the TREX cells was resistant to rapamycin, Torin1, MLN0128 (an mTOR ATP-competitive inhibitor), GDC0980 (a dual PI3K/mTOR ATP-competitive inhibitor), (Figure 3B and Supplementary Figures 4C and 4D). Thus, on a molecular level, while cells with mTOR mutations may display high levels of mTORC1/2 activity, this activity is still sensitive to pharmacological mTOR inhibition.  The kinase activity of mTOR is tightly regulated by nutrient availability; when cells are starved of nutrients (specifically glucose and amino acids), they downregulate mTORC1 signaling, while retreatment of cells with these nutrients restores mTORC1-mediated signaling (26). Given this, we sought to determine whether any of the activating mTOR mutants affect the sensitivity of mTORC1 signaling to amino acid or glucose withdrawal. Indeed, S6K1 phosphorylation was highly resistant to deprivation of either nutrient in cells expressing several mutants (A1459P, S2215Y, I2500F and R2505P) (Figure 3C and Supplementary Figures 4E and 4F). This observation may be relevant in the context of developing tumors, which are often glucose starved (27, 28), where inappropriate mTORC1 activity may provide a growth advantage.  Cancer cells with hyperactivating MTOR mutations are hypersensitive to rapamycin in vitro and in vivo  To determine if cancer cells with MTOR mutations are dependent on mTORC1 activity, we evaluated the impact of rapamycin on the proliferation of set of cancer cell lines harboring WT or mutant mTOR (Figure 4A). We identified four cell lines with mTORC1-activating MTOR mutations (C1483Y in MOLT16; E1799K in HEC59 and SNU349; and S2215Y in JHUEM7) and two with MTOR mutations that have no apparent impact on mTORC1 signaling (V2006L in TUHR10TKB; and R2152C in A375) (Supplementary Figures 5A and 5B). HeLa cells were used as a negative control cell line, as they are mildly rapamycin sensitive and are wild-type for mTOR (7, 29). MCF7 and SW780 cells, which are also wild-type for mTOR, served as positive controls for rapamycin sensitivity because the MCF7 cells harbor an activating PI3K-p110α mutation (E545K) while the SW780 cells lack NPRL2, which encodes a component of the GATOR1 negative regulator of the amino acid-sensing pathway (30, 31). Importantly, only the cell lines with activating MTOR mutations, the PI3K-p110α mutant, or the NPRL2-null SW780 cells were hypersensitive to rapamycin treatment (Figure 4B). Consistent with these and published results, the growth of HeLa xenografts was partially rapamycin sensitive, while rapamycin completely halted the growth of HEC59 xenografts, which carry the hyperactivating mTOR E1799K mutation (Figure 4C) (32, 33). These results suggest that the presence of hyperactivating MTOR mutations in cancer cells may serve as biomarkers to identify tumors that are likely to respond to mTOR inhibitors.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Rapamycin inhibits the proliferation of cancer cell lines with hyperactivating MTOR mutations Go to: Discussion Early cancer genome sequencing projects led to the identification of three mutations in MTOR that were shown to activate mTORC1 signaling (3, 4). Here, we have identified an additional 33 previously unknown activating MTOR mutations (some are recurrent, others are not) (Supplementary Table 4). Mechanistically, we find that the activating mutations diminish the mTOR-Deptor interaction and interestingly, when mapped onto the recently solved crystal structure of mTOR, the mutations cluster in several distinct locations within the protein itself, suggesting that other activating mechanisms may exist (Supplementary Figure 6) (34). While the mutations do not prevent pharmacological mTOR inhibition, a subset protect against the effects of nutrient deprivation on mTORC1 signaling. Lastly, we demonstrate that cell lines with activating MTOR mutations are particularly sensitive to rapamycin in cell culture and in xenografts, likely due to mTOR pathway dependency.  The diversity of activating MTOR mutations we characterized is reminiscent of the various activating mutations in the prototypical lipid kinase PIK3CA, which encodes for the PI3K catalytic subunit p110α (35). However, unlike the activating PIK3CA mutations, which confer equal activation of PI3K-mediated signaling pathways, the diverse MTOR mutations can differentially activate mTORC1 or mTORC2, leading to either S6K1/4EBP1 or Akt1 phosphorylation, respectively. This finding is particularly relevant in a clinical setting, as patients with mTORC1 activating mutations may respond well to FDA-approved rapalogs, while patients with mTORC2 activating mutations might best be treated with ATP-competitive mTOR inhibitors, although such inhibitors are still in clinical trials. This distinction is especially relevant for patients with mTORC2 activating mutations, because rapalogs can in some cases upregulate mTORC2 signaling through modulation of an mTORC1-dependent feedback loop (36).  Rapalog-based therapies are currently approved or in clinical trials for several cancer subtypes, and some patients have had dramatic and durable responses to these therapies (37). Given that some cells with activating MTOR mutations are particularly rapamycin sensitive (Figure 4), it is possible that some of the rapalog-responsive patients had tumors with similar mutations. Indeed, it was recently found that the tumor of a bladder cancer patient with two activating MTOR mutations displayed exquisite sensitivity to rapalog-based therapy (38). Many more cancer-associated MTOR mutations will likely be identified in future studies, but functional evaluation of these mutations will be required to determine their impact on the mTOR pathway. As tumor sequencing becomes more commonplace, functional studies such as ours may aid in arriving at a more personalized treatment regimen that eventually promotes patient survival.  Go to: Methods Data acquisition and cluster analysis  All mutations in genes of the mTOR pathway were acquired from the cBIO, COSMIC, and ICGC databases or through a literature search with a data-freeze date of September 1, 2013. To identify regions of mTOR significantly enriched for somatic point mutations, we determined the probability of seeing at least the observed number of mutations in a 50 amino acid sliding window with the null hypothesis being all 463 MTOR mutations randomly occurring across the 2549 amino acid protein. Specifically, we calculated a threshold for significance of at least 15 mutations per 50 amino acids by the formula:  p=∑n=k463(463k)∗(1−502549)463−k∗(502549)k which equals 0.043 for k = at least 15 mutations per 50 amino acids.  Materials  Reagents were obtained from the following sources: antibodies to HA (clone C29F4), S6K1 (clone 49D7), phospho-T389-S6K1 (clone 108D2), and phospho-S473-Akt1 (clone D9E) from Cell Signaling Technology; antibody to GAPDH (clone GT239) from Genetex; antibodies to Deptor and Raptor, X-ray film, and PVDF membrane were from Millipore; antibody to Rictor from Bethyl; antibody to the Flag epitope (clone M2), Flag M2-coupled agarose beads, glucose and amino acid mixtures from Sigma; horseradish-peroxidase-labeled anti-mouse and anti-rabbit secondary antibodies from Santa Cruz Biotechnology; FuGENE HD and Cell Titer Glo from Promega; X-tremeGENE 9 and Complete Protease Mixture from Roche Applied Science; QuikChange II XL from Stratagene; enhanced chemiluminescence reagent and glutathione-coupled agarose beads from Thermo; 8-week-old nude mice from Taconic; rapamycin from LC Labs; MLN0128 and GDC0980 from Selleckchem; and Torin1 was synthesized in the Gray laboratory (39). cDNAs for mTOR and PI3K-p110α were from Addgene; expression vectors for HAGST-S6K1, HA-GST-Akt1, and HA-GST-Rheb1 were described previously (24, 40, 41) and Flag-14-3-3α was a generous gift from the Yaffe lab. The primers used to generate the mTOR and Rheb1 mutations were from Integrated DNA Technologies and are listed in supplemental table 5. HEK-293T-TREX cell system, 4-12% bis-tris SDS-PAGE gels, and 20x MOPS buffers were from Invitrogen.  Tissue culture and cell lines  MCF7, HELA, HEK-293T, HCT116, A375 and SW780 cells were from ATCC; JHUEM7, MOLT16, NCIH446, SNU349, and TUHR10TKB cells were from the Broad Institute Cancer Cell Line Encyclopedia; HEK-293E cells were a generous gift of the Blenis lab; and the HEC59 cells were a generous gift of the Lippard lab. The cell lines have not been re-authenticated, although those from ATCC and the Broad were used within 6 months of resuscitation. The HEK-293T, HEK-293E, HCT116, A375, HEC59, and TUHR10TKB cells were cultured in DMEM; JHUEM7 and MOLT16 cells were cultured in RPMI; and the SW780 cells were cultured in IMDM. All media was prepared with 10% heat inactivated FBS and 1% Penicillin/Streptomycin. All cell lines were maintained at 37°C, 5% CO2.  Site-directed mutagenesis, cloning, and TREX cell line generation  All MTOR and RHEB point mutations were generated in the parental vectors using site-directed mutagenesis with the QuikChange II XL kit according to the manufacturer’s protocol. Primer sequences are listed in Supplementary Table 5. Point mutations were verified using Sanger sequencing as conducted by Eton Biosciences. The HA-GST-4EBP1 reporter vector was generated by synthesizing a gBlock from IDT encoding for 4EBP1 and cloning it into the pRK5-HA-GST vector using SalI and NotI restriction digestion followed by ligation. WT and mutant mTOR cDNAs were subcloned directly from the pcDNA3 vector into the pcDNA5/FRT/TO vector using single site NotI restriction digestion followed by ligation. Flag-mTOR-expressing TREX cells were generated according to the manufacturer's protocol.  Cell treatments, lysis, and immunoprecipitations  For S6K1 and Akt1 co-transfection assays, 3×105 HEK-293T or HEK-293E cells per well were seeded into 6-well tissue culture plates, transfected 24 hours later with 2 μg of mTOR-encoding plasmid and 1 ng of S6K1- or Akt1-encoding plasmid using X-tremeGENE 9 or FuGENE HD, followed by whole cell lysis 48 hours after transfection in NP-40 lysis buffer (50 mM Tris-HCl at pH 7.5, 150 mM NaCl, 1% NP-40 substitute, 1 mM EDTA at pH8.0, 50 mM NaF, 10 mM Na-pyrophosphate, 15 mM Na3VO4, 100 mM β-glycerophosphate, and 1 tablet of protease inhibitor per 50 mL of buffer). 200-400 μg of whole cell lysates were mixed with 5x SDS-sample buffer to a final concentration of 1-2 μg/μL, boiled for 5 minutes, and then used directly for immunoblotting or frozen at −20°C. For glutathione pull down assays, 2×106 HEK-293T cells were seeded onto 10 cm tissue culture plates, transfected 24 hours later with 10 μg of mTOR-encoding plasmid and 2 ng of S6K1-encoding plasmid using X-tremeGENE 9, and lysed 48-72 hours after transfection in NP-40 lysis buffer. 2-3 mg of the resultant whole-cell lysates were incubated with 30 μL of pre-washed glutathione-coupled agarose beads in a 1 mL volume, which were rotated at 4°C for two hours, spun at 2,500 RCF for one minute, washed in 500 μL lysis buffer three times, and the beads directly boiled in 50 μL of 2x SDS-sample buffer. For mTOR immunoprecipitations, the cells were treated as with the glutathione pulldown, except they were lysed/washed in CHAPS buffer (50 mM HEPES at pH 7.4, 150 mM NaCl, 0.4% CHAPS, 50 mM NaF, 10 mM Na-pyrophosphate, 100 mM β-glycerophosphate, and 1 tablet of protease inhibitor per 50 mL of buffer) and incubated with Flag-M2-coupled agarose beads.  Immunoblotting  10-50 μg of whole cell lysates, 10-30 μL of glutathione pulldown samples, or 10-30 μL of Flag-M2 immunoprecipitates were loaded into lanes of 4-12% bis-tris SDS-PAGE gels, run at 120 volts for 2 hours in 1x MOPS buffer, and then transferred to 0.45 μm PVDF membrane at 60 volts for 2 hours in 1x transfer buffer (100 mM CAPS, 123 mM NaOH, 10% Ethanol). The membranes were then immunoblotted for the indicated proteins. All primary antibodies were diluted 1:1000 in 5% BSA W/V TBST, with the exception of GAPDH and Flag antibodies which were diluted 1:2000. All secondary antibodies were diluted 1:5000 in 5% milk W/V TBST. Densitometry was performed using ImageJ and a student's T test was used to determine statistical significance.  Rapamycin, Torin1, MLN0128, GDC0980, and nutrient starvation/re-stimulation treatments  For the mTOR inhibitor experiments, 3×105 TREX cells per well were seeded into 6-well plates, grown for one day, treated with 100 nM rapamycin, 250 nM Torin1, 250 nM MLN0128, 250 nM GDC0980, or DMSO for 60 minutes. The cells were then lysed as above. For the nutrient deprivation experiments, 3×105 TREX cells per well were seeded into 6-well plates, grown for one day, rinsed briefly in 1x amino acid- or glucose-free RPMI, incubated in 1x amino acid- or glucose-free RPMI for 60 minutes, and then stimulated with free amino acids or glucose to the levels in complete RPMI for 15 minutes.  In vitro proliferation assays  Six replicates each of 800-1200 cells were seeded into 96-well plates, treated with 8 doses of rapamycin 24 hours later, and assayed for ATP content using Cell Titer Glo 96 hours following rapamycin treatment according to the manufacturer's protocol.  In vivo xenograft assays  3×106 cells per injection site were implanted subcutaneously into the right and left flanks of nude mice. Once tumors were palpable in all animals (>50 mm3 volume by caliper measurements), mice were assigned randomly into rapamycin treated or untreated groups and caliper measurements were taken every 3-4 days until tumor burden approached the limits set by institutional guidelines. Tumor volume was assessed according to the formula (0.5)(W)(W)(L), and a student's T test was used to determine the p-values. Rapamycin (4 mg/kg) or vehicle was delivered by daily IP injection, 100 mL per injection. All experiments involving mice were carried out with approval from the Committee for Animal Care at MIT and under supervision of the Department of Comparative Medicine at MIT.   Significance  We report that a diverse set of cancer-associated MTOR mutations confer increased mTORC1/2 pathway activity and that cells harboring these mutations are highly sensitive to rapamycin in culture and in vivo. These findings are clinically relevant as the MTOR mutations characterized herein may serve as biomarkers for predicting tumor responses to mTOR inhibitors.  
1876||Genes encoding components of the PI3K-Akt-mTOR signaling axis are frequently mutated in cancer, but few mutations have been characterized in MTOR, the gene for the mTOR kinase. Using publicly available tumor genome sequencing data, we generated a comprehensive catalog of mTOR pathway mutations in cancer, identifying 33 MTOR mutations that confer pathway hyperactivation. The mutations cluster in six distinct regions in the C-terminal half of mTOR and occur in multiple cancer types, with one cluster particularly prominent in kidney cancer. The activating mutations do not affect mTOR complex assembly, but a subset reduces binding to the mTOR inhibitor Deptor. mTORC1 signaling in cells expressing various activating mutations remains sensitive to pharmacological mTOR inhibition, but is partially resistant to nutrient deprivation. Lastly, cancer cell lines with hyperactivating MTOR mutations display heightened sensitivity to rapamycin both in culture and as in vivo xenografts, suggesting that such mutations confer mTOR pathway dependency.  Keywords: personalized, mTOR, mutations, biomarker, deptor Go to: Introduction In mammals, the PI3K-Akt-mTOR pathway regulates cell size, mRNA translation, autophagy and many metabolic processes, including lipid synthesis (1). A variety of upstream regulators control the activity of the serine/threonine protein kinase mTOR and many of these are deregulated in cancer, resulting in pathway hyperactivation. Such activation occurs most commonly through loss-of-function mutations in tumor suppressors, such as phosphatase and tensin homolog (PTEN), tuberous sclerosis 1/2 (TSC1/2), neurofibromin 1/2 (NF1/2), or oncogenic mutations in KRAS, PIK3CA, or AKT (2). However, few cancer-associated mutations have been functionally characterized in MTOR itself, with only two reports thus far describing such mutations. In the first report, the authors tested six cancer-associated MTOR mutations and observed that two (S2215Y from a colorectal sample and R2505P from a kidney sample) conferred mTOR complex 1 (mTORC1) activation (3). In the second report, the authors identified an mTORC1 activating MTOR mutation (L2431P) that was present in a portion but not the entirety of a primary kidney tumor (4). Although these initial reports establish that activating MTOR mutations do arise in cancer, they were based upon limited sample sets that do not reflect the diverse subtypes of cancer. More recently, cancer genome sequencing projects, such as The Cancer Genome Atlas (TCGA) and the Cancer Cell Line Encyclopedia (CCLE), have identified a vast number of somatic mutations in thousands of tumors from more than 40 cancer subtypes (5-7).  Using publicly available databases of cancer genome sequence data, we cataloged all mutations in mTOR pathway components. We annotated over 400 samples with missense mutations in the MTOR gene from dozens of cancer subtypes, most of which lie within six clusters in the part of the gene that encodes the C-terminal portion of mTOR. Furthermore, through functional analyses, we identify 33 novel mTOR pathway-activating mutations, some of which affect the capacity of mTOR to interact with its partner proteins. None of the activating mutations impact the sensitivity of mTORC1 activity in cells to mTOR inhibitors but a subset confer mTORC1 signaling resistance to nutrient deprivation. Importantly, cancer cells that naturally express a subset of the mutations are hypersensitive to the mTOR inhibitor rapamycin. These findings may have translational relevance as rapamycin analogs (rapalogs) are clinically approved for the treatment of cancer, and several ATP-competitive mTOR kinase inhibitors are in development (8). As tumor biopsies are increasingly subjected to whole exome sequencing, the hyperactivating MTOR mutations we characterize may serve as biomarkers in predicting cancer response to mTOR-targeting drugs.  Go to: Results Catalog of recurring mutations in genes encoding mTOR pathway components  To generate a comprehensive catalog of all cancer-associated missense mutations in canonical genes of the mTOR pathway, we analyzed partial genome sequencing data from the TCGA, CCLE, International Cancer Genome Consortium (ICGC) and Catalogue of Somatic Mutations in Cancer (COSMIC) databases (5-7, 9, 10). This analysis revealed that almost every gene in the mTOR pathway harbored somatic point mutations (Supplementary Table 1). To enrich for mutations that are more likely to affect pathway function, only mutations that alter the same codon more than once were counted. When normalized for gene length, this analysis revealed that MTOR contained the highest percentage of recurring mutations, and thus we focused most of our attention on these mutations (Supplementary Figure 1). Collectively, through data mining and a literature search, we curated over 400 samples with non-synonymous MTOR point mutations (Figure 1B and Supplementary Table 2) (11-17). While the majority of these mutations are represented by only one sample in our database, approximately 40% are recurrent, most of which have not been previously described. Additionally, the mutations cluster in six distinct regions of mTOR centered on highly recurrent mutations that alter amino acids C1483, E1799, T1977, S2215, L2427 and R2505 (Figure 1C). The presence of these clusters suggests that there is a selective advantage to acquiring mutations in certain regions of the mTOR protein. Furthermore, these mutations are present in multiple cancer subtypes, with the highest number in colorectal, endometrial, and lung cancers, although these cancer subtypes are also considered to have the highest mutation rates (Figures 1D and 1E) (18). Interestingly, a random mutagenesis screen in the S. pombe mTOR homolog (tor2) identified activating mutations in homologous amino acid positions to many of those we find in MTOR to be recurrently mutated in cancer (19) (Supplementary Table 3).  Figure 1 Figure 1 Cancer-associated MTOR mutations mTORC1/2 activating mutations in MTOR  The prevalence of the recurrent mutations, their clustering, and correlation with activating tor2 mutations strongly suggested that the MTOR mutations impact mTOR pathway activity. To test this possibility, wild-type (WT) or ten different mutants of mTOR (L1460P, C1483F, E1799K, F1888L, T1977R, V2006I, S2215Y, I2500F, R2505P, and D2512H) were expressed in cells and phosphorylation of the mTORC1/2 substrates S6K1, 4EBP1, or Akt1 examined (Figures 2A, 2B, and 2C). All the mTOR mutants conferred varying degrees of pathway activation, and, interestingly, a few displayed some substrate preference (L1460P, C1483F, S2215Y, and R2505P towards S6K1/4EBP1 or V2006I towards Akt1), implying that these mutations have greater effects on mTORC1 or mTORC2. Thus, while three pathway activating MTOR mutations have previously been identified (3, 4), our initial analyses uncovered an additional eight recurrent MTOR mutations which activate mTORC1 and/or mTORC2.  Figure 2 Figure 2 mTORC1 and mTORC2 activating mutations in MTOR and RHEB It is well established that two activating mutations (E545K and H1047R) within the phosphatidylinositol-4,5-bisphosphate 3-kinase, catalytic subunit alpha (PI3K-p110α), encoded by the PIK3CA gene, can lead to mTOR pathway activation (20). To determine the degree of mTOR pathway activation conferred by mTOR mutation, S6K1 phosphorylation from cells expressing WT or S2215Y mTOR was compared to cells expressing WT or mutant PI3K-p110α (Supplementary Figures 2A and 2B). This revealed that while expression of only mutant mTOR conferred mTORC1 activation, expression of either WT or mutant PI3K-p110α induced mTORC1 activity.  Non-recurrent MTOR mutations that activate mTORC1 signaling  We next examined in more detail the nature of the activating MTOR mutations, and observed that while some codons are mutated to only one other residue (e.g. E1799K), others are mutated to several different amino acids (e.g. S2215F/P/T/Y). This is reminiscent of the diverse amino acids to which the G12 residue of KRAS is mutated in cancers (21). We expressed 20 such MTOR mutations and found that many (C1483R/W/Y, F1888I, T1977K, S2215F/P, I2500M), but not all (A41P/S/T, F1888V, T1977S, V2006L, S2215T, R2505Q/*, D2512G/Y), led to increased S6K1 phosphorylation (Supplementary Figures 3 and 5, and data not shown). Given that most of these activating mutations are found only once in our dataset implies that other non-recurrent mutations may also activate mTORC1 signaling. To identify other such mutations, we turned our attention to the mutational clusters identified in Figure 1, and observed that while most are represented by several tissue types, those in the C1483 cluster are particularly prevalent in kidney cancer (Figure 1E and Supplementary Figure 3D). Interestingly, two recent cancer genome sequencing efforts reported that kidney cancers have an increased percentage of mutations in mTOR pathway genes, but the functional consequences of these mutations were not evaluated (13, 22). Expression of the ten kidney cancer-associated MTOR mutations from the C1483 cluster revealed that in addition to the previously evaluated L1460P and C1483F/Y mutants (Figure 1B and Supplemental Figure 2), three non-recurrent mutants (L1433S, A1459P, and E1519T) also induced mTORC1 pathway activity (Figure 2D). Similarly, expression of eight non-recurrent mutations from the S2215 cluster (N2206S, L2209V, A2210P, L2216P, R2217W, L2220F, Q2223K, and A2226S) activated mTORC1 signaling as measured by S6K1 phosphorylation, with the L2209V mutant conferring higher activation than even S2215Y (Supplementary Figure 3E). Lastly, other than the S2215Y and R2505P mutations, the only other cancer-associated MTOR mutation previously characterized is L2431P from a kidney cancer patient (4). Expression of mTOR containing this non-recurrent mutation caused mTORC1 activation that was much weaker than that caused by expression of the S2215Y mutant (Supplementary Figure 3F). Collectively, these results suggest that while most non-recurrent MTOR mutations found in cancer are part of the mutational “noise”, there exists a diverse set of MTOR mutations that can drive mTORC1 pathway activity. Likely, as more cancer genomes are sequenced, the activating non-recurrent mutations we identified will prove to be recurrent.  Recurrent mutations in RHEB activate mTORC1  We also observed that other mTOR pathway genes such as Raptor, Rictor, and Rheb1 harbored recurrent mutations (Supplemental Table 1). Expression of Rheb1 Y35N/C/H and to a lesser degree E139K increased phosphorylation of endogenous S6K1 more than that of WT Rheb1 (Figure 2E), while recurrent mutations in Raptor (R788C) or Rictor (S1101L) failed to induce any mTORC1 or mTORC2 activity (data not shown). In support of the relevance of these mutations to cancer, RHEB was recently highlighted as a novel cancer gene due to the presence of the Y35N mutation (23). Thus, cancer associated mutations in either MTOR or RHEB can induce mTORC1 activity; whether this is true of other mTOR pathway genes remains to be determined.  mTORC1/2 hyperactivating mutants bind less Deptor  One potential mechanism through which the mutations in mTOR (Figure 2) might increase S6K1/Akt1 phosphorylation is by altering mTORC1 or mTORC2 assembly. Alternatively or in addition, the mTOR mutations may diminish the binding of mTOR to its endogenous inhibitor Deptor, which binds to the FAT domain of mTOR (24). To test these possibilities, the interactions of exogenously expressed WT or mutant mTORs with endogenous Raptor, Rictor, and Deptor were measured. All mutant mTOR proteins bound equally well to Raptor and Rictor, suggesting that the mutations do not affect formation of either mTOR complex (Figure 3A). In contrast, Deptor binding to the immunoprecipitated mTOR proteins was reduced in cells expressing the mTOR mutants as compared to WT mTOR (Figure 3A). Given that increased mTOR pathway activity correlates with a reduction in the mTOR-Deptor interaction (24), it is likely that the observed decrease in Deptor binding reflects the increased mTOR pathway activity caused by the MTOR mutations. However, two mTORC1 activating mutations that are in the FAT domain of mTOR, L1460P and C1483Y, bound much less Deptor than the other mutants tested (Figure 3A), suggesting that these mutations directly perturb the Deptor binding site on mTOR. Consistent with this, examination of the mutations from the C1483 cluster described in figure 2D revealed that two other highly activating mutations in the FAT domain (A1459P and C1483Y) also strongly reduced the mTOR-Deptor interaction (Supplementary Figure 4A). While these results suggest a possible mechanism of action for a subset of activating mTOR mutations, they do not preclude other mechanism by which MTOR mutations may impact mTORC1 signaling, such as by increasing the activity of the mTOR kinase domain.  Figure 3 Figure 3 mTOR mutants bind less Deptor and cells expressing the mTOR S2215Y mutation are resistant to nutrient deprivation MTOR mutations do not affect mTORC1 sensitivity to mTOR inhibitors but can affect the pathway response to nutrient deprivation  We next considered the possibility that the mTORC1-activating MTOR mutants have altered sensitivity to established mTOR inhibitors. Engineered mutations in the FRB domain of mTOR, which binds the FKBP12-rapamycin complex, confer marked rapamycin resistance to mTOR (25). To test whether mTOR mutation alters pathway inhibition by rapamycin or Torin1 (an investigational ATP-competitive mTOR inhibitor), we used HEK-293 cells with an integrated FLP recombination site (TREX cells) to stably express WT or several different mutants of mTOR (A1459P, C1483Y, E1799K, F1888I, L2209V, S2215Y, L2431P, I2500F, and R2505P), as the mTOR cDNA is too large to be packaged and expressed via a lentiviral delivery system (Supplementary Figure 4B). Baseline phosphorylation of endogenous S6K1 was higher in TREX cells expressing the A1459P, L2209V, S2215Y, I2500F and R2505P mTOR mutants than in parental or WT-expressing cells (Figure 3B and Supplementary Figures 4C and 4D), consistent with the results obtained upon transient expression of these mutants (Figures 2A and 2D, and Supplementary Figure 3D). Importantly, mTORC1 activity in none of the TREX cells was resistant to rapamycin, Torin1, MLN0128 (an mTOR ATP-competitive inhibitor), GDC0980 (a dual PI3K/mTOR ATP-competitive inhibitor), (Figure 3B and Supplementary Figures 4C and 4D). Thus, on a molecular level, while cells with mTOR mutations may display high levels of mTORC1/2 activity, this activity is still sensitive to pharmacological mTOR inhibition.  The kinase activity of mTOR is tightly regulated by nutrient availability; when cells are starved of nutrients (specifically glucose and amino acids), they downregulate mTORC1 signaling, while retreatment of cells with these nutrients restores mTORC1-mediated signaling (26). Given this, we sought to determine whether any of the activating mTOR mutants affect the sensitivity of mTORC1 signaling to amino acid or glucose withdrawal. Indeed, S6K1 phosphorylation was highly resistant to deprivation of either nutrient in cells expressing several mutants (A1459P, S2215Y, I2500F and R2505P) (Figure 3C and Supplementary Figures 4E and 4F). This observation may be relevant in the context of developing tumors, which are often glucose starved (27, 28), where inappropriate mTORC1 activity may provide a growth advantage.  Cancer cells with hyperactivating MTOR mutations are hypersensitive to rapamycin in vitro and in vivo  To determine if cancer cells with MTOR mutations are dependent on mTORC1 activity, we evaluated the impact of rapamycin on the proliferation of set of cancer cell lines harboring WT or mutant mTOR (Figure 4A). We identified four cell lines with mTORC1-activating MTOR mutations (C1483Y in MOLT16; E1799K in HEC59 and SNU349; and S2215Y in JHUEM7) and two with MTOR mutations that have no apparent impact on mTORC1 signaling (V2006L in TUHR10TKB; and R2152C in A375) (Supplementary Figures 5A and 5B). HeLa cells were used as a negative control cell line, as they are mildly rapamycin sensitive and are wild-type for mTOR (7, 29). MCF7 and SW780 cells, which are also wild-type for mTOR, served as positive controls for rapamycin sensitivity because the MCF7 cells harbor an activating PI3K-p110α mutation (E545K) while the SW780 cells lack NPRL2, which encodes a component of the GATOR1 negative regulator of the amino acid-sensing pathway (30, 31). Importantly, only the cell lines with activating MTOR mutations, the PI3K-p110α mutant, or the NPRL2-null SW780 cells were hypersensitive to rapamycin treatment (Figure 4B). Consistent with these and published results, the growth of HeLa xenografts was partially rapamycin sensitive, while rapamycin completely halted the growth of HEC59 xenografts, which carry the hyperactivating mTOR E1799K mutation (Figure 4C) (32, 33). These results suggest that the presence of hyperactivating MTOR mutations in cancer cells may serve as biomarkers to identify tumors that are likely to respond to mTOR inhibitors.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Rapamycin inhibits the proliferation of cancer cell lines with hyperactivating MTOR mutations Go to: Discussion Early cancer genome sequencing projects led to the identification of three mutations in MTOR that were shown to activate mTORC1 signaling (3, 4). Here, we have identified an additional 33 previously unknown activating MTOR mutations (some are recurrent, others are not) (Supplementary Table 4). Mechanistically, we find that the activating mutations diminish the mTOR-Deptor interaction and interestingly, when mapped onto the recently solved crystal structure of mTOR, the mutations cluster in several distinct locations within the protein itself, suggesting that other activating mechanisms may exist (Supplementary Figure 6) (34). While the mutations do not prevent pharmacological mTOR inhibition, a subset protect against the effects of nutrient deprivation on mTORC1 signaling. Lastly, we demonstrate that cell lines with activating MTOR mutations are particularly sensitive to rapamycin in cell culture and in xenografts, likely due to mTOR pathway dependency.  The diversity of activating MTOR mutations we characterized is reminiscent of the various activating mutations in the prototypical lipid kinase PIK3CA, which encodes for the PI3K catalytic subunit p110α (35). However, unlike the activating PIK3CA mutations, which confer equal activation of PI3K-mediated signaling pathways, the diverse MTOR mutations can differentially activate mTORC1 or mTORC2, leading to either S6K1/4EBP1 or Akt1 phosphorylation, respectively. This finding is particularly relevant in a clinical setting, as patients with mTORC1 activating mutations may respond well to FDA-approved rapalogs, while patients with mTORC2 activating mutations might best be treated with ATP-competitive mTOR inhibitors, although such inhibitors are still in clinical trials. This distinction is especially relevant for patients with mTORC2 activating mutations, because rapalogs can in some cases upregulate mTORC2 signaling through modulation of an mTORC1-dependent feedback loop (36).  Rapalog-based therapies are currently approved or in clinical trials for several cancer subtypes, and some patients have had dramatic and durable responses to these therapies (37). Given that some cells with activating MTOR mutations are particularly rapamycin sensitive (Figure 4), it is possible that some of the rapalog-responsive patients had tumors with similar mutations. Indeed, it was recently found that the tumor of a bladder cancer patient with two activating MTOR mutations displayed exquisite sensitivity to rapalog-based therapy (38). Many more cancer-associated MTOR mutations will likely be identified in future studies, but functional evaluation of these mutations will be required to determine their impact on the mTOR pathway. As tumor sequencing becomes more commonplace, functional studies such as ours may aid in arriving at a more personalized treatment regimen that eventually promotes patient survival.  Go to: Methods Data acquisition and cluster analysis  All mutations in genes of the mTOR pathway were acquired from the cBIO, COSMIC, and ICGC databases or through a literature search with a data-freeze date of September 1, 2013. To identify regions of mTOR significantly enriched for somatic point mutations, we determined the probability of seeing at least the observed number of mutations in a 50 amino acid sliding window with the null hypothesis being all 463 MTOR mutations randomly occurring across the 2549 amino acid protein. Specifically, we calculated a threshold for significance of at least 15 mutations per 50 amino acids by the formula:  p=∑n=k463(463k)∗(1−502549)463−k∗(502549)k which equals 0.043 for k = at least 15 mutations per 50 amino acids.  Materials  Reagents were obtained from the following sources: antibodies to HA (clone C29F4), S6K1 (clone 49D7), phospho-T389-S6K1 (clone 108D2), and phospho-S473-Akt1 (clone D9E) from Cell Signaling Technology; antibody to GAPDH (clone GT239) from Genetex; antibodies to Deptor and Raptor, X-ray film, and PVDF membrane were from Millipore; antibody to Rictor from Bethyl; antibody to the Flag epitope (clone M2), Flag M2-coupled agarose beads, glucose and amino acid mixtures from Sigma; horseradish-peroxidase-labeled anti-mouse and anti-rabbit secondary antibodies from Santa Cruz Biotechnology; FuGENE HD and Cell Titer Glo from Promega; X-tremeGENE 9 and Complete Protease Mixture from Roche Applied Science; QuikChange II XL from Stratagene; enhanced chemiluminescence reagent and glutathione-coupled agarose beads from Thermo; 8-week-old nude mice from Taconic; rapamycin from LC Labs; MLN0128 and GDC0980 from Selleckchem; and Torin1 was synthesized in the Gray laboratory (39). cDNAs for mTOR and PI3K-p110α were from Addgene; expression vectors for HAGST-S6K1, HA-GST-Akt1, and HA-GST-Rheb1 were described previously (24, 40, 41) and Flag-14-3-3α was a generous gift from the Yaffe lab. The primers used to generate the mTOR and Rheb1 mutations were from Integrated DNA Technologies and are listed in supplemental table 5. HEK-293T-TREX cell system, 4-12% bis-tris SDS-PAGE gels, and 20x MOPS buffers were from Invitrogen.  Tissue culture and cell lines  MCF7, HELA, HEK-293T, HCT116, A375 and SW780 cells were from ATCC; JHUEM7, MOLT16, NCIH446, SNU349, and TUHR10TKB cells were from the Broad Institute Cancer Cell Line Encyclopedia; HEK-293E cells were a generous gift of the Blenis lab; and the HEC59 cells were a generous gift of the Lippard lab. The cell lines have not been re-authenticated, although those from ATCC and the Broad were used within 6 months of resuscitation. The HEK-293T, HEK-293E, HCT116, A375, HEC59, and TUHR10TKB cells were cultured in DMEM; JHUEM7 and MOLT16 cells were cultured in RPMI; and the SW780 cells were cultured in IMDM. All media was prepared with 10% heat inactivated FBS and 1% Penicillin/Streptomycin. All cell lines were maintained at 37°C, 5% CO2.  Site-directed mutagenesis, cloning, and TREX cell line generation  All MTOR and RHEB point mutations were generated in the parental vectors using site-directed mutagenesis with the QuikChange II XL kit according to the manufacturer’s protocol. Primer sequences are listed in Supplementary Table 5. Point mutations were verified using Sanger sequencing as conducted by Eton Biosciences. The HA-GST-4EBP1 reporter vector was generated by synthesizing a gBlock from IDT encoding for 4EBP1 and cloning it into the pRK5-HA-GST vector using SalI and NotI restriction digestion followed by ligation. WT and mutant mTOR cDNAs were subcloned directly from the pcDNA3 vector into the pcDNA5/FRT/TO vector using single site NotI restriction digestion followed by ligation. Flag-mTOR-expressing TREX cells were generated according to the manufacturer's protocol.  Cell treatments, lysis, and immunoprecipitations  For S6K1 and Akt1 co-transfection assays, 3×105 HEK-293T or HEK-293E cells per well were seeded into 6-well tissue culture plates, transfected 24 hours later with 2 μg of mTOR-encoding plasmid and 1 ng of S6K1- or Akt1-encoding plasmid using X-tremeGENE 9 or FuGENE HD, followed by whole cell lysis 48 hours after transfection in NP-40 lysis buffer (50 mM Tris-HCl at pH 7.5, 150 mM NaCl, 1% NP-40 substitute, 1 mM EDTA at pH8.0, 50 mM NaF, 10 mM Na-pyrophosphate, 15 mM Na3VO4, 100 mM β-glycerophosphate, and 1 tablet of protease inhibitor per 50 mL of buffer). 200-400 μg of whole cell lysates were mixed with 5x SDS-sample buffer to a final concentration of 1-2 μg/μL, boiled for 5 minutes, and then used directly for immunoblotting or frozen at −20°C. For glutathione pull down assays, 2×106 HEK-293T cells were seeded onto 10 cm tissue culture plates, transfected 24 hours later with 10 μg of mTOR-encoding plasmid and 2 ng of S6K1-encoding plasmid using X-tremeGENE 9, and lysed 48-72 hours after transfection in NP-40 lysis buffer. 2-3 mg of the resultant whole-cell lysates were incubated with 30 μL of pre-washed glutathione-coupled agarose beads in a 1 mL volume, which were rotated at 4°C for two hours, spun at 2,500 RCF for one minute, washed in 500 μL lysis buffer three times, and the beads directly boiled in 50 μL of 2x SDS-sample buffer. For mTOR immunoprecipitations, the cells were treated as with the glutathione pulldown, except they were lysed/washed in CHAPS buffer (50 mM HEPES at pH 7.4, 150 mM NaCl, 0.4% CHAPS, 50 mM NaF, 10 mM Na-pyrophosphate, 100 mM β-glycerophosphate, and 1 tablet of protease inhibitor per 50 mL of buffer) and incubated with Flag-M2-coupled agarose beads.  Immunoblotting  10-50 μg of whole cell lysates, 10-30 μL of glutathione pulldown samples, or 10-30 μL of Flag-M2 immunoprecipitates were loaded into lanes of 4-12% bis-tris SDS-PAGE gels, run at 120 volts for 2 hours in 1x MOPS buffer, and then transferred to 0.45 μm PVDF membrane at 60 volts for 2 hours in 1x transfer buffer (100 mM CAPS, 123 mM NaOH, 10% Ethanol). The membranes were then immunoblotted for the indicated proteins. All primary antibodies were diluted 1:1000 in 5% BSA W/V TBST, with the exception of GAPDH and Flag antibodies which were diluted 1:2000. All secondary antibodies were diluted 1:5000 in 5% milk W/V TBST. Densitometry was performed using ImageJ and a student's T test was used to determine statistical significance.  Rapamycin, Torin1, MLN0128, GDC0980, and nutrient starvation/re-stimulation treatments  For the mTOR inhibitor experiments, 3×105 TREX cells per well were seeded into 6-well plates, grown for one day, treated with 100 nM rapamycin, 250 nM Torin1, 250 nM MLN0128, 250 nM GDC0980, or DMSO for 60 minutes. The cells were then lysed as above. For the nutrient deprivation experiments, 3×105 TREX cells per well were seeded into 6-well plates, grown for one day, rinsed briefly in 1x amino acid- or glucose-free RPMI, incubated in 1x amino acid- or glucose-free RPMI for 60 minutes, and then stimulated with free amino acids or glucose to the levels in complete RPMI for 15 minutes.  In vitro proliferation assays  Six replicates each of 800-1200 cells were seeded into 96-well plates, treated with 8 doses of rapamycin 24 hours later, and assayed for ATP content using Cell Titer Glo 96 hours following rapamycin treatment according to the manufacturer's protocol.  In vivo xenograft assays  3×106 cells per injection site were implanted subcutaneously into the right and left flanks of nude mice. Once tumors were palpable in all animals (>50 mm3 volume by caliper measurements), mice were assigned randomly into rapamycin treated or untreated groups and caliper measurements were taken every 3-4 days until tumor burden approached the limits set by institutional guidelines. Tumor volume was assessed according to the formula (0.5)(W)(W)(L), and a student's T test was used to determine the p-values. Rapamycin (4 mg/kg) or vehicle was delivered by daily IP injection, 100 mL per injection. All experiments involving mice were carried out with approval from the Committee for Animal Care at MIT and under supervision of the Department of Comparative Medicine at MIT.   Significance  We report that a diverse set of cancer-associated MTOR mutations confer increased mTORC1/2 pathway activity and that cells harboring these mutations are highly sensitive to rapamycin in culture and in vivo. These findings are clinically relevant as the MTOR mutations characterized herein may serve as biomarkers for predicting tumor responses to mTOR inhibitors.  
1886||Genes encoding components of the PI3K-Akt-mTOR signaling axis are frequently mutated in cancer, but few mutations have been characterized in MTOR, the gene for the mTOR kinase. Using publicly available tumor genome sequencing data, we generated a comprehensive catalog of mTOR pathway mutations in cancer, identifying 33 MTOR mutations that confer pathway hyperactivation. The mutations cluster in six distinct regions in the C-terminal half of mTOR and occur in multiple cancer types, with one cluster particularly prominent in kidney cancer. The activating mutations do not affect mTOR complex assembly, but a subset reduces binding to the mTOR inhibitor Deptor. mTORC1 signaling in cells expressing various activating mutations remains sensitive to pharmacological mTOR inhibition, but is partially resistant to nutrient deprivation. Lastly, cancer cell lines with hyperactivating MTOR mutations display heightened sensitivity to rapamycin both in culture and as in vivo xenografts, suggesting that such mutations confer mTOR pathway dependency.  Keywords: personalized, mTOR, mutations, biomarker, deptor Go to: Introduction In mammals, the PI3K-Akt-mTOR pathway regulates cell size, mRNA translation, autophagy and many metabolic processes, including lipid synthesis (1). A variety of upstream regulators control the activity of the serine/threonine protein kinase mTOR and many of these are deregulated in cancer, resulting in pathway hyperactivation. Such activation occurs most commonly through loss-of-function mutations in tumor suppressors, such as phosphatase and tensin homolog (PTEN), tuberous sclerosis 1/2 (TSC1/2), neurofibromin 1/2 (NF1/2), or oncogenic mutations in KRAS, PIK3CA, or AKT (2). However, few cancer-associated mutations have been functionally characterized in MTOR itself, with only two reports thus far describing such mutations. In the first report, the authors tested six cancer-associated MTOR mutations and observed that two (S2215Y from a colorectal sample and R2505P from a kidney sample) conferred mTOR complex 1 (mTORC1) activation (3). In the second report, the authors identified an mTORC1 activating MTOR mutation (L2431P) that was present in a portion but not the entirety of a primary kidney tumor (4). Although these initial reports establish that activating MTOR mutations do arise in cancer, they were based upon limited sample sets that do not reflect the diverse subtypes of cancer. More recently, cancer genome sequencing projects, such as The Cancer Genome Atlas (TCGA) and the Cancer Cell Line Encyclopedia (CCLE), have identified a vast number of somatic mutations in thousands of tumors from more than 40 cancer subtypes (5-7).  Using publicly available databases of cancer genome sequence data, we cataloged all mutations in mTOR pathway components. We annotated over 400 samples with missense mutations in the MTOR gene from dozens of cancer subtypes, most of which lie within six clusters in the part of the gene that encodes the C-terminal portion of mTOR. Furthermore, through functional analyses, we identify 33 novel mTOR pathway-activating mutations, some of which affect the capacity of mTOR to interact with its partner proteins. None of the activating mutations impact the sensitivity of mTORC1 activity in cells to mTOR inhibitors but a subset confer mTORC1 signaling resistance to nutrient deprivation. Importantly, cancer cells that naturally express a subset of the mutations are hypersensitive to the mTOR inhibitor rapamycin. These findings may have translational relevance as rapamycin analogs (rapalogs) are clinically approved for the treatment of cancer, and several ATP-competitive mTOR kinase inhibitors are in development (8). As tumor biopsies are increasingly subjected to whole exome sequencing, the hyperactivating MTOR mutations we characterize may serve as biomarkers in predicting cancer response to mTOR-targeting drugs.  Go to: Results Catalog of recurring mutations in genes encoding mTOR pathway components  To generate a comprehensive catalog of all cancer-associated missense mutations in canonical genes of the mTOR pathway, we analyzed partial genome sequencing data from the TCGA, CCLE, International Cancer Genome Consortium (ICGC) and Catalogue of Somatic Mutations in Cancer (COSMIC) databases (5-7, 9, 10). This analysis revealed that almost every gene in the mTOR pathway harbored somatic point mutations (Supplementary Table 1). To enrich for mutations that are more likely to affect pathway function, only mutations that alter the same codon more than once were counted. When normalized for gene length, this analysis revealed that MTOR contained the highest percentage of recurring mutations, and thus we focused most of our attention on these mutations (Supplementary Figure 1). Collectively, through data mining and a literature search, we curated over 400 samples with non-synonymous MTOR point mutations (Figure 1B and Supplementary Table 2) (11-17). While the majority of these mutations are represented by only one sample in our database, approximately 40% are recurrent, most of which have not been previously described. Additionally, the mutations cluster in six distinct regions of mTOR centered on highly recurrent mutations that alter amino acids C1483, E1799, T1977, S2215, L2427 and R2505 (Figure 1C). The presence of these clusters suggests that there is a selective advantage to acquiring mutations in certain regions of the mTOR protein. Furthermore, these mutations are present in multiple cancer subtypes, with the highest number in colorectal, endometrial, and lung cancers, although these cancer subtypes are also considered to have the highest mutation rates (Figures 1D and 1E) (18). Interestingly, a random mutagenesis screen in the S. pombe mTOR homolog (tor2) identified activating mutations in homologous amino acid positions to many of those we find in MTOR to be recurrently mutated in cancer (19) (Supplementary Table 3).  Figure 1 Figure 1 Cancer-associated MTOR mutations mTORC1/2 activating mutations in MTOR  The prevalence of the recurrent mutations, their clustering, and correlation with activating tor2 mutations strongly suggested that the MTOR mutations impact mTOR pathway activity. To test this possibility, wild-type (WT) or ten different mutants of mTOR (L1460P, C1483F, E1799K, F1888L, T1977R, V2006I, S2215Y, I2500F, R2505P, and D2512H) were expressed in cells and phosphorylation of the mTORC1/2 substrates S6K1, 4EBP1, or Akt1 examined (Figures 2A, 2B, and 2C). All the mTOR mutants conferred varying degrees of pathway activation, and, interestingly, a few displayed some substrate preference (L1460P, C1483F, S2215Y, and R2505P towards S6K1/4EBP1 or V2006I towards Akt1), implying that these mutations have greater effects on mTORC1 or mTORC2. Thus, while three pathway activating MTOR mutations have previously been identified (3, 4), our initial analyses uncovered an additional eight recurrent MTOR mutations which activate mTORC1 and/or mTORC2.  Figure 2 Figure 2 mTORC1 and mTORC2 activating mutations in MTOR and RHEB It is well established that two activating mutations (E545K and H1047R) within the phosphatidylinositol-4,5-bisphosphate 3-kinase, catalytic subunit alpha (PI3K-p110α), encoded by the PIK3CA gene, can lead to mTOR pathway activation (20). To determine the degree of mTOR pathway activation conferred by mTOR mutation, S6K1 phosphorylation from cells expressing WT or S2215Y mTOR was compared to cells expressing WT or mutant PI3K-p110α (Supplementary Figures 2A and 2B). This revealed that while expression of only mutant mTOR conferred mTORC1 activation, expression of either WT or mutant PI3K-p110α induced mTORC1 activity.  Non-recurrent MTOR mutations that activate mTORC1 signaling  We next examined in more detail the nature of the activating MTOR mutations, and observed that while some codons are mutated to only one other residue (e.g. E1799K), others are mutated to several different amino acids (e.g. S2215F/P/T/Y). This is reminiscent of the diverse amino acids to which the G12 residue of KRAS is mutated in cancers (21). We expressed 20 such MTOR mutations and found that many (C1483R/W/Y, F1888I, T1977K, S2215F/P, I2500M), but not all (A41P/S/T, F1888V, T1977S, V2006L, S2215T, R2505Q/*, D2512G/Y), led to increased S6K1 phosphorylation (Supplementary Figures 3 and 5, and data not shown). Given that most of these activating mutations are found only once in our dataset implies that other non-recurrent mutations may also activate mTORC1 signaling. To identify other such mutations, we turned our attention to the mutational clusters identified in Figure 1, and observed that while most are represented by several tissue types, those in the C1483 cluster are particularly prevalent in kidney cancer (Figure 1E and Supplementary Figure 3D). Interestingly, two recent cancer genome sequencing efforts reported that kidney cancers have an increased percentage of mutations in mTOR pathway genes, but the functional consequences of these mutations were not evaluated (13, 22). Expression of the ten kidney cancer-associated MTOR mutations from the C1483 cluster revealed that in addition to the previously evaluated L1460P and C1483F/Y mutants (Figure 1B and Supplemental Figure 2), three non-recurrent mutants (L1433S, A1459P, and E1519T) also induced mTORC1 pathway activity (Figure 2D). Similarly, expression of eight non-recurrent mutations from the S2215 cluster (N2206S, L2209V, A2210P, L2216P, R2217W, L2220F, Q2223K, and A2226S) activated mTORC1 signaling as measured by S6K1 phosphorylation, with the L2209V mutant conferring higher activation than even S2215Y (Supplementary Figure 3E). Lastly, other than the S2215Y and R2505P mutations, the only other cancer-associated MTOR mutation previously characterized is L2431P from a kidney cancer patient (4). Expression of mTOR containing this non-recurrent mutation caused mTORC1 activation that was much weaker than that caused by expression of the S2215Y mutant (Supplementary Figure 3F). Collectively, these results suggest that while most non-recurrent MTOR mutations found in cancer are part of the mutational “noise”, there exists a diverse set of MTOR mutations that can drive mTORC1 pathway activity. Likely, as more cancer genomes are sequenced, the activating non-recurrent mutations we identified will prove to be recurrent.  Recurrent mutations in RHEB activate mTORC1  We also observed that other mTOR pathway genes such as Raptor, Rictor, and Rheb1 harbored recurrent mutations (Supplemental Table 1). Expression of Rheb1 Y35N/C/H and to a lesser degree E139K increased phosphorylation of endogenous S6K1 more than that of WT Rheb1 (Figure 2E), while recurrent mutations in Raptor (R788C) or Rictor (S1101L) failed to induce any mTORC1 or mTORC2 activity (data not shown). In support of the relevance of these mutations to cancer, RHEB was recently highlighted as a novel cancer gene due to the presence of the Y35N mutation (23). Thus, cancer associated mutations in either MTOR or RHEB can induce mTORC1 activity; whether this is true of other mTOR pathway genes remains to be determined.  mTORC1/2 hyperactivating mutants bind less Deptor  One potential mechanism through which the mutations in mTOR (Figure 2) might increase S6K1/Akt1 phosphorylation is by altering mTORC1 or mTORC2 assembly. Alternatively or in addition, the mTOR mutations may diminish the binding of mTOR to its endogenous inhibitor Deptor, which binds to the FAT domain of mTOR (24). To test these possibilities, the interactions of exogenously expressed WT or mutant mTORs with endogenous Raptor, Rictor, and Deptor were measured. All mutant mTOR proteins bound equally well to Raptor and Rictor, suggesting that the mutations do not affect formation of either mTOR complex (Figure 3A). In contrast, Deptor binding to the immunoprecipitated mTOR proteins was reduced in cells expressing the mTOR mutants as compared to WT mTOR (Figure 3A). Given that increased mTOR pathway activity correlates with a reduction in the mTOR-Deptor interaction (24), it is likely that the observed decrease in Deptor binding reflects the increased mTOR pathway activity caused by the MTOR mutations. However, two mTORC1 activating mutations that are in the FAT domain of mTOR, L1460P and C1483Y, bound much less Deptor than the other mutants tested (Figure 3A), suggesting that these mutations directly perturb the Deptor binding site on mTOR. Consistent with this, examination of the mutations from the C1483 cluster described in figure 2D revealed that two other highly activating mutations in the FAT domain (A1459P and C1483Y) also strongly reduced the mTOR-Deptor interaction (Supplementary Figure 4A). While these results suggest a possible mechanism of action for a subset of activating mTOR mutations, they do not preclude other mechanism by which MTOR mutations may impact mTORC1 signaling, such as by increasing the activity of the mTOR kinase domain.  Figure 3 Figure 3 mTOR mutants bind less Deptor and cells expressing the mTOR S2215Y mutation are resistant to nutrient deprivation MTOR mutations do not affect mTORC1 sensitivity to mTOR inhibitors but can affect the pathway response to nutrient deprivation  We next considered the possibility that the mTORC1-activating MTOR mutants have altered sensitivity to established mTOR inhibitors. Engineered mutations in the FRB domain of mTOR, which binds the FKBP12-rapamycin complex, confer marked rapamycin resistance to mTOR (25). To test whether mTOR mutation alters pathway inhibition by rapamycin or Torin1 (an investigational ATP-competitive mTOR inhibitor), we used HEK-293 cells with an integrated FLP recombination site (TREX cells) to stably express WT or several different mutants of mTOR (A1459P, C1483Y, E1799K, F1888I, L2209V, S2215Y, L2431P, I2500F, and R2505P), as the mTOR cDNA is too large to be packaged and expressed via a lentiviral delivery system (Supplementary Figure 4B). Baseline phosphorylation of endogenous S6K1 was higher in TREX cells expressing the A1459P, L2209V, S2215Y, I2500F and R2505P mTOR mutants than in parental or WT-expressing cells (Figure 3B and Supplementary Figures 4C and 4D), consistent with the results obtained upon transient expression of these mutants (Figures 2A and 2D, and Supplementary Figure 3D). Importantly, mTORC1 activity in none of the TREX cells was resistant to rapamycin, Torin1, MLN0128 (an mTOR ATP-competitive inhibitor), GDC0980 (a dual PI3K/mTOR ATP-competitive inhibitor), (Figure 3B and Supplementary Figures 4C and 4D). Thus, on a molecular level, while cells with mTOR mutations may display high levels of mTORC1/2 activity, this activity is still sensitive to pharmacological mTOR inhibition.  The kinase activity of mTOR is tightly regulated by nutrient availability; when cells are starved of nutrients (specifically glucose and amino acids), they downregulate mTORC1 signaling, while retreatment of cells with these nutrients restores mTORC1-mediated signaling (26). Given this, we sought to determine whether any of the activating mTOR mutants affect the sensitivity of mTORC1 signaling to amino acid or glucose withdrawal. Indeed, S6K1 phosphorylation was highly resistant to deprivation of either nutrient in cells expressing several mutants (A1459P, S2215Y, I2500F and R2505P) (Figure 3C and Supplementary Figures 4E and 4F). This observation may be relevant in the context of developing tumors, which are often glucose starved (27, 28), where inappropriate mTORC1 activity may provide a growth advantage.  Cancer cells with hyperactivating MTOR mutations are hypersensitive to rapamycin in vitro and in vivo  To determine if cancer cells with MTOR mutations are dependent on mTORC1 activity, we evaluated the impact of rapamycin on the proliferation of set of cancer cell lines harboring WT or mutant mTOR (Figure 4A). We identified four cell lines with mTORC1-activating MTOR mutations (C1483Y in MOLT16; E1799K in HEC59 and SNU349; and S2215Y in JHUEM7) and two with MTOR mutations that have no apparent impact on mTORC1 signaling (V2006L in TUHR10TKB; and R2152C in A375) (Supplementary Figures 5A and 5B). HeLa cells were used as a negative control cell line, as they are mildly rapamycin sensitive and are wild-type for mTOR (7, 29). MCF7 and SW780 cells, which are also wild-type for mTOR, served as positive controls for rapamycin sensitivity because the MCF7 cells harbor an activating PI3K-p110α mutation (E545K) while the SW780 cells lack NPRL2, which encodes a component of the GATOR1 negative regulator of the amino acid-sensing pathway (30, 31). Importantly, only the cell lines with activating MTOR mutations, the PI3K-p110α mutant, or the NPRL2-null SW780 cells were hypersensitive to rapamycin treatment (Figure 4B). Consistent with these and published results, the growth of HeLa xenografts was partially rapamycin sensitive, while rapamycin completely halted the growth of HEC59 xenografts, which carry the hyperactivating mTOR E1799K mutation (Figure 4C) (32, 33). These results suggest that the presence of hyperactivating MTOR mutations in cancer cells may serve as biomarkers to identify tumors that are likely to respond to mTOR inhibitors.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Rapamycin inhibits the proliferation of cancer cell lines with hyperactivating MTOR mutations Go to: Discussion Early cancer genome sequencing projects led to the identification of three mutations in MTOR that were shown to activate mTORC1 signaling (3, 4). Here, we have identified an additional 33 previously unknown activating MTOR mutations (some are recurrent, others are not) (Supplementary Table 4). Mechanistically, we find that the activating mutations diminish the mTOR-Deptor interaction and interestingly, when mapped onto the recently solved crystal structure of mTOR, the mutations cluster in several distinct locations within the protein itself, suggesting that other activating mechanisms may exist (Supplementary Figure 6) (34). While the mutations do not prevent pharmacological mTOR inhibition, a subset protect against the effects of nutrient deprivation on mTORC1 signaling. Lastly, we demonstrate that cell lines with activating MTOR mutations are particularly sensitive to rapamycin in cell culture and in xenografts, likely due to mTOR pathway dependency.  The diversity of activating MTOR mutations we characterized is reminiscent of the various activating mutations in the prototypical lipid kinase PIK3CA, which encodes for the PI3K catalytic subunit p110α (35). However, unlike the activating PIK3CA mutations, which confer equal activation of PI3K-mediated signaling pathways, the diverse MTOR mutations can differentially activate mTORC1 or mTORC2, leading to either S6K1/4EBP1 or Akt1 phosphorylation, respectively. This finding is particularly relevant in a clinical setting, as patients with mTORC1 activating mutations may respond well to FDA-approved rapalogs, while patients with mTORC2 activating mutations might best be treated with ATP-competitive mTOR inhibitors, although such inhibitors are still in clinical trials. This distinction is especially relevant for patients with mTORC2 activating mutations, because rapalogs can in some cases upregulate mTORC2 signaling through modulation of an mTORC1-dependent feedback loop (36).  Rapalog-based therapies are currently approved or in clinical trials for several cancer subtypes, and some patients have had dramatic and durable responses to these therapies (37). Given that some cells with activating MTOR mutations are particularly rapamycin sensitive (Figure 4), it is possible that some of the rapalog-responsive patients had tumors with similar mutations. Indeed, it was recently found that the tumor of a bladder cancer patient with two activating MTOR mutations displayed exquisite sensitivity to rapalog-based therapy (38). Many more cancer-associated MTOR mutations will likely be identified in future studies, but functional evaluation of these mutations will be required to determine their impact on the mTOR pathway. As tumor sequencing becomes more commonplace, functional studies such as ours may aid in arriving at a more personalized treatment regimen that eventually promotes patient survival.  Go to: Methods Data acquisition and cluster analysis  All mutations in genes of the mTOR pathway were acquired from the cBIO, COSMIC, and ICGC databases or through a literature search with a data-freeze date of September 1, 2013. To identify regions of mTOR significantly enriched for somatic point mutations, we determined the probability of seeing at least the observed number of mutations in a 50 amino acid sliding window with the null hypothesis being all 463 MTOR mutations randomly occurring across the 2549 amino acid protein. Specifically, we calculated a threshold for significance of at least 15 mutations per 50 amino acids by the formula:  p=∑n=k463(463k)∗(1−502549)463−k∗(502549)k which equals 0.043 for k = at least 15 mutations per 50 amino acids.  Materials  Reagents were obtained from the following sources: antibodies to HA (clone C29F4), S6K1 (clone 49D7), phospho-T389-S6K1 (clone 108D2), and phospho-S473-Akt1 (clone D9E) from Cell Signaling Technology; antibody to GAPDH (clone GT239) from Genetex; antibodies to Deptor and Raptor, X-ray film, and PVDF membrane were from Millipore; antibody to Rictor from Bethyl; antibody to the Flag epitope (clone M2), Flag M2-coupled agarose beads, glucose and amino acid mixtures from Sigma; horseradish-peroxidase-labeled anti-mouse and anti-rabbit secondary antibodies from Santa Cruz Biotechnology; FuGENE HD and Cell Titer Glo from Promega; X-tremeGENE 9 and Complete Protease Mixture from Roche Applied Science; QuikChange II XL from Stratagene; enhanced chemiluminescence reagent and glutathione-coupled agarose beads from Thermo; 8-week-old nude mice from Taconic; rapamycin from LC Labs; MLN0128 and GDC0980 from Selleckchem; and Torin1 was synthesized in the Gray laboratory (39). cDNAs for mTOR and PI3K-p110α were from Addgene; expression vectors for HAGST-S6K1, HA-GST-Akt1, and HA-GST-Rheb1 were described previously (24, 40, 41) and Flag-14-3-3α was a generous gift from the Yaffe lab. The primers used to generate the mTOR and Rheb1 mutations were from Integrated DNA Technologies and are listed in supplemental table 5. HEK-293T-TREX cell system, 4-12% bis-tris SDS-PAGE gels, and 20x MOPS buffers were from Invitrogen.  Tissue culture and cell lines  MCF7, HELA, HEK-293T, HCT116, A375 and SW780 cells were from ATCC; JHUEM7, MOLT16, NCIH446, SNU349, and TUHR10TKB cells were from the Broad Institute Cancer Cell Line Encyclopedia; HEK-293E cells were a generous gift of the Blenis lab; and the HEC59 cells were a generous gift of the Lippard lab. The cell lines have not been re-authenticated, although those from ATCC and the Broad were used within 6 months of resuscitation. The HEK-293T, HEK-293E, HCT116, A375, HEC59, and TUHR10TKB cells were cultured in DMEM; JHUEM7 and MOLT16 cells were cultured in RPMI; and the SW780 cells were cultured in IMDM. All media was prepared with 10% heat inactivated FBS and 1% Penicillin/Streptomycin. All cell lines were maintained at 37°C, 5% CO2.  Site-directed mutagenesis, cloning, and TREX cell line generation  All MTOR and RHEB point mutations were generated in the parental vectors using site-directed mutagenesis with the QuikChange II XL kit according to the manufacturer’s protocol. Primer sequences are listed in Supplementary Table 5. Point mutations were verified using Sanger sequencing as conducted by Eton Biosciences. The HA-GST-4EBP1 reporter vector was generated by synthesizing a gBlock from IDT encoding for 4EBP1 and cloning it into the pRK5-HA-GST vector using SalI and NotI restriction digestion followed by ligation. WT and mutant mTOR cDNAs were subcloned directly from the pcDNA3 vector into the pcDNA5/FRT/TO vector using single site NotI restriction digestion followed by ligation. Flag-mTOR-expressing TREX cells were generated according to the manufacturer's protocol.  Cell treatments, lysis, and immunoprecipitations  For S6K1 and Akt1 co-transfection assays, 3×105 HEK-293T or HEK-293E cells per well were seeded into 6-well tissue culture plates, transfected 24 hours later with 2 μg of mTOR-encoding plasmid and 1 ng of S6K1- or Akt1-encoding plasmid using X-tremeGENE 9 or FuGENE HD, followed by whole cell lysis 48 hours after transfection in NP-40 lysis buffer (50 mM Tris-HCl at pH 7.5, 150 mM NaCl, 1% NP-40 substitute, 1 mM EDTA at pH8.0, 50 mM NaF, 10 mM Na-pyrophosphate, 15 mM Na3VO4, 100 mM β-glycerophosphate, and 1 tablet of protease inhibitor per 50 mL of buffer). 200-400 μg of whole cell lysates were mixed with 5x SDS-sample buffer to a final concentration of 1-2 μg/μL, boiled for 5 minutes, and then used directly for immunoblotting or frozen at −20°C. For glutathione pull down assays, 2×106 HEK-293T cells were seeded onto 10 cm tissue culture plates, transfected 24 hours later with 10 μg of mTOR-encoding plasmid and 2 ng of S6K1-encoding plasmid using X-tremeGENE 9, and lysed 48-72 hours after transfection in NP-40 lysis buffer. 2-3 mg of the resultant whole-cell lysates were incubated with 30 μL of pre-washed glutathione-coupled agarose beads in a 1 mL volume, which were rotated at 4°C for two hours, spun at 2,500 RCF for one minute, washed in 500 μL lysis buffer three times, and the beads directly boiled in 50 μL of 2x SDS-sample buffer. For mTOR immunoprecipitations, the cells were treated as with the glutathione pulldown, except they were lysed/washed in CHAPS buffer (50 mM HEPES at pH 7.4, 150 mM NaCl, 0.4% CHAPS, 50 mM NaF, 10 mM Na-pyrophosphate, 100 mM β-glycerophosphate, and 1 tablet of protease inhibitor per 50 mL of buffer) and incubated with Flag-M2-coupled agarose beads.  Immunoblotting  10-50 μg of whole cell lysates, 10-30 μL of glutathione pulldown samples, or 10-30 μL of Flag-M2 immunoprecipitates were loaded into lanes of 4-12% bis-tris SDS-PAGE gels, run at 120 volts for 2 hours in 1x MOPS buffer, and then transferred to 0.45 μm PVDF membrane at 60 volts for 2 hours in 1x transfer buffer (100 mM CAPS, 123 mM NaOH, 10% Ethanol). The membranes were then immunoblotted for the indicated proteins. All primary antibodies were diluted 1:1000 in 5% BSA W/V TBST, with the exception of GAPDH and Flag antibodies which were diluted 1:2000. All secondary antibodies were diluted 1:5000 in 5% milk W/V TBST. Densitometry was performed using ImageJ and a student's T test was used to determine statistical significance.  Rapamycin, Torin1, MLN0128, GDC0980, and nutrient starvation/re-stimulation treatments  For the mTOR inhibitor experiments, 3×105 TREX cells per well were seeded into 6-well plates, grown for one day, treated with 100 nM rapamycin, 250 nM Torin1, 250 nM MLN0128, 250 nM GDC0980, or DMSO for 60 minutes. The cells were then lysed as above. For the nutrient deprivation experiments, 3×105 TREX cells per well were seeded into 6-well plates, grown for one day, rinsed briefly in 1x amino acid- or glucose-free RPMI, incubated in 1x amino acid- or glucose-free RPMI for 60 minutes, and then stimulated with free amino acids or glucose to the levels in complete RPMI for 15 minutes.  In vitro proliferation assays  Six replicates each of 800-1200 cells were seeded into 96-well plates, treated with 8 doses of rapamycin 24 hours later, and assayed for ATP content using Cell Titer Glo 96 hours following rapamycin treatment according to the manufacturer's protocol.  In vivo xenograft assays  3×106 cells per injection site were implanted subcutaneously into the right and left flanks of nude mice. Once tumors were palpable in all animals (>50 mm3 volume by caliper measurements), mice were assigned randomly into rapamycin treated or untreated groups and caliper measurements were taken every 3-4 days until tumor burden approached the limits set by institutional guidelines. Tumor volume was assessed according to the formula (0.5)(W)(W)(L), and a student's T test was used to determine the p-values. Rapamycin (4 mg/kg) or vehicle was delivered by daily IP injection, 100 mL per injection. All experiments involving mice were carried out with approval from the Committee for Animal Care at MIT and under supervision of the Department of Comparative Medicine at MIT.   Significance  We report that a diverse set of cancer-associated MTOR mutations confer increased mTORC1/2 pathway activity and that cells harboring these mutations are highly sensitive to rapamycin in culture and in vivo. These findings are clinically relevant as the MTOR mutations characterized herein may serve as biomarkers for predicting tumor responses to mTOR inhibitors.  
1889||Mammalian target of rapamycin (mTOR) is a serine/threonine kinase that regulates a variety of cellular functions such as growth, proliferation and autophagy. In a variety of cancer cells, overactivation of mTOR has been reported. In addition, mTOR inhibitors, such as rapamycin and its derivatives, are being evaluated in clinical trials as anticancer drugs. However, no active mutants of mTOR have been identified in human cancer. Here, we report that two different point mutations, S2215Y and R2505P, identified in human cancer genome database confer constitutive activation of mTOR signaling even under nutrient starvation conditions. S2215Y was identified in large intestine adenocarcinoma whereas R2505P was identified in renal cell carcinoma. mTOR complex 1 prepared from cells expressing the mutant mTOR after nutrient starvation still retains the activity to phosphorylate 4E-BP1 in vitro. The cells expressing the mTOR mutant show increased percentage of S-phase cells and exhibit resistance to cell size decrease by amino-acid starvation. The activated mutants are still sensitive to rapamycin. However, they show increased resistance to 1-butanol. Our study points to the idea that mTOR activating mutations can be identified in a wide range of human cancer.  Keywords: mTORC1, rapamycin, cancer genome database, kinase activity The mammalian target of rapamycin (mTOR) signaling pathway has critical functions in protein synthesis, controlling cell size and cell-cycle progression in response to extracellular and intracellular stimuli, including insulin, nutrients and energy status (Wullschleger et al., 2006; Wang and Proud, 2009). Its effect on protein synthesis is mediated by the phosphorylation of S6K and 4E-BP1 and this is catalyzed by the mTOR complex 1 (mTORC1) that contains raptor, mLST8 in addition to mTOR. The second complex, mTORC2, contains rictor, mLST8 and sin1 and functions to phosphorylate Akt as well as to regulate actin cytoskeleton (Sabatini, 2006). Dysregulation of mTOR activity is correlated with several Hamartoma syndromes, including tuberous sclerosis complex, Cowden disease and Peutz–Jeghers syndromes. These genetic disorders are known to be caused by mutations in tumor-suppressor genes such as TSC1-TSC2, PTEN and LKB1 that negatively regulate mTOR (Inoki et al., 2005). Furthermore, activation of the mTOR signaling pathway has been reported in a variety of human cancer, including malignant melanoma and head and neck cancer (Guertin and Sabatini, 2007; Molinolo et al., 2007; Karbowniczek et al., 2008). The mTORC1 signaling is activated also in a majority of renal clear cell carcinomas (Robb et al., 2007). Rapamycin and its derivatives are being evaluated as an anticancer drug in clinical trials. In particular, temsirolimus (also known as CCI-779) is approved by the Food and Drug Administration for the treatment of patients with advanced renal cell carcinoma (Chiang and Abraham, 2007). Despite the importance of mTOR activation in human cancer, no activating mutations of mTOR have been identified in human cancer.  Previously, we have carried out random mutagenesis of fission yeast Tor2 (Urano et al., 2007) to identify single amino-acid changes that confer hyperactivation. This study identified 23 point mutations, any of which can confer hyperactive phenotypes to Tor2. Most mutations were clustered in and around the FAT and the kinase domain. Two representative mutations were selected and each was introduced into mTOR. Expression of the mTOR mutants led to constitutive activation of mTOR even after nutrient starvation (Urano et al., 2007). In addition to our study, Maeda and co-workers (Ohne et al., 2008) have shown that mutations in the FRB and kinase domain of mTOR, different from the ones identified in our study, lead to hyperactivation of mTOR. Thus, these studies provided a proof of principle that a single amino-acid substitution can convert mTOR to a constitutive active form.  To identify mTOR mutations in human cancer, we searched the sequence of the mTOR (MTOR) gene from a variety of human cancer samples in the COSMIC Library (Catalogue of Somatic Mutations in Cancer) provided by the Sanger Institute (http://www.sanger.ac.uk/genetics/CGP/cosmic/) in which a vast amount of information on somatic mutations in human cancers is stored. Ten mutations have been identified in the mTOR gene from 750 cancer samples derived from the following tissues: breast, central nervous system, hematopoietic and lymphoid tissue, kidney, large intestine, lung, ovary, pancreas, pleura, skin, stomach, testis, upper aerodigestive tract and urinary tract. Of the 10 mutations, 2 are silent mutations that do not change the amino-acid sequence. One of them generates a stop codon that produces a truncated mTOR protein that does not contain the kinase domain. A mutation M135T was identified twice. Six different amino-acid changes identified are shown in Figure 1. The types of cancer where the mutation was identified as well as COSMIC information are shown in Figure 1. Interestingly, we found a number of mutations in the C-terminal region that contains the kinase domain.  Figure 1 Figure 1 Mammalian target of rapamycin (mTOR) mutations found in cancer genome. mTOR mutations were identified by searching the COSMIC Library (Catalogue of Somatic Mutations in Cancer) as described in text. The mTOR mutations identified in cancer genome are indicated ... We were particularly interested in the mutations that are located within or close to the kinase domain. These mutations, S2215Y, P2476L and R2505P, as well as the A8S mutation at the N-terminal region were introduced into mTOR and their effects were examined. To carry out this experiment, we introduced the mutations into AU1-tagged mTOR and the activity was measured in HEK293T cells as described previously (Urano et al., 2007). As negative controls, we characterized the cells transfected with a vector as well as the cells transfected with a plasmid encoding AU1-tagged wild-type mTOR. As a positive control, E2419K, a mutation identified in our previous mutagenesis study (Urano et al., 2007) was used. After nutrient starvation, phosphorylation of mTOR substrates, S6K1 and 4E-BP1, was measured as an indication of mTOR activity. FLAG-tagged S6K1 was co-transfected. As can be seen in Figure 2a, phosphorylation of S6K1 was detected in the cells expressing the mTOR mutants, E2419K, S2215Y or R2505P. Conversely, phosphorylation of S6K1 was not detected in the cells transfected with the wild-type mTOR as well as with the A8S or P2476L mutant, although all AU1-mTOR were expressed at a similar level. Phosphorylation of 4E-BP1 was also increased by the expression of the E2419K, S2215Y or R2505P mutant but not in the cells transfected with the mutants A8S, P2476L, an empty vector or the wild-type mTOR (Figure 2b).  Figure 2 Figure 2 mTORS2215Y and mTORR2505P cancer mutations confer constitutive activation of mTOR complex 1 (mTORC1) but not mTORC2. (a) Mutations in mTOR were introduced by two-step polymerase chain reaction (PCR) into pcDNA3-AU1-mTOR as described previously (Urano ... As described earlier, mTOR forms two complexes, mTORC1 and mTORC2, and each complex is activated by distinct signaling pathways and transmits the signals to different substrates. mTORC1 phosphorylates S6K1 and 4E-BP1, and mTORC2 phosphorylates Akt. To examine whether the mTOR mutants affect mTORC2, we examined Akt phosphorylation by co-transfecting myc-Akt and examining Akt phosphorylation using anti-phospho-Akt antibody. As can be seen in Figure 2c, no significant increase of the phosphorylation of Akt was detected with the mTOR mutants. These results suggest that the cancer mTOR mutations confer activation of mTORC1 but not mTORC2. These results are similar to those we obtained with the mTOR mutants identified by random mutagenesis; the amino-acid changes cause selective activation of mTORC1 (Urano et al., 2007).  To further examine constitutive activation of mTOR by the cancer mutation, we focused on the S2215Y mutant and examined its kinase activity in vitro. AU1-tagged wild-type mTOR or the S2215Y mutant was transfected into HEK293T cells. We first tested whether the S2215Y mutant forms intact complexes with mTORC subunits by immunoprecipitating mTOR using anti-AU1 antibody. As seen in Figure 3a, similar amount of the wild-type and the S2215Y mutant mTOR was immunoprecipitated. Comparable amount of mTORC1-specific component, raptor, mTORC2-specific component, rictor, as well as mLST8 that is present in both mTORC1 and mTORC2 was detected both in the wild-type and S2215Y immunoprecipitates, suggesting that mTOR S2215Y forms intact mTORC1 and mTORC2. We next examined the kinase activity of mTORC1 and mTORC2 in vitro. After transfection, the cells were starved for serum and nutrients, and mTORC1 and mTORC2 were separately immunopurified by the use of anti-raptor and anti-rictor antibodies, respectively. Each immunoprecipitate was then mixed with 4E-BP1, which is an mTORC1 substrate, or Akt, which is an mTORC2 substrate, and kinase reaction was carried out. As shown in Figure 3b, phospho-4E-BP1 was detected strongly in the immunoprecipitates of the S2215Y mutant as well as of E2419K. Conversely, the wild-type mTOR exhibited minimal activity, as only a slight phosphorylation of 4E-BP1 was observed. The immunoprecipitates without AU1-mTOR (Control) also phosphorylated 4E-BP1 only slightly. We have also examined the R2505P mutation. Immunoprecipitates from cells expressing the mutant strongly phosphorylated 4E-BP1 (Supplementary Figure 1). These results show that the S2215Y and R2505P mutations confer constitutive mTORC1 activity. We next examined whether the S2215Y mutation also confers constitutive mTORC2 activity. As seen in Figure 3c, phospho-Akt was hardly detected in the rictor immunoprecipitates from the cells expressing the wild-type mTOR or the vector control. AU1-mTOR E2419K and S2215Y phosphorylated Akt but the amount of phospho-Akt was only slightly above that of the wild-type mTOR, suggesting that the mTOR S2215Y cancer mutant specifically activates mTORC1. These results are consistent with our in vivo findings (Figure 2). Recently, it has been established that GTP-bound Rheb G-protein is specifically required for the hyperactivation of the wild-type mTORC1, but not mTORC2, in vitro as well as in vivo (Sancak et al., 2007; Sato et al., 2009). Thus, the hyperactivation of mTORC1 by the mTOR cancer mutants S2215Y and R2505P mimics Rheb activation of mTORC1.  Figure 3 Figure 3 mTORS2215Y increases the catalytic activity of mTOR complex 1 (mTORC1) but not mTORC2 in vitro. (a) HEK293T cells were transfected with either the empty vector (control) or pcDNA3-AU1-mTOR (wild type or S2215Y). Cell extracts were prepared from the serum ... To test whether the constitutive activation of mTOR by the cancer mutations affects cell-cycle control and cell size, we analyzed cell cycle and cell size using the cells expressing the mTOR S2215Y mutant. After transfecting the wild-type or the active mTOR mutant, the cells were starved for serum. The cellular DNA was labeled with propidium iodide and scanned by FACScan flow cytometer (Figure 4a). The percentage of cells in S phase was 28.2 ± 4.3% and that of cells in G0/G1 phase was 64.9 ± 3.5% in the cells expressing the wild-type mTOR. However, in the cells expressing the mTOR S2215Y mutant, the percentage of cells in S phase was substantially increased to 42.0 ± 0.7% with a concomitant decrease in the percentage of G0/G1 cells to 51.5 ± 3.1%. These results suggest that cell-cycle progression is affected by the expression of the mTOR active mutant. Forward scatter analysis was also carried out to examine alteration of cell size. In this experiment, HEK293T cells were transfected with the wild-type or the mutant S2215Y mTOR and then incubated with or without amino acids. As can be seen in Figure 4b, the size of cells expressing the mutant mTOR was significantly larger than that of the cells expressing the wild-type mTOR. In the presence of amino acids, no difference in cell size between the cells expressing the wild-type and mutant S2215Y mTOR was observed (data not shown). These results suggest that the expression of the mutant mTOR confers resistance to size decrease on amino-acid starvation.  Figure 4 Figure 4 mTORS2215Y effects on cell cycle and cell size under nutrient starvation and sensitivity to rapamycin, osmotic stress and 1-butanol. (a) HEK293T cells transfected with pcDNA3-AU1-mTOR (wild type or S2215Y) were subjected to serum starvation. After trypsinization, ... We next examined whether rapamycin, an mTOR inhibitor, inhibits the enhanced phosphorylation of S6K1 by mTOR S2215Y. After transfection of AU1-mTOR and FLAG-S6K1, we treated the cells with rapamycin for 1 h. In the cells with empty vector or mTOR wild type, phosphorylation of S6K1 was not seen (Figure 4c), whereas mTOR active mutants, E2419K and L1460P, increased phosphorylation of S6K1. This increased phosphorylation was suppressed by the rapamycin treatment. mTOR S2215Y also enhanced the phosphorylation of S6K1 but, in the presence of rapamycin, S6K1 phosphorylation was completely abolished. These results suggest that rapamycin is effective in inhibiting the phenotypes due to activating mutations in mTOR.  To gain insight into possible differences between the wild-type and the mutant mTOR, we examined sensitivity to treatments that are known to affect the mTOR signaling. It has been reported that the mTORC1 signaling is inhibited by several intracellular and extracellular stresses, including oxidative and osmotic stresses such as high concentration of hydrogen peroxide and sorbitol, respectively (Patel et al., 2002; Reiling and Sabatini, 2006). In addition, 1-butanol, an inhibitor of phospholipase D, also prevents the mTOR signaling by decreasing phosphatidic acid (Fang et al., 2001). We tested effects of these stresses and the inhibitor on the activity of the mTOR S2215Y mutant. As shown in Figure 4d, the mTOR signaling in cells expressing the mutant mTOR was insensitive to 1-butanol. Partial resistance to hydrogen peroxide was observed. In contrast, we did not find differences in the sensitivity to osmotic stress by sorbitol treatment between cells expressing the wild-type and the mutant mTOR. Our results with 1-butanol are of interest. Phospholipase D is involved in the synthesis of phosphatidic acid, which is required for the interaction of mTOR with raptor (English et al., 1996; Toschi et al., 2009). The mutant mTOR may have altered requirement for phosphatidic acid. We also examined whether the cells expressing the mutant mTOR exhibit altered response to hypoxia treatment (Supplementary Figure 2). HEK293 cells were transfected with pcDNA3 empty vector, pcDNA3-AU1-mTOR wild-type or pcDNA3-AU1-mTOR S2215Y cancer mutant, and placed in a 1% O2 condition. The cells were immediately lysed and the proteins were analyzed by SDS–polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis followed by western blotting. The activity of mTOR was assessed by the phosphorylation level of ribosomal protein S6. AU1-mTOR was equally expressed in the cells transfected with mTOR wild-type or with the cancer mutant. Hypoxia-inducible factor 1α (HIF-1α) expression was increased when the cells were placed in 1% O2 incubator for 3 or 6 h, confirming that the cells were exposed to low oxygen. In the cells with empty vector or with the mTOR wild type, phospho-S6 was reduced in a hypoxic condition. However, in the cells expressing the mTOR cancer mutant, S6 remained moderately phosphorylated even after 6 h exposure in hypoxic condition, suggesting that mTOR cancer mutant confers partial resistance to hypoxia.  In conclusion, we have shown that two different single amino-acid mutations in mTOR, S2215Y and R2505P, identified in cancer genome database, confer nutrient-independent activation on mTORC1. We have further shown that the cells expressing the mTOR mutant S2215Y exhibit altered cell-cycle profile with increased percentage of S phase. In addition, cells expressing the mutant mTOR do not decrease cell size on nutrient starvation. An important issue concerns whether the mTOR cancer mutants exhibit transforming activity. Our experiments with focus formation assays so far have not revealed any transforming activity of the mTOR mutant S2215Y (Supplementary Figure 3a). This suggests that the sole expression of the mTOR cancer mutant does not transform Rat1 cells. Maeda and co-workers (Ohne et al., 2008) have examined hyperactive mTOR mutants identified by genetic screens and reported that their mutants do not transform NIH3T3 cells. Conversely, transforming activity of an activating mTOR mutant due to a deletion in the repressor domain of mTOR was reported using p53 mutant mouse embryonic fibroblasts (Edinger and Thompson, 2004). Further work is needed to conclude whether the mTOR mutants exhibit transforming activity.  It is important to point out that the mTOR mutation was present together with another mutation in the cancer samples we examined. In the case of the S2215Y mutation, mutations of G13D in K-ras and R8131I in Titin (TTN) were found. K-ras is the most frequently activated oncogene, with 17–25% of all human tumors harboring an active mutation in the gene (Kranenburg, 2005). This raises the possibility that the mTOR active mutant S2215Y enhances transforming activity of activated K-ras. Focus formation assays using Rat1 cells showed that the number of foci in cells coexpressing mutant K-ras and the mTOR S2215Y mutant is higher than that in cells expressing the mutant K-ras (Supplementary Figure 3b), raising the possibility that the mutant mTOR S2215Y enhances K-ras transformation. However, further work is needed to investigate this point. In the case of the kidney cancer sample harboring the R2505P mutation, another mutation of F218I in the CDC25A gene was present. CDC25 phosphatases activate Cdk/cyclin complexes by dephosphorylation and promote cell-cycle progression (Ray and Kiyokawa, 2007; Aressy and Ducommun, 2008). Overexpression of CDC25A and its isoform CDC25B has been observed in many human tumors, including breast, prostate, head and neck and non-small-cell lung cancer. In addition, expression of CDC25A in retinoblastoma-deficient fibroblasts leads to foci formation, growth in soft agar and tumor formation in mice (Kristjansdottir and Rudolph, 2004). Further study is needed to investigate whether the mTOR mutation and the CDC25A mutation work in concert to impact tumorigenesis.  Our study represents the first demonstration that mTOR is activated by point mutations in human cancer. Further mining of the human cancer genome database may reveal additional mutations. Characterization of tumor samples may provide insight into the type of cancer where mTOR activation has critical functions. In turn, this could help us target certain types of cancer for anti-mTOR treatments such as the rapamycin treatment.  
1893||Genes encoding components of the PI3K-Akt-mTOR signaling axis are frequently mutated in cancer, but few mutations have been characterized in MTOR, the gene for the mTOR kinase. Using publicly available tumor genome sequencing data, we generated a comprehensive catalog of mTOR pathway mutations in cancer, identifying 33 MTOR mutations that confer pathway hyperactivation. The mutations cluster in six distinct regions in the C-terminal half of mTOR and occur in multiple cancer types, with one cluster particularly prominent in kidney cancer. The activating mutations do not affect mTOR complex assembly, but a subset reduces binding to the mTOR inhibitor Deptor. mTORC1 signaling in cells expressing various activating mutations remains sensitive to pharmacological mTOR inhibition, but is partially resistant to nutrient deprivation. Lastly, cancer cell lines with hyperactivating MTOR mutations display heightened sensitivity to rapamycin both in culture and as in vivo xenografts, suggesting that such mutations confer mTOR pathway dependency.  Keywords: personalized, mTOR, mutations, biomarker, deptor Go to: Introduction In mammals, the PI3K-Akt-mTOR pathway regulates cell size, mRNA translation, autophagy and many metabolic processes, including lipid synthesis (1). A variety of upstream regulators control the activity of the serine/threonine protein kinase mTOR and many of these are deregulated in cancer, resulting in pathway hyperactivation. Such activation occurs most commonly through loss-of-function mutations in tumor suppressors, such as phosphatase and tensin homolog (PTEN), tuberous sclerosis 1/2 (TSC1/2), neurofibromin 1/2 (NF1/2), or oncogenic mutations in KRAS, PIK3CA, or AKT (2). However, few cancer-associated mutations have been functionally characterized in MTOR itself, with only two reports thus far describing such mutations. In the first report, the authors tested six cancer-associated MTOR mutations and observed that two (S2215Y from a colorectal sample and R2505P from a kidney sample) conferred mTOR complex 1 (mTORC1) activation (3). In the second report, the authors identified an mTORC1 activating MTOR mutation (L2431P) that was present in a portion but not the entirety of a primary kidney tumor (4). Although these initial reports establish that activating MTOR mutations do arise in cancer, they were based upon limited sample sets that do not reflect the diverse subtypes of cancer. More recently, cancer genome sequencing projects, such as The Cancer Genome Atlas (TCGA) and the Cancer Cell Line Encyclopedia (CCLE), have identified a vast number of somatic mutations in thousands of tumors from more than 40 cancer subtypes (5-7).  Using publicly available databases of cancer genome sequence data, we cataloged all mutations in mTOR pathway components. We annotated over 400 samples with missense mutations in the MTOR gene from dozens of cancer subtypes, most of which lie within six clusters in the part of the gene that encodes the C-terminal portion of mTOR. Furthermore, through functional analyses, we identify 33 novel mTOR pathway-activating mutations, some of which affect the capacity of mTOR to interact with its partner proteins. None of the activating mutations impact the sensitivity of mTORC1 activity in cells to mTOR inhibitors but a subset confer mTORC1 signaling resistance to nutrient deprivation. Importantly, cancer cells that naturally express a subset of the mutations are hypersensitive to the mTOR inhibitor rapamycin. These findings may have translational relevance as rapamycin analogs (rapalogs) are clinically approved for the treatment of cancer, and several ATP-competitive mTOR kinase inhibitors are in development (8). As tumor biopsies are increasingly subjected to whole exome sequencing, the hyperactivating MTOR mutations we characterize may serve as biomarkers in predicting cancer response to mTOR-targeting drugs.  Go to: Results Catalog of recurring mutations in genes encoding mTOR pathway components  To generate a comprehensive catalog of all cancer-associated missense mutations in canonical genes of the mTOR pathway, we analyzed partial genome sequencing data from the TCGA, CCLE, International Cancer Genome Consortium (ICGC) and Catalogue of Somatic Mutations in Cancer (COSMIC) databases (5-7, 9, 10). This analysis revealed that almost every gene in the mTOR pathway harbored somatic point mutations (Supplementary Table 1). To enrich for mutations that are more likely to affect pathway function, only mutations that alter the same codon more than once were counted. When normalized for gene length, this analysis revealed that MTOR contained the highest percentage of recurring mutations, and thus we focused most of our attention on these mutations (Supplementary Figure 1). Collectively, through data mining and a literature search, we curated over 400 samples with non-synonymous MTOR point mutations (Figure 1B and Supplementary Table 2) (11-17). While the majority of these mutations are represented by only one sample in our database, approximately 40% are recurrent, most of which have not been previously described. Additionally, the mutations cluster in six distinct regions of mTOR centered on highly recurrent mutations that alter amino acids C1483, E1799, T1977, S2215, L2427 and R2505 (Figure 1C). The presence of these clusters suggests that there is a selective advantage to acquiring mutations in certain regions of the mTOR protein. Furthermore, these mutations are present in multiple cancer subtypes, with the highest number in colorectal, endometrial, and lung cancers, although these cancer subtypes are also considered to have the highest mutation rates (Figures 1D and 1E) (18). Interestingly, a random mutagenesis screen in the S. pombe mTOR homolog (tor2) identified activating mutations in homologous amino acid positions to many of those we find in MTOR to be recurrently mutated in cancer (19) (Supplementary Table 3).  Figure 1 Figure 1 Cancer-associated MTOR mutations mTORC1/2 activating mutations in MTOR  The prevalence of the recurrent mutations, their clustering, and correlation with activating tor2 mutations strongly suggested that the MTOR mutations impact mTOR pathway activity. To test this possibility, wild-type (WT) or ten different mutants of mTOR (L1460P, C1483F, E1799K, F1888L, T1977R, V2006I, S2215Y, I2500F, R2505P, and D2512H) were expressed in cells and phosphorylation of the mTORC1/2 substrates S6K1, 4EBP1, or Akt1 examined (Figures 2A, 2B, and 2C). All the mTOR mutants conferred varying degrees of pathway activation, and, interestingly, a few displayed some substrate preference (L1460P, C1483F, S2215Y, and R2505P towards S6K1/4EBP1 or V2006I towards Akt1), implying that these mutations have greater effects on mTORC1 or mTORC2. Thus, while three pathway activating MTOR mutations have previously been identified (3, 4), our initial analyses uncovered an additional eight recurrent MTOR mutations which activate mTORC1 and/or mTORC2.  Figure 2 Figure 2 mTORC1 and mTORC2 activating mutations in MTOR and RHEB It is well established that two activating mutations (E545K and H1047R) within the phosphatidylinositol-4,5-bisphosphate 3-kinase, catalytic subunit alpha (PI3K-p110α), encoded by the PIK3CA gene, can lead to mTOR pathway activation (20). To determine the degree of mTOR pathway activation conferred by mTOR mutation, S6K1 phosphorylation from cells expressing WT or S2215Y mTOR was compared to cells expressing WT or mutant PI3K-p110α (Supplementary Figures 2A and 2B). This revealed that while expression of only mutant mTOR conferred mTORC1 activation, expression of either WT or mutant PI3K-p110α induced mTORC1 activity.  Non-recurrent MTOR mutations that activate mTORC1 signaling  We next examined in more detail the nature of the activating MTOR mutations, and observed that while some codons are mutated to only one other residue (e.g. E1799K), others are mutated to several different amino acids (e.g. S2215F/P/T/Y). This is reminiscent of the diverse amino acids to which the G12 residue of KRAS is mutated in cancers (21). We expressed 20 such MTOR mutations and found that many (C1483R/W/Y, F1888I, T1977K, S2215F/P, I2500M), but not all (A41P/S/T, F1888V, T1977S, V2006L, S2215T, R2505Q/*, D2512G/Y), led to increased S6K1 phosphorylation (Supplementary Figures 3 and 5, and data not shown). Given that most of these activating mutations are found only once in our dataset implies that other non-recurrent mutations may also activate mTORC1 signaling. To identify other such mutations, we turned our attention to the mutational clusters identified in Figure 1, and observed that while most are represented by several tissue types, those in the C1483 cluster are particularly prevalent in kidney cancer (Figure 1E and Supplementary Figure 3D). Interestingly, two recent cancer genome sequencing efforts reported that kidney cancers have an increased percentage of mutations in mTOR pathway genes, but the functional consequences of these mutations were not evaluated (13, 22). Expression of the ten kidney cancer-associated MTOR mutations from the C1483 cluster revealed that in addition to the previously evaluated L1460P and C1483F/Y mutants (Figure 1B and Supplemental Figure 2), three non-recurrent mutants (L1433S, A1459P, and E1519T) also induced mTORC1 pathway activity (Figure 2D). Similarly, expression of eight non-recurrent mutations from the S2215 cluster (N2206S, L2209V, A2210P, L2216P, R2217W, L2220F, Q2223K, and A2226S) activated mTORC1 signaling as measured by S6K1 phosphorylation, with the L2209V mutant conferring higher activation than even S2215Y (Supplementary Figure 3E). Lastly, other than the S2215Y and R2505P mutations, the only other cancer-associated MTOR mutation previously characterized is L2431P from a kidney cancer patient (4). Expression of mTOR containing this non-recurrent mutation caused mTORC1 activation that was much weaker than that caused by expression of the S2215Y mutant (Supplementary Figure 3F). Collectively, these results suggest that while most non-recurrent MTOR mutations found in cancer are part of the mutational “noise”, there exists a diverse set of MTOR mutations that can drive mTORC1 pathway activity. Likely, as more cancer genomes are sequenced, the activating non-recurrent mutations we identified will prove to be recurrent.  Recurrent mutations in RHEB activate mTORC1  We also observed that other mTOR pathway genes such as Raptor, Rictor, and Rheb1 harbored recurrent mutations (Supplemental Table 1). Expression of Rheb1 Y35N/C/H and to a lesser degree E139K increased phosphorylation of endogenous S6K1 more than that of WT Rheb1 (Figure 2E), while recurrent mutations in Raptor (R788C) or Rictor (S1101L) failed to induce any mTORC1 or mTORC2 activity (data not shown). In support of the relevance of these mutations to cancer, RHEB was recently highlighted as a novel cancer gene due to the presence of the Y35N mutation (23). Thus, cancer associated mutations in either MTOR or RHEB can induce mTORC1 activity; whether this is true of other mTOR pathway genes remains to be determined.  mTORC1/2 hyperactivating mutants bind less Deptor  One potential mechanism through which the mutations in mTOR (Figure 2) might increase S6K1/Akt1 phosphorylation is by altering mTORC1 or mTORC2 assembly. Alternatively or in addition, the mTOR mutations may diminish the binding of mTOR to its endogenous inhibitor Deptor, which binds to the FAT domain of mTOR (24). To test these possibilities, the interactions of exogenously expressed WT or mutant mTORs with endogenous Raptor, Rictor, and Deptor were measured. All mutant mTOR proteins bound equally well to Raptor and Rictor, suggesting that the mutations do not affect formation of either mTOR complex (Figure 3A). In contrast, Deptor binding to the immunoprecipitated mTOR proteins was reduced in cells expressing the mTOR mutants as compared to WT mTOR (Figure 3A). Given that increased mTOR pathway activity correlates with a reduction in the mTOR-Deptor interaction (24), it is likely that the observed decrease in Deptor binding reflects the increased mTOR pathway activity caused by the MTOR mutations. However, two mTORC1 activating mutations that are in the FAT domain of mTOR, L1460P and C1483Y, bound much less Deptor than the other mutants tested (Figure 3A), suggesting that these mutations directly perturb the Deptor binding site on mTOR. Consistent with this, examination of the mutations from the C1483 cluster described in figure 2D revealed that two other highly activating mutations in the FAT domain (A1459P and C1483Y) also strongly reduced the mTOR-Deptor interaction (Supplementary Figure 4A). While these results suggest a possible mechanism of action for a subset of activating mTOR mutations, they do not preclude other mechanism by which MTOR mutations may impact mTORC1 signaling, such as by increasing the activity of the mTOR kinase domain.  Figure 3 Figure 3 mTOR mutants bind less Deptor and cells expressing the mTOR S2215Y mutation are resistant to nutrient deprivation MTOR mutations do not affect mTORC1 sensitivity to mTOR inhibitors but can affect the pathway response to nutrient deprivation  We next considered the possibility that the mTORC1-activating MTOR mutants have altered sensitivity to established mTOR inhibitors. Engineered mutations in the FRB domain of mTOR, which binds the FKBP12-rapamycin complex, confer marked rapamycin resistance to mTOR (25). To test whether mTOR mutation alters pathway inhibition by rapamycin or Torin1 (an investigational ATP-competitive mTOR inhibitor), we used HEK-293 cells with an integrated FLP recombination site (TREX cells) to stably express WT or several different mutants of mTOR (A1459P, C1483Y, E1799K, F1888I, L2209V, S2215Y, L2431P, I2500F, and R2505P), as the mTOR cDNA is too large to be packaged and expressed via a lentiviral delivery system (Supplementary Figure 4B). Baseline phosphorylation of endogenous S6K1 was higher in TREX cells expressing the A1459P, L2209V, S2215Y, I2500F and R2505P mTOR mutants than in parental or WT-expressing cells (Figure 3B and Supplementary Figures 4C and 4D), consistent with the results obtained upon transient expression of these mutants (Figures 2A and 2D, and Supplementary Figure 3D). Importantly, mTORC1 activity in none of the TREX cells was resistant to rapamycin, Torin1, MLN0128 (an mTOR ATP-competitive inhibitor), GDC0980 (a dual PI3K/mTOR ATP-competitive inhibitor), (Figure 3B and Supplementary Figures 4C and 4D). Thus, on a molecular level, while cells with mTOR mutations may display high levels of mTORC1/2 activity, this activity is still sensitive to pharmacological mTOR inhibition.  The kinase activity of mTOR is tightly regulated by nutrient availability; when cells are starved of nutrients (specifically glucose and amino acids), they downregulate mTORC1 signaling, while retreatment of cells with these nutrients restores mTORC1-mediated signaling (26). Given this, we sought to determine whether any of the activating mTOR mutants affect the sensitivity of mTORC1 signaling to amino acid or glucose withdrawal. Indeed, S6K1 phosphorylation was highly resistant to deprivation of either nutrient in cells expressing several mutants (A1459P, S2215Y, I2500F and R2505P) (Figure 3C and Supplementary Figures 4E and 4F). This observation may be relevant in the context of developing tumors, which are often glucose starved (27, 28), where inappropriate mTORC1 activity may provide a growth advantage.  Cancer cells with hyperactivating MTOR mutations are hypersensitive to rapamycin in vitro and in vivo  To determine if cancer cells with MTOR mutations are dependent on mTORC1 activity, we evaluated the impact of rapamycin on the proliferation of set of cancer cell lines harboring WT or mutant mTOR (Figure 4A). We identified four cell lines with mTORC1-activating MTOR mutations (C1483Y in MOLT16; E1799K in HEC59 and SNU349; and S2215Y in JHUEM7) and two with MTOR mutations that have no apparent impact on mTORC1 signaling (V2006L in TUHR10TKB; and R2152C in A375) (Supplementary Figures 5A and 5B). HeLa cells were used as a negative control cell line, as they are mildly rapamycin sensitive and are wild-type for mTOR (7, 29). MCF7 and SW780 cells, which are also wild-type for mTOR, served as positive controls for rapamycin sensitivity because the MCF7 cells harbor an activating PI3K-p110α mutation (E545K) while the SW780 cells lack NPRL2, which encodes a component of the GATOR1 negative regulator of the amino acid-sensing pathway (30, 31). Importantly, only the cell lines with activating MTOR mutations, the PI3K-p110α mutant, or the NPRL2-null SW780 cells were hypersensitive to rapamycin treatment (Figure 4B). Consistent with these and published results, the growth of HeLa xenografts was partially rapamycin sensitive, while rapamycin completely halted the growth of HEC59 xenografts, which carry the hyperactivating mTOR E1799K mutation (Figure 4C) (32, 33). These results suggest that the presence of hyperactivating MTOR mutations in cancer cells may serve as biomarkers to identify tumors that are likely to respond to mTOR inhibitors.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Rapamycin inhibits the proliferation of cancer cell lines with hyperactivating MTOR mutations Go to: Discussion Early cancer genome sequencing projects led to the identification of three mutations in MTOR that were shown to activate mTORC1 signaling (3, 4). Here, we have identified an additional 33 previously unknown activating MTOR mutations (some are recurrent, others are not) (Supplementary Table 4). Mechanistically, we find that the activating mutations diminish the mTOR-Deptor interaction and interestingly, when mapped onto the recently solved crystal structure of mTOR, the mutations cluster in several distinct locations within the protein itself, suggesting that other activating mechanisms may exist (Supplementary Figure 6) (34). While the mutations do not prevent pharmacological mTOR inhibition, a subset protect against the effects of nutrient deprivation on mTORC1 signaling. Lastly, we demonstrate that cell lines with activating MTOR mutations are particularly sensitive to rapamycin in cell culture and in xenografts, likely due to mTOR pathway dependency.  The diversity of activating MTOR mutations we characterized is reminiscent of the various activating mutations in the prototypical lipid kinase PIK3CA, which encodes for the PI3K catalytic subunit p110α (35). However, unlike the activating PIK3CA mutations, which confer equal activation of PI3K-mediated signaling pathways, the diverse MTOR mutations can differentially activate mTORC1 or mTORC2, leading to either S6K1/4EBP1 or Akt1 phosphorylation, respectively. This finding is particularly relevant in a clinical setting, as patients with mTORC1 activating mutations may respond well to FDA-approved rapalogs, while patients with mTORC2 activating mutations might best be treated with ATP-competitive mTOR inhibitors, although such inhibitors are still in clinical trials. This distinction is especially relevant for patients with mTORC2 activating mutations, because rapalogs can in some cases upregulate mTORC2 signaling through modulation of an mTORC1-dependent feedback loop (36).  Rapalog-based therapies are currently approved or in clinical trials for several cancer subtypes, and some patients have had dramatic and durable responses to these therapies (37). Given that some cells with activating MTOR mutations are particularly rapamycin sensitive (Figure 4), it is possible that some of the rapalog-responsive patients had tumors with similar mutations. Indeed, it was recently found that the tumor of a bladder cancer patient with two activating MTOR mutations displayed exquisite sensitivity to rapalog-based therapy (38). Many more cancer-associated MTOR mutations will likely be identified in future studies, but functional evaluation of these mutations will be required to determine their impact on the mTOR pathway. As tumor sequencing becomes more commonplace, functional studies such as ours may aid in arriving at a more personalized treatment regimen that eventually promotes patient survival.  Go to: Methods Data acquisition and cluster analysis  All mutations in genes of the mTOR pathway were acquired from the cBIO, COSMIC, and ICGC databases or through a literature search with a data-freeze date of September 1, 2013. To identify regions of mTOR significantly enriched for somatic point mutations, we determined the probability of seeing at least the observed number of mutations in a 50 amino acid sliding window with the null hypothesis being all 463 MTOR mutations randomly occurring across the 2549 amino acid protein. Specifically, we calculated a threshold for significance of at least 15 mutations per 50 amino acids by the formula:  p=∑n=k463(463k)∗(1−502549)463−k∗(502549)k which equals 0.043 for k = at least 15 mutations per 50 amino acids.  Materials  Reagents were obtained from the following sources: antibodies to HA (clone C29F4), S6K1 (clone 49D7), phospho-T389-S6K1 (clone 108D2), and phospho-S473-Akt1 (clone D9E) from Cell Signaling Technology; antibody to GAPDH (clone GT239) from Genetex; antibodies to Deptor and Raptor, X-ray film, and PVDF membrane were from Millipore; antibody to Rictor from Bethyl; antibody to the Flag epitope (clone M2), Flag M2-coupled agarose beads, glucose and amino acid mixtures from Sigma; horseradish-peroxidase-labeled anti-mouse and anti-rabbit secondary antibodies from Santa Cruz Biotechnology; FuGENE HD and Cell Titer Glo from Promega; X-tremeGENE 9 and Complete Protease Mixture from Roche Applied Science; QuikChange II XL from Stratagene; enhanced chemiluminescence reagent and glutathione-coupled agarose beads from Thermo; 8-week-old nude mice from Taconic; rapamycin from LC Labs; MLN0128 and GDC0980 from Selleckchem; and Torin1 was synthesized in the Gray laboratory (39). cDNAs for mTOR and PI3K-p110α were from Addgene; expression vectors for HAGST-S6K1, HA-GST-Akt1, and HA-GST-Rheb1 were described previously (24, 40, 41) and Flag-14-3-3α was a generous gift from the Yaffe lab. The primers used to generate the mTOR and Rheb1 mutations were from Integrated DNA Technologies and are listed in supplemental table 5. HEK-293T-TREX cell system, 4-12% bis-tris SDS-PAGE gels, and 20x MOPS buffers were from Invitrogen.  Tissue culture and cell lines  MCF7, HELA, HEK-293T, HCT116, A375 and SW780 cells were from ATCC; JHUEM7, MOLT16, NCIH446, SNU349, and TUHR10TKB cells were from the Broad Institute Cancer Cell Line Encyclopedia; HEK-293E cells were a generous gift of the Blenis lab; and the HEC59 cells were a generous gift of the Lippard lab. The cell lines have not been re-authenticated, although those from ATCC and the Broad were used within 6 months of resuscitation. The HEK-293T, HEK-293E, HCT116, A375, HEC59, and TUHR10TKB cells were cultured in DMEM; JHUEM7 and MOLT16 cells were cultured in RPMI; and the SW780 cells were cultured in IMDM. All media was prepared with 10% heat inactivated FBS and 1% Penicillin/Streptomycin. All cell lines were maintained at 37°C, 5% CO2.  Site-directed mutagenesis, cloning, and TREX cell line generation  All MTOR and RHEB point mutations were generated in the parental vectors using site-directed mutagenesis with the QuikChange II XL kit according to the manufacturer’s protocol. Primer sequences are listed in Supplementary Table 5. Point mutations were verified using Sanger sequencing as conducted by Eton Biosciences. The HA-GST-4EBP1 reporter vector was generated by synthesizing a gBlock from IDT encoding for 4EBP1 and cloning it into the pRK5-HA-GST vector using SalI and NotI restriction digestion followed by ligation. WT and mutant mTOR cDNAs were subcloned directly from the pcDNA3 vector into the pcDNA5/FRT/TO vector using single site NotI restriction digestion followed by ligation. Flag-mTOR-expressing TREX cells were generated according to the manufacturer's protocol.  Cell treatments, lysis, and immunoprecipitations  For S6K1 and Akt1 co-transfection assays, 3×105 HEK-293T or HEK-293E cells per well were seeded into 6-well tissue culture plates, transfected 24 hours later with 2 μg of mTOR-encoding plasmid and 1 ng of S6K1- or Akt1-encoding plasmid using X-tremeGENE 9 or FuGENE HD, followed by whole cell lysis 48 hours after transfection in NP-40 lysis buffer (50 mM Tris-HCl at pH 7.5, 150 mM NaCl, 1% NP-40 substitute, 1 mM EDTA at pH8.0, 50 mM NaF, 10 mM Na-pyrophosphate, 15 mM Na3VO4, 100 mM β-glycerophosphate, and 1 tablet of protease inhibitor per 50 mL of buffer). 200-400 μg of whole cell lysates were mixed with 5x SDS-sample buffer to a final concentration of 1-2 μg/μL, boiled for 5 minutes, and then used directly for immunoblotting or frozen at −20°C. For glutathione pull down assays, 2×106 HEK-293T cells were seeded onto 10 cm tissue culture plates, transfected 24 hours later with 10 μg of mTOR-encoding plasmid and 2 ng of S6K1-encoding plasmid using X-tremeGENE 9, and lysed 48-72 hours after transfection in NP-40 lysis buffer. 2-3 mg of the resultant whole-cell lysates were incubated with 30 μL of pre-washed glutathione-coupled agarose beads in a 1 mL volume, which were rotated at 4°C for two hours, spun at 2,500 RCF for one minute, washed in 500 μL lysis buffer three times, and the beads directly boiled in 50 μL of 2x SDS-sample buffer. For mTOR immunoprecipitations, the cells were treated as with the glutathione pulldown, except they were lysed/washed in CHAPS buffer (50 mM HEPES at pH 7.4, 150 mM NaCl, 0.4% CHAPS, 50 mM NaF, 10 mM Na-pyrophosphate, 100 mM β-glycerophosphate, and 1 tablet of protease inhibitor per 50 mL of buffer) and incubated with Flag-M2-coupled agarose beads.  Immunoblotting  10-50 μg of whole cell lysates, 10-30 μL of glutathione pulldown samples, or 10-30 μL of Flag-M2 immunoprecipitates were loaded into lanes of 4-12% bis-tris SDS-PAGE gels, run at 120 volts for 2 hours in 1x MOPS buffer, and then transferred to 0.45 μm PVDF membrane at 60 volts for 2 hours in 1x transfer buffer (100 mM CAPS, 123 mM NaOH, 10% Ethanol). The membranes were then immunoblotted for the indicated proteins. All primary antibodies were diluted 1:1000 in 5% BSA W/V TBST, with the exception of GAPDH and Flag antibodies which were diluted 1:2000. All secondary antibodies were diluted 1:5000 in 5% milk W/V TBST. Densitometry was performed using ImageJ and a student's T test was used to determine statistical significance.  Rapamycin, Torin1, MLN0128, GDC0980, and nutrient starvation/re-stimulation treatments  For the mTOR inhibitor experiments, 3×105 TREX cells per well were seeded into 6-well plates, grown for one day, treated with 100 nM rapamycin, 250 nM Torin1, 250 nM MLN0128, 250 nM GDC0980, or DMSO for 60 minutes. The cells were then lysed as above. For the nutrient deprivation experiments, 3×105 TREX cells per well were seeded into 6-well plates, grown for one day, rinsed briefly in 1x amino acid- or glucose-free RPMI, incubated in 1x amino acid- or glucose-free RPMI for 60 minutes, and then stimulated with free amino acids or glucose to the levels in complete RPMI for 15 minutes.  In vitro proliferation assays  Six replicates each of 800-1200 cells were seeded into 96-well plates, treated with 8 doses of rapamycin 24 hours later, and assayed for ATP content using Cell Titer Glo 96 hours following rapamycin treatment according to the manufacturer's protocol.  In vivo xenograft assays  3×106 cells per injection site were implanted subcutaneously into the right and left flanks of nude mice. Once tumors were palpable in all animals (>50 mm3 volume by caliper measurements), mice were assigned randomly into rapamycin treated or untreated groups and caliper measurements were taken every 3-4 days until tumor burden approached the limits set by institutional guidelines. Tumor volume was assessed according to the formula (0.5)(W)(W)(L), and a student's T test was used to determine the p-values. Rapamycin (4 mg/kg) or vehicle was delivered by daily IP injection, 100 mL per injection. All experiments involving mice were carried out with approval from the Committee for Animal Care at MIT and under supervision of the Department of Comparative Medicine at MIT.   Significance  We report that a diverse set of cancer-associated MTOR mutations confer increased mTORC1/2 pathway activity and that cells harboring these mutations are highly sensitive to rapamycin in culture and in vivo. These findings are clinically relevant as the MTOR mutations characterized herein may serve as biomarkers for predicting tumor responses to mTOR inhibitors.  
1897||Genes encoding components of the PI3K-Akt-mTOR signaling axis are frequently mutated in cancer, but few mutations have been characterized in MTOR, the gene for the mTOR kinase. Using publicly available tumor genome sequencing data, we generated a comprehensive catalog of mTOR pathway mutations in cancer, identifying 33 MTOR mutations that confer pathway hyperactivation. The mutations cluster in six distinct regions in the C-terminal half of mTOR and occur in multiple cancer types, with one cluster particularly prominent in kidney cancer. The activating mutations do not affect mTOR complex assembly, but a subset reduces binding to the mTOR inhibitor Deptor. mTORC1 signaling in cells expressing various activating mutations remains sensitive to pharmacological mTOR inhibition, but is partially resistant to nutrient deprivation. Lastly, cancer cell lines with hyperactivating MTOR mutations display heightened sensitivity to rapamycin both in culture and as in vivo xenografts, suggesting that such mutations confer mTOR pathway dependency.  Keywords: personalized, mTOR, mutations, biomarker, deptor Go to: Introduction In mammals, the PI3K-Akt-mTOR pathway regulates cell size, mRNA translation, autophagy and many metabolic processes, including lipid synthesis (1). A variety of upstream regulators control the activity of the serine/threonine protein kinase mTOR and many of these are deregulated in cancer, resulting in pathway hyperactivation. Such activation occurs most commonly through loss-of-function mutations in tumor suppressors, such as phosphatase and tensin homolog (PTEN), tuberous sclerosis 1/2 (TSC1/2), neurofibromin 1/2 (NF1/2), or oncogenic mutations in KRAS, PIK3CA, or AKT (2). However, few cancer-associated mutations have been functionally characterized in MTOR itself, with only two reports thus far describing such mutations. In the first report, the authors tested six cancer-associated MTOR mutations and observed that two (S2215Y from a colorectal sample and R2505P from a kidney sample) conferred mTOR complex 1 (mTORC1) activation (3). In the second report, the authors identified an mTORC1 activating MTOR mutation (L2431P) that was present in a portion but not the entirety of a primary kidney tumor (4). Although these initial reports establish that activating MTOR mutations do arise in cancer, they were based upon limited sample sets that do not reflect the diverse subtypes of cancer. More recently, cancer genome sequencing projects, such as The Cancer Genome Atlas (TCGA) and the Cancer Cell Line Encyclopedia (CCLE), have identified a vast number of somatic mutations in thousands of tumors from more than 40 cancer subtypes (5-7).  Using publicly available databases of cancer genome sequence data, we cataloged all mutations in mTOR pathway components. We annotated over 400 samples with missense mutations in the MTOR gene from dozens of cancer subtypes, most of which lie within six clusters in the part of the gene that encodes the C-terminal portion of mTOR. Furthermore, through functional analyses, we identify 33 novel mTOR pathway-activating mutations, some of which affect the capacity of mTOR to interact with its partner proteins. None of the activating mutations impact the sensitivity of mTORC1 activity in cells to mTOR inhibitors but a subset confer mTORC1 signaling resistance to nutrient deprivation. Importantly, cancer cells that naturally express a subset of the mutations are hypersensitive to the mTOR inhibitor rapamycin. These findings may have translational relevance as rapamycin analogs (rapalogs) are clinically approved for the treatment of cancer, and several ATP-competitive mTOR kinase inhibitors are in development (8). As tumor biopsies are increasingly subjected to whole exome sequencing, the hyperactivating MTOR mutations we characterize may serve as biomarkers in predicting cancer response to mTOR-targeting drugs.  Go to: Results Catalog of recurring mutations in genes encoding mTOR pathway components  To generate a comprehensive catalog of all cancer-associated missense mutations in canonical genes of the mTOR pathway, we analyzed partial genome sequencing data from the TCGA, CCLE, International Cancer Genome Consortium (ICGC) and Catalogue of Somatic Mutations in Cancer (COSMIC) databases (5-7, 9, 10). This analysis revealed that almost every gene in the mTOR pathway harbored somatic point mutations (Supplementary Table 1). To enrich for mutations that are more likely to affect pathway function, only mutations that alter the same codon more than once were counted. When normalized for gene length, this analysis revealed that MTOR contained the highest percentage of recurring mutations, and thus we focused most of our attention on these mutations (Supplementary Figure 1). Collectively, through data mining and a literature search, we curated over 400 samples with non-synonymous MTOR point mutations (Figure 1B and Supplementary Table 2) (11-17). While the majority of these mutations are represented by only one sample in our database, approximately 40% are recurrent, most of which have not been previously described. Additionally, the mutations cluster in six distinct regions of mTOR centered on highly recurrent mutations that alter amino acids C1483, E1799, T1977, S2215, L2427 and R2505 (Figure 1C). The presence of these clusters suggests that there is a selective advantage to acquiring mutations in certain regions of the mTOR protein. Furthermore, these mutations are present in multiple cancer subtypes, with the highest number in colorectal, endometrial, and lung cancers, although these cancer subtypes are also considered to have the highest mutation rates (Figures 1D and 1E) (18). Interestingly, a random mutagenesis screen in the S. pombe mTOR homolog (tor2) identified activating mutations in homologous amino acid positions to many of those we find in MTOR to be recurrently mutated in cancer (19) (Supplementary Table 3).  Figure 1 Figure 1 Cancer-associated MTOR mutations mTORC1/2 activating mutations in MTOR  The prevalence of the recurrent mutations, their clustering, and correlation with activating tor2 mutations strongly suggested that the MTOR mutations impact mTOR pathway activity. To test this possibility, wild-type (WT) or ten different mutants of mTOR (L1460P, C1483F, E1799K, F1888L, T1977R, V2006I, S2215Y, I2500F, R2505P, and D2512H) were expressed in cells and phosphorylation of the mTORC1/2 substrates S6K1, 4EBP1, or Akt1 examined (Figures 2A, 2B, and 2C). All the mTOR mutants conferred varying degrees of pathway activation, and, interestingly, a few displayed some substrate preference (L1460P, C1483F, S2215Y, and R2505P towards S6K1/4EBP1 or V2006I towards Akt1), implying that these mutations have greater effects on mTORC1 or mTORC2. Thus, while three pathway activating MTOR mutations have previously been identified (3, 4), our initial analyses uncovered an additional eight recurrent MTOR mutations which activate mTORC1 and/or mTORC2.  Figure 2 Figure 2 mTORC1 and mTORC2 activating mutations in MTOR and RHEB It is well established that two activating mutations (E545K and H1047R) within the phosphatidylinositol-4,5-bisphosphate 3-kinase, catalytic subunit alpha (PI3K-p110α), encoded by the PIK3CA gene, can lead to mTOR pathway activation (20). To determine the degree of mTOR pathway activation conferred by mTOR mutation, S6K1 phosphorylation from cells expressing WT or S2215Y mTOR was compared to cells expressing WT or mutant PI3K-p110α (Supplementary Figures 2A and 2B). This revealed that while expression of only mutant mTOR conferred mTORC1 activation, expression of either WT or mutant PI3K-p110α induced mTORC1 activity.  Non-recurrent MTOR mutations that activate mTORC1 signaling  We next examined in more detail the nature of the activating MTOR mutations, and observed that while some codons are mutated to only one other residue (e.g. E1799K), others are mutated to several different amino acids (e.g. S2215F/P/T/Y). This is reminiscent of the diverse amino acids to which the G12 residue of KRAS is mutated in cancers (21). We expressed 20 such MTOR mutations and found that many (C1483R/W/Y, F1888I, T1977K, S2215F/P, I2500M), but not all (A41P/S/T, F1888V, T1977S, V2006L, S2215T, R2505Q/*, D2512G/Y), led to increased S6K1 phosphorylation (Supplementary Figures 3 and 5, and data not shown). Given that most of these activating mutations are found only once in our dataset implies that other non-recurrent mutations may also activate mTORC1 signaling. To identify other such mutations, we turned our attention to the mutational clusters identified in Figure 1, and observed that while most are represented by several tissue types, those in the C1483 cluster are particularly prevalent in kidney cancer (Figure 1E and Supplementary Figure 3D). Interestingly, two recent cancer genome sequencing efforts reported that kidney cancers have an increased percentage of mutations in mTOR pathway genes, but the functional consequences of these mutations were not evaluated (13, 22). Expression of the ten kidney cancer-associated MTOR mutations from the C1483 cluster revealed that in addition to the previously evaluated L1460P and C1483F/Y mutants (Figure 1B and Supplemental Figure 2), three non-recurrent mutants (L1433S, A1459P, and E1519T) also induced mTORC1 pathway activity (Figure 2D). Similarly, expression of eight non-recurrent mutations from the S2215 cluster (N2206S, L2209V, A2210P, L2216P, R2217W, L2220F, Q2223K, and A2226S) activated mTORC1 signaling as measured by S6K1 phosphorylation, with the L2209V mutant conferring higher activation than even S2215Y (Supplementary Figure 3E). Lastly, other than the S2215Y and R2505P mutations, the only other cancer-associated MTOR mutation previously characterized is L2431P from a kidney cancer patient (4). Expression of mTOR containing this non-recurrent mutation caused mTORC1 activation that was much weaker than that caused by expression of the S2215Y mutant (Supplementary Figure 3F). Collectively, these results suggest that while most non-recurrent MTOR mutations found in cancer are part of the mutational “noise”, there exists a diverse set of MTOR mutations that can drive mTORC1 pathway activity. Likely, as more cancer genomes are sequenced, the activating non-recurrent mutations we identified will prove to be recurrent.  Recurrent mutations in RHEB activate mTORC1  We also observed that other mTOR pathway genes such as Raptor, Rictor, and Rheb1 harbored recurrent mutations (Supplemental Table 1). Expression of Rheb1 Y35N/C/H and to a lesser degree E139K increased phosphorylation of endogenous S6K1 more than that of WT Rheb1 (Figure 2E), while recurrent mutations in Raptor (R788C) or Rictor (S1101L) failed to induce any mTORC1 or mTORC2 activity (data not shown). In support of the relevance of these mutations to cancer, RHEB was recently highlighted as a novel cancer gene due to the presence of the Y35N mutation (23). Thus, cancer associated mutations in either MTOR or RHEB can induce mTORC1 activity; whether this is true of other mTOR pathway genes remains to be determined.  mTORC1/2 hyperactivating mutants bind less Deptor  One potential mechanism through which the mutations in mTOR (Figure 2) might increase S6K1/Akt1 phosphorylation is by altering mTORC1 or mTORC2 assembly. Alternatively or in addition, the mTOR mutations may diminish the binding of mTOR to its endogenous inhibitor Deptor, which binds to the FAT domain of mTOR (24). To test these possibilities, the interactions of exogenously expressed WT or mutant mTORs with endogenous Raptor, Rictor, and Deptor were measured. All mutant mTOR proteins bound equally well to Raptor and Rictor, suggesting that the mutations do not affect formation of either mTOR complex (Figure 3A). In contrast, Deptor binding to the immunoprecipitated mTOR proteins was reduced in cells expressing the mTOR mutants as compared to WT mTOR (Figure 3A). Given that increased mTOR pathway activity correlates with a reduction in the mTOR-Deptor interaction (24), it is likely that the observed decrease in Deptor binding reflects the increased mTOR pathway activity caused by the MTOR mutations. However, two mTORC1 activating mutations that are in the FAT domain of mTOR, L1460P and C1483Y, bound much less Deptor than the other mutants tested (Figure 3A), suggesting that these mutations directly perturb the Deptor binding site on mTOR. Consistent with this, examination of the mutations from the C1483 cluster described in figure 2D revealed that two other highly activating mutations in the FAT domain (A1459P and C1483Y) also strongly reduced the mTOR-Deptor interaction (Supplementary Figure 4A). While these results suggest a possible mechanism of action for a subset of activating mTOR mutations, they do not preclude other mechanism by which MTOR mutations may impact mTORC1 signaling, such as by increasing the activity of the mTOR kinase domain.  Figure 3 Figure 3 mTOR mutants bind less Deptor and cells expressing the mTOR S2215Y mutation are resistant to nutrient deprivation MTOR mutations do not affect mTORC1 sensitivity to mTOR inhibitors but can affect the pathway response to nutrient deprivation  We next considered the possibility that the mTORC1-activating MTOR mutants have altered sensitivity to established mTOR inhibitors. Engineered mutations in the FRB domain of mTOR, which binds the FKBP12-rapamycin complex, confer marked rapamycin resistance to mTOR (25). To test whether mTOR mutation alters pathway inhibition by rapamycin or Torin1 (an investigational ATP-competitive mTOR inhibitor), we used HEK-293 cells with an integrated FLP recombination site (TREX cells) to stably express WT or several different mutants of mTOR (A1459P, C1483Y, E1799K, F1888I, L2209V, S2215Y, L2431P, I2500F, and R2505P), as the mTOR cDNA is too large to be packaged and expressed via a lentiviral delivery system (Supplementary Figure 4B). Baseline phosphorylation of endogenous S6K1 was higher in TREX cells expressing the A1459P, L2209V, S2215Y, I2500F and R2505P mTOR mutants than in parental or WT-expressing cells (Figure 3B and Supplementary Figures 4C and 4D), consistent with the results obtained upon transient expression of these mutants (Figures 2A and 2D, and Supplementary Figure 3D). Importantly, mTORC1 activity in none of the TREX cells was resistant to rapamycin, Torin1, MLN0128 (an mTOR ATP-competitive inhibitor), GDC0980 (a dual PI3K/mTOR ATP-competitive inhibitor), (Figure 3B and Supplementary Figures 4C and 4D). Thus, on a molecular level, while cells with mTOR mutations may display high levels of mTORC1/2 activity, this activity is still sensitive to pharmacological mTOR inhibition.  The kinase activity of mTOR is tightly regulated by nutrient availability; when cells are starved of nutrients (specifically glucose and amino acids), they downregulate mTORC1 signaling, while retreatment of cells with these nutrients restores mTORC1-mediated signaling (26). Given this, we sought to determine whether any of the activating mTOR mutants affect the sensitivity of mTORC1 signaling to amino acid or glucose withdrawal. Indeed, S6K1 phosphorylation was highly resistant to deprivation of either nutrient in cells expressing several mutants (A1459P, S2215Y, I2500F and R2505P) (Figure 3C and Supplementary Figures 4E and 4F). This observation may be relevant in the context of developing tumors, which are often glucose starved (27, 28), where inappropriate mTORC1 activity may provide a growth advantage.  Cancer cells with hyperactivating MTOR mutations are hypersensitive to rapamycin in vitro and in vivo  To determine if cancer cells with MTOR mutations are dependent on mTORC1 activity, we evaluated the impact of rapamycin on the proliferation of set of cancer cell lines harboring WT or mutant mTOR (Figure 4A). We identified four cell lines with mTORC1-activating MTOR mutations (C1483Y in MOLT16; E1799K in HEC59 and SNU349; and S2215Y in JHUEM7) and two with MTOR mutations that have no apparent impact on mTORC1 signaling (V2006L in TUHR10TKB; and R2152C in A375) (Supplementary Figures 5A and 5B). HeLa cells were used as a negative control cell line, as they are mildly rapamycin sensitive and are wild-type for mTOR (7, 29). MCF7 and SW780 cells, which are also wild-type for mTOR, served as positive controls for rapamycin sensitivity because the MCF7 cells harbor an activating PI3K-p110α mutation (E545K) while the SW780 cells lack NPRL2, which encodes a component of the GATOR1 negative regulator of the amino acid-sensing pathway (30, 31). Importantly, only the cell lines with activating MTOR mutations, the PI3K-p110α mutant, or the NPRL2-null SW780 cells were hypersensitive to rapamycin treatment (Figure 4B). Consistent with these and published results, the growth of HeLa xenografts was partially rapamycin sensitive, while rapamycin completely halted the growth of HEC59 xenografts, which carry the hyperactivating mTOR E1799K mutation (Figure 4C) (32, 33). These results suggest that the presence of hyperactivating MTOR mutations in cancer cells may serve as biomarkers to identify tumors that are likely to respond to mTOR inhibitors.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Rapamycin inhibits the proliferation of cancer cell lines with hyperactivating MTOR mutations Go to: Discussion Early cancer genome sequencing projects led to the identification of three mutations in MTOR that were shown to activate mTORC1 signaling (3, 4). Here, we have identified an additional 33 previously unknown activating MTOR mutations (some are recurrent, others are not) (Supplementary Table 4). Mechanistically, we find that the activating mutations diminish the mTOR-Deptor interaction and interestingly, when mapped onto the recently solved crystal structure of mTOR, the mutations cluster in several distinct locations within the protein itself, suggesting that other activating mechanisms may exist (Supplementary Figure 6) (34). While the mutations do not prevent pharmacological mTOR inhibition, a subset protect against the effects of nutrient deprivation on mTORC1 signaling. Lastly, we demonstrate that cell lines with activating MTOR mutations are particularly sensitive to rapamycin in cell culture and in xenografts, likely due to mTOR pathway dependency.  The diversity of activating MTOR mutations we characterized is reminiscent of the various activating mutations in the prototypical lipid kinase PIK3CA, which encodes for the PI3K catalytic subunit p110α (35). However, unlike the activating PIK3CA mutations, which confer equal activation of PI3K-mediated signaling pathways, the diverse MTOR mutations can differentially activate mTORC1 or mTORC2, leading to either S6K1/4EBP1 or Akt1 phosphorylation, respectively. This finding is particularly relevant in a clinical setting, as patients with mTORC1 activating mutations may respond well to FDA-approved rapalogs, while patients with mTORC2 activating mutations might best be treated with ATP-competitive mTOR inhibitors, although such inhibitors are still in clinical trials. This distinction is especially relevant for patients with mTORC2 activating mutations, because rapalogs can in some cases upregulate mTORC2 signaling through modulation of an mTORC1-dependent feedback loop (36).  Rapalog-based therapies are currently approved or in clinical trials for several cancer subtypes, and some patients have had dramatic and durable responses to these therapies (37). Given that some cells with activating MTOR mutations are particularly rapamycin sensitive (Figure 4), it is possible that some of the rapalog-responsive patients had tumors with similar mutations. Indeed, it was recently found that the tumor of a bladder cancer patient with two activating MTOR mutations displayed exquisite sensitivity to rapalog-based therapy (38). Many more cancer-associated MTOR mutations will likely be identified in future studies, but functional evaluation of these mutations will be required to determine their impact on the mTOR pathway. As tumor sequencing becomes more commonplace, functional studies such as ours may aid in arriving at a more personalized treatment regimen that eventually promotes patient survival.  Go to: Methods Data acquisition and cluster analysis  All mutations in genes of the mTOR pathway were acquired from the cBIO, COSMIC, and ICGC databases or through a literature search with a data-freeze date of September 1, 2013. To identify regions of mTOR significantly enriched for somatic point mutations, we determined the probability of seeing at least the observed number of mutations in a 50 amino acid sliding window with the null hypothesis being all 463 MTOR mutations randomly occurring across the 2549 amino acid protein. Specifically, we calculated a threshold for significance of at least 15 mutations per 50 amino acids by the formula:  p=∑n=k463(463k)∗(1−502549)463−k∗(502549)k which equals 0.043 for k = at least 15 mutations per 50 amino acids.  Materials  Reagents were obtained from the following sources: antibodies to HA (clone C29F4), S6K1 (clone 49D7), phospho-T389-S6K1 (clone 108D2), and phospho-S473-Akt1 (clone D9E) from Cell Signaling Technology; antibody to GAPDH (clone GT239) from Genetex; antibodies to Deptor and Raptor, X-ray film, and PVDF membrane were from Millipore; antibody to Rictor from Bethyl; antibody to the Flag epitope (clone M2), Flag M2-coupled agarose beads, glucose and amino acid mixtures from Sigma; horseradish-peroxidase-labeled anti-mouse and anti-rabbit secondary antibodies from Santa Cruz Biotechnology; FuGENE HD and Cell Titer Glo from Promega; X-tremeGENE 9 and Complete Protease Mixture from Roche Applied Science; QuikChange II XL from Stratagene; enhanced chemiluminescence reagent and glutathione-coupled agarose beads from Thermo; 8-week-old nude mice from Taconic; rapamycin from LC Labs; MLN0128 and GDC0980 from Selleckchem; and Torin1 was synthesized in the Gray laboratory (39). cDNAs for mTOR and PI3K-p110α were from Addgene; expression vectors for HAGST-S6K1, HA-GST-Akt1, and HA-GST-Rheb1 were described previously (24, 40, 41) and Flag-14-3-3α was a generous gift from the Yaffe lab. The primers used to generate the mTOR and Rheb1 mutations were from Integrated DNA Technologies and are listed in supplemental table 5. HEK-293T-TREX cell system, 4-12% bis-tris SDS-PAGE gels, and 20x MOPS buffers were from Invitrogen.  Tissue culture and cell lines  MCF7, HELA, HEK-293T, HCT116, A375 and SW780 cells were from ATCC; JHUEM7, MOLT16, NCIH446, SNU349, and TUHR10TKB cells were from the Broad Institute Cancer Cell Line Encyclopedia; HEK-293E cells were a generous gift of the Blenis lab; and the HEC59 cells were a generous gift of the Lippard lab. The cell lines have not been re-authenticated, although those from ATCC and the Broad were used within 6 months of resuscitation. The HEK-293T, HEK-293E, HCT116, A375, HEC59, and TUHR10TKB cells were cultured in DMEM; JHUEM7 and MOLT16 cells were cultured in RPMI; and the SW780 cells were cultured in IMDM. All media was prepared with 10% heat inactivated FBS and 1% Penicillin/Streptomycin. All cell lines were maintained at 37°C, 5% CO2.  Site-directed mutagenesis, cloning, and TREX cell line generation  All MTOR and RHEB point mutations were generated in the parental vectors using site-directed mutagenesis with the QuikChange II XL kit according to the manufacturer’s protocol. Primer sequences are listed in Supplementary Table 5. Point mutations were verified using Sanger sequencing as conducted by Eton Biosciences. The HA-GST-4EBP1 reporter vector was generated by synthesizing a gBlock from IDT encoding for 4EBP1 and cloning it into the pRK5-HA-GST vector using SalI and NotI restriction digestion followed by ligation. WT and mutant mTOR cDNAs were subcloned directly from the pcDNA3 vector into the pcDNA5/FRT/TO vector using single site NotI restriction digestion followed by ligation. Flag-mTOR-expressing TREX cells were generated according to the manufacturer's protocol.  Cell treatments, lysis, and immunoprecipitations  For S6K1 and Akt1 co-transfection assays, 3×105 HEK-293T or HEK-293E cells per well were seeded into 6-well tissue culture plates, transfected 24 hours later with 2 μg of mTOR-encoding plasmid and 1 ng of S6K1- or Akt1-encoding plasmid using X-tremeGENE 9 or FuGENE HD, followed by whole cell lysis 48 hours after transfection in NP-40 lysis buffer (50 mM Tris-HCl at pH 7.5, 150 mM NaCl, 1% NP-40 substitute, 1 mM EDTA at pH8.0, 50 mM NaF, 10 mM Na-pyrophosphate, 15 mM Na3VO4, 100 mM β-glycerophosphate, and 1 tablet of protease inhibitor per 50 mL of buffer). 200-400 μg of whole cell lysates were mixed with 5x SDS-sample buffer to a final concentration of 1-2 μg/μL, boiled for 5 minutes, and then used directly for immunoblotting or frozen at −20°C. For glutathione pull down assays, 2×106 HEK-293T cells were seeded onto 10 cm tissue culture plates, transfected 24 hours later with 10 μg of mTOR-encoding plasmid and 2 ng of S6K1-encoding plasmid using X-tremeGENE 9, and lysed 48-72 hours after transfection in NP-40 lysis buffer. 2-3 mg of the resultant whole-cell lysates were incubated with 30 μL of pre-washed glutathione-coupled agarose beads in a 1 mL volume, which were rotated at 4°C for two hours, spun at 2,500 RCF for one minute, washed in 500 μL lysis buffer three times, and the beads directly boiled in 50 μL of 2x SDS-sample buffer. For mTOR immunoprecipitations, the cells were treated as with the glutathione pulldown, except they were lysed/washed in CHAPS buffer (50 mM HEPES at pH 7.4, 150 mM NaCl, 0.4% CHAPS, 50 mM NaF, 10 mM Na-pyrophosphate, 100 mM β-glycerophosphate, and 1 tablet of protease inhibitor per 50 mL of buffer) and incubated with Flag-M2-coupled agarose beads.  Immunoblotting  10-50 μg of whole cell lysates, 10-30 μL of glutathione pulldown samples, or 10-30 μL of Flag-M2 immunoprecipitates were loaded into lanes of 4-12% bis-tris SDS-PAGE gels, run at 120 volts for 2 hours in 1x MOPS buffer, and then transferred to 0.45 μm PVDF membrane at 60 volts for 2 hours in 1x transfer buffer (100 mM CAPS, 123 mM NaOH, 10% Ethanol). The membranes were then immunoblotted for the indicated proteins. All primary antibodies were diluted 1:1000 in 5% BSA W/V TBST, with the exception of GAPDH and Flag antibodies which were diluted 1:2000. All secondary antibodies were diluted 1:5000 in 5% milk W/V TBST. Densitometry was performed using ImageJ and a student's T test was used to determine statistical significance.  Rapamycin, Torin1, MLN0128, GDC0980, and nutrient starvation/re-stimulation treatments  For the mTOR inhibitor experiments, 3×105 TREX cells per well were seeded into 6-well plates, grown for one day, treated with 100 nM rapamycin, 250 nM Torin1, 250 nM MLN0128, 250 nM GDC0980, or DMSO for 60 minutes. The cells were then lysed as above. For the nutrient deprivation experiments, 3×105 TREX cells per well were seeded into 6-well plates, grown for one day, rinsed briefly in 1x amino acid- or glucose-free RPMI, incubated in 1x amino acid- or glucose-free RPMI for 60 minutes, and then stimulated with free amino acids or glucose to the levels in complete RPMI for 15 minutes.  In vitro proliferation assays  Six replicates each of 800-1200 cells were seeded into 96-well plates, treated with 8 doses of rapamycin 24 hours later, and assayed for ATP content using Cell Titer Glo 96 hours following rapamycin treatment according to the manufacturer's protocol.  In vivo xenograft assays  3×106 cells per injection site were implanted subcutaneously into the right and left flanks of nude mice. Once tumors were palpable in all animals (>50 mm3 volume by caliper measurements), mice were assigned randomly into rapamycin treated or untreated groups and caliper measurements were taken every 3-4 days until tumor burden approached the limits set by institutional guidelines. Tumor volume was assessed according to the formula (0.5)(W)(W)(L), and a student's T test was used to determine the p-values. Rapamycin (4 mg/kg) or vehicle was delivered by daily IP injection, 100 mL per injection. All experiments involving mice were carried out with approval from the Committee for Animal Care at MIT and under supervision of the Department of Comparative Medicine at MIT.   Significance  We report that a diverse set of cancer-associated MTOR mutations confer increased mTORC1/2 pathway activity and that cells harboring these mutations are highly sensitive to rapamycin in culture and in vivo. These findings are clinically relevant as the MTOR mutations characterized herein may serve as biomarkers for predicting tumor responses to mTOR inhibitors.  
1898||Genes encoding components of the PI3K-Akt-mTOR signaling axis are frequently mutated in cancer, but few mutations have been characterized in MTOR, the gene for the mTOR kinase. Using publicly available tumor genome sequencing data, we generated a comprehensive catalog of mTOR pathway mutations in cancer, identifying 33 MTOR mutations that confer pathway hyperactivation. The mutations cluster in six distinct regions in the C-terminal half of mTOR and occur in multiple cancer types, with one cluster particularly prominent in kidney cancer. The activating mutations do not affect mTOR complex assembly, but a subset reduces binding to the mTOR inhibitor Deptor. mTORC1 signaling in cells expressing various activating mutations remains sensitive to pharmacological mTOR inhibition, but is partially resistant to nutrient deprivation. Lastly, cancer cell lines with hyperactivating MTOR mutations display heightened sensitivity to rapamycin both in culture and as in vivo xenografts, suggesting that such mutations confer mTOR pathway dependency.  Keywords: personalized, mTOR, mutations, biomarker, deptor Go to: Introduction In mammals, the PI3K-Akt-mTOR pathway regulates cell size, mRNA translation, autophagy and many metabolic processes, including lipid synthesis (1). A variety of upstream regulators control the activity of the serine/threonine protein kinase mTOR and many of these are deregulated in cancer, resulting in pathway hyperactivation. Such activation occurs most commonly through loss-of-function mutations in tumor suppressors, such as phosphatase and tensin homolog (PTEN), tuberous sclerosis 1/2 (TSC1/2), neurofibromin 1/2 (NF1/2), or oncogenic mutations in KRAS, PIK3CA, or AKT (2). However, few cancer-associated mutations have been functionally characterized in MTOR itself, with only two reports thus far describing such mutations. In the first report, the authors tested six cancer-associated MTOR mutations and observed that two (S2215Y from a colorectal sample and R2505P from a kidney sample) conferred mTOR complex 1 (mTORC1) activation (3). In the second report, the authors identified an mTORC1 activating MTOR mutation (L2431P) that was present in a portion but not the entirety of a primary kidney tumor (4). Although these initial reports establish that activating MTOR mutations do arise in cancer, they were based upon limited sample sets that do not reflect the diverse subtypes of cancer. More recently, cancer genome sequencing projects, such as The Cancer Genome Atlas (TCGA) and the Cancer Cell Line Encyclopedia (CCLE), have identified a vast number of somatic mutations in thousands of tumors from more than 40 cancer subtypes (5-7).  Using publicly available databases of cancer genome sequence data, we cataloged all mutations in mTOR pathway components. We annotated over 400 samples with missense mutations in the MTOR gene from dozens of cancer subtypes, most of which lie within six clusters in the part of the gene that encodes the C-terminal portion of mTOR. Furthermore, through functional analyses, we identify 33 novel mTOR pathway-activating mutations, some of which affect the capacity of mTOR to interact with its partner proteins. None of the activating mutations impact the sensitivity of mTORC1 activity in cells to mTOR inhibitors but a subset confer mTORC1 signaling resistance to nutrient deprivation. Importantly, cancer cells that naturally express a subset of the mutations are hypersensitive to the mTOR inhibitor rapamycin. These findings may have translational relevance as rapamycin analogs (rapalogs) are clinically approved for the treatment of cancer, and several ATP-competitive mTOR kinase inhibitors are in development (8). As tumor biopsies are increasingly subjected to whole exome sequencing, the hyperactivating MTOR mutations we characterize may serve as biomarkers in predicting cancer response to mTOR-targeting drugs.  Go to: Results Catalog of recurring mutations in genes encoding mTOR pathway components  To generate a comprehensive catalog of all cancer-associated missense mutations in canonical genes of the mTOR pathway, we analyzed partial genome sequencing data from the TCGA, CCLE, International Cancer Genome Consortium (ICGC) and Catalogue of Somatic Mutations in Cancer (COSMIC) databases (5-7, 9, 10). This analysis revealed that almost every gene in the mTOR pathway harbored somatic point mutations (Supplementary Table 1). To enrich for mutations that are more likely to affect pathway function, only mutations that alter the same codon more than once were counted. When normalized for gene length, this analysis revealed that MTOR contained the highest percentage of recurring mutations, and thus we focused most of our attention on these mutations (Supplementary Figure 1). Collectively, through data mining and a literature search, we curated over 400 samples with non-synonymous MTOR point mutations (Figure 1B and Supplementary Table 2) (11-17). While the majority of these mutations are represented by only one sample in our database, approximately 40% are recurrent, most of which have not been previously described. Additionally, the mutations cluster in six distinct regions of mTOR centered on highly recurrent mutations that alter amino acids C1483, E1799, T1977, S2215, L2427 and R2505 (Figure 1C). The presence of these clusters suggests that there is a selective advantage to acquiring mutations in certain regions of the mTOR protein. Furthermore, these mutations are present in multiple cancer subtypes, with the highest number in colorectal, endometrial, and lung cancers, although these cancer subtypes are also considered to have the highest mutation rates (Figures 1D and 1E) (18). Interestingly, a random mutagenesis screen in the S. pombe mTOR homolog (tor2) identified activating mutations in homologous amino acid positions to many of those we find in MTOR to be recurrently mutated in cancer (19) (Supplementary Table 3).  Figure 1 Figure 1 Cancer-associated MTOR mutations mTORC1/2 activating mutations in MTOR  The prevalence of the recurrent mutations, their clustering, and correlation with activating tor2 mutations strongly suggested that the MTOR mutations impact mTOR pathway activity. To test this possibility, wild-type (WT) or ten different mutants of mTOR (L1460P, C1483F, E1799K, F1888L, T1977R, V2006I, S2215Y, I2500F, R2505P, and D2512H) were expressed in cells and phosphorylation of the mTORC1/2 substrates S6K1, 4EBP1, or Akt1 examined (Figures 2A, 2B, and 2C). All the mTOR mutants conferred varying degrees of pathway activation, and, interestingly, a few displayed some substrate preference (L1460P, C1483F, S2215Y, and R2505P towards S6K1/4EBP1 or V2006I towards Akt1), implying that these mutations have greater effects on mTORC1 or mTORC2. Thus, while three pathway activating MTOR mutations have previously been identified (3, 4), our initial analyses uncovered an additional eight recurrent MTOR mutations which activate mTORC1 and/or mTORC2.  Figure 2 Figure 2 mTORC1 and mTORC2 activating mutations in MTOR and RHEB It is well established that two activating mutations (E545K and H1047R) within the phosphatidylinositol-4,5-bisphosphate 3-kinase, catalytic subunit alpha (PI3K-p110α), encoded by the PIK3CA gene, can lead to mTOR pathway activation (20). To determine the degree of mTOR pathway activation conferred by mTOR mutation, S6K1 phosphorylation from cells expressing WT or S2215Y mTOR was compared to cells expressing WT or mutant PI3K-p110α (Supplementary Figures 2A and 2B). This revealed that while expression of only mutant mTOR conferred mTORC1 activation, expression of either WT or mutant PI3K-p110α induced mTORC1 activity.  Non-recurrent MTOR mutations that activate mTORC1 signaling  We next examined in more detail the nature of the activating MTOR mutations, and observed that while some codons are mutated to only one other residue (e.g. E1799K), others are mutated to several different amino acids (e.g. S2215F/P/T/Y). This is reminiscent of the diverse amino acids to which the G12 residue of KRAS is mutated in cancers (21). We expressed 20 such MTOR mutations and found that many (C1483R/W/Y, F1888I, T1977K, S2215F/P, I2500M), but not all (A41P/S/T, F1888V, T1977S, V2006L, S2215T, R2505Q/*, D2512G/Y), led to increased S6K1 phosphorylation (Supplementary Figures 3 and 5, and data not shown). Given that most of these activating mutations are found only once in our dataset implies that other non-recurrent mutations may also activate mTORC1 signaling. To identify other such mutations, we turned our attention to the mutational clusters identified in Figure 1, and observed that while most are represented by several tissue types, those in the C1483 cluster are particularly prevalent in kidney cancer (Figure 1E and Supplementary Figure 3D). Interestingly, two recent cancer genome sequencing efforts reported that kidney cancers have an increased percentage of mutations in mTOR pathway genes, but the functional consequences of these mutations were not evaluated (13, 22). Expression of the ten kidney cancer-associated MTOR mutations from the C1483 cluster revealed that in addition to the previously evaluated L1460P and C1483F/Y mutants (Figure 1B and Supplemental Figure 2), three non-recurrent mutants (L1433S, A1459P, and E1519T) also induced mTORC1 pathway activity (Figure 2D). Similarly, expression of eight non-recurrent mutations from the S2215 cluster (N2206S, L2209V, A2210P, L2216P, R2217W, L2220F, Q2223K, and A2226S) activated mTORC1 signaling as measured by S6K1 phosphorylation, with the L2209V mutant conferring higher activation than even S2215Y (Supplementary Figure 3E). Lastly, other than the S2215Y and R2505P mutations, the only other cancer-associated MTOR mutation previously characterized is L2431P from a kidney cancer patient (4). Expression of mTOR containing this non-recurrent mutation caused mTORC1 activation that was much weaker than that caused by expression of the S2215Y mutant (Supplementary Figure 3F). Collectively, these results suggest that while most non-recurrent MTOR mutations found in cancer are part of the mutational “noise”, there exists a diverse set of MTOR mutations that can drive mTORC1 pathway activity. Likely, as more cancer genomes are sequenced, the activating non-recurrent mutations we identified will prove to be recurrent.  Recurrent mutations in RHEB activate mTORC1  We also observed that other mTOR pathway genes such as Raptor, Rictor, and Rheb1 harbored recurrent mutations (Supplemental Table 1). Expression of Rheb1 Y35N/C/H and to a lesser degree E139K increased phosphorylation of endogenous S6K1 more than that of WT Rheb1 (Figure 2E), while recurrent mutations in Raptor (R788C) or Rictor (S1101L) failed to induce any mTORC1 or mTORC2 activity (data not shown). In support of the relevance of these mutations to cancer, RHEB was recently highlighted as a novel cancer gene due to the presence of the Y35N mutation (23). Thus, cancer associated mutations in either MTOR or RHEB can induce mTORC1 activity; whether this is true of other mTOR pathway genes remains to be determined.  mTORC1/2 hyperactivating mutants bind less Deptor  One potential mechanism through which the mutations in mTOR (Figure 2) might increase S6K1/Akt1 phosphorylation is by altering mTORC1 or mTORC2 assembly. Alternatively or in addition, the mTOR mutations may diminish the binding of mTOR to its endogenous inhibitor Deptor, which binds to the FAT domain of mTOR (24). To test these possibilities, the interactions of exogenously expressed WT or mutant mTORs with endogenous Raptor, Rictor, and Deptor were measured. All mutant mTOR proteins bound equally well to Raptor and Rictor, suggesting that the mutations do not affect formation of either mTOR complex (Figure 3A). In contrast, Deptor binding to the immunoprecipitated mTOR proteins was reduced in cells expressing the mTOR mutants as compared to WT mTOR (Figure 3A). Given that increased mTOR pathway activity correlates with a reduction in the mTOR-Deptor interaction (24), it is likely that the observed decrease in Deptor binding reflects the increased mTOR pathway activity caused by the MTOR mutations. However, two mTORC1 activating mutations that are in the FAT domain of mTOR, L1460P and C1483Y, bound much less Deptor than the other mutants tested (Figure 3A), suggesting that these mutations directly perturb the Deptor binding site on mTOR. Consistent with this, examination of the mutations from the C1483 cluster described in figure 2D revealed that two other highly activating mutations in the FAT domain (A1459P and C1483Y) also strongly reduced the mTOR-Deptor interaction (Supplementary Figure 4A). While these results suggest a possible mechanism of action for a subset of activating mTOR mutations, they do not preclude other mechanism by which MTOR mutations may impact mTORC1 signaling, such as by increasing the activity of the mTOR kinase domain.  Figure 3 Figure 3 mTOR mutants bind less Deptor and cells expressing the mTOR S2215Y mutation are resistant to nutrient deprivation MTOR mutations do not affect mTORC1 sensitivity to mTOR inhibitors but can affect the pathway response to nutrient deprivation  We next considered the possibility that the mTORC1-activating MTOR mutants have altered sensitivity to established mTOR inhibitors. Engineered mutations in the FRB domain of mTOR, which binds the FKBP12-rapamycin complex, confer marked rapamycin resistance to mTOR (25). To test whether mTOR mutation alters pathway inhibition by rapamycin or Torin1 (an investigational ATP-competitive mTOR inhibitor), we used HEK-293 cells with an integrated FLP recombination site (TREX cells) to stably express WT or several different mutants of mTOR (A1459P, C1483Y, E1799K, F1888I, L2209V, S2215Y, L2431P, I2500F, and R2505P), as the mTOR cDNA is too large to be packaged and expressed via a lentiviral delivery system (Supplementary Figure 4B). Baseline phosphorylation of endogenous S6K1 was higher in TREX cells expressing the A1459P, L2209V, S2215Y, I2500F and R2505P mTOR mutants than in parental or WT-expressing cells (Figure 3B and Supplementary Figures 4C and 4D), consistent with the results obtained upon transient expression of these mutants (Figures 2A and 2D, and Supplementary Figure 3D). Importantly, mTORC1 activity in none of the TREX cells was resistant to rapamycin, Torin1, MLN0128 (an mTOR ATP-competitive inhibitor), GDC0980 (a dual PI3K/mTOR ATP-competitive inhibitor), (Figure 3B and Supplementary Figures 4C and 4D). Thus, on a molecular level, while cells with mTOR mutations may display high levels of mTORC1/2 activity, this activity is still sensitive to pharmacological mTOR inhibition.  The kinase activity of mTOR is tightly regulated by nutrient availability; when cells are starved of nutrients (specifically glucose and amino acids), they downregulate mTORC1 signaling, while retreatment of cells with these nutrients restores mTORC1-mediated signaling (26). Given this, we sought to determine whether any of the activating mTOR mutants affect the sensitivity of mTORC1 signaling to amino acid or glucose withdrawal. Indeed, S6K1 phosphorylation was highly resistant to deprivation of either nutrient in cells expressing several mutants (A1459P, S2215Y, I2500F and R2505P) (Figure 3C and Supplementary Figures 4E and 4F). This observation may be relevant in the context of developing tumors, which are often glucose starved (27, 28), where inappropriate mTORC1 activity may provide a growth advantage.  Cancer cells with hyperactivating MTOR mutations are hypersensitive to rapamycin in vitro and in vivo  To determine if cancer cells with MTOR mutations are dependent on mTORC1 activity, we evaluated the impact of rapamycin on the proliferation of set of cancer cell lines harboring WT or mutant mTOR (Figure 4A). We identified four cell lines with mTORC1-activating MTOR mutations (C1483Y in MOLT16; E1799K in HEC59 and SNU349; and S2215Y in JHUEM7) and two with MTOR mutations that have no apparent impact on mTORC1 signaling (V2006L in TUHR10TKB; and R2152C in A375) (Supplementary Figures 5A and 5B). HeLa cells were used as a negative control cell line, as they are mildly rapamycin sensitive and are wild-type for mTOR (7, 29). MCF7 and SW780 cells, which are also wild-type for mTOR, served as positive controls for rapamycin sensitivity because the MCF7 cells harbor an activating PI3K-p110α mutation (E545K) while the SW780 cells lack NPRL2, which encodes a component of the GATOR1 negative regulator of the amino acid-sensing pathway (30, 31). Importantly, only the cell lines with activating MTOR mutations, the PI3K-p110α mutant, or the NPRL2-null SW780 cells were hypersensitive to rapamycin treatment (Figure 4B). Consistent with these and published results, the growth of HeLa xenografts was partially rapamycin sensitive, while rapamycin completely halted the growth of HEC59 xenografts, which carry the hyperactivating mTOR E1799K mutation (Figure 4C) (32, 33). These results suggest that the presence of hyperactivating MTOR mutations in cancer cells may serve as biomarkers to identify tumors that are likely to respond to mTOR inhibitors.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Rapamycin inhibits the proliferation of cancer cell lines with hyperactivating MTOR mutations Go to: Discussion Early cancer genome sequencing projects led to the identification of three mutations in MTOR that were shown to activate mTORC1 signaling (3, 4). Here, we have identified an additional 33 previously unknown activating MTOR mutations (some are recurrent, others are not) (Supplementary Table 4). Mechanistically, we find that the activating mutations diminish the mTOR-Deptor interaction and interestingly, when mapped onto the recently solved crystal structure of mTOR, the mutations cluster in several distinct locations within the protein itself, suggesting that other activating mechanisms may exist (Supplementary Figure 6) (34). While the mutations do not prevent pharmacological mTOR inhibition, a subset protect against the effects of nutrient deprivation on mTORC1 signaling. Lastly, we demonstrate that cell lines with activating MTOR mutations are particularly sensitive to rapamycin in cell culture and in xenografts, likely due to mTOR pathway dependency.  The diversity of activating MTOR mutations we characterized is reminiscent of the various activating mutations in the prototypical lipid kinase PIK3CA, which encodes for the PI3K catalytic subunit p110α (35). However, unlike the activating PIK3CA mutations, which confer equal activation of PI3K-mediated signaling pathways, the diverse MTOR mutations can differentially activate mTORC1 or mTORC2, leading to either S6K1/4EBP1 or Akt1 phosphorylation, respectively. This finding is particularly relevant in a clinical setting, as patients with mTORC1 activating mutations may respond well to FDA-approved rapalogs, while patients with mTORC2 activating mutations might best be treated with ATP-competitive mTOR inhibitors, although such inhibitors are still in clinical trials. This distinction is especially relevant for patients with mTORC2 activating mutations, because rapalogs can in some cases upregulate mTORC2 signaling through modulation of an mTORC1-dependent feedback loop (36).  Rapalog-based therapies are currently approved or in clinical trials for several cancer subtypes, and some patients have had dramatic and durable responses to these therapies (37). Given that some cells with activating MTOR mutations are particularly rapamycin sensitive (Figure 4), it is possible that some of the rapalog-responsive patients had tumors with similar mutations. Indeed, it was recently found that the tumor of a bladder cancer patient with two activating MTOR mutations displayed exquisite sensitivity to rapalog-based therapy (38). Many more cancer-associated MTOR mutations will likely be identified in future studies, but functional evaluation of these mutations will be required to determine their impact on the mTOR pathway. As tumor sequencing becomes more commonplace, functional studies such as ours may aid in arriving at a more personalized treatment regimen that eventually promotes patient survival.  Go to: Methods Data acquisition and cluster analysis  All mutations in genes of the mTOR pathway were acquired from the cBIO, COSMIC, and ICGC databases or through a literature search with a data-freeze date of September 1, 2013. To identify regions of mTOR significantly enriched for somatic point mutations, we determined the probability of seeing at least the observed number of mutations in a 50 amino acid sliding window with the null hypothesis being all 463 MTOR mutations randomly occurring across the 2549 amino acid protein. Specifically, we calculated a threshold for significance of at least 15 mutations per 50 amino acids by the formula:  p=∑n=k463(463k)∗(1−502549)463−k∗(502549)k which equals 0.043 for k = at least 15 mutations per 50 amino acids.  Materials  Reagents were obtained from the following sources: antibodies to HA (clone C29F4), S6K1 (clone 49D7), phospho-T389-S6K1 (clone 108D2), and phospho-S473-Akt1 (clone D9E) from Cell Signaling Technology; antibody to GAPDH (clone GT239) from Genetex; antibodies to Deptor and Raptor, X-ray film, and PVDF membrane were from Millipore; antibody to Rictor from Bethyl; antibody to the Flag epitope (clone M2), Flag M2-coupled agarose beads, glucose and amino acid mixtures from Sigma; horseradish-peroxidase-labeled anti-mouse and anti-rabbit secondary antibodies from Santa Cruz Biotechnology; FuGENE HD and Cell Titer Glo from Promega; X-tremeGENE 9 and Complete Protease Mixture from Roche Applied Science; QuikChange II XL from Stratagene; enhanced chemiluminescence reagent and glutathione-coupled agarose beads from Thermo; 8-week-old nude mice from Taconic; rapamycin from LC Labs; MLN0128 and GDC0980 from Selleckchem; and Torin1 was synthesized in the Gray laboratory (39). cDNAs for mTOR and PI3K-p110α were from Addgene; expression vectors for HAGST-S6K1, HA-GST-Akt1, and HA-GST-Rheb1 were described previously (24, 40, 41) and Flag-14-3-3α was a generous gift from the Yaffe lab. The primers used to generate the mTOR and Rheb1 mutations were from Integrated DNA Technologies and are listed in supplemental table 5. HEK-293T-TREX cell system, 4-12% bis-tris SDS-PAGE gels, and 20x MOPS buffers were from Invitrogen.  Tissue culture and cell lines  MCF7, HELA, HEK-293T, HCT116, A375 and SW780 cells were from ATCC; JHUEM7, MOLT16, NCIH446, SNU349, and TUHR10TKB cells were from the Broad Institute Cancer Cell Line Encyclopedia; HEK-293E cells were a generous gift of the Blenis lab; and the HEC59 cells were a generous gift of the Lippard lab. The cell lines have not been re-authenticated, although those from ATCC and the Broad were used within 6 months of resuscitation. The HEK-293T, HEK-293E, HCT116, A375, HEC59, and TUHR10TKB cells were cultured in DMEM; JHUEM7 and MOLT16 cells were cultured in RPMI; and the SW780 cells were cultured in IMDM. All media was prepared with 10% heat inactivated FBS and 1% Penicillin/Streptomycin. All cell lines were maintained at 37°C, 5% CO2.  Site-directed mutagenesis, cloning, and TREX cell line generation  All MTOR and RHEB point mutations were generated in the parental vectors using site-directed mutagenesis with the QuikChange II XL kit according to the manufacturer’s protocol. Primer sequences are listed in Supplementary Table 5. Point mutations were verified using Sanger sequencing as conducted by Eton Biosciences. The HA-GST-4EBP1 reporter vector was generated by synthesizing a gBlock from IDT encoding for 4EBP1 and cloning it into the pRK5-HA-GST vector using SalI and NotI restriction digestion followed by ligation. WT and mutant mTOR cDNAs were subcloned directly from the pcDNA3 vector into the pcDNA5/FRT/TO vector using single site NotI restriction digestion followed by ligation. Flag-mTOR-expressing TREX cells were generated according to the manufacturer's protocol.  Cell treatments, lysis, and immunoprecipitations  For S6K1 and Akt1 co-transfection assays, 3×105 HEK-293T or HEK-293E cells per well were seeded into 6-well tissue culture plates, transfected 24 hours later with 2 μg of mTOR-encoding plasmid and 1 ng of S6K1- or Akt1-encoding plasmid using X-tremeGENE 9 or FuGENE HD, followed by whole cell lysis 48 hours after transfection in NP-40 lysis buffer (50 mM Tris-HCl at pH 7.5, 150 mM NaCl, 1% NP-40 substitute, 1 mM EDTA at pH8.0, 50 mM NaF, 10 mM Na-pyrophosphate, 15 mM Na3VO4, 100 mM β-glycerophosphate, and 1 tablet of protease inhibitor per 50 mL of buffer). 200-400 μg of whole cell lysates were mixed with 5x SDS-sample buffer to a final concentration of 1-2 μg/μL, boiled for 5 minutes, and then used directly for immunoblotting or frozen at −20°C. For glutathione pull down assays, 2×106 HEK-293T cells were seeded onto 10 cm tissue culture plates, transfected 24 hours later with 10 μg of mTOR-encoding plasmid and 2 ng of S6K1-encoding plasmid using X-tremeGENE 9, and lysed 48-72 hours after transfection in NP-40 lysis buffer. 2-3 mg of the resultant whole-cell lysates were incubated with 30 μL of pre-washed glutathione-coupled agarose beads in a 1 mL volume, which were rotated at 4°C for two hours, spun at 2,500 RCF for one minute, washed in 500 μL lysis buffer three times, and the beads directly boiled in 50 μL of 2x SDS-sample buffer. For mTOR immunoprecipitations, the cells were treated as with the glutathione pulldown, except they were lysed/washed in CHAPS buffer (50 mM HEPES at pH 7.4, 150 mM NaCl, 0.4% CHAPS, 50 mM NaF, 10 mM Na-pyrophosphate, 100 mM β-glycerophosphate, and 1 tablet of protease inhibitor per 50 mL of buffer) and incubated with Flag-M2-coupled agarose beads.  Immunoblotting  10-50 μg of whole cell lysates, 10-30 μL of glutathione pulldown samples, or 10-30 μL of Flag-M2 immunoprecipitates were loaded into lanes of 4-12% bis-tris SDS-PAGE gels, run at 120 volts for 2 hours in 1x MOPS buffer, and then transferred to 0.45 μm PVDF membrane at 60 volts for 2 hours in 1x transfer buffer (100 mM CAPS, 123 mM NaOH, 10% Ethanol). The membranes were then immunoblotted for the indicated proteins. All primary antibodies were diluted 1:1000 in 5% BSA W/V TBST, with the exception of GAPDH and Flag antibodies which were diluted 1:2000. All secondary antibodies were diluted 1:5000 in 5% milk W/V TBST. Densitometry was performed using ImageJ and a student's T test was used to determine statistical significance.  Rapamycin, Torin1, MLN0128, GDC0980, and nutrient starvation/re-stimulation treatments  For the mTOR inhibitor experiments, 3×105 TREX cells per well were seeded into 6-well plates, grown for one day, treated with 100 nM rapamycin, 250 nM Torin1, 250 nM MLN0128, 250 nM GDC0980, or DMSO for 60 minutes. The cells were then lysed as above. For the nutrient deprivation experiments, 3×105 TREX cells per well were seeded into 6-well plates, grown for one day, rinsed briefly in 1x amino acid- or glucose-free RPMI, incubated in 1x amino acid- or glucose-free RPMI for 60 minutes, and then stimulated with free amino acids or glucose to the levels in complete RPMI for 15 minutes.  In vitro proliferation assays  Six replicates each of 800-1200 cells were seeded into 96-well plates, treated with 8 doses of rapamycin 24 hours later, and assayed for ATP content using Cell Titer Glo 96 hours following rapamycin treatment according to the manufacturer's protocol.  In vivo xenograft assays  3×106 cells per injection site were implanted subcutaneously into the right and left flanks of nude mice. Once tumors were palpable in all animals (>50 mm3 volume by caliper measurements), mice were assigned randomly into rapamycin treated or untreated groups and caliper measurements were taken every 3-4 days until tumor burden approached the limits set by institutional guidelines. Tumor volume was assessed according to the formula (0.5)(W)(W)(L), and a student's T test was used to determine the p-values. Rapamycin (4 mg/kg) or vehicle was delivered by daily IP injection, 100 mL per injection. All experiments involving mice were carried out with approval from the Committee for Animal Care at MIT and under supervision of the Department of Comparative Medicine at MIT.   Significance  We report that a diverse set of cancer-associated MTOR mutations confer increased mTORC1/2 pathway activity and that cells harboring these mutations are highly sensitive to rapamycin in culture and in vivo. These findings are clinically relevant as the MTOR mutations characterized herein may serve as biomarkers for predicting tumor responses to mTOR inhibitors.  
1959|| Abstract Nucleoporins (NUPs) are essential components of the nuclear pore complex (NPC).1 Only few diseases have been attributed to NPC dysfunction.2-4 Steroid resistant nephrotic syndrome (SRNS), a frequent cause of chronic kidney disease, is caused by dysfunction of glomerular podocytes.5 Here we identify in 8 families with SRNS mutations of NUP93, its interaction partner NUP205, or exportin5 (XPO5) as a hitherto unrecognized monogenic cause of SRNS. NUP93 mutations caused disrupted NPC assembly. NUP93 knockdown reduced the presence of NUP205 in the NPC and, reciprocally, a NUP205 mutation abrogated NUP93 interaction. We demonstrate that NUP93 and XPO5 interact with the signaling protein SMAD4, and that NUP93 mutations abrogated interaction with SMAD4. Significantly, NUP93 mutations interfered with BMP7-induced SMAD transcriptional reporter activity. We hereby demonstrate that mutations of NUPs cause a distinct renal disease, and reveal SMAD signaling as a novel disease mechanism of SRNS, opening a potential new avenue for treatment.  Go to: Results Steroid-resistant nephrotic syndrome (SRNS) is a disease of the renal glomerular filter. It constitutes the second most frequent cause of end-stage kidney disease (ESKD) in the first 3 decades of life.6 Its renal histologic correlate is focal segmental glomerulosclerosis (FSGS), which invariably causes loss of renal function within a few years of onset requiring dialysis treatment or renal transplantation for survival. Over 30 monogenic genes lead to podocyte dysfunction if mutated, which revealed these glomerular epithelial cells as the critical site of SRNS.5,7 Disease gene identification also implicated multiple signaling pathways in the pathogenesis of SRNS.8-10 We recently demonstrated in a large cohort of 1,780 families with SRNS that in about 70% of cases a causative gene is unknown.11  To identify additional genes that cause SRNS if mutated we performed homozygosity mapping12 and whole exome sequencing13 in 160 families with SRNS. In three families (A1671, A1626, and A2241) (Fig. 1, Table 1, Supplementary Figs. 1 and ​and2)2) we detected 2 different homozygous missense mutations of the gene NUP93 (NM_014669.4) (p.Gly591Val and p.Tyr629Cys), which encodes the nuclear pore protein 931 (Table 1, Fig. 1a, d–e). By high-throughput exon sequencing11,14,15 in a worldwide cohort of 1,800 families with SRNS we detected 3 additional families (A2403, A3256, and A1394) with compound heterozygous truncating mutations or highly conserved missense mutations of NUP93 (Table 1, Fig. 1d–e, Supplementary Fig. 2). The variants p.Gly591Val and p.Tyr629Cys apparently represent European and Turkish founder alleles, respectively (Table 1). We show that the splice site mutation (c.1537+1G>A) detected in family A1394 (Table 1, Fig. 1d) leads to aberrant splicing with in-frame skipping of exon 13 (Supplementary Fig. 1B–E). NUP93 function is known to be essential for NPC assembly in S. cerevisiae,16,17 C. elegans, and D. rerio.18  Figure 1 Figure 1 Homozygosity mapping and whole exome sequencing (WES) identify recessive mutations of NUP93, NUP205, or XPO5 in 8 families with steroid resistant nephrotic syndrome Figure 2 Figure 2 Subcellular localization of NUP93 in podocytes and NUP93 knockdown resulting in reduced podocyte migration, proliferation, and impaired resistance to oxidative stress TABLE 1 TABLE 1 Mutations in NUP93, NUP205 or XPO5 in 10 individuals from 8 families with steroid resistant nephrotic syndrome Phenotypically, all 7 individuals of 6 families with recessive NUP93 mutations had SRNS that manifested early, i.e. between 1 and 6 years of age, and caused ESKD between ages 1 and 11 years (Table 1). Renal biopsy revealed FSGS or its developmental equivalent diffuse mesangial sclerosis (DMS) in the 5 individuals in whom a biopsy was performed (Table 1, Fig. 1b–c,g–h and Supplementary Fig. 3A). In addition, there was a renal tubular phenotype with proximal tubular dilation with protein casts and interstitial cell infiltrations (Fig. 1c, Supplementary Fig. 3B). Electron microscopy revealed partial podocyte foot process effacement (Supplementary Fig. 3C). It is known that glomerular developmental defects (diffuse mesangial sclerosis, DMS) and glomerular degenerative defects (focal segmental glomerular sclerosis, FSGS) can occur on a monogenic basis due to multiple allelism.19 However, in NUP93 mutations only one family had features of DMS, whereas 4 others had FSGS, making a glomerular developmental defect unlikely. One patient showed partial response to steroids, and two patients responded partially to CSA. A partial response to therapy with alternative agents is a rare but known feature of monogenic forms of nephrotic syndrome that is otherwise steroid resistant.20 However no genotype-phenotype correlation has been detected so far in these cases.  In addition, by genetic mapping (Fig. 1f) and whole exome sequencing in two siblings of family A1733 with early onset SRNS and FSGS we identified a homozygous missense mutation of the nucleoporin NUP205 (NM_015135.2) at a highly conserved amino acid residue (p.Phe1995Ser) (Fig. 1f, Table 1, Supplementary Fig. 2). Interestingly, NUP205 is a direct protein interaction partner of NUP93 within the inner ring of the NPC.17,21 Furthermore, by genetic mapping (Fig. 1i) and whole exome sequencing we identified a homozygous missense mutation of the nuclear export protein exportin5 (XPO5) (NM_020750.2) (p.Val552Ile) in individual F1092 with onset of SRNS at 2 years (Fig. 1i, Table 1, Supplementary Fig. 2). Remarkably, XPO5 is known to play a role in nuclear export in concert with nucleoporins.22-24  Nucleoporins (NUPs) are highly conserved eukaryotic proteins that form nuclear pore complexes (NPCs), huge macromolecular assemblies in the nuclear envelope which mediate the transport of proteins, RNAs and RNP particles between cytoplasm and the nuclear interior (Supplementary Fig. 4).25,17 NUPs function by interacting with transport receptors such as exportins and importins that shuttle their cargo through NPCs (Supplementary Fig. 4). While monogenic mutations in genes encoding NPC components have only been described in three other human diseases,2-4 we here implicate three NPC associated proteins in the pathogenesis of SRNS. We find, surprisingly, that very specific recessive mutations in genes that have a critical cellular function may cause a distinct renal disease phenotype.  To determine whether the two nucleoporins, NUP93 and NUP205, and the exportin XPO5 are expressed during renal development, we performed immunofluorescence (IF) studies in sections of fetal rat kidney. We observed that at the capillary loop stage of renal glomerular development NUP93, NUP205, and XPO5 are present in developing podocytes that are positive for the podocyte nuclear marker WT1 (Supplementary Fig. 5). Interestingly, in adult rat glomeruli, XPO5 colocalized in podocytes with synaptopodin, a marker of primary and secondary podocyte foot processes, in a pattern that has been described for many other products of genes that if mutated cause SRNS (Fig. 2d).8,26,27  To elucidate the role of the nucleoporin NUP93 in the pathogenesis of SRNS, we performed in-vitro functional assays in human immortalized podocytes. First, we studied podocyte migration, a well-established surrogate phenotype that is typically altered upon loss-of-function of genes that are involved in nephrotic syndrome.8-10 We show that knockdown of NUP93 using 2 different shRNAs resulted in an impaired migratory phenotype that was rescued by transfection of wildtype mouse Nup93 (Fig. 2e). Knockdown of the nucleoporin NUP153 in which we did not find mutations in individuals with SRNS did not affect podocyte migration (Supplementary Fig. 6). Furthermore, we found that upon knockdown of NUP93 the proliferation rate of human podocytes is strongly reduced (Fig. 2f). To assess oxidative stress resistance, we challenged human podocytes with sub-lethal concentrations of H2O2 (100 μM, 250 μM, and 500 μM). While H2O2 at these doses did not affect scrambled-control cells, it induced apoptotic cell death shown by increased cleavage of caspase-3 in NUP93 knockdown cells (Fig. 2g).  To assess whether the NUP93 mutations that we identified in individuals with SRNS interfere with nuclear pore complex (NPC) localization, we performed IF microscopy of the proteins of Myc tagged NUP93 constructs in human podocytes (Fig. 3a,c). Upon overexpression, wild type or some mutant constructs of NUP93 localized to the nuclear envelope, whereas constructs representing the truncating mutation p.Lys442Asnfs*14 and the splice site mutation p.del ex13, that we detected in individuals with SRNS (A3256 and A1394, respectively), failed to properly mark the nuclear envelope (Fig. 3a,c).  Figure 3 Figure 3 NUP93 mutations interfere with nuclear pore complex (NPC) assembly, and a NUP205 mutation affects NUP93-NUP205 interaction To further evaluate interference of mutations with nuclear envelope integrity, we performed a depletion-addback assay in Xenopus laevis egg extracts. In this assay formation of nuclear envelopes, indicated by a smooth membrane staining with DiIC18 as well as NPC formation (indicated by the antibody AB414) around sperm chromatin (Fig. 3b, upper and second rows), was faithfully reconstituted.28 Depletion of Nup93 abrogated nuclear envelope and pore formation,29,30 which was restored upon re-addition of wildtype protein or most mutants found in individuals with SRNS, but not by mutants del ex13, Arg388Trp, or Lys442Asnfs*14 (Fig. 3b,d). NUP93 tightly interacts with NUP20531 and, consistently, shRNA knockdown of NUP93 in podocytes caused depletion of NUP205 (Fig. 3e). Furthermore, we found that GFP tagged NUP205 interacts with endogenous NUP93 upon overexpression in HEK293 cells (Fig. 3f). The mutant NUP205 allele identified in family A1733 with SRNS, p.Phe1995Ser, abrogated this interaction (Fig. 3f). However, NUP93 mutations identified in families with SRNS did not abrogate the interaction with NUP205 (Supplementary Fig. 7).  It was recently shown that drosophila NUP93 and NUP205, apart from their known roles as scaffold nucleoporins in NPC assembly, also have cargo import functions and are essential for nuclear import of phosphorylated/activated SMADs (Supplementary Fig. 4).32 Interestingly, loss of function of other nucleoporins does not affect SMAD signaling.32 Following these previous findings, we performed further studies to define the role of NUP93 in SMAD signaling. Using immunofluorescence in human podocytes, we demonstrate that upon stimulation with BMP7 NUP93 colocalizes with the nuclear importer importin7 to a nuclear rim structure (Fig. 2a). Interestingly, both proteins also showed strong colocalization during different stages of renal development (Fig. 2b–c). Because of the described roles of NUP93 in SMAD signaling in drosophila, we explored whether NUP93 interacts with SMAD.32 We performed coimmunoprecipitation studies in HEK293 cells (Fig. 4). We demonstrate that SMAD4 interacts with endogenous NUP93 when overexpressed in HEK293 cells, which we confirmed for endogenous SMAD4 (Fig. 4a–b). Furthermore, we show that upon BMP7 stimulation NUP93 interacts with the phosphorylated/activated form of endogenous SMAD1/5 (Fig. 4d). Interestingly, the 3 NUP93 mutations p.Lys442Asnfs*14, p.Gly591Val, and p.Tyr629Cys that we found in patients with SRNS (Table 1, Fig. 1d–e) abrogated this interaction (Fig. 4c), likely reflecting their pathogenicity (Table 1). The abrogation of interaction was confirmed reciprocally (Supplementary Fig. 8).  Figure 4 Figure 4 NUP93, importin7, and exportin5 (XPO5) interact with SMAD proteins, and NUP93 mutations from individuals with SRNS abrogate the interaction with SMAD4 and importin7 upon coIP in HEK293 cells Because of the suggested role of the karyopherin importin-7 (Msk) in NUP93 mediated nuclear import of SMAD,32,33 we explored whether the NUP93 mutations that we identified in individuals with SRNS affect BMP7 dependent SMAD signaling. We found that NUP93 and SMAD4 both interact with endogenous importin7 in humans (Fig. 4e–f). The same 3 mutations (p.Lys442Asnfs*14, p.Gly591Val, p.Tyr629Cys) that disrupted interaction with SMAD4 (Fig. 4c, Table 1, Fig. 1d–e) also abrogated interaction of NUP93 with importin7 (Fig. 4g). In addition, we found that NUP93 colocalizes importin7 in different stages of glomerular development and in podocyte precursor cells at the early capillary loop stage (Fig. 2b–c).  BMP7 plays a crucial role in renal development.34 Furthermore, growing experimental evidence suggests that BMP7 is an important mediator of renal response to injury, and has protective effects in multiple animal models of acute and chronic renal injury.35 BMP7 balances the profibrotic effects of TGF-β, and it has been shown that loss of SMAD4 promotes renal fibrosis and inflammation.36 In addition, BMP7 inhibits apoptotis and promotes podocyte survival in experimental models of diabetic nephropathy.37 Since, podocytes and collecting duct cells were shown to be the primary target cells of BMP7 in the kidney,38 we explored whether the NUP93 mutations that we identified in individuals with SRNS affect BMP7 dependent SMAD signaling. We demonstrate that knockdown of NUP93 in human podocytes using two different shRNAs disrupts BMP7 dependent activation of SMAD signaling as demonstrated by reduced nuclear accumulation of SMAD4 after BMP7 stimulation (Fig. 5a). An equivalent result was seen when using HEK 293 (Supplementary Fig. 9). Consistently, expression of mouse wildtype Nup93 but none of the 5 mutants detected in individuals with SRNS rescued the BMP7 dependent nuclear translocation of endogenous SMAD4 in knockdown cells (Fig. 5b, Supplementary Fig. 9B).  Figure 5 Figure 5 Knockdown of NUP93 interferes with BMP7-induced activation of SMAD signaling Upon shRNA knockdown of NUP93 in HEK293 cells BMP7 treatment failed to induce SMAD dependent reporter activity when compared to scrambled control (Fig. 5c). Reciprocally, whereas transfection of wild type full-length mouse Nup93 (under NUP93 knockdown) restored BMP7 dependent SMAD reporter activity, none of the constructs reflecting the 5 mutations detected in individuals with SRNS rescued SMAD4 dependent transcription (Fig. 5c). Furthermore, upon treatment of human podocytes with BMP7, importin-7 localizes to a nuclear rim structure in control cells (Fig. 2a, Fig. 5d). Knockdown of NUP93 by two different shRNAs inhibited this rim formation (Fig. 5d). Knockdown of the nucleoporin NUP188 in which we did not find mutations in individuals with SRNS did not reduce SMAD reporter activity in our assay (Supplementary Fig. 10).  We demonstrated loss of function for all NUP93 mutations detected in individuals with SRNS. NUP93 mutations either disrupt NPC integrity (Fig. 3a–c) (mutations p.del ex13, p.Arg388Trp, and p.Lys442Asnfs*14) or abrogate the interaction of NUP93 with SMAD4 (Fig. 4c) or importin7 (Fig. 4g) (mutations p.Lys442Asnfs*14, p.Gly591Val, p.Tyr629Cys) (see middle column of Table 1). In all individuals with mutations in NUP93 there was a defect in SMAD signaling, suggesting SMAD signaling as the relevant pathogenic pathway shared by these mutations. Furthermore, we show that XPO5, which we found defective in another individual with SRNS (Fig. 1i, Table 1) also interacts with SMAD4 (Fig. 4h).  In summary, we here demonstrate that specific mutations of NUP93, NUP205, or XPO5 cause a distinct entity of SRNS and we introduce the terms “NPHS11”, “NPHS12”, and “NPHS13”, respectively. We thereby link NPC associated proteins to a new pathogenic pathway for SRNS. Furthermore, we implicate BMP7 dependent SMAD signaling as a novel disease mechanism of SRNS, thereby potentially opening new approaches towards its therapy.  Go to: Online Methods Research subjects  We obtained blood samples and pedigrees following informed consent from individuals with SRNS. Approval for human subjects research was obtained from Institutional Review Boards of the University of Michigan, and Boston Children's Hospital. The diagnosis of steroid-resistant nephrotic syndrome was based on published clinical criteria.  Linkage analysis  For genome-wide homozygosity mapping the GeneChip® Human Mapping 250k StyI Array from Affymetrix was used. Non-parametric LOD scores were calculated using a modified version of the program GENEHUNTER 2.140,41 through stepwise use of a sliding window with sets of 110 SNPs and the program ALLEGRO42 in order to identify regions of homozygosity as described12,43 using a disease allele frequency of 0.0001 and Caucasian marker allele frequencies. For graphical presentation (Fig. 1a, f, i, Suppl. Fig. 1) non-parametric lod scores (NPL) were calculated and plotted across the human genome. The x-axis shows Affymetrix 250K StyI array SNP positions on human chromosomes concatenated from p-ter (left) to q-ter (right). Genetic distance is given in cM.  Whole exome sequencing  Whole exome sequencing (WES) and variant burden analysis was performed as described previously44. In brief, genomic DNA was isolated from blood lymphocytes and subjected to exome capture using Agilent SureSelect™ human exome capture arrays (Life technologies™) followed by next generation sequencing on the HiSeq Illumina™ sequencing platform as previously described.  Mutation calling  Sequence reads were mapped against the human reference genome (NCBI build 37/hg19) using CLC Genomics Workbench (version 6.5.1) software (CLC bio). Variants with minor allele frequencies <1% in the dbSNP (Version 137) database were selected and annotated for impact on the encoded protein and for conservation of the reference base and amino acid among orthologs across phylogeny. Mutation calling was performed by geneticists/cell biologists, who had knowledge of the clinical phenotypes and pedigree structure, as well as experience with homozygosity mapping and exome evaluation.  High-throughput mutation analysis by array-based multiplex PCR and NGS  We used PCR-based 48.48 Access Array microfluidic technology (Fluidigm™) with consecutive next generation sequencing. We applied a 12-fold primer multiplexing approach allowing PCR-based amplification for 48 DNA samples simultaneously in 576 amplicons.14,15 A total of 1,800 individuals with nephrotic syndrome were analyzed, among them subset of 500 individuals with proteinuria and hematuria. After amplification of all targeted coding and splice site regions, sample-derived products were indexed with 384 different 10 bp-barcodes in a subsequent PCR. Finally, 2 × 250bp paired-end sequencing was performed on an Illumina™ MiSeq instrument. Bioinformatic analysis was conducted using CLC-Genomics-Workbench™ software. Potential mutations were confirmed by Sanger sequencing and evaluated for segregation. Primer sequences for targeted exon sequencing are provided in Suppl. Table 1.  cDNA and splice mutation  RNA of A1394-21 was purified from whole blood (purelink, Invitrogen) and cDNA was synthesized using a high fidelity RT-PCR system (Agilent Technologies). RT-PCR was performed on cDNA from A1394-21 and from healthy controls using exonic primers flanking exon 13. PCR products were Sanger sequenced and analyzed on an agarose gel to test for exon skipping (Suppl. Fig. 1).  cDNA cloning  Human NUP93 full-length cDNA was subcloned by PCR from human full-length cDNA (cDNA clone MGC: 21106 IMAGE: 4750923). Mouse NUP93 was subcloned from mouse NUP93 full-length cDNA (cDNA clone MGC: 28230, IMAGE: 3991335). Human NUP205 subcloned from human full-length cDNA (cDNA clone MGC: 168237 IMAGE: 9020614). Human XPO5 full-length was subcloned from human full-length cDNA (cDNA clone MGC: 74566 IMAGE: 5492046). Human SMAD4 full-length was subcloned from human full-length cDNA (cDNA clone MGC: 8602 IMAGE: 2961238), human SMAD2 was subcloned from human full-length cDNA (cDNA clone MGC: 34440 IMAGE: 5221801), human SMAD5 was subcloned from human full-length cDNA (cDNA clone MGC: 8960 IMAGE:3906006). Mouse Ipo7 was subcloned from mouse full-length Importin7 (cDNA clone, MGC: 175386, IMAGE: 100014508). Expression vectors were produced using LR clonase (Invitrogen®) following the manufacturer's instruction. The following expression vectors were used in this publication: pRK5-N-Myc, pCDNA6.2-N-GFP, pCDNA6.2-C-GFP, pCS-Dest2, and pSirenRetroQ. Clones reflecting the mutations identified in individuals with SRNS were introduced in the cDNA constructed using the Quick change II XL site-directed mutagenesis kit, Agilent Technologies. This technique was also applied to generate a human SMAD4 construct lacking the canonical nuclear export signal (amino acids 142-149).45  Cell lines  Experiments shown in this publication were performed in HEK293T cells and immortalized human podocytes. HEK293T cells were purchased from the ATCC biological resource center. Human immortalized podocytes were a kind gift from Moin Saleem, University of Bristol, Bristol, UK, and were cultured as previously described.46 Cell lines were tested for mycoplasma contamination on a quarterly basis.  Coimmunoprecipitation  Coimmunoprecipitation experiments were performed as described previously.47 Briefly, cell lysates were pre-cleared with protein G or A beads. Then, cell lysates were mixed with the appropriate antibodies and incubated overnight at 4°C in lysis buffer containing the complete protease inhibitor mixture. Immune complexes were collected by binding to mixed protein G or A beads and washed four times with lysis buffer prior to immunoblotting. Coimmunoprecipitation of GFP fusion proteins was performed using Chromotek-GFP-Trap® Agarose Beads, allele bioscience. Coimmunoprecipitation experiments were performed in three independent experiments, and protein-protein interactions were confirmed reciprocally.  SMAD translocation assays  Human immortalized podocytes were transfected with scrambled or shRNA against human NUP93 (see Suppl. Table 1 for targeted sequences). For rescue experiments, a second transfection with pCDNA6.2-N-GFP-MOCK, pCDNA6.2_murine Nup93 wildtype, or pCDNA6.2_murine Nup93 mutant clones was performed after 24 hrs. 60 minutes prior to the experiment cells were exposed to 100 ng/ml recombinant BMP7 (rc-BMP7, R&D systems). The knockdown efficiency, as well as effective activation of the BMP7-SMAD1/5 pathway was confirmed by immunoblotting (Fig. 3d, Suppl. Fig. 11).  SMAD reporter gene assay  The SMAD reporter assay was performed using the Cignal SMAD Reporter (luciferase) assay (Qiagen®) following the manufacturer's protocol. In brief, HEK293 cells were transfected with the Cignal SMAD reporter construct and scrambled or shRNA against human NUP93. After 24 hours cells were transfected with murine Nup93 (WT or mutants) or pCDNA6.2-N-GFP-MOCK. Eighteen hours prior to the experiment, cells were exposed to 100 ng/ml recombinant BMP7 (rc-BMP7, R&D systems). Luciferase activities were measured using Dual-Luciferase® Reporter Assay and GloMaxTM 96 microplate luminometer (Promega) according to the manufacturer's instruction. The luciferase activities were normalized to Renilla luciferase activities and protein concentration. Data points result from three independent experiments, and are presented as mean and standard deviation. P < 0.05 was considered statistically significant. For the data shown in Suppl. Fig. 10, HEK293 cells were transfected with ON-TARGETplus SMARTpool siRNA against NUP93, NUP153, and NUP188 (GE Dharmacon) at a final concentration of 100 nM using lipofectamine® RNAiMAX (Thermo Fisher) following the manufacturer's instructions. Experiments were performed 48 hrs after transfection.  Podocyte migration assay  The Podocyte migration assay was performed as previously described.8 Briefly, real-time migration assays were performed using the xCELLigence™ system (Roche Applied Science) with CIM-plate 16 according to the manufacturer's instructions. Immortalized human podocyte with shRNA mediated knockdown of NUP93 (shRNA #1 and shRNA#3) were transfected with MOCK-GFP or mouse full-length wildtype Nup93 cDNA (Nup93_FL). 36 hrs after transfection, 4 × 104 cells were seeded in serum free medium in the upper chambers of the migration plate. The lower chambers were filled with medium containing 15% FBS as chemoattractant, or with serum-free medium as control. Changes in impedance were analyzed using the RTCA software. Results were plotted as cell index (relative podocyte migration) vs. time. Each experiment was performed in triplicates, and repeated two times independently. Results are presented as mean with standard deviation.  Podocyte proliferation assay  The proliferation assay was performed using the xCELLigence system™ with E-plates 16 (Roche Applied Science) according to the manufacturer's instructions. The experiment was performed in immortalized human podocytes with shRNA mediated knockdown of NUP93 (shRNA #1 and shRNA#3). Cells were transfected with MOCK-GFP or mouse full-length wildtype Nup93 cDNA (Nup93_FL). 36 hrs after transfection, 2.5 × 104 cells were seeded in each well of the E-plate 16. Changes in impedance were analyzed using the RTCA software. Results were plotted as cell index (relative podocyte proliferation) vs. time. Each experiment was performed in triplicates, and repeated two times independently. Results are presented as mean with standard deviation. For the data shown in Suppl. Fig. 6, immortalized human podocytes were transfected with ON-TARGETplus SMARTpool siRNA against NUP93, NUP153, and NUP188 (GE Dharmacon) at a final concentration of 100 nM using lipofectamine® RNAiMAX (Thermo Fisher) following the manufacturer's instructions. Experiments were performed 48 hrs after transfection.  In-vitro experiments to assess oxidative stress resistance  To assess oxidative stress resistance in human immortalized podocytes, H2O2 was added to cell culture medium at three different doses (100 μM, 250 μM, and 500 μM) that did not induce significant apoptosis or changes in cell morphology in control cells. After 60 minutes cell were lysed and apoptosis was assessed using an antibody against cleaved caspase-3 (cell signaling, #9661) in control (scrambled shRNA) as compared to knockdown cells. The result was shown in two independent experiments.  NUP93 depletion-addback assay in Xenopus laevis eggs  Nuclear assemblies using Xenopus egg extracts immunofluorescence on in vitro assembled nuclei, generation of affinity resins, sperm heads and floated unlabeled or DiIC18-labeled membranes were carried out as described48 and analyzed on an Olympus FV1000 confocal microscope. Nup93 was depleted as in Theerthagiri et al., 2010.31 mRNA encoding human Nup93 (GenBank accession NM_014669.4) and the corresponding mutants was prepared using the mMESSAGE mMachine kit (Life Technologies) and added to extracts at a concentration of 200 ng/μl. The experiment was repeated three times independently, and 100 nuclei were counted in each experiment. Results are shown as mean and standard deviation.  Knockdown in human podocytes  ShRNA against human NUP93 was subcloned into pSIREN RetroQ for retroviral transduction using HEK293T cells. 48 hours after transduction puromycin at a final concentration of 4 ug/ml was added to the medium for selection of transduced cells. See Suppl. Table 1 for target sequences, and Fig. 3d for knockdown efficiency.  Antibodies  For immunofluorescence experiments the following primary antibodies were used: mouse anti-NUP93 (F2), sc-374400, Santa Cruz Biotechnology; mouse anti-SMAD4 (B-8), sc-7966, Santa Cruz Biotechnology; and goat anti-Importin7, NB100-1081, Novus bioscience; and anti-TRP, mAB414, Covance. Antibodies against Xenopus Nup20531 and Nup9349 have been described. Donkey anti-goat Alexa 488 and Alexa-594 conjugated secondary antibodies, and DAPI (4′,6-Diamidino-2-Phenylindole, Dihydrochloride) were obtained from Invitrogen. For immunoblotting the following primary antibodies were used: mouse anti-NUP93 (F2), sc-374400, Santa Cruz Biotechnology; mouse anti-SMAD4 (B-8), sc-7966, Santa Cruz Biotechnology; goat anti-Importin7, NB100-1081, Novus bioscience; rabbit anti-NUP205, HPA024574, Atlas antibodies, Sigma; rabbit anti-phospho-Smad1/5, #9526, cell signaling. HRP labeled secondary antibodies were purchased from Santa Cruz. See Supplementary Fig. 12 for characterization of antibodies against human NUP93 and NUP205.  Immunofluorescence and confocal microscopy in cell lines  For immunostaining human immortalized podocytes were seeded on coverglasses, and grown at permissive temperature. For overexpression studies human podocytes were transiently transfected using lipofectamine 2000® following the manufacturer's instructions. Experiments were performed 24-48 hrs after transfection. Cells were fixed and permeabilized for 10 min using 4% paraformaldehyde and 0.25%Triton-X100. After blocking, cells were incubated with primary antibody over-night at 4°C. The cells were incubated in secondary antibodies for 90 min at room-temperature, followed by 5 min. staining with 1 × DAPI/PBS. Confocal imaging was performed using Leica SP5X system with an upright DM6000 microscope and images were processed with the Leica AF software suite. Immunofluorescence experiments were repeated at least twice in independent experiments.  Immunofluorescence and confocal microscopy on rat tissues  Frozen tissue sections were permeabilized in 0.25%Triton-X100, blocked in 10% donkey serum for an hour at room temperature, and incubated in primary antibody overnight. The cells were incubated in secondary antibodies for 90 min at room-temperature, followed by 5 min. staining with 1 × DAPI/PBS. Confocal imaging was performed using Leica SP5X system with an upright DM6000 microscope and images were processed with the Leica AF software suite. 
2066||In humans, mutations in SOX9 result in a skeletal malformation syndrome, campomelic dysplasia (CD). The present study investigated two major classes of CD mutations: 1) point mutations in the high mobility group (HMG) domain and 2) truncations and frameshifts that alter the C terminus of the protein. We analyzed the effect of one novel mutation and three other point mutations in the HMG domain of SOX9 on the DNA binding and DNA bending properties of the protein. The F12L mutant HMG domain shows negligible DNA binding, the H65Y mutant shows minimal DNA binding, whereas the A19V mutant shows near wild type DNA binding and bends DNA normally. Interestingly, the P70R mutant has altered DNA binding specificity, but also bends DNA normally. The effects of the point mutations were interpreted using a molecular model of the SOX9 HMG domain. We analyzed the effects upon transcription of mutations resembling the truncation and frameshift mutations in CD patients, and found that progressive deletion of the C terminus causes progressive loss of transactivation. Maximal transactivation by SOX9 requires both the C-terminal domain rich in proline, glutamine, and serine and the adjacent domain composed entirely of proline, glutamine, and alanine. Thus, CD arises by mutations that interfere with DNA binding by SOX9 or truncate the C-terminal transactivation domain and thereby impede the ability of SOX9 to activate target genes during organ development.  In humans, mutations in SOX9 cause campomelic dysplasia (CD),1 a skeletal malformation syndrome that is often associated with XY sex reversal (1). Other tissues affected include kidney, heart, and brain, consistent with the expression pattern of Sox9 in developing mouse (2,3). There are four major classes of mutations causing CD: 1) amino acid substitutions in the HMG domain (Fig. 1 A), 2) truncations or frameshifts that alter the C terminus of SOX9 (Fig.1 B), 3) mutations at splice junctions, and 4) chromosomal translocations, of which classes 1 and 2 are investigated here. Most CD patients are heterozygous for wild type and mutant alleles of SOX9. CD appears to result from haploinsufficiency; presumably, a critical dose of SOX9 is required to switch on the appropriate genes during development. The present study reports the identification in a CD patient of a novel amino acid substitution mutation (H65Y) in the HMG domain of SOX9. We report the effects of this and three other point mutations (F12L, A19V, and P70R) on the DNA binding and DNA bending activities of the HMG domain.  Figure 1 View larger version: In this page In a new window Download as PowerPoint Slide Figure 1 A, diagram of the SOX9 HMG domain, showing amino acid substitution mutations that have been identified in patients with CD. Mutations identified in XY females are indicated below and those in XX females (F) or XY males (M) above. Mutations investigated in the present study are indicated withfilled circles. Amino acid residues are numbered from the start of the HMG domain, which extends from Asn101to Asn184 of full-length SOX9. B, diagram of the entire SOX9 open reading frame showing the different domains of the protein and the mutations that have been identified in patients with CD. Mutations identified in patients with sex reversal are indicated below and those in XX females (F) or XY males (M) above. SA, splice acceptor mutation; fs, frameshift; X, stop codon.  SOX proteins represent a large class of transcription factors related to SRY, the testis-determining factor, through their HMG domains that bind and bend DNA in a sequence-specific manner. Expression of these proteins in defined cell types at specific stages of development appears to govern cell fate decisions. SOX9 activates expression of type II and type XI collagen in vivo (4-6), consistent with a role in bone development.  SOX proteins fall within a larger group of HMG domain proteins comprising two classes: 1) those that bind DNA without sequence specificity (such as HMG1, HMGD) and 2) those that bind DNA with sequence specificity (including the TCF1/LEF1 and SOX transcription factors). An amino acid sequence alignment of the SOX9 HMG domain with those of SRY and LEF1 is shown in Fig. 2. Although the three-dimensional structure of the SOX9 HMG domain is not known, the solution structures of the HMG domains of SRY (7) and LEF1 (8), in complex with DNA, have been determined by NMR. The fold of the two HMG domains is similar. The three α-helices of the each HMG domain come together in an L-shape in which the short arm is formed by helices 1 and 2 and the long arm by helix 3 and the N-terminal strand. The concave surface of the “L” contacts the minor groove of the DNA. We have constructed a model of the SOX9 HMG domain based on the solution structure of the SRY HMG domain and have used the model to make interpretations about the effects of point mutations within the HMG domain, on DNA binding. According to the model, three of the SOX9 point mutations studied here (F12L, H65Y, and P70R) occur in residues that lie on or near the DNA binding surface of the HMG domain, and might therefore be expected to affect DNA binding. The fourth mutation (A19V) affects a residue that is not on the DNA binding surface, but might be important in maintaining the structure of the protein.  Figure 2 View larger version: In this page In a new window Download as PowerPoint Slide Figure 2 Amino acid sequence alignment of the HMG domain of SOX9 (1) with those of SRY (27) and mouse LEF1 (28). The point mutations studied here are indicated above.  The determinants of transactivation by SOX9 have not been fully defined. Many of the mutations that result in CD are truncations or frameshifts that alter the C terminus of the protein. We hypothesized that these mutations disrupt the transactivation potential of the protein and we sought to define the limits of the transactivation domain of SOX9 by deletion analysis. At the C terminus of SOX9 lies the PQS-rich domain (Fig. 1 B; residues 386–509), a domain rich in proline, serine, and glutamine, which is required for transcriptional activation (9). Preceding this is the PQA domain (residues 339–379) that consists entirely of proline, glutamine, and alanine. We have investigated the effect of truncations of the C terminus of SOX9 (similar to C-terminal deletions seen in CD patients) on the transactivation activity of SOX9 and show that both the PQS-rich and PQA domains are required for maximal transcriptional activation.  Previous Section Next Section EXPERIMENTAL PROCEDURES  Patient Reports Patient 10 is the third child of consanguineous Pakistani parents (half first cousins). One older brother died of congenital heart disease; an older sister and younger brother are both well. At birth the proband had macrocephaly, micrognathia, depressed nasal bridge, short limbs, curved femora, small patellae, bilateral talipes equinovarus, normal male genitalia, and mild thoracic kyphosis. Tracheomalacia caused severe respiratory distress and necessitated tracheostomy with ventilation from birth. Radiological features included hypoplastic scapulae, widely spaced pubic symphysis, vertical, narrow iliac bones, bowed femora, straight tibiae, long fibulae, increased acetabular angle (hips not dislocated). Cytogenetic studies showed a normal male karyotype. Hospitalization was prolonged in infancy due to respiratory problems. The tracheostomy was eventually removed at 6 years of age but a gastrostomy remains, although the patient takes most food by mouth. At age 10 years, height is minus 6.5 S.D.; there is scoliosis, but limbs are short and largely straight; the patellae are malpositioned; and calf muscles have reduced bulk. The proband walked at age 4 years. He has moderate intellectual retardation and hearing impairment. He is a social and communicative child who reads simple text, but he has limited speech and prefers to use Makaton signs. The proband’s father is phenotypically normal and has chromosome mosaicism for a clinically insignificant Y:15 rearrangement that translocates Yq heterochromatin on to 15p. The proband’s mother has proportionate short stature, mild kyphoscoliosis, and a normal female karyotype. Before the molecular basis of the proband’s campomelic dysplasia was discovered, the mother had a another pregnancy where recurrence of the condition was diagnosed by ultrasound and confirmed by radiographic examination of the fetus at 19 weeks’ gestation.  The other patients studied here have been reported elsewhere and are summarized in Table I.  View this table: In this window In a new window Table I Missense CD mutations analyzed in this study  PCR Amplification and SSCP To screen for the H65Y mutation among the family of patient 10, a portion of the SOX9 open reading frame was amplified from genomic DNA from blood lymphocytes by PCR, using primers F and G, and analyzed by SSCP as described previously (10).  Parental Haplotyping Paternity and maternity of patient 10 were confirmed by DNA profiling using 12 fluorescently labeled PCR primer pairs that amplify microsatellite markers (heterozygosity >70%) located on human chromosome 8, as described previously (10). The parental haplotypes were concordant with those of the proband.  Mutagenesis DNA sequences encoding mutant SOX9 HMG domains bearing point mutations were produced by PCR, with the mutation incorporated into one of the primers, or by amplification of patient DNA. Forward and reverse primers also bore NdeI andHindIII sites, respectively, to allow the PCR products to be inserted between the NdeI and HindIII sites in pT7-7. The sequences of all mutants were verified by DNA sequencing.  Deletion mutant SOX9(1–485) was produced by digestion ofSOX9-pcDNA3 with PpuMI and BstXI, removal of single-stranded termini with mung bean nuclease, and religation with T4 DNA ligase. With the aim of producing a series of nested deletion mutants, a PpuMI and BstXI double digest of pcDNA3-SOX9 was treated with mung bean nuclease to remove single-stranded termini, and then with exonuclease III. Only mutant SOX9(1–410) was isolated in this manner, and it appears to have resulted fortuitously from exonuclease digestion by mung bean nuclease past the single-stranded overhang, removing 347 nucleotides upstream of the BstXI site. Other deletion mutants were created by digestion with restriction endonucleases and religation. Mutant SOX9(1–248) was produced by removal of aApaI restriction fragment from pcDNA3-SOX9. This deletion closely mimics a CD mutation that results from a missense mutation at codon 251. Removal of a SfiI-EcoRV restriction fragment produced deletion mutant SOX9(1–437), which closely mimics a CD mutation resulting from a missense mutation at codon 440. Mutant SOX9(1–454) was produced by removal of sequences between the most 5′RsaI site of SOX9 and the EcoRV site in the multiple cloning site of pcDNA3. Mutant SOX9(1–465) was produced by removal of sequences between the most 5′BstUI site in SOX9 and the same EcoRV site. SOX9(ΔPQA) was produced by removal of a PmlI andPvuII restriction fragment from SOX9.  Production of Mutant and Wild Type HMG Domains The plasmids (pT7-7-SOX9box) were transformed into Escherichia coli BL21 and expression of the SOX9 HMG domain was induced by IPTG and soluble protein extracts prepared (11). The HMG domains were expressed in E. coli at a level of approximately 15–45 mg/liter. The HMG domain used in this study extends from residue Asn101 to Asn184 of full-length SOX9, with the addition of a Met residue at the N terminus.  Production of Mutant and Wild Type Full-length SOX9 Full-length SOX9 was produced in vitro by coupled transcription and translation of SOX9 (wild type and deletion mutants) in pcDNA3, using a TNT kit (Promega), with incorporation of [35S]methionine.  Electrophoretic Mobility Shift Assays Oligonucleotide probes were synthesized on an Applied Biosystems 394 DNA/RNA synthesizer. The sequences of the upper strands are given below. S9WT sequence is GGGTTAAC AG AACAATGG AATCTGGTAGA. The high affinity SOX9 binding site is shown in bold. It comprises the high affinity SOX binding site (SOXCON) flanked by four residues that enhance binding of SOX9 (underlined) (12). SOXCORE sequence is GGGTTAACGC AACAAT CTAATCTGGTAGA. The high affinity SOX binding site is shown in bold. The four flanking residues (underlined) are those that are least preferred for binding of SOX9 in vitro (12). Col2c1 sequence is GGGCCCCTCTCCCACAATGCCCCCCTGTC; Col2c2 sequence isGGGTCGAGAAAAGCCCCATTCATGAGAGC. Col2c1 and Col2c2 are SOX-binding sequences from the Col2a1enhancer that are required for chondrocyte-specific expression.In vivo, SOX proteins appear to tolerate considerable sequence variation in their binding sites. The sites conform loosely to the HMG consensus binding site (A/T)(A/T)CAA(A/T)G. The residues that correspond to this consensus are shown in bold. To prepare probes, complementary oligonucleotides were annealed and radiolabeled by end-filling with Superscript reverse transcriptase in the presence of [α-32P]dCTP and purified on Biogel-P4 spin columns.E. coli cell lysates containing SOX9 HMG domain were mixed with 32P-labeled probe (0.25 nM) in a total volume of 16 μl of binding buffer (13) and kept on ice for 15 min before electrophoresis. Protein-DNA complexes were resolved from free DNA on non-denaturing 6% polyacrylamide gels (40:1 (w/w) acrylamide:bisacrylamide) in 0.5× TBE for 3.5 h at 10 V/cm. Prior to sample loading, the gel was prerun for 2 h at 150V. Shifted and free probe were quantitated by PhosphorImager analysis.  Circular Permutation Assay Pairs of oligonucleotides were annealed to give linkers bearing SOXCON (upper strand: TCGACTGATAACAATGCGCTCT; lower strand: CTAGAGAGCGCATTGTTATCAG) or S9WT (upper strand: TCGACTGATAGAACAATGGGCGCTCT; lower strand: CTAGAGAGCGCCCATTGTTCTATCAG). The binding sites are shown in bold. pBEND2-SOXCON and pBEND2-S9WT were created by insertion of these linkers between the XbaI and SalI sites of pBEND2 (14). Seven circularly permuted probes bearing the binding sites were isolated by digestion of these plasmids with BamHI (A),RsaI (B), StuI (C), EcoRV (D),SpeI (E), NheI (F), or EcoRI andSalI (G) and excision of the bands after agarose gel electrophoresis. The probes were then treated with shrimp alkaline phosphatase and labeled with [γ-32P]ATP using T4 polynucleotide kinase. Probes (0.2–0.8 ng) were mixed with extract containing 180 ng of wild type or 600 ng of A19V or P70R mutant SOX9 HMG domain in binding buffer (13), in a total volume of 16 μl, and kept for 15 min on ice. Products were resolved by electrophoresis through 6.5% polyacrylamide non-denaturing gels (40:1 (w/w) acrylamide:bisacrylamide) as described above. Bend parameters were calculated as described previously (15).  Molecular Modeling Homology modeling by Modeller (16) was used to generate model structures of SOX9 and the P70R mutant, using the NMR structure of human SRY (PDB code 1HRY; Ref. 7) as template. The models were subjected to iterative molecular dynamics refinement using in-built simulated annealing protocols, to improve the structural quality as computed by PROCHECK (17). GRASP (18) was used to map residue contributions to the molecular surface. MOLSCRIPT was used to create the C-α traces.  Cell Types and Culture COS-7 cells were cultured as a monolayer in RPMI 1640, supplemented with 1% (v/v) penicillin/streptomycin, 1% L-glutamine, and 10% (v/v) fetal calf serum, at 37 °C under 5% CO2.  Transient Transfections COS-7 cells were transfected by DEAE-dextran-assisted electroporation (19). Transactivation by SOX9 was measured in transfection assays, using the reporter plasmid, pS10E1bCAT, in which the CAT gene is under the control of the E1b promoter, downstream of 10 SOX core binding sites (AACAAT). Cells (1 × 106) in log growth phase were transfected with 1 μg of pS10E1bCAT, 26 ng of pcDNA3 or pcDNA3-SOX9 (wild type or deletion mutant), and 20 ng of pCMV-lac, in a volume of 600 μl of RPMI 1640 containing 10 μg/ml DEAE-dextran. Pulse conditions were 960 microfarads and 250 mV using a Gene Pulser apparatus (Bio-Rad). Cells from each transfection were seeded into two flasks after addition of 6 ml of RPMI, and grown for 48 h before being harvested. Protein concentrations, in cell lysates, were determined by Bradford assay. CAT expression was determined by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay, using a CAT enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay kit (Roche Molecular Biochemicals). To correct for varying transfection efficiencies, β-galactosidase levels were assayed and CAT levels were normalized for β-galactosidase expression. β-Galactosidase expression was assayed using the β-galactosidase enzyme assay system (Promega).  Previous Section Next Section RESULTS  Detection of a Novel CD Mutation In a screen of theSOX9 open reading frame from CD patients (13), we identified a novel missense mutation (H65Y; CAC → TAC) in the SOX9 HMG domain from one patient. Curiously, the father of this patient appears phenotypically normal, but carries the H65Y mutation in his blood lymphocytes (and presumably germ cells). In contrast, the mother has a kyphoscoliosis and does not appear to carry the mutation (Fig.3). These findings raised the possibility that the mutation inherited from the father was a rare polymorphism that was not responsible for the CD phenotype and that another mutation, inherited from the mother, was responsible for the CD phenotype. Using SSCP, we screened for the polymorphism in the DNA from 62 phenotypically normal individuals of Pakistani descent, and failed to find another instance of the polymorphism.  Figure 3 View larger version: In this page In a new window Download as PowerPoint Slide Figure 3 SSCP shifts showing inheritance of the H65Y mutation by patient 10 from his father. The band that differs between the mutant and wild type alleles is indicated with anarrow. Controls include DNA amplified from three normal individuals and a reaction to which no template DNA was added (no DNA).  DNA Binding and Bending Activities of Mutant HMG Domains from Patients with CD The wild type and mutant HMG domains were expressed in E. coli upon induction with IPTG. The proteins were soluble and stably expressed as judged by SDS-PAGE (Fig.4). The affinities of wild type and mutant HMG domains for DNA probes S9WT, SOXCORE, and two sequences from the Col2a1 enhancer, Col2c1 and Col2c2, were compared by EMSA (Fig. 5). The probe, S9WT, bears the high affinity SOX9-binding site selected in vitro(AGAACAATGG). This sequence includes the high affinity binding site defined for other SOX proteins ((A/T)(A/T)CAA(A/T), shown in bold and termed SOXCON here; Ref. 20-22), flanked on either end by two residues preferred by SOX9 (12). SOXCORE bears the sequenceGC AACAAT CT, in which the four flanking residues of S9WT are mutated to those selected by SOX9 at lowest frequency in these positions (underlined). The wild type SOX9 HMG domain bound S9WT (relative binding 100%) more strongly than the other probes. Binding of SOXCORE, was about 8-fold lower. These results are consistent with our previous finding that the 5′-AG and 3′-GG in S9WT enhance binding of SOX9 (12). Interestingly, binding of the wild type HMG domain to Col2c1 and Col2c2 was about 5- and 3-fold lower than to S9WT. Note that Col2c1 has a single HMG binding site, which includes the 3′-flanking G in S9WT, whereas Col2c2 has two sites, one of which includes the 3′-flanking G and the other of which includes both 3′-flanking G nucleotides in S9WT. Presumably only one of the two sites on Col2c2 can be occupied at a time, as only a single shifted band is seen, even with high concentrations of SOX9 HMG domain.  Figure 4 View larger version: In this page In a new window Download as PowerPoint Slide Figure 4 SDS-PAGE of wild type (wt) and mutant HMG domains. E. coli cell lysates were resolved on a 10–20% polyacrylamide gradient gel at 20 V/cm for 180 min and stained with Coomassie Brilliant Blue. The position of the HMG domain is indicated on the left, and molecular size markers are indicated on the right. IPTG induction is indicated below. The relevant band is absent from uninduced cells transformed with pT7-7-SOX9 box and lysates from induced cells transformed with vector alone. The level of expression of the F12L mutant was approximately 3-fold lower than that of the other HMG domains.  Figure 5 View larger version: In this page In a new window Download as PowerPoint Slide Figure 5 EMSA of mutant and wild type (wt) SOX9 HMG domains binding to probes S9WT and SOXCORE (A); Col2c12 and Col2c2 (B). The positions of free DNA and DNA-HMG domain complex are indicated. Concentrations of mutant and wild type proteins in binding reactions were varied to determine the range over which DNA binding (amount of probe shifted) varied linearly with protein concentration. Where possible, concentrations of protein in binding reactions were within this range. The SOX binding sites in each probe are given, with residues corresponding to S9WT shown inbold. Note that Col2c2 has two binding sites in opposite orientations as indicated by the arrows. “Relative binding” refers to the amount of probe shifted per unit of HMG domain in the reaction, relative to the amount of S9WT probe shifted by the wild type SOX9 HMG domain, which is set at 100. Undetectable binding (−) is equivalent to relative binding <0.01.  Binding of the F12L mutant to any of the four probes was not detectable (relative binding <0.01%), suggesting that Phe12 is essential for DNA binding. The H65Y mutant showed barely detectable binding to S9WT, Col2c1, and Col2c2 (relative binding of 0.07%, 0.01%, and 0.01%, respectively), and undetectable binding to SOXCORE. Thus the H65Y mutation has a drastic effect on sequence-specific DNA binding. Binding of the A19V mutant to each of the four probes was only 3–5-fold lower than wild type, suggesting that Ala19 is not essential for DNA binding and that the A19V mutation does not drastically disrupt the structure of the HMG domain.  Interestingly, the P70R mutant showed altered DNA binding specificity compared with the wild type HMG domain. As stated above, binding of the wild type HMG domain to S9WT was about 8-fold higher than to SOXCORE. In comparison, whereas binding of the P70R mutant HMG domain to S9WT was only 7-fold lower than the wild type HMG domain, its binding to SOXCORE was undetectable (<0.01% relative binding). Thus, the four residues in S9WT that flank the core SOX consensus site appear to be essential for binding of the P70R mutant to DNA, whereas they enhance binding of the wild type SOX9 HMG domain only moderately. This suggests that the P70R mutant is missing some of the key contacts that contribute to binding to the core SOX consensus site. Finally, we found binding of the P70R mutant to the Col2c1 and Col2c2 probes to be barely detectable. The presence of at least one of the flanking residues of S9WT in the binding sites on these probes is presumably responsible for the small amount of binding observed.  Some point mutations in the HMG domain of SRY in patients with XY gonadal dysgenesis alter the DNA bending properties of the protein (23). Therefore, we determined the bend angles induced upon binding of the wild type and mutant HMG domains to S9WT and SOXCON, using a circular permutation assay. The bend angle induced upon binding of the wild type HMG domain to S9WT was 71 ± 0.4°. The A19V and P70R mutants bent this probe similarly (Fig.6 A). The bend angle induced upon binding of the wild type HMG domain to SOXCON was 78 ± 0.6° (Fig. 6 B). This is similar to the angle induced upon binding of the SRY HMG domain to SOXCON (results not shown). The A19V mutant bent the SOXCON probe similarly (Fig. 6 B). Thus, the A19V and P70R mutations do not appear to alter the DNA bending properties of SOX9.  Figure 6 View larger version: In this page In a new window Download as PowerPoint Slide Figure 6 DNA bending by wild type and A19V or P70R mutant HMG domains. Circularly permuted probes were labeled with32P and incubated with 600 ng of A19V or P70R HMG domain or 180 ng of wild type HMG domain. Bend angles were estimated as described previously (15).  Molecular Modeling To investigate further the function of specific amino acid residues in the SOX9 HMG domain, we built a model of the structure of the HMG domain of SOX9, based on the known solution structure of the HMG domain of SRY in complex with DNA. The SRY and SOX9 HMG domains differ at 39 of the 77 amino acids in the SRY structure. The homology model of the SOX9 HMG domain fits closely to the structure of the SRY HMG domain; 72 of the 77 C-α carbons have been aligned (root mean square deviation = 0.72 Å; Fig.7 A).  Figure 7 View larger version: In this page In a new window Download as PowerPoint Slide Figure 7 MOLSCRIPT C-α trace overlay of HMG domains of wild type SOX9 model (cyan) and SRY (1hry, magenta) (A) and HMG domain models of the P70R mutant of SOX9 (green) and wild type SOX9 (cyan) (B).Selected residues implicated in DNA binding are shown in ball-and-stick representation.  The DNA binding surfaces of the SRY and SOX9 HMG domains are depicted in Fig. 8 (A andB). Of the four mutated residues of SOX9 studied here, Phe12 (cyan), His65(magenta), and Pro70 (yellow) are located on or near the DNA binding surface in similar positions to the homologous residues in SRY. Ala19 of SOX9 is not part of the DNA binding surface; it faces away from the DNA, into the solvent. In the SOX9 model, as in the SRY structure, the side chain of Phe12 interacts with the base of T12. Pro70lies at the end of helix 3 of both SRY and SOX9 HMG domains and is likely to be important in determining the orientation of the C-terminal tail that includes residues Lys73 (blue) and Tyr74 (green). These residues are thought to be instrumental in DNA binding and bending by SRY, and the present model of the SOX9 HMG domain suggests that their positions on the DNA binding surface are conserved in the SOX9 HMG domain.  Figure 8 View larger version: In this page In a new window Download as PowerPoint Slide Figure 8 Molecular surfaces from models of HMG domains in complex with a DNA octamer d(GCACAAAC), showing the locations of specific residues on the DNA binding surface. A, HMG domain of SRY; B, HMG domain of wild type SOX9;C, HMG domain of P70R mutant SOX9. The contributions of residues pertinent to the molecular surface have been color-coded: Phe12 (cyan), His65(magenta), Pro70 (yellow), Lys73 (blue), Tyr74(green), and Arg77 (red). The SRY structure does not have coordinates for residue 77. The backbone of the upper strand of the DNA is shown in red and that of the lower strand in purple. The bases of the DNA are color-coded (G, green; C, yellow; A, red; T,purple), and the deoxyribose units are shown aswhite pentagons.  Inspection of the model of the SOX9 HMG domain allows us to speculate on how the SOX9 mutations studied here affect DNA binding. The F12L mutation affects a key aromatic contact between the HMG domain and the DNA; in the F12L mutant, the Leu12 side chain is unlikely to interact with the bases in the same way that Phe12 does in the wild type HMG domain. In the A19V mutant, the larger hydrophobic side chain of Val19 is likely to be stabilized by interaction with Phe12, Tyr15, and Tyr43. These interactions could alter the interaction of Phe12 with the DNA.  His65 of SOX9 lies in a hollow on the DNA binding surface, with most of its side chain accessible to solvent, away from the DNA binding surface. Replacement of this residue with tyrosine would replace a positively charged or hydrophilic neutral residue with a larger and more hydrophobic side chain, which would prefer to be buried, with a consequent change of conformation. In this changed conformation, Tyr65 might protrude further into the DNA binding pocket, thus diminishing DNA binding. Furthermore, examination of the model suggests that the H65Y mutation is likely to affect the conformation of residues near the N terminus of the SOX9 HMG domain, where important contacts are made with the DNA. Arg4 of SRY interacts with the phosphate group of nucleotide C4, whereas Arg7 points out into the solvent. However, in the SOX9 HMG domain, Arg4 is replaced with His, which being shorter appears to be unable to interact with the DNA (Fig. 7 A). Instead, the two nitrogens of Arg7 coordinate with the N2 of G13. In the model of the wild type SOX9 HMG domain, Pro8interacts with His65. However, in the H65Y mutant, Pro8 is too close to Tyr65 to allow the bulkier side chain of tyrosine to be accommodated in this position. Thus in the H65Y mutant, Tyr65 is likely to cause Pro8 to relocate, which could, in turn, affect the interaction of Arg7 with the DNA.  To investigate the effect of the P70R mutation on the structure of the SOX9 HMG domain, we built a model of the P70R mutant HMG domain, in which 71 of the 77 C-α carbons have been aligned with those of the wild type SOX9 HMG domain (root mean square deviation = 0.69 Å; Fig. 7 B). The DNA binding surface of the P70R mutant HMG domain is depicted in Fig. 8 C. Comparison of the models of wild type and P70R mutant SOX9 HMG domains allows us to speculate on how the P70R mutation affects the interaction of the HMG domain with DNA. The major difference between the model of the P70R mutant and that of the wild type HMG domain is that the C-terminal tail is oriented differently in the P70R mutant (Fig. 7 B). This tail includes residues Lys73 and Tyr74, which appear to be important DNA-contact residues. In the NMR structure of SRY, Tyr74 interacts hydrophobically with base A3 (closest distance = 3.2 Å). In the model of the SOX9 HMG domain, Tyr74 is not close enough to this base to make hydrophobic contact (closest distance = 6.9 Å), but its side chain is able to flip over so that the phenolic hydroxyl group can interact with base C16 by hydrogen bonding. Two contacts with C16 are possible: one with N1 of C16 (closest distance = 3.3 Å) and the other with the sugar oxygen of C16 (closest distance = 2.7 Å). In the SOX9 model, Lys73 is able to interact with the phosphate group of C16 (closest distance = 2.7 Å). Thus, the present model of the wild type SOX9 HMG domain suggests that the side chains of Lys73and Tyr74 are likely to help to stabilize the interaction of the SOX9 HMG domain with one of the residues flanking the 5′ end of the core SOX binding site in S9WT. This might explain the preference of SOX9 for the 5′-flanking G in S9WT. According to the models, a consequence of the altered orientation of the C-terminal tail of the P70R mutant is that Lys73 is no longer oriented toward the DNA binding surface, and Tyr74, while still on the DNA binding surface, is also unable to make contact with the DNA (closest distance = 5.5 Å). Thus, some of the key contacts that the wild type SOX9 HMG domain makes with the DNA appear to be lost in the P70R mutant. However, a compensating interaction is possible; in the model of P70R mutant, the altered orientation of the C-terminal tail may allow Arg77 (Fig. 7 C; red) to interact with one of the residues flanking the core SOX binding site in S9WT. In conclusion, the models are consistent with the hypothesis that the reduced DNA binding affinity and altered DNA binding specificity of the P70R mutant are, at least in part, due to a different orientation of the C-terminal tail of the HMG domain from that of the wild type protein.  The PQS-rich and PQA Domains of SOX9 Both Contribute to Transactivation Many CD mutations result in truncation of the C terminus of SOX9. We constructed a series of mutants with successively larger deletions of their C termini. These mutants mimic mutant SOX9 proteins seen in CD, and by assaying their transactivation activity we have defined the transactivation domain of SOX9.  Transfection of COS-7 cells with full-length SOX9 gave a 31-fold induction of CAT transcription compared with transfection of cells with the vector, pcDNA3. SOX9 mutants with successively larger deletions of their C termini gave successively lower levels ofCAT activation (Fig.9 A). Transactivation by the deletion mutant SOX9 1–454 (which lacks the C-terminal 55 amino acids) was 4.4-fold lower than wild-type SOX9 (Sceffé, p< 0.05). Transactivation by mutant SOX9 1–248 was reduced another 9.5-fold (Sceffé, p < 0.05), to levels that are near background. A mutant lacking only the PQA domain gave 1.5-fold lower CAT activation than wild type SOX9, and this difference was significant (Sceffé, p < 0.05). Thus, the PQS-rich and PQA domains both appear to be required for maximal transactivation. The mutant proteins were expressed stably in rabbit reticulocyte lysate (Fig. 9 B, i), bound to DNA in an EMSA (Fig. 9 B, ii) and were imported into the nuclei when expressed in COS-7 cells (Fig. 9 C). Thus the decreased activity of the mutant proteins does not appear to be due to protein instability or to failure of the mutant proteins to localize in the nucleus and to bind to DNA.  Figure 9 View larger version: In this page In a new window Download as PowerPoint Slide Figure 9 Localization of the transactivation domain of SOX9. A, diagram of the open reading frame of full-length SOX9 protein and deletion mutants and graph of transcriptional activation induced by each of the constructs upon transfection into COS-7 cells. Transcriptional activation by SOX9 was measured by determination of CAT expression in lysates of cells co-transfected with pcDNA3-SOX9 (wild type and deletion mutants) and the reporter plasmid, pS10E1bCAT. pCMV-lac was co-transfected and β-galactosidase activity assayed to account for variations in transfection efficiency. A one-way analysis of variance revealed a significant difference between the mean levels of CAT/unit of β-galactosidase for the different DNA constructs (F(8,18) = 141.59, p < 0.00005). Post-hoc comparisons showed that cells transfected with each of the deletion constructs produced significantly less CAT/unit of β-galactosidase than did cells transfected with the full-length SOX9 construct (Sceffé, p < 0.05). Significant differences that are pertinent to the discussion are indicated (*,p < 0.05). B, i, autoradiograph of SDS-PAGE of wild type SOX9 and deletion mutants expressed in vitro in rabbit reticulocyte lysate; ii, EMSA showing binding of wild type and deletion mutants of SOX9 to a duplex oligonucleotide bearing SOXCON. Molecular size markers are indicated on the right. C, nuclear localization of wild type SOX9 and deletion mutants. pcDNA3-SOX9 and deletion mutants were transfected into COS-7 cells and SOX9 was detected by indirect immunofluorescence, using rabbit anti-hemagglutinin as the first antibody and fluorescein isothiocyanate-conjugated goat anti-rabbit antibody as the second antibody.  Previous Section Next Section DISCUSSION  In this study, we have investigated the structure and function of wild type SOX9 and two classes of mutation that occur in patients with campomelic dysplasia. We report the identification of a novel amino acid substitution mutation (H65Y) in the SOX9 HMG domain of a CD patient. The mutation appears to have been inherited from the unaffected father. It is unlikely that the mutation is a rare polymorphism that is unrelated to the CD phenotype, as a screen of the DNA from 62 Pakistanis failed to detect another instance of the mutation. Furthermore, the DNA binding activity of the H65Y mutant protein was barely detectable, suggesting that the patient’s CD phenotype results from failure of the mutant SOX9 protein to bind DNA and its consequent failure to activate expression of target genes. The father’s normal phenotype might be explained by mosaicism, whereby a certain proportion of his cells (including germ cells) are heterozygous for the mutant SOX9 allele and the remainder have two copies of the wild type allele.  A comparison of the amino acid sequences of the HMG domains that bind DNA with sequence specificity with those that bind without sequence specificity (such as HMG-1 and HMG-D) gives some clues as to which residues are important in DNA binding and sequence specificity (24). His65 of SOX9 is conserved in sequence-specific HMG domain proteins, but is replaced by a Tyr residue in most of the nonspecific HMG domains, suggesting that a His residue at this position is required for sequence-specific DNA binding. The greatly reduced DNA binding activity of the H65Y mutant compared with the wild type HMG domain supports this interpretation. In the model of the wild type HMG domain of SOX9 presented here, His65 lies in a hollow on the DNA binding surface. Replacement of this residue with a larger and more hydrophobic tyrosine residue might interfere with interaction with the DNA by protruding into the DNA binding pocket. An alternative explanation for the lack of DNA binding activity observed in the H65Y mutant is suggested by inspection of the solution structure of SRY. Packing of His65 (homologous to His65 of SOX9) with Pro8, Leu61, and Gln62 helps stabilize the middle of the long arm of the “L” (7). The model of the SOX9 HMG domain presented here suggests that the larger side chain of Tyr65 in the H65Y mutant would cause Pro8 to relocate and modulate an interaction between Arg7 and the DNA.  The present study also investigated the effect of three other point mutations within the HMG domain of SOX9: F12L, A19V, and P70R. Phe12 is conserved in the sequence-specific HMG domains and is conserved or replaced with another aromatic residue (Tyr) in the nonspecific HMG domains and thus is expected to be important for sequence-specific DNA binding. Phe12 of SRY appears to interact with an AT base pair in the minor groove of the DNA and aid the deformation of the DNA that is brought about by intercalation of the adjacent residue, Ile13, between two AT base pairs (25). In our model of the SOX9 HMG domain, Phe12 lies in a similar position on the DNA binding surface and can therefore be expected to function similarly. Thus, the F12L mutation is likely to interfere with a key contact between the SOX9 HMG domain and the DNA. The present study supports this prediction, as the F12L mutant protein shows undetectable binding to the DNA sequences tested. It is also possible that the mutation disrupts the structure of the SOX9 HMG domain, as Phe12 of SRY is one of 12 residues that lie at the junction of the three helices and form a large hydrophobic core, which stabilizes the “L” shape and has an exposed surface that contacts the DNA (7).  The A19V mutant HMG domain bound the DNA probes 3–5-fold less strongly than the wild type HMG domain, but both mutant and wild type HMG domains bent DNA probes bearing S9WT or SOXCON to the same extent. The lack of conservation of Ala19 of SOX9, among other SOX proteins, and the substantial DNA binding activity observed in the A19V mutant, suggest that Ala19 is not critical for sequence-specific DNA binding and that the A19V mutation does not drastically disrupt the structure of the HMG domain. Ala19in SOX9 corresponds to Gln19 in SRY, which does not contact the DNA directly; instead, it helps to maintain the orientation of the long and short arms of the L-shape of the molecule (7). Thus, the reduced DNA binding activity observed in the A19V mutant HMG domain might be explained if this mutation modulates some of the interactions responsible for maintaining the orientation of the long and short arms of the wild type HMG domain. Inspection of the model of the SOX9 HMG domain suggests that interaction between Val19 in the A19V mutant with Phe12, Tyr15, and Tyr43is likely to modulate the interaction of Phe12 with the DNA. The CD phenotype that results from the A19V mutation indicates that the residual DNA binding activity observed in this mutant protein is insufficient to allow the protein to bind and activate target genes to levels required for normal development. Alternatively, the A19V mutant may be deficient in some activity not measured here.  Pro70 of SOX9 is conserved among sequence-specific HMG domain proteins but not among the nonspecific HMG domains, suggesting that it is important for sequence-specific DNA binding. Meyer et al. (26) found that the P70R mutant HMG domain showed reduced binding to a DNA probe that includes S9WT. We extend these results to show that the P70R mutant has altered DNA binding specificity. Although the wild type HMG domain binds S9WT with only 8-fold higher affinity than it binds SOXCORE, the P70R mutant showed moderately strong binding to S9WT, but no detectable binding to SOXCORE. These results suggest that the mutant protein lacks some of the contacts that the wild type protein makes with the core SOX consensus site, but retains contacts with the flanking residues in S9WT.  An inspection of the structures of SRY and LEF1 suggests that Pro70 in SOX9 is likely to be important for determining the orientation of the C-terminal tail of the HMG domain (residues 71–84). In these structures, the corresponding proline residues break helix 3 and produce a kink, such that helix 3 is shorter than that found in the HMG-1 and HMG-D domains, which lack DNA sequence specificity. The C-terminal strand then bends back toward the N terminus, forming a small hydrophobic cluster, that brings the N- and C-terminal strands into proximity and is thought to be important for sequence-specific DNA binding (8). Tyr74 of SRY forms part of the hydrophobic core, and its aromatic ring is packed against the bases of A3 and T14 and appears to push the A3 base toward the major groove, thereby disrupting base stacking and base pairing. Thus, Tyr74appears to be important for sequence-specific DNA binding and bending. Lys73 of SRY appears to form a salt bridge with the phosphate group of C16 (7). Lys73 and Tyr74 are highly conserved in SOX proteins. In our model of the wild type SOX9 HMG domain, Lys73 and Tyr74 also appear to make important contacts with the DNA. We predicted that replacement of Pro70 in the SOX9 HMG domain with Arg would alter the orientations of these residues. Accordingly, the molecular models of the respective HMG domains, presented here, show Lys73 to be on the DNA binding surface of the wild type HMG domain, but not on that of the P70R mutant. Although Tyr74 is located on the DNA binding surface in the P70R mutant, it is not close enough to make contact with the DNA. Thus, we propose that the P70R mutation interferes with the ability of the protein to bind and activate target genes by modulating the interaction of Lys73 and Tyr74 with the DNA.  The NMR structure of SRY suggests that Lys73 and Tyr74 of SRY play an important role in DNA bending (7). As the homologous residues have altered orientations with respect to the DNA binding surface in our model of the P70R mutant of SOX9, we predicted that this mutant would have altered DNA bending properties. Using a circular permutation assay, we estimated the bend angle induced upon binding of the P70R mutant HMG domain to probes bearing S9WT to be close to the angle induced upon binding of the wild type HMG domain. Thus, the P70R mutation does not appear to affect the DNA bending properties of the SOX9 HMG domain. The model of the P70R mutant suggests that a compensating interaction between Arg77 and the extended DNA sequence of S9WT might stabilize DNA binding and bending by the P70R mutant.  Many of the mutations that give rise to CD truncate the C terminus of the protein. We constructed a number of SOX9 deletion mutants, which mimic the truncation and frameshift mutations seen in CD patients, and used these mutants to define the transactivation domain of SOX9. Analysis of the transactivation activity of the deletion mutants shows that progressive truncation of the C terminus of SOX9 results in progressive loss of transactivation activity and therefore demonstrates that most of the transactivation activity is conferred by the PQS-rich domain. However, the PQA domain is also required for maximal transactivation. The present results contrast with those of Sudbecket al. (9), who also found that the transactivation activity of SOX9 was conferred by the PQS-rich domain, but that the PQA domain was not required for maximal transactivation. The apparent discrepancy between these results and the present results might be explained by the fact that Sudbeck et al. studied the effect of removal of the PQA domain in the context of a fusion protein in which SOX9 (with or without the DNA binding domain) was fused to the Gal4 DNA binding domain. In contrast, the present study examined the effect of deletions, on the transactivation activity of SOX9, in the context of the native protein. The results of the present study are therefore more likely to reflect the activity of the native protein and mutant SOX9 proteins found in patients with CD.  Although the PQA domain of SOX9 varies greatly in length among species, the PQS-rich domain is highly conserved. Analysis of the mutations present in CD patients suggests that CD often arises from truncation of the C terminus of SOX9, and it is likely that in these cases the CD phenotype results from failure of the mutant SOX9 protein to activate target genes to levels sufficient for normal development.  In conclusion, the question of how the PQS and PQA domains mediate transcriptional activation remains to be answered. It is likely that they do so via interactions with other transcriptional activators or components of the basal transcription apparatus.  
2157||The PTEN (phosphatase and tensin homolog) phosphatase is unique in mammals in terms of its tumor suppressor activity, exerted by dephosphorylation of the lipid second messenger PIP3 (phosphatidylinositol 3,4,5-trisphosphate), which activates the phosphoinositide 3-kinase/Akt/mTOR (mammalian target of rapamycin) oncogenic pathway. Loss-of-function mutations in the PTEN gene are frequent in human cancer and in the germline of patients with PTEN hamartoma tumor-related syndromes (PHTSs). In addition, PTEN is mutated in patients with autism spectrum disorders (ASDs), although no functional information on these mutations is available. Here, we report a comprehensive in vivo functional analysis of human PTEN using a heterologous yeast reconstitution system. Ala-scanning mutagenesis at the catalytic loops of PTEN outlined the critical role of residues within the P-catalytic loop for PIP3 phosphatase activity in vivo. PTEN mutations that mimic the P-catalytic loop of mammalian PTEN-like proteins (TPTE, TPIP, tensins and auxilins) affected PTEN function variably, whereas tumor- or PHTS-associated mutations targeting the PTEN P-loop produced complete loss of function. Conversely, Ala-substitutions, as well as tumor-related mutations at the WPD- and TI-catalytic loops, displayed partial activity in many cases. Interestingly, a tumor-related D92N mutation was partially active, supporting the notion that the PTEN Asp92 residue might not function as the catalytic general acid. The analysis of a panel of ASD-associated hereditary PTEN mutations revealed that most of them did not substantially abrogate PTEN activity in vivo, whereas most of PHTS-associated mutations did. Our findings reveal distinctive functional patterns among PTEN mutations found in tumors and in the germline of PHTS and ASD patients, which could be relevant for therapy. Topic: mutation catalysis phosphoric monoester hydrolases yeasts neoplasms pten gene Issue Section: Articles INTRODUCTION  PTEN (phosphatase and tensin homolog deleted in chromosome 10) is a mammalian lipid and protein phosphatase with orthologs in lower animals, plants and fungi (1). In mammals, PTEN-related proteins exist whose activity has been poorly explored. These proteins include TPIP and TPTE (orthologs of a voltage-sensor phosphatase from Ciona intestinalis), as well as the actin-binding tensin 1/2/3 and the clathrin-binding auxilin 1/2 (2–4). PTEN most relevant function is based on its ability to dephosphorylate phosphatidylinositol 3,4,5-trisphosphate (PIP3) in the 3′ phosphate of the inositol ring, resulting in the bisphosphate product phosphatidylinositol 4,5-bisphosphate (PIP2), thus broadly inhibiting the oncogenic phosphoinositide 3-kinase (PI3K)-dependent signaling (5–8). As a tumor suppressor, PTEN exerts its function by counteracting the anti-apoptotic and growth stimulatory effects of PDK1 (phosphoinositide-dependent kinase) and protein kinase B (PKB/Akt), which rely on PIP3 for their activation (9,10). Sporadic somatic mutations in PTEN make this tumor suppressor gene one of the two most frequently affected in human malignancies, together with p53, especially in solid tumors (11–14). Germline mutations of PTEN lead to inherited hamartoma, Cowden syndrome and related disorders, generally known as PTEN hamartoma tumor-related syndromes (PHTSs) (15–17). PTEN is considered haploinsufficient to prevent certain malignancies, suggesting that dosage is important for its function, as it must be the influence of a given point mutation in the catalytic activity of the enzyme (18). Besides its clear involvement in PHTS, germline PTEN mutations have been described in patients with neurodevelopmental disorders, such as autism spectrum disorders (ASDs) and developmental delay (DD) (19–22). Oncogenic PTEN mutations have been generally related to a loss of function of the encoded phosphatase. However, few studies have been done to understand the influence of putative neurodevelopment-related PTEN mutations on its catalytic activity.  Although phosphatase-independent functions of PTEN have also been described to contribute to its tumor suppressive activity (8,23–25), buffering PI3K signaling in virtue of its catalytic activity is assumed to be its key role. Thus, the precise dissection of PTEN catalytic properties is highly relevant for human disease. The crystal structure of PTEN (26) revealed an active site pocket similar to those of protein tyrosine phosphatases (PTPs) and dual-specificity Thr/Ser/Tyr phosphatases, as predicted by primary sequence analyses, although richer in basic residues. This explained the ability of PTEN to dephosphorylate acidic phosphopeptides (27). In addition, the PTEN active site pocket was wider than that of PTPs, to accommodate the rather bulky phosphorylated inositol moiety that constitutes the polar head of PIP3 (26). The PTEN phosphatase signature motif ([123]HCKAGKGR[130]; P-loop), including the catalytic Cys124 and Arg130 residues, is located at the bottom of the active site pocket. The walls of the pocket are delimited in part by a WPD-loop (thus designed after the equivalent region in PTP1B) and a TI-loop (so named because of conserved Thr and Ile residues), which are thought to be important for the activity of the enzyme. The fact that the Asp92, within the PTEN WPD-loop, is located in the pocket in an identical fashion to the equivalent proton donor catalytic residue on PTP1B led to the hypothesis that it may serve as the general acid that allows protonation of the leaving phosphate during the dephosphorylation reaction. Although in vitro studies using an Asp92 to Ala PTEN mutation indicated that Asp92 does not act as the general acid (28,29), no conclusive studies have been done to analyze the contribution of Asp92 in the in vivo dephosphorylation of PIP3 by PTEN.  We have previously validated a humanized yeast model to study the function of PI3K and PTEN in vivo, based on the heterologous co-expression of these proteins (1,30,31). Briefly, expression of hyperactive p110α, the catalytic subunit of mammalian class I PI3K, results in high toxicity in yeast cells as a result of the depletion of essential PIP2 pools. Co-expression of PTEN restores PIP2 levels and suppresses PI3K toxicity. Besides, co-expression of GFP-tagged mammalian Akt in this system allowed the detection of pools of PI3K-generated PIP3 in the yeast cell, where Akt localized, providing a visual readout of PI3K and PTEN activities (30,32). Here, we present an extensive site-directed mutagenesis and functional study of PTEN by using this system. Humanized yeast-based bioassays combine the advantages of powerful yeast genetics, an ever-growing availability of post-genomic tools, their ease and safety of manipulation and the fast achievement of results (1). Our results offer insights into the catalytic properties of PTEN and provide a platform to compare in vivo the contribution to lipid phosphatase inactivation of mutations found in tumors and in the germline of patients with PTEN-related syndromes. Our analysis reveals that PTEN germline mutations found in patients with ASD/DD neurodevelopmental disorders do not generally confer complete loss of function of the PTEN PIP3 phosphatase activity, when compared with mutations found in the germline of PHTS patients with tumor disorders.  RESULTS  Ala-scanning of the catalytic loops at the PTEN active site  The PIP3 lipid phosphatase activity of PTEN is essential for its tumor suppressor activity, which is evidenced by the abundance of tumor-related mutations in exons encoding the catalytic phosphatase core of the enzyme (11,15,33). Thus, the precise definition of PIP3 catalytic properties of PTEN in vivo, and its relation with PTEN residues mutated in tumor samples or in patients, is highly relevant in oncology. The PTEN active site is conformed by three catalytic loops (26): the WPD-loop, residues 88–98; the P-loop, residues 121–131; and the TI-loop, residues 160–171 (Fig. 1A). The P-catalytic loop (containing the essential catalytic cysteine; Cys124 in human PTEN) is highly conserved between species, from mammals to lower eukaryotes, whereas the WPD- and TI-loops are more divergent (Fig. 1B). To test the contribution of all individual residues within the three PTEN catalytic loops to the in vivo activity of the enzyme, a comprehensive Ala-scanning mutagenesis was performed. The PIP3 catalytic activity of the resulting mutations was assessed in vivo using a reconstitution heterologous system in the yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae (31). As illustrated in Figure 2, Ala substitutions of the residues at the core P-loop (residues 121–131) substantially abrogated the PTEN ability to dephosphorylate PIP3in vivo, with the exception of the A121V, G129A and T131A mutations, which displayed partial or total activity (note that Ala residues have been substituted by Val residues in our Ala-scanning mutational analysis). Remarkably, a Cowden disease mutation targeting the Gly129 residue (G129E) is defective for PIP3 phosphatase activity but maintains in vitro activity against phosphotyrosine peptides (34). Overall, the residues at the WPD- and TI-loops were less important for PIP3 catalytic activity. Thus, Ala substitutions of most WPD residues (88–98) did not affect, or only partially affected, PTEN catalytic activity, with the exception of Asp92 and His93 that fully abrogated the PTEN function (Fig. 2). Also, Ala substitutions of most TI residues (160–171) only weakly affected the PTEN activity, except for Val166, Gln171 and, to some extent, Asp162. (Fig. 2) The loss-of-function properties of the D92A mutation is in accordance with the importance of this residue in PTEN phosphatase catalysis, although its role as the general acid in the hydrolysis reaction remains unclear (28,29).  Figure 1. PTEN catalytic loops. (A) Detail of the three-dimensional structure of the PTEN catalytic site. Regions spanning the WPD-, P- and TI-catalytic loops are marked in yellow, red and blue, respectively. Image was generated with PyMOL (http://pymol.org), based on PDB ID: 1D5R (26). (B) Amino acid sequence alignment of PTEN catalytic loops from Homo sapiens, Danio rerio, Strongylocentrotus purpuratus, Drosophila melanogaster, Caenorhabditis elegans, Dictyostelium discoideum, Schizosaccharomyces pombe and S. cerevisiae. (C) Amino acid sequence alignment of PTEN catalytic loops with the equivalent regions from PTEN-like proteins (H. sapiens sequences). Amino acid numbering from H. sapiens PTEN is in brackets. Amino acid identity with regard to H. sapiens PTEN is marked in yellow. Alignments were made manually. View largeDownload slide PTEN catalytic loops. (A) Detail of the three-dimensional structure of the PTEN catalytic site. Regions spanning the WPD-, P- and TI-catalytic loops are marked in yellow, red and blue, respectively. Image was generated with PyMOL (http://pymol.org), based on PDB ID: 1D5R (26). (B) Amino acid sequence alignment of PTEN catalytic loops from Homo sapiens, Danio rerio, Strongylocentrotus purpuratus, Drosophila melanogaster, Caenorhabditis elegans, Dictyostelium discoideum, Schizosaccharomyces pombe and S. cerevisiae. (C) Amino acid sequence alignment of PTEN catalytic loops with the equivalent regions from PTEN-like proteins (H. sapiens sequences). Amino acid numbering from H. sapiens PTEN is in brackets. Amino acid identity with regard to H. sapiens PTEN is marked in yellow. Alignments were made manually. Figure 2. Functional assessment in the yeast in vivo model of Ala-scanning mutations covering the PTEN catalytic site. YPH499 S. cerevisiae transformants expressing p110α-CAAX, GFP-Akt1 and PTEN mutations [Ala substitutions of the indicated amino acids: residues 88–98 at the WPD-loop, residues 121–131 at the P-loop (catalytic Cys in bold), residues 160–171 at the T-loop; Val substitutions in the case of residues Ala121 and Ala126] were incubated for 5 h in the presence of galactose (all heterologous proteins are co-expressed from the GAL1 galactose-inducible promoter), and GFP staining was monitored by fluorescence microscopy. As a reference, controls expressing wild-type (WT) PTEN or the empty vector (φ) are shown at the top (left). Black-color bars indicates the percentage of cells with plasma membrane GFP stain (high PIP3 levels = low PTEN activity), whereas white color corresponds to the percentage of cells that display a nucleocytoplasmic GFP signal (low PIP3 levels = high PTEN activity). Over 100 cells were analyzed microscopically per experiment. Data are the average from three different experiments. Error bars correspond to the standard deviation. (+) or (−) signs indicate the ability of each PTEN mutation to rescue growth arrest induced by p110α-CAAX, as determined by serial dilution drop growth assays on solid medium (see inlet at the top as a reference). The drop growth experiments were performed on co-transformants expressing only p110α-CAAX and the indicated PTEN mutation. Asterisks (*) mark mutations to Ala that have been reported in tumors/germline PHTS. View largeDownload slide Functional assessment in the yeast in vivo model of Ala-scanning mutations covering the PTEN catalytic site. YPH499 S. cerevisiae transformants expressing p110α-CAAX, GFP-Akt1 and PTEN mutations [Ala substitutions of the indicated amino acids: residues 88–98 at the WPD-loop, residues 121–131 at the P-loop (catalytic Cys in bold), residues 160–171 at the T-loop; Val substitutions in the case of residues Ala121 and Ala126] were incubated for 5 h in the presence of galactose (all heterologous proteins are co-expressed from the GAL1 galactose-inducible promoter), and GFP staining was monitored by fluorescence microscopy. As a reference, controls expressing wild-type (WT) PTEN or the empty vector (φ) are shown at the top (left). Black-color bars indicates the percentage of cells with plasma membrane GFP stain (high PIP3 levels = low PTEN activity), whereas white color corresponds to the percentage of cells that display a nucleocytoplasmic GFP signal (low PIP3 levels = high PTEN activity). Over 100 cells were analyzed microscopically per experiment. Data are the average from three different experiments. Error bars correspond to the standard deviation. (+) or (−) signs indicate the ability of each PTEN mutation to rescue growth arrest induced by p110α-CAAX, as determined by serial dilution drop growth assays on solid medium (see inlet at the top as a reference). The drop growth experiments were performed on co-transformants expressing only p110α-CAAX and the indicated PTEN mutation. Asterisks (*) mark mutations to Ala that have been reported in tumors/germline PHTS. Functional analysis of mutations at the PTEN P-loop mimicking PTEN-like proteins  PTEN-like proteins include TPIP and TPTE, as well as tensins and auxilins. The WPD- and TI-loops are divergent between PTEN and PTEN-like proteins, whereas the P-loop is more conserved (Fig. 1C). As part of our mutational analysis of the PTEN active site, we designed single amino acid substitution mutants on PTEN that mimicked the P-loop from the different PTEN-like proteins and tested their PIP3 phosphatase activity in the yeast system. Mutations included A121V, I122L, I122V, H123Y, C124N, K125L, K125M, K125R, A126D, A126G, G127N, K128R, K128T, G129D, G129A, R130A, R130K, T131I, T131L and T131S (note that A121V, G129A and R130A mutations are included in Fig. 2). A group of mutations (H123Y, C124N, A126D, G127N, K128T, G129D, R130A, R130K, T131I and T131L) fully abrogated the PIP3 phosphatase activity of PTEN in yeast, whereas other two groups only affected partially (I122L, K125L, K125M, A126G and K128R) or did not affect PTEN PIP3 phosphatase activity (A121V, I122V, K125R, G129A and T131S) (Fig. 3; note that results for A121V, G129A and R130A mutations are included in Fig. 2). The results from this mutational analysis are in agreement with the in vitro PIP3 phosphatase activity reported for TPIP and with the lack of activity reported for TPTE (35). Our results also suggest that the P-loops from tensin and auxilin proteins do not bear catalytic activity. Moreover, this analysis revealed that some conservative mutations at the PTEN P-loop (such as I122V, K125R and T131S) are permissive for its activity in vivo.  Figure 3. Functional assessment of PTEN mutations mimicking the P-loop sequence from PTEN-like proteins. Experiments were performed and are presented as in Figure 2. The alignment marks divergences within the P-loop sequence between PTEN and PTEN-related proteins, which correspond to the substitutions made in the PTEN-mutated versions. The numbering of residues for PTEN is shown. ‘=’ indicates the same residue at that position than PTEN. The data for substitutions marked in italics in this alignment are already presented in Figure 2. The asterisk marks a mutation reported in tumors/germline PHTS. View largeDownload slide Functional assessment of PTEN mutations mimicking the P-loop sequence from PTEN-like proteins. Experiments were performed and are presented as in Figure 2. The alignment marks divergences within the P-loop sequence between PTEN and PTEN-related proteins, which correspond to the substitutions made in the PTEN-mutated versions. The numbering of residues for PTEN is shown. ‘=’ indicates the same residue at that position than PTEN. The data for substitutions marked in italics in this alignment are already presented in Figure 2. The asterisk marks a mutation reported in tumors/germline PHTS. Functional analysis of tumor-related mutations targeting PTEN active site residues  Tumor-related mutations are spread along the entire PTEN amino acid sequence. Nevertheless, the PTEN C-terminal tail (last 50 residues) is targeted by mutations less frequently, in agreement with our previous finding using the yeast heterologous system that PTEN 1–349 is the minimal fully functional PTEN protein (30). On the other hand, the core PTP catalytic domain (residues 14–185) is more frequently targeted by mutations in either tumors or PHTS patients. Some of these mutations have been analyzed in terms of intrinsic catalytic activity (36–40), but the majority of them have not been directly tested for function. We have analyzed in the yeast system the PIP3 phosphatase activity of tumor-related mutations targeting PTEN residues at the PTEN catalytic loops (note that some of these mutations have been analyzed previously and are shown in Figs 2 and 3; and Figs 5 and 6 also include some of them). As expected, all the tumor mutations at the P-loop tested (A121E, I122S, H123D, H123Y, C124S, K125E, A126S, A126V, G127E, K128N, G129E, G129V, G129R, R130G, T131A and T131I) gave rise to proteins that were fully inactive, except for A126S and K128N that produced partially inactive proteins (Fig. 4 and Figs 2 and 3). Mutations at the TI-loop included T160I, R161G, D162G, G165E, G165V, V166I, T167A, I168F, P169H and S170R. Among these, only the T160I, G165E, G165V and S170R were loss-of-function mutations (Fig. 4 and Fig. 2). Finally, tumor-related mutations targeting the WPD loop included Y88C, F90L, E91A, D92A, D92E, D92G, D92H, D92N, D92V, H93D, H93Q, H93R, H93Y, N94I, P95L and P96Q. Proteins bearing Y88C, F90L or E91A mutations were active, whereas the rest of mutant proteins were partially or fully inactive (Fig. 4 and Figs 2, 5 and 6). A summary of the tumor-related PTEN mutants analyzed is shown in Supplementary Material, Table S1. Taken together, our findings illustrate the heterogeneity in the catalytic activity of tumor-related PTEN mutant proteins.  Figure 4. Functional assessment of tumor-related PTEN mutations targeting PTEN catalytic loops. Experiments were performed as those in Figure 2. View largeDownload slide Functional assessment of tumor-related PTEN mutations targeting PTEN catalytic loops. Experiments were performed as those in Figure 2. Figure 5. Functional assessment of PTEN mutations targeting the Asp92 residue. (A) Tolerance to mutation of the Asp92 residue. Mutations were assessed in yeast, as those in Figure 2. Asterisks mark mutations that have been reported in tumors/germline PHTS. The image at the right corresponds to growth rescue assays from representative PTEN mutations and controls from the data presented. (B) In vitro phosphatase activity of recombinant PTEN proteins purified from COS-7 cell line transfectants, as determined by the malachite green assay, using diC8-phosphatydilinositol PIP3 as the substrate. Data are the average from three independent experiments. Error bars correspond to the standard deviation. (C) Ability of PTEN mutations to abolish HA-Akt activation in mammalian cells. PTEN wild-type or the indicated mutations were co-expressed with HA-Akt1 in COS-7 cells. Cell-free lysates were subjected to immunoblot using anti-phospho-active-Akt antibodies (p-Thr308 and p-Ser473). The content of PTEN and HA-Akt1 in the lysates was monitored using anti-PTEN (all PTEN mutations were expressed equally, not shown) and anti-HA antibodies, respectively. Bands were quantified and results are presented as the average ± SD of the p-Akt/Akt ratio, obtained from three independent experiments. View largeDownload slide Functional assessment of PTEN mutations targeting the Asp92 residue. (A) Tolerance to mutation of the Asp92 residue. Mutations were assessed in yeast, as those in Figure 2. Asterisks mark mutations that have been reported in tumors/germline PHTS. The image at the right corresponds to growth rescue assays from representative PTEN mutations and controls from the data presented. (B) In vitro phosphatase activity of recombinant PTEN proteins purified from COS-7 cell line transfectants, as determined by the malachite green assay, using diC8-phosphatydilinositol PIP3 as the substrate. Data are the average from three independent experiments. Error bars correspond to the standard deviation. (C) Ability of PTEN mutations to abolish HA-Akt activation in mammalian cells. PTEN wild-type or the indicated mutations were co-expressed with HA-Akt1 in COS-7 cells. Cell-free lysates were subjected to immunoblot using anti-phospho-active-Akt antibodies (p-Thr308 and p-Ser473). The content of PTEN and HA-Akt1 in the lysates was monitored using anti-PTEN (all PTEN mutations were expressed equally, not shown) and anti-HA antibodies, respectively. Bands were quantified and results are presented as the average ± SD of the p-Akt/Akt ratio, obtained from three independent experiments. Figure 6. Functional assessment of PTEN mutations related to PHTS (A) or ASD/DD (B) hereditary syndromes. Experiments were performed as described in Figure 2. Asterisks in (B) mark mutations that have been reported in germline PHTS. (C) Global functional analyses of the impact on catalytic activity of PHTS- versus ASD/DD-related mutations. The y-axis refers to relative in vivo PTEN activity, as measured by the percentage of yeast cells with low PIP3 levels at the plasma membrane, as determined by GFP-Akt1 localization (as in Figs 2–4 and 6A). Each spot corresponds to the average data from three independent experiments on each particular mutation from the indicated category (PHTS or ASD/DD). Spots surrounded by a circle correspond to mutations that are common to PHTS or ASD/DD [those marked with asterisks in (B)]. Vertical lines mark the standard deviation. Paired t-test of these independent set of data revealed a significant difference in activity for ASD/DD mutations with respect to PHTS mutations (P < 0.001). (D) Comparative analysis of PHTS and ASD/DD PTEN mutations referred to their ability to rescue growth arrest induced in S. cerevisiae by p110α-CAAX expression. ASD/DD-related mutations are generally more competent than PHTS-related mutations in counteracting p110α-CAAX activity. PHTS mutations included in this study are listed in Supplementary Material, Table S1, and results correspond to those in (A) and in Figures 4 and 5. ASD/DD mutations data correspond to those in (B). View large Download slide Functional assessment of PTEN mutations related to PHTS (A) or ASD/DD (B) hereditary syndromes. Experiments were performed as described in Figure 2. Asterisks in (B) mark mutations that have been reported in germline PHTS. (C) Global functional analyses of the impact on catalytic activity of PHTS- versus ASD/DD-related mutations. The y-axis refers to relative in vivo PTEN activity, as measured by the percentage of yeast cells with low PIP3 levels at the plasma membrane, as determined by GFP-Akt1 localization (as in Figs 2–4 and 6A). Each spot corresponds to the average data from three independent experiments on each particular mutation from the indicated category (PHTS or ASD/DD). Spots surrounded by a circle correspond to mutations that are common to PHTS or ASD/DD [those marked with asterisks in (B)]. Vertical lines mark the standard deviation. Paired t-test of these independent set of data revealed a significant difference in activity for ASD/DD mutations with respect to PHTS mutations (P < 0.001). (D) Comparative analysis of PHTS and ASD/DD PTEN mutations referred to their ability to rescue growth arrest induced in S. cerevisiae by p110α-CAAX expression. ASD/DD-related mutations are generally more competent than PHTS-related mutations in counteracting p110α-CAAX activity. PHTS mutations included in this study are listed in Supplementary Material, Table S1, and results correspond to those in (A) and in Figures 4 and 5. ASD/DD mutations data correspond to those in (B). Relevance of the Asp92 residue in PTEN activity in vivo  Remarkably, a mutation in the putative catalytic Asp92 residue to Asn (D92N) rendered a protein partially active in vivo in the yeast system, whereas substitution of this residue to any of the other 18 amino acids generated fully inactive PTEN enzymes (Fig. 5A). This outlines the importance of Asp92 in PTEN enzymatic activity, but also demonstrates that the presence of an aspartic acid residue at this position is not a strict requirement for PTEN-driven catalysis. To further substantiate this observation, the PIP3 phosphatase activity of the PTEN mutations D92A (non-conservative), D92E (charge-conservative) and D92N (size-conservative), expressed in mammalian cells, was tested both in vitro and in vivo. As shown, the mutations D92A and D92E fully abrogated hydrolysis of PIP3 by PTEN in vitro, whereas the mutation D92N only partially affected it (Fig. 5B). Upon co-expression with Akt, the D92N PTEN mutant also manifested more activity [indirectly measured as the levels of phospho-Akt (p-Akt) content] than the D92A or the D92E mutant proteins (Fig. 5C). Our results suggest that Asp92 does not behave as the general acid in the hydrolysis of PIP3 by PTEN, in vitro and in vivo.  Most of germline PTEN mutations associated with autism syndrome disorders do not fully abrogate PIP3 phosphatase activity  The involvement of PTEN in brain developmental disorders has been proposed on the basis of the identification of hereditary PTEN mutations in patients with these disorders (41,42), but little information is available on the severity of such mutations in terms of PTEN function. One of the mutations present in glioblastoma tumor samples (H93R) has also been found in the germline of a patient with autism (19). When performing the experiments shown above on tumor-related PTEN mutations, we included the H93R and found it to display a modest loss of activity in the yeast model when compared with wild-type PTEN, although it was capable of fully recovering yeast growth (Fig. 6B). This prompted us to examine additional inherited mutations found in patients with autism-related disorders (ASD) or with DD/mental retardation. These mutations included, besides H93R, the G44D, H118P, H123Q, M134T, E157G, R173H, Y176C, T202I, F241S, D252G, W274L, N276S and D326N, involving not only catalytic but other protein domains. Remarkably, proteins bearing most of these mutations were either fully or partially active in the yeast (Fig. 6B and Supplementary Material, Table S1), although their ability to recover growth from PI3K-imposed inhibition was variable. These results were in contrast to those obtained by analyzing the function of a panel of PHTS-associated mutations, also distributed along the entire PTEN coding region (mutations A34D, M35R, G36R, N48K, H61D, Y68D, D92E, H93Y, P96Q, H123D, C124S, G129E, R130G, Y155C, G165E, G165V, S170R, L181P, V217N, P246L, R335L, V343E; L345V and F347L; Fig. 6A and Supplementary Material, Table S1). Most of the PHTS-associated mutations generated total or partial loss of function when analyzed in vivo in yeast. Moreover, global comparison of PHTS- and ASD/DD-related mutations in terms of their ability both to deplete PIP3 generated by PI3K in yeast (Fig. 6C; P < 0.001) and to rescue yeast growth (Fig. 6D) revealed that ASD/DD-related PTEN mutations have a lower effect in PTEN activity than those associated with PHTS. These findings indicate that specific PTEN functional patterns correlate with the mutations found on either PHTS or ASD/DD patients and suggest that a severe loss of the PTEN PIP3 catalytic activity may not be the major driver of autism or autism-related neurological disorders.  DISCUSSION  The PTEN phosphatase is a key regulatory hub of PI3K-mediated signaling. While mammals express a variety of isoforms of PI3K and PIP3-dependent downstream kinases in this pathway, the PTEN tumor suppressor is rather unique, being the only one gene that encodes for a common inactivator of the pathway. Thus, mutations in exons of the PTEN gene are frequent in tumors and hereditary cancer syndromes. The regulation of PTEN is complex, involving multiple processes related to its phosphorylation, ubiquitination, nuclear translocation, interaction with membranes and complexing with different proteins (6,8,24,43,44). Although recent reports point towards PTEN functions independent of its lipid phosphatase activity (23–25,45,46), PTEN tumor suppressor function mainly relies on its catalytic activity on PIP3 pools locally generated by PI3K at the plasma membrane. The contribution of PTEN mutations isolated in the clinics to the function of the encoded protein is crucial to understand the molecular mechanisms that lead to tumor development and progression. We have developed a simple model for functional assessment of PTEN mutations based on heterologous expression in yeast (1,31). This model allows ready evaluation of the involvement of PTEN mutations on the ability to counteract PI3K activity in vivo, by compromising PTEN PIP3 catalytic activity or by affecting PTEN protein stability, two common mechanisms by which PTEN is inactivated in tumors (30). Here, we report extensive use of this model with two aims: (i) to provide clues for structure–function relationship by systematic mutagenesis and (ii) to study the influence of individual disease-related PTEN mutations in its lipid phosphatase activity.  From our systematic functional analysis on the PTEN catalytic loops, several conclusions can be driven. First, as expected, the P-loop including the catalytic Cys residue is very sensitive to mutagenesis, in consonance with the observation that it constitutes a hot spot for tumor-related mutations (11,15,33), whereas the WPD and TI loops are more permissive to point Ala substitutions. Still, residues like Asp92 or His93 (WPD-loop), Asp162, Val166 or Gln171 (TI-loop) were critical for function. We made a comprehensive study on tolerance to mutation of the Asp92 residue, equivalent to the acid proton donor involved in catalysis in PTPs that are structurally related to PTEN (47). Tolerance to mutation was very low in this residue, since its substitution to any other amino acid yielded an inactive enzyme, except for Asp-to-Asn substitution, which partially retained activity in vivo, not only in the yeast model but also in mammalian cells. Since the D92N mutation has been reported in the clinic, such reduced activity may substantially contribute to disease. Interestingly, this argues against the need for an acid residue in that position, revealing an alternative mechanism of catalysis for the PTEN phosphatase, as proposed by other authors based on in vitro experiments (28,29). We also made substitutions within the catalytic loops mimicking PTEN-related proteins, such as TPIP, TPTE, tensin and auxilin. Although these proteins possess distinct non-PTP-related domains that control protein targeting, protein–protein interactions and cell signaling, they share the presence of PTP- and C2-like domains with significant similarity with those from PTEN (2,3,48). With the exception of TPIP, PTEN-like proteins are predicted to be catalytically inactive, due either to the lack of essential residues at the catalytic site or to amino acid substitutions potentially deleterious for catalysis (35,49,50). Nevertheless, tensin2/C1-TEN has been proposed to be an active phosphatase, based on functional studies on a mutation that targets its putative catalytic cysteine residue (51). Our observations favor the hypothesis that the P-loop of TPIP might be competent for activity, whereas TPTE, tensins and auxilins would be inactive as phosphatases, as evidenced in other studies (35,52,53).  A large number of different PTEN mutations have been described in human tumors and in the germline of patients with PHTS or PHTS-related syndromes (11,15,33) [for updates, check HGMD (http://www.hgmd.cf.ac.uk/ac/index.php) and COSMIC (http://www.sanger.ac.uk/genetics/CGP/cosmic) databases]. These mutations target the PTEN gene not only at its coding regions, but also at exon–intron boundaries and promoter regions. Most of PTEN mutations at exon–intron boundaries or promoter regions have a major impact in the levels of expression of the PTEN protein, being causative of PTEN functional deficiency and considered as pathogenic (54–56). Mutations targeting the PTEN coding region include frame-shift and nonsense mutations, which also generate unstable truncated PTEN proteins in most of the cases (36), as well as missense mutations that result in individual amino acid changes. Functional analyses of a limited number of these missense mutations have revealed that, in many cases, the resultant amino acid substitutions generate PTEN proteins with impaired intrinsic catalytic activity and/or protein stability (36–39). Also, some examples have been described of missense PTEN mutations that do not affect the intrinsic catalysis nor the stability of the protein, but rather impair essential regulatory PTEN properties, such as binding to membranes or nuclear entry (40,57). Our previous study using the heterologous yeast system as a reporter of the activity of PTEN mutations in vivo revealed that such system reproduces with fidelity the effects on mammalian cells of mutations that diminish either the intrinsic PTEN catalytic activity and/or binding to membranes or the intrinsic PTEN protein stability (30). Our current comprehensive functional study of tumor-associated PTEN mutations indicates that almost all mutations targeting the P-catalytic loop confer loss of PTEN intrinsic catalytic activity (12 of 13), whereas mutations targeting the WPD- or the TI-loops are less frequently associated with full loss of catalysis (5 of 9 and 4 of 9, respectively). These results are in agreement with the Ala-scanning analysis of these regions and suggest the existence of a relatively large number of tumor-associated mutations at the PTEN gene that do not fully abrogate the PTEN catalytic activity, but may be relevant in clinics. Recently, a comprehensive study on PTEN mutations in PHTS disease has yielded predictive clinical parameters (58). Association of reported mutations to the activity of PTEN by means of ready in vivo functional assays, as the one exploited here, might help clinicians in decisions towards putative mutation-specific therapies.  PHTS and ASD/DD are syndromes with distinct clinical entities, which share macrocephaly as a frequent common alteration (59). Also, clinicians have noted that PHTS patients often display neurobehavioral features resembling autism (19) and, interestingly, at least five PTEN mutations (H93R, Y176C, F241S, D252G and R173H; see Supplementary Material, Table S1) have been reported as associated with both PHTS and ASD/DD (19,41,42,58). Our comparative analysis of germline mutations found in PHTS patients and in ASD/DD patients revealed a distinct functional pattern for these two groups of mutations. PHTS-associated mutations, which included in our study mutations distributed all along the PTEN protein, were found significantly more deleterious for PTEN catalysis than ASD/DD-associated mutations (Fig. 6). This could be important for the distinct etiology and progress of tumor-related and tumor non-related syndromes associated with PTEN mutations and may be of relevance in the design and implementation of new therapies for these diseases. It is likely that small variations in the lipid phosphatase activity or in the stability of heterozygotic PTEN mutations can explain the higher penetrance found for the set of PHTS-associated mutations, when compared with ASD/DD-associated mutations. Although it has been suggested that ASD- and macrocephaly-related PTEN mutations may behave differentially in terms of loss of function (19), the lack of functional models has made difficult to provide support for this hypothesis. If this is the case, as suggested by our study, additional unknown factors might exist affecting differentially the etiology and/or progression of these diseases. In this regard, a study focused on the functional analysis of the PHTS- and ASD-associated H93R PTEN mutation reported a partial loss of catalytic activity for this mutation, as well as a defect in the binding to PTEN-activating PIP2 model membranes. Remarkably, the binding of the H93R mutation to phosphatidylserine membranes, which are abundant in mammalian cells, was augmented (60). Our results show that the H93R mutation retained most of its lipid phosphatase activity in the yeast, suggesting that differences in the thresholds that control membrane-binding mediated PTEN activation may exist in distinct cell systems. Also of interest, mice with diminution of PTEN expression levels as subtle as 20% develop a wide spectrum of tumors with high penetrance, and it has been proposed that altered gene dosage may be relevant in ASD/DD (18,61). In this regard, ASD/DD has been linked with abnormal synapsis growth and plasticity, an alteration that has also been observed in mice with PTEN-deficient neurons (62,63). Furthermore, a mice model lacking PTEN expression in mature neuronal populations in the cerebral cortex and the hippocampus displayed behavioral abnormalities reminiscent of human ASD/DD (64). Our findings show a relatively weak association between ASD/DD-related mutations at the PTEN gene and full loss of intrinsic lipid phosphatase activity or protein stability, which is in line with the lack of concordance between ASD/DD and childhood cancer (65). ASD/DD constitutes a heterogeneous, multigene-linked group of developmental disorders (41,42,66). Further studies will be required to ascertain the functional changes on the activity of the PTEN protein from ASD/DD patients with mutations at the PTEN gene. The comprehensive analysis of the functional properties of putative pathogenic mutant proteins, as the one we present here for PTEN mutations, will give some light on the molecular pathways altered in the neurons of patients with ASD/DD.  MATERIALS AND METHODS  Cells, media, growth conditions, transfection and protein detection  The S. cerevisiae strain YPH499 (MATa ade2–101 trp1–63 leu2–1 ura3–52 his3-▵200 lys2–801) was used for heterologous expression of mammalian proteins. For all the analyses, synthetic complete medium was used, containing 0.17 % yeast nitrogen base without amino acids, 0.5% ammonium sulfate supplemented with appropriate amino acids and nucleic acid bases, and added 2% glucose (SD), galactose (SG) or raffinose (SR), as required. Yeasts were transformed by standard procedures. Growth of yeast on plates was tested by spotting transformant cells onto SD or SG plates lacking the corresponding auxotrophic markers. Transformants were grown overnight in SD lacking uracile, leucine or both (SD-U, SD-L or SD-UL) as required and adjusted to an OD600 of 0.5. Five microliter aliquots of each sample plus three serial 1/10 dilutions were deposited on the surfaces of solid media SG-U, SG-L or SG-UL. Growth was monitored after 2–3 days at 30°C. Expression of all PTEN mutations in yeast was verified by immunoblot on yeast lysates with 421B or 425A anti-PTEN mAb (67) followed by horseradish-peroxidase-conjugated anti-mouse antibody (Calbiochem). To measure GFP-Akt1 plasma membrane localization, as an indirect indicator of cellular PIP3 levels, transformant cells were grown to log phase in liquid SR medium lacking the corresponding auxotrophic markers, and then 2 % galactose was added for 6–8 h. GFP-Akt1 was visualized by fluorescence microscopy. To obtain statistically significant data, ≥100 cells were examined from each condition or experiment for either cytoplasmic or membrane-associated localization. Cells were examined under an Eclipse TE2000U microscope (Nikon) and digital images were acquired with Orca C4742-95-12ER charge-coupled device camera (Hamamatsu) and Aquacosmos Imaging Systems or HCImage software. To overexpress PTEN mutations in mammalian cells, COS-7 cells (simian kidney) were transfected by the DEAE-dextran method and processed after 48 h. To measure p-Akt content in COS-7 cells in the presence of PTEN mutations, cells were co-transfected with pRK5 PTEN and pSG5 HA-Akt1 as described (68). Cells were lysed, and post-nuclear lysates were subjected by immunoblot using a mixture of anti-p-Thr308 and anti-p-Ser473-Akt antibodies (Cell Signalling Technologies). Membranes were stripped and probed for anti-Akt antibody (Cell Signalling Technologies). Bands were quantified using ImageQuant TL software, and results are represented as the average ± SD of the p-Akt/Akt ratio.  Plasmids, mutagenesis and in vitro phosphatase assays  YCpLG myc-p110-CAAX, pYES2 PTEN, pRK5 PTEN, pSG5 HA-Akt1 and pYES3 GFP-Akt1 have been described previously (30). Mutagenesis was performed by a two-step PCR strategy. All mutations were checked by DNA sequencing. The sequences of oligonucleotides used for mutagenesis are available on request. In vitro phosphatase assays were made using PTEN wild-type or mutations, from COS-7-transfected cells, as the enzymes, and diC8-phosphatydilinositol PIP3 (Echelon) as the substrate, as described previously (30). 
2172||The PTEN (phosphatase and tensin homolog) phosphatase is unique in mammals in terms of its tumor suppressor activity, exerted by dephosphorylation of the lipid second messenger PIP3 (phosphatidylinositol 3,4,5-trisphosphate), which activates the phosphoinositide 3-kinase/Akt/mTOR (mammalian target of rapamycin) oncogenic pathway. Loss-of-function mutations in the PTEN gene are frequent in human cancer and in the germline of patients with PTEN hamartoma tumor-related syndromes (PHTSs). In addition, PTEN is mutated in patients with autism spectrum disorders (ASDs), although no functional information on these mutations is available. Here, we report a comprehensive in vivo functional analysis of human PTEN using a heterologous yeast reconstitution system. Ala-scanning mutagenesis at the catalytic loops of PTEN outlined the critical role of residues within the P-catalytic loop for PIP3 phosphatase activity in vivo. PTEN mutations that mimic the P-catalytic loop of mammalian PTEN-like proteins (TPTE, TPIP, tensins and auxilins) affected PTEN function variably, whereas tumor- or PHTS-associated mutations targeting the PTEN P-loop produced complete loss of function. Conversely, Ala-substitutions, as well as tumor-related mutations at the WPD- and TI-catalytic loops, displayed partial activity in many cases. Interestingly, a tumor-related D92N mutation was partially active, supporting the notion that the PTEN Asp92 residue might not function as the catalytic general acid. The analysis of a panel of ASD-associated hereditary PTEN mutations revealed that most of them did not substantially abrogate PTEN activity in vivo, whereas most of PHTS-associated mutations did. Our findings reveal distinctive functional patterns among PTEN mutations found in tumors and in the germline of PHTS and ASD patients, which could be relevant for therapy. Topic: mutation catalysis phosphoric monoester hydrolases yeasts neoplasms pten gene Issue Section: Articles INTRODUCTION  PTEN (phosphatase and tensin homolog deleted in chromosome 10) is a mammalian lipid and protein phosphatase with orthologs in lower animals, plants and fungi (1). In mammals, PTEN-related proteins exist whose activity has been poorly explored. These proteins include TPIP and TPTE (orthologs of a voltage-sensor phosphatase from Ciona intestinalis), as well as the actin-binding tensin 1/2/3 and the clathrin-binding auxilin 1/2 (2–4). PTEN most relevant function is based on its ability to dephosphorylate phosphatidylinositol 3,4,5-trisphosphate (PIP3) in the 3′ phosphate of the inositol ring, resulting in the bisphosphate product phosphatidylinositol 4,5-bisphosphate (PIP2), thus broadly inhibiting the oncogenic phosphoinositide 3-kinase (PI3K)-dependent signaling (5–8). As a tumor suppressor, PTEN exerts its function by counteracting the anti-apoptotic and growth stimulatory effects of PDK1 (phosphoinositide-dependent kinase) and protein kinase B (PKB/Akt), which rely on PIP3 for their activation (9,10). Sporadic somatic mutations in PTEN make this tumor suppressor gene one of the two most frequently affected in human malignancies, together with p53, especially in solid tumors (11–14). Germline mutations of PTEN lead to inherited hamartoma, Cowden syndrome and related disorders, generally known as PTEN hamartoma tumor-related syndromes (PHTSs) (15–17). PTEN is considered haploinsufficient to prevent certain malignancies, suggesting that dosage is important for its function, as it must be the influence of a given point mutation in the catalytic activity of the enzyme (18). Besides its clear involvement in PHTS, germline PTEN mutations have been described in patients with neurodevelopmental disorders, such as autism spectrum disorders (ASDs) and developmental delay (DD) (19–22). Oncogenic PTEN mutations have been generally related to a loss of function of the encoded phosphatase. However, few studies have been done to understand the influence of putative neurodevelopment-related PTEN mutations on its catalytic activity.  Although phosphatase-independent functions of PTEN have also been described to contribute to its tumor suppressive activity (8,23–25), buffering PI3K signaling in virtue of its catalytic activity is assumed to be its key role. Thus, the precise dissection of PTEN catalytic properties is highly relevant for human disease. The crystal structure of PTEN (26) revealed an active site pocket similar to those of protein tyrosine phosphatases (PTPs) and dual-specificity Thr/Ser/Tyr phosphatases, as predicted by primary sequence analyses, although richer in basic residues. This explained the ability of PTEN to dephosphorylate acidic phosphopeptides (27). In addition, the PTEN active site pocket was wider than that of PTPs, to accommodate the rather bulky phosphorylated inositol moiety that constitutes the polar head of PIP3 (26). The PTEN phosphatase signature motif ([123]HCKAGKGR[130]; P-loop), including the catalytic Cys124 and Arg130 residues, is located at the bottom of the active site pocket. The walls of the pocket are delimited in part by a WPD-loop (thus designed after the equivalent region in PTP1B) and a TI-loop (so named because of conserved Thr and Ile residues), which are thought to be important for the activity of the enzyme. The fact that the Asp92, within the PTEN WPD-loop, is located in the pocket in an identical fashion to the equivalent proton donor catalytic residue on PTP1B led to the hypothesis that it may serve as the general acid that allows protonation of the leaving phosphate during the dephosphorylation reaction. Although in vitro studies using an Asp92 to Ala PTEN mutation indicated that Asp92 does not act as the general acid (28,29), no conclusive studies have been done to analyze the contribution of Asp92 in the in vivo dephosphorylation of PIP3 by PTEN.  We have previously validated a humanized yeast model to study the function of PI3K and PTEN in vivo, based on the heterologous co-expression of these proteins (1,30,31). Briefly, expression of hyperactive p110α, the catalytic subunit of mammalian class I PI3K, results in high toxicity in yeast cells as a result of the depletion of essential PIP2 pools. Co-expression of PTEN restores PIP2 levels and suppresses PI3K toxicity. Besides, co-expression of GFP-tagged mammalian Akt in this system allowed the detection of pools of PI3K-generated PIP3 in the yeast cell, where Akt localized, providing a visual readout of PI3K and PTEN activities (30,32). Here, we present an extensive site-directed mutagenesis and functional study of PTEN by using this system. Humanized yeast-based bioassays combine the advantages of powerful yeast genetics, an ever-growing availability of post-genomic tools, their ease and safety of manipulation and the fast achievement of results (1). Our results offer insights into the catalytic properties of PTEN and provide a platform to compare in vivo the contribution to lipid phosphatase inactivation of mutations found in tumors and in the germline of patients with PTEN-related syndromes. Our analysis reveals that PTEN germline mutations found in patients with ASD/DD neurodevelopmental disorders do not generally confer complete loss of function of the PTEN PIP3 phosphatase activity, when compared with mutations found in the germline of PHTS patients with tumor disorders.  RESULTS  Ala-scanning of the catalytic loops at the PTEN active site  The PIP3 lipid phosphatase activity of PTEN is essential for its tumor suppressor activity, which is evidenced by the abundance of tumor-related mutations in exons encoding the catalytic phosphatase core of the enzyme (11,15,33). Thus, the precise definition of PIP3 catalytic properties of PTEN in vivo, and its relation with PTEN residues mutated in tumor samples or in patients, is highly relevant in oncology. The PTEN active site is conformed by three catalytic loops (26): the WPD-loop, residues 88–98; the P-loop, residues 121–131; and the TI-loop, residues 160–171 (Fig. 1A). The P-catalytic loop (containing the essential catalytic cysteine; Cys124 in human PTEN) is highly conserved between species, from mammals to lower eukaryotes, whereas the WPD- and TI-loops are more divergent (Fig. 1B). To test the contribution of all individual residues within the three PTEN catalytic loops to the in vivo activity of the enzyme, a comprehensive Ala-scanning mutagenesis was performed. The PIP3 catalytic activity of the resulting mutations was assessed in vivo using a reconstitution heterologous system in the yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae (31). As illustrated in Figure 2, Ala substitutions of the residues at the core P-loop (residues 121–131) substantially abrogated the PTEN ability to dephosphorylate PIP3in vivo, with the exception of the A121V, G129A and T131A mutations, which displayed partial or total activity (note that Ala residues have been substituted by Val residues in our Ala-scanning mutational analysis). Remarkably, a Cowden disease mutation targeting the Gly129 residue (G129E) is defective for PIP3 phosphatase activity but maintains in vitro activity against phosphotyrosine peptides (34). Overall, the residues at the WPD- and TI-loops were less important for PIP3 catalytic activity. Thus, Ala substitutions of most WPD residues (88–98) did not affect, or only partially affected, PTEN catalytic activity, with the exception of Asp92 and His93 that fully abrogated the PTEN function (Fig. 2). Also, Ala substitutions of most TI residues (160–171) only weakly affected the PTEN activity, except for Val166, Gln171 and, to some extent, Asp162. (Fig. 2) The loss-of-function properties of the D92A mutation is in accordance with the importance of this residue in PTEN phosphatase catalysis, although its role as the general acid in the hydrolysis reaction remains unclear (28,29).  Figure 1. PTEN catalytic loops. (A) Detail of the three-dimensional structure of the PTEN catalytic site. Regions spanning the WPD-, P- and TI-catalytic loops are marked in yellow, red and blue, respectively. Image was generated with PyMOL (http://pymol.org), based on PDB ID: 1D5R (26). (B) Amino acid sequence alignment of PTEN catalytic loops from Homo sapiens, Danio rerio, Strongylocentrotus purpuratus, Drosophila melanogaster, Caenorhabditis elegans, Dictyostelium discoideum, Schizosaccharomyces pombe and S. cerevisiae. (C) Amino acid sequence alignment of PTEN catalytic loops with the equivalent regions from PTEN-like proteins (H. sapiens sequences). Amino acid numbering from H. sapiens PTEN is in brackets. Amino acid identity with regard to H. sapiens PTEN is marked in yellow. Alignments were made manually. View largeDownload slide PTEN catalytic loops. (A) Detail of the three-dimensional structure of the PTEN catalytic site. Regions spanning the WPD-, P- and TI-catalytic loops are marked in yellow, red and blue, respectively. Image was generated with PyMOL (http://pymol.org), based on PDB ID: 1D5R (26). (B) Amino acid sequence alignment of PTEN catalytic loops from Homo sapiens, Danio rerio, Strongylocentrotus purpuratus, Drosophila melanogaster, Caenorhabditis elegans, Dictyostelium discoideum, Schizosaccharomyces pombe and S. cerevisiae. (C) Amino acid sequence alignment of PTEN catalytic loops with the equivalent regions from PTEN-like proteins (H. sapiens sequences). Amino acid numbering from H. sapiens PTEN is in brackets. Amino acid identity with regard to H. sapiens PTEN is marked in yellow. Alignments were made manually. Figure 2. Functional assessment in the yeast in vivo model of Ala-scanning mutations covering the PTEN catalytic site. YPH499 S. cerevisiae transformants expressing p110α-CAAX, GFP-Akt1 and PTEN mutations [Ala substitutions of the indicated amino acids: residues 88–98 at the WPD-loop, residues 121–131 at the P-loop (catalytic Cys in bold), residues 160–171 at the T-loop; Val substitutions in the case of residues Ala121 and Ala126] were incubated for 5 h in the presence of galactose (all heterologous proteins are co-expressed from the GAL1 galactose-inducible promoter), and GFP staining was monitored by fluorescence microscopy. As a reference, controls expressing wild-type (WT) PTEN or the empty vector (φ) are shown at the top (left). Black-color bars indicates the percentage of cells with plasma membrane GFP stain (high PIP3 levels = low PTEN activity), whereas white color corresponds to the percentage of cells that display a nucleocytoplasmic GFP signal (low PIP3 levels = high PTEN activity). Over 100 cells were analyzed microscopically per experiment. Data are the average from three different experiments. Error bars correspond to the standard deviation. (+) or (−) signs indicate the ability of each PTEN mutation to rescue growth arrest induced by p110α-CAAX, as determined by serial dilution drop growth assays on solid medium (see inlet at the top as a reference). The drop growth experiments were performed on co-transformants expressing only p110α-CAAX and the indicated PTEN mutation. Asterisks (*) mark mutations to Ala that have been reported in tumors/germline PHTS. View largeDownload slide Functional assessment in the yeast in vivo model of Ala-scanning mutations covering the PTEN catalytic site. YPH499 S. cerevisiae transformants expressing p110α-CAAX, GFP-Akt1 and PTEN mutations [Ala substitutions of the indicated amino acids: residues 88–98 at the WPD-loop, residues 121–131 at the P-loop (catalytic Cys in bold), residues 160–171 at the T-loop; Val substitutions in the case of residues Ala121 and Ala126] were incubated for 5 h in the presence of galactose (all heterologous proteins are co-expressed from the GAL1 galactose-inducible promoter), and GFP staining was monitored by fluorescence microscopy. As a reference, controls expressing wild-type (WT) PTEN or the empty vector (φ) are shown at the top (left). Black-color bars indicates the percentage of cells with plasma membrane GFP stain (high PIP3 levels = low PTEN activity), whereas white color corresponds to the percentage of cells that display a nucleocytoplasmic GFP signal (low PIP3 levels = high PTEN activity). Over 100 cells were analyzed microscopically per experiment. Data are the average from three different experiments. Error bars correspond to the standard deviation. (+) or (−) signs indicate the ability of each PTEN mutation to rescue growth arrest induced by p110α-CAAX, as determined by serial dilution drop growth assays on solid medium (see inlet at the top as a reference). The drop growth experiments were performed on co-transformants expressing only p110α-CAAX and the indicated PTEN mutation. Asterisks (*) mark mutations to Ala that have been reported in tumors/germline PHTS. Functional analysis of mutations at the PTEN P-loop mimicking PTEN-like proteins  PTEN-like proteins include TPIP and TPTE, as well as tensins and auxilins. The WPD- and TI-loops are divergent between PTEN and PTEN-like proteins, whereas the P-loop is more conserved (Fig. 1C). As part of our mutational analysis of the PTEN active site, we designed single amino acid substitution mutants on PTEN that mimicked the P-loop from the different PTEN-like proteins and tested their PIP3 phosphatase activity in the yeast system. Mutations included A121V, I122L, I122V, H123Y, C124N, K125L, K125M, K125R, A126D, A126G, G127N, K128R, K128T, G129D, G129A, R130A, R130K, T131I, T131L and T131S (note that A121V, G129A and R130A mutations are included in Fig. 2). A group of mutations (H123Y, C124N, A126D, G127N, K128T, G129D, R130A, R130K, T131I and T131L) fully abrogated the PIP3 phosphatase activity of PTEN in yeast, whereas other two groups only affected partially (I122L, K125L, K125M, A126G and K128R) or did not affect PTEN PIP3 phosphatase activity (A121V, I122V, K125R, G129A and T131S) (Fig. 3; note that results for A121V, G129A and R130A mutations are included in Fig. 2). The results from this mutational analysis are in agreement with the in vitro PIP3 phosphatase activity reported for TPIP and with the lack of activity reported for TPTE (35). Our results also suggest that the P-loops from tensin and auxilin proteins do not bear catalytic activity. Moreover, this analysis revealed that some conservative mutations at the PTEN P-loop (such as I122V, K125R and T131S) are permissive for its activity in vivo.  Figure 3. Functional assessment of PTEN mutations mimicking the P-loop sequence from PTEN-like proteins. Experiments were performed and are presented as in Figure 2. The alignment marks divergences within the P-loop sequence between PTEN and PTEN-related proteins, which correspond to the substitutions made in the PTEN-mutated versions. The numbering of residues for PTEN is shown. ‘=’ indicates the same residue at that position than PTEN. The data for substitutions marked in italics in this alignment are already presented in Figure 2. The asterisk marks a mutation reported in tumors/germline PHTS. View largeDownload slide Functional assessment of PTEN mutations mimicking the P-loop sequence from PTEN-like proteins. Experiments were performed and are presented as in Figure 2. The alignment marks divergences within the P-loop sequence between PTEN and PTEN-related proteins, which correspond to the substitutions made in the PTEN-mutated versions. The numbering of residues for PTEN is shown. ‘=’ indicates the same residue at that position than PTEN. The data for substitutions marked in italics in this alignment are already presented in Figure 2. The asterisk marks a mutation reported in tumors/germline PHTS. Functional analysis of tumor-related mutations targeting PTEN active site residues  Tumor-related mutations are spread along the entire PTEN amino acid sequence. Nevertheless, the PTEN C-terminal tail (last 50 residues) is targeted by mutations less frequently, in agreement with our previous finding using the yeast heterologous system that PTEN 1–349 is the minimal fully functional PTEN protein (30). On the other hand, the core PTP catalytic domain (residues 14–185) is more frequently targeted by mutations in either tumors or PHTS patients. Some of these mutations have been analyzed in terms of intrinsic catalytic activity (36–40), but the majority of them have not been directly tested for function. We have analyzed in the yeast system the PIP3 phosphatase activity of tumor-related mutations targeting PTEN residues at the PTEN catalytic loops (note that some of these mutations have been analyzed previously and are shown in Figs 2 and 3; and Figs 5 and 6 also include some of them). As expected, all the tumor mutations at the P-loop tested (A121E, I122S, H123D, H123Y, C124S, K125E, A126S, A126V, G127E, K128N, G129E, G129V, G129R, R130G, T131A and T131I) gave rise to proteins that were fully inactive, except for A126S and K128N that produced partially inactive proteins (Fig. 4 and Figs 2 and 3). Mutations at the TI-loop included T160I, R161G, D162G, G165E, G165V, V166I, T167A, I168F, P169H and S170R. Among these, only the T160I, G165E, G165V and S170R were loss-of-function mutations (Fig. 4 and Fig. 2). Finally, tumor-related mutations targeting the WPD loop included Y88C, F90L, E91A, D92A, D92E, D92G, D92H, D92N, D92V, H93D, H93Q, H93R, H93Y, N94I, P95L and P96Q. Proteins bearing Y88C, F90L or E91A mutations were active, whereas the rest of mutant proteins were partially or fully inactive (Fig. 4 and Figs 2, 5 and 6). A summary of the tumor-related PTEN mutants analyzed is shown in Supplementary Material, Table S1. Taken together, our findings illustrate the heterogeneity in the catalytic activity of tumor-related PTEN mutant proteins.  Figure 4. Functional assessment of tumor-related PTEN mutations targeting PTEN catalytic loops. Experiments were performed as those in Figure 2. View largeDownload slide Functional assessment of tumor-related PTEN mutations targeting PTEN catalytic loops. Experiments were performed as those in Figure 2. Figure 5. Functional assessment of PTEN mutations targeting the Asp92 residue. (A) Tolerance to mutation of the Asp92 residue. Mutations were assessed in yeast, as those in Figure 2. Asterisks mark mutations that have been reported in tumors/germline PHTS. The image at the right corresponds to growth rescue assays from representative PTEN mutations and controls from the data presented. (B) In vitro phosphatase activity of recombinant PTEN proteins purified from COS-7 cell line transfectants, as determined by the malachite green assay, using diC8-phosphatydilinositol PIP3 as the substrate. Data are the average from three independent experiments. Error bars correspond to the standard deviation. (C) Ability of PTEN mutations to abolish HA-Akt activation in mammalian cells. PTEN wild-type or the indicated mutations were co-expressed with HA-Akt1 in COS-7 cells. Cell-free lysates were subjected to immunoblot using anti-phospho-active-Akt antibodies (p-Thr308 and p-Ser473). The content of PTEN and HA-Akt1 in the lysates was monitored using anti-PTEN (all PTEN mutations were expressed equally, not shown) and anti-HA antibodies, respectively. Bands were quantified and results are presented as the average ± SD of the p-Akt/Akt ratio, obtained from three independent experiments. View largeDownload slide Functional assessment of PTEN mutations targeting the Asp92 residue. (A) Tolerance to mutation of the Asp92 residue. Mutations were assessed in yeast, as those in Figure 2. Asterisks mark mutations that have been reported in tumors/germline PHTS. The image at the right corresponds to growth rescue assays from representative PTEN mutations and controls from the data presented. (B) In vitro phosphatase activity of recombinant PTEN proteins purified from COS-7 cell line transfectants, as determined by the malachite green assay, using diC8-phosphatydilinositol PIP3 as the substrate. Data are the average from three independent experiments. Error bars correspond to the standard deviation. (C) Ability of PTEN mutations to abolish HA-Akt activation in mammalian cells. PTEN wild-type or the indicated mutations were co-expressed with HA-Akt1 in COS-7 cells. Cell-free lysates were subjected to immunoblot using anti-phospho-active-Akt antibodies (p-Thr308 and p-Ser473). The content of PTEN and HA-Akt1 in the lysates was monitored using anti-PTEN (all PTEN mutations were expressed equally, not shown) and anti-HA antibodies, respectively. Bands were quantified and results are presented as the average ± SD of the p-Akt/Akt ratio, obtained from three independent experiments. Figure 6. Functional assessment of PTEN mutations related to PHTS (A) or ASD/DD (B) hereditary syndromes. Experiments were performed as described in Figure 2. Asterisks in (B) mark mutations that have been reported in germline PHTS. (C) Global functional analyses of the impact on catalytic activity of PHTS- versus ASD/DD-related mutations. The y-axis refers to relative in vivo PTEN activity, as measured by the percentage of yeast cells with low PIP3 levels at the plasma membrane, as determined by GFP-Akt1 localization (as in Figs 2–4 and 6A). Each spot corresponds to the average data from three independent experiments on each particular mutation from the indicated category (PHTS or ASD/DD). Spots surrounded by a circle correspond to mutations that are common to PHTS or ASD/DD [those marked with asterisks in (B)]. Vertical lines mark the standard deviation. Paired t-test of these independent set of data revealed a significant difference in activity for ASD/DD mutations with respect to PHTS mutations (P < 0.001). (D) Comparative analysis of PHTS and ASD/DD PTEN mutations referred to their ability to rescue growth arrest induced in S. cerevisiae by p110α-CAAX expression. ASD/DD-related mutations are generally more competent than PHTS-related mutations in counteracting p110α-CAAX activity. PHTS mutations included in this study are listed in Supplementary Material, Table S1, and results correspond to those in (A) and in Figures 4 and 5. ASD/DD mutations data correspond to those in (B). View large Download slide Functional assessment of PTEN mutations related to PHTS (A) or ASD/DD (B) hereditary syndromes. Experiments were performed as described in Figure 2. Asterisks in (B) mark mutations that have been reported in germline PHTS. (C) Global functional analyses of the impact on catalytic activity of PHTS- versus ASD/DD-related mutations. The y-axis refers to relative in vivo PTEN activity, as measured by the percentage of yeast cells with low PIP3 levels at the plasma membrane, as determined by GFP-Akt1 localization (as in Figs 2–4 and 6A). Each spot corresponds to the average data from three independent experiments on each particular mutation from the indicated category (PHTS or ASD/DD). Spots surrounded by a circle correspond to mutations that are common to PHTS or ASD/DD [those marked with asterisks in (B)]. Vertical lines mark the standard deviation. Paired t-test of these independent set of data revealed a significant difference in activity for ASD/DD mutations with respect to PHTS mutations (P < 0.001). (D) Comparative analysis of PHTS and ASD/DD PTEN mutations referred to their ability to rescue growth arrest induced in S. cerevisiae by p110α-CAAX expression. ASD/DD-related mutations are generally more competent than PHTS-related mutations in counteracting p110α-CAAX activity. PHTS mutations included in this study are listed in Supplementary Material, Table S1, and results correspond to those in (A) and in Figures 4 and 5. ASD/DD mutations data correspond to those in (B). Relevance of the Asp92 residue in PTEN activity in vivo  Remarkably, a mutation in the putative catalytic Asp92 residue to Asn (D92N) rendered a protein partially active in vivo in the yeast system, whereas substitution of this residue to any of the other 18 amino acids generated fully inactive PTEN enzymes (Fig. 5A). This outlines the importance of Asp92 in PTEN enzymatic activity, but also demonstrates that the presence of an aspartic acid residue at this position is not a strict requirement for PTEN-driven catalysis. To further substantiate this observation, the PIP3 phosphatase activity of the PTEN mutations D92A (non-conservative), D92E (charge-conservative) and D92N (size-conservative), expressed in mammalian cells, was tested both in vitro and in vivo. As shown, the mutations D92A and D92E fully abrogated hydrolysis of PIP3 by PTEN in vitro, whereas the mutation D92N only partially affected it (Fig. 5B). Upon co-expression with Akt, the D92N PTEN mutant also manifested more activity [indirectly measured as the levels of phospho-Akt (p-Akt) content] than the D92A or the D92E mutant proteins (Fig. 5C). Our results suggest that Asp92 does not behave as the general acid in the hydrolysis of PIP3 by PTEN, in vitro and in vivo.  Most of germline PTEN mutations associated with autism syndrome disorders do not fully abrogate PIP3 phosphatase activity  The involvement of PTEN in brain developmental disorders has been proposed on the basis of the identification of hereditary PTEN mutations in patients with these disorders (41,42), but little information is available on the severity of such mutations in terms of PTEN function. One of the mutations present in glioblastoma tumor samples (H93R) has also been found in the germline of a patient with autism (19). When performing the experiments shown above on tumor-related PTEN mutations, we included the H93R and found it to display a modest loss of activity in the yeast model when compared with wild-type PTEN, although it was capable of fully recovering yeast growth (Fig. 6B). This prompted us to examine additional inherited mutations found in patients with autism-related disorders (ASD) or with DD/mental retardation. These mutations included, besides H93R, the G44D, H118P, H123Q, M134T, E157G, R173H, Y176C, T202I, F241S, D252G, W274L, N276S and D326N, involving not only catalytic but other protein domains. Remarkably, proteins bearing most of these mutations were either fully or partially active in the yeast (Fig. 6B and Supplementary Material, Table S1), although their ability to recover growth from PI3K-imposed inhibition was variable. These results were in contrast to those obtained by analyzing the function of a panel of PHTS-associated mutations, also distributed along the entire PTEN coding region (mutations A34D, M35R, G36R, N48K, H61D, Y68D, D92E, H93Y, P96Q, H123D, C124S, G129E, R130G, Y155C, G165E, G165V, S170R, L181P, V217N, P246L, R335L, V343E; L345V and F347L; Fig. 6A and Supplementary Material, Table S1). Most of the PHTS-associated mutations generated total or partial loss of function when analyzed in vivo in yeast. Moreover, global comparison of PHTS- and ASD/DD-related mutations in terms of their ability both to deplete PIP3 generated by PI3K in yeast (Fig. 6C; P < 0.001) and to rescue yeast growth (Fig. 6D) revealed that ASD/DD-related PTEN mutations have a lower effect in PTEN activity than those associated with PHTS. These findings indicate that specific PTEN functional patterns correlate with the mutations found on either PHTS or ASD/DD patients and suggest that a severe loss of the PTEN PIP3 catalytic activity may not be the major driver of autism or autism-related neurological disorders.  DISCUSSION  The PTEN phosphatase is a key regulatory hub of PI3K-mediated signaling. While mammals express a variety of isoforms of PI3K and PIP3-dependent downstream kinases in this pathway, the PTEN tumor suppressor is rather unique, being the only one gene that encodes for a common inactivator of the pathway. Thus, mutations in exons of the PTEN gene are frequent in tumors and hereditary cancer syndromes. The regulation of PTEN is complex, involving multiple processes related to its phosphorylation, ubiquitination, nuclear translocation, interaction with membranes and complexing with different proteins (6,8,24,43,44). Although recent reports point towards PTEN functions independent of its lipid phosphatase activity (23–25,45,46), PTEN tumor suppressor function mainly relies on its catalytic activity on PIP3 pools locally generated by PI3K at the plasma membrane. The contribution of PTEN mutations isolated in the clinics to the function of the encoded protein is crucial to understand the molecular mechanisms that lead to tumor development and progression. We have developed a simple model for functional assessment of PTEN mutations based on heterologous expression in yeast (1,31). This model allows ready evaluation of the involvement of PTEN mutations on the ability to counteract PI3K activity in vivo, by compromising PTEN PIP3 catalytic activity or by affecting PTEN protein stability, two common mechanisms by which PTEN is inactivated in tumors (30). Here, we report extensive use of this model with two aims: (i) to provide clues for structure–function relationship by systematic mutagenesis and (ii) to study the influence of individual disease-related PTEN mutations in its lipid phosphatase activity.  From our systematic functional analysis on the PTEN catalytic loops, several conclusions can be driven. First, as expected, the P-loop including the catalytic Cys residue is very sensitive to mutagenesis, in consonance with the observation that it constitutes a hot spot for tumor-related mutations (11,15,33), whereas the WPD and TI loops are more permissive to point Ala substitutions. Still, residues like Asp92 or His93 (WPD-loop), Asp162, Val166 or Gln171 (TI-loop) were critical for function. We made a comprehensive study on tolerance to mutation of the Asp92 residue, equivalent to the acid proton donor involved in catalysis in PTPs that are structurally related to PTEN (47). Tolerance to mutation was very low in this residue, since its substitution to any other amino acid yielded an inactive enzyme, except for Asp-to-Asn substitution, which partially retained activity in vivo, not only in the yeast model but also in mammalian cells. Since the D92N mutation has been reported in the clinic, such reduced activity may substantially contribute to disease. Interestingly, this argues against the need for an acid residue in that position, revealing an alternative mechanism of catalysis for the PTEN phosphatase, as proposed by other authors based on in vitro experiments (28,29). We also made substitutions within the catalytic loops mimicking PTEN-related proteins, such as TPIP, TPTE, tensin and auxilin. Although these proteins possess distinct non-PTP-related domains that control protein targeting, protein–protein interactions and cell signaling, they share the presence of PTP- and C2-like domains with significant similarity with those from PTEN (2,3,48). With the exception of TPIP, PTEN-like proteins are predicted to be catalytically inactive, due either to the lack of essential residues at the catalytic site or to amino acid substitutions potentially deleterious for catalysis (35,49,50). Nevertheless, tensin2/C1-TEN has been proposed to be an active phosphatase, based on functional studies on a mutation that targets its putative catalytic cysteine residue (51). Our observations favor the hypothesis that the P-loop of TPIP might be competent for activity, whereas TPTE, tensins and auxilins would be inactive as phosphatases, as evidenced in other studies (35,52,53).  A large number of different PTEN mutations have been described in human tumors and in the germline of patients with PHTS or PHTS-related syndromes (11,15,33) [for updates, check HGMD (http://www.hgmd.cf.ac.uk/ac/index.php) and COSMIC (http://www.sanger.ac.uk/genetics/CGP/cosmic) databases]. These mutations target the PTEN gene not only at its coding regions, but also at exon–intron boundaries and promoter regions. Most of PTEN mutations at exon–intron boundaries or promoter regions have a major impact in the levels of expression of the PTEN protein, being causative of PTEN functional deficiency and considered as pathogenic (54–56). Mutations targeting the PTEN coding region include frame-shift and nonsense mutations, which also generate unstable truncated PTEN proteins in most of the cases (36), as well as missense mutations that result in individual amino acid changes. Functional analyses of a limited number of these missense mutations have revealed that, in many cases, the resultant amino acid substitutions generate PTEN proteins with impaired intrinsic catalytic activity and/or protein stability (36–39). Also, some examples have been described of missense PTEN mutations that do not affect the intrinsic catalysis nor the stability of the protein, but rather impair essential regulatory PTEN properties, such as binding to membranes or nuclear entry (40,57). Our previous study using the heterologous yeast system as a reporter of the activity of PTEN mutations in vivo revealed that such system reproduces with fidelity the effects on mammalian cells of mutations that diminish either the intrinsic PTEN catalytic activity and/or binding to membranes or the intrinsic PTEN protein stability (30). Our current comprehensive functional study of tumor-associated PTEN mutations indicates that almost all mutations targeting the P-catalytic loop confer loss of PTEN intrinsic catalytic activity (12 of 13), whereas mutations targeting the WPD- or the TI-loops are less frequently associated with full loss of catalysis (5 of 9 and 4 of 9, respectively). These results are in agreement with the Ala-scanning analysis of these regions and suggest the existence of a relatively large number of tumor-associated mutations at the PTEN gene that do not fully abrogate the PTEN catalytic activity, but may be relevant in clinics. Recently, a comprehensive study on PTEN mutations in PHTS disease has yielded predictive clinical parameters (58). Association of reported mutations to the activity of PTEN by means of ready in vivo functional assays, as the one exploited here, might help clinicians in decisions towards putative mutation-specific therapies.  PHTS and ASD/DD are syndromes with distinct clinical entities, which share macrocephaly as a frequent common alteration (59). Also, clinicians have noted that PHTS patients often display neurobehavioral features resembling autism (19) and, interestingly, at least five PTEN mutations (H93R, Y176C, F241S, D252G and R173H; see Supplementary Material, Table S1) have been reported as associated with both PHTS and ASD/DD (19,41,42,58). Our comparative analysis of germline mutations found in PHTS patients and in ASD/DD patients revealed a distinct functional pattern for these two groups of mutations. PHTS-associated mutations, which included in our study mutations distributed all along the PTEN protein, were found significantly more deleterious for PTEN catalysis than ASD/DD-associated mutations (Fig. 6). This could be important for the distinct etiology and progress of tumor-related and tumor non-related syndromes associated with PTEN mutations and may be of relevance in the design and implementation of new therapies for these diseases. It is likely that small variations in the lipid phosphatase activity or in the stability of heterozygotic PTEN mutations can explain the higher penetrance found for the set of PHTS-associated mutations, when compared with ASD/DD-associated mutations. Although it has been suggested that ASD- and macrocephaly-related PTEN mutations may behave differentially in terms of loss of function (19), the lack of functional models has made difficult to provide support for this hypothesis. If this is the case, as suggested by our study, additional unknown factors might exist affecting differentially the etiology and/or progression of these diseases. In this regard, a study focused on the functional analysis of the PHTS- and ASD-associated H93R PTEN mutation reported a partial loss of catalytic activity for this mutation, as well as a defect in the binding to PTEN-activating PIP2 model membranes. Remarkably, the binding of the H93R mutation to phosphatidylserine membranes, which are abundant in mammalian cells, was augmented (60). Our results show that the H93R mutation retained most of its lipid phosphatase activity in the yeast, suggesting that differences in the thresholds that control membrane-binding mediated PTEN activation may exist in distinct cell systems. Also of interest, mice with diminution of PTEN expression levels as subtle as 20% develop a wide spectrum of tumors with high penetrance, and it has been proposed that altered gene dosage may be relevant in ASD/DD (18,61). In this regard, ASD/DD has been linked with abnormal synapsis growth and plasticity, an alteration that has also been observed in mice with PTEN-deficient neurons (62,63). Furthermore, a mice model lacking PTEN expression in mature neuronal populations in the cerebral cortex and the hippocampus displayed behavioral abnormalities reminiscent of human ASD/DD (64). Our findings show a relatively weak association between ASD/DD-related mutations at the PTEN gene and full loss of intrinsic lipid phosphatase activity or protein stability, which is in line with the lack of concordance between ASD/DD and childhood cancer (65). ASD/DD constitutes a heterogeneous, multigene-linked group of developmental disorders (41,42,66). Further studies will be required to ascertain the functional changes on the activity of the PTEN protein from ASD/DD patients with mutations at the PTEN gene. The comprehensive analysis of the functional properties of putative pathogenic mutant proteins, as the one we present here for PTEN mutations, will give some light on the molecular pathways altered in the neurons of patients with ASD/DD.  MATERIALS AND METHODS  Cells, media, growth conditions, transfection and protein detection  The S. cerevisiae strain YPH499 (MATa ade2–101 trp1–63 leu2–1 ura3–52 his3-▵200 lys2–801) was used for heterologous expression of mammalian proteins. For all the analyses, synthetic complete medium was used, containing 0.17 % yeast nitrogen base without amino acids, 0.5% ammonium sulfate supplemented with appropriate amino acids and nucleic acid bases, and added 2% glucose (SD), galactose (SG) or raffinose (SR), as required. Yeasts were transformed by standard procedures. Growth of yeast on plates was tested by spotting transformant cells onto SD or SG plates lacking the corresponding auxotrophic markers. Transformants were grown overnight in SD lacking uracile, leucine or both (SD-U, SD-L or SD-UL) as required and adjusted to an OD600 of 0.5. Five microliter aliquots of each sample plus three serial 1/10 dilutions were deposited on the surfaces of solid media SG-U, SG-L or SG-UL. Growth was monitored after 2–3 days at 30°C. Expression of all PTEN mutations in yeast was verified by immunoblot on yeast lysates with 421B or 425A anti-PTEN mAb (67) followed by horseradish-peroxidase-conjugated anti-mouse antibody (Calbiochem). To measure GFP-Akt1 plasma membrane localization, as an indirect indicator of cellular PIP3 levels, transformant cells were grown to log phase in liquid SR medium lacking the corresponding auxotrophic markers, and then 2 % galactose was added for 6–8 h. GFP-Akt1 was visualized by fluorescence microscopy. To obtain statistically significant data, ≥100 cells were examined from each condition or experiment for either cytoplasmic or membrane-associated localization. Cells were examined under an Eclipse TE2000U microscope (Nikon) and digital images were acquired with Orca C4742-95-12ER charge-coupled device camera (Hamamatsu) and Aquacosmos Imaging Systems or HCImage software. To overexpress PTEN mutations in mammalian cells, COS-7 cells (simian kidney) were transfected by the DEAE-dextran method and processed after 48 h. To measure p-Akt content in COS-7 cells in the presence of PTEN mutations, cells were co-transfected with pRK5 PTEN and pSG5 HA-Akt1 as described (68). Cells were lysed, and post-nuclear lysates were subjected by immunoblot using a mixture of anti-p-Thr308 and anti-p-Ser473-Akt antibodies (Cell Signalling Technologies). Membranes were stripped and probed for anti-Akt antibody (Cell Signalling Technologies). Bands were quantified using ImageQuant TL software, and results are represented as the average ± SD of the p-Akt/Akt ratio.  Plasmids, mutagenesis and in vitro phosphatase assays  YCpLG myc-p110-CAAX, pYES2 PTEN, pRK5 PTEN, pSG5 HA-Akt1 and pYES3 GFP-Akt1 have been described previously (30). Mutagenesis was performed by a two-step PCR strategy. All mutations were checked by DNA sequencing. The sequences of oligonucleotides used for mutagenesis are available on request. In vitro phosphatase assays were made using PTEN wild-type or mutations, from COS-7-transfected cells, as the enzymes, and diC8-phosphatydilinositol PIP3 (Echelon) as the substrate, as described previously (30). 
2206||The PTEN (phosphatase and tensin homolog) phosphatase is unique in mammals in terms of its tumor suppressor activity, exerted by dephosphorylation of the lipid second messenger PIP3 (phosphatidylinositol 3,4,5-trisphosphate), which activates the phosphoinositide 3-kinase/Akt/mTOR (mammalian target of rapamycin) oncogenic pathway. Loss-of-function mutations in the PTEN gene are frequent in human cancer and in the germline of patients with PTEN hamartoma tumor-related syndromes (PHTSs). In addition, PTEN is mutated in patients with autism spectrum disorders (ASDs), although no functional information on these mutations is available. Here, we report a comprehensive in vivo functional analysis of human PTEN using a heterologous yeast reconstitution system. Ala-scanning mutagenesis at the catalytic loops of PTEN outlined the critical role of residues within the P-catalytic loop for PIP3 phosphatase activity in vivo. PTEN mutations that mimic the P-catalytic loop of mammalian PTEN-like proteins (TPTE, TPIP, tensins and auxilins) affected PTEN function variably, whereas tumor- or PHTS-associated mutations targeting the PTEN P-loop produced complete loss of function. Conversely, Ala-substitutions, as well as tumor-related mutations at the WPD- and TI-catalytic loops, displayed partial activity in many cases. Interestingly, a tumor-related D92N mutation was partially active, supporting the notion that the PTEN Asp92 residue might not function as the catalytic general acid. The analysis of a panel of ASD-associated hereditary PTEN mutations revealed that most of them did not substantially abrogate PTEN activity in vivo, whereas most of PHTS-associated mutations did. Our findings reveal distinctive functional patterns among PTEN mutations found in tumors and in the germline of PHTS and ASD patients, which could be relevant for therapy. Topic: mutation catalysis phosphoric monoester hydrolases yeasts neoplasms pten gene Issue Section: Articles INTRODUCTION  PTEN (phosphatase and tensin homolog deleted in chromosome 10) is a mammalian lipid and protein phosphatase with orthologs in lower animals, plants and fungi (1). In mammals, PTEN-related proteins exist whose activity has been poorly explored. These proteins include TPIP and TPTE (orthologs of a voltage-sensor phosphatase from Ciona intestinalis), as well as the actin-binding tensin 1/2/3 and the clathrin-binding auxilin 1/2 (2–4). PTEN most relevant function is based on its ability to dephosphorylate phosphatidylinositol 3,4,5-trisphosphate (PIP3) in the 3′ phosphate of the inositol ring, resulting in the bisphosphate product phosphatidylinositol 4,5-bisphosphate (PIP2), thus broadly inhibiting the oncogenic phosphoinositide 3-kinase (PI3K)-dependent signaling (5–8). As a tumor suppressor, PTEN exerts its function by counteracting the anti-apoptotic and growth stimulatory effects of PDK1 (phosphoinositide-dependent kinase) and protein kinase B (PKB/Akt), which rely on PIP3 for their activation (9,10). Sporadic somatic mutations in PTEN make this tumor suppressor gene one of the two most frequently affected in human malignancies, together with p53, especially in solid tumors (11–14). Germline mutations of PTEN lead to inherited hamartoma, Cowden syndrome and related disorders, generally known as PTEN hamartoma tumor-related syndromes (PHTSs) (15–17). PTEN is considered haploinsufficient to prevent certain malignancies, suggesting that dosage is important for its function, as it must be the influence of a given point mutation in the catalytic activity of the enzyme (18). Besides its clear involvement in PHTS, germline PTEN mutations have been described in patients with neurodevelopmental disorders, such as autism spectrum disorders (ASDs) and developmental delay (DD) (19–22). Oncogenic PTEN mutations have been generally related to a loss of function of the encoded phosphatase. However, few studies have been done to understand the influence of putative neurodevelopment-related PTEN mutations on its catalytic activity.  Although phosphatase-independent functions of PTEN have also been described to contribute to its tumor suppressive activity (8,23–25), buffering PI3K signaling in virtue of its catalytic activity is assumed to be its key role. Thus, the precise dissection of PTEN catalytic properties is highly relevant for human disease. The crystal structure of PTEN (26) revealed an active site pocket similar to those of protein tyrosine phosphatases (PTPs) and dual-specificity Thr/Ser/Tyr phosphatases, as predicted by primary sequence analyses, although richer in basic residues. This explained the ability of PTEN to dephosphorylate acidic phosphopeptides (27). In addition, the PTEN active site pocket was wider than that of PTPs, to accommodate the rather bulky phosphorylated inositol moiety that constitutes the polar head of PIP3 (26). The PTEN phosphatase signature motif ([123]HCKAGKGR[130]; P-loop), including the catalytic Cys124 and Arg130 residues, is located at the bottom of the active site pocket. The walls of the pocket are delimited in part by a WPD-loop (thus designed after the equivalent region in PTP1B) and a TI-loop (so named because of conserved Thr and Ile residues), which are thought to be important for the activity of the enzyme. The fact that the Asp92, within the PTEN WPD-loop, is located in the pocket in an identical fashion to the equivalent proton donor catalytic residue on PTP1B led to the hypothesis that it may serve as the general acid that allows protonation of the leaving phosphate during the dephosphorylation reaction. Although in vitro studies using an Asp92 to Ala PTEN mutation indicated that Asp92 does not act as the general acid (28,29), no conclusive studies have been done to analyze the contribution of Asp92 in the in vivo dephosphorylation of PIP3 by PTEN.  We have previously validated a humanized yeast model to study the function of PI3K and PTEN in vivo, based on the heterologous co-expression of these proteins (1,30,31). Briefly, expression of hyperactive p110α, the catalytic subunit of mammalian class I PI3K, results in high toxicity in yeast cells as a result of the depletion of essential PIP2 pools. Co-expression of PTEN restores PIP2 levels and suppresses PI3K toxicity. Besides, co-expression of GFP-tagged mammalian Akt in this system allowed the detection of pools of PI3K-generated PIP3 in the yeast cell, where Akt localized, providing a visual readout of PI3K and PTEN activities (30,32). Here, we present an extensive site-directed mutagenesis and functional study of PTEN by using this system. Humanized yeast-based bioassays combine the advantages of powerful yeast genetics, an ever-growing availability of post-genomic tools, their ease and safety of manipulation and the fast achievement of results (1). Our results offer insights into the catalytic properties of PTEN and provide a platform to compare in vivo the contribution to lipid phosphatase inactivation of mutations found in tumors and in the germline of patients with PTEN-related syndromes. Our analysis reveals that PTEN germline mutations found in patients with ASD/DD neurodevelopmental disorders do not generally confer complete loss of function of the PTEN PIP3 phosphatase activity, when compared with mutations found in the germline of PHTS patients with tumor disorders.  RESULTS  Ala-scanning of the catalytic loops at the PTEN active site  The PIP3 lipid phosphatase activity of PTEN is essential for its tumor suppressor activity, which is evidenced by the abundance of tumor-related mutations in exons encoding the catalytic phosphatase core of the enzyme (11,15,33). Thus, the precise definition of PIP3 catalytic properties of PTEN in vivo, and its relation with PTEN residues mutated in tumor samples or in patients, is highly relevant in oncology. The PTEN active site is conformed by three catalytic loops (26): the WPD-loop, residues 88–98; the P-loop, residues 121–131; and the TI-loop, residues 160–171 (Fig. 1A). The P-catalytic loop (containing the essential catalytic cysteine; Cys124 in human PTEN) is highly conserved between species, from mammals to lower eukaryotes, whereas the WPD- and TI-loops are more divergent (Fig. 1B). To test the contribution of all individual residues within the three PTEN catalytic loops to the in vivo activity of the enzyme, a comprehensive Ala-scanning mutagenesis was performed. The PIP3 catalytic activity of the resulting mutations was assessed in vivo using a reconstitution heterologous system in the yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae (31). As illustrated in Figure 2, Ala substitutions of the residues at the core P-loop (residues 121–131) substantially abrogated the PTEN ability to dephosphorylate PIP3in vivo, with the exception of the A121V, G129A and T131A mutations, which displayed partial or total activity (note that Ala residues have been substituted by Val residues in our Ala-scanning mutational analysis). Remarkably, a Cowden disease mutation targeting the Gly129 residue (G129E) is defective for PIP3 phosphatase activity but maintains in vitro activity against phosphotyrosine peptides (34). Overall, the residues at the WPD- and TI-loops were less important for PIP3 catalytic activity. Thus, Ala substitutions of most WPD residues (88–98) did not affect, or only partially affected, PTEN catalytic activity, with the exception of Asp92 and His93 that fully abrogated the PTEN function (Fig. 2). Also, Ala substitutions of most TI residues (160–171) only weakly affected the PTEN activity, except for Val166, Gln171 and, to some extent, Asp162. (Fig. 2) The loss-of-function properties of the D92A mutation is in accordance with the importance of this residue in PTEN phosphatase catalysis, although its role as the general acid in the hydrolysis reaction remains unclear (28,29).  Figure 1. PTEN catalytic loops. (A) Detail of the three-dimensional structure of the PTEN catalytic site. Regions spanning the WPD-, P- and TI-catalytic loops are marked in yellow, red and blue, respectively. Image was generated with PyMOL (http://pymol.org), based on PDB ID: 1D5R (26). (B) Amino acid sequence alignment of PTEN catalytic loops from Homo sapiens, Danio rerio, Strongylocentrotus purpuratus, Drosophila melanogaster, Caenorhabditis elegans, Dictyostelium discoideum, Schizosaccharomyces pombe and S. cerevisiae. (C) Amino acid sequence alignment of PTEN catalytic loops with the equivalent regions from PTEN-like proteins (H. sapiens sequences). Amino acid numbering from H. sapiens PTEN is in brackets. Amino acid identity with regard to H. sapiens PTEN is marked in yellow. Alignments were made manually. View largeDownload slide PTEN catalytic loops. (A) Detail of the three-dimensional structure of the PTEN catalytic site. Regions spanning the WPD-, P- and TI-catalytic loops are marked in yellow, red and blue, respectively. Image was generated with PyMOL (http://pymol.org), based on PDB ID: 1D5R (26). (B) Amino acid sequence alignment of PTEN catalytic loops from Homo sapiens, Danio rerio, Strongylocentrotus purpuratus, Drosophila melanogaster, Caenorhabditis elegans, Dictyostelium discoideum, Schizosaccharomyces pombe and S. cerevisiae. (C) Amino acid sequence alignment of PTEN catalytic loops with the equivalent regions from PTEN-like proteins (H. sapiens sequences). Amino acid numbering from H. sapiens PTEN is in brackets. Amino acid identity with regard to H. sapiens PTEN is marked in yellow. Alignments were made manually. Figure 2. Functional assessment in the yeast in vivo model of Ala-scanning mutations covering the PTEN catalytic site. YPH499 S. cerevisiae transformants expressing p110α-CAAX, GFP-Akt1 and PTEN mutations [Ala substitutions of the indicated amino acids: residues 88–98 at the WPD-loop, residues 121–131 at the P-loop (catalytic Cys in bold), residues 160–171 at the T-loop; Val substitutions in the case of residues Ala121 and Ala126] were incubated for 5 h in the presence of galactose (all heterologous proteins are co-expressed from the GAL1 galactose-inducible promoter), and GFP staining was monitored by fluorescence microscopy. As a reference, controls expressing wild-type (WT) PTEN or the empty vector (φ) are shown at the top (left). Black-color bars indicates the percentage of cells with plasma membrane GFP stain (high PIP3 levels = low PTEN activity), whereas white color corresponds to the percentage of cells that display a nucleocytoplasmic GFP signal (low PIP3 levels = high PTEN activity). Over 100 cells were analyzed microscopically per experiment. Data are the average from three different experiments. Error bars correspond to the standard deviation. (+) or (−) signs indicate the ability of each PTEN mutation to rescue growth arrest induced by p110α-CAAX, as determined by serial dilution drop growth assays on solid medium (see inlet at the top as a reference). The drop growth experiments were performed on co-transformants expressing only p110α-CAAX and the indicated PTEN mutation. Asterisks (*) mark mutations to Ala that have been reported in tumors/germline PHTS. View largeDownload slide Functional assessment in the yeast in vivo model of Ala-scanning mutations covering the PTEN catalytic site. YPH499 S. cerevisiae transformants expressing p110α-CAAX, GFP-Akt1 and PTEN mutations [Ala substitutions of the indicated amino acids: residues 88–98 at the WPD-loop, residues 121–131 at the P-loop (catalytic Cys in bold), residues 160–171 at the T-loop; Val substitutions in the case of residues Ala121 and Ala126] were incubated for 5 h in the presence of galactose (all heterologous proteins are co-expressed from the GAL1 galactose-inducible promoter), and GFP staining was monitored by fluorescence microscopy. As a reference, controls expressing wild-type (WT) PTEN or the empty vector (φ) are shown at the top (left). Black-color bars indicates the percentage of cells with plasma membrane GFP stain (high PIP3 levels = low PTEN activity), whereas white color corresponds to the percentage of cells that display a nucleocytoplasmic GFP signal (low PIP3 levels = high PTEN activity). Over 100 cells were analyzed microscopically per experiment. Data are the average from three different experiments. Error bars correspond to the standard deviation. (+) or (−) signs indicate the ability of each PTEN mutation to rescue growth arrest induced by p110α-CAAX, as determined by serial dilution drop growth assays on solid medium (see inlet at the top as a reference). The drop growth experiments were performed on co-transformants expressing only p110α-CAAX and the indicated PTEN mutation. Asterisks (*) mark mutations to Ala that have been reported in tumors/germline PHTS. Functional analysis of mutations at the PTEN P-loop mimicking PTEN-like proteins  PTEN-like proteins include TPIP and TPTE, as well as tensins and auxilins. The WPD- and TI-loops are divergent between PTEN and PTEN-like proteins, whereas the P-loop is more conserved (Fig. 1C). As part of our mutational analysis of the PTEN active site, we designed single amino acid substitution mutants on PTEN that mimicked the P-loop from the different PTEN-like proteins and tested their PIP3 phosphatase activity in the yeast system. Mutations included A121V, I122L, I122V, H123Y, C124N, K125L, K125M, K125R, A126D, A126G, G127N, K128R, K128T, G129D, G129A, R130A, R130K, T131I, T131L and T131S (note that A121V, G129A and R130A mutations are included in Fig. 2). A group of mutations (H123Y, C124N, A126D, G127N, K128T, G129D, R130A, R130K, T131I and T131L) fully abrogated the PIP3 phosphatase activity of PTEN in yeast, whereas other two groups only affected partially (I122L, K125L, K125M, A126G and K128R) or did not affect PTEN PIP3 phosphatase activity (A121V, I122V, K125R, G129A and T131S) (Fig. 3; note that results for A121V, G129A and R130A mutations are included in Fig. 2). The results from this mutational analysis are in agreement with the in vitro PIP3 phosphatase activity reported for TPIP and with the lack of activity reported for TPTE (35). Our results also suggest that the P-loops from tensin and auxilin proteins do not bear catalytic activity. Moreover, this analysis revealed that some conservative mutations at the PTEN P-loop (such as I122V, K125R and T131S) are permissive for its activity in vivo.  Figure 3. Functional assessment of PTEN mutations mimicking the P-loop sequence from PTEN-like proteins. Experiments were performed and are presented as in Figure 2. The alignment marks divergences within the P-loop sequence between PTEN and PTEN-related proteins, which correspond to the substitutions made in the PTEN-mutated versions. The numbering of residues for PTEN is shown. ‘=’ indicates the same residue at that position than PTEN. The data for substitutions marked in italics in this alignment are already presented in Figure 2. The asterisk marks a mutation reported in tumors/germline PHTS. View largeDownload slide Functional assessment of PTEN mutations mimicking the P-loop sequence from PTEN-like proteins. Experiments were performed and are presented as in Figure 2. The alignment marks divergences within the P-loop sequence between PTEN and PTEN-related proteins, which correspond to the substitutions made in the PTEN-mutated versions. The numbering of residues for PTEN is shown. ‘=’ indicates the same residue at that position than PTEN. The data for substitutions marked in italics in this alignment are already presented in Figure 2. The asterisk marks a mutation reported in tumors/germline PHTS. Functional analysis of tumor-related mutations targeting PTEN active site residues  Tumor-related mutations are spread along the entire PTEN amino acid sequence. Nevertheless, the PTEN C-terminal tail (last 50 residues) is targeted by mutations less frequently, in agreement with our previous finding using the yeast heterologous system that PTEN 1–349 is the minimal fully functional PTEN protein (30). On the other hand, the core PTP catalytic domain (residues 14–185) is more frequently targeted by mutations in either tumors or PHTS patients. Some of these mutations have been analyzed in terms of intrinsic catalytic activity (36–40), but the majority of them have not been directly tested for function. We have analyzed in the yeast system the PIP3 phosphatase activity of tumor-related mutations targeting PTEN residues at the PTEN catalytic loops (note that some of these mutations have been analyzed previously and are shown in Figs 2 and 3; and Figs 5 and 6 also include some of them). As expected, all the tumor mutations at the P-loop tested (A121E, I122S, H123D, H123Y, C124S, K125E, A126S, A126V, G127E, K128N, G129E, G129V, G129R, R130G, T131A and T131I) gave rise to proteins that were fully inactive, except for A126S and K128N that produced partially inactive proteins (Fig. 4 and Figs 2 and 3). Mutations at the TI-loop included T160I, R161G, D162G, G165E, G165V, V166I, T167A, I168F, P169H and S170R. Among these, only the T160I, G165E, G165V and S170R were loss-of-function mutations (Fig. 4 and Fig. 2). Finally, tumor-related mutations targeting the WPD loop included Y88C, F90L, E91A, D92A, D92E, D92G, D92H, D92N, D92V, H93D, H93Q, H93R, H93Y, N94I, P95L and P96Q. Proteins bearing Y88C, F90L or E91A mutations were active, whereas the rest of mutant proteins were partially or fully inactive (Fig. 4 and Figs 2, 5 and 6). A summary of the tumor-related PTEN mutants analyzed is shown in Supplementary Material, Table S1. Taken together, our findings illustrate the heterogeneity in the catalytic activity of tumor-related PTEN mutant proteins.  Figure 4. Functional assessment of tumor-related PTEN mutations targeting PTEN catalytic loops. Experiments were performed as those in Figure 2. View largeDownload slide Functional assessment of tumor-related PTEN mutations targeting PTEN catalytic loops. Experiments were performed as those in Figure 2. Figure 5. Functional assessment of PTEN mutations targeting the Asp92 residue. (A) Tolerance to mutation of the Asp92 residue. Mutations were assessed in yeast, as those in Figure 2. Asterisks mark mutations that have been reported in tumors/germline PHTS. The image at the right corresponds to growth rescue assays from representative PTEN mutations and controls from the data presented. (B) In vitro phosphatase activity of recombinant PTEN proteins purified from COS-7 cell line transfectants, as determined by the malachite green assay, using diC8-phosphatydilinositol PIP3 as the substrate. Data are the average from three independent experiments. Error bars correspond to the standard deviation. (C) Ability of PTEN mutations to abolish HA-Akt activation in mammalian cells. PTEN wild-type or the indicated mutations were co-expressed with HA-Akt1 in COS-7 cells. Cell-free lysates were subjected to immunoblot using anti-phospho-active-Akt antibodies (p-Thr308 and p-Ser473). The content of PTEN and HA-Akt1 in the lysates was monitored using anti-PTEN (all PTEN mutations were expressed equally, not shown) and anti-HA antibodies, respectively. Bands were quantified and results are presented as the average ± SD of the p-Akt/Akt ratio, obtained from three independent experiments. View largeDownload slide Functional assessment of PTEN mutations targeting the Asp92 residue. (A) Tolerance to mutation of the Asp92 residue. Mutations were assessed in yeast, as those in Figure 2. Asterisks mark mutations that have been reported in tumors/germline PHTS. The image at the right corresponds to growth rescue assays from representative PTEN mutations and controls from the data presented. (B) In vitro phosphatase activity of recombinant PTEN proteins purified from COS-7 cell line transfectants, as determined by the malachite green assay, using diC8-phosphatydilinositol PIP3 as the substrate. Data are the average from three independent experiments. Error bars correspond to the standard deviation. (C) Ability of PTEN mutations to abolish HA-Akt activation in mammalian cells. PTEN wild-type or the indicated mutations were co-expressed with HA-Akt1 in COS-7 cells. Cell-free lysates were subjected to immunoblot using anti-phospho-active-Akt antibodies (p-Thr308 and p-Ser473). The content of PTEN and HA-Akt1 in the lysates was monitored using anti-PTEN (all PTEN mutations were expressed equally, not shown) and anti-HA antibodies, respectively. Bands were quantified and results are presented as the average ± SD of the p-Akt/Akt ratio, obtained from three independent experiments. Figure 6. Functional assessment of PTEN mutations related to PHTS (A) or ASD/DD (B) hereditary syndromes. Experiments were performed as described in Figure 2. Asterisks in (B) mark mutations that have been reported in germline PHTS. (C) Global functional analyses of the impact on catalytic activity of PHTS- versus ASD/DD-related mutations. The y-axis refers to relative in vivo PTEN activity, as measured by the percentage of yeast cells with low PIP3 levels at the plasma membrane, as determined by GFP-Akt1 localization (as in Figs 2–4 and 6A). Each spot corresponds to the average data from three independent experiments on each particular mutation from the indicated category (PHTS or ASD/DD). Spots surrounded by a circle correspond to mutations that are common to PHTS or ASD/DD [those marked with asterisks in (B)]. Vertical lines mark the standard deviation. Paired t-test of these independent set of data revealed a significant difference in activity for ASD/DD mutations with respect to PHTS mutations (P < 0.001). (D) Comparative analysis of PHTS and ASD/DD PTEN mutations referred to their ability to rescue growth arrest induced in S. cerevisiae by p110α-CAAX expression. ASD/DD-related mutations are generally more competent than PHTS-related mutations in counteracting p110α-CAAX activity. PHTS mutations included in this study are listed in Supplementary Material, Table S1, and results correspond to those in (A) and in Figures 4 and 5. ASD/DD mutations data correspond to those in (B). View large Download slide Functional assessment of PTEN mutations related to PHTS (A) or ASD/DD (B) hereditary syndromes. Experiments were performed as described in Figure 2. Asterisks in (B) mark mutations that have been reported in germline PHTS. (C) Global functional analyses of the impact on catalytic activity of PHTS- versus ASD/DD-related mutations. The y-axis refers to relative in vivo PTEN activity, as measured by the percentage of yeast cells with low PIP3 levels at the plasma membrane, as determined by GFP-Akt1 localization (as in Figs 2–4 and 6A). Each spot corresponds to the average data from three independent experiments on each particular mutation from the indicated category (PHTS or ASD/DD). Spots surrounded by a circle correspond to mutations that are common to PHTS or ASD/DD [those marked with asterisks in (B)]. Vertical lines mark the standard deviation. Paired t-test of these independent set of data revealed a significant difference in activity for ASD/DD mutations with respect to PHTS mutations (P < 0.001). (D) Comparative analysis of PHTS and ASD/DD PTEN mutations referred to their ability to rescue growth arrest induced in S. cerevisiae by p110α-CAAX expression. ASD/DD-related mutations are generally more competent than PHTS-related mutations in counteracting p110α-CAAX activity. PHTS mutations included in this study are listed in Supplementary Material, Table S1, and results correspond to those in (A) and in Figures 4 and 5. ASD/DD mutations data correspond to those in (B). Relevance of the Asp92 residue in PTEN activity in vivo  Remarkably, a mutation in the putative catalytic Asp92 residue to Asn (D92N) rendered a protein partially active in vivo in the yeast system, whereas substitution of this residue to any of the other 18 amino acids generated fully inactive PTEN enzymes (Fig. 5A). This outlines the importance of Asp92 in PTEN enzymatic activity, but also demonstrates that the presence of an aspartic acid residue at this position is not a strict requirement for PTEN-driven catalysis. To further substantiate this observation, the PIP3 phosphatase activity of the PTEN mutations D92A (non-conservative), D92E (charge-conservative) and D92N (size-conservative), expressed in mammalian cells, was tested both in vitro and in vivo. As shown, the mutations D92A and D92E fully abrogated hydrolysis of PIP3 by PTEN in vitro, whereas the mutation D92N only partially affected it (Fig. 5B). Upon co-expression with Akt, the D92N PTEN mutant also manifested more activity [indirectly measured as the levels of phospho-Akt (p-Akt) content] than the D92A or the D92E mutant proteins (Fig. 5C). Our results suggest that Asp92 does not behave as the general acid in the hydrolysis of PIP3 by PTEN, in vitro and in vivo.  Most of germline PTEN mutations associated with autism syndrome disorders do not fully abrogate PIP3 phosphatase activity  The involvement of PTEN in brain developmental disorders has been proposed on the basis of the identification of hereditary PTEN mutations in patients with these disorders (41,42), but little information is available on the severity of such mutations in terms of PTEN function. One of the mutations present in glioblastoma tumor samples (H93R) has also been found in the germline of a patient with autism (19). When performing the experiments shown above on tumor-related PTEN mutations, we included the H93R and found it to display a modest loss of activity in the yeast model when compared with wild-type PTEN, although it was capable of fully recovering yeast growth (Fig. 6B). This prompted us to examine additional inherited mutations found in patients with autism-related disorders (ASD) or with DD/mental retardation. These mutations included, besides H93R, the G44D, H118P, H123Q, M134T, E157G, R173H, Y176C, T202I, F241S, D252G, W274L, N276S and D326N, involving not only catalytic but other protein domains. Remarkably, proteins bearing most of these mutations were either fully or partially active in the yeast (Fig. 6B and Supplementary Material, Table S1), although their ability to recover growth from PI3K-imposed inhibition was variable. These results were in contrast to those obtained by analyzing the function of a panel of PHTS-associated mutations, also distributed along the entire PTEN coding region (mutations A34D, M35R, G36R, N48K, H61D, Y68D, D92E, H93Y, P96Q, H123D, C124S, G129E, R130G, Y155C, G165E, G165V, S170R, L181P, V217N, P246L, R335L, V343E; L345V and F347L; Fig. 6A and Supplementary Material, Table S1). Most of the PHTS-associated mutations generated total or partial loss of function when analyzed in vivo in yeast. Moreover, global comparison of PHTS- and ASD/DD-related mutations in terms of their ability both to deplete PIP3 generated by PI3K in yeast (Fig. 6C; P < 0.001) and to rescue yeast growth (Fig. 6D) revealed that ASD/DD-related PTEN mutations have a lower effect in PTEN activity than those associated with PHTS. These findings indicate that specific PTEN functional patterns correlate with the mutations found on either PHTS or ASD/DD patients and suggest that a severe loss of the PTEN PIP3 catalytic activity may not be the major driver of autism or autism-related neurological disorders.  DISCUSSION  The PTEN phosphatase is a key regulatory hub of PI3K-mediated signaling. While mammals express a variety of isoforms of PI3K and PIP3-dependent downstream kinases in this pathway, the PTEN tumor suppressor is rather unique, being the only one gene that encodes for a common inactivator of the pathway. Thus, mutations in exons of the PTEN gene are frequent in tumors and hereditary cancer syndromes. The regulation of PTEN is complex, involving multiple processes related to its phosphorylation, ubiquitination, nuclear translocation, interaction with membranes and complexing with different proteins (6,8,24,43,44). Although recent reports point towards PTEN functions independent of its lipid phosphatase activity (23–25,45,46), PTEN tumor suppressor function mainly relies on its catalytic activity on PIP3 pools locally generated by PI3K at the plasma membrane. The contribution of PTEN mutations isolated in the clinics to the function of the encoded protein is crucial to understand the molecular mechanisms that lead to tumor development and progression. We have developed a simple model for functional assessment of PTEN mutations based on heterologous expression in yeast (1,31). This model allows ready evaluation of the involvement of PTEN mutations on the ability to counteract PI3K activity in vivo, by compromising PTEN PIP3 catalytic activity or by affecting PTEN protein stability, two common mechanisms by which PTEN is inactivated in tumors (30). Here, we report extensive use of this model with two aims: (i) to provide clues for structure–function relationship by systematic mutagenesis and (ii) to study the influence of individual disease-related PTEN mutations in its lipid phosphatase activity.  From our systematic functional analysis on the PTEN catalytic loops, several conclusions can be driven. First, as expected, the P-loop including the catalytic Cys residue is very sensitive to mutagenesis, in consonance with the observation that it constitutes a hot spot for tumor-related mutations (11,15,33), whereas the WPD and TI loops are more permissive to point Ala substitutions. Still, residues like Asp92 or His93 (WPD-loop), Asp162, Val166 or Gln171 (TI-loop) were critical for function. We made a comprehensive study on tolerance to mutation of the Asp92 residue, equivalent to the acid proton donor involved in catalysis in PTPs that are structurally related to PTEN (47). Tolerance to mutation was very low in this residue, since its substitution to any other amino acid yielded an inactive enzyme, except for Asp-to-Asn substitution, which partially retained activity in vivo, not only in the yeast model but also in mammalian cells. Since the D92N mutation has been reported in the clinic, such reduced activity may substantially contribute to disease. Interestingly, this argues against the need for an acid residue in that position, revealing an alternative mechanism of catalysis for the PTEN phosphatase, as proposed by other authors based on in vitro experiments (28,29). We also made substitutions within the catalytic loops mimicking PTEN-related proteins, such as TPIP, TPTE, tensin and auxilin. Although these proteins possess distinct non-PTP-related domains that control protein targeting, protein–protein interactions and cell signaling, they share the presence of PTP- and C2-like domains with significant similarity with those from PTEN (2,3,48). With the exception of TPIP, PTEN-like proteins are predicted to be catalytically inactive, due either to the lack of essential residues at the catalytic site or to amino acid substitutions potentially deleterious for catalysis (35,49,50). Nevertheless, tensin2/C1-TEN has been proposed to be an active phosphatase, based on functional studies on a mutation that targets its putative catalytic cysteine residue (51). Our observations favor the hypothesis that the P-loop of TPIP might be competent for activity, whereas TPTE, tensins and auxilins would be inactive as phosphatases, as evidenced in other studies (35,52,53).  A large number of different PTEN mutations have been described in human tumors and in the germline of patients with PHTS or PHTS-related syndromes (11,15,33) [for updates, check HGMD (http://www.hgmd.cf.ac.uk/ac/index.php) and COSMIC (http://www.sanger.ac.uk/genetics/CGP/cosmic) databases]. These mutations target the PTEN gene not only at its coding regions, but also at exon–intron boundaries and promoter regions. Most of PTEN mutations at exon–intron boundaries or promoter regions have a major impact in the levels of expression of the PTEN protein, being causative of PTEN functional deficiency and considered as pathogenic (54–56). Mutations targeting the PTEN coding region include frame-shift and nonsense mutations, which also generate unstable truncated PTEN proteins in most of the cases (36), as well as missense mutations that result in individual amino acid changes. Functional analyses of a limited number of these missense mutations have revealed that, in many cases, the resultant amino acid substitutions generate PTEN proteins with impaired intrinsic catalytic activity and/or protein stability (36–39). Also, some examples have been described of missense PTEN mutations that do not affect the intrinsic catalysis nor the stability of the protein, but rather impair essential regulatory PTEN properties, such as binding to membranes or nuclear entry (40,57). Our previous study using the heterologous yeast system as a reporter of the activity of PTEN mutations in vivo revealed that such system reproduces with fidelity the effects on mammalian cells of mutations that diminish either the intrinsic PTEN catalytic activity and/or binding to membranes or the intrinsic PTEN protein stability (30). Our current comprehensive functional study of tumor-associated PTEN mutations indicates that almost all mutations targeting the P-catalytic loop confer loss of PTEN intrinsic catalytic activity (12 of 13), whereas mutations targeting the WPD- or the TI-loops are less frequently associated with full loss of catalysis (5 of 9 and 4 of 9, respectively). These results are in agreement with the Ala-scanning analysis of these regions and suggest the existence of a relatively large number of tumor-associated mutations at the PTEN gene that do not fully abrogate the PTEN catalytic activity, but may be relevant in clinics. Recently, a comprehensive study on PTEN mutations in PHTS disease has yielded predictive clinical parameters (58). Association of reported mutations to the activity of PTEN by means of ready in vivo functional assays, as the one exploited here, might help clinicians in decisions towards putative mutation-specific therapies.  PHTS and ASD/DD are syndromes with distinct clinical entities, which share macrocephaly as a frequent common alteration (59). Also, clinicians have noted that PHTS patients often display neurobehavioral features resembling autism (19) and, interestingly, at least five PTEN mutations (H93R, Y176C, F241S, D252G and R173H; see Supplementary Material, Table S1) have been reported as associated with both PHTS and ASD/DD (19,41,42,58). Our comparative analysis of germline mutations found in PHTS patients and in ASD/DD patients revealed a distinct functional pattern for these two groups of mutations. PHTS-associated mutations, which included in our study mutations distributed all along the PTEN protein, were found significantly more deleterious for PTEN catalysis than ASD/DD-associated mutations (Fig. 6). This could be important for the distinct etiology and progress of tumor-related and tumor non-related syndromes associated with PTEN mutations and may be of relevance in the design and implementation of new therapies for these diseases. It is likely that small variations in the lipid phosphatase activity or in the stability of heterozygotic PTEN mutations can explain the higher penetrance found for the set of PHTS-associated mutations, when compared with ASD/DD-associated mutations. Although it has been suggested that ASD- and macrocephaly-related PTEN mutations may behave differentially in terms of loss of function (19), the lack of functional models has made difficult to provide support for this hypothesis. If this is the case, as suggested by our study, additional unknown factors might exist affecting differentially the etiology and/or progression of these diseases. In this regard, a study focused on the functional analysis of the PHTS- and ASD-associated H93R PTEN mutation reported a partial loss of catalytic activity for this mutation, as well as a defect in the binding to PTEN-activating PIP2 model membranes. Remarkably, the binding of the H93R mutation to phosphatidylserine membranes, which are abundant in mammalian cells, was augmented (60). Our results show that the H93R mutation retained most of its lipid phosphatase activity in the yeast, suggesting that differences in the thresholds that control membrane-binding mediated PTEN activation may exist in distinct cell systems. Also of interest, mice with diminution of PTEN expression levels as subtle as 20% develop a wide spectrum of tumors with high penetrance, and it has been proposed that altered gene dosage may be relevant in ASD/DD (18,61). In this regard, ASD/DD has been linked with abnormal synapsis growth and plasticity, an alteration that has also been observed in mice with PTEN-deficient neurons (62,63). Furthermore, a mice model lacking PTEN expression in mature neuronal populations in the cerebral cortex and the hippocampus displayed behavioral abnormalities reminiscent of human ASD/DD (64). Our findings show a relatively weak association between ASD/DD-related mutations at the PTEN gene and full loss of intrinsic lipid phosphatase activity or protein stability, which is in line with the lack of concordance between ASD/DD and childhood cancer (65). ASD/DD constitutes a heterogeneous, multigene-linked group of developmental disorders (41,42,66). Further studies will be required to ascertain the functional changes on the activity of the PTEN protein from ASD/DD patients with mutations at the PTEN gene. The comprehensive analysis of the functional properties of putative pathogenic mutant proteins, as the one we present here for PTEN mutations, will give some light on the molecular pathways altered in the neurons of patients with ASD/DD.  MATERIALS AND METHODS  Cells, media, growth conditions, transfection and protein detection  The S. cerevisiae strain YPH499 (MATa ade2–101 trp1–63 leu2–1 ura3–52 his3-▵200 lys2–801) was used for heterologous expression of mammalian proteins. For all the analyses, synthetic complete medium was used, containing 0.17 % yeast nitrogen base without amino acids, 0.5% ammonium sulfate supplemented with appropriate amino acids and nucleic acid bases, and added 2% glucose (SD), galactose (SG) or raffinose (SR), as required. Yeasts were transformed by standard procedures. Growth of yeast on plates was tested by spotting transformant cells onto SD or SG plates lacking the corresponding auxotrophic markers. Transformants were grown overnight in SD lacking uracile, leucine or both (SD-U, SD-L or SD-UL) as required and adjusted to an OD600 of 0.5. Five microliter aliquots of each sample plus three serial 1/10 dilutions were deposited on the surfaces of solid media SG-U, SG-L or SG-UL. Growth was monitored after 2–3 days at 30°C. Expression of all PTEN mutations in yeast was verified by immunoblot on yeast lysates with 421B or 425A anti-PTEN mAb (67) followed by horseradish-peroxidase-conjugated anti-mouse antibody (Calbiochem). To measure GFP-Akt1 plasma membrane localization, as an indirect indicator of cellular PIP3 levels, transformant cells were grown to log phase in liquid SR medium lacking the corresponding auxotrophic markers, and then 2 % galactose was added for 6–8 h. GFP-Akt1 was visualized by fluorescence microscopy. To obtain statistically significant data, ≥100 cells were examined from each condition or experiment for either cytoplasmic or membrane-associated localization. Cells were examined under an Eclipse TE2000U microscope (Nikon) and digital images were acquired with Orca C4742-95-12ER charge-coupled device camera (Hamamatsu) and Aquacosmos Imaging Systems or HCImage software. To overexpress PTEN mutations in mammalian cells, COS-7 cells (simian kidney) were transfected by the DEAE-dextran method and processed after 48 h. To measure p-Akt content in COS-7 cells in the presence of PTEN mutations, cells were co-transfected with pRK5 PTEN and pSG5 HA-Akt1 as described (68). Cells were lysed, and post-nuclear lysates were subjected by immunoblot using a mixture of anti-p-Thr308 and anti-p-Ser473-Akt antibodies (Cell Signalling Technologies). Membranes were stripped and probed for anti-Akt antibody (Cell Signalling Technologies). Bands were quantified using ImageQuant TL software, and results are represented as the average ± SD of the p-Akt/Akt ratio.  Plasmids, mutagenesis and in vitro phosphatase assays  YCpLG myc-p110-CAAX, pYES2 PTEN, pRK5 PTEN, pSG5 HA-Akt1 and pYES3 GFP-Akt1 have been described previously (30). Mutagenesis was performed by a two-step PCR strategy. All mutations were checked by DNA sequencing. The sequences of oligonucleotides used for mutagenesis are available on request. In vitro phosphatase assays were made using PTEN wild-type or mutations, from COS-7-transfected cells, as the enzymes, and diC8-phosphatydilinositol PIP3 (Echelon) as the substrate, as described previously (30). 
2224||The PTEN (phosphatase and tensin homolog) phosphatase is unique in mammals in terms of its tumor suppressor activity, exerted by dephosphorylation of the lipid second messenger PIP3 (phosphatidylinositol 3,4,5-trisphosphate), which activates the phosphoinositide 3-kinase/Akt/mTOR (mammalian target of rapamycin) oncogenic pathway. Loss-of-function mutations in the PTEN gene are frequent in human cancer and in the germline of patients with PTEN hamartoma tumor-related syndromes (PHTSs). In addition, PTEN is mutated in patients with autism spectrum disorders (ASDs), although no functional information on these mutations is available. Here, we report a comprehensive in vivo functional analysis of human PTEN using a heterologous yeast reconstitution system. Ala-scanning mutagenesis at the catalytic loops of PTEN outlined the critical role of residues within the P-catalytic loop for PIP3 phosphatase activity in vivo. PTEN mutations that mimic the P-catalytic loop of mammalian PTEN-like proteins (TPTE, TPIP, tensins and auxilins) affected PTEN function variably, whereas tumor- or PHTS-associated mutations targeting the PTEN P-loop produced complete loss of function. Conversely, Ala-substitutions, as well as tumor-related mutations at the WPD- and TI-catalytic loops, displayed partial activity in many cases. Interestingly, a tumor-related D92N mutation was partially active, supporting the notion that the PTEN Asp92 residue might not function as the catalytic general acid. The analysis of a panel of ASD-associated hereditary PTEN mutations revealed that most of them did not substantially abrogate PTEN activity in vivo, whereas most of PHTS-associated mutations did. Our findings reveal distinctive functional patterns among PTEN mutations found in tumors and in the germline of PHTS and ASD patients, which could be relevant for therapy. Topic: mutation catalysis phosphoric monoester hydrolases yeasts neoplasms pten gene Issue Section: Articles INTRODUCTION  PTEN (phosphatase and tensin homolog deleted in chromosome 10) is a mammalian lipid and protein phosphatase with orthologs in lower animals, plants and fungi (1). In mammals, PTEN-related proteins exist whose activity has been poorly explored. These proteins include TPIP and TPTE (orthologs of a voltage-sensor phosphatase from Ciona intestinalis), as well as the actin-binding tensin 1/2/3 and the clathrin-binding auxilin 1/2 (2–4). PTEN most relevant function is based on its ability to dephosphorylate phosphatidylinositol 3,4,5-trisphosphate (PIP3) in the 3′ phosphate of the inositol ring, resulting in the bisphosphate product phosphatidylinositol 4,5-bisphosphate (PIP2), thus broadly inhibiting the oncogenic phosphoinositide 3-kinase (PI3K)-dependent signaling (5–8). As a tumor suppressor, PTEN exerts its function by counteracting the anti-apoptotic and growth stimulatory effects of PDK1 (phosphoinositide-dependent kinase) and protein kinase B (PKB/Akt), which rely on PIP3 for their activation (9,10). Sporadic somatic mutations in PTEN make this tumor suppressor gene one of the two most frequently affected in human malignancies, together with p53, especially in solid tumors (11–14). Germline mutations of PTEN lead to inherited hamartoma, Cowden syndrome and related disorders, generally known as PTEN hamartoma tumor-related syndromes (PHTSs) (15–17). PTEN is considered haploinsufficient to prevent certain malignancies, suggesting that dosage is important for its function, as it must be the influence of a given point mutation in the catalytic activity of the enzyme (18). Besides its clear involvement in PHTS, germline PTEN mutations have been described in patients with neurodevelopmental disorders, such as autism spectrum disorders (ASDs) and developmental delay (DD) (19–22). Oncogenic PTEN mutations have been generally related to a loss of function of the encoded phosphatase. However, few studies have been done to understand the influence of putative neurodevelopment-related PTEN mutations on its catalytic activity.  Although phosphatase-independent functions of PTEN have also been described to contribute to its tumor suppressive activity (8,23–25), buffering PI3K signaling in virtue of its catalytic activity is assumed to be its key role. Thus, the precise dissection of PTEN catalytic properties is highly relevant for human disease. The crystal structure of PTEN (26) revealed an active site pocket similar to those of protein tyrosine phosphatases (PTPs) and dual-specificity Thr/Ser/Tyr phosphatases, as predicted by primary sequence analyses, although richer in basic residues. This explained the ability of PTEN to dephosphorylate acidic phosphopeptides (27). In addition, the PTEN active site pocket was wider than that of PTPs, to accommodate the rather bulky phosphorylated inositol moiety that constitutes the polar head of PIP3 (26). The PTEN phosphatase signature motif ([123]HCKAGKGR[130]; P-loop), including the catalytic Cys124 and Arg130 residues, is located at the bottom of the active site pocket. The walls of the pocket are delimited in part by a WPD-loop (thus designed after the equivalent region in PTP1B) and a TI-loop (so named because of conserved Thr and Ile residues), which are thought to be important for the activity of the enzyme. The fact that the Asp92, within the PTEN WPD-loop, is located in the pocket in an identical fashion to the equivalent proton donor catalytic residue on PTP1B led to the hypothesis that it may serve as the general acid that allows protonation of the leaving phosphate during the dephosphorylation reaction. Although in vitro studies using an Asp92 to Ala PTEN mutation indicated that Asp92 does not act as the general acid (28,29), no conclusive studies have been done to analyze the contribution of Asp92 in the in vivo dephosphorylation of PIP3 by PTEN.  We have previously validated a humanized yeast model to study the function of PI3K and PTEN in vivo, based on the heterologous co-expression of these proteins (1,30,31). Briefly, expression of hyperactive p110α, the catalytic subunit of mammalian class I PI3K, results in high toxicity in yeast cells as a result of the depletion of essential PIP2 pools. Co-expression of PTEN restores PIP2 levels and suppresses PI3K toxicity. Besides, co-expression of GFP-tagged mammalian Akt in this system allowed the detection of pools of PI3K-generated PIP3 in the yeast cell, where Akt localized, providing a visual readout of PI3K and PTEN activities (30,32). Here, we present an extensive site-directed mutagenesis and functional study of PTEN by using this system. Humanized yeast-based bioassays combine the advantages of powerful yeast genetics, an ever-growing availability of post-genomic tools, their ease and safety of manipulation and the fast achievement of results (1). Our results offer insights into the catalytic properties of PTEN and provide a platform to compare in vivo the contribution to lipid phosphatase inactivation of mutations found in tumors and in the germline of patients with PTEN-related syndromes. Our analysis reveals that PTEN germline mutations found in patients with ASD/DD neurodevelopmental disorders do not generally confer complete loss of function of the PTEN PIP3 phosphatase activity, when compared with mutations found in the germline of PHTS patients with tumor disorders.  RESULTS  Ala-scanning of the catalytic loops at the PTEN active site  The PIP3 lipid phosphatase activity of PTEN is essential for its tumor suppressor activity, which is evidenced by the abundance of tumor-related mutations in exons encoding the catalytic phosphatase core of the enzyme (11,15,33). Thus, the precise definition of PIP3 catalytic properties of PTEN in vivo, and its relation with PTEN residues mutated in tumor samples or in patients, is highly relevant in oncology. The PTEN active site is conformed by three catalytic loops (26): the WPD-loop, residues 88–98; the P-loop, residues 121–131; and the TI-loop, residues 160–171 (Fig. 1A). The P-catalytic loop (containing the essential catalytic cysteine; Cys124 in human PTEN) is highly conserved between species, from mammals to lower eukaryotes, whereas the WPD- and TI-loops are more divergent (Fig. 1B). To test the contribution of all individual residues within the three PTEN catalytic loops to the in vivo activity of the enzyme, a comprehensive Ala-scanning mutagenesis was performed. The PIP3 catalytic activity of the resulting mutations was assessed in vivo using a reconstitution heterologous system in the yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae (31). As illustrated in Figure 2, Ala substitutions of the residues at the core P-loop (residues 121–131) substantially abrogated the PTEN ability to dephosphorylate PIP3in vivo, with the exception of the A121V, G129A and T131A mutations, which displayed partial or total activity (note that Ala residues have been substituted by Val residues in our Ala-scanning mutational analysis). Remarkably, a Cowden disease mutation targeting the Gly129 residue (G129E) is defective for PIP3 phosphatase activity but maintains in vitro activity against phosphotyrosine peptides (34). Overall, the residues at the WPD- and TI-loops were less important for PIP3 catalytic activity. Thus, Ala substitutions of most WPD residues (88–98) did not affect, or only partially affected, PTEN catalytic activity, with the exception of Asp92 and His93 that fully abrogated the PTEN function (Fig. 2). Also, Ala substitutions of most TI residues (160–171) only weakly affected the PTEN activity, except for Val166, Gln171 and, to some extent, Asp162. (Fig. 2) The loss-of-function properties of the D92A mutation is in accordance with the importance of this residue in PTEN phosphatase catalysis, although its role as the general acid in the hydrolysis reaction remains unclear (28,29).  Figure 1. PTEN catalytic loops. (A) Detail of the three-dimensional structure of the PTEN catalytic site. Regions spanning the WPD-, P- and TI-catalytic loops are marked in yellow, red and blue, respectively. Image was generated with PyMOL (http://pymol.org), based on PDB ID: 1D5R (26). (B) Amino acid sequence alignment of PTEN catalytic loops from Homo sapiens, Danio rerio, Strongylocentrotus purpuratus, Drosophila melanogaster, Caenorhabditis elegans, Dictyostelium discoideum, Schizosaccharomyces pombe and S. cerevisiae. (C) Amino acid sequence alignment of PTEN catalytic loops with the equivalent regions from PTEN-like proteins (H. sapiens sequences). Amino acid numbering from H. sapiens PTEN is in brackets. Amino acid identity with regard to H. sapiens PTEN is marked in yellow. Alignments were made manually. View largeDownload slide PTEN catalytic loops. (A) Detail of the three-dimensional structure of the PTEN catalytic site. Regions spanning the WPD-, P- and TI-catalytic loops are marked in yellow, red and blue, respectively. Image was generated with PyMOL (http://pymol.org), based on PDB ID: 1D5R (26). (B) Amino acid sequence alignment of PTEN catalytic loops from Homo sapiens, Danio rerio, Strongylocentrotus purpuratus, Drosophila melanogaster, Caenorhabditis elegans, Dictyostelium discoideum, Schizosaccharomyces pombe and S. cerevisiae. (C) Amino acid sequence alignment of PTEN catalytic loops with the equivalent regions from PTEN-like proteins (H. sapiens sequences). Amino acid numbering from H. sapiens PTEN is in brackets. Amino acid identity with regard to H. sapiens PTEN is marked in yellow. Alignments were made manually. Figure 2. Functional assessment in the yeast in vivo model of Ala-scanning mutations covering the PTEN catalytic site. YPH499 S. cerevisiae transformants expressing p110α-CAAX, GFP-Akt1 and PTEN mutations [Ala substitutions of the indicated amino acids: residues 88–98 at the WPD-loop, residues 121–131 at the P-loop (catalytic Cys in bold), residues 160–171 at the T-loop; Val substitutions in the case of residues Ala121 and Ala126] were incubated for 5 h in the presence of galactose (all heterologous proteins are co-expressed from the GAL1 galactose-inducible promoter), and GFP staining was monitored by fluorescence microscopy. As a reference, controls expressing wild-type (WT) PTEN or the empty vector (φ) are shown at the top (left). Black-color bars indicates the percentage of cells with plasma membrane GFP stain (high PIP3 levels = low PTEN activity), whereas white color corresponds to the percentage of cells that display a nucleocytoplasmic GFP signal (low PIP3 levels = high PTEN activity). Over 100 cells were analyzed microscopically per experiment. Data are the average from three different experiments. Error bars correspond to the standard deviation. (+) or (−) signs indicate the ability of each PTEN mutation to rescue growth arrest induced by p110α-CAAX, as determined by serial dilution drop growth assays on solid medium (see inlet at the top as a reference). The drop growth experiments were performed on co-transformants expressing only p110α-CAAX and the indicated PTEN mutation. Asterisks (*) mark mutations to Ala that have been reported in tumors/germline PHTS. View largeDownload slide Functional assessment in the yeast in vivo model of Ala-scanning mutations covering the PTEN catalytic site. YPH499 S. cerevisiae transformants expressing p110α-CAAX, GFP-Akt1 and PTEN mutations [Ala substitutions of the indicated amino acids: residues 88–98 at the WPD-loop, residues 121–131 at the P-loop (catalytic Cys in bold), residues 160–171 at the T-loop; Val substitutions in the case of residues Ala121 and Ala126] were incubated for 5 h in the presence of galactose (all heterologous proteins are co-expressed from the GAL1 galactose-inducible promoter), and GFP staining was monitored by fluorescence microscopy. As a reference, controls expressing wild-type (WT) PTEN or the empty vector (φ) are shown at the top (left). Black-color bars indicates the percentage of cells with plasma membrane GFP stain (high PIP3 levels = low PTEN activity), whereas white color corresponds to the percentage of cells that display a nucleocytoplasmic GFP signal (low PIP3 levels = high PTEN activity). Over 100 cells were analyzed microscopically per experiment. Data are the average from three different experiments. Error bars correspond to the standard deviation. (+) or (−) signs indicate the ability of each PTEN mutation to rescue growth arrest induced by p110α-CAAX, as determined by serial dilution drop growth assays on solid medium (see inlet at the top as a reference). The drop growth experiments were performed on co-transformants expressing only p110α-CAAX and the indicated PTEN mutation. Asterisks (*) mark mutations to Ala that have been reported in tumors/germline PHTS. Functional analysis of mutations at the PTEN P-loop mimicking PTEN-like proteins  PTEN-like proteins include TPIP and TPTE, as well as tensins and auxilins. The WPD- and TI-loops are divergent between PTEN and PTEN-like proteins, whereas the P-loop is more conserved (Fig. 1C). As part of our mutational analysis of the PTEN active site, we designed single amino acid substitution mutants on PTEN that mimicked the P-loop from the different PTEN-like proteins and tested their PIP3 phosphatase activity in the yeast system. Mutations included A121V, I122L, I122V, H123Y, C124N, K125L, K125M, K125R, A126D, A126G, G127N, K128R, K128T, G129D, G129A, R130A, R130K, T131I, T131L and T131S (note that A121V, G129A and R130A mutations are included in Fig. 2). A group of mutations (H123Y, C124N, A126D, G127N, K128T, G129D, R130A, R130K, T131I and T131L) fully abrogated the PIP3 phosphatase activity of PTEN in yeast, whereas other two groups only affected partially (I122L, K125L, K125M, A126G and K128R) or did not affect PTEN PIP3 phosphatase activity (A121V, I122V, K125R, G129A and T131S) (Fig. 3; note that results for A121V, G129A and R130A mutations are included in Fig. 2). The results from this mutational analysis are in agreement with the in vitro PIP3 phosphatase activity reported for TPIP and with the lack of activity reported for TPTE (35). Our results also suggest that the P-loops from tensin and auxilin proteins do not bear catalytic activity. Moreover, this analysis revealed that some conservative mutations at the PTEN P-loop (such as I122V, K125R and T131S) are permissive for its activity in vivo.  Figure 3. Functional assessment of PTEN mutations mimicking the P-loop sequence from PTEN-like proteins. Experiments were performed and are presented as in Figure 2. The alignment marks divergences within the P-loop sequence between PTEN and PTEN-related proteins, which correspond to the substitutions made in the PTEN-mutated versions. The numbering of residues for PTEN is shown. ‘=’ indicates the same residue at that position than PTEN. The data for substitutions marked in italics in this alignment are already presented in Figure 2. The asterisk marks a mutation reported in tumors/germline PHTS. View largeDownload slide Functional assessment of PTEN mutations mimicking the P-loop sequence from PTEN-like proteins. Experiments were performed and are presented as in Figure 2. The alignment marks divergences within the P-loop sequence between PTEN and PTEN-related proteins, which correspond to the substitutions made in the PTEN-mutated versions. The numbering of residues for PTEN is shown. ‘=’ indicates the same residue at that position than PTEN. The data for substitutions marked in italics in this alignment are already presented in Figure 2. The asterisk marks a mutation reported in tumors/germline PHTS. Functional analysis of tumor-related mutations targeting PTEN active site residues  Tumor-related mutations are spread along the entire PTEN amino acid sequence. Nevertheless, the PTEN C-terminal tail (last 50 residues) is targeted by mutations less frequently, in agreement with our previous finding using the yeast heterologous system that PTEN 1–349 is the minimal fully functional PTEN protein (30). On the other hand, the core PTP catalytic domain (residues 14–185) is more frequently targeted by mutations in either tumors or PHTS patients. Some of these mutations have been analyzed in terms of intrinsic catalytic activity (36–40), but the majority of them have not been directly tested for function. We have analyzed in the yeast system the PIP3 phosphatase activity of tumor-related mutations targeting PTEN residues at the PTEN catalytic loops (note that some of these mutations have been analyzed previously and are shown in Figs 2 and 3; and Figs 5 and 6 also include some of them). As expected, all the tumor mutations at the P-loop tested (A121E, I122S, H123D, H123Y, C124S, K125E, A126S, A126V, G127E, K128N, G129E, G129V, G129R, R130G, T131A and T131I) gave rise to proteins that were fully inactive, except for A126S and K128N that produced partially inactive proteins (Fig. 4 and Figs 2 and 3). Mutations at the TI-loop included T160I, R161G, D162G, G165E, G165V, V166I, T167A, I168F, P169H and S170R. Among these, only the T160I, G165E, G165V and S170R were loss-of-function mutations (Fig. 4 and Fig. 2). Finally, tumor-related mutations targeting the WPD loop included Y88C, F90L, E91A, D92A, D92E, D92G, D92H, D92N, D92V, H93D, H93Q, H93R, H93Y, N94I, P95L and P96Q. Proteins bearing Y88C, F90L or E91A mutations were active, whereas the rest of mutant proteins were partially or fully inactive (Fig. 4 and Figs 2, 5 and 6). A summary of the tumor-related PTEN mutants analyzed is shown in Supplementary Material, Table S1. Taken together, our findings illustrate the heterogeneity in the catalytic activity of tumor-related PTEN mutant proteins.  Figure 4. Functional assessment of tumor-related PTEN mutations targeting PTEN catalytic loops. Experiments were performed as those in Figure 2. View largeDownload slide Functional assessment of tumor-related PTEN mutations targeting PTEN catalytic loops. Experiments were performed as those in Figure 2. Figure 5. Functional assessment of PTEN mutations targeting the Asp92 residue. (A) Tolerance to mutation of the Asp92 residue. Mutations were assessed in yeast, as those in Figure 2. Asterisks mark mutations that have been reported in tumors/germline PHTS. The image at the right corresponds to growth rescue assays from representative PTEN mutations and controls from the data presented. (B) In vitro phosphatase activity of recombinant PTEN proteins purified from COS-7 cell line transfectants, as determined by the malachite green assay, using diC8-phosphatydilinositol PIP3 as the substrate. Data are the average from three independent experiments. Error bars correspond to the standard deviation. (C) Ability of PTEN mutations to abolish HA-Akt activation in mammalian cells. PTEN wild-type or the indicated mutations were co-expressed with HA-Akt1 in COS-7 cells. Cell-free lysates were subjected to immunoblot using anti-phospho-active-Akt antibodies (p-Thr308 and p-Ser473). The content of PTEN and HA-Akt1 in the lysates was monitored using anti-PTEN (all PTEN mutations were expressed equally, not shown) and anti-HA antibodies, respectively. Bands were quantified and results are presented as the average ± SD of the p-Akt/Akt ratio, obtained from three independent experiments. View largeDownload slide Functional assessment of PTEN mutations targeting the Asp92 residue. (A) Tolerance to mutation of the Asp92 residue. Mutations were assessed in yeast, as those in Figure 2. Asterisks mark mutations that have been reported in tumors/germline PHTS. The image at the right corresponds to growth rescue assays from representative PTEN mutations and controls from the data presented. (B) In vitro phosphatase activity of recombinant PTEN proteins purified from COS-7 cell line transfectants, as determined by the malachite green assay, using diC8-phosphatydilinositol PIP3 as the substrate. Data are the average from three independent experiments. Error bars correspond to the standard deviation. (C) Ability of PTEN mutations to abolish HA-Akt activation in mammalian cells. PTEN wild-type or the indicated mutations were co-expressed with HA-Akt1 in COS-7 cells. Cell-free lysates were subjected to immunoblot using anti-phospho-active-Akt antibodies (p-Thr308 and p-Ser473). The content of PTEN and HA-Akt1 in the lysates was monitored using anti-PTEN (all PTEN mutations were expressed equally, not shown) and anti-HA antibodies, respectively. Bands were quantified and results are presented as the average ± SD of the p-Akt/Akt ratio, obtained from three independent experiments. Figure 6. Functional assessment of PTEN mutations related to PHTS (A) or ASD/DD (B) hereditary syndromes. Experiments were performed as described in Figure 2. Asterisks in (B) mark mutations that have been reported in germline PHTS. (C) Global functional analyses of the impact on catalytic activity of PHTS- versus ASD/DD-related mutations. The y-axis refers to relative in vivo PTEN activity, as measured by the percentage of yeast cells with low PIP3 levels at the plasma membrane, as determined by GFP-Akt1 localization (as in Figs 2–4 and 6A). Each spot corresponds to the average data from three independent experiments on each particular mutation from the indicated category (PHTS or ASD/DD). Spots surrounded by a circle correspond to mutations that are common to PHTS or ASD/DD [those marked with asterisks in (B)]. Vertical lines mark the standard deviation. Paired t-test of these independent set of data revealed a significant difference in activity for ASD/DD mutations with respect to PHTS mutations (P < 0.001). (D) Comparative analysis of PHTS and ASD/DD PTEN mutations referred to their ability to rescue growth arrest induced in S. cerevisiae by p110α-CAAX expression. ASD/DD-related mutations are generally more competent than PHTS-related mutations in counteracting p110α-CAAX activity. PHTS mutations included in this study are listed in Supplementary Material, Table S1, and results correspond to those in (A) and in Figures 4 and 5. ASD/DD mutations data correspond to those in (B). View large Download slide Functional assessment of PTEN mutations related to PHTS (A) or ASD/DD (B) hereditary syndromes. Experiments were performed as described in Figure 2. Asterisks in (B) mark mutations that have been reported in germline PHTS. (C) Global functional analyses of the impact on catalytic activity of PHTS- versus ASD/DD-related mutations. The y-axis refers to relative in vivo PTEN activity, as measured by the percentage of yeast cells with low PIP3 levels at the plasma membrane, as determined by GFP-Akt1 localization (as in Figs 2–4 and 6A). Each spot corresponds to the average data from three independent experiments on each particular mutation from the indicated category (PHTS or ASD/DD). Spots surrounded by a circle correspond to mutations that are common to PHTS or ASD/DD [those marked with asterisks in (B)]. Vertical lines mark the standard deviation. Paired t-test of these independent set of data revealed a significant difference in activity for ASD/DD mutations with respect to PHTS mutations (P < 0.001). (D) Comparative analysis of PHTS and ASD/DD PTEN mutations referred to their ability to rescue growth arrest induced in S. cerevisiae by p110α-CAAX expression. ASD/DD-related mutations are generally more competent than PHTS-related mutations in counteracting p110α-CAAX activity. PHTS mutations included in this study are listed in Supplementary Material, Table S1, and results correspond to those in (A) and in Figures 4 and 5. ASD/DD mutations data correspond to those in (B). Relevance of the Asp92 residue in PTEN activity in vivo  Remarkably, a mutation in the putative catalytic Asp92 residue to Asn (D92N) rendered a protein partially active in vivo in the yeast system, whereas substitution of this residue to any of the other 18 amino acids generated fully inactive PTEN enzymes (Fig. 5A). This outlines the importance of Asp92 in PTEN enzymatic activity, but also demonstrates that the presence of an aspartic acid residue at this position is not a strict requirement for PTEN-driven catalysis. To further substantiate this observation, the PIP3 phosphatase activity of the PTEN mutations D92A (non-conservative), D92E (charge-conservative) and D92N (size-conservative), expressed in mammalian cells, was tested both in vitro and in vivo. As shown, the mutations D92A and D92E fully abrogated hydrolysis of PIP3 by PTEN in vitro, whereas the mutation D92N only partially affected it (Fig. 5B). Upon co-expression with Akt, the D92N PTEN mutant also manifested more activity [indirectly measured as the levels of phospho-Akt (p-Akt) content] than the D92A or the D92E mutant proteins (Fig. 5C). Our results suggest that Asp92 does not behave as the general acid in the hydrolysis of PIP3 by PTEN, in vitro and in vivo.  Most of germline PTEN mutations associated with autism syndrome disorders do not fully abrogate PIP3 phosphatase activity  The involvement of PTEN in brain developmental disorders has been proposed on the basis of the identification of hereditary PTEN mutations in patients with these disorders (41,42), but little information is available on the severity of such mutations in terms of PTEN function. One of the mutations present in glioblastoma tumor samples (H93R) has also been found in the germline of a patient with autism (19). When performing the experiments shown above on tumor-related PTEN mutations, we included the H93R and found it to display a modest loss of activity in the yeast model when compared with wild-type PTEN, although it was capable of fully recovering yeast growth (Fig. 6B). This prompted us to examine additional inherited mutations found in patients with autism-related disorders (ASD) or with DD/mental retardation. These mutations included, besides H93R, the G44D, H118P, H123Q, M134T, E157G, R173H, Y176C, T202I, F241S, D252G, W274L, N276S and D326N, involving not only catalytic but other protein domains. Remarkably, proteins bearing most of these mutations were either fully or partially active in the yeast (Fig. 6B and Supplementary Material, Table S1), although their ability to recover growth from PI3K-imposed inhibition was variable. These results were in contrast to those obtained by analyzing the function of a panel of PHTS-associated mutations, also distributed along the entire PTEN coding region (mutations A34D, M35R, G36R, N48K, H61D, Y68D, D92E, H93Y, P96Q, H123D, C124S, G129E, R130G, Y155C, G165E, G165V, S170R, L181P, V217N, P246L, R335L, V343E; L345V and F347L; Fig. 6A and Supplementary Material, Table S1). Most of the PHTS-associated mutations generated total or partial loss of function when analyzed in vivo in yeast. Moreover, global comparison of PHTS- and ASD/DD-related mutations in terms of their ability both to deplete PIP3 generated by PI3K in yeast (Fig. 6C; P < 0.001) and to rescue yeast growth (Fig. 6D) revealed that ASD/DD-related PTEN mutations have a lower effect in PTEN activity than those associated with PHTS. These findings indicate that specific PTEN functional patterns correlate with the mutations found on either PHTS or ASD/DD patients and suggest that a severe loss of the PTEN PIP3 catalytic activity may not be the major driver of autism or autism-related neurological disorders.  DISCUSSION  The PTEN phosphatase is a key regulatory hub of PI3K-mediated signaling. While mammals express a variety of isoforms of PI3K and PIP3-dependent downstream kinases in this pathway, the PTEN tumor suppressor is rather unique, being the only one gene that encodes for a common inactivator of the pathway. Thus, mutations in exons of the PTEN gene are frequent in tumors and hereditary cancer syndromes. The regulation of PTEN is complex, involving multiple processes related to its phosphorylation, ubiquitination, nuclear translocation, interaction with membranes and complexing with different proteins (6,8,24,43,44). Although recent reports point towards PTEN functions independent of its lipid phosphatase activity (23–25,45,46), PTEN tumor suppressor function mainly relies on its catalytic activity on PIP3 pools locally generated by PI3K at the plasma membrane. The contribution of PTEN mutations isolated in the clinics to the function of the encoded protein is crucial to understand the molecular mechanisms that lead to tumor development and progression. We have developed a simple model for functional assessment of PTEN mutations based on heterologous expression in yeast (1,31). This model allows ready evaluation of the involvement of PTEN mutations on the ability to counteract PI3K activity in vivo, by compromising PTEN PIP3 catalytic activity or by affecting PTEN protein stability, two common mechanisms by which PTEN is inactivated in tumors (30). Here, we report extensive use of this model with two aims: (i) to provide clues for structure–function relationship by systematic mutagenesis and (ii) to study the influence of individual disease-related PTEN mutations in its lipid phosphatase activity.  From our systematic functional analysis on the PTEN catalytic loops, several conclusions can be driven. First, as expected, the P-loop including the catalytic Cys residue is very sensitive to mutagenesis, in consonance with the observation that it constitutes a hot spot for tumor-related mutations (11,15,33), whereas the WPD and TI loops are more permissive to point Ala substitutions. Still, residues like Asp92 or His93 (WPD-loop), Asp162, Val166 or Gln171 (TI-loop) were critical for function. We made a comprehensive study on tolerance to mutation of the Asp92 residue, equivalent to the acid proton donor involved in catalysis in PTPs that are structurally related to PTEN (47). Tolerance to mutation was very low in this residue, since its substitution to any other amino acid yielded an inactive enzyme, except for Asp-to-Asn substitution, which partially retained activity in vivo, not only in the yeast model but also in mammalian cells. Since the D92N mutation has been reported in the clinic, such reduced activity may substantially contribute to disease. Interestingly, this argues against the need for an acid residue in that position, revealing an alternative mechanism of catalysis for the PTEN phosphatase, as proposed by other authors based on in vitro experiments (28,29). We also made substitutions within the catalytic loops mimicking PTEN-related proteins, such as TPIP, TPTE, tensin and auxilin. Although these proteins possess distinct non-PTP-related domains that control protein targeting, protein–protein interactions and cell signaling, they share the presence of PTP- and C2-like domains with significant similarity with those from PTEN (2,3,48). With the exception of TPIP, PTEN-like proteins are predicted to be catalytically inactive, due either to the lack of essential residues at the catalytic site or to amino acid substitutions potentially deleterious for catalysis (35,49,50). Nevertheless, tensin2/C1-TEN has been proposed to be an active phosphatase, based on functional studies on a mutation that targets its putative catalytic cysteine residue (51). Our observations favor the hypothesis that the P-loop of TPIP might be competent for activity, whereas TPTE, tensins and auxilins would be inactive as phosphatases, as evidenced in other studies (35,52,53).  A large number of different PTEN mutations have been described in human tumors and in the germline of patients with PHTS or PHTS-related syndromes (11,15,33) [for updates, check HGMD (http://www.hgmd.cf.ac.uk/ac/index.php) and COSMIC (http://www.sanger.ac.uk/genetics/CGP/cosmic) databases]. These mutations target the PTEN gene not only at its coding regions, but also at exon–intron boundaries and promoter regions. Most of PTEN mutations at exon–intron boundaries or promoter regions have a major impact in the levels of expression of the PTEN protein, being causative of PTEN functional deficiency and considered as pathogenic (54–56). Mutations targeting the PTEN coding region include frame-shift and nonsense mutations, which also generate unstable truncated PTEN proteins in most of the cases (36), as well as missense mutations that result in individual amino acid changes. Functional analyses of a limited number of these missense mutations have revealed that, in many cases, the resultant amino acid substitutions generate PTEN proteins with impaired intrinsic catalytic activity and/or protein stability (36–39). Also, some examples have been described of missense PTEN mutations that do not affect the intrinsic catalysis nor the stability of the protein, but rather impair essential regulatory PTEN properties, such as binding to membranes or nuclear entry (40,57). Our previous study using the heterologous yeast system as a reporter of the activity of PTEN mutations in vivo revealed that such system reproduces with fidelity the effects on mammalian cells of mutations that diminish either the intrinsic PTEN catalytic activity and/or binding to membranes or the intrinsic PTEN protein stability (30). Our current comprehensive functional study of tumor-associated PTEN mutations indicates that almost all mutations targeting the P-catalytic loop confer loss of PTEN intrinsic catalytic activity (12 of 13), whereas mutations targeting the WPD- or the TI-loops are less frequently associated with full loss of catalysis (5 of 9 and 4 of 9, respectively). These results are in agreement with the Ala-scanning analysis of these regions and suggest the existence of a relatively large number of tumor-associated mutations at the PTEN gene that do not fully abrogate the PTEN catalytic activity, but may be relevant in clinics. Recently, a comprehensive study on PTEN mutations in PHTS disease has yielded predictive clinical parameters (58). Association of reported mutations to the activity of PTEN by means of ready in vivo functional assays, as the one exploited here, might help clinicians in decisions towards putative mutation-specific therapies.  PHTS and ASD/DD are syndromes with distinct clinical entities, which share macrocephaly as a frequent common alteration (59). Also, clinicians have noted that PHTS patients often display neurobehavioral features resembling autism (19) and, interestingly, at least five PTEN mutations (H93R, Y176C, F241S, D252G and R173H; see Supplementary Material, Table S1) have been reported as associated with both PHTS and ASD/DD (19,41,42,58). Our comparative analysis of germline mutations found in PHTS patients and in ASD/DD patients revealed a distinct functional pattern for these two groups of mutations. PHTS-associated mutations, which included in our study mutations distributed all along the PTEN protein, were found significantly more deleterious for PTEN catalysis than ASD/DD-associated mutations (Fig. 6). This could be important for the distinct etiology and progress of tumor-related and tumor non-related syndromes associated with PTEN mutations and may be of relevance in the design and implementation of new therapies for these diseases. It is likely that small variations in the lipid phosphatase activity or in the stability of heterozygotic PTEN mutations can explain the higher penetrance found for the set of PHTS-associated mutations, when compared with ASD/DD-associated mutations. Although it has been suggested that ASD- and macrocephaly-related PTEN mutations may behave differentially in terms of loss of function (19), the lack of functional models has made difficult to provide support for this hypothesis. If this is the case, as suggested by our study, additional unknown factors might exist affecting differentially the etiology and/or progression of these diseases. In this regard, a study focused on the functional analysis of the PHTS- and ASD-associated H93R PTEN mutation reported a partial loss of catalytic activity for this mutation, as well as a defect in the binding to PTEN-activating PIP2 model membranes. Remarkably, the binding of the H93R mutation to phosphatidylserine membranes, which are abundant in mammalian cells, was augmented (60). Our results show that the H93R mutation retained most of its lipid phosphatase activity in the yeast, suggesting that differences in the thresholds that control membrane-binding mediated PTEN activation may exist in distinct cell systems. Also of interest, mice with diminution of PTEN expression levels as subtle as 20% develop a wide spectrum of tumors with high penetrance, and it has been proposed that altered gene dosage may be relevant in ASD/DD (18,61). In this regard, ASD/DD has been linked with abnormal synapsis growth and plasticity, an alteration that has also been observed in mice with PTEN-deficient neurons (62,63). Furthermore, a mice model lacking PTEN expression in mature neuronal populations in the cerebral cortex and the hippocampus displayed behavioral abnormalities reminiscent of human ASD/DD (64). Our findings show a relatively weak association between ASD/DD-related mutations at the PTEN gene and full loss of intrinsic lipid phosphatase activity or protein stability, which is in line with the lack of concordance between ASD/DD and childhood cancer (65). ASD/DD constitutes a heterogeneous, multigene-linked group of developmental disorders (41,42,66). Further studies will be required to ascertain the functional changes on the activity of the PTEN protein from ASD/DD patients with mutations at the PTEN gene. The comprehensive analysis of the functional properties of putative pathogenic mutant proteins, as the one we present here for PTEN mutations, will give some light on the molecular pathways altered in the neurons of patients with ASD/DD.  MATERIALS AND METHODS  Cells, media, growth conditions, transfection and protein detection  The S. cerevisiae strain YPH499 (MATa ade2–101 trp1–63 leu2–1 ura3–52 his3-▵200 lys2–801) was used for heterologous expression of mammalian proteins. For all the analyses, synthetic complete medium was used, containing 0.17 % yeast nitrogen base without amino acids, 0.5% ammonium sulfate supplemented with appropriate amino acids and nucleic acid bases, and added 2% glucose (SD), galactose (SG) or raffinose (SR), as required. Yeasts were transformed by standard procedures. Growth of yeast on plates was tested by spotting transformant cells onto SD or SG plates lacking the corresponding auxotrophic markers. Transformants were grown overnight in SD lacking uracile, leucine or both (SD-U, SD-L or SD-UL) as required and adjusted to an OD600 of 0.5. Five microliter aliquots of each sample plus three serial 1/10 dilutions were deposited on the surfaces of solid media SG-U, SG-L or SG-UL. Growth was monitored after 2–3 days at 30°C. Expression of all PTEN mutations in yeast was verified by immunoblot on yeast lysates with 421B or 425A anti-PTEN mAb (67) followed by horseradish-peroxidase-conjugated anti-mouse antibody (Calbiochem). To measure GFP-Akt1 plasma membrane localization, as an indirect indicator of cellular PIP3 levels, transformant cells were grown to log phase in liquid SR medium lacking the corresponding auxotrophic markers, and then 2 % galactose was added for 6–8 h. GFP-Akt1 was visualized by fluorescence microscopy. To obtain statistically significant data, ≥100 cells were examined from each condition or experiment for either cytoplasmic or membrane-associated localization. Cells were examined under an Eclipse TE2000U microscope (Nikon) and digital images were acquired with Orca C4742-95-12ER charge-coupled device camera (Hamamatsu) and Aquacosmos Imaging Systems or HCImage software. To overexpress PTEN mutations in mammalian cells, COS-7 cells (simian kidney) were transfected by the DEAE-dextran method and processed after 48 h. To measure p-Akt content in COS-7 cells in the presence of PTEN mutations, cells were co-transfected with pRK5 PTEN and pSG5 HA-Akt1 as described (68). Cells were lysed, and post-nuclear lysates were subjected by immunoblot using a mixture of anti-p-Thr308 and anti-p-Ser473-Akt antibodies (Cell Signalling Technologies). Membranes were stripped and probed for anti-Akt antibody (Cell Signalling Technologies). Bands were quantified using ImageQuant TL software, and results are represented as the average ± SD of the p-Akt/Akt ratio.  Plasmids, mutagenesis and in vitro phosphatase assays  YCpLG myc-p110-CAAX, pYES2 PTEN, pRK5 PTEN, pSG5 HA-Akt1 and pYES3 GFP-Akt1 have been described previously (30). Mutagenesis was performed by a two-step PCR strategy. All mutations were checked by DNA sequencing. The sequences of oligonucleotides used for mutagenesis are available on request. In vitro phosphatase assays were made using PTEN wild-type or mutations, from COS-7-transfected cells, as the enzymes, and diC8-phosphatydilinositol PIP3 (Echelon) as the substrate, as described previously (30). 
2232||The PTEN (phosphatase and tensin homolog) phosphatase is unique in mammals in terms of its tumor suppressor activity, exerted by dephosphorylation of the lipid second messenger PIP3 (phosphatidylinositol 3,4,5-trisphosphate), which activates the phosphoinositide 3-kinase/Akt/mTOR (mammalian target of rapamycin) oncogenic pathway. Loss-of-function mutations in the PTEN gene are frequent in human cancer and in the germline of patients with PTEN hamartoma tumor-related syndromes (PHTSs). In addition, PTEN is mutated in patients with autism spectrum disorders (ASDs), although no functional information on these mutations is available. Here, we report a comprehensive in vivo functional analysis of human PTEN using a heterologous yeast reconstitution system. Ala-scanning mutagenesis at the catalytic loops of PTEN outlined the critical role of residues within the P-catalytic loop for PIP3 phosphatase activity in vivo. PTEN mutations that mimic the P-catalytic loop of mammalian PTEN-like proteins (TPTE, TPIP, tensins and auxilins) affected PTEN function variably, whereas tumor- or PHTS-associated mutations targeting the PTEN P-loop produced complete loss of function. Conversely, Ala-substitutions, as well as tumor-related mutations at the WPD- and TI-catalytic loops, displayed partial activity in many cases. Interestingly, a tumor-related D92N mutation was partially active, supporting the notion that the PTEN Asp92 residue might not function as the catalytic general acid. The analysis of a panel of ASD-associated hereditary PTEN mutations revealed that most of them did not substantially abrogate PTEN activity in vivo, whereas most of PHTS-associated mutations did. Our findings reveal distinctive functional patterns among PTEN mutations found in tumors and in the germline of PHTS and ASD patients, which could be relevant for therapy. Topic: mutation catalysis phosphoric monoester hydrolases yeasts neoplasms pten gene Issue Section: Articles INTRODUCTION  PTEN (phosphatase and tensin homolog deleted in chromosome 10) is a mammalian lipid and protein phosphatase with orthologs in lower animals, plants and fungi (1). In mammals, PTEN-related proteins exist whose activity has been poorly explored. These proteins include TPIP and TPTE (orthologs of a voltage-sensor phosphatase from Ciona intestinalis), as well as the actin-binding tensin 1/2/3 and the clathrin-binding auxilin 1/2 (2–4). PTEN most relevant function is based on its ability to dephosphorylate phosphatidylinositol 3,4,5-trisphosphate (PIP3) in the 3′ phosphate of the inositol ring, resulting in the bisphosphate product phosphatidylinositol 4,5-bisphosphate (PIP2), thus broadly inhibiting the oncogenic phosphoinositide 3-kinase (PI3K)-dependent signaling (5–8). As a tumor suppressor, PTEN exerts its function by counteracting the anti-apoptotic and growth stimulatory effects of PDK1 (phosphoinositide-dependent kinase) and protein kinase B (PKB/Akt), which rely on PIP3 for their activation (9,10). Sporadic somatic mutations in PTEN make this tumor suppressor gene one of the two most frequently affected in human malignancies, together with p53, especially in solid tumors (11–14). Germline mutations of PTEN lead to inherited hamartoma, Cowden syndrome and related disorders, generally known as PTEN hamartoma tumor-related syndromes (PHTSs) (15–17). PTEN is considered haploinsufficient to prevent certain malignancies, suggesting that dosage is important for its function, as it must be the influence of a given point mutation in the catalytic activity of the enzyme (18). Besides its clear involvement in PHTS, germline PTEN mutations have been described in patients with neurodevelopmental disorders, such as autism spectrum disorders (ASDs) and developmental delay (DD) (19–22). Oncogenic PTEN mutations have been generally related to a loss of function of the encoded phosphatase. However, few studies have been done to understand the influence of putative neurodevelopment-related PTEN mutations on its catalytic activity.  Although phosphatase-independent functions of PTEN have also been described to contribute to its tumor suppressive activity (8,23–25), buffering PI3K signaling in virtue of its catalytic activity is assumed to be its key role. Thus, the precise dissection of PTEN catalytic properties is highly relevant for human disease. The crystal structure of PTEN (26) revealed an active site pocket similar to those of protein tyrosine phosphatases (PTPs) and dual-specificity Thr/Ser/Tyr phosphatases, as predicted by primary sequence analyses, although richer in basic residues. This explained the ability of PTEN to dephosphorylate acidic phosphopeptides (27). In addition, the PTEN active site pocket was wider than that of PTPs, to accommodate the rather bulky phosphorylated inositol moiety that constitutes the polar head of PIP3 (26). The PTEN phosphatase signature motif ([123]HCKAGKGR[130]; P-loop), including the catalytic Cys124 and Arg130 residues, is located at the bottom of the active site pocket. The walls of the pocket are delimited in part by a WPD-loop (thus designed after the equivalent region in PTP1B) and a TI-loop (so named because of conserved Thr and Ile residues), which are thought to be important for the activity of the enzyme. The fact that the Asp92, within the PTEN WPD-loop, is located in the pocket in an identical fashion to the equivalent proton donor catalytic residue on PTP1B led to the hypothesis that it may serve as the general acid that allows protonation of the leaving phosphate during the dephosphorylation reaction. Although in vitro studies using an Asp92 to Ala PTEN mutation indicated that Asp92 does not act as the general acid (28,29), no conclusive studies have been done to analyze the contribution of Asp92 in the in vivo dephosphorylation of PIP3 by PTEN.  We have previously validated a humanized yeast model to study the function of PI3K and PTEN in vivo, based on the heterologous co-expression of these proteins (1,30,31). Briefly, expression of hyperactive p110α, the catalytic subunit of mammalian class I PI3K, results in high toxicity in yeast cells as a result of the depletion of essential PIP2 pools. Co-expression of PTEN restores PIP2 levels and suppresses PI3K toxicity. Besides, co-expression of GFP-tagged mammalian Akt in this system allowed the detection of pools of PI3K-generated PIP3 in the yeast cell, where Akt localized, providing a visual readout of PI3K and PTEN activities (30,32). Here, we present an extensive site-directed mutagenesis and functional study of PTEN by using this system. Humanized yeast-based bioassays combine the advantages of powerful yeast genetics, an ever-growing availability of post-genomic tools, their ease and safety of manipulation and the fast achievement of results (1). Our results offer insights into the catalytic properties of PTEN and provide a platform to compare in vivo the contribution to lipid phosphatase inactivation of mutations found in tumors and in the germline of patients with PTEN-related syndromes. Our analysis reveals that PTEN germline mutations found in patients with ASD/DD neurodevelopmental disorders do not generally confer complete loss of function of the PTEN PIP3 phosphatase activity, when compared with mutations found in the germline of PHTS patients with tumor disorders.  RESULTS  Ala-scanning of the catalytic loops at the PTEN active site  The PIP3 lipid phosphatase activity of PTEN is essential for its tumor suppressor activity, which is evidenced by the abundance of tumor-related mutations in exons encoding the catalytic phosphatase core of the enzyme (11,15,33). Thus, the precise definition of PIP3 catalytic properties of PTEN in vivo, and its relation with PTEN residues mutated in tumor samples or in patients, is highly relevant in oncology. The PTEN active site is conformed by three catalytic loops (26): the WPD-loop, residues 88–98; the P-loop, residues 121–131; and the TI-loop, residues 160–171 (Fig. 1A). The P-catalytic loop (containing the essential catalytic cysteine; Cys124 in human PTEN) is highly conserved between species, from mammals to lower eukaryotes, whereas the WPD- and TI-loops are more divergent (Fig. 1B). To test the contribution of all individual residues within the three PTEN catalytic loops to the in vivo activity of the enzyme, a comprehensive Ala-scanning mutagenesis was performed. The PIP3 catalytic activity of the resulting mutations was assessed in vivo using a reconstitution heterologous system in the yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae (31). As illustrated in Figure 2, Ala substitutions of the residues at the core P-loop (residues 121–131) substantially abrogated the PTEN ability to dephosphorylate PIP3in vivo, with the exception of the A121V, G129A and T131A mutations, which displayed partial or total activity (note that Ala residues have been substituted by Val residues in our Ala-scanning mutational analysis). Remarkably, a Cowden disease mutation targeting the Gly129 residue (G129E) is defective for PIP3 phosphatase activity but maintains in vitro activity against phosphotyrosine peptides (34). Overall, the residues at the WPD- and TI-loops were less important for PIP3 catalytic activity. Thus, Ala substitutions of most WPD residues (88–98) did not affect, or only partially affected, PTEN catalytic activity, with the exception of Asp92 and His93 that fully abrogated the PTEN function (Fig. 2). Also, Ala substitutions of most TI residues (160–171) only weakly affected the PTEN activity, except for Val166, Gln171 and, to some extent, Asp162. (Fig. 2) The loss-of-function properties of the D92A mutation is in accordance with the importance of this residue in PTEN phosphatase catalysis, although its role as the general acid in the hydrolysis reaction remains unclear (28,29).  Figure 1. PTEN catalytic loops. (A) Detail of the three-dimensional structure of the PTEN catalytic site. Regions spanning the WPD-, P- and TI-catalytic loops are marked in yellow, red and blue, respectively. Image was generated with PyMOL (http://pymol.org), based on PDB ID: 1D5R (26). (B) Amino acid sequence alignment of PTEN catalytic loops from Homo sapiens, Danio rerio, Strongylocentrotus purpuratus, Drosophila melanogaster, Caenorhabditis elegans, Dictyostelium discoideum, Schizosaccharomyces pombe and S. cerevisiae. (C) Amino acid sequence alignment of PTEN catalytic loops with the equivalent regions from PTEN-like proteins (H. sapiens sequences). Amino acid numbering from H. sapiens PTEN is in brackets. Amino acid identity with regard to H. sapiens PTEN is marked in yellow. Alignments were made manually. View largeDownload slide PTEN catalytic loops. (A) Detail of the three-dimensional structure of the PTEN catalytic site. Regions spanning the WPD-, P- and TI-catalytic loops are marked in yellow, red and blue, respectively. Image was generated with PyMOL (http://pymol.org), based on PDB ID: 1D5R (26). (B) Amino acid sequence alignment of PTEN catalytic loops from Homo sapiens, Danio rerio, Strongylocentrotus purpuratus, Drosophila melanogaster, Caenorhabditis elegans, Dictyostelium discoideum, Schizosaccharomyces pombe and S. cerevisiae. (C) Amino acid sequence alignment of PTEN catalytic loops with the equivalent regions from PTEN-like proteins (H. sapiens sequences). Amino acid numbering from H. sapiens PTEN is in brackets. Amino acid identity with regard to H. sapiens PTEN is marked in yellow. Alignments were made manually. Figure 2. Functional assessment in the yeast in vivo model of Ala-scanning mutations covering the PTEN catalytic site. YPH499 S. cerevisiae transformants expressing p110α-CAAX, GFP-Akt1 and PTEN mutations [Ala substitutions of the indicated amino acids: residues 88–98 at the WPD-loop, residues 121–131 at the P-loop (catalytic Cys in bold), residues 160–171 at the T-loop; Val substitutions in the case of residues Ala121 and Ala126] were incubated for 5 h in the presence of galactose (all heterologous proteins are co-expressed from the GAL1 galactose-inducible promoter), and GFP staining was monitored by fluorescence microscopy. As a reference, controls expressing wild-type (WT) PTEN or the empty vector (φ) are shown at the top (left). Black-color bars indicates the percentage of cells with plasma membrane GFP stain (high PIP3 levels = low PTEN activity), whereas white color corresponds to the percentage of cells that display a nucleocytoplasmic GFP signal (low PIP3 levels = high PTEN activity). Over 100 cells were analyzed microscopically per experiment. Data are the average from three different experiments. Error bars correspond to the standard deviation. (+) or (−) signs indicate the ability of each PTEN mutation to rescue growth arrest induced by p110α-CAAX, as determined by serial dilution drop growth assays on solid medium (see inlet at the top as a reference). The drop growth experiments were performed on co-transformants expressing only p110α-CAAX and the indicated PTEN mutation. Asterisks (*) mark mutations to Ala that have been reported in tumors/germline PHTS. View largeDownload slide Functional assessment in the yeast in vivo model of Ala-scanning mutations covering the PTEN catalytic site. YPH499 S. cerevisiae transformants expressing p110α-CAAX, GFP-Akt1 and PTEN mutations [Ala substitutions of the indicated amino acids: residues 88–98 at the WPD-loop, residues 121–131 at the P-loop (catalytic Cys in bold), residues 160–171 at the T-loop; Val substitutions in the case of residues Ala121 and Ala126] were incubated for 5 h in the presence of galactose (all heterologous proteins are co-expressed from the GAL1 galactose-inducible promoter), and GFP staining was monitored by fluorescence microscopy. As a reference, controls expressing wild-type (WT) PTEN or the empty vector (φ) are shown at the top (left). Black-color bars indicates the percentage of cells with plasma membrane GFP stain (high PIP3 levels = low PTEN activity), whereas white color corresponds to the percentage of cells that display a nucleocytoplasmic GFP signal (low PIP3 levels = high PTEN activity). Over 100 cells were analyzed microscopically per experiment. Data are the average from three different experiments. Error bars correspond to the standard deviation. (+) or (−) signs indicate the ability of each PTEN mutation to rescue growth arrest induced by p110α-CAAX, as determined by serial dilution drop growth assays on solid medium (see inlet at the top as a reference). The drop growth experiments were performed on co-transformants expressing only p110α-CAAX and the indicated PTEN mutation. Asterisks (*) mark mutations to Ala that have been reported in tumors/germline PHTS. Functional analysis of mutations at the PTEN P-loop mimicking PTEN-like proteins  PTEN-like proteins include TPIP and TPTE, as well as tensins and auxilins. The WPD- and TI-loops are divergent between PTEN and PTEN-like proteins, whereas the P-loop is more conserved (Fig. 1C). As part of our mutational analysis of the PTEN active site, we designed single amino acid substitution mutants on PTEN that mimicked the P-loop from the different PTEN-like proteins and tested their PIP3 phosphatase activity in the yeast system. Mutations included A121V, I122L, I122V, H123Y, C124N, K125L, K125M, K125R, A126D, A126G, G127N, K128R, K128T, G129D, G129A, R130A, R130K, T131I, T131L and T131S (note that A121V, G129A and R130A mutations are included in Fig. 2). A group of mutations (H123Y, C124N, A126D, G127N, K128T, G129D, R130A, R130K, T131I and T131L) fully abrogated the PIP3 phosphatase activity of PTEN in yeast, whereas other two groups only affected partially (I122L, K125L, K125M, A126G and K128R) or did not affect PTEN PIP3 phosphatase activity (A121V, I122V, K125R, G129A and T131S) (Fig. 3; note that results for A121V, G129A and R130A mutations are included in Fig. 2). The results from this mutational analysis are in agreement with the in vitro PIP3 phosphatase activity reported for TPIP and with the lack of activity reported for TPTE (35). Our results also suggest that the P-loops from tensin and auxilin proteins do not bear catalytic activity. Moreover, this analysis revealed that some conservative mutations at the PTEN P-loop (such as I122V, K125R and T131S) are permissive for its activity in vivo.  Figure 3. Functional assessment of PTEN mutations mimicking the P-loop sequence from PTEN-like proteins. Experiments were performed and are presented as in Figure 2. The alignment marks divergences within the P-loop sequence between PTEN and PTEN-related proteins, which correspond to the substitutions made in the PTEN-mutated versions. The numbering of residues for PTEN is shown. ‘=’ indicates the same residue at that position than PTEN. The data for substitutions marked in italics in this alignment are already presented in Figure 2. The asterisk marks a mutation reported in tumors/germline PHTS. View largeDownload slide Functional assessment of PTEN mutations mimicking the P-loop sequence from PTEN-like proteins. Experiments were performed and are presented as in Figure 2. The alignment marks divergences within the P-loop sequence between PTEN and PTEN-related proteins, which correspond to the substitutions made in the PTEN-mutated versions. The numbering of residues for PTEN is shown. ‘=’ indicates the same residue at that position than PTEN. The data for substitutions marked in italics in this alignment are already presented in Figure 2. The asterisk marks a mutation reported in tumors/germline PHTS. Functional analysis of tumor-related mutations targeting PTEN active site residues  Tumor-related mutations are spread along the entire PTEN amino acid sequence. Nevertheless, the PTEN C-terminal tail (last 50 residues) is targeted by mutations less frequently, in agreement with our previous finding using the yeast heterologous system that PTEN 1–349 is the minimal fully functional PTEN protein (30). On the other hand, the core PTP catalytic domain (residues 14–185) is more frequently targeted by mutations in either tumors or PHTS patients. Some of these mutations have been analyzed in terms of intrinsic catalytic activity (36–40), but the majority of them have not been directly tested for function. We have analyzed in the yeast system the PIP3 phosphatase activity of tumor-related mutations targeting PTEN residues at the PTEN catalytic loops (note that some of these mutations have been analyzed previously and are shown in Figs 2 and 3; and Figs 5 and 6 also include some of them). As expected, all the tumor mutations at the P-loop tested (A121E, I122S, H123D, H123Y, C124S, K125E, A126S, A126V, G127E, K128N, G129E, G129V, G129R, R130G, T131A and T131I) gave rise to proteins that were fully inactive, except for A126S and K128N that produced partially inactive proteins (Fig. 4 and Figs 2 and 3). Mutations at the TI-loop included T160I, R161G, D162G, G165E, G165V, V166I, T167A, I168F, P169H and S170R. Among these, only the T160I, G165E, G165V and S170R were loss-of-function mutations (Fig. 4 and Fig. 2). Finally, tumor-related mutations targeting the WPD loop included Y88C, F90L, E91A, D92A, D92E, D92G, D92H, D92N, D92V, H93D, H93Q, H93R, H93Y, N94I, P95L and P96Q. Proteins bearing Y88C, F90L or E91A mutations were active, whereas the rest of mutant proteins were partially or fully inactive (Fig. 4 and Figs 2, 5 and 6). A summary of the tumor-related PTEN mutants analyzed is shown in Supplementary Material, Table S1. Taken together, our findings illustrate the heterogeneity in the catalytic activity of tumor-related PTEN mutant proteins.  Figure 4. Functional assessment of tumor-related PTEN mutations targeting PTEN catalytic loops. Experiments were performed as those in Figure 2. View largeDownload slide Functional assessment of tumor-related PTEN mutations targeting PTEN catalytic loops. Experiments were performed as those in Figure 2. Figure 5. Functional assessment of PTEN mutations targeting the Asp92 residue. (A) Tolerance to mutation of the Asp92 residue. Mutations were assessed in yeast, as those in Figure 2. Asterisks mark mutations that have been reported in tumors/germline PHTS. The image at the right corresponds to growth rescue assays from representative PTEN mutations and controls from the data presented. (B) In vitro phosphatase activity of recombinant PTEN proteins purified from COS-7 cell line transfectants, as determined by the malachite green assay, using diC8-phosphatydilinositol PIP3 as the substrate. Data are the average from three independent experiments. Error bars correspond to the standard deviation. (C) Ability of PTEN mutations to abolish HA-Akt activation in mammalian cells. PTEN wild-type or the indicated mutations were co-expressed with HA-Akt1 in COS-7 cells. Cell-free lysates were subjected to immunoblot using anti-phospho-active-Akt antibodies (p-Thr308 and p-Ser473). The content of PTEN and HA-Akt1 in the lysates was monitored using anti-PTEN (all PTEN mutations were expressed equally, not shown) and anti-HA antibodies, respectively. Bands were quantified and results are presented as the average ± SD of the p-Akt/Akt ratio, obtained from three independent experiments. View largeDownload slide Functional assessment of PTEN mutations targeting the Asp92 residue. (A) Tolerance to mutation of the Asp92 residue. Mutations were assessed in yeast, as those in Figure 2. Asterisks mark mutations that have been reported in tumors/germline PHTS. The image at the right corresponds to growth rescue assays from representative PTEN mutations and controls from the data presented. (B) In vitro phosphatase activity of recombinant PTEN proteins purified from COS-7 cell line transfectants, as determined by the malachite green assay, using diC8-phosphatydilinositol PIP3 as the substrate. Data are the average from three independent experiments. Error bars correspond to the standard deviation. (C) Ability of PTEN mutations to abolish HA-Akt activation in mammalian cells. PTEN wild-type or the indicated mutations were co-expressed with HA-Akt1 in COS-7 cells. Cell-free lysates were subjected to immunoblot using anti-phospho-active-Akt antibodies (p-Thr308 and p-Ser473). The content of PTEN and HA-Akt1 in the lysates was monitored using anti-PTEN (all PTEN mutations were expressed equally, not shown) and anti-HA antibodies, respectively. Bands were quantified and results are presented as the average ± SD of the p-Akt/Akt ratio, obtained from three independent experiments. Figure 6. Functional assessment of PTEN mutations related to PHTS (A) or ASD/DD (B) hereditary syndromes. Experiments were performed as described in Figure 2. Asterisks in (B) mark mutations that have been reported in germline PHTS. (C) Global functional analyses of the impact on catalytic activity of PHTS- versus ASD/DD-related mutations. The y-axis refers to relative in vivo PTEN activity, as measured by the percentage of yeast cells with low PIP3 levels at the plasma membrane, as determined by GFP-Akt1 localization (as in Figs 2–4 and 6A). Each spot corresponds to the average data from three independent experiments on each particular mutation from the indicated category (PHTS or ASD/DD). Spots surrounded by a circle correspond to mutations that are common to PHTS or ASD/DD [those marked with asterisks in (B)]. Vertical lines mark the standard deviation. Paired t-test of these independent set of data revealed a significant difference in activity for ASD/DD mutations with respect to PHTS mutations (P < 0.001). (D) Comparative analysis of PHTS and ASD/DD PTEN mutations referred to their ability to rescue growth arrest induced in S. cerevisiae by p110α-CAAX expression. ASD/DD-related mutations are generally more competent than PHTS-related mutations in counteracting p110α-CAAX activity. PHTS mutations included in this study are listed in Supplementary Material, Table S1, and results correspond to those in (A) and in Figures 4 and 5. ASD/DD mutations data correspond to those in (B). View large Download slide Functional assessment of PTEN mutations related to PHTS (A) or ASD/DD (B) hereditary syndromes. Experiments were performed as described in Figure 2. Asterisks in (B) mark mutations that have been reported in germline PHTS. (C) Global functional analyses of the impact on catalytic activity of PHTS- versus ASD/DD-related mutations. The y-axis refers to relative in vivo PTEN activity, as measured by the percentage of yeast cells with low PIP3 levels at the plasma membrane, as determined by GFP-Akt1 localization (as in Figs 2–4 and 6A). Each spot corresponds to the average data from three independent experiments on each particular mutation from the indicated category (PHTS or ASD/DD). Spots surrounded by a circle correspond to mutations that are common to PHTS or ASD/DD [those marked with asterisks in (B)]. Vertical lines mark the standard deviation. Paired t-test of these independent set of data revealed a significant difference in activity for ASD/DD mutations with respect to PHTS mutations (P < 0.001). (D) Comparative analysis of PHTS and ASD/DD PTEN mutations referred to their ability to rescue growth arrest induced in S. cerevisiae by p110α-CAAX expression. ASD/DD-related mutations are generally more competent than PHTS-related mutations in counteracting p110α-CAAX activity. PHTS mutations included in this study are listed in Supplementary Material, Table S1, and results correspond to those in (A) and in Figures 4 and 5. ASD/DD mutations data correspond to those in (B). Relevance of the Asp92 residue in PTEN activity in vivo  Remarkably, a mutation in the putative catalytic Asp92 residue to Asn (D92N) rendered a protein partially active in vivo in the yeast system, whereas substitution of this residue to any of the other 18 amino acids generated fully inactive PTEN enzymes (Fig. 5A). This outlines the importance of Asp92 in PTEN enzymatic activity, but also demonstrates that the presence of an aspartic acid residue at this position is not a strict requirement for PTEN-driven catalysis. To further substantiate this observation, the PIP3 phosphatase activity of the PTEN mutations D92A (non-conservative), D92E (charge-conservative) and D92N (size-conservative), expressed in mammalian cells, was tested both in vitro and in vivo. As shown, the mutations D92A and D92E fully abrogated hydrolysis of PIP3 by PTEN in vitro, whereas the mutation D92N only partially affected it (Fig. 5B). Upon co-expression with Akt, the D92N PTEN mutant also manifested more activity [indirectly measured as the levels of phospho-Akt (p-Akt) content] than the D92A or the D92E mutant proteins (Fig. 5C). Our results suggest that Asp92 does not behave as the general acid in the hydrolysis of PIP3 by PTEN, in vitro and in vivo.  Most of germline PTEN mutations associated with autism syndrome disorders do not fully abrogate PIP3 phosphatase activity  The involvement of PTEN in brain developmental disorders has been proposed on the basis of the identification of hereditary PTEN mutations in patients with these disorders (41,42), but little information is available on the severity of such mutations in terms of PTEN function. One of the mutations present in glioblastoma tumor samples (H93R) has also been found in the germline of a patient with autism (19). When performing the experiments shown above on tumor-related PTEN mutations, we included the H93R and found it to display a modest loss of activity in the yeast model when compared with wild-type PTEN, although it was capable of fully recovering yeast growth (Fig. 6B). This prompted us to examine additional inherited mutations found in patients with autism-related disorders (ASD) or with DD/mental retardation. These mutations included, besides H93R, the G44D, H118P, H123Q, M134T, E157G, R173H, Y176C, T202I, F241S, D252G, W274L, N276S and D326N, involving not only catalytic but other protein domains. Remarkably, proteins bearing most of these mutations were either fully or partially active in the yeast (Fig. 6B and Supplementary Material, Table S1), although their ability to recover growth from PI3K-imposed inhibition was variable. These results were in contrast to those obtained by analyzing the function of a panel of PHTS-associated mutations, also distributed along the entire PTEN coding region (mutations A34D, M35R, G36R, N48K, H61D, Y68D, D92E, H93Y, P96Q, H123D, C124S, G129E, R130G, Y155C, G165E, G165V, S170R, L181P, V217N, P246L, R335L, V343E; L345V and F347L; Fig. 6A and Supplementary Material, Table S1). Most of the PHTS-associated mutations generated total or partial loss of function when analyzed in vivo in yeast. Moreover, global comparison of PHTS- and ASD/DD-related mutations in terms of their ability both to deplete PIP3 generated by PI3K in yeast (Fig. 6C; P < 0.001) and to rescue yeast growth (Fig. 6D) revealed that ASD/DD-related PTEN mutations have a lower effect in PTEN activity than those associated with PHTS. These findings indicate that specific PTEN functional patterns correlate with the mutations found on either PHTS or ASD/DD patients and suggest that a severe loss of the PTEN PIP3 catalytic activity may not be the major driver of autism or autism-related neurological disorders.  DISCUSSION  The PTEN phosphatase is a key regulatory hub of PI3K-mediated signaling. While mammals express a variety of isoforms of PI3K and PIP3-dependent downstream kinases in this pathway, the PTEN tumor suppressor is rather unique, being the only one gene that encodes for a common inactivator of the pathway. Thus, mutations in exons of the PTEN gene are frequent in tumors and hereditary cancer syndromes. The regulation of PTEN is complex, involving multiple processes related to its phosphorylation, ubiquitination, nuclear translocation, interaction with membranes and complexing with different proteins (6,8,24,43,44). Although recent reports point towards PTEN functions independent of its lipid phosphatase activity (23–25,45,46), PTEN tumor suppressor function mainly relies on its catalytic activity on PIP3 pools locally generated by PI3K at the plasma membrane. The contribution of PTEN mutations isolated in the clinics to the function of the encoded protein is crucial to understand the molecular mechanisms that lead to tumor development and progression. We have developed a simple model for functional assessment of PTEN mutations based on heterologous expression in yeast (1,31). This model allows ready evaluation of the involvement of PTEN mutations on the ability to counteract PI3K activity in vivo, by compromising PTEN PIP3 catalytic activity or by affecting PTEN protein stability, two common mechanisms by which PTEN is inactivated in tumors (30). Here, we report extensive use of this model with two aims: (i) to provide clues for structure–function relationship by systematic mutagenesis and (ii) to study the influence of individual disease-related PTEN mutations in its lipid phosphatase activity.  From our systematic functional analysis on the PTEN catalytic loops, several conclusions can be driven. First, as expected, the P-loop including the catalytic Cys residue is very sensitive to mutagenesis, in consonance with the observation that it constitutes a hot spot for tumor-related mutations (11,15,33), whereas the WPD and TI loops are more permissive to point Ala substitutions. Still, residues like Asp92 or His93 (WPD-loop), Asp162, Val166 or Gln171 (TI-loop) were critical for function. We made a comprehensive study on tolerance to mutation of the Asp92 residue, equivalent to the acid proton donor involved in catalysis in PTPs that are structurally related to PTEN (47). Tolerance to mutation was very low in this residue, since its substitution to any other amino acid yielded an inactive enzyme, except for Asp-to-Asn substitution, which partially retained activity in vivo, not only in the yeast model but also in mammalian cells. Since the D92N mutation has been reported in the clinic, such reduced activity may substantially contribute to disease. Interestingly, this argues against the need for an acid residue in that position, revealing an alternative mechanism of catalysis for the PTEN phosphatase, as proposed by other authors based on in vitro experiments (28,29). We also made substitutions within the catalytic loops mimicking PTEN-related proteins, such as TPIP, TPTE, tensin and auxilin. Although these proteins possess distinct non-PTP-related domains that control protein targeting, protein–protein interactions and cell signaling, they share the presence of PTP- and C2-like domains with significant similarity with those from PTEN (2,3,48). With the exception of TPIP, PTEN-like proteins are predicted to be catalytically inactive, due either to the lack of essential residues at the catalytic site or to amino acid substitutions potentially deleterious for catalysis (35,49,50). Nevertheless, tensin2/C1-TEN has been proposed to be an active phosphatase, based on functional studies on a mutation that targets its putative catalytic cysteine residue (51). Our observations favor the hypothesis that the P-loop of TPIP might be competent for activity, whereas TPTE, tensins and auxilins would be inactive as phosphatases, as evidenced in other studies (35,52,53).  A large number of different PTEN mutations have been described in human tumors and in the germline of patients with PHTS or PHTS-related syndromes (11,15,33) [for updates, check HGMD (http://www.hgmd.cf.ac.uk/ac/index.php) and COSMIC (http://www.sanger.ac.uk/genetics/CGP/cosmic) databases]. These mutations target the PTEN gene not only at its coding regions, but also at exon–intron boundaries and promoter regions. Most of PTEN mutations at exon–intron boundaries or promoter regions have a major impact in the levels of expression of the PTEN protein, being causative of PTEN functional deficiency and considered as pathogenic (54–56). Mutations targeting the PTEN coding region include frame-shift and nonsense mutations, which also generate unstable truncated PTEN proteins in most of the cases (36), as well as missense mutations that result in individual amino acid changes. Functional analyses of a limited number of these missense mutations have revealed that, in many cases, the resultant amino acid substitutions generate PTEN proteins with impaired intrinsic catalytic activity and/or protein stability (36–39). Also, some examples have been described of missense PTEN mutations that do not affect the intrinsic catalysis nor the stability of the protein, but rather impair essential regulatory PTEN properties, such as binding to membranes or nuclear entry (40,57). Our previous study using the heterologous yeast system as a reporter of the activity of PTEN mutations in vivo revealed that such system reproduces with fidelity the effects on mammalian cells of mutations that diminish either the intrinsic PTEN catalytic activity and/or binding to membranes or the intrinsic PTEN protein stability (30). Our current comprehensive functional study of tumor-associated PTEN mutations indicates that almost all mutations targeting the P-catalytic loop confer loss of PTEN intrinsic catalytic activity (12 of 13), whereas mutations targeting the WPD- or the TI-loops are less frequently associated with full loss of catalysis (5 of 9 and 4 of 9, respectively). These results are in agreement with the Ala-scanning analysis of these regions and suggest the existence of a relatively large number of tumor-associated mutations at the PTEN gene that do not fully abrogate the PTEN catalytic activity, but may be relevant in clinics. Recently, a comprehensive study on PTEN mutations in PHTS disease has yielded predictive clinical parameters (58). Association of reported mutations to the activity of PTEN by means of ready in vivo functional assays, as the one exploited here, might help clinicians in decisions towards putative mutation-specific therapies.  PHTS and ASD/DD are syndromes with distinct clinical entities, which share macrocephaly as a frequent common alteration (59). Also, clinicians have noted that PHTS patients often display neurobehavioral features resembling autism (19) and, interestingly, at least five PTEN mutations (H93R, Y176C, F241S, D252G and R173H; see Supplementary Material, Table S1) have been reported as associated with both PHTS and ASD/DD (19,41,42,58). Our comparative analysis of germline mutations found in PHTS patients and in ASD/DD patients revealed a distinct functional pattern for these two groups of mutations. PHTS-associated mutations, which included in our study mutations distributed all along the PTEN protein, were found significantly more deleterious for PTEN catalysis than ASD/DD-associated mutations (Fig. 6). This could be important for the distinct etiology and progress of tumor-related and tumor non-related syndromes associated with PTEN mutations and may be of relevance in the design and implementation of new therapies for these diseases. It is likely that small variations in the lipid phosphatase activity or in the stability of heterozygotic PTEN mutations can explain the higher penetrance found for the set of PHTS-associated mutations, when compared with ASD/DD-associated mutations. Although it has been suggested that ASD- and macrocephaly-related PTEN mutations may behave differentially in terms of loss of function (19), the lack of functional models has made difficult to provide support for this hypothesis. If this is the case, as suggested by our study, additional unknown factors might exist affecting differentially the etiology and/or progression of these diseases. In this regard, a study focused on the functional analysis of the PHTS- and ASD-associated H93R PTEN mutation reported a partial loss of catalytic activity for this mutation, as well as a defect in the binding to PTEN-activating PIP2 model membranes. Remarkably, the binding of the H93R mutation to phosphatidylserine membranes, which are abundant in mammalian cells, was augmented (60). Our results show that the H93R mutation retained most of its lipid phosphatase activity in the yeast, suggesting that differences in the thresholds that control membrane-binding mediated PTEN activation may exist in distinct cell systems. Also of interest, mice with diminution of PTEN expression levels as subtle as 20% develop a wide spectrum of tumors with high penetrance, and it has been proposed that altered gene dosage may be relevant in ASD/DD (18,61). In this regard, ASD/DD has been linked with abnormal synapsis growth and plasticity, an alteration that has also been observed in mice with PTEN-deficient neurons (62,63). Furthermore, a mice model lacking PTEN expression in mature neuronal populations in the cerebral cortex and the hippocampus displayed behavioral abnormalities reminiscent of human ASD/DD (64). Our findings show a relatively weak association between ASD/DD-related mutations at the PTEN gene and full loss of intrinsic lipid phosphatase activity or protein stability, which is in line with the lack of concordance between ASD/DD and childhood cancer (65). ASD/DD constitutes a heterogeneous, multigene-linked group of developmental disorders (41,42,66). Further studies will be required to ascertain the functional changes on the activity of the PTEN protein from ASD/DD patients with mutations at the PTEN gene. The comprehensive analysis of the functional properties of putative pathogenic mutant proteins, as the one we present here for PTEN mutations, will give some light on the molecular pathways altered in the neurons of patients with ASD/DD.  MATERIALS AND METHODS  Cells, media, growth conditions, transfection and protein detection  The S. cerevisiae strain YPH499 (MATa ade2–101 trp1–63 leu2–1 ura3–52 his3-▵200 lys2–801) was used for heterologous expression of mammalian proteins. For all the analyses, synthetic complete medium was used, containing 0.17 % yeast nitrogen base without amino acids, 0.5% ammonium sulfate supplemented with appropriate amino acids and nucleic acid bases, and added 2% glucose (SD), galactose (SG) or raffinose (SR), as required. Yeasts were transformed by standard procedures. Growth of yeast on plates was tested by spotting transformant cells onto SD or SG plates lacking the corresponding auxotrophic markers. Transformants were grown overnight in SD lacking uracile, leucine or both (SD-U, SD-L or SD-UL) as required and adjusted to an OD600 of 0.5. Five microliter aliquots of each sample plus three serial 1/10 dilutions were deposited on the surfaces of solid media SG-U, SG-L or SG-UL. Growth was monitored after 2–3 days at 30°C. Expression of all PTEN mutations in yeast was verified by immunoblot on yeast lysates with 421B or 425A anti-PTEN mAb (67) followed by horseradish-peroxidase-conjugated anti-mouse antibody (Calbiochem). To measure GFP-Akt1 plasma membrane localization, as an indirect indicator of cellular PIP3 levels, transformant cells were grown to log phase in liquid SR medium lacking the corresponding auxotrophic markers, and then 2 % galactose was added for 6–8 h. GFP-Akt1 was visualized by fluorescence microscopy. To obtain statistically significant data, ≥100 cells were examined from each condition or experiment for either cytoplasmic or membrane-associated localization. Cells were examined under an Eclipse TE2000U microscope (Nikon) and digital images were acquired with Orca C4742-95-12ER charge-coupled device camera (Hamamatsu) and Aquacosmos Imaging Systems or HCImage software. To overexpress PTEN mutations in mammalian cells, COS-7 cells (simian kidney) were transfected by the DEAE-dextran method and processed after 48 h. To measure p-Akt content in COS-7 cells in the presence of PTEN mutations, cells were co-transfected with pRK5 PTEN and pSG5 HA-Akt1 as described (68). Cells were lysed, and post-nuclear lysates were subjected by immunoblot using a mixture of anti-p-Thr308 and anti-p-Ser473-Akt antibodies (Cell Signalling Technologies). Membranes were stripped and probed for anti-Akt antibody (Cell Signalling Technologies). Bands were quantified using ImageQuant TL software, and results are represented as the average ± SD of the p-Akt/Akt ratio.  Plasmids, mutagenesis and in vitro phosphatase assays  YCpLG myc-p110-CAAX, pYES2 PTEN, pRK5 PTEN, pSG5 HA-Akt1 and pYES3 GFP-Akt1 have been described previously (30). Mutagenesis was performed by a two-step PCR strategy. All mutations were checked by DNA sequencing. The sequences of oligonucleotides used for mutagenesis are available on request. In vitro phosphatase assays were made using PTEN wild-type or mutations, from COS-7-transfected cells, as the enzymes, and diC8-phosphatydilinositol PIP3 (Echelon) as the substrate, as described previously (30). The tumor suppressor gene PTEN is frequently mutated in diverse human cancers and in autosomal dominant cancer predisposition disorders. Recent studies have shown that the lipid phosphatase activity of PTEN is critical for its tumor suppressor function and that PTEN negatively regulates the phosphatidylinositol 3*-kinase-protein kinase B pathway. Although more than half of PTEN mutations result in protein truncation, a significant fraction of PTEN mutations are missense mutations. To examine whether tumor-derived and germ-line-derived missense mutations inactivate PTEN lipid phosphatase function, we constructed 42 distinct types of PTEN missense mutations and expressed them in Escherichia coli. The purified (His)6-tagged PTEN proteins were tested for their ability to dephosphorylate inositol 1,3,4,5-tetrakisphosphate and phosphatidylinositol 3,4,5-triphosphate. In addition, we examined the effect of mutant PTENs on the ability of PTEN to bind to the phospholipid membrane. The results revealed that the majority of PTEN missense mutations [38 of 42 (90%)] eliminated or reduced phosphatase activity and that all of the mutations examined had no effect on the membrane binding activity of PTEN. Our study indicated that phosphoinositide phosphatase activity is important for the tumor suppressor function of PTEN and that there may be other mechanisms of PTEN inactivation that are not monitored by in vitro phosphatase assay and in vitro membrane binding assay. Introduction The PTEN/MMAC1/TEP1 gene (referred to hereafter as PTEN) was identified recently as a putative tumor suppressor gene located on human chromosome 10q23.3 (1–3). Somatic deletions or small mutations of PTEN have been observed with high frequency in malignant glioma (4, 5) and endometrial cancer (6, 7) and at a lower rate in other malignancies such as prostate cancer (8), small cell lung cancer (9), melanoma (10), hepatocellular carcinoma (11), and breast cancer (12). Germ-line mutations of PTEN have been detected frequently (;80%) in the autosomal dominant hamartoma cancer syndromes Cowden disease (OMIM158350), Bannayan-Zonana syndrome (OMIM153480), and Lhermitte-Duclos disease (13, 14). In a murine model, heterozygous knockout mice develop tumors in multiple organs, whereas homozygous deletion of PTEN is embryonically lethal (15, 16). Furthermore, enforced expression of PTEN cDNA inhibits cell migration and spreading (17, 18) and suppresses tumor cell growth by arresting the cell cycle at G1 phase and/or by inducing apoptosis (19). This genetic and biological evidence suggests that PTEN has an important function in tumorigenesis as well as in normal embryonic development. The PTEN gene contains nine exons and encodes a 403-amino acid cytoplasmic protein showing extensive NH2-terminal homology with tensin and auxillin as well as having a central catalytic domain showing perfect homology with PTP3 and dual-specific phosphatases (1–3). A key step in understanding the function of PTEN as a tumor suppressor is to identify its physiological substrates. Data thus far suggest that PTEN possesses two distinct phosphatase activities. One is a phosphoinositide phosphatase activity against phosphoinositides, such as Ins(1,3,4,5)P4 and PtdIns(3,4,5)P3, which involves dephosphorylation of the D3-position phosphate of the inositol ring (20). The other is protein phosphatase activity, including focal adhesion kinase (21). Several studies have shown that the phosphoinositide phosphatase activity of PTEN is critical for its tumor suppressor function, whereas activity toward the protein substrate is not essential for growth suppression (18, 22–25). This suggests that the former activity may play a more important role in tumor suppression by PTEN. Because PtdIns(3,4,5)P3 is a phospholipid second messenger produced by PI3K, PTEN seems to be involved in the PI3K signaling pathway (26). One of the important downstream targets of PI3K is protein kinase B/Akt, which controls cell proliferation and protects cells from apoptosis (27). The fact that both PI3K and Akt play critical roles in a variety of growth factor signaling pathways raises the possibility that PTEN functions as a tumor suppressor through negative regulation of the PI3K/Akt pathway. Loss of PTEN function can occur through homozygous gene deletion, point mutation plus loss of the remaining allele, or loss of expression (1, 2, 4, 28). We reviewed both somatic and germ-line PTEN mutations by surveying a database of the published literature. There were about 417 mutations reported by the end of August 1999. Among them, 143 (34%) were missense mutations including 90 distinct types, 162 (39%) were frameshift mutations, 73 (18%) were nonsense mutations, and 39 (9%) were other mutations containing in-frame deletion/insertion or splicing site mutations. The frequency of missense mutations in the PTEN gene was higher than that in other tumor suppressor genes except for the p53 gene, which had the highest frequency of missense mutations (;90%). Although both truncating and missense PTEN mutations were scattered throughout the nine exons of PTEN, the missense mutations tended to cluster around the phosphatase domain. In fact, several studies showed that a limited number of reported missense mutations within the phosphatase domain could abrogate the protein phosphatase and/or phosphoinositide phosphatase activity of PTEN (22, 25). Even so, the majority of missense mutations, including mutations outside the phosphatase doReceived 3/1/00; accepted 5/4/00. The costs of publication of this article were defrayed in part by the payment of page charges. This article must therefore be hereby marked advertisement in accordance with 18 U.S.C. Section 1734 solely to indicate this fact. 1 Supported in part by grants-in-aid from the Ministry of Education, Science, Sports and Culture and the Ministry of Health and Welfare, Japan. 2 To whom requests for reprints should be addressed, at Department of Clinical Oncology, Institute of Development, Aging and Cancer, Tohoku University, 4-1 Seiryomachi, Aoba-ku, Sendai 980-8575, Japan. Phone: 81-22-717-8547; Fax: 81-22-717-8548; E-mail: chikashi@idac.tohoku.ac.jp. 3 The abbreviations used are: PTP, protein tyrosine phosphatase; Ins(1,3,4,5)P4, inositol 1,3,4,5-tetrakisphosphate; PtdIns(3,4,5)P3, phosphatidylinositol 3,4,5-triphosphate; PI3K, phosphatidylinositol 39-kinase; LMV, large multilamellar vesicle; PS, phosphatidylserine; PE, phosphatidylethanolamine; PC, phosphatidylcholine. 3147 Downloaded from cancerres.aacrjournals.org on May 28, 2017. © 2000 American Association for Cancer Research. main, remain to be analyzed. In general, analyses of the effects of missense mutations derived from a disease on the functional properties of the gene product are advantageous to elucidate the most important function for pathogenesis. Therefore, we evaluated the pathogenic effect of a series of PTEN missense mutations. In this study, we constructed 42 distinct missense mutations that mapped within the PTEN open reading frame and examined the phosphoinositide phosphatase activity of the (His)6-tagged PTEN protein corresponding to each point mutation against Ins(1,3,4,5)P4 and PtdIns(3,4,5)P3 as well as their ability to bind a phospholipid membrane in vitro. Materials and Methods Vector Construction and Cloning of Mutant PTEN Alleles. The wildtype histidine-tagged PTEN [(His)6-PTEN] expression vector was constructed as follows. The full-length open reading frame of PTEN cDNA was amplified by PCR using Pfu DNA polymerase (Stratagene, La Jolla, CA) and a pair of primers with BamHI and HindIII sites. The restriction endonuclease-treated PCR product was inserted into the BamHI/HindIII sites of the pQE30 vector (Qiagen, Hilden, Germany). PTEN cDNA with missense mutations (S10N, Y16C, G20E, Y27S, L42R, H61R, Y68H, C71Y, H93Y, C105F, D107Y, L112P, L112R, A121P, C124R, G129R, G129E, R130G, R130L, R130Q, V133I, M134L, C136Y, Y155C, G165R, S170N, S170R, R173C, R173H, R173P, Y174N, S227F, G251C, K289E, D331G, F341V, K342N, V343E, L345Q, F347L, V369G, and T401I) was constructed by megaprimer PCR (29). The BamHI/HindIII fragment of mutant PTEN cDNA was introduced into the BamHI/HindIII site of the pQE30 vector to generate mutant (His)6-PTEN expression vectors. All of the plasmids were sequenced to confirm that the appropriate mutation had been incorporated and that no additional mutations were present. These vectors are identical to the wild-type (His)6-PTEN expression vector except for the specific mutations. Bacterial Expression and Purification of PTEN. To induce the expression of (His)6-PTEN, the vector was transformed into Escherichia coli strain M15 harboring pREP4 (Qiagen). The resulting transformant was cultured in 50 ml of Luria-Bertani medium at 37°C by mid-log phase (A600 nm 5 0.6). Isopropyl b-D-thiogalactopyranoside was added at a concentration of 0.2 mM, and the culture was incubated for an additional 6 h at 25°C. Thereafter, all of the procedures were performed at 4°C. The bacterial cells were harvested by centrifugation, and the bacterial pellet was frozen at 280°C until use. The frozen pellets were resuspended in 1 ml of ice-cold lysis buffer containing 50 mM NaH2PO4 (pH 8.0), 500 mM NaCl, 5 mM imidazole, 5 mM 2-mercaptoethanol, and 1 mM phenylmethylsulfonyl fluoride, and bacteriolysis was performed by sonication until the cell suspension became transparent. After the addition of 10 ml of Tween 20, the lysate was incubated on ice for 30 min and then centrifuged at 15,000 3 g for 20 min. The supernatant was mixed with 50 ml of Ni-NTA-agarose (Qiagen) for 30 min at 4°C; washed three times with 250 ml of the wash buffer containing 50 mM NaH2PO4 (pH 8.0), 300 mM NaCl, and 20 mM imidazole; and eluted three times with 50 ml of the elution buffer containing 50 mM NaH2PO4 (pH 8.0), 300 mM NaCl, and 250 mM imidazole. The buffer of the eluted solution was then replaced with 500 ml of TED buffer containing 20 mM Tris-HCl (pH 8.0), 2 mM EDTA, 2 mM DTT, 300 mM NaCl, and 1 mM phenylmethylsulfonyl fluoride by using Nanosep (Pall Filtron, Northborough, MA) and centrifuged to a volume of 50 ml. The purified protein was stored in the presence of 2% (v/v) glycerin at 280°C until use. Protein concentrations and the integrity of fusion proteins were determined by SDSPAGE and by comparison with known concentrations of BSA. Ins(1,3,4,5)P4 Phosphatase Assay. The inositol phosphatase assay was performed using the method described by Maehama and Dixon (20) in a 20-ml reaction volume consisting of 100 mM Tris-HCl (pH 8.0), 10 mM DTT, 60 mM [ 3 H]Ins(1,3,4,5)P4 (0.01 mCi; New England Nuclear, Boston, MA), and 1 mg of the purified (His)6-PTEN protein at 37°C for 30 min. The reaction was terminated by the addition of 1 ml of stop solution consisting of 0.1 M HCOOH and 0.6 M HCOONH4. To separate the dephosphorylated product [ 3 H]Ins(1,4,5)P3 from the substrate, the reaction sample was applied to a AG1-X8 column (0.5 ml; Bio-Rad, Hercules, CA), equilibrated with the stop solution, and eluted with 5 ml of the stop solution. Radioactivity in the eluted solution was measured using a liquid scintillation counter. PtdIns(3,4,5)P3 Phosphatase Assay. The (His)6-PTEN protein used for the PtdIns(3,4,5)P3 phosphatase assay was extracted again as described above, except that NaH2PO4 was replaced with 50 mM Tris-HCl (pH 8.0) in the buffer used for lysis, washing, and elution. The phosphatase assays (30) were performed in 50 ml of reaction buffer containing 100 mM Tris-HCl (pH 8.0), 10 mM DTT, 200 mM water-soluble DiC8-PtdIns(3,4,5)P3 (Echelon, Salt Lake City, UT), and 2 mg of (His)6-PTEN protein at 37°C for 40 min. The phosphate released from the substrate was measured using Green Reagent (Biomol, Plymouth Meeting, PA) according to the manufacturer’s instructions. In brief, 500 ml of Green Reagent were added, followed by incubation for 20 min at room temperature. The concentration of the released phosphate was determined by measuring the A620 nm. A standard curve was generated in each assay, and the amount of free phosphate was calculated from the standard curve line-fit data. Phospholipid Binding Assay. The PTEN protein binding to LMVs consisting of three different phosphoglycerides, PS, PE, and PC (Sigma, St. Louis, MO), was carried out according to the procedures published previously (31– 33), with some modifications. Briefly, 100 mg of LMVs (PS:PE:PC ratio, 35:50:15) were prepared in 10 ml of buffer containing 50 mM HEPES-KOH (pH 7.2) and 100 mM NaCl by sonication and collected by centrifugation. An aliquot of (His)6-PTEN protein (2–5 mg) and 100 ml of LMVs were incubated in 50 mM HEPES-KOH (pH 7.2) and 2 mM CaCl2 for 15 min at 25°C. After centrifugation at 12,000 3 g for 10 min at 4°C, the pellets containing lipid and bound proteins were washed in 500 ml of the above-mentioned buffer and dissolved in SDS sample buffer. The addition of an equal volume of 20% (w/v) trichloroacetic acid precipitated the proteins in the supernatants. After a 15-min incubation on ice, the samples were centrifuged at 12,000 3 g for 15 min at 4°C, washed twice with acetone, and mixed with SDS sample buffer. Equal proportions of the supernatants and pellets were analyzed by 10% (w/v) SDS-PAGE followed by silver staining (Daiichi Pure Chemicals, Tokyo, Japan). Results To examine whether the missense mutation inactivates the phosphoinositide phosphatase function of PTEN, we selected 42 distinct tumor-derived or germ-line-derived missense mutations covering more than 40% of the reported missense mutation types. Each mutation was constructed by site-directed mutagenesis, expressed as a (His)6-tagged fusion protein [(His)6-PTEN] in E. coli, and purified as described in “Materials and Methods.” The amount of expressed (His)6-PTEN was measured by spectrophotometer and confirmed by SDS-PAGE. The representative data are shown in Fig. 1. To assess phosphoinositide phosphatase activity, we used two phosphoinositide substrates with [PtdIns(3,4,5)P3] or without [Ins(1,3,4,5)P4] a diacylglycerol chain. Bacterially expressed PTEN has been shown to dephosphorylate the phosphate in the D3 position of the inositol ring in each substrate (20, 30, 33). Phosphatase Activities of PTEN against Ins(1,3,4,5)P4. To examine whether the missense mutations inactivate normal PTEN phosFig. 1. Bacterial expression and purification of PTEN. Recombinant (His)6-PTEN expressed from wild-type PTEN, null pQE30 vector, and mutant PTEN (Y68H, S170N, G251C, K289E, D331G, and L345Q) in E. coli was purified using Ni-NTA-agarose, as described in “Materials and Methods.” Approximately 0.5–1 mg of the proteins was separated by SDS-PAGE and visualized by Coomassie Blue staining. BSA was used for judging the concentration of the PTEN protein. Null, null pQE30 vector as a negative control; PTEN, wild-type PTEN as a positive control. 3148 FUNCTIONAL EVALUATION OF PTEN MISSENSE MUTATIONS Downloaded from cancerres.aacrjournals.org on May 28, 2017. © 2000 American Association for Cancer Research. phatase activity against Ins(1,3,4,5)P4, (His)6-PTEN harboring the indicated amino acid substitutions was assayed for its ability to dephosphorylate the phosphate in the D3 position of Ins(1,3,4,5)P4 using the method described previously (Ref. 20; Fig. 2). The results showed that four mutant PTENs (9%; S10N, L42R, V369G, and T401I) retained activity comparable with or even higher than that of normal PTEN, and seven mutant PTENs (17%; G20E, M134L, S227F, K289E, D331G, K342N, and F347L) retained partial activity (Fig. 2). The remaining 31 mutant PTENs (74%) had no activity. Phosphatase Activities of PTEN against PtdIns(3,4,5)P3. Because Ins(1,3,4,5)P4 lacks the diacylglycerol chain of PtdIns(3,4,5)P3, we compared the phosphoinositide phosphatase activities of 12 selected mutant PTENs and normal PTEN toward the two substrates. These PTENs contained mutants with full (S10N, L42R, V369G, and T401I), partial (G20E, M134L, S227F, and K342N), and no (Y68H, G129E, R130G, and R173C) phosphatase activities against Ins(1,3,4,5)P4. Water-soluble PtdIns(3,4,5)P3 was used to examine the released phosphate. The eight mutant PTENs with full or partial Ins(1,3,4,5)P4 phosphatase activity showed nearly the same level of phosphatase activity against PtdIns(3,4,5)P3 as wild-type PTEN, whereas the four mutant PTENs with no Ins(1,3,4,5)P4 phosphatase activity also eliminated PtdIns(3,4,5)P3 phosphatase activity (Fig. 3). These results indicated that the effects of the missense mutations on PTEN phosphatase activity against the two phosphoinositides were nearly identical, although the assay using Ins(1,3,4,5)P4 may be more sensitive to subtle structural changes in PTEN than that using PtdIns(3,4,5)P3. Ability of PTEN to Bind to LMVs. During our study of PTEN phosphatase activities, a second biochemical property of PTEN was reported: the ability to bind to lipid membranes in vitro through the C2 domain (33). This raised the possibility that some PTEN mutations may inactivate the physiological function of PTEN through disruption Fig. 3. Phosphatase activity of PTEN against PtdIns(3,4,5) P3. Two mg of (His)6-PTEN were assayed for phosphoinositol phosphatase activity against water-soluble diC8- PtdIns(3,4,5)P3. The amount of free phosphate released in the reaction was measured at A620 nm and compared with a standard curve. The data are representative of three experiments that yielded similar results. Fig. 2. Phosphatase activity of PTEN against Ins(1,3,4,5)P4. One mg of (His)6-PTEN protein was assayed for phosphoinositol phosphatase activity against [3 H]Ins(1,3,4,5)P4 as described in “Materials and Methods.” The radioactivity of the dephosphorylated product was counted, and the results were normalized to wild-type PTEN (100%). The 42 PTEN mutants were divided into seven groups (A2G) for protein extraction and phosphatase assay. The data are representative of three independent experiments that yielded similar results. 3149 FUNCTIONAL EVALUATION OF PTEN MISSENSE MUTATIONS Downloaded from cancerres.aacrjournals.org on May 28, 2017. © 2000 American Association for Cancer Research. of the membrane binding activity. To examine this possibility, 15 mutant PTENs with (S10N, L42R, K289E, D331G, V369G, and T401I) or without (Y16C, Y68H, R130Q, R130L, G165R, S170N, R173C, G251C, and L345Q) phosphatase activity were subjected to a protein-membrane binding assay using LMVs that consisted of three different phosphoglycerides (PC, PS, and PE) according to procedures published previously (31, 32). Representative data of the selected mutant PTENs are shown in Fig. 4. When bacterial proteins copurified with PTEN failed to bind LMVs, all mutants tested retained the binding activity of PTEN, irrespective of whether or not they had phosphoinositide phosphatase activity. This result suggested that the ability of PTEN to bind to membranes is not a major target of tumor-derived or germ-line-derived missense mutations, even if the activity may be important for physiological PTEN function. Discussion Since its discovery, PTEN has been thought to be a protein phosphatase because it shares the signature motif HCXXGXXR with the active site of PTPs and dual-specific protein phosphatases. However, recent studies have shown that the biologically relevant targets of PTEN may not be phosphoproteins but rather a subset of phosphoinositides (20, 22, 25). This speculation can be supported by several findings. For example, tumor cell lines with mutant PTEN retained elevated levels of PtdIns(3,4,5)P3 and Akt activity, and the introduction of wild-type PTEN reduced the levels of both (34, 35). Furthermore, analysis of the PTEN crystal structure indicated that the phosphatase active site of PTEN is larger than that of the PTPs and that the COOH-terminal portion has a structure similar to the C2 domain and actually binds to phospholipid membranes in vitro (33). To elucidate the most important tumor suppressor function of PTEN, the analysis of the effect of the missense mutations on currently known functional properties of PTEN will be beneficial until all of the functions of PTEN are clarified. Thus far, only a limited number of tumor-derived and germ-line-derived PTEN missense mutations have been examined for known PTEN functions. All of the missense mutations that have been tested inactivated phosphoinositide phosphatase activity, whereas some of the mutations retained protein phosphatase activity (22, 25). Although these observations stressed the importance of phosphoinositide phosphatase activity, it was necessary to determine whether the reported PTEN missense mutations inactivate the currently proposed functions of PTEN. As an initial study, we constructed 42 missense mutations, which covered more than 40% of reported missense mutations, mapped throughout from the NH2-terminal and COOH-terminal portions of PTEN and tested them against the phosphoinositide phosphatase activity and membrane binding activity of wild-type PTEN. We classified them according to the recent report describing PTEN crystal structure (33). There were 31 mutations (S10N, Y16C, G20E, Y27S, L42R, H61R, Y68H, C71Y, H93Y, C105F, D107Y, L112P, L112R, A121P, C124R, G129R, G129E, R130G, R130L, R130Q, V133I, M134L, C136Y, Y155C, G165R, S170N, S170R, R173C, R173H, R173P, and Y174N) within the NH2-terminal phosphatase domain (residues 7–185), 9 mutations (S227F, G251C, K289E, D331G, F341V, K342N, V343E, L345Q, and F347L) within the COOHterminal C2 domain (residues 186–351), and 2 mutations (V369G and T401I) close to the COOH-terminal end. Among these mutations, most of the mutations within the NH2-terminal phosphatase domain (27 of 31 mutations, 87%) inactivated phosphatase activity. In contrast, a higher percentage of mutations within both the C2 domain (five of nine mutations, 56%) and the COOH-terminal end (two of two mutations, 100%) retained phosphatase activity. Overall, our results showed that most mutations (38 of 42 mutations, 90%) eliminated or reduced phosphatase activity. The mutations within the phosphatase domain contain eight mutations located at the predicted active site pocket, including six mutations (C124R, G129R, G129E, R130G, R130L, and R130Q) in the HCXXGRXXR signature motif of the P loop (residues 123–130) at the bottom of the pocket and two mutations (H93Y and G165R) at the walls of the pocket, the WPD loop (residues 90–97), and the TI loop (residues 160–168), respectively. All mutations within the active site pocket eliminated phosphatase activity. The mutations in the motif represent 19% (27 of 143) of the total missense mutations according to our statistics. From our functional analysis and the previous genetic and structural analyses, we conclude that PTEN phosphoinositide phosphatase activity is an important tumor-suppressive function of PTEN. However, 26% (11 of 42) of the mutants retained some level of the normal PTEN phosphatase activity in vitro. Although there may be a polymorphism(s) among these mutants, it is likely that the in vitro phosphatase assays do not always reflect the in vivo phosphatase activity of PTEN and that there might be other mechanisms of PTEN inactivation. In our study, most of the mutations that mapped to the COOH-terminal region retained some levels of phosphoinositide phosphatase activity. According to recent studies, there may be regulatory domains in the COOH-terminal region. Georgescu et al. (30) have shown that two missense mutations (L345Q and T348I) in the predicted b-strand structure (residues 342–349) seem to destabilize PTEN in mammalian cells, although these mutations are also defective in the phosphatase assay by bacterially expressed proteins. Lee et al. (33) have shown that the predicted C2 domain in the COOHterminal portion bound to phospholipid membranes. They also speculated that the C2 and the phosphatase domains associate across an extensive interface adjacent to the phosphatase active site. Furthermore, they predicted that the C2 domain may not only recruit PTEN to the membrane but may also help with the positioning and orientation of the catalytic domain with respect to the membrane-bound substrate. In this study, we could not find any tumor-derived mutations that affected the membrane binding activity of PTEN, which suggested that the binding of PTEN to membranes is not a major target of the missense mutations. Our results do not exclude the possibility of binding activity as an important tumor suppressor function of PTEN because there are high frequencies of PTEN frameshift (39%) and nonsense (18%) mutations that are predicted to eliminate the PTEN membrane binding domain and perhaps preserve enzyme activity. It would be of great interest to determine whether the mutations in the C2 domain, which have both in vitro phosphatase and membrane binding activities, affect the phosphatase activity under the conditions of PTEN protein binding to the phospholipid membrane. PTEN also has another domain, called the PDZ binding domain, in the COOH-terminal end (33, 36); the domain binds to the PDZ proteins (DLG1 and MAST205), and this binding is regulated by phosphorylation of the tyrosine residue at codon 401. It would also be Fig. 4. PTEN binding activity to LMVs. A representative silver-stained gel of protein bound to LMVs is shown. P, the pellet fraction coprecipitated with LMVs. S, the supernatant fraction without binding to LMVs. Note that proteins other than PTENs exist only in the supernatant fractions. 3150 FUNCTIONAL EVALUATION OF PTEN MISSENSE MUTATIONS Downloaded from cancerres.aacrjournals.org on May 28, 2017. © 2000 American Association for Cancer Research. interesting to determine whether tumor-derived T401I mutations with in vitro phosphatase activity inactivate binding to the PDZ proteins. Finally, we found that some mutants with partial phosphatase activity against Ins(1,3,4,5)P4 (G20E, M134L, S227F, and K342N) showed nearly wild-type levels of phosphatase activity against PtdIns(3,4,5)P3. It is possible that certain PTEN mutations impair phosphatase activity only toward one type of inositol phosphate molecule [Ins(1,3,4,5)P4] but not others [i.e., PtdIns(3,4,5)P3] and therefore affect distinct cellular signaling pathways because these two molecules have different functions in the cell: Ins(1,3,4,5)P4 is a second messenger involved in regulating intracellular calcium signaling, whereas PtdIns(3,4,5)P3 is well known as a second messenger molecule generated by PI3K activity (20). Taken together, PTEN phosphatase activity could be regulated by subcellular location, phosphorylation, and/or interaction with other cellular proteins. The physiological function of PTEN remains to be clarified in additional experiments.   
2429||Mutations in BRCA1 and BRCA2 account for the majority of hereditary breast and ovarian cancers, and therefore sequence analysis of both genes is routinely conducted in patients with early-onset breast cancer. Besides mutations that clearly abolish protein function or are known to increase cancer risk, a large number of sequence variants of uncertain signifi cance (VUS) have been identifi ed. Although several functional assays for BRCA1 VUSs have been described, thus far it has not been possible to conduct a high-throughput analysis in the context of the full-length protein. We have developed a relatively fast and easy cDNA-based functional assay to classify BRCA1 VUSs based on their ability to functionally complement BRCA1-defi cient mouse embryonic stem cells. Using this assay, we have analyzed 74 unclassifi ed BRCA1 missense mutants for which all predicted pathogenic variants are confi ned to the BRCA1 RING and BRCT domains.  SIGNIFICANCE: BRCA1 VUSs are frequently found in patients with hereditary breast or ovarian cancer and present a serious problem for clinical geneticists. This article describes the generation, validation, and application of a reliable high-throughput assay for the functional classifi cation of BRCA1 sequence variants of uncertain signifi cance. Cancer Discov; 3(10); 1142–55. ©2013 AACR.  Authors’ Affi liations: 1 Division of Molecular Pathology and Cancer Genomics Centre and 2 Department of Pathology, The Netherlands Cancer Institute Amsterdam, The Netherlands; and 3 TaconicArtemis GmbH, Cologne, Germany  Note: Supplementary data for this article are available at Cancer Discovery Online (http://cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org/).  Current address for C. Klijn: Genentech Inc., South San Francisco, California.  Corresponding Author: Jos Jonkers, The Netherlands Cancer Institute, Plesmanlaan 121, Amsterdam, 1066 CX, The Netherlands. Phone: 31-20- 5122000; Fax: 31-20-5122050; E-mail: j.jonkers@nki.nl doi: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094 ©2013 American Association for Cancer Research.  INTRODUCTION  Germline loss-of-function mutations in BRCA1 and BRCA2 are known to result in an approximately tenfold increased lifetime risk of developing breast or ovarian cancer. Thus far, no other genes have been identifi ed with such a strong link to hereditary breast and ovarian cancer (HBOC), and in the past decades, many women have been screened for germline mutations in BRCA1 or BRCA2 . This has resulted in the identifi cation of numerous pathogenic mutations as well as a large number of sequence variants for which the clinical relevance is not clear. In the most recent publication of the ENIGMA (Evidence-based Network for the Interpretation of Germline Mutant Alleles) group, an international consortium for the evaluation of BRCA1 or BRCA2 sequence variants, a total of 1,273 unique BRCA1 variants is mentioned ( 1 ), but this number may increase even further because of the implementation of high-throughput sequencing methods. Of the BRCA1 variants of uncertain signifi cance (VUS), 920 are nontruncating exonic mutations that may affect protein function or mRNA splicing, but for which there is not enough linkage information to indicate whether they are pathogenic. To aid genetic counseling of individuals with BRCA1/2 VUS, both genetic and functional classifi cation methods have been developed. Genetic analysis of BRCA1 or BRCA2 VUSs relies on cosegregation with disease, cooccurrence with known pathogenic mutations, and family history of cancer. These data have been integrated into computational models to calculate the likelihood that a VUS is disease-causing ( 2 ). Additional in silico analysis of the evolutionary conservation of the amino acids affected by the mutation and the predicted impact of the mutant amino acids on protein folding are also implemented in such models. Functional assays do not rely on preexisting data, but directly test the effect of BRCA1/2 VUSs on known functions of the encoded proteins ( 3 ). Although this may seem relatively straightforward, it can be diffi cult to extrapolate data from functional assays into cancer risks for patients. For instance, in most assays only part of the BRCA1 protein is analyzed. In addition, some of the more elegant assays are technically demanding and not suitable to analyze large numbers of mutations. We reasoned that a good functional assay should fulfi ll three basic requirements: (i) it should investigate the biologic effects of a BRCA1 VUS in the context of the full-length protein; (ii) it should be conducted under normal physiologic conditions in a noncancerous cell type; and (iii) it should be based on a highly standardized and reproducible protocol.  These considerations led us to develop a functional assay based on physiologic expression of full-length human BRCA1 cDNA in mouse embryonic stem cells that are genetically engineered to allow conditional deletion of endogenous Brca1 . Mutant BRCA1 cDNAs are generated using site-directed mutagenesis (SDM) and introduced in a defi ned genomic locus of mouse embryonic stem cells by recombinase-mediated cassette exchange (RMCE). In this way, we have analyzed 86 BRCA1 variants for their effects on cell proliferation and drug sensitivity, including 74 clinically relevant VUSs.  RESULTS  Generation of Mouse Embryonic Stem Cells Expressing BRCA1 Sequence Variants  Although BRCA1-defi cient tumor cells proliferate rapidly in situ , loss of BRCA1 in normal cells leads to a severe proliferation defect ( 4 ). We decided to make use of this phenotype for the functional analysis of BRCA1 variants in Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1144 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. Brca1 -selectable conditional knockout (SCo) mouse embryonic stem cells ( 5 ). These cells carry one Brca1 -null allele and a selectable conditional Brca1SCo allele, which contains, in addition to loxP sites around exons 5–6, a split puromycin resistance marker that is activated upon Cre-mediated deletion of exons 5–6. They also contain a CreERT2 allele in the Rosa26 locus, which allows for controlled activation of Cre via administration of 4-hydroxy tamoxifen (4-OHT). Thus, BRCA1-defi cient embryonic stem cells can be easily obtained via 4-OHT–induced inactivation of the Brca1SCo allele and subsequent selection for puromycin resistance ( Fig.  1 ; ref.  5 ). To allow effi cient integration of human BRCA1 variants in one specifi c genomic locus, we supplied the other Rosa26 allele with F3 and Frt recombination sites for RMCE by the site-specifi c recombinase Flp ( Fig.  1 and Supplementary Fig. S1; ref. 6 ). Cells that have undergone successful RMCE can be selected because they express a truncated neomycin selection marker under control of the endogenous Rosa26 promoter, which further increases targeting effi ciency. Flpmediated recombination ensures single-copy integration of BRCA1 expression constructs at the same Rosa26 locus, thus avoiding position-effect variegation and copy number– dependent differences in expression.  RMCE vectors were equipped with a human BRCA1 cDNA expression construct, which was modifi ed using SDM to introduce defi ned mutations in BRCA1 . The focus of our analysis was on Dutch and Belgian VUSs that were found in families with HBOC. We also included a number of variants  Figure 1.   Schematic overview of the RMCE procedure in R26 CreERT2/RMCE ; Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells. Before the introduction of a human BRCA1 cDNA, R26 CreERT2/RMCE ; Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells are mouse BRCA1-profi cient and sensitive to both neomycin and puromycin. Targeting of singlecopy human BRCA1 cDNA variants to the Rosa26 locus by Flp RMCE results in expression of human BRCA1 and neomycin resistance. Addition of 4-OHT leads to CreERT2-mediated deletion of mouse Brca1 exons 5 and 6, resulting in loss of mouse BRCA1 protein and concomitant expression of puromycin from the phosphoglycerate kinase (PGK) promoter. This enables selection of mouse BRCA1-defi cient, human BRCA1-expressing R26 CreERT2/hBRCA1 ; Brca1Δ/Δ embryonic stem cells that can be used in functional complementation assays. R26 CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1SCo/Δ R26CreERT2/hBRCA1;Brca1SCo/Δ R26CreERT2/hBRCA1;Brca1Δ/Δ 3 5–6 3 5–6 7–8 3 3 14 7–8 7–8 3 7–8 5–6 Introduction of human BRCA1 by RMCE 3 14 SA SA Brca1SCo5–6 Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26RMCE Brca1Δ5–6 Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26hBRCA1 Brca1SCo5–6 Brca1SCo5–6 Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26RMCE Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26hBRCA1 3 14 CreERT2 CreERT2 CreERT2 CreERT2 Puro Puro Puro PGK PGK PGK Puro PGK zsgreen Hyg FLP zsgreen Hyg FLP SA SA NeoR Selection hBRCA1–, mBrca1+, neoS, puroS hBRCA1+, mBrca1+, neoR, puroS hBRCA1+, mBrca1–, neoR, puroR pA hBRCA1 hBRCA1 EF1α EF1α Δ5′ neo Δ5′ neo Δ5′ neo EF1α hBRCA1 Cre-mediated deletion of mouse Brca1 by 4-OHT addition 3 14 PuroR Selection SA SA SA SA Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1145 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE that were previously classifi ed using functional assays ( 7, 8 ) or a multifactorial likelihood model ( 9 ), as well as M1400V, L1407P, and M1411T, which have been reported to attenuate the interaction between BRCA1 and PALB2 ( 10 ). To allow validation of our functional complementation assay, we included a series of eight BRCA1 variants that are known to be deleterious or neutral according to the Breast Cancer Information Core database (BIC; http://research.nhgri .nih.gov/bic/ ; Supplementary Table S1). These controls include the well-known pathogenic BRCA1 founder mutations 185delAG and 5382insC and the neutral polymorphisms Y105C, R866C, and E1250K. The BIC designation is supported by the classifi cation according to the International Agency for Research on Cancer ( http://iarc.fr/ ), which includes the Align-GVGD score that indicates biophysical and evolutionary alterations ( http://agvgd.iarc.fr/ ; Supplementary Table S1; refs. 11, 12 ). Align-GVGD scores vary between C0 (likely neutral) and C65 (likely deleterious). Sequence-verifi ed constructs that contained the intended VUS, but no other BRCA1 mutations, were transfected into R26 CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells to undergo RMCE ( Fig.  2 ). Neomycin-resistant clones were pooled and RMCE was confi rmed by PCR analysis. Subsequently, protein expression of the human BRCA1 variants was analyzed by Western blot analysis with a human BRCA1-specifi c antibody ( Fig. 2 and Supplementary Fig. S2). Comparison with BRCA1 protein levels in embryonic stem cells expressing human BRCA1 from a bacterial artifi cial chromosome (BAC), which is known to rescue embryonic lethality of Brca1 -null mice ( 7 ,  13 ), showed that transcription of the human BRCA1 cDNA from the EF1A gene promoter results in physiologic levels of BRCA1 protein (Supplementary Fig.  S1). Most BRCA1 variants were expressed at equal levels, allowing comparison of their functional activities. A number of C-terminal BRCA1 mutants showed low levels of expression (Supplementary Table S2; Supplementary Fig. S2). Real-time RT-PCR analysis showed that decreased protein expression was not caused by decreased mRNA expression (Supplementary Fig.  S3), suggesting that the low abundance of BRCA1 protein results from posttranslational events. In fact, for most of these variants, mutation-associated protein instability has already been documented in previous publications (refs. 8 , 14 , 15 ; Supplementary Table S2).  Functional Complementation Assay of BRCA1 Sequence Variants in Mouse Brca1 -Null Embryonic Stem Cells  As a fi rst functional test, we assayed the ability of BRCA1 variants to restore the proliferation defect of switched R26 CreERT2/RMCE ;Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells ( Fig.  2 ). Expression of endogenous mouse Brca1 was shut off through overnight induction of Cre activity by 4-OHT, and 7 days  Figure 2.   Workfl ow for the functional classifi cation of BRCA1 sequence variants in Brca1 -null embryonic stem (ES) cells. Outline of the generation of mouse Brca1 -defi cient embryonic stem cells expressing human BRCA1 variants and functional complementation assays. Indicated are the experimental steps and the time it takes one person to analyze 20 mutants. Introduction of BRCA1 variants in R26CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1SCo/D ES cells BRCA1 Construct + G418 Selection of clones with correct RMCE BRCA1 Expression analysis SDM and sequencing RMCE in ES cells x + 4-OHT + Puromycin Functional assays Functional assays Cre-Mediated deletion of Brca1SCo allele Proliferation and cisplatin sensitivity assays Selection of Brca1ΔSCo/Δ ES cells Timecourse for the analysis of 20 BRCA1 variants Weeks 0 1 2 7 3 8 4 5 6 SDM and RMCE Functional assays Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1146 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. after switching, cells were plated in 96-well plates for proliferation assays, and were analyzed using Sulphorhodamine B staining. For each group of mutants tested, we included positive and negative controls consisting of embryonic stem cells containing, respectively, wild-type human BRCA1 cDNA and an empty RMCE vector. BRCA1 variants were evaluated on their ability to support growth compared with these controls (Supplementary Tables S3 and S4). Although we tested 28 mutations in the central domain encoded by exon 11 (aa 224–1366), BRCA1 variants that were unable to rescue the proliferation defect of Brca1 -null mouse embryonic stem cells to BRCA1 wild-type levels were confi ned to the conserved N- and C-terminal domains of BRCA1.  Cisplatin Sensitivity Assay for Classifi cation of BRCA1 Variants  Although the ability of BRCA1 variants to support proliferation appears to be indicative of VUS function, results were not always clear-cut (Supplementary Tables S3 and S4). BRCA1 is known to be important for DNA interstrand crosslink (ICL) repair through mechanisms that are both dependent ( 5 ) and independent ( 16 ) of its function in homologous recombination (HR). The role of BRCA1 in ICL repair is stressed by the occurrence of genetic reversion mutations restoring BRCA1 protein expression in platinum-resistant ovarian tumors in BRCA1 -mutation carriers ( 17, 18 ). We therefore decided to conduct a 96-well–based cisplatin sensitivity assay to allow a more stringent evaluation of BRCA1 VUS functionality.  Half-maximal inhibitory concentrations (IC 50 ) of cisplatin were determined using a resazurin cell viability assay, and BRCA1 variants were again classifi ed in comparison to wildtype BRCA1 and an empty RMCE vector. To obtain corrected cisplatin IC 50 values, we fi tted a log-logistic curve constrained at 1 and 0. We excluded a fi t if the residual squared error (RSE) exceeded 0.1. We then applied a Bayesian predictor to classify BRCA1 VUS as pathogenic or benign. Most variants that showed less than wild-type activity in the proliferation assay also scored as functionally impaired in the cisplatin sensitivity assay and were classifi ed as deleterious ( Table 1 ,  Table 1.   Functional classifi cation of BRCA1 VUS based on cisplatin response Variant DNA change Type of mutation a Classifi cation S4F c.11C>T VUS Not Clear M18T c.53T>C VUS Deleterious 185delAG c.68_69delAG Deleterious control Deleterious b K45Q c.133A>C VUS Neutral C61G c.181T>G Deleterious control Deleterious C64G c.190T>G VUS Deleterious b D67Y c.199G>T VUS Neutral Y105C c.314A>G Neutral control Neutral N132K c.396C>A VUS Neutral P142H c.425C>A VUS Neutral L147F c.441G>C VUS Neutral L165P c.494T>C VUS Neutral R170W c.508C>T VUS Neutral S186Y c.557C>A VUS Neutral V191I c.571G>A VUS Neutral T231M c.692C>T VUS Neutral D245V c.734A>T VUS Neutral L246V c.736T>G VUS Neutral V271L c.811G>C VUS Neutral S308A c.922A>G; c.923G>C Artifi cial h Not Clear L358R; C360R; E362H c.1073T>G; c.1078T>C; c.1084G>C; c.1086G>T Artifi cial Neutral L668F c.2002C>T VUS Neutral D695N c.2083G>A VUS Neutral P798L c.2393C>T VUS Neutral N810Y c.2428A>T VUS Neutral T826K c.2477C>A VUS Neutral (continued) Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1147 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE (continued) Variant DNA change Type of mutation a Classifi cation R841Q c.2522G>A VUS Neutral Y856H c.2566T>C VUS Neutral R866C c.2596C>T Neutral control Neutral S988A c.2962T>G Artifi cial Neutral M1008I c.3024G>A VUS Neutral E1060A c.3179A>C VUS Neutral S1101N c.3302G>A VUS Neutral K1110del c.3328_3330delAAG VUS Neutral S1140G c.3418A>G VUS Neutral E1214K c.3640G>A VUS Neutral N1236K c.3708T>G VUS Neutral E1250K c.3748G>A Neutral control Neutral L1267S c.3800T>C VUS Neutral E1282V c.3845A>T VUS Neutral S1297del c.3891_3893delTTC VUS Neutral S1301R c.3903T>A VUS Neutral E1346K c.4036G>A VUS Neutral V1378I c.4132G>A VUS Neutral M1400V c.4198A>G VUS Neutral L1407P c.4220T>C VUS Neutral b M1411T c.4232T>C VUS Neutral R1443G c.4327C>G VUS Neutral S1448G c.4342A>G VUS Neutral S1486C c.4456A>T VUS Neutral S1497A c.4489T>G Artifi cial Neutral V1534M c.4600G>A VUS Neutral R1589P c.4766G>C VUS Neutral M1628T c.4883T>C VUS Neutral S1651P c.4951T>C VUS Not Clear S1651F c.4952C>T VUS Not Clear M1652I c.4956G>A VUS Neutral S1655F c.4964C>T VUS Deleterious b H1686R c.5057A>G VUS Deleterious H1686Q c.5058T>A VUS Deleterious V1688del c.5062_5064delGTT VUS Deleterious T1691I c.5072C>T VUS Not clear R1699W c.5095C>T Deleterious control Deleterious b R1699Q c.5096G>A VUS Deleterious b G1706E c.5117G>A VUS Deleterious b G1706A c.5117G>C VUS Neutral A1708E c.5123C>A Deleterious control Deleterious W1718C c.5154G>T VUS Deleterious T1720A c.5158A>G VUS Neutral E1735K c.5203G>A VUS Not clear  Table 1.   Functional classifi cation of BRCA1 VUS based on cisplatin response (Continued) Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1148 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al.  Fig. 3 ). Variants showing increased cisplatin sensitivity were tested at least twice before they were classifi ed. The positive and negative controls classifi ed as expected, although the known pathogenic truncation mutation 5382insC scored as neutral in one of three assays, stressing the need for repeat experiments. Also BRCA1 variants that were previously tested in other assays conducted as expected. It should be noted that the artifi cial variants S308A and S1497A rescued proliferation and cisplatin responses of mouse Brca1 - defi cient embryonic stem cells in BAC complementation assays, but are predicted to be deleterious based on their effects on embryonic stem cell differentiation and their response to γ-irradiation, respectively ( 7 ). The V1804D mutation scored as a neutral variant in our assay, which is in line with most published data ( 8, 9 ), except for the results of an embryonic stem cell–based BAC complementation assay ( 7 ). Again, all BRCA1 mutations that were classifi ed as deleterious were confi ned to regions encoding the conserved N- and C-terminal domains ( Fig.  4 ), despite the observation that deletion of the central region encoded by exon 11 leads to genetic instability in mice ( 12 ). Remarkably, the three mutations that diminish the interaction between BRCA1 and PALB2 ( 10 ), just C-terminal of the region encoded by exon 11, had no effect on cisplatin sensitivity in this assay. Of note, there was in general good correlation between our classifi cation and the Align-GVGD score (Supplementary Table S4). Notable exceptions were the neutral control variant R866C, which validated our assay but scored as likely deleterious (C65) using Align-GVGD, and G1770V, which scored as likely neutral (C0) by Align-GVGD but was classi- fi ed as deleterious in our assay. Our assay also classifi ed some variants for which the Align-GVGD scores were less clear, emphasizing the usefulness of functional assays to complement in silico analysis.  We also analyzed the possible effects of all BRCA1 variants on mRNA splicing, which may have deleterious consequences but cannot be assessed in our cDNA-based assay. The predictive value for exonic variants outside the consensus splice sites is questionable ( 19, 20 ), but four missense mutations were present in existing splice sites (Supplementary Table S4). Although c.5154G>T (encoding W1718C) was deleterious, three of these variants were classifi ed as neutral in our assay. One of them, c.441G>C (encoding L147F), had an increased probability to damage the splice donor site of exon 7. Another variant, c.5072C>T (encoding T1691I), might also affect splicing, but no defect was measured in blood samples of mutation carriers ( 19 ). The third exonic splice site mutation that was classifi ed as neutral in our cisplatin sensitivity assay, c.133A>C (K45Q), is not predicted to lead to aberrant splicing.  Results from Proliferation and Cisplatin Sensitivity Assays Correlate with HR Activity of BRCA1 Variants  BRCA1 and BRCA2 are involved in DNA repair via HR ( 12 , 21 ). Together with non-homologous end joining (NHEJ), HR forms the cellular defense against DNA double-strand breaks (DSB), a severe type of DNA damage that is lethal if unrepaired. Although HR is essentially error-free, NHEJ is error-prone, and therefore defects in HR are known to lead to genomic instability. Although it is not clear whether other Variant DNA change Type of mutation a Classifi cation V1736A c.5207T>C VUS Not clear b D1739G c.5216A>G VUS Deleterious D1739V c.5216A>T VUS Deleterious H1746Q c.5238C>G VUS Not clear R1753T c.5258G>C VUS Not clear b 5382insC c.5266dupC Deleterious control Not clear b L1764P c.5291T>C VUS Deleterious b C1767S c.5300G>C VUS Neutral G1770V c.5309G>T VUS Deleterious b W1782C c.5346G>T VUS Neutral A1789T c.5365G>A VUS Deleterious E1794D c.5382G>C VUS Neutral V1804D c.5411T>A VUS Neutral P1812R c.5435C>G VUS Neutral W1837R c.5509T>C VUS Deleterious H1862L c.5585A>T VUS Neutral a Type of mutation indicates if a variant is a VUS according to the BIC database (http://research.nhgri.nih.gov/bic/). b Functionally impaired in the DR-GFP and/or combined PARP inhibitor/cisplatin sensitivity assay.  Table 1.   Functional classifi cation of BRCA1 VUS based on cisplatin response (Continued) Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1149 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE  Figure 3.   Waterfall chart of cisplatin IC 50 values normalized for wild-type human BRCA1 and empty RMCE vector controls. Corrected cisplatin IC 50 values for all tested human BRCA1 variants and controls, including repeat experiments. BRCA1 variants are classifi ed as functionally impaired or neutral when the corrected IC 50 values are similar to either the empty RMCE vector or the wild-type human BRCA1 controls ( P < 0.05). 4.0 –3.0 –2.0 –1.0 0.0 1.0 2.0 3.0 Corrected cisplatin IC50 (a.u.) Mutant hBRCA1 Wild-type hBRCA1 Empty RMCE vector Positive control Negative control  Figure 4.   Predicted pathogenic BRCA1 amino acid substitutions are confi ned to the evolutionarily conserved N- and C-terminal domains. Schematic representation of the BRCA1 protein with the positions of variants classifi ed as neutral (green) or deleterious (red) indicated. Positive and negative controls are depicted by open pinheads and the known deleterious truncation mutations 185delAG (N-terminal) and 5382insC (C-terminal) are marked in blue. The amino acid sequences of the evolutionarily conserved RING (N-terminal) and BRCT (C-terminal) domains are specifi ed to show the exact positions of deleterious (red) and neutral (green) variants. The amino acid substitutions or nonsense (X) mutations of positive and negative controls are encircled. RING domain BRCT domains Deleterious VUS Neutral VUS Deleterious truncation mutant Deleterious control variant Neutral control variant 1646 1706 1766 91 109 1826 1863 61 31 1 MDLSALRVEEVQNVINAMQKILECPICLEL VNKRMSMVVSGLTPEEFMLVYKFARKHHITLTNLITEETTHVVMKTDAEFVCERTLKYFL IKEPVSTKCDHIFCKFCMLKLLNQKKGPSQ GIAGGKWVVSYFWVTQSIKERKMLNEHDFEVRGDVVNGRNHQGPKRARESQDRKIFRGLE CPLCKNDITKRSLQESTRFSQLVEELLKII CAFQLDTGLEYANSYNFAK ICCYGPFTNMPTDQLEWMVQLCGASVVKELSSFTLGTGVHPIVVVQPDAWTEDNGFHAIG QMCEAPVVTREWVLDSVALYQCQELDTYLIPQIPHSHY T Q E C A X Y C GG F R - Q W Q I E A V R L S C D DR T V P G X Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1150 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. functions of BRCA1 are also important for tumor suppression ( 16 , 22 , 23–26 ), its role in HR is likely to be relevant. Therefore, we used the direct repeat (DR)-GFP assay ( 27 ) to measure the effects on HR for a subset of our BRCA1 VUSs. A number of predicted pathogenic variants and controls were shuttled into R26 CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1 SCo/Δ ;Pim1 DR-GFP/wt embryonic stem cells carrying the DR-GFP reporter in the Pim1 locus. Expression of endogenous mouse Brca1 was switched off, and cells were transfected with a plasmid encoding the I-SceI meganuclease as well as an mCherry fl uorescent marker to control for transfection effi ciency. Repair of I-SceI–induced DNA DSBs in DR-GFP via HR leads to expression of GFP, which can be monitored by fl ow cytometry. All but one of the predicted pathogenic variants tested resulted in defective HR, thereby confi rming our functional classifi cation ( Fig. 5 ). The only predicted deleterious variant that did not signifi cantly differ from wild-type BRCA1 , R1699Q, seemed to support intermediate levels of HR activity.  PARP Inhibitor Sensitivity Assay for Classifi cation of BRCA1 Variants with Intermediate Activity  Deleterious effects of variants with intermediate or partial activity may escape detection in certain functional assays. Although cisplatin sensitivity assays allow robust and  Figure 5.  BRCA1 sequence variants classifi ed as pathogenic do not restore HR. R26 CreERT2/hBRCA1; Brca1 SCo/Δ;Pim1 DR-GFP/wt embryonic stem cells carrying the DR-GFP reporter gene in the Pim1 locus and mutant BRCA1 or controls in the Rosa26 locus were switched using 4-OHT and transfected with a vector expressing I-SceI and mCherry. Transfected cells were analyzed for GFP expression as a measure of HR activity. Expression of BRCA1 wild-type (WT) cDNA resulted in increased HR compared to the empty RMCE vector (Vector) control. Error bars indicate the SD between the results of three independent I-SceI transfections. Signifi cantly decreased HR activity compared with the wild-type control (green line) is indicated. GFP-Positive cells (%) 0.0 0.5 1.0 1.5 2.0 2.5 3.0 3.5 4.0 4.5 ** ns ** * * ns * * * * * * * ns ns WT Vector 185delAG C64G V271L S1651F S1655F R1699Q R1699W G1706A G1706E V1736A R1753T 5382insC L1764P G1770V reproducible classifi cation of several functionally impaired BRCA1 variants, assays using other compounds may have additional value. It is known that BRCA1- and BRCA2- defi cient cells are extremely sensitive to PARP1 inhibition ( 28, 29 ), leading to a larger dynamic range between BRCA2- defi cient cells and isogenic BRCA2-profi cient controls than for cisplatin ( 30 ). We therefore tested complementation of PARP inhibitor sensitivity for a number of BRCA1 mutants and the BRCA1 wild-type control. Given the unexpected neutral effects of the M1400V, L1407P, and M1411T mutations in the PALB2 interaction domain, we decided to include these variants in this series, as well as the R1699Q and V1736A variants that have recently been shown to confer (intermediate) breast and ovarian cancer risk ( 31, 32 ). To allow direct comparison of results from different assays, we repeated the cisplatin sensitivity and proliferation assays in parallel to the olaparib sensitivity assay. Our results indicate that BRCA1 wild-type and empty vector controls indeed show a larger difference in sensitivity for olaparib than for cisplatin ( Fig.  6 ). However, this increase in dynamic range is accompanied by an increased variation between repeat experiments for BRCA1-profi cient samples. Nevertheless, the functional defect of the R1699Q and V1736A mutations becomes more evident, and there also Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1151 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE  Figure 6.   PARP inhibitor sensitivity assay of BRCA1 sequence variants. R26 CreERT2/hBRCA1 ;Brca1 SCo/Δ or R26CreERT2/RMCE; Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells carrying mutant BRCA1 , BRCA1 wild-type (WT), or empty RMCE vector (Vector) controls in the Rosa26 locus were switched using 4-OHT and assayed for sensitivity to cisplatin or the PARP inhibitor olaparib. The cytotoxicity assays were conducted in parallel and data were normalized to the average of the wild-type controls. Error bars indicate the SD between the results of biologic triplicates for which the cells were independently switched. Signifi cant deviation from the average IC 50 values of the wild-type control (green line) is indicated. IC50 Relative to WT controls (%) 0 20 40 60 80 100 120 140 160 Cisplatin Olaparib * **** **** * * ** *** **** ns ns ns ns WT Vector M1400V L1407P M1411T R1699Q V1736A seems to be a less than wild-type response for the PALB2 interaction mutant L1407P. In the concurrent proliferation analysis, R1699Q and V1736A both show an intermediate functional defect (Supplementary Fig.  S4). Also the M1411T mutation seems to affect the response to PARP inhibition, but the difference with BRCA1 wild-type is not signifi cant. Interestingly, the L1407P and M1411T variants have previously been shown to be more defective than M1400V in a gene conversion assay ( 10 ). It should also be noted that, in contrast with the large-scale classifi cation experiments, the cisplatin sensitivity assay conducted in parallel to the PARP inhibitor assay identifi ed signifi cant functional defects for L1407P and V1736A.  DISCUSSION  Over the past few years several functional assays for classifi cation of BRCA1 VUSs have been developed. Several of these assays are restricted to functions of the BRCA1 protein that reside in the evolutionarily conserved RING or BRCT domains. Examples include in vitro transactivation assays for BRCT peptides ( 8 ) and measurement of ubiquitin ligase activity for protein fragments encompassing the N-terminal RING domain ( 33 ). Other assays were designed to evaluate the functions of full-length mutant BRCA1 protein, either by monitoring general effects on proliferation or response to DNA damage ( 7 ), or by directly focusing on the role of BRCA1 in DNA repair via HR ( 34 ).  Because BRCA1 VUSs are not restricted to regions encoding the N- or C-terminal domains, and given the observation that interaction between these domains is required for recruitment of BRCA1 to damaged DNA ( 35 ), functional assays for the full-length protein would be ideal. In principle, such assays can be conducted in cell lines derived from BRCA1 - mutated tumors, but there are indications that the outcome of assays for BRCA1 function depends on the cellular context. As absence of BRCA1 leads to loss of cellular viability, it is thought that additional mutations are required for BRCA1- associated tumorigenesis. For example, loss of p53 alleviates the consequences of BRCA1 defi ciency both in vitro and in vivo ( 4 ) and is common in BRCA1-defi cient tumors ( 36, 37 ). Also, depletion of 53BP1 is known to suppress the defects caused by BRCA1 defi ciency ( 5 , 38 , 39 ). Therefore, aberrations in BRCA1-defi cient tumor cells may mask functional defects of BRCA1 VUSs. We reasoned that assays in normal cells that can be depleted from endogenous BRCA1 expression are most likely to reveal functional defects of BRCA1 VUSs. The usefulness of this approach has been previously shown by Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1152 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. BAC complementation assays in mouse embryonic stem cells ( 7 , 40 ). However, mutagenesis of large BAC clones by recombineering and functional complementation of cells with these mutant constructs is time-consuming and technically demanding, and therefore cannot be conducted in a high-throughput setting. We therefore set out to develop a cDNA-based functional complementation assay in mouse embryonic stem cells that is easier to control and scale up and more suitable for routine functional classifi cation of BRCA1 sequence variants.  One advantage of BAC transgenics in complementation assays is that genes are expressed at physiologically relevant levels. This is the result of low copy-number integrations and the presence of natural regulatory elements required for proper gene expression. We decided to use RMCE to allow single-copy integration of BRCA1 cDNAs at one specifi c genomic locus. The use of RMCE effectively prevents multiple or partial integrations, concatemers, and position-effect variegation. As a result, all variants are expressed at equal levels. Moreover, transcription of BRCA1 cDNAs from the EF1A gene promoter results in physiologic levels of BRCA1 protein, comparable with those observed in embryonic stem cells stably transfected with a BAC containing the human BRCA1 locus. Indeed, the wild-type human BRCA1 cDNA was able to complement Brca1 -null embryonic stem cells in cellular proliferation, drug sensitivity, and HR assays. Our RMCE strategy uses BRCA1 cDNA constructs in which mutations can be swiftly introduced using SDM, enabling a higher throughput than introduction of mutations via BAC recombineering. In addition, the introduction of BRCA1 cDNAs via RMCE obviates the need to analyze multiple embryonic stem cell clones for correct integration and expression.  As a proof of principle, we used our functional complementation assay to analyze exonic BRCA1 VUSs that were identifi ed in families with HBOC in the Netherlands and Belgium, as well as a set of previously analyzed BRCA1 variants. A number of mutations resulted in reduced BRCA1 protein levels, most likely because of structural destabilization. In all cases, this led to diminished capacity for functional complementation. Also, several variants that gave rise to normal BRCA1 protein levels were unable to rescue the proliferation defect and cisplatin sensitivity of Brca1 -null embryonic stem cells. As BRCA1 loss of function mutations are associated with increased cancer risk, variants that score as functionally impaired in our embryonic stem cell assay system may be causally involved in tumor formation. This notion is supported by the fact that seven of eight known pathogenic or neutral control variants in our validation series were correctly classifi ed by the cisplatin sensitivity assay. The pathogenic 5382insC truncation mutation could not be classifi ed because it scored as neutral in one of three transfection series. This was probably due to technical reasons, as the 5382insC mutation did not restore HR activity in Brca1 -defi cient embryonic stem cells, in contrast with R1699Q, which was recently shown to confer intermediate risk of HBOC ( 32 ).  Our assay system yielded ambivalent results for nine other variants: S4F, S308A, S1651P, S1651F, T1691I, V1736A, E1735K, H1746Q, and R1753T. T1691I and E1735K were classifi ed as functionally impaired in only one cisplatin sensitivity test, whereas values from repeat experiments could not be taken into account because of RSE values above 0.1. S4F, S1651P, S1651F, V1736A, H1746Q, and R1753T were differently classifi ed in repeat experiments, which may refl ect technical fl aws or intermediate activity of these variants. Of note, the V1736A mutation was recently identifi ed as a pathogenic variant with hypomorphic activity in DNA repair ( 31 ). Although we did not measure signifi cant HR activity of V1736A in a DR-GFP gene conversion assay, intermediate activity of this variant is supported by the results of the proliferation assays and additional cisplatin sensitivity assays. S1651F showed HR activity similar to wild-type BRCA1 , whereas R1753T was HR-defi cient. S308A is an artifi cial mutation of a BRCA1 phosphorylation site that was able to support proliferation and resistance to DNA damage in an embryonic stem cell-based BAC complementation assay. However, S308A-complemented embryonic stem cells did show increased apoptosis when cultured in embryoid bodies ( 7 ), indicating a partial defect that might explain the ambivalent results for this mutation in our assays.  Our results show that BRCA1 variants should ideally be assayed in triplicate to avoid misclassifi cation. This also applies to BRCA1 VUS that we classifi ed as neutral, most of which were tested only once because in our current study we focused on variants that showed functional impairment. The striking restriction of unambiguously predicted pathogenic mutants to the terminal RING and BRCT domains suggests that some plasticity is allowed for the central domain of BRCA1. However, our dataset is still limited and more experiments are required to gain insight into the function of this domain.  Our cDNA-based system allows for several additional functional assays that have been described previously for BAC transgenic embryonic stem cells ( 7 ). These include assays for defects during in vitro and in vivo embryonic stem cell differentiation but also treatments with other cytotoxic agents. As a proof of principle, we investigated the activity of a number of mutants in the response to the PARP inhibitor olaparib. These included M1400V, L1407, and M1411T, which were previously shown to impair PALB2 binding and have a negative effect on BRCA1 function ( 10 ). Although the differences in sensitivity of BRCA1-defi cient versus BRCA1-profi cient embryonic stem cells are larger for olaparib than for cisplatin, increased variation between repeat experiments allowed us to identify functional defects only for L1407 and not for the other two variants in the PALB2 interaction domain, M1400V and M1411T. However, the R1699Q and V1736A variants, which are known to have hypomorphic activity, clearly showed a defect in the response to olaparib. Interestingly, both mutations are in the BRCT domain, and it has recently been shown that mutation of this domain especially confers sensitivity to PARP inhibition ( 41 ). Together, our results show that PARP inhibitor sensitivity assays may have added value, especially for the classifi cation of BRCA1 VUSs with intermediate phenotypes.  Platinum drugs and PARP inhibitors are selectively toxic to BRCA1-defi cient cells because they target HR defi ciency. Although the role of BRCA1 in HR is thought to be essential for maintaining genomic integrity and preventing accumulation of (oncogenic) mutations, other activities may also contribute to its tumor suppression function. These activities Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1153 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE may include the HR-independent role for BRCA1 in ICL repair, which has been attributed to the facilitation of FANCD2 accumulation at cross-linked DNA ( 16 ). Nevertheless, we observed a good correlation between the results of the cisplatin sensitivity assay and the results of the DR-GFP HR assay. All BRCA1 variants that failed to restore the cisplatin response in Brca1 -null embryonic stem cells were also defective in catalyzing gene conversion, thereby confi rming our functional classifi cation. It will be interesting to see if this holds true for all BRCA1 variants or whether there are also pathogenic mutations that have no effect on HR.  As with any other in vitro approach, our functional complementation assay system might still fail to identify all pathogenic variants because it does not necessarily recapitulate all aspects of BRCA1 function in vivo . A limitation of our cDNA-based assay is also that it cannot be used to investigate effects on mRNA splicing. Although algorithms have been designed to predict possible splice defects, the consequences of mutations outside of the consensus splice sites especially require functional validation experiments. For this purpose, BAC complementation assays ( 7 ), minigene-based splicing assays, or BRCA1 transcript analysis of patient blood samples ( 19 ) may be instrumental. However, transacting factors also affect splicing, and these may be tissue specifi c ( 42 ). A possible solution would be to determine the presence of BRCA1 splice variants in tumor tissue from BRCA1 VUS carriers and use this information to generate a cDNA construct for analysis of the functional consequences. To evaluate BRCA1 VUSs, there remains a need for multifactorial models that combine results from functional assays and in silico analyses with genetic evidence and other information from mutation carriers. This also includes DNA copy number data from tumors from BRCA1 VUS carriers, as it is known that BRCA1- associated breast tumors show distinct genomic aberrations ( 43, 44 ). Our functional assay system does however provide a robust and easily implementable tool for the functional characterization of large numbers of BRCA1 VUSs within the context of the full-length protein. It is our hope that our assay system will fi nd its way to clinical genetics laboratories where it can be used to aid genetic counseling. Ideally, these tests should be coordinated on an international level and in close collaboration with the ENIGMA consortium.    Missense substitutions of uncertain clinical significance in the BRCA1 gene are a vexing problem in genetic counseling for women who have a family history of breast cancer. In this study, we evaluated the functions of 29 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in two DNA repair pathways. Repair of double-strand breaks by homology-directed recombination (HDR) had been previously analyzed for 16 of these BRCA1 variants, and 13 more variants were analyzed in this study. All 29 variants were also analyzed for function in double-strand break repair by the single-strand annealing (SSA) pathway. We found that among the pathogenic mutations in BRCA1, all were defective for DNA repair by either pathway. The HDR assay was accurate because all pathogenic mutants were defective for HDR, and all nonpathogenic variants were fully functional for HDR. Repair by SSA accurately identified pathogenic mutants, but several nonpathogenic variants were scored as defective or partially defective. These results indicated that specific amino acid residues of the BRCA1 protein have different effects in the two related DNA repair pathways, and these results validate the HDR assay as highly correlative with BRCA1-associated breast cancer.  Keywords: BRCA1, homologous recombination, single-strand annealing, centrosome, VUS Go to: Introduction Among the more than 70,000 women who had their BRCA1 gene (MIM# 113705) sequenced by 2006, approximately 2.3% were found to carry a BRCA1 variant of uncertain significance (VUS). These variants were classified as uncertain because they occurred in families wherein segregation analysis had not been done or in whom the segregation analysis was not informative and thus the VUS had unknown effects on breast and ovarian cancer risk [Hall et al., 2009; Spearman et al., 2008; Sweet et al., 2009]. As whole genome and exome sequencing becomes a more prevalent practice, more VUSs in BRCA1 will be uncovered, and increasingly women will face the quandary of an uninformative genetic test. This leads to individuals with a VUS test result making decisions about cancer screening and prevention without concrete information on which to base their decisions. Women who have an indeterminate BRCA1 sequence result and a family history of breast cancer have a high level of distress, and there are no consistent clinical guidelines for advising them [Dorval et al., 2005; Petrucelli et al., 2002; van Dijk et al., 2006]. Of the 567 BRCA1 missense substitutions listed in the current Breast Cancer Information Core (BIC) database, 14 are described as pathogenic (Class 5) and 27 as nonpathogenic (Class 1). By including the data from Collaborators for the Investigation of Modifiers of BRCA1/2 (CIMBA), a total of 24 BRCA1 variants are pathogenic (CIMBA database). Less than 10% of the missense substitutions in the BIC database have known cancer predisposition. In the absence of definitive genetic information on BRCA1 missense substitutions, other methods are needed to determine whether missense substitutions are pathogenic. Multifactorial approaches have augmented genetic segregation analysis with additional information about the proband and, in some cases, the tumor [Easton et al., 2007; Goldgar et al., 2004; Lindor et al., 2012; Plon et al., 2008; Spearman et al., 2008; Sweet et al., 2009]. These approaches have been successful in reclassification of variants but are also incomplete because they cannot definitively determine whether any given variant affects the critical cancer suppressing function(s) of the protein [Millot et al., 2012]. In contrast, a biological functional assay has the potential to determine whether any given BRCA1 missense substitution is defective in a process, and if that function is predictive of cancer predisposition (i.e., 100% sensitive and 100% specific), then the functional assay can, in theory, be used in genetic counseling.  A variety of biological assays have been analyzed for BRCA1 function and have been correlated with cancer predisposition to various extents [Carvalho et al., 2007; Cotta-Ramusino et al., 2011; Kais et al., 2012; Lee et al., 2010; Millot et al., 2012; Morris et al., 2006; Ransburgh et al., 2010; Vallee et al., 2012]. Several of these assays test single domains of BRCA1, and several address the variant within the context of the full-length protein. In this study, we analyzed the effects of 29 missense substitutions in BRCA1 on the repair of double-strand DNA breaks (DSBs) by homologous recombination and by the single-strand annealing (SSA) pathways. Our results indicate that the effects of specific missense mutations in these pathways strongly correlate with breast cancer predisposition. Further, we find that specific amino acid substitutions affect the two double-strand break repair pathways differentially.  Go to: Materials and Methods Plasmids and Cell Lines  All plasmids for the expression of human BRCA1 with missense substitutions were generated by site-directed mutagenesis from the wild-type sequence (GenBank: U14680.1). Several of these plasmids had been described in previous publications [Ransburgh et al., 2010; Wei et al., 2008]. The cell line for the homologous recombination assay, HeLa-DR, was based on the genomic integration of a specific vector that functions as a recombination substrate [Pierce et al., 2001]. The vector for homologous recombination had been the gift of M. Jasin (Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Institute, New York, NY). The HeLa-DR had been described before [Parvin et al., 2011; Ransburgh et al., 2010]. The repair of double-strand breaks by the SSA pathway was based on a vector kindly provided by J. Stark (City of Hope, Duarte, CA) [Bennardo et al., 2008; Stark et al., 2004] stably integrated into HeLa cells to make the HeLa–SSA cell line. The siRNA targeting the cellular BRCA1 3′ untranslated region (UTR) is the same as previously used [Ransburgh et al., 2010].  SSA Assay  HeLa–SSA cells were seeded in 15.6-mm-diameter wells in 24-well plates, and when cells were 50% confluent, cells were transfected with 5 pmol of the siRNA targeting the BRCA1 3′-UTR plus 0.3 μg of the BRCA1 expression plasmid in Lipofectamine 2000 reagent (Life Technologies, Grand Island, NY). At 24 hr after transfection, cells were transferred to 35-mm-diameter wells in six-well plates. At 48 hr, cells were transfected with 25 pmol of the BRCA1 3′-UTR-specific siRNA plus 0.75 μg BRCA1 expression plasmid plus 0.75 μg pCBASce (for the expression of I-SceI) in Lipofectamine 2000 reagent. After 3 days, cells are harvested by trypsinization, and the fraction of GFP-positive cells is determined using a FACScalibur flow cytometer (BD Biosciences, San Jose, CA) (Analytic Cytometry Shared Resource of The Ohio State University Comprehensive Cancer Center).  Western Blot Analysis of BRCA1 Protein  Immunoblots of the expressed BRCA1 protein were done as has been described previously [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Cells that had been transfected as in the SSA assay were, in parallel, extracted in 0.1% NP-40, 0.05 M Hepes (pH 7.5), and 0.005 M EDTA. Protein contents of extracts were determined using the Bradford reagent; and 50 μg of protein was electrophoresed on 3–8% Nu-PAGE gels (Life Technologies, Grand Island, NY) M. Jasin (Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Institute, NewYork, NY), transferred to polyvinylidene fluoride membranes, and immunoblotted using antibody specific to BRCA1(400–1,100). Densitometry analysis was performed from immunoblots using Kodak 1D software (Eastman Kodak Company, Rochester, NY).  Statistical Analysis of Results  The raw results in the SSA assay for the missense substitutions were compared with the control samples (either GL2 siRNA or BRCA1 siRNA with BRCA1-wt add back) using the unpaired Student’s t-test and obtained the one-tail P values; for intermediate-phenotype mutants, besides the above-mentioned comparisons, we also conducted the unpaired Student’s t-test against the control sample that contains BRCA1 siRNA with empty vector adding back, and obtained the one-tail P values. P values of less than 0.01 were considered significant.  Go to: Results Function of BRCA1 Variants in DNA Break Repair by Homologous Recombination  The BRCA1 protein has been shown to be a critical component of the response to DSBs. Cellular machinery can utilize homologous sequences to accurately repair the DSB, or the free ends can be joined by nonhomologous end joining. In addition to homologous recombination, the pathway of SSA exists by which the repair proteins resect DNA from the free ends of the DSB, and when short stretches of homologous sequence are exposed, then the DNA ends are rejoined [Stark et al., 2004]. The homologous recombination assay used in this study was based on a method developed by the Jasin laboratory in which a single integrated genomic locus contains two inactive GFP genes, and one of these contains the endonuclease cleavage site for the rare-cutting I-SceI enzyme [Pierce et al., 2001]. Upon expression of I-SceI in the cell, one inactive allele of GFP is cut, and if homologous recombination occurs using the second inactive GFP gene as the homology template, then the DNA repair results in gene conversion making the GFP gene become active (Fig. 1A). The SSA assay is based on an analogous strategy in which the GFP protein is not expressed because of intervening DNA sequence, with an I-SceI site at the 3′ end of the intervening DNA. Upon expression of the I-SceI endonuclease, the DSB is generated, and resection of the intervening sequence reveals homologous GFP sequences that are aligned and repaired [Stark et al., 2004] (Fig. 1B). These two processes depend on sequence homologies for the repair, but there are functional differences. The Rad51 and BRCA2 proteins are required for the homology-directed recombination (HDR) assay, but are not required for the SSA assay [Moynahan et al., 2001; Stark et al., 2004].  Figure 1 Figure 1 The double-strand DNA break (DSB) repair assay system. A: The HDR recombination substrate [Pierce et al. 2001] is diagrammed. The upstream GFP allele is defective because of the inclusion of an I-SceI site in its sequence. The downstream GFP allele is ... For each assay, we have established HeLa-derived cell lines with the published recombination substrate [Pierce et al., 2001; Stark et al., 2004] integrated in the genome at a single site. The HeLa-DR cell line assays HDR, and the HeLa–SSA cell line is used to assay SSA. The HDR and the SSA assays have a similar experimental design with a depletion of BRCA1 by transfection of a siRNA that is specific for the 3′-UTR of the BRCA1 mRNA. We cotransfect a BRCA1 expression plasmid that is not affected by the siRNA and which expresses the variant BRCA1 protein. After 2 days, we repeat the transfection and also transfect a plasmid that encodes the expression of the I-SceI endonuclease to generate the DSB in the presence of the variant BRCA1. After 3 days, we assay the cells for GFP expression by flow cytometry. The timeline of the experiment is shown in Figure 1C.  We have previously analyzed 16 variants of BRCA1 in a tissue-culture-cell-based assay for repair of DSBs via homologous recombination [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Using the HeLa-DR cell line developed by us, up to 20% of the cells convert to GFP positive. This high level of recombination enables the quantitative analysis of variants in BRCA1 in this process. The endogenous BRCA1 mRNA is depleted by siRNA targeting the 3′-UTR, and a BRCA1 variant that is resistant to the siRNA is simultaneously expressed from a plasmid [Parvin et al., 2011; Ransburgh, et al., 2010]. A quantitative measure of the function of the BRCA1 variant is determined from the percentage of cells that convert to GFP positive.  In this study, we first analyzed an additional 13 BRCA1 variants for function in HDR (Fig. 2). Twelve of the BRCA1 variants spanned amino acid residue 90 through 191 and were identified from the Breast Information Core (http://research.nhgri.nih.gov/bic/). These were expressed from the plasmid as full-length proteins. All 12 variants are listed in the BIC as having unknown phenotype with regard to predisposition to breast cancer. Several of these have been evaluated using a multifactorial classification system, and of these 12 variants, seven were nonpathogenic [Lindor et al., 2012]. These were chosen because the function of this domain was unknown and because many of these variants have been reported to be nonpathogenic. By testing the known nonpathogenic variants in this assay, we provide a specificity control for the functional test. The 13th variant tested is a known deleterious mutant in the carboxy terminus of the BRCA1 protein, M1775R. In these experiments, the percentage of cells that were GFP positive when transfected with the control siRNA and the control plasmid were set equal to 1%. All other results were normalized to this control, and all results were from three or more separate experiments. Depletion of BRCA1 and transfection with empty plasmid resulted in a value of 0.09 relative to the control (Fig. 2, lane 2). Thus, BRCA1 depletion has an over 10-fold effect reducing the level of homologous recombination. Depleting BRCA1 and transfecting a plasmid that expressed wild-type BRCA1 resulted in full restoration of homologous recombination (Fig. 2, lane 3). Among the variants with substitutions in residues from 90 to 191, all 12 functioned as wild type in the homologous recombination assay (Fig. 2, lanes 4–15) (P < 0.002 compared with depleted BRCA1). By contrast, the 13th tested missense substitution, a known pathogenic mutant BRCA1–M1775R, did not complement the depletion of BRCA1 in this assay (Fig. 2, lane 16) (Pv = 0.0014 compared with wild-type BRCA1).  Figure 2 Figure 2 Analysis of 13 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in the homology-directed repair assay. HeLa-DR cells were transfected with a siRNA that depleted the endogenous BRCA1 and with a plasmid that expressed the indicated BRCA1 variant. After generating a double-strand ... Function of 29 Variants of BRCA1 in the Repair of DNA Breaks by the SSA Pathway  The 16 BRCA1 variants that had previously been tested for function in homologous recombination [Ransburgh et al., 2010] and the 13 BRCA1 variants tested in this study (Fig. 2) were analyzed for function in SSA repair. The recombination substrate [Bennardo et al., 2008; Stark et al., 2004] was based on similar design as the homologous recombination substrate with the exception that restoration of GFP activity occurs when the two inactive GFP genes are repaired by SSA. HeLa cells were stably transfected with the SA–GFP construct, and a clone was selected that had no detectable background GFP signal. Upon transfection of the I-SceI-expressing plasmid, about 5–7% of cells became GFP positive, indicative of a functioning SSA pathway. Depletion of BRCA1 resulted in a decrease to about 1–2% GFP-positive cells (Fig. 3, lane 2), indicating a role for BRCA1 in the SSA repair pathway that had been previously observed [Stark et al., 2004]. Depletion of BRCA1 resulted in about 25% of the activity found in nondepleted cells. As had been observed with the homologous recombination assay, transfection of a plasmid expressing wild-type BRCA1 fully complemented the defect in SSA due to depletion of the endogenous BRCA1 (Fig. 3, lane 3). By contrast, depletion of endogenous BRCA1 and expression of a known pathogenic mutant of BRCA1, M1775R, was as defective in SSA as had been transfection of the empty vector (Fig. 3, lane 32). Similar to previous observations with the zinc-coordinating mutants of BRCA1, these residues were all required for SSA repair of double-strand breaks (Fig. 3, lanes: 6, 7, 10, 11, 13, 14, 16, and 17). As was found for the homologous recombination assay, the M18T variant and the T37R variant were defective for SSA repair. The L52F variant had reduced levels of SSA repair, approximately 69% of wild-type activity (Fig. 3, lane 15), although this value was not significantly different from wild type. The D67Y variant, a known nonpathogenic variant [Easton et al., 2007], was fully active in SSA repair (lane 18).  Figure 3 Figure 3 Analysis of 29 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in the SSA assay. HeLa–SSA cells were transfected as in Figure 2 with plasmids that express the 29 tested missense substitutions of BRCA1. Results of the fraction of cells that had converted to GFP ... Results diverged between the SSA and the homologous recombination assays for the variants in residues 90 through 191. The BRCA1–I90T variant functioned in the homologous recombination assay, but in the SSA assay, it was 47% as active as wild type (t-test for differing from wild-type P < 0.01; lane 20). The Y105C variant was statistically different from both wild-type BRCA1 and empty vector (indicated with both an asterisk and a cross; lane 21). This Y105C variant thus has intermediate phenotype, neither fully active nor fully defective. Similarly, the P142H, E143K, and the R170Q had intermediate phenotype (lanes 25, 26, and 28). The V191D variant was also defective for SSA repair (lane 31). Interestingly, the S153R and S186Y variants had diminished activity, but the change in activities was not statistically significant from the wild type. Thus, these variants were not scored as defective. Seven of the variants tested had assay-specific phenotypes, suggesting that how BRCA1 interacts with repair factors in the homologous recombination pathway is different from factors that BRCA1 binds in the SSA pathway.  When replacing the endogenous BRCA1 protein with a variant BRCA1, there is the concern that the expression levels be consistent with the levels of the endogenous in nondepleted cells. A defective phenotype could be masked by high levels of overexpression of the variant protein, or the phenotype of a functional protein might not be observed because of poor protein expression. The 16 variants with missense substitutions between residues 18 and 71 had been tested in HeLa-derived cells and the expression of each variant was similar to the endogenous in each case [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. For expression, we tested the missense substitutions between residues 90 and 191 and also residue 1775, and found that they all express approximately similarly as the endogenous BRCA1 (Fig. 4). Normalized results from densitometry analysis are presented beneath each lane. Protein from nontransfected cells and from control siRNA and empty vector transfected cells had similar amounts of BRCA1 protein (Fig. 4, lanes 1 and 2). Depletion of BRCA1 and add back with empty plasmid depleted the level of BRCA1 protein, which densitometry analysis indicated to be about 0.35 relative to the nontransfected cells (lane 3). All variants were detected at higher levels than the lysate from BRCA1-depleted cells. Some variants were expressed at higher levels than others, but at most 1.3-fold higher than the BRCA1 levels in nontransfected cells (compare, for example, lane 7 with lane 2). Because none of the BRCA1 variants were expressed at levels much higher than the endogenous BRCA1, in no case could the phenotype of a defective variant be masked by overexpression. The S186Y, V191D, and M1775R variants all had somewhat lower expression, but these lower levels of expression did not correlate with function in either homologous recombination or SSA repair. As an example, the S186Y variant was a low expresser (0.86 relative to control), but it was functional in both assays. We note that the M1775R mutant was expressed at lower levels (0.62 relative to endogenous BRCA1) than any other BRCA1 variant (lane 16). We interpret this level of expression to be similar to other variants and not an explanation for the defect in each double-strand break repair pathway. However, we cannot exclude the interpretation that the M1775R was defective in the DNA repair assays because there was lower BRCA1 expression of this isoform in our cells.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Analysis of the expression levels of 13 variants in HeLa–SSA cells. The expression levels of 16 previously tested BRCA1 substitution variants were tested in the HeLa-derived cell line [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Thirteen variants, with substitutions ... Comparison of Variants in Different Assays  The 29 BRCA1 variants analyzed in this study were compared for function in the two DNA repair assays and with available knowledge about cancer association (Table 1). Many of the variants were consistent across the two assays, but there were several variants demonstrating separation of function. All of the zinc-coordinating residues were required for function in both repair assays. The M18T variant was clearly defective, but it is currently classified as unknown clinical significance. There is one genetic model that classified this M18T variant as likely pathogenic (see below).  Table 1 Table 1 Summary of BRCA1 Variants Benchmarking Function to Clinical Relevance  Recently, a new classification system for variants has been proposed [Lindor et al., 2012; Plon et al., 2008]. According to this system, Class 1 denotes variants that are not pathogenic. Class 2 is likely nonpathogenic. Class 3 is uncertain. Class 4 is likely pathogenic (probability of being pathogenic is 0.95–0.99), and Class 5 is definitely pathogenic (probability >0.99). According to variants described in the [Lindor et al. (2012)] system, three of the variants in this study (M18T, C61G, and M1775R) were of Class 4, either likely pathogenic or definitely pathogenic. An additional five mutants are treated clinically as Class 5, pathogenic, (C39Y, C44F, C47G, C64G, and R71G). One of these pathogenic mutants, R71G, does not affect the BRCA1 protein, but rather the splicing of the mRNA [Vega et al., 2001]. Since the assays tested express BRCA1 from spliced cDNA, the R71G defective phenotype would not be detected. We thus exclude this mutant from the comparison of benchmarking these assays against known mutants. There were then seven pathogenic mutants (Class 4 or 5) analyzed and eight nonpathogenic variants (Class 1; Table 1). When comparing the results of our functional analyses with these previously classified variants, the HDR assay scored all seven pathogenic or likely pathogenic mutants as defective, and all eight nonpathogenic variants as functional. The results of the assay were, in the case of every variant, either fully active or fully defective (see examples in Fig. 2). To date, no variant tested in the HDR assay produced an intermediate score.  Compared with these benchmarks, the variants tested in the SSA assay did not score as well as the HDR assay. All pathogenic mutants were defective for SSA repair of double-strand breaks, but one nonpathogenic variant (I124V) was defective for SSA, and three Class 1 variants had intermediate phenotype in the SSA assay. Although the HDR assay was both highly sensitive and highly specific, the SSA assay was highly sensitive at association with cancer risk, but it was less specific. Of interest, it had been noted that four BRCA1 variants, Y105C, P142H, E143K, and Y179C, had decreased accumulation at the sites of DNA breaks [Wei et al., 2008]. Although these variants were normal for HDR, three of these had intermediate levels of function in the SSA assay (Table 1). Perhaps there is a link between the accumulation of BRCA1 at DNA repair sites and a factor important for the SSA assay.  Go to: Discussion Functional Assays as Predictive Tools for Assessing BRCA1 Variants  In this study, we analyzed a total of 29 BRCA1 variants in the repair of DSBs by homologous recombination and by SSA. For the sake of this discussion, we exclude the BRCA1–R71G variant that affects splicing [Vega et al., 2001] because all of our assays used prespliced cDNAs and would not be sensitive to a splicing defect. By comparing our results with those BRCA1 missense substitutions that have a known effect on breast cancer predisposition, we found that the HDR assay was 100% accurate: seven previously classified pathogenic mutants were defective for HDR, and eight previously classified nonpathogenic variants in BRCA1 were functional for HDR. Further, the results for the HDR assay were either fully active or fully defective. We interpret these results to indicate that the HDR assay is validated as a predictive tool for assessing BRCA1 variants.  By contrast to the HDR assay, the function of BRCA1 variants in the repair of DSBs by SSA had a number of differences that diminished the accuracy of this assay. On the basis of the benchmarks of variants that were classified using a genetic model [Lindor et al., 2012], the SSA assay was sensitive because it did not misclassify any pathogenic variants, but it was not specific because it misclassified several nonpathogenic variants as either intermediate or defective. Interpretation of the SSA assay was also complicated by intermediate results; by comparison, the HDR assay had no intermediate results among the 29 variants tested. It is possible, but remains to be determined, whether missense variants that are proficient for HDR, but deficient or intermediate for SSA, confer a lower or moderate risk of cancer. We thus conclude that the HDR assay is a more reliable predictive tool for assessing the function of BRCA1 variants than is the SSA assay.  We had previously performed a similar analysis of the control of centrosome duplication by BRCA1 variant proteins [Kais et al., 2012]. Fewer variants of the BRCA1 protein were analyzed in this earlier study using the centrosome assay, but it has several differences from the HDR assay. With regard to those variants with inferred breast cancer association, the centrosome duplication assay had an intermediate result for the BRCA1–D67Y variant, which is nonpathogenic. The T37R variant was defective for both DNA repair assays, but was functional in control of the centrosome duplication. Five amino acid residues away, the I42V variant had the opposite pattern as T37R, with defective centrosome control but fully functional in both DNA repair assays. Experimentally, the centrosome regulation assay is much more difficult to perform than the HDR assay, making it not as desirable an assay for analysis of BRCA1 variants. In addition, the centrosome assay appears, based on the limited set of variants, to be less accurate than the HDR assay. On the contrary, like the SSA, none of the tested seven variants that were previously classified as Class 4 or 5, were functional in the centrosomal assay, suggesting that this assay is sensitive.  It will be necessary to analyze many more variants in the HDR assay and then compare those results with the clinical experiences before this assay can be used for clinical interpretation. On the basis of the accuracy of the currently tested variants, we believe that the HDR assay will help with difficult to classify variants of unknown significance.  Functional Assays for Probing BRCA1 Residues Important in Biological Function  Separate from the clinical utility of the different functional tests, important biological information about the BRCA1 protein is available from the various functional assays. Very little structure–function information exists for BRCA1, and there have been limited systematic analyses of the effects of BRCA1 amino acid variants in a given function. A variety of variants have been analyzed in the context of short BRCA1 amino-terminal truncations for ubiquitin ligase activity [Morris et al., 2006]. In a similar vein, a variety of variants in the context of a short BRCA1 carboxy-terminal fragment have been analyzed for the activation of transcription [Carvalho et al., 2007; Lee et al., 2010]. Several variants in the context of the full-length protein have been analyzed in terms of resistance to ionizing radiation [Ruffner et al., 2001] and reversal of a lethal phenotype in murine embryonic stem cells [Chang et al., 2009].  We find that there are some discordancies between functional assays of the variants. The most striking are at T37R and I42V. BRCA1–T37R was defective for both DNA repair processes, but was fully functional for control of centrosomes. Conversely, BRCA1–I42V was defective for control of centrosome duplication [Kais et al., 2012] but functional in the DNA repair processes. From this result, we hypothesize that the protein–BRCA1 contacts in the DNA repair pathways depend on the T37 residue, whereas a different protein–BRCA1 contact is important for regulating the centrosome duplication. Such a notion is possible because the centrosome regulation occurs in the cytoplasm and the DNA repair occurs in the nucleus, and it is reasonable to suppose that different proteins are involved.  There were variants that distinguished between BRCA1 residues important for DSB repair by homologous recombination versus SSA. The observed differences between the SSA and HDR assays involved residues from 90 to 191. Several of these (Y105C, P142H, and E143K) that had intermediate phenotype in the SSA assay had been shown to have slow accumulation at sites of DSBs. Especially, P142H mutation abolished the association with Ku80 protein, which plays an important role in the repair of DSBs [Wei et al., 2008]. Perhaps the SSA pathway contributes to the accumulation of BRCA1 at sites of DNA damage in cells.  In summary, in this study, we evaluated missense variants of BRCA1 in two different DNA repair pathways. Data support that the function of BRCA1 in the HDR assay is consistent with the known cancer association of these variants, and we suggest that this test is predictive for breast cancer. By contrast, the repair of DNA by the related SSA pathway is not perfectly consistent with what is known about cancer predisposition, and the SSA assay yields intermediate results. On the basis of these current results, we suggest that the HDR assay is validated for predicting whether substitution at any residue of BRCA1 is disease associated.  
2454||There have been few published analyses of the effects of missense mutations of the BRCA1 gene on BRCA1 protein function. In this study, we adapted a previously described homology directed recombination (HDR) assay to the analysis of the effects of BRCA1 point substitutions on its function in recombination. We established a HeLa-derived cell line, which has integrated in its genome a recombination substrate. Following transfection of a plasmid that expresses the endonuclease that creates a double-stranded break in the recombination substrate, HDR is readily scored by the percentage of GFP-positive cells. By combining RNAi specific for the cellular BRCA1 mRNA with expression of BRCA1 mutants resistant to the RNAi, we could effectively replace the endogenous BRCA1 protein with selected point mutants of BRCA1 and test these in the recombination assay. We found that both, the amino- and carboxy-terminal ~300 residues of BRCA1 were essential for directing HDR. Sixteen missense mutants from the amino terminus of BRCA1 were analyzed for function in HDR, and we found that several point mutants fully replaced the wild-type BRCA1 and are neutral in this process. Mutation of any single zinc-coordinating residue was fully defective in this assay. Several protein variants due to missense mutations, including methionine-18 to threonine and threonine-37 to arginine were also found to be defective for recombination. We have thus established a robust assay system for the analysis of the effects of specific missense mutations of BRCA1 in regulating the homologous recombination process.  Go to: Introduction The Breast Cancer associated gene 1 (BRCA1) is a tumor suppressor that is specifically associated with familial cases of breast cancer and ovarian cancer (1). In familial breast cancer, a woman may inherit a BRCA1 allele with a mutation, and during her lifetime there is a high likelihood that in at least one breast epithelial cell the second, non-mutated, allele of BRCA1 will be lost by deletion. Such a cell is hemizygous for BRCA1 and the one remaining allele has a mutation. If that mutation renders the BRCA1 defective for a key biological function, then that cell has increased likelihood of transforming into a breast tumor.  The BRCA1 gene has been sequenced from many individuals with a family history of breast cancer, and many of the characterized mutations result in a frame shift or a stop codon and truncate the encoded BRCA1 protein. Clearly, such truncating mutations predispose to breast cancer. Missense mutations, however, can present a diagnostic dilemma since specific point mutations have low prevalence in the population and the disease association is often unclear. Several genetic and evolutionary analyses can predict whether a given point mutation is likely to predispose to breast cancer, but the interpretation can be ambiguous (2–4).  Although there have been many studies assessing the functional implication of BRCA1 mutations, there has been no systematic functional studies that are designed for analysis of the full length protein or that assess a biological process such as homologous recombination. Several in vitro biochemical assays have tested the effects of point mutations in protein-protein interactions (5), in BRCA1-dependent ubiquitin ligase activity (6), and in the control of the centrosome (7). A tissue culture cell-based assay fuses 468 amino acids from the BRCA1 carboxy-terminus to a DNA-binding domain and analyzes the effect of the mutant on a transcription-based reporter assay (8). This latter assay has been very successful in assigning whether a missense mutation is associated with loss of transcription function, but the assay cannot evaluate BRCA1 sequences in the amino-terminal three-fourths of the protein, and the assay does not address non-transcription functions of BRCA1, such as regulation of DNA repair.  In this study, we have adapted the homologous recombination assay that BRCA1 regulates (9–11) to a robust method to analyze specific BRCA1 protein variants. The modified assay tests specific BRCA1 missense mutations in the homologous recombination process. We have characterized a set of point mutations in the amino terminus of BRCA1 in this assay as an initial step in determining whether a BRCA1 variant of unknown function may predispose to breast cancer.  Go to: Materials and Methods Plasmids, siRNA, and Cell Lines  The plasmid encoding the recombination substrate, pDR-GFP, and the I-SceI expression plasmid, cBAS, were both kindly provided by Drs. K. Nakanishi and M. Jasin (Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Center, NY, NY). BRCA1 expression plasmid, pcDNA-5’HA-BRCA1, has been previously described (12), and site-specific point mutations identified on the Breast Cancer Information Core (BIC) were generated using the Quick Change Kit from Stratagene. Details of the subcloning are available upon request. Plasmids for the expression of BRCA1 deletion mutants have been previously described (12, 13).  Sequences of the 3’-UTR of BRCA1 were targeted with siRNA oligonucleotides based on the sequence GCUCCUCUCACUCUUCAGU specific for nucleotides 80,780 to 80,798 of the BRCA1 gene (accession number AY273801). BRCA2 was targeted using siRNA based on the sequence UAAAUUUGGACAUAAGGAGUCCUCC. The control siRNA, called GL2, targets the luciferase gene (14).  A stable derivative of HeLa cells was established by transfection with pDR-GFP using standard procedures and selection in 1.5 µg/ml puromycin. Puromycin-resistant cells were cloned by limiting dilution in 96 well plates, and an initial screen selected those colonies that had no detectable GFP fluorescence. Remaining colonies were replica plated and transfected in parallel with cBAS to express the I-SceI. The untransfected stocks of those clones with intense fluorescence in a high percentage of cells were selected and re-cloned by limiting dilution. The number of integration sites in the final cell line, HeLa-DR13-9, was determined by digesting genomic DNA with XhoI and analyzing by Southern blotting.  Homology Directed Recombination Assay  On day 1, HeLa-DR13-9 cells, approximately 4.0 × 104 cells in a 1.5 cm well were transfected with 5 pmoles of BRCA1 siRNA targeting the 3’-UTR of BRCA1 gene and 0.3 µg of the appropriate BRCA1 expression plasmid in the presence of 0.5 µl of lipofectamine-2000 (Invitrogen). On day 2, the transfected cells were transferred to 3.5 cm well dishes. On day 3, the cells were transfected with 25 pmoles of the BRCA1 siRNA, 0.75 µg of the appropriate BRCA1 expression plasmid, plus 0.75 µg of cBAS in the presence of 2.5 µl of lipofectamine-2000. On day 6, cells were trypsinized and 10,000 cells from each well were counted by flow cytometry using a Becton Dickinson FACSCalibur instrument in the OSU Comprehensive Cancer Center Analytical Cytometry shared resource.  All point mutants of BRCA1 analyzed were tested in triplicate and the percentage of cells with recombined locus encoding GFP were normalized to the same percentage from the control siRNA transfected cells. In the figures, the averages are shown with the standard error of the mean depicted by error bars.  Immunoprecipitation analysis  HEK293T cells were transfected with the same BRCA1 variant expression constructs as used in the HDR assay. Whole cell lysates were harvested 2 days post transfection and subjected to immunoaffinity purification using the HA.11 anti-HA tag antibody (Covance) by standard procedures (12). Western blots were analyzed with anti-HA antibody and anti-BARD1 antibody H-300 (Santa Cruz) by standard methods.  Go to: Results Both the amino- and carboxy-termini of BRCA1 are required for BRCA1 regulation of homology directed recombination  We adapted an established assay (15) for homologous recombination in which two inactive alleles of green fluorescent protein (GFP) are integrated in a single locus in the genome of the cell. One allele contains the 18 bp recognition element for the I-SceI endonuclease. Transfection into the cells of a plasmid for expressing the I-SceI results in a double strand break in one GFP allele, and this break can be repaired by homology directed recombination (HDR) using the second inactive allele of GFP. (The plasmids encoding the recombination substrate and the I-SceI endonuclease were the gift of M. Jasin, Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center, NY, NY.) This repair results in gene conversion that creates a GFP allele that encodes an active protein, and the recombination can be detected by identifying green fluorescing cells. This plasmid and strategy (Figure 1A) has been successfully used in a variety of experiments in which a cell line carrying a mutant version of a protein under study has had this recombination substrate inserted in the cell and the effect of the specific protein was then evaluated (15–17). We instead inserted a copy of this recombination substrate into HeLa cells and carefully selected a clone, called HeLa-DR13-9, which has no background GFP fluorescence, but following transfection of the I-SceI expressing plasmid there is a high level of GFP-positive cells. In many repeated experiments, between 10% and 20% of the cells will undergo recombination following I-SceI expression. This cell line is then useful for the analysis of RNAi-depletion of proteins and testing for their effects in HDR.  Figure 1 Figure 1 The Homology-Directed Recombination Assay HeLa-DR13-9 cells were transfected with either a control siRNA or an siRNA specific to BRCA1. Two days later these cells were re-transfected with the appropriate siRNA plus the plasmid for expression of I-SceI, and three days later the percentage of GFP-positive cells was determined by flow-cytometry. The reduction in GFP-positive cells when BRCA1 is depleted is evident from inspection of the resultant monolayers (Figure 1B) and is quantified by flow cytometry (10,000 cells counted per sample). In the experiment for Figure 2, in the absence of transfected I-SceI expression plasmid, there are no GFP-positive cells (Figure 2, lane 1). In the presence of I-SceI and a control siRNA 16% of the cells were GFP-positive (lane 2). Depletion of BRCA1 or BRCA2 reduced the number of cells with recombined GFP-alleles by eight-fold or 40-fold, respectively. Similar reductions in HDR were observed with siRNAs targeting other BRCA1 and BRCA2 sequences, indicating that these results are not due to off-target effects of the siRNA (data not shown). Further, these results are consistent with published observations (9, 18). Importantly, when the siRNA targets the 3’-UTR of the BRCA1, expression of exogenous BRCA1 from a plasmid with a different 3’-UTR results in complete restoration of HDR activity (Figure 2, lane 4). This result suggests that we have a robust assay for determining the effects of specific BRCA1 mutations in the regulation of the homologous recombination process.  Figure 2 Figure 2 Depletion of BRCA1 protein decreases HDR activity We next assayed a series of synthetic BRCA1 deletion mutants for function in the HDR assay. In Figure 3A, the four deletion mutants are diagrammed. Using the same time course as in Figure 2, the endogenous BRCA1 protein was depleted by 3’-UTR-targeting siRNA, and the test BRCA1 protein was expressed from a co-transfected plasmid. Multiple repeat experiments were done, and in each experiment the maximal recombination varies from 10% to 20%, depending on transfection efficiency. Within an experiment the ratio of GFP-positive cells in the BRCA1 depleted sample relative to the control RNAi was consistently 8- to 10-fold reduced. We thus normalized data in each experiment, allowing us to average the results from multiple experiments. Replacing the endogenous BRCA1 with ΔN-BRCA1, which has deleted residues 1–302, results in a 4- to 5-fold reduction in homologous recombination. Expression of the ΔM1-BRCA1, which has deleted residues 305–770, reduced recombination by about 40%. Similarly, expression of the ΔM2-BRCA1, which has deleted residues 775–1292, resulted in a decrease in recombination by about 60%. Expression of the ΔC-BRCA1, which has deleted residues 1527–1863, resulted in a 10-fold loss of recombination. Clearly, the amino-terminus and carboxy-terminus each had a significant role in controlling the recombination reaction. Expression of the two internal domains had intermediate effects. In each case, the concentrations of BRCA1 protein expressed from the transfected plasmid were at or higher levels than the endogenous BRCA1 protein (Figure 3C), indicating that the reduction in HDR activity was not due to failure to express the test protein. Since the expression level of the ΔN, ΔM1, and ΔM2 mutants were significantly higher than the endogenous BRCA1 protein, it is possible that the magnitudes of the deficiencies in HDR activity with these BRCA1 deletion mutants were underestimated. We decided to focus on point mutations in the amino terminus.  Figure 3 Figure 3 The BRCA1 N- and C-termini are important in regulation of HDR activity Identification of BRCA1 point mutations that are critical for homologous recombination activity  We decided to test point mutations in the amino-terminal 71 amino acid residues of BRCA1 that were derived from individuals with a family history of breast cancer and identified from the BIC database. The reasons for using mutations identified in breast or ovarian cancer clinics were two-fold: first, this is the most direct way to identify candidate amino acid residues for critical function without performing saturating mutagenesis and testing a large number of variants; and second, the results of our functional tests might be useful in counseling such individuals who carry these mutations. Sixteen different variants were produced by site-directed mutagenesis of the BRCA1 cDNA-expressing plasmid. One of these variants, C27A, is a synthetic mutation and is not derived from a variant obtained from an individual with a family history with breast cancer. Rather, the C27A variant completes the set of eight different Zn-coordinating residues of BRCA1 in this analysis. The results of multiple experiments are shown in Figure 4. Consistent with our previous experiments, depletion of BRCA1 by transfection of siRNA targeting the 3’-UTR and co-transfection of the empty plasmid vector, resulted in a 10-fold reduction in GFP-positive cells relative to the control siRNA. Transfection of this BRCA1-specific siRNA along with the wild-type BRCA1 expression plasmid fully restored homology-directed recombination (Figure 4A, lane 3). Strikingly, transfection of each mutant either fully restored recombination to 100% or was fully negative, at the same level of homologous recombination as the vector-transfected control. We note that the deletion mutants used in Figure 3 produced recombination levels that had intermediate results: the ΔM1 and ΔM2 deletions caused partial decrements in homologous recombination. Even deleting the amino terminus, containing all of the residues being tested did not have as severe an effect on the HDR assay as did the point mutants. The expression levels of the point mutants of BRCA1 all were similar to the endogenous protein level (Figure 4B, compare lane 3 to all other lanes) whereas the ΔN deletion, which encompassed all of these point mutants, was significantly overexpressed relative to the endogenous protein and perhaps causing a partial masking of the HDR defect. Alternatively, it is a formal possibility that the point mutations in the BRCA1 protein have both a loss of function phenotype and a dominant negative phenotype.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Identification of BRCA1 missense mutations that affect homologous recombination Eight of the residues that were tested coordinate zinc ions in the RING domain: C24R, C27A, C39Y, H41R, C44F, C47G, C61G, and C64G. It is anticipated that substitution of any of these amino acid residues would have major structural consequences to the protein. Consistent with that concept, replacement of the endogenous BRCA1 with any of these BRCA1 molecules with mutated zinc-coordinating residues was non-functional in HDR (Figure 4A, lanes 6, 7, 10, 11, 13, 14, 16, 17).  Eight other substitution mutants were tested for function in the homologous recombination pathway. The M18T and T37R variants did not complement the HDR assay. Variants that could complement the HDR activity were I21V, I31M, I42V, L52, D67Y, and R71G.  We tested whether the mutant BRCA1 proteins used in this study could bind to BARD1 (Figure 5). We transfected the HA-epitope tagged BRCA1 into HEK293T cells and purified proteins in complex with the variant BRCA1 protein by immunoaffinity purification (IP) using antibody recognizing the HA-tag. Purified proteins were analyzed by immunoblots specific for the HA-epitope to evaluate the effectiveness of expression and purification of the mutant BRCA1 protein and specific for the endogenous BARD1 protein. We found that BRCA1 variant proteins I21V, I31M, I42V, L52F, D67Y, and R71G effectively purified cellular BARD1 protein. These are the same proteins that functioned in homologous recombination. Of note, the BRCA1 variant proteins M18T and H41R had detectable low level of BARD1 binding, but these BRCA1 variants did not complement the HDR assay.  Figure 5 Figure 5 Effect of BRCA1 missense variants on association with BARD1 Correlation of biological function with available clinical data for each BRCA1 missense mutant  We have summarized the available information for each mutant in Table 1, including results of HDR function and BARD1 binding (this study), E3 ubiquitin ligase activity and resistance to ionizing radiation (6), and available clinical information. For many of these variants family history was unavailable, and this limited the analysis we could do. Examples of available family data are supplied in Supplemental Table 1. We applied an algorithm called VUS Predict (19) to the 16 variants. VUS Predict calculates the odds of a variant being detrimental based on a variety of characteristics of tumors including estrogen receptor, progesterone receptor, and Her2 status, tumor grade, histopathology, age of onset, and the position of the amino acid residue in a functional domain or evolutionary conserved sequence. If there were no clinical data, then the VUS Predict output was based on the single criterion of evolutionary conservation (asterisked values in Table 1).  Table 1 Table 1 Summary of biological functions of BRCA1 proteins in the context of available clinical information for each variant. Of the 16 BRCA1 variants in this study, four of the eight Zn-coordinating residues have been classified as deleterious when mutant (Table 1). One other variant, R71G, has been classified as deleterious (2, 20), and one, D67Y, had been classified as neutral (4). One of the substitution mutants, M18T, has a published odds ratio of being deleterious of 31:1 (4). Using VUS Predict, the M18T mutant has 170.8:1 odds of being deleterious. While these analyses clearly indicate the M18T variant has a trend as a deleterious allele, the magnitude of the ratio did not exceed the threshold of 1000:1 for making a clinical classification. We find that this mutation of BRCA1 causes a complete loss of HDR activity. Though this substitution, when expressed in a truncated BRCA1 peptide in the absence of the BARD1 did have ubiquitin ligase enzymatic activity, it was defective in protection of a cell against ionizing radiation (6). In another study using the BRCA1/BARD1 heterodimer, the M18T variant was inactive as a ubiquitin ligase (21). The M18T substitution could affect the BRCA1-BARD1 heterodimerization interface (22), resulting in reduced BARD1 association with the BRCA1 variant (Figure 5). Our results in the HDR assay are consistent with this substitution being deleterious.  Genetic analysis of one of these mutants, D67Y, has suggested that it is neutral with regard to cancer predisposition (4), and consistent with that notion it has the same phenotype as does wild-type BRCA1 in the HDR assay. Though the R71G substitution is considered cancer-promoting, the mutation is thought to affect the splicing of the mRNA (20), such a feature would be missed when expressing a cDNA as in this experiment. Mutant BRCA1(R71G) protein functioned in the HDR at similar levels as did wild-type BRCA1.  Among the remaining five variants of unknown clinical consequence, the T37R variant was defective in HDR (Figure 4A, lane 9). In new research published while this study was being written has indicated that the similar T37K variant is likely to be deleterious based on clinical and evolutionary analysis (3). The T37R substitution was also found to defective in providing ionizing radiation resistance (6), consistent with our HDR results. Taken together, the threonine-37 residue is likely critical to the homologous recombination process, and consequently to radio-resistance. The threonine-37 side chain is solvent exposed, but in a small cavity near the BRCA1-BARD1 heterodimerization interface (22). Perhaps the bulky lysine or arginine substitutions result in disruption of BRCA1-BARD1 binding, or alternatively another protein important to HDR binds to this pocket.  Go to: Discussion This study establishes a new assay for evaluating the function of BRCA1 protein variants. Critical components include the HeLa-derived cell line containing an integrated recombination substrate that is readily scored using flow cytometry. The very low background fluorescence in this cell, combined with the very high response to I-SceI expression, make this cell line ideal for analyzing the homologous recombination process. Since HeLa cells are readily transfected, we routinely obtain greater than 70% of the cells transfected in a monolayer (data not shown), this cell line is ideal for silencing a given gene by RNAi and re-expressing the gene via an RNAi-resistant plasmid expression vector. Though BRCA1 is associated with breast and ovarian cancers, this function for BRCA1 has been found in all cell types, and is thus valid to study in the HeLa cell line. While not high-throughput, the assay is relatively quick once the mutant plasmids are prepared. Several variants can be analyzed simultaneously in a one week experiment. We plan to expand this analysis to a number of variants in the amino- and carboxy-termini of the BRCA1 protein. This continuing effort will greatly expand the analysis of the functional consequences of missense mutations in BRCA1 function.  When a BRCA1 variant protein is defective in the homologous recombination process, is it cancer associated? So far, the results indicate a strong correlation with this HDR assay and cancer predisposition, but the analysis of more mutants will be important to determine whether there is an association. Conversely, are BRCA1 variants that have full HDR activity neutral mutations? The R71G variant has full HDR activity, but it is certainly cancer-associated but via splicing (20), a mechanism that would not be identified in this assay using fully spliced cDNAs. Thus, we already have one example indicating that the converse is not true. In addition, we are developing a similar assay for centrosome control by BRCA1 variants, and initial results suggest that some of these variants do indeed function differently in the two assays (Z. Kais, JDP, unpublished observations).  Combining the functional analysis described in this study with genetic and clinical analysis of point mutants (3, 4) will undoubtedly be important for counseling women who carry missense mutations of BRCA1. As the data become more complete, such results will likely become an excellent resource for guiding clinical decisions.  Germline mutations of the breast cancer 1 (BRCA1) gene are a major cause of familial breast and ovarian cancer. The BRCA1 protein displays E3 ubiquitin ligase activity, and this enzymatic function is thought to be required for tumor suppression. To test this hypothesis, we generated mice that express an enzymatically defective Brca1. We found that this mutant Brca1 prevents tumor formation to the same degree as does wild-type Brca1 in three different genetically engineered mouse (GEM) models of cancer. In contrast, a mutation that ablates phosphoprotein recognition by the BRCA C terminus (BRCT) domains of BRCA1 elicits tumors in each of the three GEM models. Thus, BRCT phosphoprotein recognition, but not the E3 ligase activity, is required for BRCA1 tumor suppression.  Germline mutations of the breast cancer 1 (BRCA1) tumor suppressor are a common cause of hereditary breast and ovarian cancer. The BRCA1 protein harbors an N-terminal RING motif characteristic of many ubiquitin E3 ligases and two BRCA C terminus (BRCT) motifs that form a phosphoprotein recognition domain (1-4). BRCA1 interacts with BRCA1-associated RING domain protein 1 (BARD1) to form a potent E3 ligase (5, 6) that is thought to regulate multiple pathways, including those responsible for tumor suppression (1-4). To test whether the E3 ligase activity of BRCA1 is essential for tumor suppression, we examined mice that express Brca1FH-I26A, an enzymatically defective protein with a missense mutation (I26A) in the RING domain that allows assembly of the BRCA1/BARD1 heterodimer but abrogates its E3 ligase activity (7, 8). (Single-letter abbreviations for the amino acid residues are as follows: A, Ala; C, Cys; D, Asp; E, Glu; F, Phe; G, Gly; H, His; I, Ile; K, Lys; L, Leu; M, Met; N, Asn; P, Pro; Q, Gln; R, Arg; S, Ser; T, Thr; V, Val; W, Trp; and Y, Tyr. In the mutants, other amino acids were substituted at certain locations; for example, I26A indicates that isoleucine at position 26 was replaced by alanine.) Brca1FH-I26A/+ and Brca1FH-WT/+ mice were generated from isogenic embryonic stem (ES) cells that express either Brca1FH-I26A or the corresponding wild-type Brca1FH-WT protein (9) and bred to homozygosity. Brca1FH-I26A/FH-I26A pups were born at the expected Mendelian ratio and survived to adulthood. Because Brca1-null mice invariably undergo embryonic lethality (10, 11), the viability of Brca1FH-I26A/FH-I26A mice indicates that E3 ligase activity is not essential for all BRCA1 functions. Nonetheless, Brca1FH-I26A/FH-I26A, but not Brca1FH-WT/FH-WT, males are sterile and have smaller testes, and their seminiferous tubules lack elongated spermatids and spermatozoa (fig. S1), which suggests a block in spermatogenesis. Apart from male sterility and a modest decrease in adult body weight (5 to 10%), Brca1FH-I26A/FH-I26A mice appear indistinguishable from their Brca1FH-WT/FH-WT littermates. Moreover, analyses of Brca1FH-I26A/FH-I26A mouse embryonic fibroblasts (MEFs) revealed that the I26A mutation had no measurable effect on cellular proliferation, chromosomal stability, senescence induction, centrosome number, spindle formation, resistance to genotoxic stress, or ubiquitin foci formation at sites of DNA damage—unlike the hypomorphic Brca1 lesions in MEFs of Brca1tr/tr (12) and Brca1Δ11/Δ11 mice (13), which are known to disrupt tumor suppression (fig. S2).  To evaluate whether the E3 ligase activity affects tumor suppression, we initially used a mouse model of pancreatic cancer in which the Pdx1-cre transgene triggers KrasG12D and p53R172H expression in pancreatic progenitor cells (14). To test whether Brca1 suppresses formation of these tumors, we generated Pdx1-cre animals carrying KrasLSL-G12D (14) together with conditional-null Brca1flex2 (15) and/or p53flex7 (16) alleles. Although double-mutant KrasLSL-G12D/p53flex7/flex7/Pdx1-cre mice succumbed to pancreatic tumors with an average latency (T50) of 68 days, tumor latency was dramatically reduced in triple-mutant animals (KrasLSL-G12D/p53flex7/flex7/Brca1flex2/flex2/Pdx1-cre) with conditional-null Brca1flex2 (T50 = 40 days; P < 0.0001), indicating that wild-type Brca1 suppresses pancreatic tumor development (Fig. 1A). In contrast, triple-mutant animals (KrasLSL-G12D/p53flex7/flex7/Brca1flex2/FH-I26A/Pdx1-cre) expressing Brca1FH-I26A developed pancreatic tumors with a similar latency (T50 = 65 days) as that of double-mutant KrasLSL-G12D/p53flex7/flex7/Pdx1-cre mice (T50 = 68 days; P = 0.2595) (Fig. 1A). Thus, the tumor suppression potential of enzymatically inactive Brca1 in the pancreas is indistinguishable from that of wild-type Brca1.  Fig. 1 Fig. 1 The enzymatic activity of Brca1 is dispensable for tumor suppression. (A) Kaplan-Meier tumor-free survival curves of KrasLSL-G12D/p53flex7/flex7/Pdx1-cre (KPC-Brca1+/+; black curve; T50 = 68 days) mice compared with KrasLSL-G12D/p53flex7/flex7/Pdx1-cre/Brca1 ... We next applied a mouse model of familial breast cancer in which the Wapcre gene elicits mammary-specific inactivation of the conditional-null Brca1flex2 allele (15). However, unlike Brca1flex2/flex2/Wapcre/+ females, which form tumors resembling the basal-like breast carcinomas of human BRCA1 mutation carriers (15), all mice expressing enzymatically inactive Brca1 (Brca1flex2/FH-I26A/Wapcre/+) remained tumor-free over the 24-month observation period (Fig. 1B).  We also monitored three cohorts of Wapcre/+ mice sensitized for tumor development by a conditional p53 mutation (p53LSL-R270H). Whereas mammary tumors developed in control p53LSL-R270H/+/Wapcre/+ females with an average latency of 380 days, which is consistent with previous studies (17), tumor formation was accelerated (T50 = 308 days) by conditional Brca1 inactivation in Brca1flex2/flex2/p53LSL-R270H/+/Wapcre/+ females (P < 0.0001) (Fig. 1C). The kinetics of tumor development in Brca1flex2/FH-I26A/p53LSL-R270H/+/Wapcre/+ females was indistinguishable from that of control p53LSL-R270H/+/Wapcre/+ females (P = 0.7502) and significantly slower than that of Brca1flex2/flex2/p53LSL-R270H/+/Wapcre/+ females (P < 0.0001) (Fig. 1C). Moreover, representative oligonucleotide microarray analysis (18) revealed a “simplex” pattern of genomic copy number variation in Brca1flex2/FH-I26A/p53flex7/flex7/Wapcre/+ tumors, similar to that of p53flex7/flex7/Wapcre/+ tumors but distinct from the “complex sawtooth” pattern of Brca1flex2/flex2/p53flex7/flex7/Wapcre/+ tumors (fig. S3). Thus, mammary-specific loss of Brca1 enzymatic activity does not promote basal-like breast carcinoma in a manner analogous to complete Brca1 inactivation.  Although mice lacking Brca1 enzymatic activity (Brca1FH-I26A/FH-I26A and Brca1FH-I26A/−) are viable, some (18.6%) died of tumors at a very advanced age (Fig. 1D). However, the frequency and kinetics of spontaneous tumor formation in the mutant mice were comparable with those of Brca1FH-WT/FH-WT control animals (P = 0.5197) and significantly lower than those of Brca1tr/tr mice (P < 0.0001) (12). Thus, the E3 ligase activity of BRCA1 is dispensable for tumor suppression in each of the three GEM cancer models.  The BRCT motifs of BRCA1 form a phospho-recognition domain that preferentially binds the phosphorylated isoforms of repair proteins Abraxas/CCDC98, BACH1/FancJ, and CtIP (1, 2). Because most tumor-associated BRCA1 alleles have frameshift/nonsense mutations that eliminate one or both BRCT motifs, BRCT phospho-recognition may be critical for tumor suppression. Indeed, in some families breast cancer susceptibility can be ascribed to missense mutations that cause a single amino acid substitution (for example, S1655F) that disrupts the interaction between the BRCT domain and its cognate phospho-ligands. Structural studies show that BRCA1 residue S1655 donates a hydrogen bond to the phosphate group of these phospho-ligands, and that mutation of this residue disrupts their interaction with BRCA1 (19-23). To determine whether BRCT phospho-recognition is required for genome stability and tumor suppression, we mutated the corresponding mouse residue (S1598F) to generate heterozygous (Brca1S1598F/+) and homozygous (Brca1S1598F/S1598F) ES clones (fig. S4). The Brca1S1598F/+ ES cells were injected into blastocysts to derive germline chimeras, and heterozygous animals were then intercrossed to produce homozygous Brca1S1598F/S1598F offspring, which appeared at the expected Mendelian ratio. Apart from male sterility, these mice developed normally and provided a source of Brca1S1598F/S1598F MEFs.  The mutant Brca1 protein of Brca1S1598F/S1598F MEFs is expressed at normal levels and fails to bind Bach1/FancJ (Fig. 2A). Brca1S1598F/S1598F ES cells are hypersensitive to genotoxic stress (Fig. 2B) and defective for homology-directed DNA repair (Fig. 2C). In addition, Brca1S1598F/S1598F MEFs display proliferation defects, chromosomal instability, centrosome amplification, and diminished recruitment of repair proteins to sites of DNA damage (figs. S5 and S6). Thus, the S1598F mutation disrupts BRCA1 function in the DNA damage response. To evaluate its effect on tumor suppression, we monitored an experimental cohort of Brca1flex2/S1598F/p53LSL-R270H/+/Wapcre/+ females and control cohorts of the p53LSL-R270H/+/Wapcre/+, Brca1flex2/flex2/Wapcre/+, and Brca1flex2/flex2/p53LSL-R270H/+/Wapcre/+ females described above (Fig. 1, B and C). As shown in Fig. 3A, mammary tumorigenesis was accelerated in experimental Brca1flex2/S1598F/p53LSL-R270H/+/Wapcre/+ mice (T50 = 308 days) relative to p53LSL-R270H/+/Wapcre/+ animals (T50 = 380 days; P < 0.0001), and the shortened latency was indistinguishable from that of Brca1flex2/flex2/p53LSL-R270H/+/Wapcre/+ animals (T50 = 309 days; P = 0.4543). Thus, the S1598F mutation impairs mammary tumor suppression to a comparable degree as does complete Brca1 inactivation. Pancreatic tumor formation in mice expressing Brca1S1598F (KrasLSL-G12D/p53flex7/flex7/Brca1flex2/S1598F/Pdx1-cre; T50 = 45 days) was also accelerated relative to those expressing wild-type Brca1 (KrasLSL-G12D/p53flex7/flex7/Pdx1-cre mice; T50 = 68 days; P < 0.0001) (Fig. 3B) and comparable with conditional-null Brca1 mice (KrasLSL-G12D/p53flex7/flex7/Brca1flex2/flex2/Pdx1-cre) (T50 = 40 days; P = 0.2632). Furthermore, homozygous Brca1S1598F/S1598F mice were highly tumor-prone (49 out of 72; 68.1%) relative to control animals (P < 0.0001) (Fig. 3C). Thus, BRCT phospho-recognition is critical for BRCA1-mediated tumor suppression in all three GEM cancer models.  Fig. 2 Fig. 2 The BRCT phospho-recognition property of Brca1 is critical for the DNA damage response. (A) S1598F ablates the interaction between Bach1/FancJ and endogenous Brca1. MEFs were prepared from mice with a knock-in allele (Bach1WT-FH) encoding wild-type Bach1 ... Fig. 3 Fig. 3 BRCT phospho-recognition is essential for Brca1 tumor suppression. (A) Kaplan-Meier tumor-free survival curves of p53LSL-R270H/+/Wapcre/+ (PC-Brca1+/+; black curve; T50 = 380 days) females compared with Brca1flex2/flex2/p53LSL-R270H/+/Wapcre/+ (PC-Brca1 ... BRCA1 is thought to regulate diverse cellular processes by ubiquitinating multiple protein substrates (1-4). Indeed, on the basis of the same mutation (I26A) used here the E3 ligase activity has been implicated in BRCA1 control of centrosome duplication (24), checkpoint activation (25), mitotic spindle assembly (26), and tumor cell motility (27). In light of these observations, the viability of mice lacking BRCA1 enzymatic activity was unexpected. Because mice homozygous for null Brca1 mutations undergo embryonic lethality (10, 11), our results suggest that the E3 ligase activity of BRCA1 is dispensable for much of normal development. Thus, many of the known and unknown functions of BRCA1 may be mediated independent of its ability to catalyze ubiquitination.  From a medical standpoint, the key function of BRCA1 is its ability to suppress tumor formation in breast and ovarian tissues. Like BRCA1, many other oncoproteins and tumor suppressors possess enzymatic activity. In most cases, the enzymatic function has proven to be integral to the oncogenic process, and in some cases it can be targeted for therapeutic gain, as illustrated by the clinical success of certain tyrosine kinase inhibitors. However, because enzymatically inert Brca1 is sufficient to suppress tumor formation in several settings (Fig. 1), including a model of human basal-like breast cancer, the E3 ligase activity of BRCA1 appears to be dispensable for tumor suppression.  A role for the E3 ligase activity in BRCA1 tumor suppression was predicated partly on the fact that this activity is ablated by certain tumor-associated lesions of the RING domain, such as the C61G and C64G missense mutations (6). However, these mutations also disrupt the interaction between BRCA1 and its partner protein BARD1 (5). Because mammary-specific inactivation of either Brca1 or Bard1 elicits breast tumors with the same basal-like phenotype (15), the tumor suppression activity of BRCA1 is probably mediated by the BRCA1/BARD1 heterodimer. Unlike the tumorigenic C61G and C64G mutations, the synthetic I26A mutation used in this study specifically ablates the enzymatic activity of BRCA1 but allows proper assembly of the BRCA1/BARD1 heterodimer (7). Thus, the tumorigenic RING mutations are likely to compromise BRCA1-mediated tumor suppression primarily by impairing BRCA1/BARD1 heterodimerization.  The mouse model of hereditary breast cancer has provided meaningful insights into the molecular mechanisms of BRCA1-mediated tumor suppression. First, the identical pattern of breast carcinogenesis in conditional Brca1-, Bard1-, and Brca1/Bard1-null mice implies that tumor suppression is dependent on the BRCA1/BARD1 heterodimer (15). Second, as shown here tumor suppression does not require the E3 ligase activity of BRCA1/BARD1. Third, our data also suggest that the ability of the BRCT domain to bind its phospho-ligands is critical for BRCA1 tumor suppression. In light of this result, it is noteworthy that BRCA1/BARD1 forms distinct protein complexes (A, B, and C) based on BRCT-mediated interactions with three different repair proteins (Abraxas/CCDC98, BACH1/FancJ, and CtIP) (1, 2). Because tumor suppression appears to be dependent on BRCA1 association with one or more of these BRCT phospho-ligands (and/or others yet to be discovered), these interactions may provide valuable targets for therapeutic intervention.  Missense substitutions of uncertain clinical significance in the BRCA1 gene are a vexing problem in genetic counseling for women who have a family history of breast cancer. In this study, we evaluated the functions of 29 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in two DNA repair pathways. Repair of double-strand breaks by homology-directed recombination (HDR) had been previously analyzed for 16 of these BRCA1 variants, and 13 more variants were analyzed in this study. All 29 variants were also analyzed for function in double-strand break repair by the single-strand annealing (SSA) pathway. We found that among the pathogenic mutations in BRCA1, all were defective for DNA repair by either pathway. The HDR assay was accurate because all pathogenic mutants were defective for HDR, and all nonpathogenic variants were fully functional for HDR. Repair by SSA accurately identified pathogenic mutants, but several nonpathogenic variants were scored as defective or partially defective. These results indicated that specific amino acid residues of the BRCA1 protein have different effects in the two related DNA repair pathways, and these results validate the HDR assay as highly correlative with BRCA1-associated breast cancer.  Keywords: BRCA1, homologous recombination, single-strand annealing, centrosome, VUS Go to: Introduction Among the more than 70,000 women who had their BRCA1 gene (MIM# 113705) sequenced by 2006, approximately 2.3% were found to carry a BRCA1 variant of uncertain significance (VUS). These variants were classified as uncertain because they occurred in families wherein segregation analysis had not been done or in whom the segregation analysis was not informative and thus the VUS had unknown effects on breast and ovarian cancer risk [Hall et al., 2009; Spearman et al., 2008; Sweet et al., 2009]. As whole genome and exome sequencing becomes a more prevalent practice, more VUSs in BRCA1 will be uncovered, and increasingly women will face the quandary of an uninformative genetic test. This leads to individuals with a VUS test result making decisions about cancer screening and prevention without concrete information on which to base their decisions. Women who have an indeterminate BRCA1 sequence result and a family history of breast cancer have a high level of distress, and there are no consistent clinical guidelines for advising them [Dorval et al., 2005; Petrucelli et al., 2002; van Dijk et al., 2006]. Of the 567 BRCA1 missense substitutions listed in the current Breast Cancer Information Core (BIC) database, 14 are described as pathogenic (Class 5) and 27 as nonpathogenic (Class 1). By including the data from Collaborators for the Investigation of Modifiers of BRCA1/2 (CIMBA), a total of 24 BRCA1 variants are pathogenic (CIMBA database). Less than 10% of the missense substitutions in the BIC database have known cancer predisposition. In the absence of definitive genetic information on BRCA1 missense substitutions, other methods are needed to determine whether missense substitutions are pathogenic. Multifactorial approaches have augmented genetic segregation analysis with additional information about the proband and, in some cases, the tumor [Easton et al., 2007; Goldgar et al., 2004; Lindor et al., 2012; Plon et al., 2008; Spearman et al., 2008; Sweet et al., 2009]. These approaches have been successful in reclassification of variants but are also incomplete because they cannot definitively determine whether any given variant affects the critical cancer suppressing function(s) of the protein [Millot et al., 2012]. In contrast, a biological functional assay has the potential to determine whether any given BRCA1 missense substitution is defective in a process, and if that function is predictive of cancer predisposition (i.e., 100% sensitive and 100% specific), then the functional assay can, in theory, be used in genetic counseling.  A variety of biological assays have been analyzed for BRCA1 function and have been correlated with cancer predisposition to various extents [Carvalho et al., 2007; Cotta-Ramusino et al., 2011; Kais et al., 2012; Lee et al., 2010; Millot et al., 2012; Morris et al., 2006; Ransburgh et al., 2010; Vallee et al., 2012]. Several of these assays test single domains of BRCA1, and several address the variant within the context of the full-length protein. In this study, we analyzed the effects of 29 missense substitutions in BRCA1 on the repair of double-strand DNA breaks (DSBs) by homologous recombination and by the single-strand annealing (SSA) pathways. Our results indicate that the effects of specific missense mutations in these pathways strongly correlate with breast cancer predisposition. Further, we find that specific amino acid substitutions affect the two double-strand break repair pathways differentially.  Go to: Materials and Methods Plasmids and Cell Lines  All plasmids for the expression of human BRCA1 with missense substitutions were generated by site-directed mutagenesis from the wild-type sequence (GenBank: U14680.1). Several of these plasmids had been described in previous publications [Ransburgh et al., 2010; Wei et al., 2008]. The cell line for the homologous recombination assay, HeLa-DR, was based on the genomic integration of a specific vector that functions as a recombination substrate [Pierce et al., 2001]. The vector for homologous recombination had been the gift of M. Jasin (Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Institute, New York, NY). The HeLa-DR had been described before [Parvin et al., 2011; Ransburgh et al., 2010]. The repair of double-strand breaks by the SSA pathway was based on a vector kindly provided by J. Stark (City of Hope, Duarte, CA) [Bennardo et al., 2008; Stark et al., 2004] stably integrated into HeLa cells to make the HeLa–SSA cell line. The siRNA targeting the cellular BRCA1 3′ untranslated region (UTR) is the same as previously used [Ransburgh et al., 2010].  SSA Assay  HeLa–SSA cells were seeded in 15.6-mm-diameter wells in 24-well plates, and when cells were 50% confluent, cells were transfected with 5 pmol of the siRNA targeting the BRCA1 3′-UTR plus 0.3 μg of the BRCA1 expression plasmid in Lipofectamine 2000 reagent (Life Technologies, Grand Island, NY). At 24 hr after transfection, cells were transferred to 35-mm-diameter wells in six-well plates. At 48 hr, cells were transfected with 25 pmol of the BRCA1 3′-UTR-specific siRNA plus 0.75 μg BRCA1 expression plasmid plus 0.75 μg pCBASce (for the expression of I-SceI) in Lipofectamine 2000 reagent. After 3 days, cells are harvested by trypsinization, and the fraction of GFP-positive cells is determined using a FACScalibur flow cytometer (BD Biosciences, San Jose, CA) (Analytic Cytometry Shared Resource of The Ohio State University Comprehensive Cancer Center).  Western Blot Analysis of BRCA1 Protein  Immunoblots of the expressed BRCA1 protein were done as has been described previously [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Cells that had been transfected as in the SSA assay were, in parallel, extracted in 0.1% NP-40, 0.05 M Hepes (pH 7.5), and 0.005 M EDTA. Protein contents of extracts were determined using the Bradford reagent; and 50 μg of protein was electrophoresed on 3–8% Nu-PAGE gels (Life Technologies, Grand Island, NY) M. Jasin (Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Institute, NewYork, NY), transferred to polyvinylidene fluoride membranes, and immunoblotted using antibody specific to BRCA1(400–1,100). Densitometry analysis was performed from immunoblots using Kodak 1D software (Eastman Kodak Company, Rochester, NY).  Statistical Analysis of Results  The raw results in the SSA assay for the missense substitutions were compared with the control samples (either GL2 siRNA or BRCA1 siRNA with BRCA1-wt add back) using the unpaired Student’s t-test and obtained the one-tail P values; for intermediate-phenotype mutants, besides the above-mentioned comparisons, we also conducted the unpaired Student’s t-test against the control sample that contains BRCA1 siRNA with empty vector adding back, and obtained the one-tail P values. P values of less than 0.01 were considered significant.  Go to: Results Function of BRCA1 Variants in DNA Break Repair by Homologous Recombination  The BRCA1 protein has been shown to be a critical component of the response to DSBs. Cellular machinery can utilize homologous sequences to accurately repair the DSB, or the free ends can be joined by nonhomologous end joining. In addition to homologous recombination, the pathway of SSA exists by which the repair proteins resect DNA from the free ends of the DSB, and when short stretches of homologous sequence are exposed, then the DNA ends are rejoined [Stark et al., 2004]. The homologous recombination assay used in this study was based on a method developed by the Jasin laboratory in which a single integrated genomic locus contains two inactive GFP genes, and one of these contains the endonuclease cleavage site for the rare-cutting I-SceI enzyme [Pierce et al., 2001]. Upon expression of I-SceI in the cell, one inactive allele of GFP is cut, and if homologous recombination occurs using the second inactive GFP gene as the homology template, then the DNA repair results in gene conversion making the GFP gene become active (Fig. 1A). The SSA assay is based on an analogous strategy in which the GFP protein is not expressed because of intervening DNA sequence, with an I-SceI site at the 3′ end of the intervening DNA. Upon expression of the I-SceI endonuclease, the DSB is generated, and resection of the intervening sequence reveals homologous GFP sequences that are aligned and repaired [Stark et al., 2004] (Fig. 1B). These two processes depend on sequence homologies for the repair, but there are functional differences. The Rad51 and BRCA2 proteins are required for the homology-directed recombination (HDR) assay, but are not required for the SSA assay [Moynahan et al., 2001; Stark et al., 2004].  Figure 1 Figure 1 The double-strand DNA break (DSB) repair assay system. A: The HDR recombination substrate [Pierce et al. 2001] is diagrammed. The upstream GFP allele is defective because of the inclusion of an I-SceI site in its sequence. The downstream GFP allele is ... For each assay, we have established HeLa-derived cell lines with the published recombination substrate [Pierce et al., 2001; Stark et al., 2004] integrated in the genome at a single site. The HeLa-DR cell line assays HDR, and the HeLa–SSA cell line is used to assay SSA. The HDR and the SSA assays have a similar experimental design with a depletion of BRCA1 by transfection of a siRNA that is specific for the 3′-UTR of the BRCA1 mRNA. We cotransfect a BRCA1 expression plasmid that is not affected by the siRNA and which expresses the variant BRCA1 protein. After 2 days, we repeat the transfection and also transfect a plasmid that encodes the expression of the I-SceI endonuclease to generate the DSB in the presence of the variant BRCA1. After 3 days, we assay the cells for GFP expression by flow cytometry. The timeline of the experiment is shown in Figure 1C.  We have previously analyzed 16 variants of BRCA1 in a tissue-culture-cell-based assay for repair of DSBs via homologous recombination [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Using the HeLa-DR cell line developed by us, up to 20% of the cells convert to GFP positive. This high level of recombination enables the quantitative analysis of variants in BRCA1 in this process. The endogenous BRCA1 mRNA is depleted by siRNA targeting the 3′-UTR, and a BRCA1 variant that is resistant to the siRNA is simultaneously expressed from a plasmid [Parvin et al., 2011; Ransburgh, et al., 2010]. A quantitative measure of the function of the BRCA1 variant is determined from the percentage of cells that convert to GFP positive.  In this study, we first analyzed an additional 13 BRCA1 variants for function in HDR (Fig. 2). Twelve of the BRCA1 variants spanned amino acid residue 90 through 191 and were identified from the Breast Information Core (http://research.nhgri.nih.gov/bic/). These were expressed from the plasmid as full-length proteins. All 12 variants are listed in the BIC as having unknown phenotype with regard to predisposition to breast cancer. Several of these have been evaluated using a multifactorial classification system, and of these 12 variants, seven were nonpathogenic [Lindor et al., 2012]. These were chosen because the function of this domain was unknown and because many of these variants have been reported to be nonpathogenic. By testing the known nonpathogenic variants in this assay, we provide a specificity control for the functional test. The 13th variant tested is a known deleterious mutant in the carboxy terminus of the BRCA1 protein, M1775R. In these experiments, the percentage of cells that were GFP positive when transfected with the control siRNA and the control plasmid were set equal to 1%. All other results were normalized to this control, and all results were from three or more separate experiments. Depletion of BRCA1 and transfection with empty plasmid resulted in a value of 0.09 relative to the control (Fig. 2, lane 2). Thus, BRCA1 depletion has an over 10-fold effect reducing the level of homologous recombination. Depleting BRCA1 and transfecting a plasmid that expressed wild-type BRCA1 resulted in full restoration of homologous recombination (Fig. 2, lane 3). Among the variants with substitutions in residues from 90 to 191, all 12 functioned as wild type in the homologous recombination assay (Fig. 2, lanes 4–15) (P < 0.002 compared with depleted BRCA1). By contrast, the 13th tested missense substitution, a known pathogenic mutant BRCA1–M1775R, did not complement the depletion of BRCA1 in this assay (Fig. 2, lane 16) (Pv = 0.0014 compared with wild-type BRCA1).  Figure 2 Figure 2 Analysis of 13 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in the homology-directed repair assay. HeLa-DR cells were transfected with a siRNA that depleted the endogenous BRCA1 and with a plasmid that expressed the indicated BRCA1 variant. After generating a double-strand ... Function of 29 Variants of BRCA1 in the Repair of DNA Breaks by the SSA Pathway  The 16 BRCA1 variants that had previously been tested for function in homologous recombination [Ransburgh et al., 2010] and the 13 BRCA1 variants tested in this study (Fig. 2) were analyzed for function in SSA repair. The recombination substrate [Bennardo et al., 2008; Stark et al., 2004] was based on similar design as the homologous recombination substrate with the exception that restoration of GFP activity occurs when the two inactive GFP genes are repaired by SSA. HeLa cells were stably transfected with the SA–GFP construct, and a clone was selected that had no detectable background GFP signal. Upon transfection of the I-SceI-expressing plasmid, about 5–7% of cells became GFP positive, indicative of a functioning SSA pathway. Depletion of BRCA1 resulted in a decrease to about 1–2% GFP-positive cells (Fig. 3, lane 2), indicating a role for BRCA1 in the SSA repair pathway that had been previously observed [Stark et al., 2004]. Depletion of BRCA1 resulted in about 25% of the activity found in nondepleted cells. As had been observed with the homologous recombination assay, transfection of a plasmid expressing wild-type BRCA1 fully complemented the defect in SSA due to depletion of the endogenous BRCA1 (Fig. 3, lane 3). By contrast, depletion of endogenous BRCA1 and expression of a known pathogenic mutant of BRCA1, M1775R, was as defective in SSA as had been transfection of the empty vector (Fig. 3, lane 32). Similar to previous observations with the zinc-coordinating mutants of BRCA1, these residues were all required for SSA repair of double-strand breaks (Fig. 3, lanes: 6, 7, 10, 11, 13, 14, 16, and 17). As was found for the homologous recombination assay, the M18T variant and the T37R variant were defective for SSA repair. The L52F variant had reduced levels of SSA repair, approximately 69% of wild-type activity (Fig. 3, lane 15), although this value was not significantly different from wild type. The D67Y variant, a known nonpathogenic variant [Easton et al., 2007], was fully active in SSA repair (lane 18).  Figure 3 Figure 3 Analysis of 29 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in the SSA assay. HeLa–SSA cells were transfected as in Figure 2 with plasmids that express the 29 tested missense substitutions of BRCA1. Results of the fraction of cells that had converted to GFP ... Results diverged between the SSA and the homologous recombination assays for the variants in residues 90 through 191. The BRCA1–I90T variant functioned in the homologous recombination assay, but in the SSA assay, it was 47% as active as wild type (t-test for differing from wild-type P < 0.01; lane 20). The Y105C variant was statistically different from both wild-type BRCA1 and empty vector (indicated with both an asterisk and a cross; lane 21). This Y105C variant thus has intermediate phenotype, neither fully active nor fully defective. Similarly, the P142H, E143K, and the R170Q had intermediate phenotype (lanes 25, 26, and 28). The V191D variant was also defective for SSA repair (lane 31). Interestingly, the S153R and S186Y variants had diminished activity, but the change in activities was not statistically significant from the wild type. Thus, these variants were not scored as defective. Seven of the variants tested had assay-specific phenotypes, suggesting that how BRCA1 interacts with repair factors in the homologous recombination pathway is different from factors that BRCA1 binds in the SSA pathway.  When replacing the endogenous BRCA1 protein with a variant BRCA1, there is the concern that the expression levels be consistent with the levels of the endogenous in nondepleted cells. A defective phenotype could be masked by high levels of overexpression of the variant protein, or the phenotype of a functional protein might not be observed because of poor protein expression. The 16 variants with missense substitutions between residues 18 and 71 had been tested in HeLa-derived cells and the expression of each variant was similar to the endogenous in each case [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. For expression, we tested the missense substitutions between residues 90 and 191 and also residue 1775, and found that they all express approximately similarly as the endogenous BRCA1 (Fig. 4). Normalized results from densitometry analysis are presented beneath each lane. Protein from nontransfected cells and from control siRNA and empty vector transfected cells had similar amounts of BRCA1 protein (Fig. 4, lanes 1 and 2). Depletion of BRCA1 and add back with empty plasmid depleted the level of BRCA1 protein, which densitometry analysis indicated to be about 0.35 relative to the nontransfected cells (lane 3). All variants were detected at higher levels than the lysate from BRCA1-depleted cells. Some variants were expressed at higher levels than others, but at most 1.3-fold higher than the BRCA1 levels in nontransfected cells (compare, for example, lane 7 with lane 2). Because none of the BRCA1 variants were expressed at levels much higher than the endogenous BRCA1, in no case could the phenotype of a defective variant be masked by overexpression. The S186Y, V191D, and M1775R variants all had somewhat lower expression, but these lower levels of expression did not correlate with function in either homologous recombination or SSA repair. As an example, the S186Y variant was a low expresser (0.86 relative to control), but it was functional in both assays. We note that the M1775R mutant was expressed at lower levels (0.62 relative to endogenous BRCA1) than any other BRCA1 variant (lane 16). We interpret this level of expression to be similar to other variants and not an explanation for the defect in each double-strand break repair pathway. However, we cannot exclude the interpretation that the M1775R was defective in the DNA repair assays because there was lower BRCA1 expression of this isoform in our cells.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Analysis of the expression levels of 13 variants in HeLa–SSA cells. The expression levels of 16 previously tested BRCA1 substitution variants were tested in the HeLa-derived cell line [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Thirteen variants, with substitutions ... Comparison of Variants in Different Assays  The 29 BRCA1 variants analyzed in this study were compared for function in the two DNA repair assays and with available knowledge about cancer association (Table 1). Many of the variants were consistent across the two assays, but there were several variants demonstrating separation of function. All of the zinc-coordinating residues were required for function in both repair assays. The M18T variant was clearly defective, but it is currently classified as unknown clinical significance. There is one genetic model that classified this M18T variant as likely pathogenic (see below).  Table 1 Table 1 Summary of BRCA1 Variants Benchmarking Function to Clinical Relevance  Recently, a new classification system for variants has been proposed [Lindor et al., 2012; Plon et al., 2008]. According to this system, Class 1 denotes variants that are not pathogenic. Class 2 is likely nonpathogenic. Class 3 is uncertain. Class 4 is likely pathogenic (probability of being pathogenic is 0.95–0.99), and Class 5 is definitely pathogenic (probability >0.99). According to variants described in the [Lindor et al. (2012)] system, three of the variants in this study (M18T, C61G, and M1775R) were of Class 4, either likely pathogenic or definitely pathogenic. An additional five mutants are treated clinically as Class 5, pathogenic, (C39Y, C44F, C47G, C64G, and R71G). One of these pathogenic mutants, R71G, does not affect the BRCA1 protein, but rather the splicing of the mRNA [Vega et al., 2001]. Since the assays tested express BRCA1 from spliced cDNA, the R71G defective phenotype would not be detected. We thus exclude this mutant from the comparison of benchmarking these assays against known mutants. There were then seven pathogenic mutants (Class 4 or 5) analyzed and eight nonpathogenic variants (Class 1; Table 1). When comparing the results of our functional analyses with these previously classified variants, the HDR assay scored all seven pathogenic or likely pathogenic mutants as defective, and all eight nonpathogenic variants as functional. The results of the assay were, in the case of every variant, either fully active or fully defective (see examples in Fig. 2). To date, no variant tested in the HDR assay produced an intermediate score.  Compared with these benchmarks, the variants tested in the SSA assay did not score as well as the HDR assay. All pathogenic mutants were defective for SSA repair of double-strand breaks, but one nonpathogenic variant (I124V) was defective for SSA, and three Class 1 variants had intermediate phenotype in the SSA assay. Although the HDR assay was both highly sensitive and highly specific, the SSA assay was highly sensitive at association with cancer risk, but it was less specific. Of interest, it had been noted that four BRCA1 variants, Y105C, P142H, E143K, and Y179C, had decreased accumulation at the sites of DNA breaks [Wei et al., 2008]. Although these variants were normal for HDR, three of these had intermediate levels of function in the SSA assay (Table 1). Perhaps there is a link between the accumulation of BRCA1 at DNA repair sites and a factor important for the SSA assay.  Go to: Discussion Functional Assays as Predictive Tools for Assessing BRCA1 Variants  In this study, we analyzed a total of 29 BRCA1 variants in the repair of DSBs by homologous recombination and by SSA. For the sake of this discussion, we exclude the BRCA1–R71G variant that affects splicing [Vega et al., 2001] because all of our assays used prespliced cDNAs and would not be sensitive to a splicing defect. By comparing our results with those BRCA1 missense substitutions that have a known effect on breast cancer predisposition, we found that the HDR assay was 100% accurate: seven previously classified pathogenic mutants were defective for HDR, and eight previously classified nonpathogenic variants in BRCA1 were functional for HDR. Further, the results for the HDR assay were either fully active or fully defective. We interpret these results to indicate that the HDR assay is validated as a predictive tool for assessing BRCA1 variants.  By contrast to the HDR assay, the function of BRCA1 variants in the repair of DSBs by SSA had a number of differences that diminished the accuracy of this assay. On the basis of the benchmarks of variants that were classified using a genetic model [Lindor et al., 2012], the SSA assay was sensitive because it did not misclassify any pathogenic variants, but it was not specific because it misclassified several nonpathogenic variants as either intermediate or defective. Interpretation of the SSA assay was also complicated by intermediate results; by comparison, the HDR assay had no intermediate results among the 29 variants tested. It is possible, but remains to be determined, whether missense variants that are proficient for HDR, but deficient or intermediate for SSA, confer a lower or moderate risk of cancer. We thus conclude that the HDR assay is a more reliable predictive tool for assessing the function of BRCA1 variants than is the SSA assay.  We had previously performed a similar analysis of the control of centrosome duplication by BRCA1 variant proteins [Kais et al., 2012]. Fewer variants of the BRCA1 protein were analyzed in this earlier study using the centrosome assay, but it has several differences from the HDR assay. With regard to those variants with inferred breast cancer association, the centrosome duplication assay had an intermediate result for the BRCA1–D67Y variant, which is nonpathogenic. The T37R variant was defective for both DNA repair assays, but was functional in control of the centrosome duplication. Five amino acid residues away, the I42V variant had the opposite pattern as T37R, with defective centrosome control but fully functional in both DNA repair assays. Experimentally, the centrosome regulation assay is much more difficult to perform than the HDR assay, making it not as desirable an assay for analysis of BRCA1 variants. In addition, the centrosome assay appears, based on the limited set of variants, to be less accurate than the HDR assay. On the contrary, like the SSA, none of the tested seven variants that were previously classified as Class 4 or 5, were functional in the centrosomal assay, suggesting that this assay is sensitive.  It will be necessary to analyze many more variants in the HDR assay and then compare those results with the clinical experiences before this assay can be used for clinical interpretation. On the basis of the accuracy of the currently tested variants, we believe that the HDR assay will help with difficult to classify variants of unknown significance.  Functional Assays for Probing BRCA1 Residues Important in Biological Function  Separate from the clinical utility of the different functional tests, important biological information about the BRCA1 protein is available from the various functional assays. Very little structure–function information exists for BRCA1, and there have been limited systematic analyses of the effects of BRCA1 amino acid variants in a given function. A variety of variants have been analyzed in the context of short BRCA1 amino-terminal truncations for ubiquitin ligase activity [Morris et al., 2006]. In a similar vein, a variety of variants in the context of a short BRCA1 carboxy-terminal fragment have been analyzed for the activation of transcription [Carvalho et al., 2007; Lee et al., 2010]. Several variants in the context of the full-length protein have been analyzed in terms of resistance to ionizing radiation [Ruffner et al., 2001] and reversal of a lethal phenotype in murine embryonic stem cells [Chang et al., 2009].  We find that there are some discordancies between functional assays of the variants. The most striking are at T37R and I42V. BRCA1–T37R was defective for both DNA repair processes, but was fully functional for control of centrosomes. Conversely, BRCA1–I42V was defective for control of centrosome duplication [Kais et al., 2012] but functional in the DNA repair processes. From this result, we hypothesize that the protein–BRCA1 contacts in the DNA repair pathways depend on the T37 residue, whereas a different protein–BRCA1 contact is important for regulating the centrosome duplication. Such a notion is possible because the centrosome regulation occurs in the cytoplasm and the DNA repair occurs in the nucleus, and it is reasonable to suppose that different proteins are involved.  There were variants that distinguished between BRCA1 residues important for DSB repair by homologous recombination versus SSA. The observed differences between the SSA and HDR assays involved residues from 90 to 191. Several of these (Y105C, P142H, and E143K) that had intermediate phenotype in the SSA assay had been shown to have slow accumulation at sites of DSBs. Especially, P142H mutation abolished the association with Ku80 protein, which plays an important role in the repair of DSBs [Wei et al., 2008]. Perhaps the SSA pathway contributes to the accumulation of BRCA1 at sites of DNA damage in cells.  In summary, in this study, we evaluated missense variants of BRCA1 in two different DNA repair pathways. Data support that the function of BRCA1 in the HDR assay is consistent with the known cancer association of these variants, and we suggest that this test is predictive for breast cancer. By contrast, the repair of DNA by the related SSA pathway is not perfectly consistent with what is known about cancer predisposition, and the SSA assay yields intermediate results. On the basis of these current results, we suggest that the HDR assay is validated for predicting whether substitution at any residue of BRCA1 is disease associated.  The N-terminus of the Breast Cancer-1 predisposition protein (BRCA1) associates with the BRCA1-associated RING domain-1 protein (BARD1) to form a heterodimer, which exhibits ubiquitin ligase activity that is abrogated by known cancer-associated BRCA1 missense mutations. The majority of missense substitutions identified in patients with a personal or a family history of disease have not been followed in pedigrees, nor there is a functional understanding of their impact. We have examined, by extensive missense substitution, the interaction of BRCA1 with components that contribute to its ubiquitin ligase activity, BARD1 and the E2 ubiquitin-conjugating enzyme, UbcH5a. Selection from a randomly generated library of BRCA1 missense mutations for variants that inhibit the interaction with these components identified substitutions in residues found altered in patient DNA, indicating a correlation between loss of component-binding and propensity to disease development. We further show that the BRCA1:E2 interaction is sensitive to substitutions in all structural elements of the BRCA1 N-terminus, whereas the BARD1 interaction is sensitive to a subset of BRCA1 substitutions, which also inhibit E2-binding. Patient variants that inhibit the BRCA1:E2 interaction show loss of ubiquitin ligase activity and correlate with disease susceptibility and theoretical predictions of pathogenicity. These data link the loss of ubiquitin ligase activity, through loss of E2-binding, to the majority of non-polymorphic patient variants described within the N-terminus of BRCA1 and illustrate the likely significant role of BRCA1 ubiquitin ligase activity in tumour suppression. INTRODUCTION Inheritance of mutations in BRCA1 resulting in protein truncation predispose individuals to breast and ovarian cancer, whereas determining the significance of missense variants presents a major clinical problem (1). More than a quarter of entries recorded in the Breast cancer Information Core (BIC) dataset of BRCA1 sequence variants from patients are missense alterations (http://research.nhgri.nih.gov/bic/). This study examines the 100 N-terminal amino acids (aa) of BRCA1 that includes the Zn2þ-binding RING domain flanked by two a-helices (2). Forty-four different non-polymorphic missense variants have been reported in patient DNA encoding this region and the most frequently occurring are located within it. The pathogenicity of only a small number of these is known, and the rest remain unclassified. This is because it is not possible to follow the majority of variants by co-segregation analysis and the number of appropriate controls required to be content of a variant’s absence in unaffected individuals is prohibitive. For either approach, incomplete penetrance of the mutation may also be confounding. Thus far theoretical predictions based on evolutionary conservation # The Author 2006. Published by Oxford University Press. All rights reserved. For Permissions, please email: journals.permissions@oxfordjournals.org *To whom correspondence should be addressed at: Department of Medical and Molecular Genetics, Kings College London School of Medicine at Guy’s, Kings and St Thomas’ Hospitals, 8th Floor, Guy’s Tower, Guy’s Hospital, St Thomas’ Street, London SE1 9RT, UK. Tel: þ44 2071883699/82579; Fax: þ44 2071882585; Email: jo.morris@genetics.kcl.ac.uk { The authors wish it to be known that, in their opinion, the first two authors should be regarded as joint First Authors. Human Molecular Genetics, 2006, Vol. 15, No. 4 599–606 doi:10.1093/hmg/ddi476 Advance Access published on January 10, 2006 of the region and chemical difference of the substitution have been used to postulate the pathogenicity of many missense variants (3,4) and there is a need for functional understanding to validate such analysis. Currently, without a clinical assay for BRCA1 activity, the discovery of the majority of missense variants leaves both carriers and their families in an ambiguous position. Single exonic nucleotide mutations not associated with transcript stability, splicing or translational efficiency presumably confer loss of BRCA1 tumour suppressor ability through the loss of an activity brought about by protein conformational change. The BRCA1 N-terminal region has been reported to interact with seven protein partners and therefore potentially participates in several cellular activities (5 –10). Hence, in common with the study of many disease-associated proteins, a key challenge is to determine which interaction and activities are relevant to the disease process and which are not. An approach frequently taken in classifying a particular protein:protein interaction as significant has been to test the interaction with a disease-associated mutation in one of the protein partners. This approach may result in ambiguity when the disease-associated mutations tested have significant structural consequences (predicting an apparent plethora of significant interactions). The early discovery of BRCA1 and the subsequent reporting of variants from a population likely to be enriched for disease in a public database, the BIC, has provided a resource with which to more thoroughly test potentially important interactions. In the current study, we have made extensive use of, and reference to these variants to examine the likely relevance of the BRCA1 E3 ubiquitin ligase activity to its tumour suppressor function. The BRCA1 ubiquitin ligase is capable of forming covalently linked chains of ubiquitin on a substrate. Endogenous BRCA1-dependent ubiquitin conjugates occur at sites of double-strand DNA breaks and DNA repair in cells suggesting that BRCA1 ubiquitin ligase activity is linked to the DNA damage repair role of BRCA1 (11). The activity has also been linked to the control of centrosome duplication and microtubule nucleation, transcription and chromosome decatenation (12 – 15). Although classically thought of as a pathway for protein degradation, it is now becoming clear that the posttranslational addition of ubiquitin may act as a signal for other pathways (reviewed in (16)). In vitro, the BRCA1 ubiquitin ligase activity requires interaction with two proteins. The N-terminus of BRCA1 interacts with BARD1 to form a heterodimer. The heterodimer has substantial E3 ubiquitin ligase activity in vitro with the UbcH5 class of E2 ubiquitin conjugating enzymes, particularly UbcH5a (17,18). Importantly, loss of the activity is likely to occur in some forms of BRCA1-mediated cancer, as disease-associated mutations that substitute Zn2þ-binding residues within the BRCA1 RING affects BRCA1 ubiquitin ligase activity in vitro (19,20). However, as these mutations are structurally deleterious, it is unclear whether loss of ubiquitin ligase activity is causally linked to loss of tumour suppressor activity or an activity lost in conjunction with another, more relevant, interaction. Based on the significant body of structural work that describes the BRCA1 N-terminal region, a proportion of the 44 patient missense variants would be expected to inhibit the BARD1 interaction, and a proportion inhibit the E2 enzyme interaction, while the impact of the remainder cannot be easily predicted. The BRCA1:BARD1 interface is formed of the two helices that flank the BRCA1 RING and mutational analysis has shown that the hydrophobic core formed at the interface is required for this interaction (21,22). The interface BRCA1 makes with the E2 has been predicted to be formed of residues in the two Zn2þ-binding loops and central helix of the RING domain. A missense mutation in a residue within this region prevented the E2 interaction and also ubiquitin ligase activity (20). Thus, patient mutations located close to the predicted E2-binding face are also expected to inhibit E2-binding and ubiquitin ligase activity. Missense alterations that cause a loss of interaction with either BARD1 or the E2 ubiquitin conjugating enzyme would be expected to inhibit significant BRCA1 ubiquitin ligase activity in vitro (17,20). This study employs a comprehensive examination of missense variants derived from patient DNA to explore the relevance of BRCA1:protein interactions required for the E3 ubiquitin ligase activity of BRCA1. Our data show that loss of binding with the E2 component of the cascade correlates with variants found in a population enriched for a personal and family history of breast and ovarian cancer, ubiquitin ligase activity and theoretical predictions of pathogenicity. The data reveals the particular sensitivity of the BRCA1:E2 interaction to missense substitution within and beyond the predicted E2 interaction face and has implications for the clinical interpretation of missense variants within the N-terminus of BRCA1. RESULTS Selection of mutants from a randomly mutagenized BRCA1 library for loss of E2- or BARD1-binding identifies disease-associated mutations If BRCA1-mediated tumourigenesis is promoted through the loss of binding to components of the ubiquitin ligase cascade we predicted that a screen for substitutions that inhibit E2 or BARD1 protein interactions from a randomly generated series of BRCA1 variants should identify substitutions similar to non-polymorphic variants reported in DNA from individuals with a personal or family history of breast cancer. We therefore screened a BRCA1 library generated through random mutagenic PCR by positive selection in yeast for loss of the BRCA1:BARD1 interaction and the BRCA1:E2 interaction (as illustrated in Supplementary Material, Fig. S1). These screens identified residues within BRCA1 that are required for interaction with each protein. In a screen of the BRCA1 mutant library for substitutions that inhibit interaction with the E2 enzyme, UbcH5a, we identified 22 missense variants in 19 residues (Fig. 1, line 1). In the first screen against BARD1, we identified only truncating and frame-shift alterations (the truncation that deleted fewest residues removed amino acids from the C-terminal region of the peptide leaving aa 2– 90), indicating that few or no single amino acid substitutions prevent BRCA1:BARD1 heterodimer formation in this system. We therefore conducted a third screen in which we selected mutations that inhibit the 600 Human Molecular Genetics, 2006, Vol. 15, No. 4 interaction with BARD1 using a strain optimized for highaffinity interactions (23). From this experiment eight missense variants in seven residues were identified (Fig. 1, line 2). We sought sequence information of patient variants from the literature (24,25) and from the BIC dataset. This carries BRCA1 sequence information from over 10 000 individuals, most with a personal or a family history of breast or ovarian cancer, hence it is a database that is enriched with deleterious mutations in BRCA1 (although the pathogenicity of the majority of individual variants is not known) (3). Comparison of the BRCA1 variants selected from the screens against the E2 and BARD1 with non-polymorphic variants encoded by patient DNA show that both interactions are inhibited by substitutions in residues that because of their co-ordination with structurally integral Zn2þ have been strongly predicted, or confirmed, to be involved in disease (Fig. 1, lines 1 –3). A further four selected variants from the E2 screen result in the substitution of residues altered in patient DNA in non-Zn2þ-binding residues (Fig. 1), including the substitution of M18. The M18T/K missense variant has been identified in several independent families with breast and ovarian cancer (24,25). No variant identified in either screen is a known polymorphism. Hence, selection against either ubiquitin ligase cascade component, although interacting with BRCA1 at different affinities, identified substitutions of residues found altered in patient DNA, but only the E2 screen selected patient variants outside the structurally integral Zn2þ-binding residues. The E2 component is more sensitive to BRCA1 patient missense variants As experimental selection against the BARD1 and the E2 interactions identified variants that correlated with patient variants, we next wished to test directly the relative sensitivities of each protein interaction to non-polymorphic missense substitutions in BRCA1 encoded by patient DNA. We therefore generated constructs of all variants encoded within the first 100 amino acids of BRCA1 logged in the BIC database; both those known to be disease-associated and those that are unclassified. (Where multiple substitutions of Zn2þ-ligating cysteines have been reported, one variant was chosen; in addition M18K was generated (25).) These 35 variants were then tested for interaction with BARD1 and the E2 enzyme, UbcH5a, in a two-hybrid assay. Figure 2 shows that the wild-type BRCA1:BARD1 interaction was stronger than that of the BRCA1:E2 interaction as indicated by growth at high levels of the HIS3 competitor 3-amino-1,2,4-triazole (3AT) (Fig. 2A). A subset of BRCA1 missense substitutions inhibited growth with BARD1 at high 3AT concentrations (100 mM). These were mutations of Zn2þ-binding residues, either previously confirmed or strongly expected to be pathogenic (C24R, C44F, C61G and to a lesser extent H41R and C39R). The E2:BRCA1 interaction was more sensitive to missense substitution, 16 variants showed no interaction with the E2 at the lowest concentration of 3AT (1 mM), with 21 BRCA1 variants failed to grow at 3 mM 3AT (Fig. 2A). All Zn2þ- binding residue mutations inhibited the E2 interaction at 3 mM 3AT threshold and all patient variants that reduced the BARD1 interaction at a high threshold (100 mM 3AT), inhibited the E2 interaction at a lower one (1 mM 3AT). This was also the case for a non-patient mutation (L82D) selected for disruption of the BRCA1:BARD1 interaction (data not shown). Hence, we were unable to identify a missense mutation of BRCA1 that inhibited the BARD1 interaction, but that did not disrupt the interaction with the E2 enzyme. In a recent study, a combination of sequence alignment of BRCA1 orthologs and chemical difference of substitution was used to classify patient variants pathogenically (3). In the current study, seven of nine patient variants predicted to be deleterious using this approach inhibited the E2 interaction and all (five) variants predicted to be neutral, or of little significance, interacted with the E2 enzyme (Fig. 2C). (Experiments designed to test BRCA1 N-terminal homodimerization failed to reveal an interaction and we saw no interaction between BARD1 and UbcH5a (data not shown).) Loss of E2 interaction correlates with loss of BRCA1 ubiquitin ligase activity The sensitivity of the E2:BRCA1 interaction to missense substitution of BRCA1 suggested that the majority of nonpolymorphic missense variants reported in the population enriched for family or personal history of cancer might inhibit BRCA1 ubiquitin ligase activity, as confirmed breast cancer-associated missense variants do. In order to test this, we performed a biochemical assay which examined the ability of the BRCA1:BARD1 heterodimer to form ubiquitin Figure 1. Single amino acid substitutions in BRCA1 identified by split-hybrid selection against the E2 (UbcH5a) (line 1) and BARD1 (line 2): Variants from individuals recorded in the BIC database and reference (25) (line 3). Substitutions classified as known mutations are shown in bold (BIC database and references (24,25)). Green-shaded boxes illustrate residues substituted in variants identified from the E2 (UbcH5a) and BARD1 screens that are located in residues also substituted in patient DNA. Human Molecular Genetics, 2006, Vol. 15, No. 4 601 chains in the presence of the E2 ubiquitin conjugating enzyme, UbcH5a. In this assay, co-purified wild-type BRCA1: BARD1 N-terminal complex was able to generate polyubiquitin chains and underwent extensive auto-ubiquitination (Fig. 2B and Supplementary Material, Fig. S2). Nineteen of the 35 BRCA1 variants co-purified with BARD1 showed reduced activity in the assay. As expected all seven mutations in Zn2þ-ligating residues inhibited ubiquitin ligase activity and the activity of the remaining variants correlated with the BRCA1:E2 interaction (compare Fig. 2A with B, summarized in C). All variants that interacted with E2 at 10 mM 3AT had ubiquitin ligase activity and all but one that did not interact at this threshold showed no activity. The E2-binding activity of a single variant, with a helical substitution (I89T) correlates poorly with its ubiquitin ligase activity. It is possible that the E2 interaction is stabilized by the presence of BARD1 in the biochemical assay. The BRCA1:E2 interaction requires integrity of the BRCA1 N-terminus The BARD1 interaction was less sensitive to missense substitution of BRCA1 than the E2 interaction and restricted to the flanking helices that form the BRCA1:BARD1 interaction face (Q12Y, L82P) and the Zn2þ-ligating residues of the RING (C39S/L, H41R, C44R, C47R and C61L) (Fig. 3H). However, the impact of these variants was measurable only at high concentrations of 3AT, or in a high threshold assay, suggesting that these mutations weaken the high-affinity BARD1:BRCA1 interaction. Conversely, the BRCA1 Figure 2. (A) BARD1 (amino acids 26–119) or full length E2 (UbcH5a), were tested for interaction with wild-type or variant BRCA1 (amino acids 2 –101), using yeast two-hybrid. Growth on media lacking histidine (-HIS) indicates protein:protein interaction leading to HIS3 transcription. Growth on increasing concentrations of the HIS3 competitive inhibitor 3AT indicates strong protein:protein interaction. Triangles represent serial dilutions of yeast. (B) His-tagged BRCA1 (amino acids 1–147) and BARD1 (amino acids 26–142) were co-purified from bacteria, and checked for parity before being subjected to substrateindependent ubiquitin ligase assay with the E2 (UbcH5a) enzyme. The I26A BRCA1 variant fails to bind the E2 enzyme and is ubiquitin ligase dead (20), and was included here as a negative control. Ub-mix indicates the inclusion of all components of the assay except BRCA1:BARD1 heterodimer. Several blots are spliced together to allow ease of comparison with (A). (Full blots with relevant controls are shown in Supplementary Material, Fig. S3.) The BRCA1: protein interaction and ubiquitin ligase data are summarized in (C) together with known (K) or predicted pathogenic status (3). Substitutions predicted to be deleterious (D), likely to be neutral or of little significance (N) or because of splice junction defect (S) (32) are shown. 602 Human Molecular Genetics, 2006, Vol. 15, No. 4 interaction with E2 was disrupted by many missense substitutions and at low 3AT concentrations. Modelling the BRCA1:E2 interaction on the solved RING E3:E2 complex of c–Cbl (shown in Fig. 3) and comparing it with the NMR solution structure of BRCA1:BARD1 reveals that the face between the RING-E3 and E2 (UbcH7) is not as extensive as the BRCA1:BARD1 interaction. The BARD1:BRCA1 interface is bigger (1337 versus 869 A˚ 2 ), flatter and has a smaller gap volume, indicating that it is a tighter interaction. Both interactions have three hydrogen bonds but the BRCA1: BARD1 interaction also has two more salt bridges. Hence, single amino acid substitutions may be tolerated by the BRCA1:BARD1 interaction. Some of the amino acid substitutions of BRCA1 that inhibit the E2 interaction are located in the predicted E2 interface; in residues that co-ordinate with Zn2þ and that are within the central helix (Fig. 3C, E and H). However, the BRCA1:E2 interaction was also sensitive to non-E2 interface substitutions present within loops forming the cross-brace structure of the RING (Fig. 3D), at the join between the RING domain and flanking helices (Fig. 3F), as well as within the flanking helices (Fig. 3G). Substitutions that did not inhibit the E2 interaction are conservative in their nature (V11A, I15L, I21V, I42V, L87V), away from the E2 interface (D67E/Y, R71G, K38N) or in the distal portions of the a-helices (S4P, R7C, I90T, D96N, G98R and also Y105C, I124V and P142H (data not shown)) (illustrated in Supplementary Material, Fig. S4). Thus the locations and type of the majority of E2 disruptive variants Figure 3. Model of the BARD1:BRCA1:E2 (UbcH5b) complex. The RING domain of BRCA1 (PDB 1JM7 chain A (2)) was superimposed on the RING domain of Cbl-UbcH7 (PDB 1FBV (29)) and the structure of UbcH5b (PDB 1W4U (31)) was then superimposed on the structure of UbcH7 in the Cbl–UbcH7 complex. (UbcH5b is 88% identical to UbcH5a and both have activity with BRCA1:BARD1 (18).) BRCA1 is shown in green, BARD1 in orange and UbcH5b in blue. (A) Filled atom-model of BRCA1:BARD1 with UbcH5b. (B) Ribbon representation of BRCA1:BARD1 and UbcH5b, the Zn2þ are denoted by red spheres. (C–G) Structural classes of BRCA1:E2 disruptive variants are shown and listed beneath. (H) Summary of BARD1 and E2 disruptive missense variants. Line 1 shows secondary structure information based on the BRCA1 NMR structure (2). Line 2 shows residues in the BRCA1:BARD1 interface (blue) (2) and residues identi- fied by Brzovic et al., (20) whose resonances are perturbed by the binding of the E2 (UbcH5c) and are therefore likely to make up the E2 interface (black). Line 3 summarizes all the E2 disruptive substitutions identified in the study, and Line 4 the BARD1 disruptive substitutions. Human Molecular Genetics, 2006, Vol. 15, No. 4 603 illustrate that the integrity of the BRCA1 RING domain, the flanking helices and the relationship between these elements are required for interaction with the E2 (Table 1). DISCUSSION The identification of several interacting proteins have suggested alternative functions for the BRCA1 N-terminal region (6 –10). Although we cannot rule out the possibility that this region participates in a function unrelated to ubiquitin ligase activity, in our hands BRCA1 N-terminal interactions with full length ATF, BAP1 and reported interacting regions of ER-alpha, MSH2 and p300/CBP could not be confirmed (data not shown). Data reported here correlate missense variants from individuals with a personal or family history of breast cancer with loss of E2 enzyme interaction and ubiquitin ligase activity. Selection from a randomly generated library of BRCA1 mutations for variants that inhibit the interaction with BRCA1 ubiquitin ligase components, BARD1 or the E2 enzyme, UbcH5a, identified substitutions in residues found altered in patient DNA. The majority of patient variants inhibited the E2 interaction, and mutations in Zn2þ-binding residues reduced the already low-affinity BRCA1:E2 interaction (and weakened the high-affinity BRCA1:BARD1 interaction). Causal confirmation linking the loss of the BRCA1:E2 interaction with tumour susceptibility awaits further experiments where the subtle disruption of the E2 interaction, perhaps in an animal model, is shown to be tumourigenic. However, concordance of loss of BRCA1:E2-binding with variants confirmed or theoretically predicted to be pathogenic suggests that the BRCA1:E2 interaction may be an indicator of variant pathogenicity and may therefore form the basis of a functional assay. Further validation through investigation of BRCA1 families bearing currently unclassified variants, and continued reporting in public databases such as the BIC will be needed to confirm this for the purposes of diagnosis, counselling and clinical intervention. Our data are unable to dissect BARD1 from the E2 interaction as a cause of loss of ubiquitin ligase activity for the Zn2þ-ligating residue class of mutations as these variants cause loss of binding to BARD1 and the E2 enzyme. This is presumably because of the deleterious impact these variants have on the N-terminal structure as a whole, preventing both correct folding of the RING domain and proper folding of the half helical bundle for high-affinity interaction with BARD1. Importantly, the inhibition of ubiquitin ligase activity, through loss of the E2 interaction, was not restricted to structurally detrimental mutations in Zn2þ-ligating residues, Table 1. Predicted impact of missense substitutions in BRCA1 that prevent interaction with the E2 ubiquitin conjugating enzyme UbcH5a Class Substitution Predicted effect of substitution (based on superimposition of BRCA1 (2) and UbcH5b (31) structures over RING E3:E2 structure of Cbl:UbcH7 (29)) Zn2þ ligand C24R Loss of Zn2þ ligand likely to weaken RING domain folding C39S/R H41L/Y/R C44F/R C47G/T C61G C64G RING domain I31T or N Hydrophobic to polar: expected to disrupt RING domain T37R Non-conservative substitution of a buried residue: likely to disrupt the RING domain K45E/T/N Substitution disrupts salt bridge to BRCA1 Glu75: likely to weaken overall fold L52F/H Introduction of more bulky or polar group to a buried residue: likely to weaken overall fold S59R Charged substitution of largely buried hydrophobic group: likely to disrupt RING domain I68K Charged substitution of buried hydrophobic group: likely to disrupt RING domain S72R Disrupts hydrogen bond to T69: predicted to weaken overall fold T77M May form H-bond to S80 in some conformations; substitution to a hydrophobic surface residue predicted to weaken folding by removal of H-bond L63F Introduction of a larger buried group likely to disrupt RING domain Interface with UbcH5a E29V Disrupts salt bridge (to K4 in UbcH5b) and weaken binding to the E2 K50L/E May disrupt salt bridge (to D59 of UbcH5b) and weaken binding to the E2 K56N May disrupt H-bond (to S91 of UbcH5b) and to weaken binding to the E2 Q60L Lies close to E2 binding site; substitution likely to disrupt H bonds or salt bridge K65M May disrupt H bonding or salt bridge (to UbcH5b Q92) I26N May form part of the E2 interface or may be a structural disruption (I26 forms packing interactions within the RING domain) L28P Loss of hydrophobic contact with the E2 enzyme, proline substitution likely also to disrupt backbone preventing folding G57R BRCA1:Cbl backbones differ at this point, may alter packing with E2 or within RING Orientation of helical bundle to RING F79S F79 lies at interface between RING and helical domains. Mutation to a polar group is predicted to alter RING-domain to helical-domain packing Helical bundle I15T Polar substitution of buried hydrophobic group: likely to induce distortion to helices M18K T Polar/charged substitution of buried hydrophobic group: likely to induce distortion to helices I89T or N Polar substitution of buried hydrophobic group: likely to induce distortion to helices 604 Human Molecular Genetics, 2006, Vol. 15, No. 4 but was also caused by the majority of reported patient variants, whose structural impact is more subtle. The profile of BARD1 and E2 disruptive variants overlap; while E2 disruptive substitutions include Zn2þ residue binding mutants, they are also located throughout the N-terminal region, as are patient variants (Figs 1 and 3H). Our findings have revealed the fragility of the BRCA1:E2 interaction, which is sensitive to missense substitution in all elements of the BRCA1-N-terminus. The high density of missense variants in the BIC patient database in this region of BRCA1 may reflect a requirement for interaction with the E2 enzyme in tumour suppression. In cells, the formation of ubiquitin conjugates by exogenous BRCA1 is dependent both on BARD1 and on an intact BRCA1:E2-binding face, suggesting that loss of the E2 interaction alone is sufficient to inhibit BRCA1 ubiquitin ligase activity in cells (11). However, as substitution of Zn2þ-binding residues are many times more frequent in patients than those elsewhere in the N-terminal region, it may be that the additional loss of interaction with BARD1, perhaps resulting in reduced BRCA1 protein stability (19,26), or loss of a further function, causes greater inhibition of BRCA1 tumour suppressor function, and more frequently results in tumourigenesis than loss of the E2 interaction alone. We speculate that a weak interaction between the E3 RING and its E2 component may be a necessary part of enzyme turnover in the generation of ubiquitin chains. The E3 RING:E2 interaction is a common biological interface, with more than 300 RING-bearing proteins in the human database, many of which may function as E3 ligases for ubiquitin or ubiquitin like molecules (27). Hence, if the conclusions made in relation to the BRCA1 RING:E2 interaction can be extrapolated to other RING:E2s, then we would expect perturbations in this interactive face to occur in other diseases and syndromes.  
2458||There have been few published analyses of the effects of missense mutations of the BRCA1 gene on BRCA1 protein function. In this study, we adapted a previously described homology directed recombination (HDR) assay to the analysis of the effects of BRCA1 point substitutions on its function in recombination. We established a HeLa-derived cell line, which has integrated in its genome a recombination substrate. Following transfection of a plasmid that expresses the endonuclease that creates a double-stranded break in the recombination substrate, HDR is readily scored by the percentage of GFP-positive cells. By combining RNAi specific for the cellular BRCA1 mRNA with expression of BRCA1 mutants resistant to the RNAi, we could effectively replace the endogenous BRCA1 protein with selected point mutants of BRCA1 and test these in the recombination assay. We found that both, the amino- and carboxy-terminal ~300 residues of BRCA1 were essential for directing HDR. Sixteen missense mutants from the amino terminus of BRCA1 were analyzed for function in HDR, and we found that several point mutants fully replaced the wild-type BRCA1 and are neutral in this process. Mutation of any single zinc-coordinating residue was fully defective in this assay. Several protein variants due to missense mutations, including methionine-18 to threonine and threonine-37 to arginine were also found to be defective for recombination. We have thus established a robust assay system for the analysis of the effects of specific missense mutations of BRCA1 in regulating the homologous recombination process.  Go to: Introduction The Breast Cancer associated gene 1 (BRCA1) is a tumor suppressor that is specifically associated with familial cases of breast cancer and ovarian cancer (1). In familial breast cancer, a woman may inherit a BRCA1 allele with a mutation, and during her lifetime there is a high likelihood that in at least one breast epithelial cell the second, non-mutated, allele of BRCA1 will be lost by deletion. Such a cell is hemizygous for BRCA1 and the one remaining allele has a mutation. If that mutation renders the BRCA1 defective for a key biological function, then that cell has increased likelihood of transforming into a breast tumor.  The BRCA1 gene has been sequenced from many individuals with a family history of breast cancer, and many of the characterized mutations result in a frame shift or a stop codon and truncate the encoded BRCA1 protein. Clearly, such truncating mutations predispose to breast cancer. Missense mutations, however, can present a diagnostic dilemma since specific point mutations have low prevalence in the population and the disease association is often unclear. Several genetic and evolutionary analyses can predict whether a given point mutation is likely to predispose to breast cancer, but the interpretation can be ambiguous (2–4).  Although there have been many studies assessing the functional implication of BRCA1 mutations, there has been no systematic functional studies that are designed for analysis of the full length protein or that assess a biological process such as homologous recombination. Several in vitro biochemical assays have tested the effects of point mutations in protein-protein interactions (5), in BRCA1-dependent ubiquitin ligase activity (6), and in the control of the centrosome (7). A tissue culture cell-based assay fuses 468 amino acids from the BRCA1 carboxy-terminus to a DNA-binding domain and analyzes the effect of the mutant on a transcription-based reporter assay (8). This latter assay has been very successful in assigning whether a missense mutation is associated with loss of transcription function, but the assay cannot evaluate BRCA1 sequences in the amino-terminal three-fourths of the protein, and the assay does not address non-transcription functions of BRCA1, such as regulation of DNA repair.  In this study, we have adapted the homologous recombination assay that BRCA1 regulates (9–11) to a robust method to analyze specific BRCA1 protein variants. The modified assay tests specific BRCA1 missense mutations in the homologous recombination process. We have characterized a set of point mutations in the amino terminus of BRCA1 in this assay as an initial step in determining whether a BRCA1 variant of unknown function may predispose to breast cancer.  Go to: Materials and Methods Plasmids, siRNA, and Cell Lines  The plasmid encoding the recombination substrate, pDR-GFP, and the I-SceI expression plasmid, cBAS, were both kindly provided by Drs. K. Nakanishi and M. Jasin (Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Center, NY, NY). BRCA1 expression plasmid, pcDNA-5’HA-BRCA1, has been previously described (12), and site-specific point mutations identified on the Breast Cancer Information Core (BIC) were generated using the Quick Change Kit from Stratagene. Details of the subcloning are available upon request. Plasmids for the expression of BRCA1 deletion mutants have been previously described (12, 13).  Sequences of the 3’-UTR of BRCA1 were targeted with siRNA oligonucleotides based on the sequence GCUCCUCUCACUCUUCAGU specific for nucleotides 80,780 to 80,798 of the BRCA1 gene (accession number AY273801). BRCA2 was targeted using siRNA based on the sequence UAAAUUUGGACAUAAGGAGUCCUCC. The control siRNA, called GL2, targets the luciferase gene (14).  A stable derivative of HeLa cells was established by transfection with pDR-GFP using standard procedures and selection in 1.5 µg/ml puromycin. Puromycin-resistant cells were cloned by limiting dilution in 96 well plates, and an initial screen selected those colonies that had no detectable GFP fluorescence. Remaining colonies were replica plated and transfected in parallel with cBAS to express the I-SceI. The untransfected stocks of those clones with intense fluorescence in a high percentage of cells were selected and re-cloned by limiting dilution. The number of integration sites in the final cell line, HeLa-DR13-9, was determined by digesting genomic DNA with XhoI and analyzing by Southern blotting.  Homology Directed Recombination Assay  On day 1, HeLa-DR13-9 cells, approximately 4.0 × 104 cells in a 1.5 cm well were transfected with 5 pmoles of BRCA1 siRNA targeting the 3’-UTR of BRCA1 gene and 0.3 µg of the appropriate BRCA1 expression plasmid in the presence of 0.5 µl of lipofectamine-2000 (Invitrogen). On day 2, the transfected cells were transferred to 3.5 cm well dishes. On day 3, the cells were transfected with 25 pmoles of the BRCA1 siRNA, 0.75 µg of the appropriate BRCA1 expression plasmid, plus 0.75 µg of cBAS in the presence of 2.5 µl of lipofectamine-2000. On day 6, cells were trypsinized and 10,000 cells from each well were counted by flow cytometry using a Becton Dickinson FACSCalibur instrument in the OSU Comprehensive Cancer Center Analytical Cytometry shared resource.  All point mutants of BRCA1 analyzed were tested in triplicate and the percentage of cells with recombined locus encoding GFP were normalized to the same percentage from the control siRNA transfected cells. In the figures, the averages are shown with the standard error of the mean depicted by error bars.  Immunoprecipitation analysis  HEK293T cells were transfected with the same BRCA1 variant expression constructs as used in the HDR assay. Whole cell lysates were harvested 2 days post transfection and subjected to immunoaffinity purification using the HA.11 anti-HA tag antibody (Covance) by standard procedures (12). Western blots were analyzed with anti-HA antibody and anti-BARD1 antibody H-300 (Santa Cruz) by standard methods.  Go to: Results Both the amino- and carboxy-termini of BRCA1 are required for BRCA1 regulation of homology directed recombination  We adapted an established assay (15) for homologous recombination in which two inactive alleles of green fluorescent protein (GFP) are integrated in a single locus in the genome of the cell. One allele contains the 18 bp recognition element for the I-SceI endonuclease. Transfection into the cells of a plasmid for expressing the I-SceI results in a double strand break in one GFP allele, and this break can be repaired by homology directed recombination (HDR) using the second inactive allele of GFP. (The plasmids encoding the recombination substrate and the I-SceI endonuclease were the gift of M. Jasin, Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center, NY, NY.) This repair results in gene conversion that creates a GFP allele that encodes an active protein, and the recombination can be detected by identifying green fluorescing cells. This plasmid and strategy (Figure 1A) has been successfully used in a variety of experiments in which a cell line carrying a mutant version of a protein under study has had this recombination substrate inserted in the cell and the effect of the specific protein was then evaluated (15–17). We instead inserted a copy of this recombination substrate into HeLa cells and carefully selected a clone, called HeLa-DR13-9, which has no background GFP fluorescence, but following transfection of the I-SceI expressing plasmid there is a high level of GFP-positive cells. In many repeated experiments, between 10% and 20% of the cells will undergo recombination following I-SceI expression. This cell line is then useful for the analysis of RNAi-depletion of proteins and testing for their effects in HDR.  Figure 1 Figure 1 The Homology-Directed Recombination Assay HeLa-DR13-9 cells were transfected with either a control siRNA or an siRNA specific to BRCA1. Two days later these cells were re-transfected with the appropriate siRNA plus the plasmid for expression of I-SceI, and three days later the percentage of GFP-positive cells was determined by flow-cytometry. The reduction in GFP-positive cells when BRCA1 is depleted is evident from inspection of the resultant monolayers (Figure 1B) and is quantified by flow cytometry (10,000 cells counted per sample). In the experiment for Figure 2, in the absence of transfected I-SceI expression plasmid, there are no GFP-positive cells (Figure 2, lane 1). In the presence of I-SceI and a control siRNA 16% of the cells were GFP-positive (lane 2). Depletion of BRCA1 or BRCA2 reduced the number of cells with recombined GFP-alleles by eight-fold or 40-fold, respectively. Similar reductions in HDR were observed with siRNAs targeting other BRCA1 and BRCA2 sequences, indicating that these results are not due to off-target effects of the siRNA (data not shown). Further, these results are consistent with published observations (9, 18). Importantly, when the siRNA targets the 3’-UTR of the BRCA1, expression of exogenous BRCA1 from a plasmid with a different 3’-UTR results in complete restoration of HDR activity (Figure 2, lane 4). This result suggests that we have a robust assay for determining the effects of specific BRCA1 mutations in the regulation of the homologous recombination process.  Figure 2 Figure 2 Depletion of BRCA1 protein decreases HDR activity We next assayed a series of synthetic BRCA1 deletion mutants for function in the HDR assay. In Figure 3A, the four deletion mutants are diagrammed. Using the same time course as in Figure 2, the endogenous BRCA1 protein was depleted by 3’-UTR-targeting siRNA, and the test BRCA1 protein was expressed from a co-transfected plasmid. Multiple repeat experiments were done, and in each experiment the maximal recombination varies from 10% to 20%, depending on transfection efficiency. Within an experiment the ratio of GFP-positive cells in the BRCA1 depleted sample relative to the control RNAi was consistently 8- to 10-fold reduced. We thus normalized data in each experiment, allowing us to average the results from multiple experiments. Replacing the endogenous BRCA1 with ΔN-BRCA1, which has deleted residues 1–302, results in a 4- to 5-fold reduction in homologous recombination. Expression of the ΔM1-BRCA1, which has deleted residues 305–770, reduced recombination by about 40%. Similarly, expression of the ΔM2-BRCA1, which has deleted residues 775–1292, resulted in a decrease in recombination by about 60%. Expression of the ΔC-BRCA1, which has deleted residues 1527–1863, resulted in a 10-fold loss of recombination. Clearly, the amino-terminus and carboxy-terminus each had a significant role in controlling the recombination reaction. Expression of the two internal domains had intermediate effects. In each case, the concentrations of BRCA1 protein expressed from the transfected plasmid were at or higher levels than the endogenous BRCA1 protein (Figure 3C), indicating that the reduction in HDR activity was not due to failure to express the test protein. Since the expression level of the ΔN, ΔM1, and ΔM2 mutants were significantly higher than the endogenous BRCA1 protein, it is possible that the magnitudes of the deficiencies in HDR activity with these BRCA1 deletion mutants were underestimated. We decided to focus on point mutations in the amino terminus.  Figure 3 Figure 3 The BRCA1 N- and C-termini are important in regulation of HDR activity Identification of BRCA1 point mutations that are critical for homologous recombination activity  We decided to test point mutations in the amino-terminal 71 amino acid residues of BRCA1 that were derived from individuals with a family history of breast cancer and identified from the BIC database. The reasons for using mutations identified in breast or ovarian cancer clinics were two-fold: first, this is the most direct way to identify candidate amino acid residues for critical function without performing saturating mutagenesis and testing a large number of variants; and second, the results of our functional tests might be useful in counseling such individuals who carry these mutations. Sixteen different variants were produced by site-directed mutagenesis of the BRCA1 cDNA-expressing plasmid. One of these variants, C27A, is a synthetic mutation and is not derived from a variant obtained from an individual with a family history with breast cancer. Rather, the C27A variant completes the set of eight different Zn-coordinating residues of BRCA1 in this analysis. The results of multiple experiments are shown in Figure 4. Consistent with our previous experiments, depletion of BRCA1 by transfection of siRNA targeting the 3’-UTR and co-transfection of the empty plasmid vector, resulted in a 10-fold reduction in GFP-positive cells relative to the control siRNA. Transfection of this BRCA1-specific siRNA along with the wild-type BRCA1 expression plasmid fully restored homology-directed recombination (Figure 4A, lane 3). Strikingly, transfection of each mutant either fully restored recombination to 100% or was fully negative, at the same level of homologous recombination as the vector-transfected control. We note that the deletion mutants used in Figure 3 produced recombination levels that had intermediate results: the ΔM1 and ΔM2 deletions caused partial decrements in homologous recombination. Even deleting the amino terminus, containing all of the residues being tested did not have as severe an effect on the HDR assay as did the point mutants. The expression levels of the point mutants of BRCA1 all were similar to the endogenous protein level (Figure 4B, compare lane 3 to all other lanes) whereas the ΔN deletion, which encompassed all of these point mutants, was significantly overexpressed relative to the endogenous protein and perhaps causing a partial masking of the HDR defect. Alternatively, it is a formal possibility that the point mutations in the BRCA1 protein have both a loss of function phenotype and a dominant negative phenotype.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Identification of BRCA1 missense mutations that affect homologous recombination Eight of the residues that were tested coordinate zinc ions in the RING domain: C24R, C27A, C39Y, H41R, C44F, C47G, C61G, and C64G. It is anticipated that substitution of any of these amino acid residues would have major structural consequences to the protein. Consistent with that concept, replacement of the endogenous BRCA1 with any of these BRCA1 molecules with mutated zinc-coordinating residues was non-functional in HDR (Figure 4A, lanes 6, 7, 10, 11, 13, 14, 16, 17).  Eight other substitution mutants were tested for function in the homologous recombination pathway. The M18T and T37R variants did not complement the HDR assay. Variants that could complement the HDR activity were I21V, I31M, I42V, L52, D67Y, and R71G.  We tested whether the mutant BRCA1 proteins used in this study could bind to BARD1 (Figure 5). We transfected the HA-epitope tagged BRCA1 into HEK293T cells and purified proteins in complex with the variant BRCA1 protein by immunoaffinity purification (IP) using antibody recognizing the HA-tag. Purified proteins were analyzed by immunoblots specific for the HA-epitope to evaluate the effectiveness of expression and purification of the mutant BRCA1 protein and specific for the endogenous BARD1 protein. We found that BRCA1 variant proteins I21V, I31M, I42V, L52F, D67Y, and R71G effectively purified cellular BARD1 protein. These are the same proteins that functioned in homologous recombination. Of note, the BRCA1 variant proteins M18T and H41R had detectable low level of BARD1 binding, but these BRCA1 variants did not complement the HDR assay.  Figure 5 Figure 5 Effect of BRCA1 missense variants on association with BARD1 Correlation of biological function with available clinical data for each BRCA1 missense mutant  We have summarized the available information for each mutant in Table 1, including results of HDR function and BARD1 binding (this study), E3 ubiquitin ligase activity and resistance to ionizing radiation (6), and available clinical information. For many of these variants family history was unavailable, and this limited the analysis we could do. Examples of available family data are supplied in Supplemental Table 1. We applied an algorithm called VUS Predict (19) to the 16 variants. VUS Predict calculates the odds of a variant being detrimental based on a variety of characteristics of tumors including estrogen receptor, progesterone receptor, and Her2 status, tumor grade, histopathology, age of onset, and the position of the amino acid residue in a functional domain or evolutionary conserved sequence. If there were no clinical data, then the VUS Predict output was based on the single criterion of evolutionary conservation (asterisked values in Table 1).  Table 1 Table 1 Summary of biological functions of BRCA1 proteins in the context of available clinical information for each variant. Of the 16 BRCA1 variants in this study, four of the eight Zn-coordinating residues have been classified as deleterious when mutant (Table 1). One other variant, R71G, has been classified as deleterious (2, 20), and one, D67Y, had been classified as neutral (4). One of the substitution mutants, M18T, has a published odds ratio of being deleterious of 31:1 (4). Using VUS Predict, the M18T mutant has 170.8:1 odds of being deleterious. While these analyses clearly indicate the M18T variant has a trend as a deleterious allele, the magnitude of the ratio did not exceed the threshold of 1000:1 for making a clinical classification. We find that this mutation of BRCA1 causes a complete loss of HDR activity. Though this substitution, when expressed in a truncated BRCA1 peptide in the absence of the BARD1 did have ubiquitin ligase enzymatic activity, it was defective in protection of a cell against ionizing radiation (6). In another study using the BRCA1/BARD1 heterodimer, the M18T variant was inactive as a ubiquitin ligase (21). The M18T substitution could affect the BRCA1-BARD1 heterodimerization interface (22), resulting in reduced BARD1 association with the BRCA1 variant (Figure 5). Our results in the HDR assay are consistent with this substitution being deleterious.  Genetic analysis of one of these mutants, D67Y, has suggested that it is neutral with regard to cancer predisposition (4), and consistent with that notion it has the same phenotype as does wild-type BRCA1 in the HDR assay. Though the R71G substitution is considered cancer-promoting, the mutation is thought to affect the splicing of the mRNA (20), such a feature would be missed when expressing a cDNA as in this experiment. Mutant BRCA1(R71G) protein functioned in the HDR at similar levels as did wild-type BRCA1.  Among the remaining five variants of unknown clinical consequence, the T37R variant was defective in HDR (Figure 4A, lane 9). In new research published while this study was being written has indicated that the similar T37K variant is likely to be deleterious based on clinical and evolutionary analysis (3). The T37R substitution was also found to defective in providing ionizing radiation resistance (6), consistent with our HDR results. Taken together, the threonine-37 residue is likely critical to the homologous recombination process, and consequently to radio-resistance. The threonine-37 side chain is solvent exposed, but in a small cavity near the BRCA1-BARD1 heterodimerization interface (22). Perhaps the bulky lysine or arginine substitutions result in disruption of BRCA1-BARD1 binding, or alternatively another protein important to HDR binds to this pocket.  Go to: Discussion This study establishes a new assay for evaluating the function of BRCA1 protein variants. Critical components include the HeLa-derived cell line containing an integrated recombination substrate that is readily scored using flow cytometry. The very low background fluorescence in this cell, combined with the very high response to I-SceI expression, make this cell line ideal for analyzing the homologous recombination process. Since HeLa cells are readily transfected, we routinely obtain greater than 70% of the cells transfected in a monolayer (data not shown), this cell line is ideal for silencing a given gene by RNAi and re-expressing the gene via an RNAi-resistant plasmid expression vector. Though BRCA1 is associated with breast and ovarian cancers, this function for BRCA1 has been found in all cell types, and is thus valid to study in the HeLa cell line. While not high-throughput, the assay is relatively quick once the mutant plasmids are prepared. Several variants can be analyzed simultaneously in a one week experiment. We plan to expand this analysis to a number of variants in the amino- and carboxy-termini of the BRCA1 protein. This continuing effort will greatly expand the analysis of the functional consequences of missense mutations in BRCA1 function.  When a BRCA1 variant protein is defective in the homologous recombination process, is it cancer associated? So far, the results indicate a strong correlation with this HDR assay and cancer predisposition, but the analysis of more mutants will be important to determine whether there is an association. Conversely, are BRCA1 variants that have full HDR activity neutral mutations? The R71G variant has full HDR activity, but it is certainly cancer-associated but via splicing (20), a mechanism that would not be identified in this assay using fully spliced cDNAs. Thus, we already have one example indicating that the converse is not true. In addition, we are developing a similar assay for centrosome control by BRCA1 variants, and initial results suggest that some of these variants do indeed function differently in the two assays (Z. Kais, JDP, unpublished observations).  Combining the functional analysis described in this study with genetic and clinical analysis of point mutants (3, 4) will undoubtedly be important for counseling women who carry missense mutations of BRCA1. As the data become more complete, such results will likely become an excellent resource for guiding clinical decisions.  Missense substitutions of uncertain clinical significance in the BRCA1 gene are a vexing problem in genetic counseling for women who have a family history of breast cancer. In this study, we evaluated the functions of 29 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in two DNA repair pathways. Repair of double-strand breaks by homology-directed recombination (HDR) had been previously analyzed for 16 of these BRCA1 variants, and 13 more variants were analyzed in this study. All 29 variants were also analyzed for function in double-strand break repair by the single-strand annealing (SSA) pathway. We found that among the pathogenic mutations in BRCA1, all were defective for DNA repair by either pathway. The HDR assay was accurate because all pathogenic mutants were defective for HDR, and all nonpathogenic variants were fully functional for HDR. Repair by SSA accurately identified pathogenic mutants, but several nonpathogenic variants were scored as defective or partially defective. These results indicated that specific amino acid residues of the BRCA1 protein have different effects in the two related DNA repair pathways, and these results validate the HDR assay as highly correlative with BRCA1-associated breast cancer.  Keywords: BRCA1, homologous recombination, single-strand annealing, centrosome, VUS Go to: Introduction Among the more than 70,000 women who had their BRCA1 gene (MIM# 113705) sequenced by 2006, approximately 2.3% were found to carry a BRCA1 variant of uncertain significance (VUS). These variants were classified as uncertain because they occurred in families wherein segregation analysis had not been done or in whom the segregation analysis was not informative and thus the VUS had unknown effects on breast and ovarian cancer risk [Hall et al., 2009; Spearman et al., 2008; Sweet et al., 2009]. As whole genome and exome sequencing becomes a more prevalent practice, more VUSs in BRCA1 will be uncovered, and increasingly women will face the quandary of an uninformative genetic test. This leads to individuals with a VUS test result making decisions about cancer screening and prevention without concrete information on which to base their decisions. Women who have an indeterminate BRCA1 sequence result and a family history of breast cancer have a high level of distress, and there are no consistent clinical guidelines for advising them [Dorval et al., 2005; Petrucelli et al., 2002; van Dijk et al., 2006]. Of the 567 BRCA1 missense substitutions listed in the current Breast Cancer Information Core (BIC) database, 14 are described as pathogenic (Class 5) and 27 as nonpathogenic (Class 1). By including the data from Collaborators for the Investigation of Modifiers of BRCA1/2 (CIMBA), a total of 24 BRCA1 variants are pathogenic (CIMBA database). Less than 10% of the missense substitutions in the BIC database have known cancer predisposition. In the absence of definitive genetic information on BRCA1 missense substitutions, other methods are needed to determine whether missense substitutions are pathogenic. Multifactorial approaches have augmented genetic segregation analysis with additional information about the proband and, in some cases, the tumor [Easton et al., 2007; Goldgar et al., 2004; Lindor et al., 2012; Plon et al., 2008; Spearman et al., 2008; Sweet et al., 2009]. These approaches have been successful in reclassification of variants but are also incomplete because they cannot definitively determine whether any given variant affects the critical cancer suppressing function(s) of the protein [Millot et al., 2012]. In contrast, a biological functional assay has the potential to determine whether any given BRCA1 missense substitution is defective in a process, and if that function is predictive of cancer predisposition (i.e., 100% sensitive and 100% specific), then the functional assay can, in theory, be used in genetic counseling.  A variety of biological assays have been analyzed for BRCA1 function and have been correlated with cancer predisposition to various extents [Carvalho et al., 2007; Cotta-Ramusino et al., 2011; Kais et al., 2012; Lee et al., 2010; Millot et al., 2012; Morris et al., 2006; Ransburgh et al., 2010; Vallee et al., 2012]. Several of these assays test single domains of BRCA1, and several address the variant within the context of the full-length protein. In this study, we analyzed the effects of 29 missense substitutions in BRCA1 on the repair of double-strand DNA breaks (DSBs) by homologous recombination and by the single-strand annealing (SSA) pathways. Our results indicate that the effects of specific missense mutations in these pathways strongly correlate with breast cancer predisposition. Further, we find that specific amino acid substitutions affect the two double-strand break repair pathways differentially.  Go to: Materials and Methods Plasmids and Cell Lines  All plasmids for the expression of human BRCA1 with missense substitutions were generated by site-directed mutagenesis from the wild-type sequence (GenBank: U14680.1). Several of these plasmids had been described in previous publications [Ransburgh et al., 2010; Wei et al., 2008]. The cell line for the homologous recombination assay, HeLa-DR, was based on the genomic integration of a specific vector that functions as a recombination substrate [Pierce et al., 2001]. The vector for homologous recombination had been the gift of M. Jasin (Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Institute, New York, NY). The HeLa-DR had been described before [Parvin et al., 2011; Ransburgh et al., 2010]. The repair of double-strand breaks by the SSA pathway was based on a vector kindly provided by J. Stark (City of Hope, Duarte, CA) [Bennardo et al., 2008; Stark et al., 2004] stably integrated into HeLa cells to make the HeLa–SSA cell line. The siRNA targeting the cellular BRCA1 3′ untranslated region (UTR) is the same as previously used [Ransburgh et al., 2010].  SSA Assay  HeLa–SSA cells were seeded in 15.6-mm-diameter wells in 24-well plates, and when cells were 50% confluent, cells were transfected with 5 pmol of the siRNA targeting the BRCA1 3′-UTR plus 0.3 μg of the BRCA1 expression plasmid in Lipofectamine 2000 reagent (Life Technologies, Grand Island, NY). At 24 hr after transfection, cells were transferred to 35-mm-diameter wells in six-well plates. At 48 hr, cells were transfected with 25 pmol of the BRCA1 3′-UTR-specific siRNA plus 0.75 μg BRCA1 expression plasmid plus 0.75 μg pCBASce (for the expression of I-SceI) in Lipofectamine 2000 reagent. After 3 days, cells are harvested by trypsinization, and the fraction of GFP-positive cells is determined using a FACScalibur flow cytometer (BD Biosciences, San Jose, CA) (Analytic Cytometry Shared Resource of The Ohio State University Comprehensive Cancer Center).  Western Blot Analysis of BRCA1 Protein  Immunoblots of the expressed BRCA1 protein were done as has been described previously [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Cells that had been transfected as in the SSA assay were, in parallel, extracted in 0.1% NP-40, 0.05 M Hepes (pH 7.5), and 0.005 M EDTA. Protein contents of extracts were determined using the Bradford reagent; and 50 μg of protein was electrophoresed on 3–8% Nu-PAGE gels (Life Technologies, Grand Island, NY) M. Jasin (Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Institute, NewYork, NY), transferred to polyvinylidene fluoride membranes, and immunoblotted using antibody specific to BRCA1(400–1,100). Densitometry analysis was performed from immunoblots using Kodak 1D software (Eastman Kodak Company, Rochester, NY).  Statistical Analysis of Results  The raw results in the SSA assay for the missense substitutions were compared with the control samples (either GL2 siRNA or BRCA1 siRNA with BRCA1-wt add back) using the unpaired Student’s t-test and obtained the one-tail P values; for intermediate-phenotype mutants, besides the above-mentioned comparisons, we also conducted the unpaired Student’s t-test against the control sample that contains BRCA1 siRNA with empty vector adding back, and obtained the one-tail P values. P values of less than 0.01 were considered significant.  Go to: Results Function of BRCA1 Variants in DNA Break Repair by Homologous Recombination  The BRCA1 protein has been shown to be a critical component of the response to DSBs. Cellular machinery can utilize homologous sequences to accurately repair the DSB, or the free ends can be joined by nonhomologous end joining. In addition to homologous recombination, the pathway of SSA exists by which the repair proteins resect DNA from the free ends of the DSB, and when short stretches of homologous sequence are exposed, then the DNA ends are rejoined [Stark et al., 2004]. The homologous recombination assay used in this study was based on a method developed by the Jasin laboratory in which a single integrated genomic locus contains two inactive GFP genes, and one of these contains the endonuclease cleavage site for the rare-cutting I-SceI enzyme [Pierce et al., 2001]. Upon expression of I-SceI in the cell, one inactive allele of GFP is cut, and if homologous recombination occurs using the second inactive GFP gene as the homology template, then the DNA repair results in gene conversion making the GFP gene become active (Fig. 1A). The SSA assay is based on an analogous strategy in which the GFP protein is not expressed because of intervening DNA sequence, with an I-SceI site at the 3′ end of the intervening DNA. Upon expression of the I-SceI endonuclease, the DSB is generated, and resection of the intervening sequence reveals homologous GFP sequences that are aligned and repaired [Stark et al., 2004] (Fig. 1B). These two processes depend on sequence homologies for the repair, but there are functional differences. The Rad51 and BRCA2 proteins are required for the homology-directed recombination (HDR) assay, but are not required for the SSA assay [Moynahan et al., 2001; Stark et al., 2004].  Figure 1 Figure 1 The double-strand DNA break (DSB) repair assay system. A: The HDR recombination substrate [Pierce et al. 2001] is diagrammed. The upstream GFP allele is defective because of the inclusion of an I-SceI site in its sequence. The downstream GFP allele is ... For each assay, we have established HeLa-derived cell lines with the published recombination substrate [Pierce et al., 2001; Stark et al., 2004] integrated in the genome at a single site. The HeLa-DR cell line assays HDR, and the HeLa–SSA cell line is used to assay SSA. The HDR and the SSA assays have a similar experimental design with a depletion of BRCA1 by transfection of a siRNA that is specific for the 3′-UTR of the BRCA1 mRNA. We cotransfect a BRCA1 expression plasmid that is not affected by the siRNA and which expresses the variant BRCA1 protein. After 2 days, we repeat the transfection and also transfect a plasmid that encodes the expression of the I-SceI endonuclease to generate the DSB in the presence of the variant BRCA1. After 3 days, we assay the cells for GFP expression by flow cytometry. The timeline of the experiment is shown in Figure 1C.  We have previously analyzed 16 variants of BRCA1 in a tissue-culture-cell-based assay for repair of DSBs via homologous recombination [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Using the HeLa-DR cell line developed by us, up to 20% of the cells convert to GFP positive. This high level of recombination enables the quantitative analysis of variants in BRCA1 in this process. The endogenous BRCA1 mRNA is depleted by siRNA targeting the 3′-UTR, and a BRCA1 variant that is resistant to the siRNA is simultaneously expressed from a plasmid [Parvin et al., 2011; Ransburgh, et al., 2010]. A quantitative measure of the function of the BRCA1 variant is determined from the percentage of cells that convert to GFP positive.  In this study, we first analyzed an additional 13 BRCA1 variants for function in HDR (Fig. 2). Twelve of the BRCA1 variants spanned amino acid residue 90 through 191 and were identified from the Breast Information Core (http://research.nhgri.nih.gov/bic/). These were expressed from the plasmid as full-length proteins. All 12 variants are listed in the BIC as having unknown phenotype with regard to predisposition to breast cancer. Several of these have been evaluated using a multifactorial classification system, and of these 12 variants, seven were nonpathogenic [Lindor et al., 2012]. These were chosen because the function of this domain was unknown and because many of these variants have been reported to be nonpathogenic. By testing the known nonpathogenic variants in this assay, we provide a specificity control for the functional test. The 13th variant tested is a known deleterious mutant in the carboxy terminus of the BRCA1 protein, M1775R. In these experiments, the percentage of cells that were GFP positive when transfected with the control siRNA and the control plasmid were set equal to 1%. All other results were normalized to this control, and all results were from three or more separate experiments. Depletion of BRCA1 and transfection with empty plasmid resulted in a value of 0.09 relative to the control (Fig. 2, lane 2). Thus, BRCA1 depletion has an over 10-fold effect reducing the level of homologous recombination. Depleting BRCA1 and transfecting a plasmid that expressed wild-type BRCA1 resulted in full restoration of homologous recombination (Fig. 2, lane 3). Among the variants with substitutions in residues from 90 to 191, all 12 functioned as wild type in the homologous recombination assay (Fig. 2, lanes 4–15) (P < 0.002 compared with depleted BRCA1). By contrast, the 13th tested missense substitution, a known pathogenic mutant BRCA1–M1775R, did not complement the depletion of BRCA1 in this assay (Fig. 2, lane 16) (Pv = 0.0014 compared with wild-type BRCA1).  Figure 2 Figure 2 Analysis of 13 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in the homology-directed repair assay. HeLa-DR cells were transfected with a siRNA that depleted the endogenous BRCA1 and with a plasmid that expressed the indicated BRCA1 variant. After generating a double-strand ... Function of 29 Variants of BRCA1 in the Repair of DNA Breaks by the SSA Pathway  The 16 BRCA1 variants that had previously been tested for function in homologous recombination [Ransburgh et al., 2010] and the 13 BRCA1 variants tested in this study (Fig. 2) were analyzed for function in SSA repair. The recombination substrate [Bennardo et al., 2008; Stark et al., 2004] was based on similar design as the homologous recombination substrate with the exception that restoration of GFP activity occurs when the two inactive GFP genes are repaired by SSA. HeLa cells were stably transfected with the SA–GFP construct, and a clone was selected that had no detectable background GFP signal. Upon transfection of the I-SceI-expressing plasmid, about 5–7% of cells became GFP positive, indicative of a functioning SSA pathway. Depletion of BRCA1 resulted in a decrease to about 1–2% GFP-positive cells (Fig. 3, lane 2), indicating a role for BRCA1 in the SSA repair pathway that had been previously observed [Stark et al., 2004]. Depletion of BRCA1 resulted in about 25% of the activity found in nondepleted cells. As had been observed with the homologous recombination assay, transfection of a plasmid expressing wild-type BRCA1 fully complemented the defect in SSA due to depletion of the endogenous BRCA1 (Fig. 3, lane 3). By contrast, depletion of endogenous BRCA1 and expression of a known pathogenic mutant of BRCA1, M1775R, was as defective in SSA as had been transfection of the empty vector (Fig. 3, lane 32). Similar to previous observations with the zinc-coordinating mutants of BRCA1, these residues were all required for SSA repair of double-strand breaks (Fig. 3, lanes: 6, 7, 10, 11, 13, 14, 16, and 17). As was found for the homologous recombination assay, the M18T variant and the T37R variant were defective for SSA repair. The L52F variant had reduced levels of SSA repair, approximately 69% of wild-type activity (Fig. 3, lane 15), although this value was not significantly different from wild type. The D67Y variant, a known nonpathogenic variant [Easton et al., 2007], was fully active in SSA repair (lane 18).  Figure 3 Figure 3 Analysis of 29 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in the SSA assay. HeLa–SSA cells were transfected as in Figure 2 with plasmids that express the 29 tested missense substitutions of BRCA1. Results of the fraction of cells that had converted to GFP ... Results diverged between the SSA and the homologous recombination assays for the variants in residues 90 through 191. The BRCA1–I90T variant functioned in the homologous recombination assay, but in the SSA assay, it was 47% as active as wild type (t-test for differing from wild-type P < 0.01; lane 20). The Y105C variant was statistically different from both wild-type BRCA1 and empty vector (indicated with both an asterisk and a cross; lane 21). This Y105C variant thus has intermediate phenotype, neither fully active nor fully defective. Similarly, the P142H, E143K, and the R170Q had intermediate phenotype (lanes 25, 26, and 28). The V191D variant was also defective for SSA repair (lane 31). Interestingly, the S153R and S186Y variants had diminished activity, but the change in activities was not statistically significant from the wild type. Thus, these variants were not scored as defective. Seven of the variants tested had assay-specific phenotypes, suggesting that how BRCA1 interacts with repair factors in the homologous recombination pathway is different from factors that BRCA1 binds in the SSA pathway.  When replacing the endogenous BRCA1 protein with a variant BRCA1, there is the concern that the expression levels be consistent with the levels of the endogenous in nondepleted cells. A defective phenotype could be masked by high levels of overexpression of the variant protein, or the phenotype of a functional protein might not be observed because of poor protein expression. The 16 variants with missense substitutions between residues 18 and 71 had been tested in HeLa-derived cells and the expression of each variant was similar to the endogenous in each case [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. For expression, we tested the missense substitutions between residues 90 and 191 and also residue 1775, and found that they all express approximately similarly as the endogenous BRCA1 (Fig. 4). Normalized results from densitometry analysis are presented beneath each lane. Protein from nontransfected cells and from control siRNA and empty vector transfected cells had similar amounts of BRCA1 protein (Fig. 4, lanes 1 and 2). Depletion of BRCA1 and add back with empty plasmid depleted the level of BRCA1 protein, which densitometry analysis indicated to be about 0.35 relative to the nontransfected cells (lane 3). All variants were detected at higher levels than the lysate from BRCA1-depleted cells. Some variants were expressed at higher levels than others, but at most 1.3-fold higher than the BRCA1 levels in nontransfected cells (compare, for example, lane 7 with lane 2). Because none of the BRCA1 variants were expressed at levels much higher than the endogenous BRCA1, in no case could the phenotype of a defective variant be masked by overexpression. The S186Y, V191D, and M1775R variants all had somewhat lower expression, but these lower levels of expression did not correlate with function in either homologous recombination or SSA repair. As an example, the S186Y variant was a low expresser (0.86 relative to control), but it was functional in both assays. We note that the M1775R mutant was expressed at lower levels (0.62 relative to endogenous BRCA1) than any other BRCA1 variant (lane 16). We interpret this level of expression to be similar to other variants and not an explanation for the defect in each double-strand break repair pathway. However, we cannot exclude the interpretation that the M1775R was defective in the DNA repair assays because there was lower BRCA1 expression of this isoform in our cells.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Analysis of the expression levels of 13 variants in HeLa–SSA cells. The expression levels of 16 previously tested BRCA1 substitution variants were tested in the HeLa-derived cell line [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Thirteen variants, with substitutions ... Comparison of Variants in Different Assays  The 29 BRCA1 variants analyzed in this study were compared for function in the two DNA repair assays and with available knowledge about cancer association (Table 1). Many of the variants were consistent across the two assays, but there were several variants demonstrating separation of function. All of the zinc-coordinating residues were required for function in both repair assays. The M18T variant was clearly defective, but it is currently classified as unknown clinical significance. There is one genetic model that classified this M18T variant as likely pathogenic (see below).  Table 1 Table 1 Summary of BRCA1 Variants Benchmarking Function to Clinical Relevance  Recently, a new classification system for variants has been proposed [Lindor et al., 2012; Plon et al., 2008]. According to this system, Class 1 denotes variants that are not pathogenic. Class 2 is likely nonpathogenic. Class 3 is uncertain. Class 4 is likely pathogenic (probability of being pathogenic is 0.95–0.99), and Class 5 is definitely pathogenic (probability >0.99). According to variants described in the [Lindor et al. (2012)] system, three of the variants in this study (M18T, C61G, and M1775R) were of Class 4, either likely pathogenic or definitely pathogenic. An additional five mutants are treated clinically as Class 5, pathogenic, (C39Y, C44F, C47G, C64G, and R71G). One of these pathogenic mutants, R71G, does not affect the BRCA1 protein, but rather the splicing of the mRNA [Vega et al., 2001]. Since the assays tested express BRCA1 from spliced cDNA, the R71G defective phenotype would not be detected. We thus exclude this mutant from the comparison of benchmarking these assays against known mutants. There were then seven pathogenic mutants (Class 4 or 5) analyzed and eight nonpathogenic variants (Class 1; Table 1). When comparing the results of our functional analyses with these previously classified variants, the HDR assay scored all seven pathogenic or likely pathogenic mutants as defective, and all eight nonpathogenic variants as functional. The results of the assay were, in the case of every variant, either fully active or fully defective (see examples in Fig. 2). To date, no variant tested in the HDR assay produced an intermediate score.  Compared with these benchmarks, the variants tested in the SSA assay did not score as well as the HDR assay. All pathogenic mutants were defective for SSA repair of double-strand breaks, but one nonpathogenic variant (I124V) was defective for SSA, and three Class 1 variants had intermediate phenotype in the SSA assay. Although the HDR assay was both highly sensitive and highly specific, the SSA assay was highly sensitive at association with cancer risk, but it was less specific. Of interest, it had been noted that four BRCA1 variants, Y105C, P142H, E143K, and Y179C, had decreased accumulation at the sites of DNA breaks [Wei et al., 2008]. Although these variants were normal for HDR, three of these had intermediate levels of function in the SSA assay (Table 1). Perhaps there is a link between the accumulation of BRCA1 at DNA repair sites and a factor important for the SSA assay.  Go to: Discussion Functional Assays as Predictive Tools for Assessing BRCA1 Variants  In this study, we analyzed a total of 29 BRCA1 variants in the repair of DSBs by homologous recombination and by SSA. For the sake of this discussion, we exclude the BRCA1–R71G variant that affects splicing [Vega et al., 2001] because all of our assays used prespliced cDNAs and would not be sensitive to a splicing defect. By comparing our results with those BRCA1 missense substitutions that have a known effect on breast cancer predisposition, we found that the HDR assay was 100% accurate: seven previously classified pathogenic mutants were defective for HDR, and eight previously classified nonpathogenic variants in BRCA1 were functional for HDR. Further, the results for the HDR assay were either fully active or fully defective. We interpret these results to indicate that the HDR assay is validated as a predictive tool for assessing BRCA1 variants.  By contrast to the HDR assay, the function of BRCA1 variants in the repair of DSBs by SSA had a number of differences that diminished the accuracy of this assay. On the basis of the benchmarks of variants that were classified using a genetic model [Lindor et al., 2012], the SSA assay was sensitive because it did not misclassify any pathogenic variants, but it was not specific because it misclassified several nonpathogenic variants as either intermediate or defective. Interpretation of the SSA assay was also complicated by intermediate results; by comparison, the HDR assay had no intermediate results among the 29 variants tested. It is possible, but remains to be determined, whether missense variants that are proficient for HDR, but deficient or intermediate for SSA, confer a lower or moderate risk of cancer. We thus conclude that the HDR assay is a more reliable predictive tool for assessing the function of BRCA1 variants than is the SSA assay.  We had previously performed a similar analysis of the control of centrosome duplication by BRCA1 variant proteins [Kais et al., 2012]. Fewer variants of the BRCA1 protein were analyzed in this earlier study using the centrosome assay, but it has several differences from the HDR assay. With regard to those variants with inferred breast cancer association, the centrosome duplication assay had an intermediate result for the BRCA1–D67Y variant, which is nonpathogenic. The T37R variant was defective for both DNA repair assays, but was functional in control of the centrosome duplication. Five amino acid residues away, the I42V variant had the opposite pattern as T37R, with defective centrosome control but fully functional in both DNA repair assays. Experimentally, the centrosome regulation assay is much more difficult to perform than the HDR assay, making it not as desirable an assay for analysis of BRCA1 variants. In addition, the centrosome assay appears, based on the limited set of variants, to be less accurate than the HDR assay. On the contrary, like the SSA, none of the tested seven variants that were previously classified as Class 4 or 5, were functional in the centrosomal assay, suggesting that this assay is sensitive.  It will be necessary to analyze many more variants in the HDR assay and then compare those results with the clinical experiences before this assay can be used for clinical interpretation. On the basis of the accuracy of the currently tested variants, we believe that the HDR assay will help with difficult to classify variants of unknown significance.  Functional Assays for Probing BRCA1 Residues Important in Biological Function  Separate from the clinical utility of the different functional tests, important biological information about the BRCA1 protein is available from the various functional assays. Very little structure–function information exists for BRCA1, and there have been limited systematic analyses of the effects of BRCA1 amino acid variants in a given function. A variety of variants have been analyzed in the context of short BRCA1 amino-terminal truncations for ubiquitin ligase activity [Morris et al., 2006]. In a similar vein, a variety of variants in the context of a short BRCA1 carboxy-terminal fragment have been analyzed for the activation of transcription [Carvalho et al., 2007; Lee et al., 2010]. Several variants in the context of the full-length protein have been analyzed in terms of resistance to ionizing radiation [Ruffner et al., 2001] and reversal of a lethal phenotype in murine embryonic stem cells [Chang et al., 2009].  We find that there are some discordancies between functional assays of the variants. The most striking are at T37R and I42V. BRCA1–T37R was defective for both DNA repair processes, but was fully functional for control of centrosomes. Conversely, BRCA1–I42V was defective for control of centrosome duplication [Kais et al., 2012] but functional in the DNA repair processes. From this result, we hypothesize that the protein–BRCA1 contacts in the DNA repair pathways depend on the T37 residue, whereas a different protein–BRCA1 contact is important for regulating the centrosome duplication. Such a notion is possible because the centrosome regulation occurs in the cytoplasm and the DNA repair occurs in the nucleus, and it is reasonable to suppose that different proteins are involved.  There were variants that distinguished between BRCA1 residues important for DSB repair by homologous recombination versus SSA. The observed differences between the SSA and HDR assays involved residues from 90 to 191. Several of these (Y105C, P142H, and E143K) that had intermediate phenotype in the SSA assay had been shown to have slow accumulation at sites of DSBs. Especially, P142H mutation abolished the association with Ku80 protein, which plays an important role in the repair of DSBs [Wei et al., 2008]. Perhaps the SSA pathway contributes to the accumulation of BRCA1 at sites of DNA damage in cells.  In summary, in this study, we evaluated missense variants of BRCA1 in two different DNA repair pathways. Data support that the function of BRCA1 in the HDR assay is consistent with the known cancer association of these variants, and we suggest that this test is predictive for breast cancer. By contrast, the repair of DNA by the related SSA pathway is not perfectly consistent with what is known about cancer predisposition, and the SSA assay yields intermediate results. On the basis of these current results, we suggest that the HDR assay is validated for predicting whether substitution at any residue of BRCA1 is disease associated.  
2469||Missense substitutions of uncertain clinical significance in the BRCA1 gene are a vexing problem in genetic counseling for women who have a family history of breast cancer. In this study, we evaluated the functions of 29 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in two DNA repair pathways. Repair of double-strand breaks by homology-directed recombination (HDR) had been previously analyzed for 16 of these BRCA1 variants, and 13 more variants were analyzed in this study. All 29 variants were also analyzed for function in double-strand break repair by the single-strand annealing (SSA) pathway. We found that among the pathogenic mutations in BRCA1, all were defective for DNA repair by either pathway. The HDR assay was accurate because all pathogenic mutants were defective for HDR, and all nonpathogenic variants were fully functional for HDR. Repair by SSA accurately identified pathogenic mutants, but several nonpathogenic variants were scored as defective or partially defective. These results indicated that specific amino acid residues of the BRCA1 protein have different effects in the two related DNA repair pathways, and these results validate the HDR assay as highly correlative with BRCA1-associated breast cancer.  Keywords: BRCA1, homologous recombination, single-strand annealing, centrosome, VUS Go to: Introduction Among the more than 70,000 women who had their BRCA1 gene (MIM# 113705) sequenced by 2006, approximately 2.3% were found to carry a BRCA1 variant of uncertain significance (VUS). These variants were classified as uncertain because they occurred in families wherein segregation analysis had not been done or in whom the segregation analysis was not informative and thus the VUS had unknown effects on breast and ovarian cancer risk [Hall et al., 2009; Spearman et al., 2008; Sweet et al., 2009]. As whole genome and exome sequencing becomes a more prevalent practice, more VUSs in BRCA1 will be uncovered, and increasingly women will face the quandary of an uninformative genetic test. This leads to individuals with a VUS test result making decisions about cancer screening and prevention without concrete information on which to base their decisions. Women who have an indeterminate BRCA1 sequence result and a family history of breast cancer have a high level of distress, and there are no consistent clinical guidelines for advising them [Dorval et al., 2005; Petrucelli et al., 2002; van Dijk et al., 2006]. Of the 567 BRCA1 missense substitutions listed in the current Breast Cancer Information Core (BIC) database, 14 are described as pathogenic (Class 5) and 27 as nonpathogenic (Class 1). By including the data from Collaborators for the Investigation of Modifiers of BRCA1/2 (CIMBA), a total of 24 BRCA1 variants are pathogenic (CIMBA database). Less than 10% of the missense substitutions in the BIC database have known cancer predisposition. In the absence of definitive genetic information on BRCA1 missense substitutions, other methods are needed to determine whether missense substitutions are pathogenic. Multifactorial approaches have augmented genetic segregation analysis with additional information about the proband and, in some cases, the tumor [Easton et al., 2007; Goldgar et al., 2004; Lindor et al., 2012; Plon et al., 2008; Spearman et al., 2008; Sweet et al., 2009]. These approaches have been successful in reclassification of variants but are also incomplete because they cannot definitively determine whether any given variant affects the critical cancer suppressing function(s) of the protein [Millot et al., 2012]. In contrast, a biological functional assay has the potential to determine whether any given BRCA1 missense substitution is defective in a process, and if that function is predictive of cancer predisposition (i.e., 100% sensitive and 100% specific), then the functional assay can, in theory, be used in genetic counseling.  A variety of biological assays have been analyzed for BRCA1 function and have been correlated with cancer predisposition to various extents [Carvalho et al., 2007; Cotta-Ramusino et al., 2011; Kais et al., 2012; Lee et al., 2010; Millot et al., 2012; Morris et al., 2006; Ransburgh et al., 2010; Vallee et al., 2012]. Several of these assays test single domains of BRCA1, and several address the variant within the context of the full-length protein. In this study, we analyzed the effects of 29 missense substitutions in BRCA1 on the repair of double-strand DNA breaks (DSBs) by homologous recombination and by the single-strand annealing (SSA) pathways. Our results indicate that the effects of specific missense mutations in these pathways strongly correlate with breast cancer predisposition. Further, we find that specific amino acid substitutions affect the two double-strand break repair pathways differentially.  Go to: Materials and Methods Plasmids and Cell Lines  All plasmids for the expression of human BRCA1 with missense substitutions were generated by site-directed mutagenesis from the wild-type sequence (GenBank: U14680.1). Several of these plasmids had been described in previous publications [Ransburgh et al., 2010; Wei et al., 2008]. The cell line for the homologous recombination assay, HeLa-DR, was based on the genomic integration of a specific vector that functions as a recombination substrate [Pierce et al., 2001]. The vector for homologous recombination had been the gift of M. Jasin (Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Institute, New York, NY). The HeLa-DR had been described before [Parvin et al., 2011; Ransburgh et al., 2010]. The repair of double-strand breaks by the SSA pathway was based on a vector kindly provided by J. Stark (City of Hope, Duarte, CA) [Bennardo et al., 2008; Stark et al., 2004] stably integrated into HeLa cells to make the HeLa–SSA cell line. The siRNA targeting the cellular BRCA1 3′ untranslated region (UTR) is the same as previously used [Ransburgh et al., 2010].  SSA Assay  HeLa–SSA cells were seeded in 15.6-mm-diameter wells in 24-well plates, and when cells were 50% confluent, cells were transfected with 5 pmol of the siRNA targeting the BRCA1 3′-UTR plus 0.3 μg of the BRCA1 expression plasmid in Lipofectamine 2000 reagent (Life Technologies, Grand Island, NY). At 24 hr after transfection, cells were transferred to 35-mm-diameter wells in six-well plates. At 48 hr, cells were transfected with 25 pmol of the BRCA1 3′-UTR-specific siRNA plus 0.75 μg BRCA1 expression plasmid plus 0.75 μg pCBASce (for the expression of I-SceI) in Lipofectamine 2000 reagent. After 3 days, cells are harvested by trypsinization, and the fraction of GFP-positive cells is determined using a FACScalibur flow cytometer (BD Biosciences, San Jose, CA) (Analytic Cytometry Shared Resource of The Ohio State University Comprehensive Cancer Center).  Western Blot Analysis of BRCA1 Protein  Immunoblots of the expressed BRCA1 protein were done as has been described previously [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Cells that had been transfected as in the SSA assay were, in parallel, extracted in 0.1% NP-40, 0.05 M Hepes (pH 7.5), and 0.005 M EDTA. Protein contents of extracts were determined using the Bradford reagent; and 50 μg of protein was electrophoresed on 3–8% Nu-PAGE gels (Life Technologies, Grand Island, NY) M. Jasin (Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Institute, NewYork, NY), transferred to polyvinylidene fluoride membranes, and immunoblotted using antibody specific to BRCA1(400–1,100). Densitometry analysis was performed from immunoblots using Kodak 1D software (Eastman Kodak Company, Rochester, NY).  Statistical Analysis of Results  The raw results in the SSA assay for the missense substitutions were compared with the control samples (either GL2 siRNA or BRCA1 siRNA with BRCA1-wt add back) using the unpaired Student’s t-test and obtained the one-tail P values; for intermediate-phenotype mutants, besides the above-mentioned comparisons, we also conducted the unpaired Student’s t-test against the control sample that contains BRCA1 siRNA with empty vector adding back, and obtained the one-tail P values. P values of less than 0.01 were considered significant.  Go to: Results Function of BRCA1 Variants in DNA Break Repair by Homologous Recombination  The BRCA1 protein has been shown to be a critical component of the response to DSBs. Cellular machinery can utilize homologous sequences to accurately repair the DSB, or the free ends can be joined by nonhomologous end joining. In addition to homologous recombination, the pathway of SSA exists by which the repair proteins resect DNA from the free ends of the DSB, and when short stretches of homologous sequence are exposed, then the DNA ends are rejoined [Stark et al., 2004]. The homologous recombination assay used in this study was based on a method developed by the Jasin laboratory in which a single integrated genomic locus contains two inactive GFP genes, and one of these contains the endonuclease cleavage site for the rare-cutting I-SceI enzyme [Pierce et al., 2001]. Upon expression of I-SceI in the cell, one inactive allele of GFP is cut, and if homologous recombination occurs using the second inactive GFP gene as the homology template, then the DNA repair results in gene conversion making the GFP gene become active (Fig. 1A). The SSA assay is based on an analogous strategy in which the GFP protein is not expressed because of intervening DNA sequence, with an I-SceI site at the 3′ end of the intervening DNA. Upon expression of the I-SceI endonuclease, the DSB is generated, and resection of the intervening sequence reveals homologous GFP sequences that are aligned and repaired [Stark et al., 2004] (Fig. 1B). These two processes depend on sequence homologies for the repair, but there are functional differences. The Rad51 and BRCA2 proteins are required for the homology-directed recombination (HDR) assay, but are not required for the SSA assay [Moynahan et al., 2001; Stark et al., 2004].  Figure 1 Figure 1 The double-strand DNA break (DSB) repair assay system. A: The HDR recombination substrate [Pierce et al. 2001] is diagrammed. The upstream GFP allele is defective because of the inclusion of an I-SceI site in its sequence. The downstream GFP allele is ... For each assay, we have established HeLa-derived cell lines with the published recombination substrate [Pierce et al., 2001; Stark et al., 2004] integrated in the genome at a single site. The HeLa-DR cell line assays HDR, and the HeLa–SSA cell line is used to assay SSA. The HDR and the SSA assays have a similar experimental design with a depletion of BRCA1 by transfection of a siRNA that is specific for the 3′-UTR of the BRCA1 mRNA. We cotransfect a BRCA1 expression plasmid that is not affected by the siRNA and which expresses the variant BRCA1 protein. After 2 days, we repeat the transfection and also transfect a plasmid that encodes the expression of the I-SceI endonuclease to generate the DSB in the presence of the variant BRCA1. After 3 days, we assay the cells for GFP expression by flow cytometry. The timeline of the experiment is shown in Figure 1C.  We have previously analyzed 16 variants of BRCA1 in a tissue-culture-cell-based assay for repair of DSBs via homologous recombination [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Using the HeLa-DR cell line developed by us, up to 20% of the cells convert to GFP positive. This high level of recombination enables the quantitative analysis of variants in BRCA1 in this process. The endogenous BRCA1 mRNA is depleted by siRNA targeting the 3′-UTR, and a BRCA1 variant that is resistant to the siRNA is simultaneously expressed from a plasmid [Parvin et al., 2011; Ransburgh, et al., 2010]. A quantitative measure of the function of the BRCA1 variant is determined from the percentage of cells that convert to GFP positive.  In this study, we first analyzed an additional 13 BRCA1 variants for function in HDR (Fig. 2). Twelve of the BRCA1 variants spanned amino acid residue 90 through 191 and were identified from the Breast Information Core (http://research.nhgri.nih.gov/bic/). These were expressed from the plasmid as full-length proteins. All 12 variants are listed in the BIC as having unknown phenotype with regard to predisposition to breast cancer. Several of these have been evaluated using a multifactorial classification system, and of these 12 variants, seven were nonpathogenic [Lindor et al., 2012]. These were chosen because the function of this domain was unknown and because many of these variants have been reported to be nonpathogenic. By testing the known nonpathogenic variants in this assay, we provide a specificity control for the functional test. The 13th variant tested is a known deleterious mutant in the carboxy terminus of the BRCA1 protein, M1775R. In these experiments, the percentage of cells that were GFP positive when transfected with the control siRNA and the control plasmid were set equal to 1%. All other results were normalized to this control, and all results were from three or more separate experiments. Depletion of BRCA1 and transfection with empty plasmid resulted in a value of 0.09 relative to the control (Fig. 2, lane 2). Thus, BRCA1 depletion has an over 10-fold effect reducing the level of homologous recombination. Depleting BRCA1 and transfecting a plasmid that expressed wild-type BRCA1 resulted in full restoration of homologous recombination (Fig. 2, lane 3). Among the variants with substitutions in residues from 90 to 191, all 12 functioned as wild type in the homologous recombination assay (Fig. 2, lanes 4–15) (P < 0.002 compared with depleted BRCA1). By contrast, the 13th tested missense substitution, a known pathogenic mutant BRCA1–M1775R, did not complement the depletion of BRCA1 in this assay (Fig. 2, lane 16) (Pv = 0.0014 compared with wild-type BRCA1).  Figure 2 Figure 2 Analysis of 13 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in the homology-directed repair assay. HeLa-DR cells were transfected with a siRNA that depleted the endogenous BRCA1 and with a plasmid that expressed the indicated BRCA1 variant. After generating a double-strand ... Function of 29 Variants of BRCA1 in the Repair of DNA Breaks by the SSA Pathway  The 16 BRCA1 variants that had previously been tested for function in homologous recombination [Ransburgh et al., 2010] and the 13 BRCA1 variants tested in this study (Fig. 2) were analyzed for function in SSA repair. The recombination substrate [Bennardo et al., 2008; Stark et al., 2004] was based on similar design as the homologous recombination substrate with the exception that restoration of GFP activity occurs when the two inactive GFP genes are repaired by SSA. HeLa cells were stably transfected with the SA–GFP construct, and a clone was selected that had no detectable background GFP signal. Upon transfection of the I-SceI-expressing plasmid, about 5–7% of cells became GFP positive, indicative of a functioning SSA pathway. Depletion of BRCA1 resulted in a decrease to about 1–2% GFP-positive cells (Fig. 3, lane 2), indicating a role for BRCA1 in the SSA repair pathway that had been previously observed [Stark et al., 2004]. Depletion of BRCA1 resulted in about 25% of the activity found in nondepleted cells. As had been observed with the homologous recombination assay, transfection of a plasmid expressing wild-type BRCA1 fully complemented the defect in SSA due to depletion of the endogenous BRCA1 (Fig. 3, lane 3). By contrast, depletion of endogenous BRCA1 and expression of a known pathogenic mutant of BRCA1, M1775R, was as defective in SSA as had been transfection of the empty vector (Fig. 3, lane 32). Similar to previous observations with the zinc-coordinating mutants of BRCA1, these residues were all required for SSA repair of double-strand breaks (Fig. 3, lanes: 6, 7, 10, 11, 13, 14, 16, and 17). As was found for the homologous recombination assay, the M18T variant and the T37R variant were defective for SSA repair. The L52F variant had reduced levels of SSA repair, approximately 69% of wild-type activity (Fig. 3, lane 15), although this value was not significantly different from wild type. The D67Y variant, a known nonpathogenic variant [Easton et al., 2007], was fully active in SSA repair (lane 18).  Figure 3 Figure 3 Analysis of 29 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in the SSA assay. HeLa–SSA cells were transfected as in Figure 2 with plasmids that express the 29 tested missense substitutions of BRCA1. Results of the fraction of cells that had converted to GFP ... Results diverged between the SSA and the homologous recombination assays for the variants in residues 90 through 191. The BRCA1–I90T variant functioned in the homologous recombination assay, but in the SSA assay, it was 47% as active as wild type (t-test for differing from wild-type P < 0.01; lane 20). The Y105C variant was statistically different from both wild-type BRCA1 and empty vector (indicated with both an asterisk and a cross; lane 21). This Y105C variant thus has intermediate phenotype, neither fully active nor fully defective. Similarly, the P142H, E143K, and the R170Q had intermediate phenotype (lanes 25, 26, and 28). The V191D variant was also defective for SSA repair (lane 31). Interestingly, the S153R and S186Y variants had diminished activity, but the change in activities was not statistically significant from the wild type. Thus, these variants were not scored as defective. Seven of the variants tested had assay-specific phenotypes, suggesting that how BRCA1 interacts with repair factors in the homologous recombination pathway is different from factors that BRCA1 binds in the SSA pathway.  When replacing the endogenous BRCA1 protein with a variant BRCA1, there is the concern that the expression levels be consistent with the levels of the endogenous in nondepleted cells. A defective phenotype could be masked by high levels of overexpression of the variant protein, or the phenotype of a functional protein might not be observed because of poor protein expression. The 16 variants with missense substitutions between residues 18 and 71 had been tested in HeLa-derived cells and the expression of each variant was similar to the endogenous in each case [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. For expression, we tested the missense substitutions between residues 90 and 191 and also residue 1775, and found that they all express approximately similarly as the endogenous BRCA1 (Fig. 4). Normalized results from densitometry analysis are presented beneath each lane. Protein from nontransfected cells and from control siRNA and empty vector transfected cells had similar amounts of BRCA1 protein (Fig. 4, lanes 1 and 2). Depletion of BRCA1 and add back with empty plasmid depleted the level of BRCA1 protein, which densitometry analysis indicated to be about 0.35 relative to the nontransfected cells (lane 3). All variants were detected at higher levels than the lysate from BRCA1-depleted cells. Some variants were expressed at higher levels than others, but at most 1.3-fold higher than the BRCA1 levels in nontransfected cells (compare, for example, lane 7 with lane 2). Because none of the BRCA1 variants were expressed at levels much higher than the endogenous BRCA1, in no case could the phenotype of a defective variant be masked by overexpression. The S186Y, V191D, and M1775R variants all had somewhat lower expression, but these lower levels of expression did not correlate with function in either homologous recombination or SSA repair. As an example, the S186Y variant was a low expresser (0.86 relative to control), but it was functional in both assays. We note that the M1775R mutant was expressed at lower levels (0.62 relative to endogenous BRCA1) than any other BRCA1 variant (lane 16). We interpret this level of expression to be similar to other variants and not an explanation for the defect in each double-strand break repair pathway. However, we cannot exclude the interpretation that the M1775R was defective in the DNA repair assays because there was lower BRCA1 expression of this isoform in our cells.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Analysis of the expression levels of 13 variants in HeLa–SSA cells. The expression levels of 16 previously tested BRCA1 substitution variants were tested in the HeLa-derived cell line [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Thirteen variants, with substitutions ... Comparison of Variants in Different Assays  The 29 BRCA1 variants analyzed in this study were compared for function in the two DNA repair assays and with available knowledge about cancer association (Table 1). Many of the variants were consistent across the two assays, but there were several variants demonstrating separation of function. All of the zinc-coordinating residues were required for function in both repair assays. The M18T variant was clearly defective, but it is currently classified as unknown clinical significance. There is one genetic model that classified this M18T variant as likely pathogenic (see below).  Table 1 Table 1 Summary of BRCA1 Variants Benchmarking Function to Clinical Relevance  Recently, a new classification system for variants has been proposed [Lindor et al., 2012; Plon et al., 2008]. According to this system, Class 1 denotes variants that are not pathogenic. Class 2 is likely nonpathogenic. Class 3 is uncertain. Class 4 is likely pathogenic (probability of being pathogenic is 0.95–0.99), and Class 5 is definitely pathogenic (probability >0.99). According to variants described in the [Lindor et al. (2012)] system, three of the variants in this study (M18T, C61G, and M1775R) were of Class 4, either likely pathogenic or definitely pathogenic. An additional five mutants are treated clinically as Class 5, pathogenic, (C39Y, C44F, C47G, C64G, and R71G). One of these pathogenic mutants, R71G, does not affect the BRCA1 protein, but rather the splicing of the mRNA [Vega et al., 2001]. Since the assays tested express BRCA1 from spliced cDNA, the R71G defective phenotype would not be detected. We thus exclude this mutant from the comparison of benchmarking these assays against known mutants. There were then seven pathogenic mutants (Class 4 or 5) analyzed and eight nonpathogenic variants (Class 1; Table 1). When comparing the results of our functional analyses with these previously classified variants, the HDR assay scored all seven pathogenic or likely pathogenic mutants as defective, and all eight nonpathogenic variants as functional. The results of the assay were, in the case of every variant, either fully active or fully defective (see examples in Fig. 2). To date, no variant tested in the HDR assay produced an intermediate score.  Compared with these benchmarks, the variants tested in the SSA assay did not score as well as the HDR assay. All pathogenic mutants were defective for SSA repair of double-strand breaks, but one nonpathogenic variant (I124V) was defective for SSA, and three Class 1 variants had intermediate phenotype in the SSA assay. Although the HDR assay was both highly sensitive and highly specific, the SSA assay was highly sensitive at association with cancer risk, but it was less specific. Of interest, it had been noted that four BRCA1 variants, Y105C, P142H, E143K, and Y179C, had decreased accumulation at the sites of DNA breaks [Wei et al., 2008]. Although these variants were normal for HDR, three of these had intermediate levels of function in the SSA assay (Table 1). Perhaps there is a link between the accumulation of BRCA1 at DNA repair sites and a factor important for the SSA assay.  Go to: Discussion Functional Assays as Predictive Tools for Assessing BRCA1 Variants  In this study, we analyzed a total of 29 BRCA1 variants in the repair of DSBs by homologous recombination and by SSA. For the sake of this discussion, we exclude the BRCA1–R71G variant that affects splicing [Vega et al., 2001] because all of our assays used prespliced cDNAs and would not be sensitive to a splicing defect. By comparing our results with those BRCA1 missense substitutions that have a known effect on breast cancer predisposition, we found that the HDR assay was 100% accurate: seven previously classified pathogenic mutants were defective for HDR, and eight previously classified nonpathogenic variants in BRCA1 were functional for HDR. Further, the results for the HDR assay were either fully active or fully defective. We interpret these results to indicate that the HDR assay is validated as a predictive tool for assessing BRCA1 variants.  By contrast to the HDR assay, the function of BRCA1 variants in the repair of DSBs by SSA had a number of differences that diminished the accuracy of this assay. On the basis of the benchmarks of variants that were classified using a genetic model [Lindor et al., 2012], the SSA assay was sensitive because it did not misclassify any pathogenic variants, but it was not specific because it misclassified several nonpathogenic variants as either intermediate or defective. Interpretation of the SSA assay was also complicated by intermediate results; by comparison, the HDR assay had no intermediate results among the 29 variants tested. It is possible, but remains to be determined, whether missense variants that are proficient for HDR, but deficient or intermediate for SSA, confer a lower or moderate risk of cancer. We thus conclude that the HDR assay is a more reliable predictive tool for assessing the function of BRCA1 variants than is the SSA assay.  We had previously performed a similar analysis of the control of centrosome duplication by BRCA1 variant proteins [Kais et al., 2012]. Fewer variants of the BRCA1 protein were analyzed in this earlier study using the centrosome assay, but it has several differences from the HDR assay. With regard to those variants with inferred breast cancer association, the centrosome duplication assay had an intermediate result for the BRCA1–D67Y variant, which is nonpathogenic. The T37R variant was defective for both DNA repair assays, but was functional in control of the centrosome duplication. Five amino acid residues away, the I42V variant had the opposite pattern as T37R, with defective centrosome control but fully functional in both DNA repair assays. Experimentally, the centrosome regulation assay is much more difficult to perform than the HDR assay, making it not as desirable an assay for analysis of BRCA1 variants. In addition, the centrosome assay appears, based on the limited set of variants, to be less accurate than the HDR assay. On the contrary, like the SSA, none of the tested seven variants that were previously classified as Class 4 or 5, were functional in the centrosomal assay, suggesting that this assay is sensitive.  It will be necessary to analyze many more variants in the HDR assay and then compare those results with the clinical experiences before this assay can be used for clinical interpretation. On the basis of the accuracy of the currently tested variants, we believe that the HDR assay will help with difficult to classify variants of unknown significance.  Functional Assays for Probing BRCA1 Residues Important in Biological Function  Separate from the clinical utility of the different functional tests, important biological information about the BRCA1 protein is available from the various functional assays. Very little structure–function information exists for BRCA1, and there have been limited systematic analyses of the effects of BRCA1 amino acid variants in a given function. A variety of variants have been analyzed in the context of short BRCA1 amino-terminal truncations for ubiquitin ligase activity [Morris et al., 2006]. In a similar vein, a variety of variants in the context of a short BRCA1 carboxy-terminal fragment have been analyzed for the activation of transcription [Carvalho et al., 2007; Lee et al., 2010]. Several variants in the context of the full-length protein have been analyzed in terms of resistance to ionizing radiation [Ruffner et al., 2001] and reversal of a lethal phenotype in murine embryonic stem cells [Chang et al., 2009].  We find that there are some discordancies between functional assays of the variants. The most striking are at T37R and I42V. BRCA1–T37R was defective for both DNA repair processes, but was fully functional for control of centrosomes. Conversely, BRCA1–I42V was defective for control of centrosome duplication [Kais et al., 2012] but functional in the DNA repair processes. From this result, we hypothesize that the protein–BRCA1 contacts in the DNA repair pathways depend on the T37 residue, whereas a different protein–BRCA1 contact is important for regulating the centrosome duplication. Such a notion is possible because the centrosome regulation occurs in the cytoplasm and the DNA repair occurs in the nucleus, and it is reasonable to suppose that different proteins are involved.  There were variants that distinguished between BRCA1 residues important for DSB repair by homologous recombination versus SSA. The observed differences between the SSA and HDR assays involved residues from 90 to 191. Several of these (Y105C, P142H, and E143K) that had intermediate phenotype in the SSA assay had been shown to have slow accumulation at sites of DSBs. Especially, P142H mutation abolished the association with Ku80 protein, which plays an important role in the repair of DSBs [Wei et al., 2008]. Perhaps the SSA pathway contributes to the accumulation of BRCA1 at sites of DNA damage in cells.  In summary, in this study, we evaluated missense variants of BRCA1 in two different DNA repair pathways. Data support that the function of BRCA1 in the HDR assay is consistent with the known cancer association of these variants, and we suggest that this test is predictive for breast cancer. By contrast, the repair of DNA by the related SSA pathway is not perfectly consistent with what is known about cancer predisposition, and the SSA assay yields intermediate results. On the basis of these current results, we suggest that the HDR assay is validated for predicting whether substitution at any residue of BRCA1 is disease associated.  
2481||Mutations in BRCA1 and BRCA2 account for the majority of hereditary breast and ovarian cancers, and therefore sequence analysis of both genes is routinely conducted in patients with early-onset breast cancer. Besides mutations that clearly abolish protein function or are known to increase cancer risk, a large number of sequence variants of uncertain signifi cance (VUS) have been identifi ed. Although several functional assays for BRCA1 VUSs have been described, thus far it has not been possible to conduct a high-throughput analysis in the context of the full-length protein. We have developed a relatively fast and easy cDNA-based functional assay to classify BRCA1 VUSs based on their ability to functionally complement BRCA1-defi cient mouse embryonic stem cells. Using this assay, we have analyzed 74 unclassifi ed BRCA1 missense mutants for which all predicted pathogenic variants are confi ned to the BRCA1 RING and BRCT domains.  SIGNIFICANCE: BRCA1 VUSs are frequently found in patients with hereditary breast or ovarian cancer and present a serious problem for clinical geneticists. This article describes the generation, validation, and application of a reliable high-throughput assay for the functional classifi cation of BRCA1 sequence variants of uncertain signifi cance. Cancer Discov; 3(10); 1142–55. ©2013 AACR.  Authors’ Affi liations: 1 Division of Molecular Pathology and Cancer Genomics Centre and 2 Department of Pathology, The Netherlands Cancer Institute Amsterdam, The Netherlands; and 3 TaconicArtemis GmbH, Cologne, Germany  Note: Supplementary data for this article are available at Cancer Discovery Online (http://cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org/).  Current address for C. Klijn: Genentech Inc., South San Francisco, California.  Corresponding Author: Jos Jonkers, The Netherlands Cancer Institute, Plesmanlaan 121, Amsterdam, 1066 CX, The Netherlands. Phone: 31-20- 5122000; Fax: 31-20-5122050; E-mail: j.jonkers@nki.nl doi: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094 ©2013 American Association for Cancer Research.  INTRODUCTION  Germline loss-of-function mutations in BRCA1 and BRCA2 are known to result in an approximately tenfold increased lifetime risk of developing breast or ovarian cancer. Thus far, no other genes have been identifi ed with such a strong link to hereditary breast and ovarian cancer (HBOC), and in the past decades, many women have been screened for germline mutations in BRCA1 or BRCA2 . This has resulted in the identifi cation of numerous pathogenic mutations as well as a large number of sequence variants for which the clinical relevance is not clear. In the most recent publication of the ENIGMA (Evidence-based Network for the Interpretation of Germline Mutant Alleles) group, an international consortium for the evaluation of BRCA1 or BRCA2 sequence variants, a total of 1,273 unique BRCA1 variants is mentioned ( 1 ), but this number may increase even further because of the implementation of high-throughput sequencing methods. Of the BRCA1 variants of uncertain signifi cance (VUS), 920 are nontruncating exonic mutations that may affect protein function or mRNA splicing, but for which there is not enough linkage information to indicate whether they are pathogenic. To aid genetic counseling of individuals with BRCA1/2 VUS, both genetic and functional classifi cation methods have been developed. Genetic analysis of BRCA1 or BRCA2 VUSs relies on cosegregation with disease, cooccurrence with known pathogenic mutations, and family history of cancer. These data have been integrated into computational models to calculate the likelihood that a VUS is disease-causing ( 2 ). Additional in silico analysis of the evolutionary conservation of the amino acids affected by the mutation and the predicted impact of the mutant amino acids on protein folding are also implemented in such models. Functional assays do not rely on preexisting data, but directly test the effect of BRCA1/2 VUSs on known functions of the encoded proteins ( 3 ). Although this may seem relatively straightforward, it can be diffi cult to extrapolate data from functional assays into cancer risks for patients. For instance, in most assays only part of the BRCA1 protein is analyzed. In addition, some of the more elegant assays are technically demanding and not suitable to analyze large numbers of mutations. We reasoned that a good functional assay should fulfi ll three basic requirements: (i) it should investigate the biologic effects of a BRCA1 VUS in the context of the full-length protein; (ii) it should be conducted under normal physiologic conditions in a noncancerous cell type; and (iii) it should be based on a highly standardized and reproducible protocol.  These considerations led us to develop a functional assay based on physiologic expression of full-length human BRCA1 cDNA in mouse embryonic stem cells that are genetically engineered to allow conditional deletion of endogenous Brca1 . Mutant BRCA1 cDNAs are generated using site-directed mutagenesis (SDM) and introduced in a defi ned genomic locus of mouse embryonic stem cells by recombinase-mediated cassette exchange (RMCE). In this way, we have analyzed 86 BRCA1 variants for their effects on cell proliferation and drug sensitivity, including 74 clinically relevant VUSs.  RESULTS  Generation of Mouse Embryonic Stem Cells Expressing BRCA1 Sequence Variants  Although BRCA1-defi cient tumor cells proliferate rapidly in situ , loss of BRCA1 in normal cells leads to a severe proliferation defect ( 4 ). We decided to make use of this phenotype for the functional analysis of BRCA1 variants in Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1144 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. Brca1 -selectable conditional knockout (SCo) mouse embryonic stem cells ( 5 ). These cells carry one Brca1 -null allele and a selectable conditional Brca1SCo allele, which contains, in addition to loxP sites around exons 5–6, a split puromycin resistance marker that is activated upon Cre-mediated deletion of exons 5–6. They also contain a CreERT2 allele in the Rosa26 locus, which allows for controlled activation of Cre via administration of 4-hydroxy tamoxifen (4-OHT). Thus, BRCA1-defi cient embryonic stem cells can be easily obtained via 4-OHT–induced inactivation of the Brca1SCo allele and subsequent selection for puromycin resistance ( Fig.  1 ; ref.  5 ). To allow effi cient integration of human BRCA1 variants in one specifi c genomic locus, we supplied the other Rosa26 allele with F3 and Frt recombination sites for RMCE by the site-specifi c recombinase Flp ( Fig.  1 and Supplementary Fig. S1; ref. 6 ). Cells that have undergone successful RMCE can be selected because they express a truncated neomycin selection marker under control of the endogenous Rosa26 promoter, which further increases targeting effi ciency. Flpmediated recombination ensures single-copy integration of BRCA1 expression constructs at the same Rosa26 locus, thus avoiding position-effect variegation and copy number– dependent differences in expression.  RMCE vectors were equipped with a human BRCA1 cDNA expression construct, which was modifi ed using SDM to introduce defi ned mutations in BRCA1 . The focus of our analysis was on Dutch and Belgian VUSs that were found in families with HBOC. We also included a number of variants  Figure 1.   Schematic overview of the RMCE procedure in R26 CreERT2/RMCE ; Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells. Before the introduction of a human BRCA1 cDNA, R26 CreERT2/RMCE ; Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells are mouse BRCA1-profi cient and sensitive to both neomycin and puromycin. Targeting of singlecopy human BRCA1 cDNA variants to the Rosa26 locus by Flp RMCE results in expression of human BRCA1 and neomycin resistance. Addition of 4-OHT leads to CreERT2-mediated deletion of mouse Brca1 exons 5 and 6, resulting in loss of mouse BRCA1 protein and concomitant expression of puromycin from the phosphoglycerate kinase (PGK) promoter. This enables selection of mouse BRCA1-defi cient, human BRCA1-expressing R26 CreERT2/hBRCA1 ; Brca1Δ/Δ embryonic stem cells that can be used in functional complementation assays. R26 CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1SCo/Δ R26CreERT2/hBRCA1;Brca1SCo/Δ R26CreERT2/hBRCA1;Brca1Δ/Δ 3 5–6 3 5–6 7–8 3 3 14 7–8 7–8 3 7–8 5–6 Introduction of human BRCA1 by RMCE 3 14 SA SA Brca1SCo5–6 Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26RMCE Brca1Δ5–6 Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26hBRCA1 Brca1SCo5–6 Brca1SCo5–6 Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26RMCE Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26hBRCA1 3 14 CreERT2 CreERT2 CreERT2 CreERT2 Puro Puro Puro PGK PGK PGK Puro PGK zsgreen Hyg FLP zsgreen Hyg FLP SA SA NeoR Selection hBRCA1–, mBrca1+, neoS, puroS hBRCA1+, mBrca1+, neoR, puroS hBRCA1+, mBrca1–, neoR, puroR pA hBRCA1 hBRCA1 EF1α EF1α Δ5′ neo Δ5′ neo Δ5′ neo EF1α hBRCA1 Cre-mediated deletion of mouse Brca1 by 4-OHT addition 3 14 PuroR Selection SA SA SA SA Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1145 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE that were previously classifi ed using functional assays ( 7, 8 ) or a multifactorial likelihood model ( 9 ), as well as M1400V, L1407P, and M1411T, which have been reported to attenuate the interaction between BRCA1 and PALB2 ( 10 ). To allow validation of our functional complementation assay, we included a series of eight BRCA1 variants that are known to be deleterious or neutral according to the Breast Cancer Information Core database (BIC; http://research.nhgri .nih.gov/bic/ ; Supplementary Table S1). These controls include the well-known pathogenic BRCA1 founder mutations 185delAG and 5382insC and the neutral polymorphisms Y105C, R866C, and E1250K. The BIC designation is supported by the classifi cation according to the International Agency for Research on Cancer ( http://iarc.fr/ ), which includes the Align-GVGD score that indicates biophysical and evolutionary alterations ( http://agvgd.iarc.fr/ ; Supplementary Table S1; refs. 11, 12 ). Align-GVGD scores vary between C0 (likely neutral) and C65 (likely deleterious). Sequence-verifi ed constructs that contained the intended VUS, but no other BRCA1 mutations, were transfected into R26 CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells to undergo RMCE ( Fig.  2 ). Neomycin-resistant clones were pooled and RMCE was confi rmed by PCR analysis. Subsequently, protein expression of the human BRCA1 variants was analyzed by Western blot analysis with a human BRCA1-specifi c antibody ( Fig. 2 and Supplementary Fig. S2). Comparison with BRCA1 protein levels in embryonic stem cells expressing human BRCA1 from a bacterial artifi cial chromosome (BAC), which is known to rescue embryonic lethality of Brca1 -null mice ( 7 ,  13 ), showed that transcription of the human BRCA1 cDNA from the EF1A gene promoter results in physiologic levels of BRCA1 protein (Supplementary Fig.  S1). Most BRCA1 variants were expressed at equal levels, allowing comparison of their functional activities. A number of C-terminal BRCA1 mutants showed low levels of expression (Supplementary Table S2; Supplementary Fig. S2). Real-time RT-PCR analysis showed that decreased protein expression was not caused by decreased mRNA expression (Supplementary Fig.  S3), suggesting that the low abundance of BRCA1 protein results from posttranslational events. In fact, for most of these variants, mutation-associated protein instability has already been documented in previous publications (refs. 8 , 14 , 15 ; Supplementary Table S2).  Functional Complementation Assay of BRCA1 Sequence Variants in Mouse Brca1 -Null Embryonic Stem Cells  As a fi rst functional test, we assayed the ability of BRCA1 variants to restore the proliferation defect of switched R26 CreERT2/RMCE ;Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells ( Fig.  2 ). Expression of endogenous mouse Brca1 was shut off through overnight induction of Cre activity by 4-OHT, and 7 days  Figure 2.   Workfl ow for the functional classifi cation of BRCA1 sequence variants in Brca1 -null embryonic stem (ES) cells. Outline of the generation of mouse Brca1 -defi cient embryonic stem cells expressing human BRCA1 variants and functional complementation assays. Indicated are the experimental steps and the time it takes one person to analyze 20 mutants. Introduction of BRCA1 variants in R26CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1SCo/D ES cells BRCA1 Construct + G418 Selection of clones with correct RMCE BRCA1 Expression analysis SDM and sequencing RMCE in ES cells x + 4-OHT + Puromycin Functional assays Functional assays Cre-Mediated deletion of Brca1SCo allele Proliferation and cisplatin sensitivity assays Selection of Brca1ΔSCo/Δ ES cells Timecourse for the analysis of 20 BRCA1 variants Weeks 0 1 2 7 3 8 4 5 6 SDM and RMCE Functional assays Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1146 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. after switching, cells were plated in 96-well plates for proliferation assays, and were analyzed using Sulphorhodamine B staining. For each group of mutants tested, we included positive and negative controls consisting of embryonic stem cells containing, respectively, wild-type human BRCA1 cDNA and an empty RMCE vector. BRCA1 variants were evaluated on their ability to support growth compared with these controls (Supplementary Tables S3 and S4). Although we tested 28 mutations in the central domain encoded by exon 11 (aa 224–1366), BRCA1 variants that were unable to rescue the proliferation defect of Brca1 -null mouse embryonic stem cells to BRCA1 wild-type levels were confi ned to the conserved N- and C-terminal domains of BRCA1.  Cisplatin Sensitivity Assay for Classifi cation of BRCA1 Variants  Although the ability of BRCA1 variants to support proliferation appears to be indicative of VUS function, results were not always clear-cut (Supplementary Tables S3 and S4). BRCA1 is known to be important for DNA interstrand crosslink (ICL) repair through mechanisms that are both dependent ( 5 ) and independent ( 16 ) of its function in homologous recombination (HR). The role of BRCA1 in ICL repair is stressed by the occurrence of genetic reversion mutations restoring BRCA1 protein expression in platinum-resistant ovarian tumors in BRCA1 -mutation carriers ( 17, 18 ). We therefore decided to conduct a 96-well–based cisplatin sensitivity assay to allow a more stringent evaluation of BRCA1 VUS functionality.  Half-maximal inhibitory concentrations (IC 50 ) of cisplatin were determined using a resazurin cell viability assay, and BRCA1 variants were again classifi ed in comparison to wildtype BRCA1 and an empty RMCE vector. To obtain corrected cisplatin IC 50 values, we fi tted a log-logistic curve constrained at 1 and 0. We excluded a fi t if the residual squared error (RSE) exceeded 0.1. We then applied a Bayesian predictor to classify BRCA1 VUS as pathogenic or benign. Most variants that showed less than wild-type activity in the proliferation assay also scored as functionally impaired in the cisplatin sensitivity assay and were classifi ed as deleterious ( Table 1 ,  Table 1.   Functional classifi cation of BRCA1 VUS based on cisplatin response Variant DNA change Type of mutation a Classifi cation S4F c.11C>T VUS Not Clear M18T c.53T>C VUS Deleterious 185delAG c.68_69delAG Deleterious control Deleterious b K45Q c.133A>C VUS Neutral C61G c.181T>G Deleterious control Deleterious C64G c.190T>G VUS Deleterious b D67Y c.199G>T VUS Neutral Y105C c.314A>G Neutral control Neutral N132K c.396C>A VUS Neutral P142H c.425C>A VUS Neutral L147F c.441G>C VUS Neutral L165P c.494T>C VUS Neutral R170W c.508C>T VUS Neutral S186Y c.557C>A VUS Neutral V191I c.571G>A VUS Neutral T231M c.692C>T VUS Neutral D245V c.734A>T VUS Neutral L246V c.736T>G VUS Neutral V271L c.811G>C VUS Neutral S308A c.922A>G; c.923G>C Artifi cial h Not Clear L358R; C360R; E362H c.1073T>G; c.1078T>C; c.1084G>C; c.1086G>T Artifi cial Neutral L668F c.2002C>T VUS Neutral D695N c.2083G>A VUS Neutral P798L c.2393C>T VUS Neutral N810Y c.2428A>T VUS Neutral T826K c.2477C>A VUS Neutral (continued) Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1147 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE (continued) Variant DNA change Type of mutation a Classifi cation R841Q c.2522G>A VUS Neutral Y856H c.2566T>C VUS Neutral R866C c.2596C>T Neutral control Neutral S988A c.2962T>G Artifi cial Neutral M1008I c.3024G>A VUS Neutral E1060A c.3179A>C VUS Neutral S1101N c.3302G>A VUS Neutral K1110del c.3328_3330delAAG VUS Neutral S1140G c.3418A>G VUS Neutral E1214K c.3640G>A VUS Neutral N1236K c.3708T>G VUS Neutral E1250K c.3748G>A Neutral control Neutral L1267S c.3800T>C VUS Neutral E1282V c.3845A>T VUS Neutral S1297del c.3891_3893delTTC VUS Neutral S1301R c.3903T>A VUS Neutral E1346K c.4036G>A VUS Neutral V1378I c.4132G>A VUS Neutral M1400V c.4198A>G VUS Neutral L1407P c.4220T>C VUS Neutral b M1411T c.4232T>C VUS Neutral R1443G c.4327C>G VUS Neutral S1448G c.4342A>G VUS Neutral S1486C c.4456A>T VUS Neutral S1497A c.4489T>G Artifi cial Neutral V1534M c.4600G>A VUS Neutral R1589P c.4766G>C VUS Neutral M1628T c.4883T>C VUS Neutral S1651P c.4951T>C VUS Not Clear S1651F c.4952C>T VUS Not Clear M1652I c.4956G>A VUS Neutral S1655F c.4964C>T VUS Deleterious b H1686R c.5057A>G VUS Deleterious H1686Q c.5058T>A VUS Deleterious V1688del c.5062_5064delGTT VUS Deleterious T1691I c.5072C>T VUS Not clear R1699W c.5095C>T Deleterious control Deleterious b R1699Q c.5096G>A VUS Deleterious b G1706E c.5117G>A VUS Deleterious b G1706A c.5117G>C VUS Neutral A1708E c.5123C>A Deleterious control Deleterious W1718C c.5154G>T VUS Deleterious T1720A c.5158A>G VUS Neutral E1735K c.5203G>A VUS Not clear  Table 1.   Functional classifi cation of BRCA1 VUS based on cisplatin response (Continued) Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1148 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al.  Fig. 3 ). Variants showing increased cisplatin sensitivity were tested at least twice before they were classifi ed. The positive and negative controls classifi ed as expected, although the known pathogenic truncation mutation 5382insC scored as neutral in one of three assays, stressing the need for repeat experiments. Also BRCA1 variants that were previously tested in other assays conducted as expected. It should be noted that the artifi cial variants S308A and S1497A rescued proliferation and cisplatin responses of mouse Brca1 - defi cient embryonic stem cells in BAC complementation assays, but are predicted to be deleterious based on their effects on embryonic stem cell differentiation and their response to γ-irradiation, respectively ( 7 ). The V1804D mutation scored as a neutral variant in our assay, which is in line with most published data ( 8, 9 ), except for the results of an embryonic stem cell–based BAC complementation assay ( 7 ). Again, all BRCA1 mutations that were classifi ed as deleterious were confi ned to regions encoding the conserved N- and C-terminal domains ( Fig.  4 ), despite the observation that deletion of the central region encoded by exon 11 leads to genetic instability in mice ( 12 ). Remarkably, the three mutations that diminish the interaction between BRCA1 and PALB2 ( 10 ), just C-terminal of the region encoded by exon 11, had no effect on cisplatin sensitivity in this assay. Of note, there was in general good correlation between our classifi cation and the Align-GVGD score (Supplementary Table S4). Notable exceptions were the neutral control variant R866C, which validated our assay but scored as likely deleterious (C65) using Align-GVGD, and G1770V, which scored as likely neutral (C0) by Align-GVGD but was classi- fi ed as deleterious in our assay. Our assay also classifi ed some variants for which the Align-GVGD scores were less clear, emphasizing the usefulness of functional assays to complement in silico analysis.  We also analyzed the possible effects of all BRCA1 variants on mRNA splicing, which may have deleterious consequences but cannot be assessed in our cDNA-based assay. The predictive value for exonic variants outside the consensus splice sites is questionable ( 19, 20 ), but four missense mutations were present in existing splice sites (Supplementary Table S4). Although c.5154G>T (encoding W1718C) was deleterious, three of these variants were classifi ed as neutral in our assay. One of them, c.441G>C (encoding L147F), had an increased probability to damage the splice donor site of exon 7. Another variant, c.5072C>T (encoding T1691I), might also affect splicing, but no defect was measured in blood samples of mutation carriers ( 19 ). The third exonic splice site mutation that was classifi ed as neutral in our cisplatin sensitivity assay, c.133A>C (K45Q), is not predicted to lead to aberrant splicing.  Results from Proliferation and Cisplatin Sensitivity Assays Correlate with HR Activity of BRCA1 Variants  BRCA1 and BRCA2 are involved in DNA repair via HR ( 12 , 21 ). Together with non-homologous end joining (NHEJ), HR forms the cellular defense against DNA double-strand breaks (DSB), a severe type of DNA damage that is lethal if unrepaired. Although HR is essentially error-free, NHEJ is error-prone, and therefore defects in HR are known to lead to genomic instability. Although it is not clear whether other Variant DNA change Type of mutation a Classifi cation V1736A c.5207T>C VUS Not clear b D1739G c.5216A>G VUS Deleterious D1739V c.5216A>T VUS Deleterious H1746Q c.5238C>G VUS Not clear R1753T c.5258G>C VUS Not clear b 5382insC c.5266dupC Deleterious control Not clear b L1764P c.5291T>C VUS Deleterious b C1767S c.5300G>C VUS Neutral G1770V c.5309G>T VUS Deleterious b W1782C c.5346G>T VUS Neutral A1789T c.5365G>A VUS Deleterious E1794D c.5382G>C VUS Neutral V1804D c.5411T>A VUS Neutral P1812R c.5435C>G VUS Neutral W1837R c.5509T>C VUS Deleterious H1862L c.5585A>T VUS Neutral a Type of mutation indicates if a variant is a VUS according to the BIC database (http://research.nhgri.nih.gov/bic/). b Functionally impaired in the DR-GFP and/or combined PARP inhibitor/cisplatin sensitivity assay.  Table 1.   Functional classifi cation of BRCA1 VUS based on cisplatin response (Continued) Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1149 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE  Figure 3.   Waterfall chart of cisplatin IC 50 values normalized for wild-type human BRCA1 and empty RMCE vector controls. Corrected cisplatin IC 50 values for all tested human BRCA1 variants and controls, including repeat experiments. BRCA1 variants are classifi ed as functionally impaired or neutral when the corrected IC 50 values are similar to either the empty RMCE vector or the wild-type human BRCA1 controls ( P < 0.05). 4.0 –3.0 –2.0 –1.0 0.0 1.0 2.0 3.0 Corrected cisplatin IC50 (a.u.) Mutant hBRCA1 Wild-type hBRCA1 Empty RMCE vector Positive control Negative control  Figure 4.   Predicted pathogenic BRCA1 amino acid substitutions are confi ned to the evolutionarily conserved N- and C-terminal domains. Schematic representation of the BRCA1 protein with the positions of variants classifi ed as neutral (green) or deleterious (red) indicated. Positive and negative controls are depicted by open pinheads and the known deleterious truncation mutations 185delAG (N-terminal) and 5382insC (C-terminal) are marked in blue. The amino acid sequences of the evolutionarily conserved RING (N-terminal) and BRCT (C-terminal) domains are specifi ed to show the exact positions of deleterious (red) and neutral (green) variants. The amino acid substitutions or nonsense (X) mutations of positive and negative controls are encircled. RING domain BRCT domains Deleterious VUS Neutral VUS Deleterious truncation mutant Deleterious control variant Neutral control variant 1646 1706 1766 91 109 1826 1863 61 31 1 MDLSALRVEEVQNVINAMQKILECPICLEL VNKRMSMVVSGLTPEEFMLVYKFARKHHITLTNLITEETTHVVMKTDAEFVCERTLKYFL IKEPVSTKCDHIFCKFCMLKLLNQKKGPSQ GIAGGKWVVSYFWVTQSIKERKMLNEHDFEVRGDVVNGRNHQGPKRARESQDRKIFRGLE CPLCKNDITKRSLQESTRFSQLVEELLKII CAFQLDTGLEYANSYNFAK ICCYGPFTNMPTDQLEWMVQLCGASVVKELSSFTLGTGVHPIVVVQPDAWTEDNGFHAIG QMCEAPVVTREWVLDSVALYQCQELDTYLIPQIPHSHY T Q E C A X Y C GG F R - Q W Q I E A V R L S C D DR T V P G X Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1150 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. functions of BRCA1 are also important for tumor suppression ( 16 , 22 , 23–26 ), its role in HR is likely to be relevant. Therefore, we used the direct repeat (DR)-GFP assay ( 27 ) to measure the effects on HR for a subset of our BRCA1 VUSs. A number of predicted pathogenic variants and controls were shuttled into R26 CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1 SCo/Δ ;Pim1 DR-GFP/wt embryonic stem cells carrying the DR-GFP reporter in the Pim1 locus. Expression of endogenous mouse Brca1 was switched off, and cells were transfected with a plasmid encoding the I-SceI meganuclease as well as an mCherry fl uorescent marker to control for transfection effi ciency. Repair of I-SceI–induced DNA DSBs in DR-GFP via HR leads to expression of GFP, which can be monitored by fl ow cytometry. All but one of the predicted pathogenic variants tested resulted in defective HR, thereby confi rming our functional classifi cation ( Fig. 5 ). The only predicted deleterious variant that did not signifi cantly differ from wild-type BRCA1 , R1699Q, seemed to support intermediate levels of HR activity.  PARP Inhibitor Sensitivity Assay for Classifi cation of BRCA1 Variants with Intermediate Activity  Deleterious effects of variants with intermediate or partial activity may escape detection in certain functional assays. Although cisplatin sensitivity assays allow robust and  Figure 5.  BRCA1 sequence variants classifi ed as pathogenic do not restore HR. R26 CreERT2/hBRCA1; Brca1 SCo/Δ;Pim1 DR-GFP/wt embryonic stem cells carrying the DR-GFP reporter gene in the Pim1 locus and mutant BRCA1 or controls in the Rosa26 locus were switched using 4-OHT and transfected with a vector expressing I-SceI and mCherry. Transfected cells were analyzed for GFP expression as a measure of HR activity. Expression of BRCA1 wild-type (WT) cDNA resulted in increased HR compared to the empty RMCE vector (Vector) control. Error bars indicate the SD between the results of three independent I-SceI transfections. Signifi cantly decreased HR activity compared with the wild-type control (green line) is indicated. GFP-Positive cells (%) 0.0 0.5 1.0 1.5 2.0 2.5 3.0 3.5 4.0 4.5 ** ns ** * * ns * * * * * * * ns ns WT Vector 185delAG C64G V271L S1651F S1655F R1699Q R1699W G1706A G1706E V1736A R1753T 5382insC L1764P G1770V reproducible classifi cation of several functionally impaired BRCA1 variants, assays using other compounds may have additional value. It is known that BRCA1- and BRCA2- defi cient cells are extremely sensitive to PARP1 inhibition ( 28, 29 ), leading to a larger dynamic range between BRCA2- defi cient cells and isogenic BRCA2-profi cient controls than for cisplatin ( 30 ). We therefore tested complementation of PARP inhibitor sensitivity for a number of BRCA1 mutants and the BRCA1 wild-type control. Given the unexpected neutral effects of the M1400V, L1407P, and M1411T mutations in the PALB2 interaction domain, we decided to include these variants in this series, as well as the R1699Q and V1736A variants that have recently been shown to confer (intermediate) breast and ovarian cancer risk ( 31, 32 ). To allow direct comparison of results from different assays, we repeated the cisplatin sensitivity and proliferation assays in parallel to the olaparib sensitivity assay. Our results indicate that BRCA1 wild-type and empty vector controls indeed show a larger difference in sensitivity for olaparib than for cisplatin ( Fig.  6 ). However, this increase in dynamic range is accompanied by an increased variation between repeat experiments for BRCA1-profi cient samples. Nevertheless, the functional defect of the R1699Q and V1736A mutations becomes more evident, and there also Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1151 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE  Figure 6.   PARP inhibitor sensitivity assay of BRCA1 sequence variants. R26 CreERT2/hBRCA1 ;Brca1 SCo/Δ or R26CreERT2/RMCE; Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells carrying mutant BRCA1 , BRCA1 wild-type (WT), or empty RMCE vector (Vector) controls in the Rosa26 locus were switched using 4-OHT and assayed for sensitivity to cisplatin or the PARP inhibitor olaparib. The cytotoxicity assays were conducted in parallel and data were normalized to the average of the wild-type controls. Error bars indicate the SD between the results of biologic triplicates for which the cells were independently switched. Signifi cant deviation from the average IC 50 values of the wild-type control (green line) is indicated. IC50 Relative to WT controls (%) 0 20 40 60 80 100 120 140 160 Cisplatin Olaparib * **** **** * * ** *** **** ns ns ns ns WT Vector M1400V L1407P M1411T R1699Q V1736A seems to be a less than wild-type response for the PALB2 interaction mutant L1407P. In the concurrent proliferation analysis, R1699Q and V1736A both show an intermediate functional defect (Supplementary Fig.  S4). Also the M1411T mutation seems to affect the response to PARP inhibition, but the difference with BRCA1 wild-type is not signifi cant. Interestingly, the L1407P and M1411T variants have previously been shown to be more defective than M1400V in a gene conversion assay ( 10 ). It should also be noted that, in contrast with the large-scale classifi cation experiments, the cisplatin sensitivity assay conducted in parallel to the PARP inhibitor assay identifi ed signifi cant functional defects for L1407P and V1736A.  DISCUSSION  Over the past few years several functional assays for classifi cation of BRCA1 VUSs have been developed. Several of these assays are restricted to functions of the BRCA1 protein that reside in the evolutionarily conserved RING or BRCT domains. Examples include in vitro transactivation assays for BRCT peptides ( 8 ) and measurement of ubiquitin ligase activity for protein fragments encompassing the N-terminal RING domain ( 33 ). Other assays were designed to evaluate the functions of full-length mutant BRCA1 protein, either by monitoring general effects on proliferation or response to DNA damage ( 7 ), or by directly focusing on the role of BRCA1 in DNA repair via HR ( 34 ).  Because BRCA1 VUSs are not restricted to regions encoding the N- or C-terminal domains, and given the observation that interaction between these domains is required for recruitment of BRCA1 to damaged DNA ( 35 ), functional assays for the full-length protein would be ideal. In principle, such assays can be conducted in cell lines derived from BRCA1 - mutated tumors, but there are indications that the outcome of assays for BRCA1 function depends on the cellular context. As absence of BRCA1 leads to loss of cellular viability, it is thought that additional mutations are required for BRCA1- associated tumorigenesis. For example, loss of p53 alleviates the consequences of BRCA1 defi ciency both in vitro and in vivo ( 4 ) and is common in BRCA1-defi cient tumors ( 36, 37 ). Also, depletion of 53BP1 is known to suppress the defects caused by BRCA1 defi ciency ( 5 , 38 , 39 ). Therefore, aberrations in BRCA1-defi cient tumor cells may mask functional defects of BRCA1 VUSs. We reasoned that assays in normal cells that can be depleted from endogenous BRCA1 expression are most likely to reveal functional defects of BRCA1 VUSs. The usefulness of this approach has been previously shown by Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1152 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. BAC complementation assays in mouse embryonic stem cells ( 7 , 40 ). However, mutagenesis of large BAC clones by recombineering and functional complementation of cells with these mutant constructs is time-consuming and technically demanding, and therefore cannot be conducted in a high-throughput setting. We therefore set out to develop a cDNA-based functional complementation assay in mouse embryonic stem cells that is easier to control and scale up and more suitable for routine functional classifi cation of BRCA1 sequence variants.  One advantage of BAC transgenics in complementation assays is that genes are expressed at physiologically relevant levels. This is the result of low copy-number integrations and the presence of natural regulatory elements required for proper gene expression. We decided to use RMCE to allow single-copy integration of BRCA1 cDNAs at one specifi c genomic locus. The use of RMCE effectively prevents multiple or partial integrations, concatemers, and position-effect variegation. As a result, all variants are expressed at equal levels. Moreover, transcription of BRCA1 cDNAs from the EF1A gene promoter results in physiologic levels of BRCA1 protein, comparable with those observed in embryonic stem cells stably transfected with a BAC containing the human BRCA1 locus. Indeed, the wild-type human BRCA1 cDNA was able to complement Brca1 -null embryonic stem cells in cellular proliferation, drug sensitivity, and HR assays. Our RMCE strategy uses BRCA1 cDNA constructs in which mutations can be swiftly introduced using SDM, enabling a higher throughput than introduction of mutations via BAC recombineering. In addition, the introduction of BRCA1 cDNAs via RMCE obviates the need to analyze multiple embryonic stem cell clones for correct integration and expression.  As a proof of principle, we used our functional complementation assay to analyze exonic BRCA1 VUSs that were identifi ed in families with HBOC in the Netherlands and Belgium, as well as a set of previously analyzed BRCA1 variants. A number of mutations resulted in reduced BRCA1 protein levels, most likely because of structural destabilization. In all cases, this led to diminished capacity for functional complementation. Also, several variants that gave rise to normal BRCA1 protein levels were unable to rescue the proliferation defect and cisplatin sensitivity of Brca1 -null embryonic stem cells. As BRCA1 loss of function mutations are associated with increased cancer risk, variants that score as functionally impaired in our embryonic stem cell assay system may be causally involved in tumor formation. This notion is supported by the fact that seven of eight known pathogenic or neutral control variants in our validation series were correctly classifi ed by the cisplatin sensitivity assay. The pathogenic 5382insC truncation mutation could not be classifi ed because it scored as neutral in one of three transfection series. This was probably due to technical reasons, as the 5382insC mutation did not restore HR activity in Brca1 -defi cient embryonic stem cells, in contrast with R1699Q, which was recently shown to confer intermediate risk of HBOC ( 32 ).  Our assay system yielded ambivalent results for nine other variants: S4F, S308A, S1651P, S1651F, T1691I, V1736A, E1735K, H1746Q, and R1753T. T1691I and E1735K were classifi ed as functionally impaired in only one cisplatin sensitivity test, whereas values from repeat experiments could not be taken into account because of RSE values above 0.1. S4F, S1651P, S1651F, V1736A, H1746Q, and R1753T were differently classifi ed in repeat experiments, which may refl ect technical fl aws or intermediate activity of these variants. Of note, the V1736A mutation was recently identifi ed as a pathogenic variant with hypomorphic activity in DNA repair ( 31 ). Although we did not measure signifi cant HR activity of V1736A in a DR-GFP gene conversion assay, intermediate activity of this variant is supported by the results of the proliferation assays and additional cisplatin sensitivity assays. S1651F showed HR activity similar to wild-type BRCA1 , whereas R1753T was HR-defi cient. S308A is an artifi cial mutation of a BRCA1 phosphorylation site that was able to support proliferation and resistance to DNA damage in an embryonic stem cell-based BAC complementation assay. However, S308A-complemented embryonic stem cells did show increased apoptosis when cultured in embryoid bodies ( 7 ), indicating a partial defect that might explain the ambivalent results for this mutation in our assays.  Our results show that BRCA1 variants should ideally be assayed in triplicate to avoid misclassifi cation. This also applies to BRCA1 VUS that we classifi ed as neutral, most of which were tested only once because in our current study we focused on variants that showed functional impairment. The striking restriction of unambiguously predicted pathogenic mutants to the terminal RING and BRCT domains suggests that some plasticity is allowed for the central domain of BRCA1. However, our dataset is still limited and more experiments are required to gain insight into the function of this domain.  Our cDNA-based system allows for several additional functional assays that have been described previously for BAC transgenic embryonic stem cells ( 7 ). These include assays for defects during in vitro and in vivo embryonic stem cell differentiation but also treatments with other cytotoxic agents. As a proof of principle, we investigated the activity of a number of mutants in the response to the PARP inhibitor olaparib. These included M1400V, L1407, and M1411T, which were previously shown to impair PALB2 binding and have a negative effect on BRCA1 function ( 10 ). Although the differences in sensitivity of BRCA1-defi cient versus BRCA1-profi cient embryonic stem cells are larger for olaparib than for cisplatin, increased variation between repeat experiments allowed us to identify functional defects only for L1407 and not for the other two variants in the PALB2 interaction domain, M1400V and M1411T. However, the R1699Q and V1736A variants, which are known to have hypomorphic activity, clearly showed a defect in the response to olaparib. Interestingly, both mutations are in the BRCT domain, and it has recently been shown that mutation of this domain especially confers sensitivity to PARP inhibition ( 41 ). Together, our results show that PARP inhibitor sensitivity assays may have added value, especially for the classifi cation of BRCA1 VUSs with intermediate phenotypes.  Platinum drugs and PARP inhibitors are selectively toxic to BRCA1-defi cient cells because they target HR defi ciency. Although the role of BRCA1 in HR is thought to be essential for maintaining genomic integrity and preventing accumulation of (oncogenic) mutations, other activities may also contribute to its tumor suppression function. These activities Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1153 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE may include the HR-independent role for BRCA1 in ICL repair, which has been attributed to the facilitation of FANCD2 accumulation at cross-linked DNA ( 16 ). Nevertheless, we observed a good correlation between the results of the cisplatin sensitivity assay and the results of the DR-GFP HR assay. All BRCA1 variants that failed to restore the cisplatin response in Brca1 -null embryonic stem cells were also defective in catalyzing gene conversion, thereby confi rming our functional classifi cation. It will be interesting to see if this holds true for all BRCA1 variants or whether there are also pathogenic mutations that have no effect on HR.  As with any other in vitro approach, our functional complementation assay system might still fail to identify all pathogenic variants because it does not necessarily recapitulate all aspects of BRCA1 function in vivo . A limitation of our cDNA-based assay is also that it cannot be used to investigate effects on mRNA splicing. Although algorithms have been designed to predict possible splice defects, the consequences of mutations outside of the consensus splice sites especially require functional validation experiments. For this purpose, BAC complementation assays ( 7 ), minigene-based splicing assays, or BRCA1 transcript analysis of patient blood samples ( 19 ) may be instrumental. However, transacting factors also affect splicing, and these may be tissue specifi c ( 42 ). A possible solution would be to determine the presence of BRCA1 splice variants in tumor tissue from BRCA1 VUS carriers and use this information to generate a cDNA construct for analysis of the functional consequences. To evaluate BRCA1 VUSs, there remains a need for multifactorial models that combine results from functional assays and in silico analyses with genetic evidence and other information from mutation carriers. This also includes DNA copy number data from tumors from BRCA1 VUS carriers, as it is known that BRCA1- associated breast tumors show distinct genomic aberrations ( 43, 44 ). Our functional assay system does however provide a robust and easily implementable tool for the functional characterization of large numbers of BRCA1 VUSs within the context of the full-length protein. It is our hope that our assay system will fi nd its way to clinical genetics laboratories where it can be used to aid genetic counseling. Ideally, these tests should be coordinated on an international level and in close collaboration with the ENIGMA consortium.    Missense substitutions of uncertain clinical significance in the BRCA1 gene are a vexing problem in genetic counseling for women who have a family history of breast cancer. In this study, we evaluated the functions of 29 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in two DNA repair pathways. Repair of double-strand breaks by homology-directed recombination (HDR) had been previously analyzed for 16 of these BRCA1 variants, and 13 more variants were analyzed in this study. All 29 variants were also analyzed for function in double-strand break repair by the single-strand annealing (SSA) pathway. We found that among the pathogenic mutations in BRCA1, all were defective for DNA repair by either pathway. The HDR assay was accurate because all pathogenic mutants were defective for HDR, and all nonpathogenic variants were fully functional for HDR. Repair by SSA accurately identified pathogenic mutants, but several nonpathogenic variants were scored as defective or partially defective. These results indicated that specific amino acid residues of the BRCA1 protein have different effects in the two related DNA repair pathways, and these results validate the HDR assay as highly correlative with BRCA1-associated breast cancer.  Keywords: BRCA1, homologous recombination, single-strand annealing, centrosome, VUS Go to: Introduction Among the more than 70,000 women who had their BRCA1 gene (MIM# 113705) sequenced by 2006, approximately 2.3% were found to carry a BRCA1 variant of uncertain significance (VUS). These variants were classified as uncertain because they occurred in families wherein segregation analysis had not been done or in whom the segregation analysis was not informative and thus the VUS had unknown effects on breast and ovarian cancer risk [Hall et al., 2009; Spearman et al., 2008; Sweet et al., 2009]. As whole genome and exome sequencing becomes a more prevalent practice, more VUSs in BRCA1 will be uncovered, and increasingly women will face the quandary of an uninformative genetic test. This leads to individuals with a VUS test result making decisions about cancer screening and prevention without concrete information on which to base their decisions. Women who have an indeterminate BRCA1 sequence result and a family history of breast cancer have a high level of distress, and there are no consistent clinical guidelines for advising them [Dorval et al., 2005; Petrucelli et al., 2002; van Dijk et al., 2006]. Of the 567 BRCA1 missense substitutions listed in the current Breast Cancer Information Core (BIC) database, 14 are described as pathogenic (Class 5) and 27 as nonpathogenic (Class 1). By including the data from Collaborators for the Investigation of Modifiers of BRCA1/2 (CIMBA), a total of 24 BRCA1 variants are pathogenic (CIMBA database). Less than 10% of the missense substitutions in the BIC database have known cancer predisposition. In the absence of definitive genetic information on BRCA1 missense substitutions, other methods are needed to determine whether missense substitutions are pathogenic. Multifactorial approaches have augmented genetic segregation analysis with additional information about the proband and, in some cases, the tumor [Easton et al., 2007; Goldgar et al., 2004; Lindor et al., 2012; Plon et al., 2008; Spearman et al., 2008; Sweet et al., 2009]. These approaches have been successful in reclassification of variants but are also incomplete because they cannot definitively determine whether any given variant affects the critical cancer suppressing function(s) of the protein [Millot et al., 2012]. In contrast, a biological functional assay has the potential to determine whether any given BRCA1 missense substitution is defective in a process, and if that function is predictive of cancer predisposition (i.e., 100% sensitive and 100% specific), then the functional assay can, in theory, be used in genetic counseling.  A variety of biological assays have been analyzed for BRCA1 function and have been correlated with cancer predisposition to various extents [Carvalho et al., 2007; Cotta-Ramusino et al., 2011; Kais et al., 2012; Lee et al., 2010; Millot et al., 2012; Morris et al., 2006; Ransburgh et al., 2010; Vallee et al., 2012]. Several of these assays test single domains of BRCA1, and several address the variant within the context of the full-length protein. In this study, we analyzed the effects of 29 missense substitutions in BRCA1 on the repair of double-strand DNA breaks (DSBs) by homologous recombination and by the single-strand annealing (SSA) pathways. Our results indicate that the effects of specific missense mutations in these pathways strongly correlate with breast cancer predisposition. Further, we find that specific amino acid substitutions affect the two double-strand break repair pathways differentially.  Go to: Materials and Methods Plasmids and Cell Lines  All plasmids for the expression of human BRCA1 with missense substitutions were generated by site-directed mutagenesis from the wild-type sequence (GenBank: U14680.1). Several of these plasmids had been described in previous publications [Ransburgh et al., 2010; Wei et al., 2008]. The cell line for the homologous recombination assay, HeLa-DR, was based on the genomic integration of a specific vector that functions as a recombination substrate [Pierce et al., 2001]. The vector for homologous recombination had been the gift of M. Jasin (Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Institute, New York, NY). The HeLa-DR had been described before [Parvin et al., 2011; Ransburgh et al., 2010]. The repair of double-strand breaks by the SSA pathway was based on a vector kindly provided by J. Stark (City of Hope, Duarte, CA) [Bennardo et al., 2008; Stark et al., 2004] stably integrated into HeLa cells to make the HeLa–SSA cell line. The siRNA targeting the cellular BRCA1 3′ untranslated region (UTR) is the same as previously used [Ransburgh et al., 2010].  SSA Assay  HeLa–SSA cells were seeded in 15.6-mm-diameter wells in 24-well plates, and when cells were 50% confluent, cells were transfected with 5 pmol of the siRNA targeting the BRCA1 3′-UTR plus 0.3 μg of the BRCA1 expression plasmid in Lipofectamine 2000 reagent (Life Technologies, Grand Island, NY). At 24 hr after transfection, cells were transferred to 35-mm-diameter wells in six-well plates. At 48 hr, cells were transfected with 25 pmol of the BRCA1 3′-UTR-specific siRNA plus 0.75 μg BRCA1 expression plasmid plus 0.75 μg pCBASce (for the expression of I-SceI) in Lipofectamine 2000 reagent. After 3 days, cells are harvested by trypsinization, and the fraction of GFP-positive cells is determined using a FACScalibur flow cytometer (BD Biosciences, San Jose, CA) (Analytic Cytometry Shared Resource of The Ohio State University Comprehensive Cancer Center).  Western Blot Analysis of BRCA1 Protein  Immunoblots of the expressed BRCA1 protein were done as has been described previously [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Cells that had been transfected as in the SSA assay were, in parallel, extracted in 0.1% NP-40, 0.05 M Hepes (pH 7.5), and 0.005 M EDTA. Protein contents of extracts were determined using the Bradford reagent; and 50 μg of protein was electrophoresed on 3–8% Nu-PAGE gels (Life Technologies, Grand Island, NY) M. Jasin (Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Institute, NewYork, NY), transferred to polyvinylidene fluoride membranes, and immunoblotted using antibody specific to BRCA1(400–1,100). Densitometry analysis was performed from immunoblots using Kodak 1D software (Eastman Kodak Company, Rochester, NY).  Statistical Analysis of Results  The raw results in the SSA assay for the missense substitutions were compared with the control samples (either GL2 siRNA or BRCA1 siRNA with BRCA1-wt add back) using the unpaired Student’s t-test and obtained the one-tail P values; for intermediate-phenotype mutants, besides the above-mentioned comparisons, we also conducted the unpaired Student’s t-test against the control sample that contains BRCA1 siRNA with empty vector adding back, and obtained the one-tail P values. P values of less than 0.01 were considered significant.  Go to: Results Function of BRCA1 Variants in DNA Break Repair by Homologous Recombination  The BRCA1 protein has been shown to be a critical component of the response to DSBs. Cellular machinery can utilize homologous sequences to accurately repair the DSB, or the free ends can be joined by nonhomologous end joining. In addition to homologous recombination, the pathway of SSA exists by which the repair proteins resect DNA from the free ends of the DSB, and when short stretches of homologous sequence are exposed, then the DNA ends are rejoined [Stark et al., 2004]. The homologous recombination assay used in this study was based on a method developed by the Jasin laboratory in which a single integrated genomic locus contains two inactive GFP genes, and one of these contains the endonuclease cleavage site for the rare-cutting I-SceI enzyme [Pierce et al., 2001]. Upon expression of I-SceI in the cell, one inactive allele of GFP is cut, and if homologous recombination occurs using the second inactive GFP gene as the homology template, then the DNA repair results in gene conversion making the GFP gene become active (Fig. 1A). The SSA assay is based on an analogous strategy in which the GFP protein is not expressed because of intervening DNA sequence, with an I-SceI site at the 3′ end of the intervening DNA. Upon expression of the I-SceI endonuclease, the DSB is generated, and resection of the intervening sequence reveals homologous GFP sequences that are aligned and repaired [Stark et al., 2004] (Fig. 1B). These two processes depend on sequence homologies for the repair, but there are functional differences. The Rad51 and BRCA2 proteins are required for the homology-directed recombination (HDR) assay, but are not required for the SSA assay [Moynahan et al., 2001; Stark et al., 2004].  Figure 1 Figure 1 The double-strand DNA break (DSB) repair assay system. A: The HDR recombination substrate [Pierce et al. 2001] is diagrammed. The upstream GFP allele is defective because of the inclusion of an I-SceI site in its sequence. The downstream GFP allele is ... For each assay, we have established HeLa-derived cell lines with the published recombination substrate [Pierce et al., 2001; Stark et al., 2004] integrated in the genome at a single site. The HeLa-DR cell line assays HDR, and the HeLa–SSA cell line is used to assay SSA. The HDR and the SSA assays have a similar experimental design with a depletion of BRCA1 by transfection of a siRNA that is specific for the 3′-UTR of the BRCA1 mRNA. We cotransfect a BRCA1 expression plasmid that is not affected by the siRNA and which expresses the variant BRCA1 protein. After 2 days, we repeat the transfection and also transfect a plasmid that encodes the expression of the I-SceI endonuclease to generate the DSB in the presence of the variant BRCA1. After 3 days, we assay the cells for GFP expression by flow cytometry. The timeline of the experiment is shown in Figure 1C.  We have previously analyzed 16 variants of BRCA1 in a tissue-culture-cell-based assay for repair of DSBs via homologous recombination [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Using the HeLa-DR cell line developed by us, up to 20% of the cells convert to GFP positive. This high level of recombination enables the quantitative analysis of variants in BRCA1 in this process. The endogenous BRCA1 mRNA is depleted by siRNA targeting the 3′-UTR, and a BRCA1 variant that is resistant to the siRNA is simultaneously expressed from a plasmid [Parvin et al., 2011; Ransburgh, et al., 2010]. A quantitative measure of the function of the BRCA1 variant is determined from the percentage of cells that convert to GFP positive.  In this study, we first analyzed an additional 13 BRCA1 variants for function in HDR (Fig. 2). Twelve of the BRCA1 variants spanned amino acid residue 90 through 191 and were identified from the Breast Information Core (http://research.nhgri.nih.gov/bic/). These were expressed from the plasmid as full-length proteins. All 12 variants are listed in the BIC as having unknown phenotype with regard to predisposition to breast cancer. Several of these have been evaluated using a multifactorial classification system, and of these 12 variants, seven were nonpathogenic [Lindor et al., 2012]. These were chosen because the function of this domain was unknown and because many of these variants have been reported to be nonpathogenic. By testing the known nonpathogenic variants in this assay, we provide a specificity control for the functional test. The 13th variant tested is a known deleterious mutant in the carboxy terminus of the BRCA1 protein, M1775R. In these experiments, the percentage of cells that were GFP positive when transfected with the control siRNA and the control plasmid were set equal to 1%. All other results were normalized to this control, and all results were from three or more separate experiments. Depletion of BRCA1 and transfection with empty plasmid resulted in a value of 0.09 relative to the control (Fig. 2, lane 2). Thus, BRCA1 depletion has an over 10-fold effect reducing the level of homologous recombination. Depleting BRCA1 and transfecting a plasmid that expressed wild-type BRCA1 resulted in full restoration of homologous recombination (Fig. 2, lane 3). Among the variants with substitutions in residues from 90 to 191, all 12 functioned as wild type in the homologous recombination assay (Fig. 2, lanes 4–15) (P < 0.002 compared with depleted BRCA1). By contrast, the 13th tested missense substitution, a known pathogenic mutant BRCA1–M1775R, did not complement the depletion of BRCA1 in this assay (Fig. 2, lane 16) (Pv = 0.0014 compared with wild-type BRCA1).  Figure 2 Figure 2 Analysis of 13 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in the homology-directed repair assay. HeLa-DR cells were transfected with a siRNA that depleted the endogenous BRCA1 and with a plasmid that expressed the indicated BRCA1 variant. After generating a double-strand ... Function of 29 Variants of BRCA1 in the Repair of DNA Breaks by the SSA Pathway  The 16 BRCA1 variants that had previously been tested for function in homologous recombination [Ransburgh et al., 2010] and the 13 BRCA1 variants tested in this study (Fig. 2) were analyzed for function in SSA repair. The recombination substrate [Bennardo et al., 2008; Stark et al., 2004] was based on similar design as the homologous recombination substrate with the exception that restoration of GFP activity occurs when the two inactive GFP genes are repaired by SSA. HeLa cells were stably transfected with the SA–GFP construct, and a clone was selected that had no detectable background GFP signal. Upon transfection of the I-SceI-expressing plasmid, about 5–7% of cells became GFP positive, indicative of a functioning SSA pathway. Depletion of BRCA1 resulted in a decrease to about 1–2% GFP-positive cells (Fig. 3, lane 2), indicating a role for BRCA1 in the SSA repair pathway that had been previously observed [Stark et al., 2004]. Depletion of BRCA1 resulted in about 25% of the activity found in nondepleted cells. As had been observed with the homologous recombination assay, transfection of a plasmid expressing wild-type BRCA1 fully complemented the defect in SSA due to depletion of the endogenous BRCA1 (Fig. 3, lane 3). By contrast, depletion of endogenous BRCA1 and expression of a known pathogenic mutant of BRCA1, M1775R, was as defective in SSA as had been transfection of the empty vector (Fig. 3, lane 32). Similar to previous observations with the zinc-coordinating mutants of BRCA1, these residues were all required for SSA repair of double-strand breaks (Fig. 3, lanes: 6, 7, 10, 11, 13, 14, 16, and 17). As was found for the homologous recombination assay, the M18T variant and the T37R variant were defective for SSA repair. The L52F variant had reduced levels of SSA repair, approximately 69% of wild-type activity (Fig. 3, lane 15), although this value was not significantly different from wild type. The D67Y variant, a known nonpathogenic variant [Easton et al., 2007], was fully active in SSA repair (lane 18).  Figure 3 Figure 3 Analysis of 29 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in the SSA assay. HeLa–SSA cells were transfected as in Figure 2 with plasmids that express the 29 tested missense substitutions of BRCA1. Results of the fraction of cells that had converted to GFP ... Results diverged between the SSA and the homologous recombination assays for the variants in residues 90 through 191. The BRCA1–I90T variant functioned in the homologous recombination assay, but in the SSA assay, it was 47% as active as wild type (t-test for differing from wild-type P < 0.01; lane 20). The Y105C variant was statistically different from both wild-type BRCA1 and empty vector (indicated with both an asterisk and a cross; lane 21). This Y105C variant thus has intermediate phenotype, neither fully active nor fully defective. Similarly, the P142H, E143K, and the R170Q had intermediate phenotype (lanes 25, 26, and 28). The V191D variant was also defective for SSA repair (lane 31). Interestingly, the S153R and S186Y variants had diminished activity, but the change in activities was not statistically significant from the wild type. Thus, these variants were not scored as defective. Seven of the variants tested had assay-specific phenotypes, suggesting that how BRCA1 interacts with repair factors in the homologous recombination pathway is different from factors that BRCA1 binds in the SSA pathway.  When replacing the endogenous BRCA1 protein with a variant BRCA1, there is the concern that the expression levels be consistent with the levels of the endogenous in nondepleted cells. A defective phenotype could be masked by high levels of overexpression of the variant protein, or the phenotype of a functional protein might not be observed because of poor protein expression. The 16 variants with missense substitutions between residues 18 and 71 had been tested in HeLa-derived cells and the expression of each variant was similar to the endogenous in each case [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. For expression, we tested the missense substitutions between residues 90 and 191 and also residue 1775, and found that they all express approximately similarly as the endogenous BRCA1 (Fig. 4). Normalized results from densitometry analysis are presented beneath each lane. Protein from nontransfected cells and from control siRNA and empty vector transfected cells had similar amounts of BRCA1 protein (Fig. 4, lanes 1 and 2). Depletion of BRCA1 and add back with empty plasmid depleted the level of BRCA1 protein, which densitometry analysis indicated to be about 0.35 relative to the nontransfected cells (lane 3). All variants were detected at higher levels than the lysate from BRCA1-depleted cells. Some variants were expressed at higher levels than others, but at most 1.3-fold higher than the BRCA1 levels in nontransfected cells (compare, for example, lane 7 with lane 2). Because none of the BRCA1 variants were expressed at levels much higher than the endogenous BRCA1, in no case could the phenotype of a defective variant be masked by overexpression. The S186Y, V191D, and M1775R variants all had somewhat lower expression, but these lower levels of expression did not correlate with function in either homologous recombination or SSA repair. As an example, the S186Y variant was a low expresser (0.86 relative to control), but it was functional in both assays. We note that the M1775R mutant was expressed at lower levels (0.62 relative to endogenous BRCA1) than any other BRCA1 variant (lane 16). We interpret this level of expression to be similar to other variants and not an explanation for the defect in each double-strand break repair pathway. However, we cannot exclude the interpretation that the M1775R was defective in the DNA repair assays because there was lower BRCA1 expression of this isoform in our cells.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Analysis of the expression levels of 13 variants in HeLa–SSA cells. The expression levels of 16 previously tested BRCA1 substitution variants were tested in the HeLa-derived cell line [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Thirteen variants, with substitutions ... Comparison of Variants in Different Assays  The 29 BRCA1 variants analyzed in this study were compared for function in the two DNA repair assays and with available knowledge about cancer association (Table 1). Many of the variants were consistent across the two assays, but there were several variants demonstrating separation of function. All of the zinc-coordinating residues were required for function in both repair assays. The M18T variant was clearly defective, but it is currently classified as unknown clinical significance. There is one genetic model that classified this M18T variant as likely pathogenic (see below).  Table 1 Table 1 Summary of BRCA1 Variants Benchmarking Function to Clinical Relevance  Recently, a new classification system for variants has been proposed [Lindor et al., 2012; Plon et al., 2008]. According to this system, Class 1 denotes variants that are not pathogenic. Class 2 is likely nonpathogenic. Class 3 is uncertain. Class 4 is likely pathogenic (probability of being pathogenic is 0.95–0.99), and Class 5 is definitely pathogenic (probability >0.99). According to variants described in the [Lindor et al. (2012)] system, three of the variants in this study (M18T, C61G, and M1775R) were of Class 4, either likely pathogenic or definitely pathogenic. An additional five mutants are treated clinically as Class 5, pathogenic, (C39Y, C44F, C47G, C64G, and R71G). One of these pathogenic mutants, R71G, does not affect the BRCA1 protein, but rather the splicing of the mRNA [Vega et al., 2001]. Since the assays tested express BRCA1 from spliced cDNA, the R71G defective phenotype would not be detected. We thus exclude this mutant from the comparison of benchmarking these assays against known mutants. There were then seven pathogenic mutants (Class 4 or 5) analyzed and eight nonpathogenic variants (Class 1; Table 1). When comparing the results of our functional analyses with these previously classified variants, the HDR assay scored all seven pathogenic or likely pathogenic mutants as defective, and all eight nonpathogenic variants as functional. The results of the assay were, in the case of every variant, either fully active or fully defective (see examples in Fig. 2). To date, no variant tested in the HDR assay produced an intermediate score.  Compared with these benchmarks, the variants tested in the SSA assay did not score as well as the HDR assay. All pathogenic mutants were defective for SSA repair of double-strand breaks, but one nonpathogenic variant (I124V) was defective for SSA, and three Class 1 variants had intermediate phenotype in the SSA assay. Although the HDR assay was both highly sensitive and highly specific, the SSA assay was highly sensitive at association with cancer risk, but it was less specific. Of interest, it had been noted that four BRCA1 variants, Y105C, P142H, E143K, and Y179C, had decreased accumulation at the sites of DNA breaks [Wei et al., 2008]. Although these variants were normal for HDR, three of these had intermediate levels of function in the SSA assay (Table 1). Perhaps there is a link between the accumulation of BRCA1 at DNA repair sites and a factor important for the SSA assay.  Go to: Discussion Functional Assays as Predictive Tools for Assessing BRCA1 Variants  In this study, we analyzed a total of 29 BRCA1 variants in the repair of DSBs by homologous recombination and by SSA. For the sake of this discussion, we exclude the BRCA1–R71G variant that affects splicing [Vega et al., 2001] because all of our assays used prespliced cDNAs and would not be sensitive to a splicing defect. By comparing our results with those BRCA1 missense substitutions that have a known effect on breast cancer predisposition, we found that the HDR assay was 100% accurate: seven previously classified pathogenic mutants were defective for HDR, and eight previously classified nonpathogenic variants in BRCA1 were functional for HDR. Further, the results for the HDR assay were either fully active or fully defective. We interpret these results to indicate that the HDR assay is validated as a predictive tool for assessing BRCA1 variants.  By contrast to the HDR assay, the function of BRCA1 variants in the repair of DSBs by SSA had a number of differences that diminished the accuracy of this assay. On the basis of the benchmarks of variants that were classified using a genetic model [Lindor et al., 2012], the SSA assay was sensitive because it did not misclassify any pathogenic variants, but it was not specific because it misclassified several nonpathogenic variants as either intermediate or defective. Interpretation of the SSA assay was also complicated by intermediate results; by comparison, the HDR assay had no intermediate results among the 29 variants tested. It is possible, but remains to be determined, whether missense variants that are proficient for HDR, but deficient or intermediate for SSA, confer a lower or moderate risk of cancer. We thus conclude that the HDR assay is a more reliable predictive tool for assessing the function of BRCA1 variants than is the SSA assay.  We had previously performed a similar analysis of the control of centrosome duplication by BRCA1 variant proteins [Kais et al., 2012]. Fewer variants of the BRCA1 protein were analyzed in this earlier study using the centrosome assay, but it has several differences from the HDR assay. With regard to those variants with inferred breast cancer association, the centrosome duplication assay had an intermediate result for the BRCA1–D67Y variant, which is nonpathogenic. The T37R variant was defective for both DNA repair assays, but was functional in control of the centrosome duplication. Five amino acid residues away, the I42V variant had the opposite pattern as T37R, with defective centrosome control but fully functional in both DNA repair assays. Experimentally, the centrosome regulation assay is much more difficult to perform than the HDR assay, making it not as desirable an assay for analysis of BRCA1 variants. In addition, the centrosome assay appears, based on the limited set of variants, to be less accurate than the HDR assay. On the contrary, like the SSA, none of the tested seven variants that were previously classified as Class 4 or 5, were functional in the centrosomal assay, suggesting that this assay is sensitive.  It will be necessary to analyze many more variants in the HDR assay and then compare those results with the clinical experiences before this assay can be used for clinical interpretation. On the basis of the accuracy of the currently tested variants, we believe that the HDR assay will help with difficult to classify variants of unknown significance.  Functional Assays for Probing BRCA1 Residues Important in Biological Function  Separate from the clinical utility of the different functional tests, important biological information about the BRCA1 protein is available from the various functional assays. Very little structure–function information exists for BRCA1, and there have been limited systematic analyses of the effects of BRCA1 amino acid variants in a given function. A variety of variants have been analyzed in the context of short BRCA1 amino-terminal truncations for ubiquitin ligase activity [Morris et al., 2006]. In a similar vein, a variety of variants in the context of a short BRCA1 carboxy-terminal fragment have been analyzed for the activation of transcription [Carvalho et al., 2007; Lee et al., 2010]. Several variants in the context of the full-length protein have been analyzed in terms of resistance to ionizing radiation [Ruffner et al., 2001] and reversal of a lethal phenotype in murine embryonic stem cells [Chang et al., 2009].  We find that there are some discordancies between functional assays of the variants. The most striking are at T37R and I42V. BRCA1–T37R was defective for both DNA repair processes, but was fully functional for control of centrosomes. Conversely, BRCA1–I42V was defective for control of centrosome duplication [Kais et al., 2012] but functional in the DNA repair processes. From this result, we hypothesize that the protein–BRCA1 contacts in the DNA repair pathways depend on the T37 residue, whereas a different protein–BRCA1 contact is important for regulating the centrosome duplication. Such a notion is possible because the centrosome regulation occurs in the cytoplasm and the DNA repair occurs in the nucleus, and it is reasonable to suppose that different proteins are involved.  There were variants that distinguished between BRCA1 residues important for DSB repair by homologous recombination versus SSA. The observed differences between the SSA and HDR assays involved residues from 90 to 191. Several of these (Y105C, P142H, and E143K) that had intermediate phenotype in the SSA assay had been shown to have slow accumulation at sites of DSBs. Especially, P142H mutation abolished the association with Ku80 protein, which plays an important role in the repair of DSBs [Wei et al., 2008]. Perhaps the SSA pathway contributes to the accumulation of BRCA1 at sites of DNA damage in cells.  In summary, in this study, we evaluated missense variants of BRCA1 in two different DNA repair pathways. Data support that the function of BRCA1 in the HDR assay is consistent with the known cancer association of these variants, and we suggest that this test is predictive for breast cancer. By contrast, the repair of DNA by the related SSA pathway is not perfectly consistent with what is known about cancer predisposition, and the SSA assay yields intermediate results. On the basis of these current results, we suggest that the HDR assay is validated for predicting whether substitution at any residue of BRCA1 is disease associated.  
2489|| Abstract  The BRCA1 gene from individuals at risk of breast and ovarian cancers can be screened for the presence of mutations. However, the cancer association of most alleles carrying missense mutations is unknown, thus creating significant problems for genetic counseling. To increase our ability to identify cancer-associated mutations in BRCA1, we set out to use the principles of protein three-dimensional structure as well as the correlation between the cancer-associated mutations and those that abolish transcriptional activation. Thirty-one of 37 missense mutations of known impact on the transcriptional activation function of BRCA1 are readily rationalized in structural terms. Loss-of-function mutations involve nonconservative changes in the core of the BRCA1 C-terminus (BRCT) fold or are localized in a groove that presumably forms a binding site involved in the transcriptional activation by BRCA1; mutations that do not abolish transcriptional activation are either conservative changes in the core or are on the surface outside of the putative binding site. Next, structure-based rules for predicting functional consequences of a given missense mutation were applied to 57 germ-line BRCA1 variants of unknown cancer association. Such a structure-based approach may be helpful in an integrated effort to identify mutations that predispose individuals to cancer.  INTRODUCTION  Many germ-line mutations in the human BRCA1 gene are associated with inherited breast and ovarian cancers (1 , 2) . This information has allowed clinicians and genetic counselors to identify individuals at high risk for developing cancer. However, the disease association of over 350 missense mutations remains unclear, primarily because their relatively low frequency and ethnic specificity limit the usefulness of the population-based statistical approaches to identifying cancer-causing mutations. To address this problem, we use here the three-dimensional structure of the human BRCA1 BRCT domains to assess the transcriptional activation functions of BRCA1 mutants. Our study is made possible by the recently determined sequences (3, 4, 5, 6) and three-dimensional structures of the BRCA1 homologs (7 , 8) . In addition, we benefited from prior studies that attempted to rationalize and predict functional effects of mutations in various proteins (9, 10, 11, 12) , including those of BRCA1 (13 , 14) .  BRCA1 is a nuclear protein that activates transcription and facilitates DNA damage repair (15 , 16) . The tandem BRCT domains at the COOH-terminus of BRCA1 are involved in several of its functions, including modulation of the activity of several transcription factors (15) , binding to the RNA polymerase II holoenzyme (17) , and activating transcription of a reporter gene when fused to a heterologous DNA-binding domain (18 , 19) . Importantly, cancer-associated mutations in the BRCT domains, but not benign polymorphisms, inactivate transcriptional activation and binding to RNA polymerase II (18, 19, 20, 21) . These observations suggest that abolishing the transcriptional activation function of BRCA1 leads to tumor development and provides a genetic framework for characterization of BRCA1 BRCT variants.  MATERIALS AND METHODS  The multiple sequence alignment (MSA) of orthologous BRCA1 BRCT domains from seven species, including Homo sapiens (GenBank accession number U14680), Pan troglodytes (AF207822), Mus musculus (U68174), Rattus norvegicus (AF036760), Gallus gallus (AF355273), Canis familiaris (U50709), and Xenopus laevis (AF416868), was obtained by using program ClustalW (22) and contains only one gapped position (Supplementary Fig. 1). According to PSI-BLAST (23) , the latter six sequences are the only sequences in the nonredundant protein sequence database at National Center for Biotechnology Information that have between 30% and 90% sequence identity to the human BRCA1 BRCT domains (residues 1649–1859).  The multiple structure-based alignment of the native structures of the BRCT-like domains was obtained by the SALIGN command in MODELLER (Supplementary Fig. 2). It included the experimentally determined structures of the two human BRCA1 BRCT domains (Protein Data Bank code 1JNX; Refs. 8 , 24 ), rat BRCA1 BRCT domains (1L0B; Ref. 7 ), human p53-binding protein (1KZY; Ref. 7 ), human DNA-ligase IIIα (1IMO; Ref. 25 ), and human XRCC1 protein (1CDZ; Ref. 13 ). Structure variability was defined by the root-mean-square deviation among the superposed Cα positions, as calculated by the COMPARE command of MODELLER. The purpose of these calculations was to gain insight into the variability of surface-exposed residues (left panel in Fig. 2 ⇓ ). In conjunction with observed mutation clustering, these data may point to putative functional site(s) on the surface of BRCT repeats.  Comparative protein structure modeling by satisfaction of spatial restraints, implemented in the program MODELLER-6 (26) , was used to produce a three-dimensional model for each of the 94 mutants. The crystallographic structure of the human wild-type BRCA1 BRCT domains was used as the template for modeling (8) . The four residues missing in the crystallographic structure (1694 and 1817–1819) were modeled de novo (27) . All of the models are available in the BRCA1 model set deposited in our ModBase database of comparative protein structure models (28) . 6  For the native structure of the human BRCT tandem repeat and each of the 94 mutant models, a number of sequence and structure features were calculated. These features were used in the classification tree in Fig. 3 ⇓ (values for all 94 mutations are given in Supplementary Tables 1 and 2).  Buriedness.  Accessible surface area of an amino acid residue was calculated by the program DSSP (29) and normalized by the maximum accessible surface area for the corresponding amino acid residue type. A residue was considered exposed if its accessible surface area was larger than 40Å2 and if its relative accessible surface area was larger than 9% and buried otherwise. A mutation of a more exposed residue is less likely to change the structure and therefore its function.  Functional Site.  The putative functional site was visually assigned to the surface groove that contains the deleterious mutants (Fig. 2) ⇓ ; it consists of residue positions with accessible surface area >9%, as follows: 1654–1657, 1659, 1662, 1663, 1666, 1676, 1678, 1698–1702, 1773, 1774, 1811–1813, 1834, and 1836. A mutation in the functional site is more likely to abolish the function.  Residue Rigidity.  A residue isotropic temperature factor (B-factor) was the mean of its atomic B-factors as determined by X-ray crystallography of the native structure; it was also normalized by the mean and standard deviation (SD) of all residue B-factors in the protein chain. A mutation of a less rigid residue at a buried position is less likely to change the structure and therefore its function.  Neighborhood Rigidity.  Neighborhood of a residue was defined by the residues that have at least one atom within 5Å of any atom of the central residue. Neighborhood B-factor of a residue was defined to be the mean value of the B-factors of the residues in the neighborhood; it was also normalized by the mean and SD of all neighborhood B-factors for the neighborhoods of the same size. A mutation of a buried residue in a less rigid neighborhood is less likely to change the structure and therefore its function.  Volume Change.  Volume change was defined solely by the type of residue substitution (30) . A large change in the volume of the amino acid residue type was considered destabilizing to the structure and therefore its function, especially when buried at a rigid position.  Charge Change.  Charge change was defined solely by the type of residue substitution (30) . Mutations corresponding to changes in charge at buried positions are more likely to change the structure and therefore its function.  Polarity Change.  Polarity change was defined solely by the type of residue substitution. Amino acid residue types were classified into three classes according to their hydrophobicity: 0  Embedded Image {LIFWCMVY}, 1  Embedded Image {PATGS}, 2  Embedded Image {HQRKNED} (30) . Mutations corresponding to changes in polarity at buried positions are more likely to change the structure and therefore its function.  Mutation Likelihood.  Mutation likelihood of a residue substitution at a given MSA position reflects the “background” substitution probabilities in the BLOSUM62 matrix as well as the actually observed substitutions at the given position in the MSA of the BRCA1 BRCT orthologs (Supplementary Fig. 1; Refs. 4, 5, 6 , 9 , 31 ). The scores are centered on zero, with negative values corresponding to less likely substitutions. Unlikely mutations are more likely to change the structure and function.  Phylogenetic Entropy.  Sequence variability was defined for every column in the MSA of the BRCA1 BRCT orthologs (Supplementary Fig. 1) by Σ p ln p, where p is the observed relative frequency of residue type i (Fig. 2 ⇓ , right panel). Mutations at evolutionarily conserved positions are more likely to change the structure and function.  Helix/Turn Breaker.  Secondary structure assignment was calculated by DSSP (29) . A “helix breaker” mutation was defined as any mutation into the glycine or proline residues at a helical position; a “turn breaker” mutation was defined as any replacement of the glycine or proline residues at a turn position.  Visualization and analysis of the mutations were facilitated by the program DINO. 7  Transcriptional assays for testing our predictions were performed as described previously (21) . The wild-type BRCA1 sequence (residues 1396–1863) fused in frame to the LexA DNA-binding domain was used as the wild-type control and for introducing mutations M1775R, Y1853X, M1689R, and W1718C by site-directed mutagenesis. EGY48 yeast cells were cotransformed with the constructs and pRB1840, which contains a lacZ reporter gene under the control of a LexA operator, and tested in liquid β-galactosidase assays. For mammalian transcription assays, BRCA1 constructs were subcloned in frame to GAL4 DNA-binding domain in pCDNA3. GAL4 DNA-binding domain fusion constructs were cotransfected into human 293T cells with pG5Luc, which contains a firefly luciferase gene under the control of five GAL4 binding sites as a reporter for the assay. Transfections were normalized with an internal control phRG-TK (Promega), which contains a Renilla luciferase gene under a constitutive thymidine kinase-basal promoter.  RESULTS AND DISCUSSION  We tabulated a total of 94 missense mutations in the human BRCA1 BRCT domains (Tables 1 ⇓ and 2 ⇓ ; Fig. 1 ⇓ ). These mutations occurred naturally or were obtained via random mutagenesis. Transcriptional activation function of 37 of 94 mutants has been tested (Fig. 1 ⇓ , rows 1 and 2). Eight of the 37 mutants could be tentatively classified either as cancer-associated or benign following established genetic criteria (Ref. 32 ; Fig. 1 ⇓ , columns 1 and 2). The basis of each classification is outlined in Table 1 ⇓ .  Fig. 1. Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Fig. 1. Classification of the 94 missense mutations in the human BRCA1 BRCT domains analyzed in this study. The mutants were divided into groups depending on information about their cancer association and transcriptional activation function (Tables 1 ⇓ and 2 ⇓ ). The mutations at solvent-exposed positions are underlined (“Materials and Methods”). View inlineView popup Table 1 Functionally characterized missense mutations in the human BRCA1 BRCT domains (amino acid residues 1652–1855) View inlineView popup Table 2 Prediction of the cancer phenotype of 57 functionally uncharacterized missense mutations in the human BRCA1 BRCT domains For the eight mutations with intact transcriptional activation function, there is no evidence of cancer-association; the frequency in control population is equal or higher than in cancer cases, and there is absence of co-segregation in at least one family (Fig. 1 ⇓ , row 2; Table 1 ⇓ ). Conversely, none of the 29 tested mutations without transcriptional activation function are thought to be benign, following the same criteria (Fig. 1 ⇓ , row 2; Table 1 ⇓ ; Ref. 32 ). These observations indicate that tumor suppression by BRCA1 correlates with its ability to activate transcription.  We first rationalized the functional consequences of the 37 tested mutations in terms of their impact on folding and stability of the native structure and in terms of the integrity of binding sites of the BRCT domains. Next, we used this experience to develop generic rules for prediction of the functional impact of a missense mutation and applied these rules to the remaining 57 functionally uncharacterized mutations listed in Fig. 1 ⇓ and Table 2 ⇓ . We then tested two of these predictions by functional assays and segregation analysis.  Missense mutations of BRCA1 are likely to affect transcriptional activation in either one of the following two ways: (a) when they are exposed to the solvent, they may substantially change the structure or chemical nature of functional sites that bind other molecules, or (b) when they are buried in the core, they may prevent folding of the BRCT domains into their native fold or, less likely, affect only the structure of functional sites.  The 37 mutations, including the 8 (Fig. 1 ⇓ , row 2) and the 29 mutations (Fig. 1 ⇓ , row 1) with and without transcriptional activation function, respectively, were mapped onto the crystallographic structure of the human BRCA1 BRCT domains (Ref. 8 ; Fig. 2 ⇓ ). In addition to this structural mapping, we produced a three-dimensional protein structure model for each mutant and calculated a number of its sequence and structure features (“Materials and Methods”). We used the feature values and their changes between the wild type and the mutant to rationalize the observed effect on transcriptional activation (Table 1 ⇓ ; Supplementary Table 1).  Fig. 2. Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Fig. 2. Missense mutations on the surface of the human BRCA1 BRCT domains. The solvent-exposed residues with mutations that are known to affect and not affect the transcriptional activation activity of BRCA1 are contoured in red and yellow, respectively (Fig. 1) ⇓ . The only remaining exposed mutation of known functional impact (P1806A) is on the hidden face of the structure. Conservation of structure (“Materials and Methods;” Supplementary Fig. 2) and sequence (see phylogenetic entropy in “Materials and Methods” and Supplementary Fig. 1) are indicated by the intensity of blue on the left and right panels, respectively. The region in violet on the left panel corresponds to the linker between the two domains. The NH2- and COOH-termini of the tandem domains are marked on the right panel. The markedly reduced transcriptional activation activity of the 29 mutations (Fig. 1 ⇓ , row 1) is readily explained by their likely disruption of the structure of the BRCT domain and/or its binding sites that are involved in transcriptional activation. Twenty-three of these 29 mutations occur at buried positions and involve amino acid residue types with dissimilar charge, hydrophobicity, size, or secondary structure propensity (Fig. 1 ⇓ , row 1, not underlined). Thus, they are expected to disrupt the structure and therefore its function. The remaining six mutations resulting in reduced transcriptional activation are exposed (Fig. 1 ⇓ , row 1, underlined). Among these six mutations, R1699W and R1699Q replace a conserved residue involved in a salt bridge between the BRCT repeats (8) . Another one of the six mutations (G1743R) occurs at a position that is absolutely conserved among all available orthologs (Supplementary Fig. 1). For the remaining three exposed mutations that abolish transcription, we propose that they disrupt interactions with BRCA1 ligand(s). They are located in a groove formed by both BRCT repeats (L1657P and K1702E) and in the ridge that delimits the groove (E1660G). We suggest that this clustering of residues in a single patch on the surface of BRCA1 highlights a binding site with integrity that is necessary for transcription. Moreover, this putative binding site is relatively conserved in sequence and structure among the BRCA1 homologs (Fig. 2 ⇓ ; “Materials and Methods”). These results are in agreement with in vitro binding studies that determined the binding site of BRCA1 to the RNA polymerase holoenzyme via RNA helicase A (17) . Nonconservative substitutions of any amino acid residues that comprise the putative binding site are also likely to affect transcriptional activation. The existence of such a functional region indicates that the tandem BRCT repeats comprise one structural and functional unit, in accordance with previous conclusions (7) .  The lack of impact of the eight mutations that do not disrupt transcriptional activation function (Fig. 1 ⇓ , row 2) can also be rationalized in structural terms. Three of them are exposed on the face away from the putative binding site proposed above, whereas the remaining five mutations are conservative changes in the core of the fold (Table 1 ⇓ ; Fig. 2 ⇓ ). Five mutations (G1706A, S1715N, F1761I, M1775V, and A1843T) in the total set of 37, with impact on the transcriptional activation function that is known, could not be readily explained. Possible reasons for the inability to explain these mutants are discussed in detail in Supplementary Table 3.  Because it was straightforward to use the three-dimensional structure of the BRCA1 domains to rationalize the known functional impact of 32 of the 37 mutations, we derived a set of rules for predicting whether a given mutation inactivates transcriptional activation and therefore correlates with predisposition to cancer. These rules rely on the sequence and structural features that proved informative in explaining the presence or absence of a functional impact of the tested mutations. For example, structural neighborhood around a mutated residue can be rigid, and a mutation can introduce a large change (over 30A3) in the side chain volume. Such a mutation is likely to destabilize or distort local conformation, thus having an effect on the function of the protein. In contrast, a flexible structural neighborhood is expected to accommodate such a substitution without major perturbations in the structure. Moreover, our rules allow for the possibility that very large changes in the side chain volume (over 90A3) can have a significant effect even in a flexible neighborhood. The rules were encoded hierarchically in a “classification tree” scheme (Fig. 3) ⇓ and are implemented on the web. 8  Fig. 3. Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Fig. 3. Classification tree for annotating a given missense mutation in the human BRCA1 BRCT domains. The classification begins at the top (Start) and ends at one of the “+” or “-” leaves. The “+” and “-” indicate mutants with intact (benign) and abolished transcriptional activation function (cancer-associated), respectively. This classification tree correctly rationalizes 32 of the 37 functionally characterized variants (Table 1) ⇓ . The tree was also applied to 57 mutants that have not yet been characterized by experiment (Table 2) ⇓ . See “Materials and Methods” and Supplementary Material for a detailed description of the features. Using the classification tree, we predicted the functional consequences of the 57 missense mutations in the BRCT domains that presently lack definitive information about cancer association (Breast Cancer Information Core Database; 9 Table 2 ⇓ ; Supplementary Table 2). Our prediction algorithm assigned functional impact to 32 mutants, whereas 25 were predicted to be benign.  To validate our predictions, we tested prospectively two mutants (Fig. 4, A and B) ⇓ for which segregation data were available. The W1718C mutation was found in a family with three generations affected where women were diagnosed with either early-onset (<40-years-old) breast cancer or ovarian cancer. It was present in four of four women with cancer and was absent in three of three at-risk women without cancer. 10 The M1689R mutation also segregated with disease in a large family with several generations affected (Fig. 4C) ⇓ . Both M1689R and W1718C displayed the loss of function phenotype and segregated with disease in agreement with our predictions (Fig. 4) ⇓ .  Fig. 4. Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Fig. 4. Transcription assays and segregation analysis confirm predictions for mutations M1689R and W1718C. Structures of the reporter plasmid are depicted on top of panels A and B. Cancer-associated mutations M1775R and Y1853X were used as controls. A, transcriptional activity in yeast cells. B, transcriptional activity in human cells. C, pedigree with segregation analysis for the M1689R mutant. Arrowhead indicates the proband. The presence (M1689R) or absence (neg.) of M1689R mutation in the germ line of tested individuals is indicated. Site of tumor and age of diagnosis is also indicated. WT, wild type. To illustrate prediction by the classification tree, we used the mutation M1689R that occurs at a buried position in a relatively rigid neighborhood (Table 2 ⇓ , Supplementary Table 2). Mutations at buried and rigid locations are tolerable only if changes in the residue volume, charge, and polarity are sufficiently small; a volume change of more than one methyl group (30Å3) cannot be accepted. However, the arginine volume is only 18Å3 larger than that of methionine; therefore, the condition on the maximal allowed volume change is satisfied. At the next checkpoint, the side-chain charge is considered. Because M1689R introduces a positive charge at a buried position, the mutation is considered destabilizing, resulting into the prediction of a loss of function.  The tumor suppressor function of BRCA1 is likely to depend, at least partially, on its transcriptional activity, as suggested previously (18, 19, 20, 21) and supported by the mutation set in Table 1 ⇓ . Therefore, the ability to predict which mutations do and do not abolish the transcriptional activation function of BRCA1 can be useful in predicting their cancer association. Our analysis, based primarily on the considerations of protein three-dimensional structure, leads to a prediction of cancer association of the mutations that cannot be easily characterized by other approaches, such as population-based statistical genetics. Although all but two of the present predictions are unverified and thus cannot be used as a sole tool for risk assessment and genetic counseling, this structure-based approach may be helpful in an integrated effort, to identify mutations that predispose an individual to breast and ovarian cancers. Mutations in BRCA1 and BRCA2 account for the majority of hereditary breast and ovarian cancers, and therefore sequence analysis of both genes is routinely conducted in patients with early-onset breast cancer. Besides mutations that clearly abolish protein function or are known to increase cancer risk, a large number of sequence variants of uncertain signifi cance (VUS) have been identifi ed. Although several functional assays for BRCA1 VUSs have been described, thus far it has not been possible to conduct a high-throughput analysis in the context of the full-length protein. We have developed a relatively fast and easy cDNA-based functional assay to classify BRCA1 VUSs based on their ability to functionally complement BRCA1-defi cient mouse embryonic stem cells. Using this assay, we have analyzed 74 unclassifi ed BRCA1 missense mutants for which all predicted pathogenic variants are confi ned to the BRCA1 RING and BRCT domains.  SIGNIFICANCE: BRCA1 VUSs are frequently found in patients with hereditary breast or ovarian cancer and present a serious problem for clinical geneticists. This article describes the generation, validation, and application of a reliable high-throughput assay for the functional classifi cation of BRCA1 sequence variants of uncertain signifi cance. Cancer Discov; 3(10); 1142–55. ©2013 AACR.  Authors’ Affi liations: 1 Division of Molecular Pathology and Cancer Genomics Centre and 2 Department of Pathology, The Netherlands Cancer Institute Amsterdam, The Netherlands; and 3 TaconicArtemis GmbH, Cologne, Germany  Note: Supplementary data for this article are available at Cancer Discovery Online (http://cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org/).  Current address for C. Klijn: Genentech Inc., South San Francisco, California.  Corresponding Author: Jos Jonkers, The Netherlands Cancer Institute, Plesmanlaan 121, Amsterdam, 1066 CX, The Netherlands. Phone: 31-20- 5122000; Fax: 31-20-5122050; E-mail: j.jonkers@nki.nl doi: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094 ©2013 American Association for Cancer Research.  INTRODUCTION  Germline loss-of-function mutations in BRCA1 and BRCA2 are known to result in an approximately tenfold increased lifetime risk of developing breast or ovarian cancer. Thus far, no other genes have been identifi ed with such a strong link to hereditary breast and ovarian cancer (HBOC), and in the past decades, many women have been screened for germline mutations in BRCA1 or BRCA2 . This has resulted in the identifi cation of numerous pathogenic mutations as well as a large number of sequence variants for which the clinical relevance is not clear. In the most recent publication of the ENIGMA (Evidence-based Network for the Interpretation of Germline Mutant Alleles) group, an international consortium for the evaluation of BRCA1 or BRCA2 sequence variants, a total of 1,273 unique BRCA1 variants is mentioned ( 1 ), but this number may increase even further because of the implementation of high-throughput sequencing methods. Of the BRCA1 variants of uncertain signifi cance (VUS), 920 are nontruncating exonic mutations that may affect protein function or mRNA splicing, but for which there is not enough linkage information to indicate whether they are pathogenic. To aid genetic counseling of individuals with BRCA1/2 VUS, both genetic and functional classifi cation methods have been developed. Genetic analysis of BRCA1 or BRCA2 VUSs relies on cosegregation with disease, cooccurrence with known pathogenic mutations, and family history of cancer. These data have been integrated into computational models to calculate the likelihood that a VUS is disease-causing ( 2 ). Additional in silico analysis of the evolutionary conservation of the amino acids affected by the mutation and the predicted impact of the mutant amino acids on protein folding are also implemented in such models. Functional assays do not rely on preexisting data, but directly test the effect of BRCA1/2 VUSs on known functions of the encoded proteins ( 3 ). Although this may seem relatively straightforward, it can be diffi cult to extrapolate data from functional assays into cancer risks for patients. For instance, in most assays only part of the BRCA1 protein is analyzed. In addition, some of the more elegant assays are technically demanding and not suitable to analyze large numbers of mutations. We reasoned that a good functional assay should fulfi ll three basic requirements: (i) it should investigate the biologic effects of a BRCA1 VUS in the context of the full-length protein; (ii) it should be conducted under normal physiologic conditions in a noncancerous cell type; and (iii) it should be based on a highly standardized and reproducible protocol.  These considerations led us to develop a functional assay based on physiologic expression of full-length human BRCA1 cDNA in mouse embryonic stem cells that are genetically engineered to allow conditional deletion of endogenous Brca1 . Mutant BRCA1 cDNAs are generated using site-directed mutagenesis (SDM) and introduced in a defi ned genomic locus of mouse embryonic stem cells by recombinase-mediated cassette exchange (RMCE). In this way, we have analyzed 86 BRCA1 variants for their effects on cell proliferation and drug sensitivity, including 74 clinically relevant VUSs.  RESULTS  Generation of Mouse Embryonic Stem Cells Expressing BRCA1 Sequence Variants  Although BRCA1-defi cient tumor cells proliferate rapidly in situ , loss of BRCA1 in normal cells leads to a severe proliferation defect ( 4 ). We decided to make use of this phenotype for the functional analysis of BRCA1 variants in Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1144 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. Brca1 -selectable conditional knockout (SCo) mouse embryonic stem cells ( 5 ). These cells carry one Brca1 -null allele and a selectable conditional Brca1SCo allele, which contains, in addition to loxP sites around exons 5–6, a split puromycin resistance marker that is activated upon Cre-mediated deletion of exons 5–6. They also contain a CreERT2 allele in the Rosa26 locus, which allows for controlled activation of Cre via administration of 4-hydroxy tamoxifen (4-OHT). Thus, BRCA1-defi cient embryonic stem cells can be easily obtained via 4-OHT–induced inactivation of the Brca1SCo allele and subsequent selection for puromycin resistance ( Fig.  1 ; ref.  5 ). To allow effi cient integration of human BRCA1 variants in one specifi c genomic locus, we supplied the other Rosa26 allele with F3 and Frt recombination sites for RMCE by the site-specifi c recombinase Flp ( Fig.  1 and Supplementary Fig. S1; ref. 6 ). Cells that have undergone successful RMCE can be selected because they express a truncated neomycin selection marker under control of the endogenous Rosa26 promoter, which further increases targeting effi ciency. Flpmediated recombination ensures single-copy integration of BRCA1 expression constructs at the same Rosa26 locus, thus avoiding position-effect variegation and copy number– dependent differences in expression.  RMCE vectors were equipped with a human BRCA1 cDNA expression construct, which was modifi ed using SDM to introduce defi ned mutations in BRCA1 . The focus of our analysis was on Dutch and Belgian VUSs that were found in families with HBOC. We also included a number of variants  Figure 1.   Schematic overview of the RMCE procedure in R26 CreERT2/RMCE ; Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells. Before the introduction of a human BRCA1 cDNA, R26 CreERT2/RMCE ; Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells are mouse BRCA1-profi cient and sensitive to both neomycin and puromycin. Targeting of singlecopy human BRCA1 cDNA variants to the Rosa26 locus by Flp RMCE results in expression of human BRCA1 and neomycin resistance. Addition of 4-OHT leads to CreERT2-mediated deletion of mouse Brca1 exons 5 and 6, resulting in loss of mouse BRCA1 protein and concomitant expression of puromycin from the phosphoglycerate kinase (PGK) promoter. This enables selection of mouse BRCA1-defi cient, human BRCA1-expressing R26 CreERT2/hBRCA1 ; Brca1Δ/Δ embryonic stem cells that can be used in functional complementation assays. R26 CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1SCo/Δ R26CreERT2/hBRCA1;Brca1SCo/Δ R26CreERT2/hBRCA1;Brca1Δ/Δ 3 5–6 3 5–6 7–8 3 3 14 7–8 7–8 3 7–8 5–6 Introduction of human BRCA1 by RMCE 3 14 SA SA Brca1SCo5–6 Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26RMCE Brca1Δ5–6 Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26hBRCA1 Brca1SCo5–6 Brca1SCo5–6 Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26RMCE Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26hBRCA1 3 14 CreERT2 CreERT2 CreERT2 CreERT2 Puro Puro Puro PGK PGK PGK Puro PGK zsgreen Hyg FLP zsgreen Hyg FLP SA SA NeoR Selection hBRCA1–, mBrca1+, neoS, puroS hBRCA1+, mBrca1+, neoR, puroS hBRCA1+, mBrca1–, neoR, puroR pA hBRCA1 hBRCA1 EF1α EF1α Δ5′ neo Δ5′ neo Δ5′ neo EF1α hBRCA1 Cre-mediated deletion of mouse Brca1 by 4-OHT addition 3 14 PuroR Selection SA SA SA SA Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1145 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE that were previously classifi ed using functional assays ( 7, 8 ) or a multifactorial likelihood model ( 9 ), as well as M1400V, L1407P, and M1411T, which have been reported to attenuate the interaction between BRCA1 and PALB2 ( 10 ). To allow validation of our functional complementation assay, we included a series of eight BRCA1 variants that are known to be deleterious or neutral according to the Breast Cancer Information Core database (BIC; http://research.nhgri .nih.gov/bic/ ; Supplementary Table S1). These controls include the well-known pathogenic BRCA1 founder mutations 185delAG and 5382insC and the neutral polymorphisms Y105C, R866C, and E1250K. The BIC designation is supported by the classifi cation according to the International Agency for Research on Cancer ( http://iarc.fr/ ), which includes the Align-GVGD score that indicates biophysical and evolutionary alterations ( http://agvgd.iarc.fr/ ; Supplementary Table S1; refs. 11, 12 ). Align-GVGD scores vary between C0 (likely neutral) and C65 (likely deleterious). Sequence-verifi ed constructs that contained the intended VUS, but no other BRCA1 mutations, were transfected into R26 CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells to undergo RMCE ( Fig.  2 ). Neomycin-resistant clones were pooled and RMCE was confi rmed by PCR analysis. Subsequently, protein expression of the human BRCA1 variants was analyzed by Western blot analysis with a human BRCA1-specifi c antibody ( Fig. 2 and Supplementary Fig. S2). Comparison with BRCA1 protein levels in embryonic stem cells expressing human BRCA1 from a bacterial artifi cial chromosome (BAC), which is known to rescue embryonic lethality of Brca1 -null mice ( 7 ,  13 ), showed that transcription of the human BRCA1 cDNA from the EF1A gene promoter results in physiologic levels of BRCA1 protein (Supplementary Fig.  S1). Most BRCA1 variants were expressed at equal levels, allowing comparison of their functional activities. A number of C-terminal BRCA1 mutants showed low levels of expression (Supplementary Table S2; Supplementary Fig. S2). Real-time RT-PCR analysis showed that decreased protein expression was not caused by decreased mRNA expression (Supplementary Fig.  S3), suggesting that the low abundance of BRCA1 protein results from posttranslational events. In fact, for most of these variants, mutation-associated protein instability has already been documented in previous publications (refs. 8 , 14 , 15 ; Supplementary Table S2).  Functional Complementation Assay of BRCA1 Sequence Variants in Mouse Brca1 -Null Embryonic Stem Cells  As a fi rst functional test, we assayed the ability of BRCA1 variants to restore the proliferation defect of switched R26 CreERT2/RMCE ;Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells ( Fig.  2 ). Expression of endogenous mouse Brca1 was shut off through overnight induction of Cre activity by 4-OHT, and 7 days  Figure 2.   Workfl ow for the functional classifi cation of BRCA1 sequence variants in Brca1 -null embryonic stem (ES) cells. Outline of the generation of mouse Brca1 -defi cient embryonic stem cells expressing human BRCA1 variants and functional complementation assays. Indicated are the experimental steps and the time it takes one person to analyze 20 mutants. Introduction of BRCA1 variants in R26CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1SCo/D ES cells BRCA1 Construct + G418 Selection of clones with correct RMCE BRCA1 Expression analysis SDM and sequencing RMCE in ES cells x + 4-OHT + Puromycin Functional assays Functional assays Cre-Mediated deletion of Brca1SCo allele Proliferation and cisplatin sensitivity assays Selection of Brca1ΔSCo/Δ ES cells Timecourse for the analysis of 20 BRCA1 variants Weeks 0 1 2 7 3 8 4 5 6 SDM and RMCE Functional assays Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1146 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. after switching, cells were plated in 96-well plates for proliferation assays, and were analyzed using Sulphorhodamine B staining. For each group of mutants tested, we included positive and negative controls consisting of embryonic stem cells containing, respectively, wild-type human BRCA1 cDNA and an empty RMCE vector. BRCA1 variants were evaluated on their ability to support growth compared with these controls (Supplementary Tables S3 and S4). Although we tested 28 mutations in the central domain encoded by exon 11 (aa 224–1366), BRCA1 variants that were unable to rescue the proliferation defect of Brca1 -null mouse embryonic stem cells to BRCA1 wild-type levels were confi ned to the conserved N- and C-terminal domains of BRCA1.  Cisplatin Sensitivity Assay for Classifi cation of BRCA1 Variants  Although the ability of BRCA1 variants to support proliferation appears to be indicative of VUS function, results were not always clear-cut (Supplementary Tables S3 and S4). BRCA1 is known to be important for DNA interstrand crosslink (ICL) repair through mechanisms that are both dependent ( 5 ) and independent ( 16 ) of its function in homologous recombination (HR). The role of BRCA1 in ICL repair is stressed by the occurrence of genetic reversion mutations restoring BRCA1 protein expression in platinum-resistant ovarian tumors in BRCA1 -mutation carriers ( 17, 18 ). We therefore decided to conduct a 96-well–based cisplatin sensitivity assay to allow a more stringent evaluation of BRCA1 VUS functionality.  Half-maximal inhibitory concentrations (IC 50 ) of cisplatin were determined using a resazurin cell viability assay, and BRCA1 variants were again classifi ed in comparison to wildtype BRCA1 and an empty RMCE vector. To obtain corrected cisplatin IC 50 values, we fi tted a log-logistic curve constrained at 1 and 0. We excluded a fi t if the residual squared error (RSE) exceeded 0.1. We then applied a Bayesian predictor to classify BRCA1 VUS as pathogenic or benign. Most variants that showed less than wild-type activity in the proliferation assay also scored as functionally impaired in the cisplatin sensitivity assay and were classifi ed as deleterious ( Table 1 ,  Table 1.   Functional classifi cation of BRCA1 VUS based on cisplatin response Variant DNA change Type of mutation a Classifi cation S4F c.11C>T VUS Not Clear M18T c.53T>C VUS Deleterious 185delAG c.68_69delAG Deleterious control Deleterious b K45Q c.133A>C VUS Neutral C61G c.181T>G Deleterious control Deleterious C64G c.190T>G VUS Deleterious b D67Y c.199G>T VUS Neutral Y105C c.314A>G Neutral control Neutral N132K c.396C>A VUS Neutral P142H c.425C>A VUS Neutral L147F c.441G>C VUS Neutral L165P c.494T>C VUS Neutral R170W c.508C>T VUS Neutral S186Y c.557C>A VUS Neutral V191I c.571G>A VUS Neutral T231M c.692C>T VUS Neutral D245V c.734A>T VUS Neutral L246V c.736T>G VUS Neutral V271L c.811G>C VUS Neutral S308A c.922A>G; c.923G>C Artifi cial h Not Clear L358R; C360R; E362H c.1073T>G; c.1078T>C; c.1084G>C; c.1086G>T Artifi cial Neutral L668F c.2002C>T VUS Neutral D695N c.2083G>A VUS Neutral P798L c.2393C>T VUS Neutral N810Y c.2428A>T VUS Neutral T826K c.2477C>A VUS Neutral (continued) Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1147 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE (continued) Variant DNA change Type of mutation a Classifi cation R841Q c.2522G>A VUS Neutral Y856H c.2566T>C VUS Neutral R866C c.2596C>T Neutral control Neutral S988A c.2962T>G Artifi cial Neutral M1008I c.3024G>A VUS Neutral E1060A c.3179A>C VUS Neutral S1101N c.3302G>A VUS Neutral K1110del c.3328_3330delAAG VUS Neutral S1140G c.3418A>G VUS Neutral E1214K c.3640G>A VUS Neutral N1236K c.3708T>G VUS Neutral E1250K c.3748G>A Neutral control Neutral L1267S c.3800T>C VUS Neutral E1282V c.3845A>T VUS Neutral S1297del c.3891_3893delTTC VUS Neutral S1301R c.3903T>A VUS Neutral E1346K c.4036G>A VUS Neutral V1378I c.4132G>A VUS Neutral M1400V c.4198A>G VUS Neutral L1407P c.4220T>C VUS Neutral b M1411T c.4232T>C VUS Neutral R1443G c.4327C>G VUS Neutral S1448G c.4342A>G VUS Neutral S1486C c.4456A>T VUS Neutral S1497A c.4489T>G Artifi cial Neutral V1534M c.4600G>A VUS Neutral R1589P c.4766G>C VUS Neutral M1628T c.4883T>C VUS Neutral S1651P c.4951T>C VUS Not Clear S1651F c.4952C>T VUS Not Clear M1652I c.4956G>A VUS Neutral S1655F c.4964C>T VUS Deleterious b H1686R c.5057A>G VUS Deleterious H1686Q c.5058T>A VUS Deleterious V1688del c.5062_5064delGTT VUS Deleterious T1691I c.5072C>T VUS Not clear R1699W c.5095C>T Deleterious control Deleterious b R1699Q c.5096G>A VUS Deleterious b G1706E c.5117G>A VUS Deleterious b G1706A c.5117G>C VUS Neutral A1708E c.5123C>A Deleterious control Deleterious W1718C c.5154G>T VUS Deleterious T1720A c.5158A>G VUS Neutral E1735K c.5203G>A VUS Not clear  Table 1.   Functional classifi cation of BRCA1 VUS based on cisplatin response (Continued) Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1148 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al.  Fig. 3 ). Variants showing increased cisplatin sensitivity were tested at least twice before they were classifi ed. The positive and negative controls classifi ed as expected, although the known pathogenic truncation mutation 5382insC scored as neutral in one of three assays, stressing the need for repeat experiments. Also BRCA1 variants that were previously tested in other assays conducted as expected. It should be noted that the artifi cial variants S308A and S1497A rescued proliferation and cisplatin responses of mouse Brca1 - defi cient embryonic stem cells in BAC complementation assays, but are predicted to be deleterious based on their effects on embryonic stem cell differentiation and their response to γ-irradiation, respectively ( 7 ). The V1804D mutation scored as a neutral variant in our assay, which is in line with most published data ( 8, 9 ), except for the results of an embryonic stem cell–based BAC complementation assay ( 7 ). Again, all BRCA1 mutations that were classifi ed as deleterious were confi ned to regions encoding the conserved N- and C-terminal domains ( Fig.  4 ), despite the observation that deletion of the central region encoded by exon 11 leads to genetic instability in mice ( 12 ). Remarkably, the three mutations that diminish the interaction between BRCA1 and PALB2 ( 10 ), just C-terminal of the region encoded by exon 11, had no effect on cisplatin sensitivity in this assay. Of note, there was in general good correlation between our classifi cation and the Align-GVGD score (Supplementary Table S4). Notable exceptions were the neutral control variant R866C, which validated our assay but scored as likely deleterious (C65) using Align-GVGD, and G1770V, which scored as likely neutral (C0) by Align-GVGD but was classi- fi ed as deleterious in our assay. Our assay also classifi ed some variants for which the Align-GVGD scores were less clear, emphasizing the usefulness of functional assays to complement in silico analysis.  We also analyzed the possible effects of all BRCA1 variants on mRNA splicing, which may have deleterious consequences but cannot be assessed in our cDNA-based assay. The predictive value for exonic variants outside the consensus splice sites is questionable ( 19, 20 ), but four missense mutations were present in existing splice sites (Supplementary Table S4). Although c.5154G>T (encoding W1718C) was deleterious, three of these variants were classifi ed as neutral in our assay. One of them, c.441G>C (encoding L147F), had an increased probability to damage the splice donor site of exon 7. Another variant, c.5072C>T (encoding T1691I), might also affect splicing, but no defect was measured in blood samples of mutation carriers ( 19 ). The third exonic splice site mutation that was classifi ed as neutral in our cisplatin sensitivity assay, c.133A>C (K45Q), is not predicted to lead to aberrant splicing.  Results from Proliferation and Cisplatin Sensitivity Assays Correlate with HR Activity of BRCA1 Variants  BRCA1 and BRCA2 are involved in DNA repair via HR ( 12 , 21 ). Together with non-homologous end joining (NHEJ), HR forms the cellular defense against DNA double-strand breaks (DSB), a severe type of DNA damage that is lethal if unrepaired. Although HR is essentially error-free, NHEJ is error-prone, and therefore defects in HR are known to lead to genomic instability. Although it is not clear whether other Variant DNA change Type of mutation a Classifi cation V1736A c.5207T>C VUS Not clear b D1739G c.5216A>G VUS Deleterious D1739V c.5216A>T VUS Deleterious H1746Q c.5238C>G VUS Not clear R1753T c.5258G>C VUS Not clear b 5382insC c.5266dupC Deleterious control Not clear b L1764P c.5291T>C VUS Deleterious b C1767S c.5300G>C VUS Neutral G1770V c.5309G>T VUS Deleterious b W1782C c.5346G>T VUS Neutral A1789T c.5365G>A VUS Deleterious E1794D c.5382G>C VUS Neutral V1804D c.5411T>A VUS Neutral P1812R c.5435C>G VUS Neutral W1837R c.5509T>C VUS Deleterious H1862L c.5585A>T VUS Neutral a Type of mutation indicates if a variant is a VUS according to the BIC database (http://research.nhgri.nih.gov/bic/). b Functionally impaired in the DR-GFP and/or combined PARP inhibitor/cisplatin sensitivity assay.  Table 1.   Functional classifi cation of BRCA1 VUS based on cisplatin response (Continued) Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1149 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE  Figure 3.   Waterfall chart of cisplatin IC 50 values normalized for wild-type human BRCA1 and empty RMCE vector controls. Corrected cisplatin IC 50 values for all tested human BRCA1 variants and controls, including repeat experiments. BRCA1 variants are classifi ed as functionally impaired or neutral when the corrected IC 50 values are similar to either the empty RMCE vector or the wild-type human BRCA1 controls ( P < 0.05). 4.0 –3.0 –2.0 –1.0 0.0 1.0 2.0 3.0 Corrected cisplatin IC50 (a.u.) Mutant hBRCA1 Wild-type hBRCA1 Empty RMCE vector Positive control Negative control  Figure 4.   Predicted pathogenic BRCA1 amino acid substitutions are confi ned to the evolutionarily conserved N- and C-terminal domains. Schematic representation of the BRCA1 protein with the positions of variants classifi ed as neutral (green) or deleterious (red) indicated. Positive and negative controls are depicted by open pinheads and the known deleterious truncation mutations 185delAG (N-terminal) and 5382insC (C-terminal) are marked in blue. The amino acid sequences of the evolutionarily conserved RING (N-terminal) and BRCT (C-terminal) domains are specifi ed to show the exact positions of deleterious (red) and neutral (green) variants. The amino acid substitutions or nonsense (X) mutations of positive and negative controls are encircled. RING domain BRCT domains Deleterious VUS Neutral VUS Deleterious truncation mutant Deleterious control variant Neutral control variant 1646 1706 1766 91 109 1826 1863 61 31 1 MDLSALRVEEVQNVINAMQKILECPICLEL VNKRMSMVVSGLTPEEFMLVYKFARKHHITLTNLITEETTHVVMKTDAEFVCERTLKYFL IKEPVSTKCDHIFCKFCMLKLLNQKKGPSQ GIAGGKWVVSYFWVTQSIKERKMLNEHDFEVRGDVVNGRNHQGPKRARESQDRKIFRGLE CPLCKNDITKRSLQESTRFSQLVEELLKII CAFQLDTGLEYANSYNFAK ICCYGPFTNMPTDQLEWMVQLCGASVVKELSSFTLGTGVHPIVVVQPDAWTEDNGFHAIG QMCEAPVVTREWVLDSVALYQCQELDTYLIPQIPHSHY T Q E C A X Y C GG F R - Q W Q I E A V R L S C D DR T V P G X Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1150 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. functions of BRCA1 are also important for tumor suppression ( 16 , 22 , 23–26 ), its role in HR is likely to be relevant. Therefore, we used the direct repeat (DR)-GFP assay ( 27 ) to measure the effects on HR for a subset of our BRCA1 VUSs. A number of predicted pathogenic variants and controls were shuttled into R26 CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1 SCo/Δ ;Pim1 DR-GFP/wt embryonic stem cells carrying the DR-GFP reporter in the Pim1 locus. Expression of endogenous mouse Brca1 was switched off, and cells were transfected with a plasmid encoding the I-SceI meganuclease as well as an mCherry fl uorescent marker to control for transfection effi ciency. Repair of I-SceI–induced DNA DSBs in DR-GFP via HR leads to expression of GFP, which can be monitored by fl ow cytometry. All but one of the predicted pathogenic variants tested resulted in defective HR, thereby confi rming our functional classifi cation ( Fig. 5 ). The only predicted deleterious variant that did not signifi cantly differ from wild-type BRCA1 , R1699Q, seemed to support intermediate levels of HR activity.  PARP Inhibitor Sensitivity Assay for Classifi cation of BRCA1 Variants with Intermediate Activity  Deleterious effects of variants with intermediate or partial activity may escape detection in certain functional assays. Although cisplatin sensitivity assays allow robust and  Figure 5.  BRCA1 sequence variants classifi ed as pathogenic do not restore HR. R26 CreERT2/hBRCA1; Brca1 SCo/Δ;Pim1 DR-GFP/wt embryonic stem cells carrying the DR-GFP reporter gene in the Pim1 locus and mutant BRCA1 or controls in the Rosa26 locus were switched using 4-OHT and transfected with a vector expressing I-SceI and mCherry. Transfected cells were analyzed for GFP expression as a measure of HR activity. Expression of BRCA1 wild-type (WT) cDNA resulted in increased HR compared to the empty RMCE vector (Vector) control. Error bars indicate the SD between the results of three independent I-SceI transfections. Signifi cantly decreased HR activity compared with the wild-type control (green line) is indicated. GFP-Positive cells (%) 0.0 0.5 1.0 1.5 2.0 2.5 3.0 3.5 4.0 4.5 ** ns ** * * ns * * * * * * * ns ns WT Vector 185delAG C64G V271L S1651F S1655F R1699Q R1699W G1706A G1706E V1736A R1753T 5382insC L1764P G1770V reproducible classifi cation of several functionally impaired BRCA1 variants, assays using other compounds may have additional value. It is known that BRCA1- and BRCA2- defi cient cells are extremely sensitive to PARP1 inhibition ( 28, 29 ), leading to a larger dynamic range between BRCA2- defi cient cells and isogenic BRCA2-profi cient controls than for cisplatin ( 30 ). We therefore tested complementation of PARP inhibitor sensitivity for a number of BRCA1 mutants and the BRCA1 wild-type control. Given the unexpected neutral effects of the M1400V, L1407P, and M1411T mutations in the PALB2 interaction domain, we decided to include these variants in this series, as well as the R1699Q and V1736A variants that have recently been shown to confer (intermediate) breast and ovarian cancer risk ( 31, 32 ). To allow direct comparison of results from different assays, we repeated the cisplatin sensitivity and proliferation assays in parallel to the olaparib sensitivity assay. Our results indicate that BRCA1 wild-type and empty vector controls indeed show a larger difference in sensitivity for olaparib than for cisplatin ( Fig.  6 ). However, this increase in dynamic range is accompanied by an increased variation between repeat experiments for BRCA1-profi cient samples. Nevertheless, the functional defect of the R1699Q and V1736A mutations becomes more evident, and there also Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1151 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE  Figure 6.   PARP inhibitor sensitivity assay of BRCA1 sequence variants. R26 CreERT2/hBRCA1 ;Brca1 SCo/Δ or R26CreERT2/RMCE; Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells carrying mutant BRCA1 , BRCA1 wild-type (WT), or empty RMCE vector (Vector) controls in the Rosa26 locus were switched using 4-OHT and assayed for sensitivity to cisplatin or the PARP inhibitor olaparib. The cytotoxicity assays were conducted in parallel and data were normalized to the average of the wild-type controls. Error bars indicate the SD between the results of biologic triplicates for which the cells were independently switched. Signifi cant deviation from the average IC 50 values of the wild-type control (green line) is indicated. IC50 Relative to WT controls (%) 0 20 40 60 80 100 120 140 160 Cisplatin Olaparib * **** **** * * ** *** **** ns ns ns ns WT Vector M1400V L1407P M1411T R1699Q V1736A seems to be a less than wild-type response for the PALB2 interaction mutant L1407P. In the concurrent proliferation analysis, R1699Q and V1736A both show an intermediate functional defect (Supplementary Fig.  S4). Also the M1411T mutation seems to affect the response to PARP inhibition, but the difference with BRCA1 wild-type is not signifi cant. Interestingly, the L1407P and M1411T variants have previously been shown to be more defective than M1400V in a gene conversion assay ( 10 ). It should also be noted that, in contrast with the large-scale classifi cation experiments, the cisplatin sensitivity assay conducted in parallel to the PARP inhibitor assay identifi ed signifi cant functional defects for L1407P and V1736A.  DISCUSSION  Over the past few years several functional assays for classifi cation of BRCA1 VUSs have been developed. Several of these assays are restricted to functions of the BRCA1 protein that reside in the evolutionarily conserved RING or BRCT domains. Examples include in vitro transactivation assays for BRCT peptides ( 8 ) and measurement of ubiquitin ligase activity for protein fragments encompassing the N-terminal RING domain ( 33 ). Other assays were designed to evaluate the functions of full-length mutant BRCA1 protein, either by monitoring general effects on proliferation or response to DNA damage ( 7 ), or by directly focusing on the role of BRCA1 in DNA repair via HR ( 34 ).  Because BRCA1 VUSs are not restricted to regions encoding the N- or C-terminal domains, and given the observation that interaction between these domains is required for recruitment of BRCA1 to damaged DNA ( 35 ), functional assays for the full-length protein would be ideal. In principle, such assays can be conducted in cell lines derived from BRCA1 - mutated tumors, but there are indications that the outcome of assays for BRCA1 function depends on the cellular context. As absence of BRCA1 leads to loss of cellular viability, it is thought that additional mutations are required for BRCA1- associated tumorigenesis. For example, loss of p53 alleviates the consequences of BRCA1 defi ciency both in vitro and in vivo ( 4 ) and is common in BRCA1-defi cient tumors ( 36, 37 ). Also, depletion of 53BP1 is known to suppress the defects caused by BRCA1 defi ciency ( 5 , 38 , 39 ). Therefore, aberrations in BRCA1-defi cient tumor cells may mask functional defects of BRCA1 VUSs. We reasoned that assays in normal cells that can be depleted from endogenous BRCA1 expression are most likely to reveal functional defects of BRCA1 VUSs. The usefulness of this approach has been previously shown by Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1152 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. BAC complementation assays in mouse embryonic stem cells ( 7 , 40 ). However, mutagenesis of large BAC clones by recombineering and functional complementation of cells with these mutant constructs is time-consuming and technically demanding, and therefore cannot be conducted in a high-throughput setting. We therefore set out to develop a cDNA-based functional complementation assay in mouse embryonic stem cells that is easier to control and scale up and more suitable for routine functional classifi cation of BRCA1 sequence variants.  One advantage of BAC transgenics in complementation assays is that genes are expressed at physiologically relevant levels. This is the result of low copy-number integrations and the presence of natural regulatory elements required for proper gene expression. We decided to use RMCE to allow single-copy integration of BRCA1 cDNAs at one specifi c genomic locus. The use of RMCE effectively prevents multiple or partial integrations, concatemers, and position-effect variegation. As a result, all variants are expressed at equal levels. Moreover, transcription of BRCA1 cDNAs from the EF1A gene promoter results in physiologic levels of BRCA1 protein, comparable with those observed in embryonic stem cells stably transfected with a BAC containing the human BRCA1 locus. Indeed, the wild-type human BRCA1 cDNA was able to complement Brca1 -null embryonic stem cells in cellular proliferation, drug sensitivity, and HR assays. Our RMCE strategy uses BRCA1 cDNA constructs in which mutations can be swiftly introduced using SDM, enabling a higher throughput than introduction of mutations via BAC recombineering. In addition, the introduction of BRCA1 cDNAs via RMCE obviates the need to analyze multiple embryonic stem cell clones for correct integration and expression.  As a proof of principle, we used our functional complementation assay to analyze exonic BRCA1 VUSs that were identifi ed in families with HBOC in the Netherlands and Belgium, as well as a set of previously analyzed BRCA1 variants. A number of mutations resulted in reduced BRCA1 protein levels, most likely because of structural destabilization. In all cases, this led to diminished capacity for functional complementation. Also, several variants that gave rise to normal BRCA1 protein levels were unable to rescue the proliferation defect and cisplatin sensitivity of Brca1 -null embryonic stem cells. As BRCA1 loss of function mutations are associated with increased cancer risk, variants that score as functionally impaired in our embryonic stem cell assay system may be causally involved in tumor formation. This notion is supported by the fact that seven of eight known pathogenic or neutral control variants in our validation series were correctly classifi ed by the cisplatin sensitivity assay. The pathogenic 5382insC truncation mutation could not be classifi ed because it scored as neutral in one of three transfection series. This was probably due to technical reasons, as the 5382insC mutation did not restore HR activity in Brca1 -defi cient embryonic stem cells, in contrast with R1699Q, which was recently shown to confer intermediate risk of HBOC ( 32 ).  Our assay system yielded ambivalent results for nine other variants: S4F, S308A, S1651P, S1651F, T1691I, V1736A, E1735K, H1746Q, and R1753T. T1691I and E1735K were classifi ed as functionally impaired in only one cisplatin sensitivity test, whereas values from repeat experiments could not be taken into account because of RSE values above 0.1. S4F, S1651P, S1651F, V1736A, H1746Q, and R1753T were differently classifi ed in repeat experiments, which may refl ect technical fl aws or intermediate activity of these variants. Of note, the V1736A mutation was recently identifi ed as a pathogenic variant with hypomorphic activity in DNA repair ( 31 ). Although we did not measure signifi cant HR activity of V1736A in a DR-GFP gene conversion assay, intermediate activity of this variant is supported by the results of the proliferation assays and additional cisplatin sensitivity assays. S1651F showed HR activity similar to wild-type BRCA1 , whereas R1753T was HR-defi cient. S308A is an artifi cial mutation of a BRCA1 phosphorylation site that was able to support proliferation and resistance to DNA damage in an embryonic stem cell-based BAC complementation assay. However, S308A-complemented embryonic stem cells did show increased apoptosis when cultured in embryoid bodies ( 7 ), indicating a partial defect that might explain the ambivalent results for this mutation in our assays.  Our results show that BRCA1 variants should ideally be assayed in triplicate to avoid misclassifi cation. This also applies to BRCA1 VUS that we classifi ed as neutral, most of which were tested only once because in our current study we focused on variants that showed functional impairment. The striking restriction of unambiguously predicted pathogenic mutants to the terminal RING and BRCT domains suggests that some plasticity is allowed for the central domain of BRCA1. However, our dataset is still limited and more experiments are required to gain insight into the function of this domain.  Our cDNA-based system allows for several additional functional assays that have been described previously for BAC transgenic embryonic stem cells ( 7 ). These include assays for defects during in vitro and in vivo embryonic stem cell differentiation but also treatments with other cytotoxic agents. As a proof of principle, we investigated the activity of a number of mutants in the response to the PARP inhibitor olaparib. These included M1400V, L1407, and M1411T, which were previously shown to impair PALB2 binding and have a negative effect on BRCA1 function ( 10 ). Although the differences in sensitivity of BRCA1-defi cient versus BRCA1-profi cient embryonic stem cells are larger for olaparib than for cisplatin, increased variation between repeat experiments allowed us to identify functional defects only for L1407 and not for the other two variants in the PALB2 interaction domain, M1400V and M1411T. However, the R1699Q and V1736A variants, which are known to have hypomorphic activity, clearly showed a defect in the response to olaparib. Interestingly, both mutations are in the BRCT domain, and it has recently been shown that mutation of this domain especially confers sensitivity to PARP inhibition ( 41 ). Together, our results show that PARP inhibitor sensitivity assays may have added value, especially for the classifi cation of BRCA1 VUSs with intermediate phenotypes.  Platinum drugs and PARP inhibitors are selectively toxic to BRCA1-defi cient cells because they target HR defi ciency. Although the role of BRCA1 in HR is thought to be essential for maintaining genomic integrity and preventing accumulation of (oncogenic) mutations, other activities may also contribute to its tumor suppression function. These activities Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1153 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE may include the HR-independent role for BRCA1 in ICL repair, which has been attributed to the facilitation of FANCD2 accumulation at cross-linked DNA ( 16 ). Nevertheless, we observed a good correlation between the results of the cisplatin sensitivity assay and the results of the DR-GFP HR assay. All BRCA1 variants that failed to restore the cisplatin response in Brca1 -null embryonic stem cells were also defective in catalyzing gene conversion, thereby confi rming our functional classifi cation. It will be interesting to see if this holds true for all BRCA1 variants or whether there are also pathogenic mutations that have no effect on HR.  As with any other in vitro approach, our functional complementation assay system might still fail to identify all pathogenic variants because it does not necessarily recapitulate all aspects of BRCA1 function in vivo . A limitation of our cDNA-based assay is also that it cannot be used to investigate effects on mRNA splicing. Although algorithms have been designed to predict possible splice defects, the consequences of mutations outside of the consensus splice sites especially require functional validation experiments. For this purpose, BAC complementation assays ( 7 ), minigene-based splicing assays, or BRCA1 transcript analysis of patient blood samples ( 19 ) may be instrumental. However, transacting factors also affect splicing, and these may be tissue specifi c ( 42 ). A possible solution would be to determine the presence of BRCA1 splice variants in tumor tissue from BRCA1 VUS carriers and use this information to generate a cDNA construct for analysis of the functional consequences. To evaluate BRCA1 VUSs, there remains a need for multifactorial models that combine results from functional assays and in silico analyses with genetic evidence and other information from mutation carriers. This also includes DNA copy number data from tumors from BRCA1 VUS carriers, as it is known that BRCA1- associated breast tumors show distinct genomic aberrations ( 43, 44 ). Our functional assay system does however provide a robust and easily implementable tool for the functional characterization of large numbers of BRCA1 VUSs within the context of the full-length protein. It is our hope that our assay system will fi nd its way to clinical genetics laboratories where it can be used to aid genetic counseling. Ideally, these tests should be coordinated on an international level and in close collaboration with the ENIGMA consortium.    BRCA1 is a tumour suppressor with pleiotropic actions. Germline mutations in BRCA1 are responsible for a large proportion of breast–ovarian cancer families. Several missense variants have been identified throughout the gene but because of lack of information about their impact on the function of BRCA1, predictive testing is not always informative. Classification of missense variants into deleterious/ high risk or neutral/low clinical significance is essential to identify individuals at risk. Objective: To investigate a panel of missense variants. Methods and results: The panel was investigated in a comprehensive framework that included (1) a functional assay based on transcription activation; (2) segregation analysis and a method of using incomplete pedigree data to calculate the odds of causality; (3) a method based on interspecific sequence variation. It was shown that the transcriptional activation assay could be used as a test to characterise mutations in the carboxy-terminus region of BRCA1 encompassing residues 1396–1863. Thirteen missense variants (H1402Y, L1407P, H1421Y, S1512I, M1628T, M1628V, T1685I, G1706A, T1720A, A1752P, G1788V, V1809F, and W1837R) were specifically investigated. Conclusions: While individual classification schemes for BRCA1 alleles still present limitations, a combination of several methods provides a more powerful way of identifying variants that are causally linked to a high risk of breast and ovarian cancer. The framework presented here brings these variants nearer to clinical applicability. I ndividuals carrying inactivating germline mutations in the breast and ovarian cancer susceptibility gene BRCA1 have an increased risk of developing cancer, making it essential to identify those at risk.1 This task is complicated by the presence of over 1000 different BRCA1 alleles in the population carrying nonsense, missense, frameshift mutations as well as large and small deletions (Breast Cancer Information Core, BIC: http://research.nhgri.nih.gov/bic/). Progress has been made recently in identifying which alleles are likely to be associated with disease. Several lines of evidence derived from population based analysis and functional studies indicate that all mutations leading to premature termination are associated with increased cancer susceptibility.2–4 However, missense mutations still pose an important problem for risk assessment because of their low frequency and, in some cases, ethnic specificity, which make population based studies difficult. Over 300 missense sequence variants have been identified in BRCA1, located throughout the gene (BIC database). In breast–ovarian cancer families in which a missense variant is the only sequence alteration detected, it is difficult to determine whether the variant is causally linked to predisposition or not and so it is uninformative for predictive testing purposes. Functional studies in which specific activities of the protein or broad biological phenotypes are assayed have contributed to the classification of missense variants.4–11 When integrated with population based studies, functional tests can be a powerful method to help characterise these mutants. BRCA1 is involved in maintaining genomic stability and participates in the DNA damage response, but its biochemical functions have remained elusive.12 13 The BRCA1 protein contains several motifs and structural domains that have been functionally characterised or, in some cases, inferred from sequence analysis and prediction. A zinc binding RING finger,14 which binds the BRCA1 associated RING domain protein BARD1 is present at the N-terminal region (aa 24– 64).15 The BRCA1–BARD1 complex behaves as an E3 ubiquitin ligase.15 Cancer associated missense mutations that are located in this region disrupt BRCA1–BARD1 interaction and affect its in vitro ubiquitination activity.16–18 At the C-terminus, two BRCT domains in tandem (BRCT-N: aa 1653–1736; BRCT-C: aa 1760–1855) display a transcription activation function when fused to a heterologous DNA binding domain6 19 and mediate the interaction of BRCA1 with the RNA polymerase II holoenzyme.20 BRCT domains are protein–protein interaction domains found in proteins involved in DNA repair and cell cycle control.21 22 Mutations that result in the truncation or structural alteration of the BRCT segment have been identified in hereditary breast– ovarian cancer families, showing the essential nature of this portion of the gene (BIC database). Importantly, cancer associated missense mutations located at the BRCT domains abolish its transcription activity in an artificial system.4 6 8 19 The strong correlation between cancer association and disruption of a certain biochemical function, even though determined in an artificial system, suggest that specific biochemical tests are powerful tools to characterise these variants. We and others have characterised several missense variants located at the BRCT domains using a transcription activation assay.4–8 19 While the published data on BRCA1 suggest a (direct or indirect) function in transcription, it is unlikely that BRCA1 represents a bona fide transcriptional activator. Our working model is that the transcription assay is Abbreviations: DBD, DNA binding domain 138 www.jmedgenet.com a monitor of the integrity of the C-terminal domain of BRCA1 and therefore can be used to derive functional information. Along those lines, we hypothesised that unclassified missense variants located in regions of BRCA1 that contribute to transcription activation besides the BRCT domains might be amenable to a transcription based classification. In the present study we show that the transcriptional activation assay can be used as a test to characterise mutations in the region encompassing aa 1396–1863 (exons 13 to 24) and we specifically investigated 13 missense variants (H1402Y, L1407P, H1421Y, S1512I, M1628T, M1628V, T1685I, G1706A, T1720A, A1752P, G1788V, V1809F, and W1837R). In addition, we analysed all the mutations using a prediction algorithm based on interspecific sequence variation and Grantham matrices.23 Pedigrees were also analysed for segregation analysis, and posterior probabilities were calculated to determine the odds of causality for each variant. Finally, co-occurrence of the variant with other known deleterious mutations was taken into account. These results were combined with previously published results derived from methods including a prediction algorithm based on general protein structure parameters that evaluates the impact on function for mutations at the BRCT domain,24 and a protease based assay.25 This integrated approach provided us with a cross validated scheme to classify variants as well as to identify the strengths and limitations of current methods. METHODS Constructs Wild type GAL4 DNA binding domain (DBD) fusion construct aa 1560–1863 of human BRCA1 in pGBT9 (Clontech) was previously described.4 The following wild type BRCA1 fragments were amplified by polymerase chain reaction (PCR) using the plasmid pcBRCA1-385 (a gift from Michael Erdos, National Human Genome Research Institute) as a template and the following nucleotide primers: fragment 2–11B (aa 1–323) (ZNF2F, 59GCGGAATTCATGG ATTTATCTGCTCTT 39; BRAL, 59ATAGTCGACTTCCAGCCCA TCTGTTATGT 39), 13–21 (aa 1396–1778) (UX13, 59CGGAATT CCAGAGGGATACCATGCAA 39; LX21DM, 59GCGGTCGA CATCTGTGGGCATGTT 39), 14–24 (aa 1455–1863) (UX14, 59CGGAATTCACTTCACAGAAAAGTAGT 39; 24ENDT, 59GC GGATCCTCAGTAGTGGCTGTGGGGGAT 39), 13–24 (aa 1396– 1863) (UX13, 59CGGAATTCCAGAGGGATACCATGCAA 39; 24ENDT), 12–24 (aa 1366–1863) (UX12, 59CGGAATTCGG TGAAGCAGCATCTGGG 39; 24ENDT). PCR products were gel purified and digested with EcoRI (2–11B only), EcoRI and SalI (13–21 only), or EcoRI and BamHI, and fragments were ligated in frame to the GAL4 DBD of the yeast expression vector pGBT9 similarly digested. Construct 11B24 (aa 302– 1863) was made by digesting pGBT9 16–24 with EcoRI and NcoI and isolating a 6.1 kb fragment containing the vector and the end of BRCA1 coding region. Subsequently, pcBRCA1–385 was similarly digested and a 4.0 kb fragment (EcoRI-NcoI) was isolated and ligated to the previous pGBT9 fragment, generating a pGBT9 (aa 302–1863). To obtain the full length, a PCR fragment corresponding to exons 2–11B (aa 1–323) was digested with EcoRI, and a 1 kb fragment was isolated and ligated to a similarly digested pGBT9 11B24. The yeast expressing vector pLex9 carrying a wild type BRCA1 sequence (aa 1396–1863) fused in frame to the LexA DNA binding domain (DBD) was used as wild type control and as a backbone to introduce the mutations described in table 1 by site directed mutagenesis using the following methods. Mutations S1613G, A1708E, M1775R, and Y1853X were subcloned from previously described constructs.5 6 Mutation H1402Y was introduced by direct PCR using primers 24ENDT and H1402Y-U (59 GGAATTCCAGAGGG ATACCATGCAATATAACC 39). Mutations L1407P, A1752P, and G1706A were introduced by the Quickchange (Stratagene) method according to the manufacturer’s instruction. The following primers containing the alteration of interest were used for PCR involving the wild type constructs produced in a methylation competent bacterial strain, and amplification was carried out using Pfu polymerase. L1407P (L1407P-U, 59 CTGATCAAGCCCCAGCA GG 39; L1407P-L, 59 CCTGCTGGGGCTTGATCAG 39); G1706A (G1706AF, 59 GACACTGAAATATTTTCTAGCAATTGCCGGCG GAAAATGG 39; G1706AR’, 59 CCATTTTCCGCCGGCAATTG CTAGAAAATATTTCAGTGTC 39); A1752P (A1752PF, 59 CCAA GGTCCAAAGCGACCTCGAGAATCCCAGGAC 39; A752PR, 59 GTCCTGGGATTCTCGAGGTCGCTTTGGACCTTGG 39). Dpn1 was subsequently added to digest the parental plasmid leaving only cDNAs with the introduced mutations to be transformed into bacteria. Mutations H1421Y, S1512I, P1614S, M1628T, M1628V, T1685I, T1700A, T1720A, G1788V, V1809F, and W1837R were introduced using splicing by overlapping extension PCR.26 The first round of PCR was undertaken using the following primers: H1421Y 39 region (H1421Y-U2, 59 GTTAGAACAG TATGGGAGCCAGCCTTCT; 24ENDT); H1421Y 59 region (H1421Y-L2, 59AGAAGGCTGGCTCCCATACTGTTCTAAC; UX13); S1512I 39 region ( S1512I-U, 59 GGTACATGCACA TATGCTCTGG-39; 24ENDT); S1512I 59 region (S1512I-L, 59 CCAGAGCATATGTGCATGTACC 39; UX13); P1614S 39 region (P1614S-U, 59 GCAGAATCTGCCCAGAGTTCAGCTGCTG 39; 24ENDT); P1614S 59 region (P1614S-L, 59 CAGCAGCTGAAC TCTGGGCAGATTCTGC 39; UX13); M1628T 39 region (M1628TF, 59 GCCGGCTATAATGCAACGGAAGAAAGTGTGA GCAGG 39; 24ENDT); M1628T 59 (M128TR9, 59 CCTGCTC ACACTTTCTTCCGTTGCATTATAGCCGGC 39; UX13); M1628V 39 region (M1628VF, 59 GCCGGCTATAATGCAGTGGAAG AAAGTGTGAGCAGG 39; 24ENDT) M1628V 59 region (M1628VR9, 59 CCTGCTCACACTTTCTTCCACTGCATTATAG CCGGC 39; UX13); T1685I; T1700A 39 region (T1700A-U, 59 GTTTGTGTGTGAACGGGCACTGAAATAT 39; 24ENDT); T1700A 59 region (T1700A-L, 59 ATATTTCAGTGCCCG TTCACACACAAAC 39; UX13); T1720A 39 region (T1720A-U, 59 GCTATTTCTGGGTGGCCCAGTCTATTAA 39; 24ENDT); T1720A 59 region (T1720A-L, 59 TTAATAGACTGGGCCACCC AGAAATAGC 39; UX13); G1788V 39 region (G1788V-F, 59 GCTGTGTTGCTTCTGTGG 39; 24ENDT); G1788V 59 region (G1788V-R, 59 CCACAGAAGCAACACACAG 39; UX13); V1809F 39 region (V1809F-F, 59 CCAATTGTGTTTGTGCAG 39; 24ENDT) V1809F 59 region (V1809F-R, 59 GGCTGCACAA ACACAATTGG 39; UX13); W1837R 59 region (W1837R-F, 59 GGTGACCCGAGAGCGGGTGTT 39; 24ENDT); W1837R 39 region (W1837R-R, 59 CCAACACCCGCTCTCGGG 39; UX13). For each mutation, both products (59 and 39 regions) were combined and used as a template for a final round of PCR using 24ENDT and UX13 primers. The final PCR products were cloned into pCR-Script Amp SK(+) vector (Stratagene). The inserts were then isolated by cutting with BamH1 and EcoR1 and ligated to pLex9 or pGBT9 vectors. All mutations were confirmed by sequencing. To obtain GAL4-DBD fusions in a mammalian expression vector, pGTB9 constructs were digested with HindIII and BamH1, a 1.8 kb band was isolated and ligated into equally digested pCDNA3. Transcription assay in yeast Two Saccharomyces cerevisiae strains were used: EGY48 [MATa, ura3, trp1, his3, 6 lexA operator-LEU2] and SFY526 [MATa, ura 3-52, his3-200, ade 2-101, lys s-801, trp 1-901, leu 2-3, 112, canr , gal 4-542, gal 80-538, URA3::GAL1-lacZ].27 SFY526 cells contain a lacZ reporter gene under the control of GAL1 UAS, which is recognised by GAL4 DNA binding domain (DBD). EGY48 cells were transformed with plasmid reporters Classification of BRCA1 missense variants of unknown clinical significance 139 www.jmedgenet.com pSH18–34, pJK103, or pRB1840 which contain a lacZ gene under the control of eight, two, and one LexA operators, respectively.27 28 Competent yeast cells were obtained using the yeast transformation system based on lithium acetate (Clontech) and cells were transformed according to the manufacturer’s instructions. At least three individual EGY48 or SFY526 clones for each variant were tested for liquid b-galactosidase assays using ONPG,29 and the assays were carried out in triplicate. The b-galactosidase activity was noted as a comparison to wild type BRCA1 and S1613G (positive controls) or to A1708E, M1775R, and Y1853X (negative controls). Western blot analysis was carried out as previously described.4 Transcription assay in mammalian cells We used pG5Luc, which contains a firefly luciferase gene under the control of five GAL4 binding sites, as a reporter for the assay. Transfections were normalised with an internal control phGR-TK (Promega), which contains a Renilla luciferase gene under a constitutive TK basal promoter using a dual luciferase system. Human 293T cells were cultured in Dulbecco’s modified Eagle’s medium (DMEM) supplemented with 5% calf serum and plated in 24-well plates the day before transfection. Transfections were done in triplicate using Fugene 6 (Roche) and harvested 24 hours posttransfection. Cells were lysed in RIPA buffer (150 mM NaCl, 10 mM Tris-HCl pH 7.4, 5 mM EDTA, 0.1% sodium dodecyl sulphate, 1% Triton X-100, 0.1% sodium deoxycholate). The blots were incubated with a-GAL4 DBD monoclonal antibody (Clontech). Lysates were cleared and samples were separated on 10% SDS-PAGE; equal amounts of protein were loaded for every sample. Gels were electroblotted on a wet apparatus to a polyvinylidene difluoride (PVDF) membrane and probed with an a-LexA DBD monoclonal antibody (Clontech). Our laboratory has completed the analysis of 27% of the existing unclassified variants (32/117) in the C-terminus of BRCA1 (residues 1560–1863). To validate the assay we have used (a) all the unambiguously classified missense variants, and (b) all other variants for which there are strong (but not definitive) clinical data. Using the set of variants in (a), the assay correctly classified the four variants that can be classified unambiguously as deleterious (A1708E, R1699W, M1775R) or benign (S1613G) based on clinical data. Using the set of variants in (b), the assay correctly classified all nine other variants with strong supporting clinical evidence for classification. These results suggest a high sensitivity and specificity for this assay. RESULTS Frequency in control populations Six variants (G1706A, A1708E, A1752P, M1775R, G1788V, and W1837R) were assessed using PCR/LDR followed by assessment in a DNA microarray30 in 500 healthy women without cancer of varying ages (18–40 years) and ethnic groups. All were at a frequency of 0/500. The remaining variants were assessed by denaturing gradient gel electrophoresis (DGGE) with the following frequencies: H1402Y (0/500), L1407P (0/500), H1421Y (0/500), S1512I (6/500), S1613G (260/500), M1628V (0/500), M1628T (0/500), T1685I (0/500), W1837R (0/500), and Y1853X (0/500). Variants T1720A and V1809F were not assessed. Activation of transcription Regions of BRCA1 that contribute to its transcription activation function besides aa 1560–1863 might also be used in a transcription based functional assays to classify missense variants. In order to determine their contribution we quantitatively assessed activation of a b-galactosidase reporter gene under the control of a GAL4 responsive promoter by a series of GAL4DBD:BRCA1 fusion constructs in yeast (fig 1A). These constructs were designed to test systematically the contribution of exons 13 to 24 to activation. While a construct including aa 1455–1863 did not show activity that was significantly higher than aa 1560–1863, a construct containing aa 1396–1863 had an activity that was markedly higher (fig 1B). The results in a mammalian expression system confirmed those obtained in yeast, with construct aa 1396–1863 showing the highest activity (fig 1C). In this case, however, the contribution of aa 1455–1559 is less clear, but this may reflect instability of the aa 1455–1863 construct in mammalian cells. We can detect expression of this construct when using a polyclonal antibody (fig 1D, second lane), but it is not recognised by a monoclonal antibody raised against a similar epitope (compare second lane in fig 1D, top and bottom panel). We were unable to obtain significant levels of expression of the GAL4DBD full length protein in 293T cells, even after several attempts. BRCT-N domain alone is not capable of activating transcription Previous experiments indicated that the BRCT-C repeat alone could activate transcription when fused to a heterologous DBD. Although activity was abolished by disruption of the BRCT-C repeat, it was still possible that the first domain could show residual activity. To test for this, we made a GAL4 fusion construct aa 1396–1778, which includes BRCT-N (aa 1653–1736) but not BRCT-C (aa 1760–1855). Sequences contained in aa 1396–1559 were defined as the strongest auxiliary activating region in BRCA1 (see above), providing the most favourable context to demonstrate any residual activity. This construct did not show any significant activation (not shown), indicating that this region can collaborate to augment activity but cannot act alone. Although there is a correlation of negative charge and transcription activation, charge does not seem to be the only determinant (fig 1). The fragment aa 1560–1863 is less negatively charged than the aa 1396–1778 fragment, yet the former is able to activate transcription while the latter is not. In conclusion, sequences outside the BRCT domains confer higher activity to BRCA1 but cannot act alone. The construct containing exons 13–24 (aa 1396–1863) showed the highest transcription activation (15-fold activation ability over full length BRCA1) being the most sensitive to detect differences in transcription activation and it was therefore chosen as the backbone in which to introduce the sequence variants for the transcription activation assay. Functional analysis of missense variants The location of the 13 missense variants studied as well as the negative and positive controls are indicated by arrows in fig 2A. Seven variants lie in the BRCT domains. Six of the variants lie upstream of the BRCT domains, three of which lie within the putative coiled coil domain (fig 2A). Three known BRCT deleterious/high risk variants—A1708E, M1775R, and Y1853X—were used as negative (that is, loss of function) controls, and S1613G (a common neutral polymorphism) and wild type BRCA1 (aa 1396–1863) were employed as positive controls. Results show that both in yeast and mammalian cells the three negative controls located in the BRCT domain lose most of transcription activation function consistent with a loss of function mutation, whereas the positive control S1613G had an activity equal to or higher than the wild type, as observed previously5 6 (fig 2B and 2C). Seven unclassified missense variants in the BRCT domains (T1685I, G1706A, T1720A, A1752P, G1788V, V1809F, and W1837R) were then tested. Variants T1685I, A1752P, G1788V, V1809F, and W1837R showed greatly decreased transcription activation 140 Phelan, Ðapic´, Tice, et al www.jmedgenet.com levels (at least ,50%) both in yeast and mammalian cells, comparable with the known mutant controls and consistent with their classification as deleterious/high risk variants (fig 2B and 2C). Variants G1706A and T1720A showed slightly reduced transcription activation levels in yeast cells, at 64% and 74%, respectively, of the wild type control. Interestingly, whereas T1720A had activity comparable to wild type in mammalian cells, G1706A showed a markedly reduced activity. The intermediate results for these mutants suggest that they may represent moderate rather than high risk variants. Six additional variants (H1402Y, L1407P, H1421Y, S1512I, M1628T, and M1628V) in locations outside the BRCT domains were also investigated for their effect on transcription. Three of the variants were located in a region in which a putative coiled coil domain has been predicted to form (fig 2A).31 Variant L1407P showed significantly reduced transcription activation levels consistent with a high risk mutation (fig 2B, 2C). Variants H1402Y, H1421Y, and S1512I showed transcription activation levels equal to or higher than wild type BRCA1, suggesting that they do not represent high risk variants and are likely to have low clinical significance. In yeast cells, protein levels were slightly variable in three independent clones. Most variants displayed levels comparable to wild type, with the exception of Y1853X and T1685I, which showed markedly reduced levels suggesting that protein instability might be the underlying cause of loss of function. In mammalian cells, some variants (S1512I, V1809F, and W1837R) had markedly reduced levels. However, no loss of function variant showed consistently reduced levels in yeast and mammalian cells, suggesting that even when expressed at higher levels they were unable to activate transcription (fig 2D). Pedigree analysis In order to obtain additional information to classify the missense variants we applied a recently developed full likelihood method for the evaluation of causality from family data.32 For the analysis of co-segregation we assumed an allele frequency of the variant of 0.0001 and a penetrance model with separate age specific risks of breast and ovarian cancer for BRCA1 based on meta-analysis estimates.33 We obtained six pedigrees for five variants (M1628T, G1706A, T1720A, V1809F, and W1837R) (fig 3). For M1628T we obtained odds against causality of 10.4:1, consistent with the data obtained in the functional assay. For G1706A we obtained odds against causality of 1.3:1. This rather uninformative result reflects the fact that this large pedigree with multiple cases typed had one case diagnosed at age 53 that did not carry the variant. This result may also reflect the β-Galactosidase units GAL1p β-Galactosidase 220 D A B 1560–1863 1456–1863 1396–1863 1366–1863 1–1863 IP C-20 IP SG11 10 20 30 40 50 60 70 1–1863 1366–1863 1396–1863 1455–1863 1560–1863 1–1863 1366–1863 1396–1863 1455–1863 1560–1863 –69 BRCA1 constructs Net charge aa –34 –23 –22 –12 220 97 97 66 66 46 46 Luciferase arbitrary units Luciferase 5 x GAL4 bs C 1000 2000 3000 4000 1–1863 1366–1863 1396–1863 1455–1863 1560–1863 Figure 1 Regions of BRCA1 that contribute to transcription activation. (A) Fusion constructs of GAL4 (yeast and mammalian cells) or LexA (yeast) DNA binding domain (grey boxes) to wild type BRCA1 used in this study. Net charges of BRCA1 sequences are indicated. (B) Presence of activating and inhibitory regions in BRCA1. Yeast cells (SFY526) were transformed with the designated constructs, and transcriptional activity was measured by the lacZ reporter gene. Cells were grown in liquid culture and b-galactosidase activity was assayed. Each bar corresponds to three independent transformants that were assayed in triplicate. (C) Activation of transcription in mammalian cells: 293T cells were co-transfected with the GAL4 DBD fusion constructs and a luciferase reporter gene under the control of GAL4 responsive elements. Four independent experiments done in duplicate are shown. Standard deviation was less than 15% in all cases (not shown). (D) Immunoprecipitations with a-BRCA1 C-terminal polyclonal antibody (C-20, directed against aa 1843–1862; top panel) or monoclonal antibody (SG11, directed against aa 1846–1863; bottom panel), blotted against a-GAL4DBD monoclonal antibody. Classification of BRCA1 missense variants of unknown clinical significance 141 www.jmedgenet.com fact that G1706A may be a moderate rather than a high risk variant. For variant V1809F the odds in favour of causality were 7.3:1, consistent with the functional test, suggesting that it is a high risk variant. Two pedigrees were analysed for the T1720A variant generating combined odds against causality of 355:1. This result is also consistent with the functional data and suggests that T1720A represents a neutral/low clinical significance variant. For variant W1837R we obtained odds of 4:1 against causality, which contradicts our functional data. Analysis of interspecific sequence variation In order to determine further the likelihood that a particular variant may or may not represent a high risk variant we also analysed the amino acid substitution using a modified Grantham matrix, adapted for BRCA1.23 These results are shown in table 1. The classification based on interspecific sequence variation confirms our choice of controls, with S1613G being classified as neutral and M1775R, A1708E, and Y1853X being classified as deleterious. It also confirms our functional results for H1402Y, L1407P, T1685I, G1706A, G1788V, and W1837R. Variant M1628V, however, was classified as a neutral/low risk variant in contradiction of our functional results. The remaining variants could not be classified by this method. Co-occurrence with deleterious mutations Homozygous disruption of Brca1 in mouse resulted in embryonic lethality (reviewed by Brodie and Deng44). In addition, there is a deficit from expected numbers of BRCA1 homozygotes and compound heterozygotes for deleterious mutations among individuals with the founder mutations 185delAG and 5382insC.45 This led to the notion that if an unknown variant co-occurs with a known deleterious mutation it is unlikely that this variant is a high risk one. Co-occurrence data relative to a set of 40 000 individuals (kindly provided Amie Deffenbaugh, Myriad Genetics Laboratories Inc) are listed in table 1. Variants H1402Y, S1512, and M1628T co-occur with a deleterious mutation and are therefore unlikely to represent high risk variants, a result supported by the functional assays. DISCUSSION In order to provide a more informative risk assessment for individuals carrying a mutation in BRCA1 we used several approaches, including association studies and segregation Figure 2 Functional analysis of missense variants in BRCA1. (A) Location of variants (blue), negative and positive controls (red and green, respectively). Grey boxes, BRCT domains; DBD, GAL4 DNA binding domain; blue box, putative coiled-coil domain. (B) Quantitative assay in yeast. (C) Quantitative assays in mammalian cells. (D) Protein levels were determined by western blots in yeast (upper panel) and mammalian cells (lower panel). 142 Phelan, Ðapic´, Tice, et al www.jmedgenet.com analysis. However, the clinical relevance of missense variants has been particularly elusive because of their low frequency, making it difficult to conduct meaningful population based studies. Several lines of investigation must be considered in the classification of a BRCA1 variant into deleterious/high risk or neutral/low clinical significance.46 The occurrence of the variant in high risk individuals (affected by breast or ovarian cancer and with a family history of breast or ovarian cancer) compared with controls can provide clues as to its status, but the frequencies of variants differ considerably between ethnic groups.36 Segregation of the variant in the family members affected by the disease may be a strong indicator that a variant is deleterious except if it is in linkage disequilibrium with another mutation, as observed in some ethnic groups.47 Additional approaches have relied on sequence comparisons23 48–50 or on functional tests which include specific assays such as transcription activation, or broader phenotypes such as the generation of a yeast small colony phenotype or induction of apoptosis in cultured cells.7–9 11 One method of classification of a BRCA1 variant is the transcription functional assay. We have previously shown that alleles containing neutral polymorphisms retained wild type activity in transcription.5 Several lines of evidence have pointed to a physiological role of BRCA1 in transcription, although its exact biochemical function is unclear.20 51–56 However, regardless of whether or not BRCA1 acts as a transcription activator in vivo, we have proposed that a transcription assay using a heterologous DNA binding domain fusion and a reporter gene serves as a monitor of the integrity of the C-terminal region of BRCA1. Because this region is essential for the tumour suppressive function of BRCA1, the transcription assay is able to generate information about the impact of missense changes. Previously, this assay was only applicable to variants in the BRCT domain (exons 16–24). Here we show that regions adjacent to the BRCT domains contribute to full activity in transcription, allowing us to extended our analysis to encompass exons 13– 24. Once it was verified that the extended assay assigned positive and negative controls correctly, seven missense variants in the BRCT domain and six variants outside the BRCT domain were tested (fig 2). The variants were chosen because they were identified as the sole BRCA1 alteration in individuals considered to be at high risk for breast or ovarian cancer (S1512I, M1628V, M1628T, T1685I, G1706A, T1720A, A1752P, G1788V, V1809F, and W1837R) or were located at or in close proximity to the putative coiled-coil domain (H1402Y, L1407P, and H1421Y). Seven of the variants caused a dramatic loss of the transcription activation function (L1407P, M1628V, T1685I, A1752P, G1788V, V1809F, and W1837R), similar to known high risk mutation controls, suggesting that they may constitute deleterious/high risk variants (fig 2B and 2C; table 1). Four of the variants (H1402Y, H1421Y, S1512I, and M1628T) showed transcription activation similar to or greater than the wild type BRCA1, suggesting they are probably neutral/low clinical significance variants. The two remaining variants had intermediate results. G1706A showed a slightly reduced activity in yeast but a markedly reduced activity in mammalian cells. Variant T1720A had a slightly reduced activity in yeast and but activity comparable to wild type BRCA1 in mammalian cells. Based on the results obtained we would tentatively classify T1720A as a neutral/low clinical significance variant. At this point we cannot classify variant G1706A. We then carried out an analysis using interspecific variation, pedigree analysis, and co-occurrence data (table 1). Of the seven variants for which the method based on interspecific variation was able to reach a conclusion, the data confirmed the classification based on our functional tests in six cases (L1407P, H1402Y, T1685I, G1706A, G1788V, and W1837R) but presented a contradiction for variant M1628V. The pedigree analysis confirmed our results for Brca Bilat 42 M Brca 29 M Brca 35 M Brca 55 M Prophylactic mastectomy Lund 897 M = V1809F 1 Brca 41 Brca 66 Brca 55 Brca 44 WT M WT WT M Brca 54 Brca 51 CL-8 M = T1720A 3 Brca 81 Brca 85 WT F92 M = T1720A Brca 55 Brca 44 M Brca 40 M WT Brca 48 Brca 49 Ov 54 T334 M = M1628T Brca 52 Brca? 52 M WT WT M WT M M M M WT WT WT M 6-99-006 M = G1706A 2 Brca65 Br 44-54 Brca 87 Ov 45 Brca 53 M792 M = W1837R OthCa 70 (colon?) Prostate Leukaemia? 78 M Brca 40? Sto CNS? 42 Brca 39 HomCs 57 Ovarian disgerminoma 27 M OvCs 58 Bladder 53 WT Brca 52 WT Brca > 70? Figure 3 Pedigrees of missense variants in BRCA1. The presence (M) or absence (WT) of the variants in the germ line of tested individuals is indicated. Affected individuals are denoted by a black circle or square; site of tumour and age of diagnosis are also indicated. Classification of BRCA1 missense variants of unknown clinical significance 143 www.jmedgenet.com three the four variants analysed. Results from pedigree analysis for W1837R contradicted all the other methods, although the odds against causality were rather small. Interestingly, results for G1706A suggested again that the available information is not enough to classify it. While no conclusion can be drawn for variants that have very low frequency and are not found to co-occur with a deleterious mutation (for example, L1407P and H1421Y), co-occurrence data indicated that H1402Y, S1512, and M1628T do not represent high risk variants, confirming the functional assay results. In order to further cross validate our analysis we compared it with results from three published methods to classify variants in the BRCT domain (table 1). The first method is Table 1 Comprehensive analysis of BRCA1 variants Exon Mutation Nucleotide change* Allowed residues  TXN` IV1 PDG PS** ST   BIC`` CO11 Comments 13 H1402Y C4323T HDYNK # # nd na na 1 1 Reduces the probability to form coiled coil   structure from 0.936 to 0.532 13 L1407P T4339C L N ? nd na na 1 0 Conserved stretch; reduces the probability to form coiled coil   structure from 0.936 to 0.037 13 H1421Y C4380T HRK # ? nd na na 2 0 Reduces the probability to form coiled coil   structure from 0.936 to 0.650 15 S1512I G4654T SGCA # ? nd na na 50 14 Allele frequency comparable in control and in breast–ovarian cancer cases34 35; clinical data favour classification as benign polymorphism 16 S1613G A4956G SNF # # nd na na 33 371 Allele frequency comparable in control and breast–ovarian cancer cases2 14 36 37; commonly found in the Japanese group used as controls38; clinical data favour classification as benign polymorphism 16 M1628V A5001G MVSR N # nd na na 4 0 16 M1628T T5002C MVSR # ? # na na 70 4 Commonly found in the Japanese group used as controls38; clinical data favour classification as benign polymorphism 17 T1685I C5173T T N N nd nd N 2 0 Found in a case with bilateral breast cancer at 41/46 y; her mother was disease-free, but grandmother and grandmother’s sister had breast cancer at 55 and 85 y, respectively 18 G1706A G5236C G N N N nd nd 4 0 18 A1708E C5242A A N N na N N 39 0 Known unfolding mutation39; no detectable activity in transcription assays or small colony phenotype test.6 11 19 Found in a early onset breast tumour, the mutant allele (present in the germline) was absent in control population and was retained in the tumour.40 Clinical data favour classification as deleterious mutation; was used as negative control in transcription assays 19 T1720A A5277G TIVS N ? # ## 12 0 20 A1752P G5373C AS N ? nd N N 3 na 21 M1775R T5443G M N N na N N 23 0 No detectable activity in transcription assays or small colony phenotype test.6 11 19 Found in a early onset breast tumour, the mutant allele (present in the germline) was absent in control population and was retained in the tumour.40 Segregates with disease.14 Clinical data favour classification as deleterious mutation; was used as negative control in transcription assays 22 G1788V G5482T G N N nd N N 15 0 Found in a bilateral breast and ovarian cancer case with family history41 23 V1809F G5544T VIL N ? N N # 4 0 24 W1837R T5628C W N N # N N 5 0 Found in an early onset breast cancer case. Proband’s father also had breast cancer and the mutation was found to segregate with disease42 24 Y1853X C5677A/G Y N N na N N 10 0 Truncating mutation that destabilises the BRCT domains.4 14 Clinical data favour classification as deleterious mutation; was used as negative control in transcription assays *Nucleotide numbering corresponds to human BRCA1 cDNA deposited in GenBank accession number U14680. Amino acid residues present at the same position in the BRCA1 orthologs. The multiple sequence alignment of orthologous BRCA1 BRCT domains from eight species, including Homo sapiens (GenBank accession number U14680), Pan troglodytes (AF207822), Mus musculus (U68174), Rattus norvegicus (AF036760), Gallus gallus (AF355273), Canis familiaris (U50709), Bos Taurus (AY077732), Xenopus laevis (AF416868), and Tetraodon nigroviridis (AY428536), was obtained by using program MegAlign (Clustal W). `Transcription assays. 1Interspecific variation.  Pedigree analysis. **Protease sensitivity; data from Williams et al. 25 Structure based prediction; data from Mirkovic et al. 24 ``Number of times this variant has been reported to the BIC database as of August 2004. 11Number of times this variant has been observed co-occurring with a known deleterious BRCA1 mutation in 40 000 samples (Myriad Genetics Laboratories).   According to prediction by the Paircoil scoring form (http://paircoil.lcs.mit.edu/cgi-bin/paircoil).43 #, neutral/low clinical relevance; N, moderate to low risk variant, N, deleterious/high risk variant. nd, not determined; na, not applicable; ?, unclassified. 144 Phelan, Ðapic´, Tice, et al www.jmedgenet.com based on the fact that variants that cause conformation changes are more likely to be prone to proteolytic degradation.25 For all five of the variants analysed by this method (T1720A, A1752P, G1788V, V1809F, and W1837R), protease sensitivity correlated with abrogation of transcriptional activation. We also compared our data with results derived from a method based on protein structure parameters to predict the outcome of different variants of BRCA1.24 For the seven variants for which there is a prediction, six (T1685I, G1706A, T1720A, A1752P, G1788V, and W1837R) confirmed the results obtained. In fact, the G1706A variant was considered not explained by the algorithm because the qualitative yeast data used to test for G1706A indicated wild type function while the algorithm predicted a functional impact. It is possible that G1706A may represent a moderate/ low risk variant and our current methods are not yet powerful enough to recognise this. Variant V1809F was contradictory; however, given that fact that pedigree analysis, transcriptional activation, and protease sensitivity indicate a high risk variant, our conclusion is that, although the change is a conservative one, the side chain size threshold in the algorithm needs to be refined. In summary, we have classified six missense variants (L1407P, M1628V, T1685I, A1752P, G1788V, and V1809F) as probable deleterious/high risk variants and the remainder as probable neutral/low clinical significance variants (H1402Y, H1421Y, S1512I, M1628T, and T1720A), with two variants (G1706A and W1837R) left unclassified. Previously, all the known deleterious missense changes were in the RING domain or BRCT repeats. Although further work is needed to classify variants L1407P and M1628V unambiguously, our results provide evidence that other regions or motifs are likely to harbour high risk missense substitutions. In particular, classification of L1407P as a high risk variant suggests an important function for the putative coiled coil motif as previously suggested.31 57 The 4-3 spacing of hydrophobic residues in the coiled coil is clearly evolutionarily conserved through the puffer fish BRCA1 sequence (Tetraodon, accession AY428536). Conclusions While individual classification schemes for BRCA1 alleles still present limitations and no single method can reliably be used alone, a combination of several methods may provide a more powerful way of identifying variants that are causally linked to a high risk of breast and ovarian cancer.58 The framework presented here pushes our understanding of these variants further towards clinical applicability in the near future.  The vast majority of BRCA1 missense sequence variants remain uncharacterised for their possible effect on protein expression and function, and therefore are unclassified in terms of their pathogenicity. BRCA1 plays diverse cellular roles and it is unlikely that any single functional assay will accurately reflect the total cellular implications of missense mutations in this gene.  Objective  To elucidate the effect of two BRCA1 variants, 5236G>C (G1706A) and 5242C>A (A1708E) on BRCA1 function, and to survey the relative usefulness of several assays to direct the characterisation of other unclassified variants in BRCA genes.  Methods and Results  Data from a range of bioinformatic, genetic, and histopathological analyses, and in vitro functional assays indicated that the 1708E variant was associated with the disruption of different cellular functions of BRCA1. In transient transfection experiments in T47D and 293T cells, the 1708E product was mislocalised to the cytoplasm and induced centrosome amplification in 293T cells. The 1708E variant also failed to transactivate transcription of reporter constructs in mammalian transcriptional transactivation assays. In contrast, the 1706A variant displayed a phenotype comparable to wildtype BRCA1 in these assays. Consistent with functional data, tumours from 1708E carriers showed typical BRCA1 pathology, while tumour material from 1706A carriers displayed few histopathological features associated with BRCA1 related tumours.  Conclusions  A comprehensive range of genetic, bioinformatic, and functional analyses have been combined for the characterisation of BRCA1 unclassified sequence variants. Consistent with the functional analyses, the combined odds of causality calculated for the 1706A variant after multifactorial likelihood analysis (1:142) indicates a definitive classification of this variant as “benign”. In contrast, functional assays of the 1708E variant indicate that it is pathogenic, possibly through subcellular mislocalisation. However, the combined odds of 262:1 in favour of causality of this variant does not meet the minimal ratio of 1000:1 for classification as pathogenic, and A1708E remains formally designated as unclassified. Our findings highlight the importance of comprehensive genetic information, together with detailed functional analysis for the definitive categorisation of unclassified sequence variants. This combination of analyses may have direct application to the characterisation of other unclassified variants in BRCA1 and BRCA2.  Keywords: BRCA1, functional analysis, unclassified variants The pathogenicity of many genetic variants in disease associated genes can be predicted from the nature of the genetic variation. For example, sequence changes that prevent protein expression or that cause loss of important functional domains can be classified as loss of function mutations. However, single exonic nucleotide changes can present a challenge. Such changes have been associated with alterations in transcript stability,1 transcript splicing,2 translation efficiency,1 protein folding,3 protein‐protein interactions,4 and the capacity to perform specific cellular functions.4 Interpretation of the pathogenicity of single nucleotide changes is a challenge for the clinical management of many inherited diseases and predispositions including Duchenne muscular dystrophy,5 cystic fibrosis,6 X linked mental retardation,7 and inherited cancer syndromes such as hereditary non‐polyposis colon cancer4 and familial breast cancer.8 There is a growing interest in developing efficient and reliable ways to classify the pathogenicity of these variants and a variety of approaches have been reported recently. These include analyses of patterns of co‐segregation,9 assessment of variant frequency in unaffected controls,6 predictions based on the position and nature of the amino acid change,7 and biochemical and functional assays.11,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,35  BRCA1 is a breast cancer susceptibility gene encoding a protein of 1863 amino acids with multiple roles in DNA repair, transcriptional activation, apoptosis, and cell cycle regulation (reviewed in Rosen et al29). Pathogenic mutations in the BRCA1 gene have been identified in approximately 15–20% of families with multiple cases of breast and ovarian cancer.30 However, the mechanism(s) by which most mutations in BRCA1 contribute to breast cancer are poorly understood. A further level of complexity is added by the spectrum of unclassified sequence variants described in this gene to date, with over 1000 different unclassified sequence variants in BRCA1 reported on the Breast Information Core (BIC) database alone (http://www.nhgri.nih.gov/Intramural_research/Lab_transfer/Bic/). The pathogenicity of only a small number of these variants has been inferred genetically10,31,32,33,34 or tested functionally.11,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,35 Underscoring the interest in and need for accurate classification of sequence variants in BRCA1 are recent descriptions of novel approaches to predict the pathogenicity of non‐synonymous amino acid substitutions. These approaches include analysing interspecies sequence variation36,37 and a combination of genetic and bioinformatic predictive investigations.8 This approach offers some advantages over more laborious and expensive experimental analyses, particularly in a clinical setting. How well the data from such predictions correlate with the results of biochemical and functional studies on the same variant, however, is yet to be established.  We have set out to determine the pathogenicity of two sequence variants, G1706A and A1708E, using a number of genetic, bioinformatic, biochemical, and cellular investigations. Although A1708E has been classified as a missense mutation by BIC, the precise molecular defect is not understood, nor has the variant been formally evaluated in the multifactorial model of causality.8 These variants were initially selected for analysis because of their proximity within the C‐terminal region of BRCA1, for which several functional assays have been developed. The C‐terminal region is a highly conserved structure containing two BRCA1 C‐terminal (BRCT) tandem repeat domains. Missense changes within this motif cause protein folding defects18,25 and inhibit transcriptional transactivation.14 The G1706A and A1708E variants are located in the first BRCT domain (amino acids 1650–1736) and have been partially characterised by predictive modelling and some functional assays (reviewed in Mirkovic et al38). Here we present data from a wider variety of approaches that further test these predictions and provide a cellular and molecular basis for pathogenic risk assessment.  Go to: Methods Genetic analysis  Australian study pedigrees were recruited by the Kathleen Cuningham Foundation Consortium for Research into Familial Breast Cancer (kConFab) according to eligibility criteria established by the consortium (http://www.kconfab.org/epidemiology/1eligibility.asp). Two Australian pedigrees in which affected index cases were ascertained to be carriers of the BRCA1 5236G>C (G1706A) variant and one Australian pedigree with the affected index case carrying the 5242C>A (A1708E) variant were selected for analysis. Sequencing or denaturing high performance liquid chromatography (DHPLC) analysis of the coding and flanking intronic regions of BRCA1 and BRCA2 in the index cases revealed no other mutations.  A Spanish pedigree carrying the G1706A variant was ascertained by the Genetics Service, Hospital de la Santa Creu i Sant Pau, Barcelona, Spain. In the index case of this pedigree, the 1706A change was detected by mutation analysis of BRCA1 and BRCA2 using SSCP methodology and sequencing to confirm the nucleotide alteration, and relatives were screened for the variant by sequencing.  Two English A1708E pedigrees were ascertained by the Clinical Genetics Service at Guy's Hospital in London, United Kingdom. The A1708E variant was identified in the index case of the first pedigree (UK1708E1) by SSCP, followed by sequencing to confirm the mutation. The other member of the family tested was screened for the variant by restriction enzyme analysis. In the second English pedigree (UK1708E2), the A1708E variant was identified in the proband by hydroxylamine fluorescent chemical cleavage of mismatch followed by sequencing confirmation. Subsequently, other carriers within the family were identified by restriction enzyme assay.  In total, 29 individuals from the G1706A pedigrees and 19 individuals from the A1708E pedigrees were genotyped. We estimated the odds for causality associated with these variants using a Bayes factor analysis by maximising the evidence in favour of causality over the hazard ratio, based on the method described by Thompson et al.9 In order to determine the penetrance associated with the variants, we used a modified segregation analysis,39 which estimates cumulative risk to age 70 of breast cancer in carriers (although, due to the small sample size, 95% confidence intervals of cumulative risk may be underestimated), where models were fitted under maximum likelihood theory using the MENDEL statistical package.40 As controls, 180 unaffected females over the age of 45 with no reported family history of breast cancer were recruited through the Australian Breast Cancer Family Study41 and screened by DHPLC for these variants. Variants absent in a sample of 180 individuals are estimated to have an allele frequency with an upper 95% confidence limit less than 1%, the formal definition of a polymorphism. All pedigrees used in the genetic analysis can be supplied by the corresponding author upon request.  Loss of heterozygosity analysis of tumours  Loss of heterozygosity (LOH) at BRCA1 was assessed for index cases by macrodissection of tumour rich (70%) regions of available paraffin sections. DNA was extracted as described previously.42 A PCR product including the 1706 and 1708 positions was generated using the primer pair 5236SeqF (5′‐GAGGCTCTTTAGCTTCTTAGGAC‐3′) and 5236SeqR (5′‐AAACGTTAGGTGTAAAAATGCAA‐3′), and sequenced in both directions using the ABI Big Dye terminator system (Applied Biosystems, Foster City, CA, USA) and the forward (5236SeqF) or reverse (5236SeqR) primers. LOH was scored by the significant reduction (<50% peak height relative to normal sequence trace) or absence of the heterozygous peak seen in the germline control.  Single nucleotide primer extension assay  To verify expression of the wildtype and variant BRCA1 transcripts in lymphoblastoid cell lines (LCLs) generated from heterozygous carriers of these variants, total RNA was extracted from LCLs using Trizol reagent (Invitrogen, Carlsbad, CA, USA) and analysed by single nucleotide primer extension (SNuPE).43 A 383 bp fragment of cDNA flanking the 1706 and 1708 positions of BRCA1 was generated by RT‐PCR using the Superscript III Reverse Transcriptase kit from Invitrogen and primers Check1F (5′‐CCAGAAGAATTTATGCTCGTG) and OR (5′‐CAGCTGTACCATCCATTCCA). As positive and negative controls, fragments were also generated with the same primers from the pZeoSV based expression constructs containing wildtype, G1706A, and A1708E BRCA1 cDNA (see below). PCR products were purified using a Qiagen QIAQuick PCR purification kit (Qiagen, Valencia, CA, USA). SNuPE assays were performed on these fragments with radiolabelled dNTPs and the primer pairs SNuPE1706F and SNuPE1706R (5′‐GGACACTGAAATATTTTCTAG and 5′‐ACCCATTTTCCTCCCGCAATT, respectively) and SNuPE1708F and SNuPE1708R (5′‐CTGAAATATTTTCTAGGAATTG and 5′‐GCTAACTACCCATTTTCCTCCC, respectively). Radiolabelled fragments were separated on a 10% denaturing acrylamide gel and visualised by autoradiography.  Grantham alignments  Extensive protein multiple sequence alignments were made with the online alignment engines TCoffee and 3Dcoffee.44 The degree of sequence variation present in the alignment was used to calculate the number of positions that are under strong functional constraint or not,37 and the likelihood ratio for whether a substitution at any particular position will be deleterious or not.8 Grantham scores45 were calculated both for each position in the alignments and for each missense mutation versus the canonical human sequence. The relationship between the two Grantham scores was used to determine the fit between the missense substitution and the range of variation observed at its position in the alignment as described previously.8,37 The analysis included 13 full length BRCA1 sequences, the most divergent of which was from the tunicate Ciona.  Protein modelling  Molecular modelling was carried out on the simulated crystal structure of the BRCT repeat region of BRCA1 (JNX1.pdb) that incorporates positions 1706 and 1708,46 using an SGI work station running the Insight II software package (Accelrys, San Diego, CA).  ESE analysis  The wildtype BRCA1 cDNA (NCBI Accession No. U14680) was examined on an exon‐by‐exon basis for sequences that act as binding sites for the serine/arginine rich family of splicing enhancers using the ESEfinder program (http://rulai.cshl.edu/tools/ESE/). The variant cDNA sequence was then screened by ESEfinder and compared to the wildtype sequence to identify any loss or gain of predicted SR binding sites.  Alternate splicing analysis  Exon 18 sequence containing the 1706A and 1708E variants was analysed for splice acceptor or donor sites using SpliceSiteFinder (http://www.genet.sickkids.on.ca/˜ali/splice sitefinder.html). To test for possible alterations in BRCA1 splicing, EBV transformed LCLs generated from variant carriers were treated for 4 h with cycloheximide (100 μg/ml) to stabilise RNA species. RNA was then extracted using the TriPure Isolation Reagent (Roche, Indianapolis, IN, USA). cDNA synthesis was performed and a 345 bp RT‐PCR product was amplified using the one step Titan One Tube RT PCR system (Roche) with forward primer 5′ATGCTCGTGTACAAGTTTG 3′ (BRCA1 exon 17) and reverse primer 5′ CTGTGGGCATGTTGGTGAA 3′ (BRCA1 exon 21). Products were visualised on a 2% agarose gel.  Expression plasmids and constructs  A plasmid containing a full length BRCA1 cDNA with three N‐terminal c‐Myc tags and an in‐frame Kozak sequence on a pcDNA3.1 backbone was kindly provided by D Livingston (Dana Farber Cancer Institute, Harvard Medical School, Boston, MA, USA) for subcloning and generation of the mutagenised expression constructs. The BRCA1 cDNA fragment of this parental plasmid was entirely sequenced prior to subcloning, and several single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs) (rs1799949, rs799917, rs16940, rs16941, rs16942, and rs4986849) were identified. These SNPs are published on the NCBI and BIC SNP databases and form a common haplotype.47 A fragment containing the c‐Myc tags, Kozak sequence, BRCA1 cDNA, and 114 bp of 3′UTR was excised from the parental plasmid with XhoI and ligated into the XhoI site of the pZeoSV vector (Invitrogen). The 1706A and 1708E mutations were generated in this plasmid using the Stratagene QuikChange PCR site directed mutagenesis protocol (Stratagene, La Jolla, CA, USA). Primer pairs for the G1706A mutagenesis protocol were Quik5236F (5′‐GACACTGAAATATTTTCTAGCAATTGCGGGAGGAAAATGGG‐3′ and Quik5236R (5′‐CCCATTTTCCTCCCGCAATTGCTAGAAAATATTTCAGTGTC‐3′). The primer pairs for the A1708E mutagenesis protocol were RTW5242F (5′CTGAAATATTTTCTAGGAATTGAGGGAGGAAAATGGGTAGTTAG‐3′) and RTW 5242R (5′‐CTAACTACCCATTTTCCTCCCTCAATTCCTAGAAAATATTTCAG‐3′). The BRCA1 5382insC deletion mutant expression plasmid was kindly donated by Dr B Weber, University of Pennsylvania, USA. Large scale DNA preps were made using the Qiagen Plasmid MaxiKit and the inserts of each plasmid were sequenced entirely to verify their identity.  Trypsin sensitivity assay  A 1571 bp product was amplified by PCR from the pZeo expression constructs containing the wildtype, 1706A, and 1708E variants with a T7 forward primer 5′GGATCCTAATACGACTCACTATAGGAACAGACCACCATGG GTCTGAGTGACAAGGAATT3′ and reverse primer 5′CTGGGGTATCAGGTAGGT3′, encompassing BRCA1 exons 12–24. The products were translated in vitro using the Promega TNT Coupled Reticulocyte Lysates System (Promega, Madison, WI, USA) incorporating 35S methionine (NEN). Protein products were digested for 12 min at 37°C using trypsin (Sigma, St Louis, MO, USA) as described previously25 at concentrations of 0, 0.6, 6, and 60 µg/ml. Protein products were separated by 14% SDS‐PAGE and visualised by autoradiography.  Cytoplasmic localisation of ectopic BRCA1 in MCF7 cells  MCF‐7 human breast cancer cells were maintained in Dulbecco's modified Eagle's medium (DMEM) supplemented with 10% fetal calf serum (FCS), and grown at 37°C in a humidified 5% CO2 atmosphere. Cells were seeded onto sterile glass coverslips and transfected at 50–60% confluency with 1–2 mg of plasmid DNA using Lipofectamine Reagent (Life Technologies, Gaithersburg, MD, USA) according to the manufacturer's instructions. At 6 h post‐transfection, the transfection mix was removed and replaced with DMEM containing 10% FCS. Cells were fixed and processed 30 h post‐transfection for fluorescence microscopy. Transfected cells were fixed in 3.7% formalin/PBS for 15 min and processed for immunostaining. Myc tagged ectopic BRCA1 was detected by immunofluorescence using the anti‐Myc rabbit polyclonal antibody A‐14 (Santa Cruz Biotec, Santa Cruz, CA, USA). Myc antibody was detected with biotin conjugated secondary antibodies (Santa Cruz) and Texas Red‐avidin D (Vector Laboratories, Burlingame, CA, USA). Cell nuclei were counterstained with the chromosome dye Hoechst 33285 (Sigma). The subcellular localisation of each ectopic protein was determined by scoring cells using an Olympus BX40 epifluorescence microscope, and the proportion of cells displaying nuclear, nuclear/cytoplasmic, or cytoplasmic staining of BRCA1 was determined as previously described.15 Digital images were collected using a SPOT camera.  Transcriptional transactivation assays  The 1706A and 1708E variants were generated in a pGAL4B expression construct containing the BRCA1 activation domain within a region spanning amino acids 1293–186348 using the Stratagene QuikChange PCR site directed mutagenesis protocol. Primer pairs for generating the 1706A variant were G1706AF 5′‐GGACACTGAAATATTTTCTAGCAATTGCGGGAGGAAAATG‐3′ and G1706AR 5′‐CATTTTCCTCCCGCAATTGCTAGAAAATATTTCAGTGTCC‐3′ and primers for the A1708E mutagenesis protocol were RTW5242F/R, described above. Assays were carried out as described previously,48 with two exceptions. MCF7 cells were used instead of 293T cells in the mammalian cell assay and Fugene 6 (Roche) transfection reagent, used according to the manufacturer's instructions, replaced the calcium phosphate precipitation method of cell transfection.  Western blots  Transiently transfected MCF7 cells were counted and lysate prepared from identical numbers of cells for each transfection. Lysate was electrophoresed, blotted, and probed with FLAG or GAL4 antibodies as described previously.48  Centrosome amplification immunofluorescence and confocal microscopy  Cells were cultured on glass cover slips and transfected with Myc‐BRCA1 wildtype and mutant constructs using Fugene 6 according to the manufacturer's instructions. For indirect immunofluorescence, cells were fixed with cold methanol, permeabilised, and stained with primary anti‐pericentrin (1:800) polyclonal (Santa Cruz Biotechnologies) and anti‐myc (9E10) (1:200) monoclonal (Santa Cruz Biotechnologies) antibodies 4 days after transfection. Texas Red goat anti‐rabbit (1:800) and Oregon Green goat anti‐mouse (1:800) secondary antibodies were subsequently added, along with 1 μg/ml Hoechst (Molecular Probes, Eugene, OR, USA). Centrosome numbers were counted in a minimum of 50 Myc expressing cells from each of two independent experiments. For subcellular localisation experiments, 48 h post‐transfection the cells were fixed with cold methanol, stained with 1 μg/ml Hoechst (Molecular Probes), anti‐myc (9E10) monoclonal (Santa Cruz Biotechnologies) primary antibody, and Oregon Green goat anti‐mouse (1:800) secondary antibody. All images were acquired with a Zeiss LSM510 confocal microscope.  Histopathology  Available tumour sections from all the pedigrees were analysed for BRCA1‐like histology by pathologists blind to mutation status. Sections were scored for parameters recognised to be associated with BRCA1 tumours.49,50,51,52,53,54 The BRCA1 mutation associated phenotype was designated as “medullary”, “atypical medullary carcinoma”, or “ductal/no special type”, with high grade, a high mitotic count (>16 mitotic figures/10 high power fields), and one or more of the following features: >25% pushing margin; confluent necrosis; prominent lymphocytic infiltrate. The estrogen receptor (ER) and progesterone receptor (PR) status of the tumour sample was available from some pathology reports.  Go to: Results Genetic and LOH analysis  In Australian G1706A pedigree no. 1 (6‐99‐006; described in Phelan et al35), two of the three breast cancer patients (ages at diagnosis: 66 and 44 years) and the single ovarian cancer patient (age at diagnosis: 45 years) were found to be 1706A carriers, whereas one woman diagnosed with breast cancer at age 53 was not a carrier.35 The Bayes factor calculated for this family was 0.7086 with a likelihood for causality ratio of 1:1.3. In Australian G1706A pedigree no. 2, the sole surviving breast cancer patient, the single ovarian cancer patient (ages at diagnosis: 49 and 52 years, respectively) and two other unaffected women (aged 70 and 90 years) were found to be 1706A carriers. In this pedigree, the variant was carried by the mother of the index case and not the father whose sister was diagnosed with breast cancer at age 40 years. The Bayes factor calculated for this family was 0.0317, with a likelihood for causality of 1:32. In the Spanish G1706A pedigree, the variant was not carried by the proband's mother who had a family history of breast and ovarian cancer and therefore was presumed to have been inherited from the father (not tested) who had no known family history of cancer. The Bayes factor analysis for the Spanish G1706A family yielded a value of 0.0196 and a likelihood for causality of 1:51. The likelihood of causality for the 1706A variant using the Bayes factor analysis method for the combined Australian and Spanish families was 1:2274.  In the Australian A1708E pedigree, both living members with breast cancer (ages at diagnosis: 47 and 58 years) were found to carry the 1708E variant. The deceased mother of a carrier was diagnosed with breast cancer at age 47, and a deceased cousin of a carrier was diagnosed with breast cancer at age 30 years. For the Australian 1708E pedigree, the likelihood of causality was 2.8:1.  In the English pedigree UK1708E1, the variant was identified in the proband (breast cancer diagnosed at age 28) and in the mother of the proband (ovarian cancer diagnosed at age 55). No other individuals in this family were genotyped. The Bayes factor analysis for this pedigree yielded odds of causality of 2.0:1. In the pedigree UK1708E2, two A1708E variant carriers were identified. One carrier was diagnosed with breast cancer at age 39 years. The other carrier has not been diagnosed with cancer to date. Two other individuals from this pedigree without breast cancer were tested and found to be negative for the A1708E variant. The Bayes factor analysis for this pedigree yielded a ratio of 0.7982:1, equating to an odds of causality of 1:1.3. The total Bayes factor for the combined Australian and English A1708E pedigrees was 4.5:1 in favour of causality, and the estimated penetrance for A1708E was 100% (95% CI 98% to 100%) to age 70 years.  Neither the 1706A nor 1708E variants were detected in any of the 180 control samples. Loss of the wildtype allele was demonstrated in tumour tissue from one case from the Australian G1706A no. 1/6‐99‐006 and A1708E pedigrees (data not shown). However, in the tumour sample isolated from the Spanish G1706A pedigree, no LOH was detected. No LOH data were available from the United Kingdom A1708E pedigrees.  SNuPE assay  The relative expression of wildtype and variant alleles was measured using the SNuPE assay. Wildtype and variant alleles were expressed at approximately equal levels (fig 11)) indicating that the variant sequences do not affect the stability of their respective transcripts.  figure mg33258.f1 Figure 1 RNA stability of BRCA1 variants G1706A and A1708E in carriers from Australian pedigrees. SNuPE assays were carried out on homozygous wildtype (wt) and variant control plasmid PCR products, and RT‐PCR products from RNA isolated ... ESE and splice variant analysis  The ESEfinder program was used to predict the effects of the 1706A and 1708E variants on serine‐arginine rich splicing factor binding to consensus exonic enhancer sequences. While this program may not identify all ESEs, and splicing predictions may not be definitive,28 replacement of the wildtype BRCA1 sequence with the 1706A variant in exon 18 was predicted by ESEfinder to disrupt a consensus binding site for the SC35 splicing enhancer. ESEfinder modelling of the 1708E variant predicted disruption of SC35 and SRp55 splicing enhancer binding sites. Further, SpliceSiteFinder analysis of the 1708E variant predicted the creation of an additional acceptor sequence. However, RT‐PCR analysis revealed no evidence of aberrant splicing (data not shown). Thus, the 1706A and 1708E variants did not appear to affect the splicing of their respective primary transcripts, supporting previous findings for 1706A by Campos et al.28  In silico analysis and protein modelling  Both variants occur in a highly conserved region of the BRCT domain of BRCA1. Analysis of the degree of cross‐species variation at the positions of these two substitutions predicted that both are likely to be deleterious. Position 1708 is invariant, resulting in a likelihood ratio (LR) of 58:1 in favour of causality for 1708E. The Grantham score for the substitution alanine>glutamic acid is 107. This score is above the average Grantham score for all possible missense single nucleotide substitutions in BRCA1 (n = 78), tending to reinforce the expectation that the substitution is deleterious. Exactly one substitution is observed at position 1706, from which we calculate an LR of 16:1 in favour of causality for 1706A. Interestingly, the cross‐species substitution at 1706 is glycine>alanine in the tunicate Ciona (SVT, unpublished data). This means that the human substitution 1706A is outside the range of variation observed in vertebrates but within the range of variation observed from human to tunicate. There are no firm data from which to determine whether, or by how much, that observation modifies the likelihood that 1706A is deleterious. But we also note that the Grantham score for glycine>alanine is 60, which is below the average Grantham score for all possible missense single nucleotide substitutions in BRCA1. Coupled with the observation of alanine at the corresponding position in the tunicate sequence, consideration of the Grantham scores would tend to decrease the likelihood that the 1706A substitution is actually high risk.  Protein structure modelling predicted that the substitution of an alanine at position 1706 would cause a moderate increase in hydrophobicity and size. The glycine at position 1706 occurs within an α‐helix structure running from leucine 1701 to isoleucine 1707. Substitution of glycine with a larger alanine at 1706 was predicted to disrupt a bend in the helix, possibly with functional consequences if normal protein function is reliant on the maintenance of this conformation. The substitution was predicted to cause clashes between the side chains of valine 1687 and valine 1713, which were not relieved by changes in the side chain rotamers of each residue.  The 1708E variant was predicted to cause significant disruption of protein structure, with a shift from a highly hydrophobic residue (alanine) to a larger and strongly hydrophilic residue (glutamic acid). Examination of the BRCA1 crystal structure showed that the alanine, glycine, and glycine residues at positions 1708, 1709, and 1710, respectively, form a tight turn structure likely to permit only small residues as replacements. Substitution of the alanine with the much larger glutamic acid residue at position 1708 was predicted to be incompatible with maintaining the turn structure. Furthermore, this substitution was predicted to produce clashes, mostly between the carboxyl group of glutamine at 1708 and the methionine at 1783 in the second BRCT domain. Clashes predicted for the glutamate residue were all with the main chain (peptide) atoms and the γ‐methylene group of the methionine, where the clashes involved distances that were too small and unfavourable interactions between hydrophobic and charged hydrophilic atoms. Changes in the side chain rotamers of each residue were not predicted to relieve the clash.  Proteolytic degradation assays  Consistent with the conformational changes predicted by protein modelling for 1708E, resistance of this variant protein fragment to trypsin degradation was reduced compared to wildtype and 1706A proteins. Degradation of the 1708E protein fragment by trypsin occurred at a 10‐fold lower concentration of the enzyme than required for the 1706A and wildtype BRCA1 fragments (fig 22),), and supports previous findings showing that the 1708E variant was less resistant to proteolytic digestion.25 The wildtype and 1706A variant BRCA1 proteins showed similar degradation profiles, indicating that the minor structural change predicted for the 1706A variant protein did not have a measurable effect on the stability of the BRCA1 protein in these assays.  figure mg33258.f2 Figure 2 The BRCA1 variant 1708E is significantly more susceptible to proteolytic digestion than the wildtype or 1706A isoforms of BRCA1. BRCA1 cDNA fragments (wildtype, 1706A, 1708E) were translated in vitro and digested with increasing concentrations ... Subcellular localisation of ectopically expressed variant and wildtype BRCA1  The 1706A and 1708E sequence variants were introduced into myc tagged full length BRCA1 cDNA expression constructs, which were then used to transfect various cell lines for expression and functional analysis. In MCF7 cells transiently transfected with these constructs, normal nuclear localisation of the transiently expressed wildtype and 1706A proteins was indicated by ubiquitous staining in both the nuclear and cytoplasmic compartments after staining with myc antibodies for ectopic BRCA1 (fig 33).). In contrast, cytoplasmic mislocalisation of the BRCA1 1708E protein was observed. This predominantly cytoplasmic expression of the 1708E variant is similar in pattern to that previously described for another cancer associated BRCA1 variant, 5382insC.15 However, while the nuclear localisation of the 5382insC variant was shown to be increased to wildtype levels with the co‐transfection of BARD1,15 in these experiments BARD1 expression did not restore nuclear localisation of the 1708E variant to a wildtype pattern of expression. Nuclear localisation of the wildtype and 1706A constructs was significantly enhanced by the co‐transfection of BARDI.  figure mg33258.f3 Figure 3 The BRCA1 1708E variant is mislocalised in MCF7 cells. MCF7 cells were transiently co‐transfected with myc tagged BRCA1 cDNA (wt, wildtype; 1706v, 1706A; 1708v, 1708E) and YFP or YFP‐BARD1 expression constructs. Ectopic ... Transcriptional transactivation assays  As the 1706A and 1708E variants map to the region of BRCA1 implicated in transcriptional transactivation, the potential effect of these sequence changes on this function of BRCA1 was investigated by introducing these changes into a cDNA construct encoding amino acids 1293 to 1863. In transiently transfected MCF7 cells, regulation of transcriptional transactivation by the 1706A variant resulted in reporter activity indistinguishable from wildtype levels (fig 4A4A).). In contrast, reporter construct activity in cells transfected with the cDNA construct containing 1708E was similar to that of the empty vector, suggesting minimal capacity for this variant protein to transactivate transcription. Western blot analysis of total protein indicated that levels of the 1708E protein were significantly lower than the wildtype and 1706A proteins (fig 4B4B)) suggesting that the reduced transcriptional transactivation was likely to reflect aberrant expression rather than function of the BRCA1 protein.  figure mg33258.f4 Figure 4 Transcriptional transactivation of reporter plasmids in vitro by 1708E BRCA1 is defective in a mammalian system. (A) Mammalian MCF7 cells co‐transfected with BRCA1 expression constructs show no significant difference in reporter ... Centrosome amplification  Another important nuclear function of BRCA1 is regulation of centrosomes (reviewed in Starita et al55). To address the consequences of the two variants on this function of BRCA1, 293T cells were transfected with wildtype and variant constructs, followed by centrosome analysis and counting. Centrosome amplification was evident in cells transfected with the BRCA1 1708E variant (fig 55)) but not in those transfected with the 1706A and wt BRCA1 constructs. Staining for c‐Myc in the 293T cells also indicated that the 1708E variant is largely mislocalised to the cytoplasm and not transported to the nucleus, supporting data presented earlier (fig 33)) for MCF7 cells.  figure mg33258.f5 Figure 5 Increased centrosome amplification is observed in 293T cells transiently transfected with the BRCA1 1708E expression plasmid. (A) 293T cells transfected with BRCA1 expression constructs containing the 1706A and 1708E variants and the ... Tumour pathology  The pathology of tumours from the 1706A and 1708E carriers in the Australian pedigrees was strikingly different (table 11).). The two tumours examined from 1708E carriers had many BRCA1 related features. In contrast, the histopathology of the 1706A tumour from the Australian pedigree no. 1/6‐99‐006 index case did not have a BRCA1 related tumour histological profile. Similarly, the Spanish G1706A pedigree tumour sample did not display features consistent with a BRCA1 defect (table 11).  Table thumbnail Table 1 Histopathology of BRCA1 1706A and 1708E breast tumours Go to: Discussion Using genetic and bioinformatics analyses, functional assays, and histopathology, we have attempted to determine the pathogenicity of the BRCA1 1706A and 1708E variants, and to assess these approaches for their potential use in the characterisation of other BRCA1 and BRCA2 unclassified variants.  Several functional assays indicated a severe functional abrogation of BRCA1 proteins carrying the 1708E variant. Protein modelling of the 1708E variant predicted a significant folding defect. Proteolytic digestion assays by us and others25 supported this prediction by showing that a protein fragment containing the 1708E variant was significantly more susceptible to degradation in vitro. Pathogenicity of the 1708E variant was further supported by assays showing cytoplasmic mislocalisation of ectopically expressed BRCA1 protein carrying the 1708E variant in MCF7 and 293T cells. Cytoplasmic mislocalisation has been demonstrated in MCF7 cells for several other BRCA1 BRCT domain mutants of known pathogenicity, including the 5382insC, M1775R, and Y1853X mutations.15  The failure of co‐transfected BARD1 to restore nuclear import of 1708E BRCA1 in MCF7 cells suggests that BARD1 is unable to complex with mutant BRCA1. The mechanism by which BARD1 and BRCA1 work together is currently being elucidated15,56,57,58 and although these two proteins interact via the N‐terminal RING domain of BRCA1, it is possible that variant sequences in the C terminus of BRCA1 affect the three dimensional protein structure. The predicted 1708E conformational change may induce an altered tertiary structure masking the BARD1 binding region and preventing the formation of the BRCA1/BARD1 heterodimer. This would impact on both the nuclear import and ubiquitin ligase functions of BRCA1. Alternatively, it is possible that the conformational change is sufficiently severe in terms of charge and size that nuclear import is physically impeded.  Cytoplasmic mislocalisation of the 1708E variant BRCA1 may impede its function as a regulator of transcription. Indeed, transcriptional transactivation by the 1708E variant was significantly lower than by the wildtype protein in our assays. These data are consistent with previously reported disruption of BRCA1 transcriptional transactivation by the 1708E variant in mammalian59 and yeast based assays.60  In the centrosome amplification assays, the 1708E variant displayed features consistent with pathogenicity. Centrosome amplification has been associated with over 70% of invasive breast tumours61 and has been shown to be a major cause of mitotic defects in cancer cells leading to chromosomal instability, cell cycle checkpoint dysregulation, and loss of tissue differentiation (reviewed in D'Assoro et al62). The C terminus of BRCA1 has been implicated as an important mediator of centrosome regulation, through the formation of a ubiquitin ligase complex with BARD1 for the ubiquitination of γ‐tubulin, a major centrosome component involved in the maintenance of centrosome number. Defects in the ubiquitination of γ‐tubulin induced by overexpression of the N‐terminal γ‐tubulin binding fragment of BRCA1 in COS 7 cells63 or by expression of mutant γ‐tubulin in mammary Hs578T cells55 caused centrosome amplification. C‐terminal deletion mutants of BRCA1 also disrupted γ‐tubulin ubiquitination.55 Our experiments showed that, in the MCF7 breast cell line, the 1708E variant was not localised to the nucleus with endogenous or ectopic BARD1, indicating that formation of the BRCA1/BARD1 complex was significantly diminished. We suggest that the centrosome defect associated with the 1708E variant may in part be a consequence of dysregulated ubiquitination of γ‐tubulin and possibly other centrosome associated proteins.  In support of the functional data, the histopathology review of the two 1708E carrying tumours identified several features commonly associated with BRCA1 mutation carrying tumours. Evolutionary sequence alignment analysis gave odds in favour of causality of 58:1 for 1708E. However, the genetic evidence of pathogenicity from the A1708E pedigrees is weak, giving an odds of causality of 4.5:1. Applying the multifactorial likelihood model8 to assess pathogenicity, the combined odds from these two approaches was 262:1, which does not meet the criteria of Goldgar et al8 of 1000:1 for a pathogenic variant. Nevertheless, the odds are consistent with the functional assays which indicated that this variant has features of a high risk mutation.  In contrast, the protein stability, transcriptional transactivation, and subcellular localisation of the 1706A variant were all comparable to the wildtype in our assays. Protein modelling of the 1706A variant predicted only a mild conformational change, and this prediction was borne out experimentally, with a proteolytic digestion profile similar to the wildtype protein. This variant also showed minimal effects on subcellular localisation, centrosome amplification, and transcriptional transactivation. Our transcriptional assay data contrasts with evidence from another research group,35 who reported that cells expressing 1706A showed a moderately reduced transcriptional transactivation capacity compared to wildtype BRCA1 in both mammalian and yeast systems. However, these inconsistencies may be due to differences in cell lines and the length of BRCA1 cDNA used.  The histopathology review of the G1706A carrying tumour from the Australian and Spanish pedigrees did not have a BRCA1 associated tumour phenotype. The loss of the wildtype allele in this tumour may simply reflect background LOH, which is estimated to be about 30% in breast tumours.64,65 Sequence alignment analysis gave odds in favour of causality of 16:1 for 1706A. The Bayesian odds of causality for this variant in the combined Australian and Spanish pedigrees studied was 1:2274. Using data from sequence alignment and co‐segregation analysis, the combined odds of causality after applying the multifactorial likelihood model is 1:142. This meets the criteria of Goldgar et al8 of 1:100 for a neutral variant, consistent with the functional assays indicating that this variant is not a high risk mutation.  In conclusion, we have presented genetic, histopathological, and functional evidence to suggest that the A1708E variant of BRCA1 is pathogenic, as classified by BIC, possibly through subcellular mislocalisation. However, this variant remains formally designated as unclassified according to the criteria of Goldgar et al8 after application of the multifactorial likelihood model using sequence alignment and co‐segregation data. In contrast, analysis of the G1706A variant in functional assays suggests that it is unlikely to be associated with significant risk of breast cancer and may be classified as benign according to the criteria of Goldgar et al.8 While classification of 1708E and other variants may ultimately be achieved by analysis of further co‐segregation data, and inclusion of LOH and control frequency data in the multifactorial likelihood model, we suggest the application of an appropriate selection of the functional assays described here and elsewhere will enhance predictions of pathogenicity of unclassified sequence variants in BRCA1 and BRCA2. Assay selection will largely be determined by the location of unclassified sequence variants within known structural or functional motifs in the gene. In our hands, the cytoplasmic mislocalisation, proteolytic sensitivity, and centrosome amplification assays were found to be the most informative for the functional analysis of the G1706A and A1708E variants in the BRCT domain of BRCA1. These assays may also be useful for variants affecting other regions of the protein. In light of the diversity of roles played by BRCA1 at the cellular level, it is unlikely that any single assay will conclusively characterise sequence variants in this gene. Where possible, a comprehensive approach utilising genetic, bioinformatic, and functional analyses to classify sequence variants is most likely to reliably indicate potential pathogenicity, and may eventually also assist in delineating variants with moderate risk from those with high or low/no risk.  Genetic screening of the breast and ovarian cancer susceptibility gene BRCA1 has uncovered a large number of variants of uncertain clinical significance. Here, we use biochemical and cellbased transcriptional assays to assess the structural and functional defects associated with a large set of 117 distinct BRCA1 missense variants within the essential BRCT domain of the BRCA1 protein that have been documented in individuals with a family history of breast or ovarian cancer. In the first method, we used limited proteolysis to assess the protein folding stability of each of the mutants compared with the wild-type. In the second method, we used a phosphopeptide pull-down assay to assess the ability of each of the variants to specifically interact with a peptide containing a pSer-X-X-Phe motif, a known functional target of the BRCA1 BRCT domain. Finally, we used transcriptional assays to assess the ability of each BRCT variant to act as a transcriptional activation domain in human cells. Through a correlation of the assay results with available family history and clinical data, we define limits to predict the disease risk associated with each variant. Forty-two of the variants show little effect on function and are likely to represent variants with little or no clinical significance; 50 display a clear functional effect and are likely to represent pathogenic variants; and the remaining 25 variants display intermediate activities. The excellent agreement between the structure/function effects of these mutations and available clinical data supports the notion that functional and structure information can be useful in the development of models to assess cancer risk. Introduction Since the cloning of BRCA1 in 1994, a large effort has been made to sequence the BRCA1 genes of women who are at increased risk for early-onset breast and ovarian cancers (1). Corresponding Author: J.N. Mark Glover or Alvaro N.A. Monteiro, Department of Biochemistry, University of Alberta, Edmonton, Alberta, T6G 2H7, Canada. Phone: 780-492-2136; Fax: 780-492-0886; mark.glover@ualberta.ca or alvaro.monteiro@moffitt.org. Reprints and Subscriptions: To order reprints of this article or to subscribe to the journal, contact the AACR Publications Department at pubs@aacr.org. Note: Supplementary data for this article are available at Cancer Research Online (http://cancerres.aacrjournals.org/). Disclosure of Potential Conflicts of Interest: No potential conflicts of interest were disclosed. NIH Public Access Author Manuscript Cancer Res. Author manuscript; available in PMC 2011 June 15. Published in final edited form as: Cancer Res. 2010 June 15; 70(12): 4880–4890. doi:10.1158/0008-5472.CAN-09-4563. NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript This effort has revealed several mutations that are strongly linked to cancer. Unfortunately, a large number of rare BRCA1 variants have been uncovered in the human population for which risk assessment has been problematic, due to a lack of informative pedigree data linking each mutation with disease risk. BRCA1 encodes a large, 1,863–amino acid nuclear protein that plays a critical role in the response of cells to genotoxic stress (2–4). BRCA1 is thought to act as an essential mediator protein in DNA damage–induced nuclear signaling events, in which it interacts with phosphorylated partner proteins such as the DNA helicase, BACH1, the nuclease CtIP, and another signaling protein, Abraxas, to relay signals generated from chromatin surrounding the damage to downstream targets such as DNA repair proteins and factors involved in cell cycle regulation (5–11). Interactions with phosphorylated partner proteins are mediated by a tandem pair of repeats at the COOH terminus of BRCA1, termed BRCT repeats (12–14). The BRCT repeat region can also act as a transcriptional activation domain when linked to a sequence-specific DNA binding module, and this activity may contribute to the ability of BRCA1 to regulate the expression of genes such as p21 and GADD45 (15,16) and modulate the activity of other transcription factors such as p53 and ER (17,18). The NH2-terminal region of the protein contains a RING domain, which forms a heterodimeric complex with the RING domain of BARD1 to form a ubiquitin ligase (19–21). Cancer-associated mutations tend to cluster in the RING and BRCT repeat regions, showing the critical role of these domains in BRCA1 tumor suppression. The BRCA1 BRCT domain specifically interacts with phosphorylated protein targets containing the motif pSer-x-x-Phe. Structural studies have revealed that recognition involves a conserved phosphoserine recognition pocket in the NH2-terminal BRCT repeat, composed of Ser1655, Gly1656, and Lys1702, which each supply ligands to recognize the phosphate (12–14). The phenylalanine residue at the +3 position of the peptide target is recognized by a largely hydrophobic groove formed at the interface between the repeats. Phosphopeptide recognition is likely a common function of BRCT domains in many proteins associated with DNA damage–mediated signal transduction. For example, the phosphorylated form of the histone variant, H2AX, which serves as a critical chromatin mark of DNA double-strand breaks, is specifically bound by the tandem BRCT repeats of MDC1 to initiate DNA doublestrand break signaling (22,23). Several studies have attempted to predict the cancer risks associated with unclassified missense variants in BRCA1 through bioinformatics analysis based on multiple sequence alignment data and protein structure prediction, as well as analyses of the clinical and family history data available for some of these mutations (1,24–28). These studies indicate that the RING and BRCT domains, which are the most highly conserved regions of BRCA1, likely contain the vast majority of cancer-associated mutations. Here, we use in vitro protein folding, phosphopeptide-binding, and cell-based transcriptional assays to assess the structural and functional consequences of a set of 117 distinct missense variants that have been uncovered in the BRCA1 BRCT domain in the human population. Our results indicate that nearly one half of the BRCT missense variants result in significant structural and/or functional defects that are likely associated with an increased cancer risk. Materials and Methods Proteolysis assays pLM1 plasmid (0.25 μg) encoding the BRCT variants was used directly as template for protein synthesis reactions with the TNT-Quick in vitro transcription/translation system (Promega). Both wild-type and mutant proteins were produced by in vitro transcription/ translation because many mutants could not be expressed in soluble form in Escherichia coli. The stability of the protein fold for the BRCA1 BRCT mutants was tested using Lee et al. Page 2 Cancer Res. Author manuscript; available in PMC 2011 June 15. NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript proteolysis assays, as previously reported (29). The measurements were normalized against the internal background, and the control measurements taken in the same day. The missense variants were tested in triplicate. Phosphopeptide-binding assays The BRCT variants were translated and labeled as in proteolysis assays. The ability of the BRCA1 BRCT mutants to bind pSer-containing peptides was tested using peptide-binding assays, as previously reported (14). Bead-immobilized peptide affinity resin was prepared by incubating a 10-fold molar excess of a biotinylated phosphopeptide (SRSTpSPTFNK) and the corresponding unphosphorylated peptide (SRSTSPTFNK) with streptavidin agarose beads (SigmaAldrich). Seven mutants, with the wild-type BRCA1-BRCT (1,646–1,858) as a positive control, and M1775R and A1708E as negative controls were examined at a time. The intensities of the bands were measured and the backgrounds were corrected using ImageQuaNT (Amersham Biosciences), and the measurements were normalized against the wild-type measurement taken in the same day. The missense variants were tested in triplicate. Transcriptional assays The construct containing wild-type BRCA1 amino acids 1,646 to 1,859 (wt) was used as a positive control and variants M1775R and Y1853X as negative controls. HEK293T cells were seeded in 24-well tissue culture plates, 1 × 105  cells per well, and 24 hours later were transfected in triplicates with Fugene 6 according to the manufacturer's instructions (Roche). The vectors containing the variants were cotransfected with pG5Luc, which contains a firefly luciferase reporter gene driven by GAL4-responsive binding sites, and phGR-TK, which contains a Renilla luciferase gene driven by a constitutive TK basal promoter used as an internal control. Cells were harvested 24 hours after transfection, and luciferase activity was measured using the Dual-Luciferase Reporter Assay System (Promega) following the manufacturer's instructions. Activity was plotted as a percentage of the wt BRCA1 activity. Thirty-four of 117 variants had already been assessed in previous articles, albeit in different amino acid contexts (amino acids 1,396–1863 or aa 1,560–1863; refs. 30–32). In only one case (G1706A), the qualitative assessment differed because it was considered of moderate effect previously and of no effect in the present study. This shows the high reproducibility of the transcriptional assays. Align-GVGD classification of BRCA1 BRCT variants The 117 BRCT variants were analyzed with the Align-GVGD algorithm at three depths of alignment. Nine mammalian BRCA1 sequences, chicken and one additional sequence (either frog, puffer fish, or sea urchin), were used for the alignment (for more detail, see ref. 33). A-class scores were assigned for variants in which the scores from at least two of three alignments agreed. Definition of a validation set To compile our validation set (Supplementary Table S1; Table 1), we identified variants that had been previously analyzed and classified by genetic (1) or integrative methods (25, 34– 40). Integrative methods use a combination of data from different sources, including cooccurrence with known deleterious mutations, personal and family history of patients carrying the variant, and cosegregation of the variant with disease within pedigrees, to assign an overall risk score. Sufficient data were available to assign 14 of the BRCA1 BRCT variants as associated with disease, whereas 10 of the variants were predicted to be neutral Lee et al. Page 3 Cancer Res. Author manuscript; available in PMC 2011 June 15. NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript (Table 1). Where possible, the probability of pathogenicity of each of these variants was classified according to the IARC scheme (Supplementary Table S1; ref. 41). We calculated specificity, sensitivity, and 95% confidence interval measures for each of the structure and functional assays based on a comparison with this variant set (Supplementary Table S2). A description of how the BRCA1 BRCT variant set was obtained is given in Supplementary Materials and Methods. Results Generation of a large set of BRCA1 BRCT missense variants Many of the BRCA1 variants that have been uncovered through worldwide sequencing efforts are now deposited within the Breast Cancer Information Core database (http://research.nhgri.nih.gov/bic/) as well as the Kathleen Cuningham Foundation Consortium for research into Familial Breast Cancer database (http://www.kconfab.org). To facilitate the assessment of the structural and functional defects associated with these mutations, we cloned all the currently available missense variants (Fig. 1) into an E. coli expression vector that we used previously for our structural and functional work of the BRCA1 BRCT domain. This vector places the BRCA1 BRCT coding sequence (corresponding to residues 1,646–1,859) under control of a T7 promotor. Using this plasmid system, recombinant protein can be expressed in E. coli and purified using established procedures for detailed biochemical and structural studies. The T7 promoter can also be used for in vitro transcription/translation of the recombinant protein. The in vitro transcription/translation system is rapid and allows the generation of multiple proteins in parallel and, because the recombinant protein is specifically labeled with 35S-methionine, no purification is required. All variants can be successfully made in this system, regardless of their folding stability. This is a further advantage over E. coli expression, in which we have found that only well-folded variants can be expressed in soluble form and purified. Thus, we have used in vitro transcribed/translated material for our structural stability and peptidebinding assays described below. We also evaluated the possibility that some of these variants could result in splicing abnormalities. We used the NNSplice 0.9 algorithm (42) to predict the effects of these changes on the efficiency with the BRCT coding region (see Supplementary Materials). Determination of the protein folding defects associated with BRCT missense variants We used limited proteolysis to determine the stability of the protein fold in the set of BRCA1 BRCT missense variants using in vitro transcribed/translated material (Supplementary Fig. S1). The wild-type protein is highly resistant to digestion by trypsin, elastase, or chymotrypsin, indicating that the in vitro produced BRCT protein is stably folded (43). On the other hand, a pilot study involving 25 of the BRCA1 BRCT missense variants showed that certain single amino acid substitutions in the BRCT domain of BRCA1 can destabilize its structure, leading to increased susceptibility to trypsin-mediated proteolysis (29). The assay is sufficiently sensitive to discriminate wild-type protein from the strongly destabilized variant A1708E as well as the moderately destabilized variant M1775R. Proteolysis of each of the missense variants was carried out at a series of trypsin concentrations, and the amount of full-length protein remaining was visualized by SDSPAGE. The results were compared with those of the wild-type protein as well as the M1775R and A1708E variants carried out in parallel. We quantified the percentages of fulllength protein remaining following digestion at different concentrations of trypsin and determined the severity of the destabilizing effects by comparing the percentage of protein remaining following digestion at 10 μg/mL trypsin to the controls (Supplementary Fig. S2A). We defined highly destabilizing mutations as those with similar rates of digestion to Lee et al. Page 4 Cancer Res. Author manuscript; available in PMC 2011 June 15. NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript the A1708E control (<5% of the protein remaining after digestion with 10 μg/mL of trypsin). Moderately destabilizing mutations were defined as those with a similar stability to M1775R (between 5% and 65% of the protein remaining after digestion with 10 μg/mL of trypsin). Finally, structurally stable variants were defined as those with a stability similar to the wild-type protein (>65% of the protein remaining after 10 μg/mL of trypsin digestion). Based on these criteria, 26 of 117 of the missense mutations showed high sensitivity to tryptic digestion; 30 of 117 showed intermediate sensitivity; and 61 of 117 showed a stability that was indistinguishable from the wild-type (Supplementary Figs. S2A and S3). We also noted that the C1697R mutant showed a particularly low protein expression level. Analysis of the phosphopeptide binding activity of BRCT missense variants The BRCA1 BRCT domain interacts with BACH1 and several other proteins through the selective recognition of the peptide motif pSer-x-x-Phe (10–14,44). All mutations that have been strongly linked to disease using family-based data, such as A1708E and M1775R (1,35), fail to bind specifically to pSer-x-x-Phe–containing peptides as shown in a pilot study that analyzed the peptide binding activities of 25 BRCA1 BRCT domain variants (14). This indicates the functional importance of the BRCA1 BRCT domain as a phosphopeptidebinding module in tumor suppression. We examined the ability of the BRCT domains containing missense variants to bind peptides derived from BACH1 using a pull-down assay in which biotinylated peptide was bound to streptavidin beads. We tested binding to a phosphorylated version of the peptide containing the BRCA1 target sequence pSer-Pro-Thr-Phe or an unphosphorylated version as a control. The results were compared with experiments with the wild-type BRCA1 BRCT as well as with the peptide binding–deficient variants A1708E and M1775R carried out in parallel. We present two analyses of the data. In the first analysis, we define “binding activity” as the fraction of the input protein that bound to the phosphorylated peptide, normalized against the binding of the wild-type protein (Supplementary Fig. S2B). In the second analysis, we define “binding specificity” as the ratio of the variant bound to the phosphopeptide compared with the nonphosphorylated counterpart, normalized to the wildtype control (Supplementary Fig. S2C). Classified in this way, we observed a range of binding activities and specificities. As observed for the protein stability assays, the variants tended to cluster near either 100% or 0% activity, with relatively few variants displaying intermediate binding activities/specificities (Supplementary Fig. S3). Thirty-eight of 117 of the variants displayed binding activities >80% of wild-type levels, whereas 35 of 117 variants displayed binding activities <20% of wild-type. The binding specificity analysis revealed 29 of 117 of the variants exhibited >80% of wild-type levels, whereas 50 of 117 of the variants exhibited <20% of wild-type levels. Analysis of the transcriptional activation activity of BRCA1 BRCT variants The transcriptional activation activity of the BRCA1 BRCT domain was the first identified activity of this region of the protein (15,16). Assays for BRCA1 BRCT transcriptional activation have been established in human and yeast cell systems (45). In either method, the BRCT domain is fused to a heterologous DNA binding domain that recognizes a defined regulatory sequence within the promoter of the reporter. Pilot studies involving subsets of the BRCA1 BRCT variants showed that mutations that have been associated with cancer using family-based data abrogate, or markedly diminish, the expression of the reporter gene (31,32,46). Moreover, the fact that mutations that destabilize the BRCT fold are strongly associated with a loss of transactivation function indicates that this assay is a monitor of the integrity of the BRCT domain (29). Lee et al. Page 5 Cancer Res. Author manuscript; available in PMC 2011 June 15. NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript As observed for the protein stability and phosphopeptide-binding assays, a wide range of transcriptional activities were observed for the variant set, with the observed values tending to cluster either at very low or very high activity levels (Supplementary Figs. S2D and S3). Thirty-eight of 117 variants displayed transcriptional activity levels at >80% of wild-type, whereas 54 of 117 were found to be <20% of wild-type levels. Correlation of structural and functional data with family history and clinical data The use of functional data in cancer risk assessment is predicated on rigorous validation of the results against sets of variants for which cancer risks are well defined. Easton and colleagues (35) have assigned risks based on genetic data for a large number of BRCA1 variants. We used these data, together with available genetic information for several other variants (25,34–40), to create a validation set of 24 variants, consisting of 14 deleterious mutations and 10 neutral variants (Table 1). We plotted the protein stability, peptide binding, and transcriptional activity data against the combined log10 likelihood ratio scores for the subset of 19 variants analyzed by Easton and colleagues (Fig. 2; likelihood ratio). In general, this analysis revealed a clear correlation between structural/functional defects and cancer risk (35). A comparison of all the genetically characterized variants with the experimental results is shown in Table 1. This comparison was used to define the sensitivities and specificities of the functional assays. Sensitivity ranged from 81.8% for phosphopeptide binding activity to 100% for phosphopeptide binding specificity and transcription assays. Specificity ranged from 75% for proteolysis assays to 87.5% for transcription assays, to 100% for binding activity assays (Supplementary Table S2). Although overall there is a good agreement between the assessed cancer risks and the functional activities of the variants, there are several variants in which cancer risk assessment and the structure/function results do not agree. For example, a significant number of cancer-associated (IARC classes 5 and 4) variants are not structurally destabilized as determined by the proteolysis assay. Each of these variants (R1699W, M1775R, and M1775K) is highly defective for specific phosphopeptide recognition and transcriptional activity. Structural studies reveal that both Arg1699 and Met1775 make critical direct contacts to the phosphopeptide (12–14), and structural investigations of the M1775R and M1775K variants reveal subtle structural rearrangements that block the +3 specificity pocket (37,47). Two of the cancer-associated (IARC class 5) variants, I1766S and G1788V, were highly defective in the proteolysis and transcriptional assays; however, they showed significant levels of nonspecific peptide binding, independent of phosphorylation. It is likely that the unfolded state of these variants exposes hydrophobic residues that are responsible for these nonspecific interactions, as suggested previously (14). G1706E, one of the cancer-associated (IARC class 5) variants, is defective in the proteolysis and peptidebinding assays; however, it shows an intermediate level of transcriptional activity. The neutral (IARC class 1) variant V1736A exhibited the least agreement between the different assays, showing significant sensitivity to proteolysis and a strong transcriptional defect while showing intermediate/strong levels of phosphopeptide interaction. Considering the overall high specificity and sensitivity obtained in the assays (Supplementary Table S2), we have defined limits to predict disease association for the uncharacterized variants based on the biochemical and transcriptional assay data (Table 1; Fig. 2). It is important to stress that the definition of these limits should not be used for classifying variants in terms of their pathogenicity in the absence of additional data. The cancer-associated (IARC classes 5 and 4) variants in general exhibited protein stability levels <58% of the wild-type, phosphopeptide binding activities <32% of wild-type, phosphopeptide specificity binding activities <21% of wild-type, and transcriptional activation function <35% of wild-type levels. Conversely, the neutral variants (IARC classes 1 and 2) in general had protein stability levels >59% of the wild-type, phosphopeptide Lee et al. Page 6 Cancer Res. Author manuscript; available in PMC 2011 June 15. NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript binding activities >67% of wild-type, phosphopeptide specificity binding activities >49% of wild-type, and transcriptional activation function >76% of wild-type levels. Variants falling between these limits are defined as uncertain. Using these limits, we have defined the structure and functional activities of each of the variants (Fig. 3). Comparison of results from different assays and overall classification Next, we compared the results from the different assays for the entire set of variants (Fig. 3). In 64 of 117 (54.7%) of the variants, there was complete concordance between the different assays, with 35 of 117 (29.9%) giving protein stability, peptide binding, and transcription activities within the limits that correspond to neutral variants in IARC classes 1 and 2, whereas 29 of 117 (24.8%) exhibited values in the range corresponding to cancer-associated (IARC classes 4 and 5) variants for each of the assays. Based on these results, we have classified the variants into groups based on their functional effect (Table 2). Although classification is straightforward for those variants in which there is a complete agreement between the different assays, for the variants in which there is not a complete agreement, classification is more complex. The largest class of discordant results includes variants that exhibit defects in binding and transcription but little or no folding defect (6 of 117 variants or 5.1%). These variants likely directly affect the phosphopeptide binding surface and may only affect residues that are exposed to the solvent preserving the overall fold structure. Because phosphopeptide recognition is critical for the tumorsuppressive function of BRCA1 (14,48), we have therefore included these variants in the strong functional effect class. Likewise, severely destabilized variants that show significant levels of phosphorylation-independent peptide binding but a strong transcriptional defect have also been categorized as strong functional effect (Table 2). We have also described eight of the variants as of “moderate functional effect” in which a preponderance of the data points to a loss of function. These include variants with intermediate levels of peptide binding specificity (W1837G and A1843P) or transcriptional activity (V1696L, G1706E, and H1746N), and strong defects in all of the other assays. In addition, we have included three additional mutants in this group that show poor agreement between the different assays but are likely to directly affect the peptide-binding surface. S1655F is predicted to impede recognition of the phosphoserine in the bound peptide, whereas G1656D could perturb the structure of the phosphoserine-binding pocket, and the introduction of a negatively charged side chain in this region would be expected to further inhibit phosphopeptide recognition. R1699L would remove a critical determinant for recognition of the phenylalanine residue at the +3 position of the phosphopeptide, and indeed, the similar R1699W variant is pathogenic (IARC class 5; Table 1). We predict a given variant to be neutral when each of the assays gives values similar to wild-type within the limits defined by comparison with the set of variants that have been characterized through family history and genetic data. In addition, we define a set of seven variants as “low functional effect” that display an intermediate activity for one of the assays and wild-type levels for the other three. Finally, there is a group of 25 variants (21.4%) that we define as “uncertain.” In general, these variants show a poor level of agreement between the different assays, and a significant number of assay results in the intermediate range. Correlation of mutant classification with predictions from Align-GVGD The Align-GVGD method (http://agvgd.iarc.fr/agvgd_input.php) uses protein multiple sequence alignment (PMSA) data to provide cancer risk estimates for BRCA1 mutations (33). In this method, each missense variant is classified based on the observed amino acid Lee et al. Page 7 Cancer Res. Author manuscript; available in PMC 2011 June 15. NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript fluctuation at that position in the PMSA (the Grantham variance, GV) as well as a comparison of the amino acid substitution with the range of amino acids observed at that position (Grantham difference, GD). In this way, seven classes of variants (C0, C15, C25, C35, C45, C55, and C65) that represent a graded series of GV-GD scores were defined. Variants in the C0 class correspond to variants that are well conserved in the PMSA and are therefore predicted to be neutral, whereas the C65 class contains missense variants that deviate from the PMSA and likely associated with an increased cancer risk. To assess the accuracy of the Align GV-GD method, we compared Align GV-GD scores to the results for the structure/function assays (Fig. 4). For the variants with no functional effect, a large majority (28 of 35, 80%) falls into the C0 class, three are classified as C15, and two are classified as C25. Only one of them, G1706A, received a high score in Align GV-GD, C55. Another variant at this position (G1706E) scored as C65, but this variant was classified with moderate functional effect by structure/function assays. These results suggest substitution of a small side chain at position 1,706 is tolerated, but not substitution of the larger, charged Glu. For the variants with strong functional effect, 25 of 42 (59.5%) are in the C65 class and 16 are spread throughout classes C15 to C55 (Fig. 4B). One missense variant (A1752P) was classified C0, but this variant shows strong defect in all assays. The substitution of a proline at position 1,752 likely destabilizes the linker α-helix, which may be responsible for the strong folding defect associated with this variant. Overall, there is strong agreement between Align GV-GD predictions and the results of functional assays, indicating that sequence alignment–based predictive methods can offer a valuable measure of risk assessment for variants in which there is no direct functional data. Discussion Here, we present the first comprehensive assessment of the structural and functional consequences of 117 BRCA1 variants corresponding to the complete set of BRCT missense variants detected to date in the human population (100% coverage). Our protein structure assay, peptide binding, and transcriptional assays show a remarkable degree of agreement and give us confidence in the validity of these results. Correlation of this experimental data with the available clinical and family history data for a subset of these variants defines limits that can be used to tentatively predict functional effect that is likely to be reflected in the disease risk associated with these variants. In this way, we show that 42.7% of the variants fall into the “clear functional effect” or “moderate functional effect” categories (Table 2) and are likely associated with an increased cancer risk, whereas 35.9% fall into the “no functional effect” or “low functional effect” categories. The remaining 21.4% falls into the uncertain category and could perhaps represent low-penetrance variants. The fact that a large proportion of variants tested displayed some functional effect lends support to the idea of applying higher prior probabilities for causality to variants found in the BRCT domains (35). The BRCA1 BRCT variant set provides a useful set of reagents for further detailed study of variants of particular interest. For example, variants that are moderately well folded based on proteolytic stability can often be purified and studied in more detail. Circular dicroism spectroscopy and differential scanning calorimetry have been used to quantitatively assess the fold stability of V1696L, R1699W, M1775K, M1775R, M1783T, V1808A, V1809F, and V1833M (49–51). Although our proteolytic assay indicated that the stability of two of these variants, R1699W and V1808A, were indistinguishable from wild-type, the more sensitive thermodynamic studies of the purified forms of these variants reveal a small but significant reduction in fold stability. In addition, quantitative assays of phosphopeptide binding, such as isothermal titration calorimetry, can reveal the detailed thermodynamics of peptide-BRCT interactions (50,51). The structural rearrangements induced by three of these variants, M1775R (47), M1775K (37), and V1809F (14), have been visualized through Lee et al. Page 8 Cancer Res. Author manuscript; available in PMC 2011 June 15. NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript crystallographic structural analysis. Each of the variants affect the +3 specificity pocket formed at the interface between the two BRCT repeats. For M1775R and M1775K, the substituted positively charged side chain adopts an orientation that fills the specificity pocket and blocks the binding of the Phe side chain at the +3 position of the target peptide. Intriguingly, the V1809F substitution, which occurs far from the +3 pocket, induces a series of conformational adjustments that results in the movement of Met1775 to fill the specificity pocket, explaining the loss of peptide binding specificity and transcriptional activity associated with this variant. Nonsynonymous single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNP) that lead to amino acid substitutions are likely to have diverse phenotypic consequences and implications for human disease. Although computational methods have been proposed to assess the effect of individual SNPs (52), relatively little has been done at the experimental level to provide insight into the effects of SNPs. The database of BRCA1/BRCA2 mutations provides an important first look at the kind of genetic diversity that exists in the human population. Another example of a large mutation database is that assembled for mutations found in p53 from human tumors. Detailed studies of the stability of the p53 DNA binding domain indicate that, like the BRCA1 BRCT domain, this relatively unstable domain is sensitive to mutations that destabilize the protein fold in addition to other classes of mutations that do not significantly affect protein fold stability but instead modify DNA-binding or proteinprotein interaction surfaces (53). Thus, rapid, general assays of protein structure and function such as the proteolysis assay used here could potentially prove useful for the rapid, high-throughput assessment of the effect of SNPs on protein function. Ultimately, unambiguous classification of variants, as proposed by the IARC Unclassified Genetic variants Working Group (41), will need a comprehensive integrative model to incorporate data from several sources. Robust integrative models have been proposed but they still lack a coherent framework to incorporate functional data. A major roadblock in the development of such a model was the lack of an established series of functional assays with standardized controls, validated against available genetic data. The present study fills this gap and allows for the development of better predictive models. Although a systematic large-scale classification of all BRCA1 variants into the IARC classes has not yet been done, it is expected that a large number will fall into class 3 (uncertain), due to the lack of genetic-based data. Conceivably, even large-scale efforts may not be able to gather sufficient genetic data on individual variants because most are extremely rare. Thus, we anticipate that the use of structural and functional information will be instrumental to move variants from the class 3 into classes that provide a basis for better risk assessment and clinical decisions. In addition, the fact that variants can now also be functionally and structurally rationalized will provide an impulse for further functional dissection of the tumor-suppressive activities of BRCA1.  
2499||Missense substitutions of uncertain clinical significance in the BRCA1 gene are a vexing problem in genetic counseling for women who have a family history of breast cancer. In this study, we evaluated the functions of 29 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in two DNA repair pathways. Repair of double-strand breaks by homology-directed recombination (HDR) had been previously analyzed for 16 of these BRCA1 variants, and 13 more variants were analyzed in this study. All 29 variants were also analyzed for function in double-strand break repair by the single-strand annealing (SSA) pathway. We found that among the pathogenic mutations in BRCA1, all were defective for DNA repair by either pathway. The HDR assay was accurate because all pathogenic mutants were defective for HDR, and all nonpathogenic variants were fully functional for HDR. Repair by SSA accurately identified pathogenic mutants, but several nonpathogenic variants were scored as defective or partially defective. These results indicated that specific amino acid residues of the BRCA1 protein have different effects in the two related DNA repair pathways, and these results validate the HDR assay as highly correlative with BRCA1-associated breast cancer.  Keywords: BRCA1, homologous recombination, single-strand annealing, centrosome, VUS Go to: Introduction Among the more than 70,000 women who had their BRCA1 gene (MIM# 113705) sequenced by 2006, approximately 2.3% were found to carry a BRCA1 variant of uncertain significance (VUS). These variants were classified as uncertain because they occurred in families wherein segregation analysis had not been done or in whom the segregation analysis was not informative and thus the VUS had unknown effects on breast and ovarian cancer risk [Hall et al., 2009; Spearman et al., 2008; Sweet et al., 2009]. As whole genome and exome sequencing becomes a more prevalent practice, more VUSs in BRCA1 will be uncovered, and increasingly women will face the quandary of an uninformative genetic test. This leads to individuals with a VUS test result making decisions about cancer screening and prevention without concrete information on which to base their decisions. Women who have an indeterminate BRCA1 sequence result and a family history of breast cancer have a high level of distress, and there are no consistent clinical guidelines for advising them [Dorval et al., 2005; Petrucelli et al., 2002; van Dijk et al., 2006]. Of the 567 BRCA1 missense substitutions listed in the current Breast Cancer Information Core (BIC) database, 14 are described as pathogenic (Class 5) and 27 as nonpathogenic (Class 1). By including the data from Collaborators for the Investigation of Modifiers of BRCA1/2 (CIMBA), a total of 24 BRCA1 variants are pathogenic (CIMBA database). Less than 10% of the missense substitutions in the BIC database have known cancer predisposition. In the absence of definitive genetic information on BRCA1 missense substitutions, other methods are needed to determine whether missense substitutions are pathogenic. Multifactorial approaches have augmented genetic segregation analysis with additional information about the proband and, in some cases, the tumor [Easton et al., 2007; Goldgar et al., 2004; Lindor et al., 2012; Plon et al., 2008; Spearman et al., 2008; Sweet et al., 2009]. These approaches have been successful in reclassification of variants but are also incomplete because they cannot definitively determine whether any given variant affects the critical cancer suppressing function(s) of the protein [Millot et al., 2012]. In contrast, a biological functional assay has the potential to determine whether any given BRCA1 missense substitution is defective in a process, and if that function is predictive of cancer predisposition (i.e., 100% sensitive and 100% specific), then the functional assay can, in theory, be used in genetic counseling.  A variety of biological assays have been analyzed for BRCA1 function and have been correlated with cancer predisposition to various extents [Carvalho et al., 2007; Cotta-Ramusino et al., 2011; Kais et al., 2012; Lee et al., 2010; Millot et al., 2012; Morris et al., 2006; Ransburgh et al., 2010; Vallee et al., 2012]. Several of these assays test single domains of BRCA1, and several address the variant within the context of the full-length protein. In this study, we analyzed the effects of 29 missense substitutions in BRCA1 on the repair of double-strand DNA breaks (DSBs) by homologous recombination and by the single-strand annealing (SSA) pathways. Our results indicate that the effects of specific missense mutations in these pathways strongly correlate with breast cancer predisposition. Further, we find that specific amino acid substitutions affect the two double-strand break repair pathways differentially.  Go to: Materials and Methods Plasmids and Cell Lines  All plasmids for the expression of human BRCA1 with missense substitutions were generated by site-directed mutagenesis from the wild-type sequence (GenBank: U14680.1). Several of these plasmids had been described in previous publications [Ransburgh et al., 2010; Wei et al., 2008]. The cell line for the homologous recombination assay, HeLa-DR, was based on the genomic integration of a specific vector that functions as a recombination substrate [Pierce et al., 2001]. The vector for homologous recombination had been the gift of M. Jasin (Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Institute, New York, NY). The HeLa-DR had been described before [Parvin et al., 2011; Ransburgh et al., 2010]. The repair of double-strand breaks by the SSA pathway was based on a vector kindly provided by J. Stark (City of Hope, Duarte, CA) [Bennardo et al., 2008; Stark et al., 2004] stably integrated into HeLa cells to make the HeLa–SSA cell line. The siRNA targeting the cellular BRCA1 3′ untranslated region (UTR) is the same as previously used [Ransburgh et al., 2010].  SSA Assay  HeLa–SSA cells were seeded in 15.6-mm-diameter wells in 24-well plates, and when cells were 50% confluent, cells were transfected with 5 pmol of the siRNA targeting the BRCA1 3′-UTR plus 0.3 μg of the BRCA1 expression plasmid in Lipofectamine 2000 reagent (Life Technologies, Grand Island, NY). At 24 hr after transfection, cells were transferred to 35-mm-diameter wells in six-well plates. At 48 hr, cells were transfected with 25 pmol of the BRCA1 3′-UTR-specific siRNA plus 0.75 μg BRCA1 expression plasmid plus 0.75 μg pCBASce (for the expression of I-SceI) in Lipofectamine 2000 reagent. After 3 days, cells are harvested by trypsinization, and the fraction of GFP-positive cells is determined using a FACScalibur flow cytometer (BD Biosciences, San Jose, CA) (Analytic Cytometry Shared Resource of The Ohio State University Comprehensive Cancer Center).  Western Blot Analysis of BRCA1 Protein  Immunoblots of the expressed BRCA1 protein were done as has been described previously [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Cells that had been transfected as in the SSA assay were, in parallel, extracted in 0.1% NP-40, 0.05 M Hepes (pH 7.5), and 0.005 M EDTA. Protein contents of extracts were determined using the Bradford reagent; and 50 μg of protein was electrophoresed on 3–8% Nu-PAGE gels (Life Technologies, Grand Island, NY) M. Jasin (Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Institute, NewYork, NY), transferred to polyvinylidene fluoride membranes, and immunoblotted using antibody specific to BRCA1(400–1,100). Densitometry analysis was performed from immunoblots using Kodak 1D software (Eastman Kodak Company, Rochester, NY).  Statistical Analysis of Results  The raw results in the SSA assay for the missense substitutions were compared with the control samples (either GL2 siRNA or BRCA1 siRNA with BRCA1-wt add back) using the unpaired Student’s t-test and obtained the one-tail P values; for intermediate-phenotype mutants, besides the above-mentioned comparisons, we also conducted the unpaired Student’s t-test against the control sample that contains BRCA1 siRNA with empty vector adding back, and obtained the one-tail P values. P values of less than 0.01 were considered significant.  Go to: Results Function of BRCA1 Variants in DNA Break Repair by Homologous Recombination  The BRCA1 protein has been shown to be a critical component of the response to DSBs. Cellular machinery can utilize homologous sequences to accurately repair the DSB, or the free ends can be joined by nonhomologous end joining. In addition to homologous recombination, the pathway of SSA exists by which the repair proteins resect DNA from the free ends of the DSB, and when short stretches of homologous sequence are exposed, then the DNA ends are rejoined [Stark et al., 2004]. The homologous recombination assay used in this study was based on a method developed by the Jasin laboratory in which a single integrated genomic locus contains two inactive GFP genes, and one of these contains the endonuclease cleavage site for the rare-cutting I-SceI enzyme [Pierce et al., 2001]. Upon expression of I-SceI in the cell, one inactive allele of GFP is cut, and if homologous recombination occurs using the second inactive GFP gene as the homology template, then the DNA repair results in gene conversion making the GFP gene become active (Fig. 1A). The SSA assay is based on an analogous strategy in which the GFP protein is not expressed because of intervening DNA sequence, with an I-SceI site at the 3′ end of the intervening DNA. Upon expression of the I-SceI endonuclease, the DSB is generated, and resection of the intervening sequence reveals homologous GFP sequences that are aligned and repaired [Stark et al., 2004] (Fig. 1B). These two processes depend on sequence homologies for the repair, but there are functional differences. The Rad51 and BRCA2 proteins are required for the homology-directed recombination (HDR) assay, but are not required for the SSA assay [Moynahan et al., 2001; Stark et al., 2004].  Figure 1 Figure 1 The double-strand DNA break (DSB) repair assay system. A: The HDR recombination substrate [Pierce et al. 2001] is diagrammed. The upstream GFP allele is defective because of the inclusion of an I-SceI site in its sequence. The downstream GFP allele is ... For each assay, we have established HeLa-derived cell lines with the published recombination substrate [Pierce et al., 2001; Stark et al., 2004] integrated in the genome at a single site. The HeLa-DR cell line assays HDR, and the HeLa–SSA cell line is used to assay SSA. The HDR and the SSA assays have a similar experimental design with a depletion of BRCA1 by transfection of a siRNA that is specific for the 3′-UTR of the BRCA1 mRNA. We cotransfect a BRCA1 expression plasmid that is not affected by the siRNA and which expresses the variant BRCA1 protein. After 2 days, we repeat the transfection and also transfect a plasmid that encodes the expression of the I-SceI endonuclease to generate the DSB in the presence of the variant BRCA1. After 3 days, we assay the cells for GFP expression by flow cytometry. The timeline of the experiment is shown in Figure 1C.  We have previously analyzed 16 variants of BRCA1 in a tissue-culture-cell-based assay for repair of DSBs via homologous recombination [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Using the HeLa-DR cell line developed by us, up to 20% of the cells convert to GFP positive. This high level of recombination enables the quantitative analysis of variants in BRCA1 in this process. The endogenous BRCA1 mRNA is depleted by siRNA targeting the 3′-UTR, and a BRCA1 variant that is resistant to the siRNA is simultaneously expressed from a plasmid [Parvin et al., 2011; Ransburgh, et al., 2010]. A quantitative measure of the function of the BRCA1 variant is determined from the percentage of cells that convert to GFP positive.  In this study, we first analyzed an additional 13 BRCA1 variants for function in HDR (Fig. 2). Twelve of the BRCA1 variants spanned amino acid residue 90 through 191 and were identified from the Breast Information Core (http://research.nhgri.nih.gov/bic/). These were expressed from the plasmid as full-length proteins. All 12 variants are listed in the BIC as having unknown phenotype with regard to predisposition to breast cancer. Several of these have been evaluated using a multifactorial classification system, and of these 12 variants, seven were nonpathogenic [Lindor et al., 2012]. These were chosen because the function of this domain was unknown and because many of these variants have been reported to be nonpathogenic. By testing the known nonpathogenic variants in this assay, we provide a specificity control for the functional test. The 13th variant tested is a known deleterious mutant in the carboxy terminus of the BRCA1 protein, M1775R. In these experiments, the percentage of cells that were GFP positive when transfected with the control siRNA and the control plasmid were set equal to 1%. All other results were normalized to this control, and all results were from three or more separate experiments. Depletion of BRCA1 and transfection with empty plasmid resulted in a value of 0.09 relative to the control (Fig. 2, lane 2). Thus, BRCA1 depletion has an over 10-fold effect reducing the level of homologous recombination. Depleting BRCA1 and transfecting a plasmid that expressed wild-type BRCA1 resulted in full restoration of homologous recombination (Fig. 2, lane 3). Among the variants with substitutions in residues from 90 to 191, all 12 functioned as wild type in the homologous recombination assay (Fig. 2, lanes 4–15) (P < 0.002 compared with depleted BRCA1). By contrast, the 13th tested missense substitution, a known pathogenic mutant BRCA1–M1775R, did not complement the depletion of BRCA1 in this assay (Fig. 2, lane 16) (Pv = 0.0014 compared with wild-type BRCA1).  Figure 2 Figure 2 Analysis of 13 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in the homology-directed repair assay. HeLa-DR cells were transfected with a siRNA that depleted the endogenous BRCA1 and with a plasmid that expressed the indicated BRCA1 variant. After generating a double-strand ... Function of 29 Variants of BRCA1 in the Repair of DNA Breaks by the SSA Pathway  The 16 BRCA1 variants that had previously been tested for function in homologous recombination [Ransburgh et al., 2010] and the 13 BRCA1 variants tested in this study (Fig. 2) were analyzed for function in SSA repair. The recombination substrate [Bennardo et al., 2008; Stark et al., 2004] was based on similar design as the homologous recombination substrate with the exception that restoration of GFP activity occurs when the two inactive GFP genes are repaired by SSA. HeLa cells were stably transfected with the SA–GFP construct, and a clone was selected that had no detectable background GFP signal. Upon transfection of the I-SceI-expressing plasmid, about 5–7% of cells became GFP positive, indicative of a functioning SSA pathway. Depletion of BRCA1 resulted in a decrease to about 1–2% GFP-positive cells (Fig. 3, lane 2), indicating a role for BRCA1 in the SSA repair pathway that had been previously observed [Stark et al., 2004]. Depletion of BRCA1 resulted in about 25% of the activity found in nondepleted cells. As had been observed with the homologous recombination assay, transfection of a plasmid expressing wild-type BRCA1 fully complemented the defect in SSA due to depletion of the endogenous BRCA1 (Fig. 3, lane 3). By contrast, depletion of endogenous BRCA1 and expression of a known pathogenic mutant of BRCA1, M1775R, was as defective in SSA as had been transfection of the empty vector (Fig. 3, lane 32). Similar to previous observations with the zinc-coordinating mutants of BRCA1, these residues were all required for SSA repair of double-strand breaks (Fig. 3, lanes: 6, 7, 10, 11, 13, 14, 16, and 17). As was found for the homologous recombination assay, the M18T variant and the T37R variant were defective for SSA repair. The L52F variant had reduced levels of SSA repair, approximately 69% of wild-type activity (Fig. 3, lane 15), although this value was not significantly different from wild type. The D67Y variant, a known nonpathogenic variant [Easton et al., 2007], was fully active in SSA repair (lane 18).  Figure 3 Figure 3 Analysis of 29 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in the SSA assay. HeLa–SSA cells were transfected as in Figure 2 with plasmids that express the 29 tested missense substitutions of BRCA1. Results of the fraction of cells that had converted to GFP ... Results diverged between the SSA and the homologous recombination assays for the variants in residues 90 through 191. The BRCA1–I90T variant functioned in the homologous recombination assay, but in the SSA assay, it was 47% as active as wild type (t-test for differing from wild-type P < 0.01; lane 20). The Y105C variant was statistically different from both wild-type BRCA1 and empty vector (indicated with both an asterisk and a cross; lane 21). This Y105C variant thus has intermediate phenotype, neither fully active nor fully defective. Similarly, the P142H, E143K, and the R170Q had intermediate phenotype (lanes 25, 26, and 28). The V191D variant was also defective for SSA repair (lane 31). Interestingly, the S153R and S186Y variants had diminished activity, but the change in activities was not statistically significant from the wild type. Thus, these variants were not scored as defective. Seven of the variants tested had assay-specific phenotypes, suggesting that how BRCA1 interacts with repair factors in the homologous recombination pathway is different from factors that BRCA1 binds in the SSA pathway.  When replacing the endogenous BRCA1 protein with a variant BRCA1, there is the concern that the expression levels be consistent with the levels of the endogenous in nondepleted cells. A defective phenotype could be masked by high levels of overexpression of the variant protein, or the phenotype of a functional protein might not be observed because of poor protein expression. The 16 variants with missense substitutions between residues 18 and 71 had been tested in HeLa-derived cells and the expression of each variant was similar to the endogenous in each case [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. For expression, we tested the missense substitutions between residues 90 and 191 and also residue 1775, and found that they all express approximately similarly as the endogenous BRCA1 (Fig. 4). Normalized results from densitometry analysis are presented beneath each lane. Protein from nontransfected cells and from control siRNA and empty vector transfected cells had similar amounts of BRCA1 protein (Fig. 4, lanes 1 and 2). Depletion of BRCA1 and add back with empty plasmid depleted the level of BRCA1 protein, which densitometry analysis indicated to be about 0.35 relative to the nontransfected cells (lane 3). All variants were detected at higher levels than the lysate from BRCA1-depleted cells. Some variants were expressed at higher levels than others, but at most 1.3-fold higher than the BRCA1 levels in nontransfected cells (compare, for example, lane 7 with lane 2). Because none of the BRCA1 variants were expressed at levels much higher than the endogenous BRCA1, in no case could the phenotype of a defective variant be masked by overexpression. The S186Y, V191D, and M1775R variants all had somewhat lower expression, but these lower levels of expression did not correlate with function in either homologous recombination or SSA repair. As an example, the S186Y variant was a low expresser (0.86 relative to control), but it was functional in both assays. We note that the M1775R mutant was expressed at lower levels (0.62 relative to endogenous BRCA1) than any other BRCA1 variant (lane 16). We interpret this level of expression to be similar to other variants and not an explanation for the defect in each double-strand break repair pathway. However, we cannot exclude the interpretation that the M1775R was defective in the DNA repair assays because there was lower BRCA1 expression of this isoform in our cells.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Analysis of the expression levels of 13 variants in HeLa–SSA cells. The expression levels of 16 previously tested BRCA1 substitution variants were tested in the HeLa-derived cell line [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Thirteen variants, with substitutions ... Comparison of Variants in Different Assays  The 29 BRCA1 variants analyzed in this study were compared for function in the two DNA repair assays and with available knowledge about cancer association (Table 1). Many of the variants were consistent across the two assays, but there were several variants demonstrating separation of function. All of the zinc-coordinating residues were required for function in both repair assays. The M18T variant was clearly defective, but it is currently classified as unknown clinical significance. There is one genetic model that classified this M18T variant as likely pathogenic (see below).  Table 1 Table 1 Summary of BRCA1 Variants Benchmarking Function to Clinical Relevance  Recently, a new classification system for variants has been proposed [Lindor et al., 2012; Plon et al., 2008]. According to this system, Class 1 denotes variants that are not pathogenic. Class 2 is likely nonpathogenic. Class 3 is uncertain. Class 4 is likely pathogenic (probability of being pathogenic is 0.95–0.99), and Class 5 is definitely pathogenic (probability >0.99). According to variants described in the [Lindor et al. (2012)] system, three of the variants in this study (M18T, C61G, and M1775R) were of Class 4, either likely pathogenic or definitely pathogenic. An additional five mutants are treated clinically as Class 5, pathogenic, (C39Y, C44F, C47G, C64G, and R71G). One of these pathogenic mutants, R71G, does not affect the BRCA1 protein, but rather the splicing of the mRNA [Vega et al., 2001]. Since the assays tested express BRCA1 from spliced cDNA, the R71G defective phenotype would not be detected. We thus exclude this mutant from the comparison of benchmarking these assays against known mutants. There were then seven pathogenic mutants (Class 4 or 5) analyzed and eight nonpathogenic variants (Class 1; Table 1). When comparing the results of our functional analyses with these previously classified variants, the HDR assay scored all seven pathogenic or likely pathogenic mutants as defective, and all eight nonpathogenic variants as functional. The results of the assay were, in the case of every variant, either fully active or fully defective (see examples in Fig. 2). To date, no variant tested in the HDR assay produced an intermediate score.  Compared with these benchmarks, the variants tested in the SSA assay did not score as well as the HDR assay. All pathogenic mutants were defective for SSA repair of double-strand breaks, but one nonpathogenic variant (I124V) was defective for SSA, and three Class 1 variants had intermediate phenotype in the SSA assay. Although the HDR assay was both highly sensitive and highly specific, the SSA assay was highly sensitive at association with cancer risk, but it was less specific. Of interest, it had been noted that four BRCA1 variants, Y105C, P142H, E143K, and Y179C, had decreased accumulation at the sites of DNA breaks [Wei et al., 2008]. Although these variants were normal for HDR, three of these had intermediate levels of function in the SSA assay (Table 1). Perhaps there is a link between the accumulation of BRCA1 at DNA repair sites and a factor important for the SSA assay.  Go to: Discussion Functional Assays as Predictive Tools for Assessing BRCA1 Variants  In this study, we analyzed a total of 29 BRCA1 variants in the repair of DSBs by homologous recombination and by SSA. For the sake of this discussion, we exclude the BRCA1–R71G variant that affects splicing [Vega et al., 2001] because all of our assays used prespliced cDNAs and would not be sensitive to a splicing defect. By comparing our results with those BRCA1 missense substitutions that have a known effect on breast cancer predisposition, we found that the HDR assay was 100% accurate: seven previously classified pathogenic mutants were defective for HDR, and eight previously classified nonpathogenic variants in BRCA1 were functional for HDR. Further, the results for the HDR assay were either fully active or fully defective. We interpret these results to indicate that the HDR assay is validated as a predictive tool for assessing BRCA1 variants.  By contrast to the HDR assay, the function of BRCA1 variants in the repair of DSBs by SSA had a number of differences that diminished the accuracy of this assay. On the basis of the benchmarks of variants that were classified using a genetic model [Lindor et al., 2012], the SSA assay was sensitive because it did not misclassify any pathogenic variants, but it was not specific because it misclassified several nonpathogenic variants as either intermediate or defective. Interpretation of the SSA assay was also complicated by intermediate results; by comparison, the HDR assay had no intermediate results among the 29 variants tested. It is possible, but remains to be determined, whether missense variants that are proficient for HDR, but deficient or intermediate for SSA, confer a lower or moderate risk of cancer. We thus conclude that the HDR assay is a more reliable predictive tool for assessing the function of BRCA1 variants than is the SSA assay.  We had previously performed a similar analysis of the control of centrosome duplication by BRCA1 variant proteins [Kais et al., 2012]. Fewer variants of the BRCA1 protein were analyzed in this earlier study using the centrosome assay, but it has several differences from the HDR assay. With regard to those variants with inferred breast cancer association, the centrosome duplication assay had an intermediate result for the BRCA1–D67Y variant, which is nonpathogenic. The T37R variant was defective for both DNA repair assays, but was functional in control of the centrosome duplication. Five amino acid residues away, the I42V variant had the opposite pattern as T37R, with defective centrosome control but fully functional in both DNA repair assays. Experimentally, the centrosome regulation assay is much more difficult to perform than the HDR assay, making it not as desirable an assay for analysis of BRCA1 variants. In addition, the centrosome assay appears, based on the limited set of variants, to be less accurate than the HDR assay. On the contrary, like the SSA, none of the tested seven variants that were previously classified as Class 4 or 5, were functional in the centrosomal assay, suggesting that this assay is sensitive.  It will be necessary to analyze many more variants in the HDR assay and then compare those results with the clinical experiences before this assay can be used for clinical interpretation. On the basis of the accuracy of the currently tested variants, we believe that the HDR assay will help with difficult to classify variants of unknown significance.  Functional Assays for Probing BRCA1 Residues Important in Biological Function  Separate from the clinical utility of the different functional tests, important biological information about the BRCA1 protein is available from the various functional assays. Very little structure–function information exists for BRCA1, and there have been limited systematic analyses of the effects of BRCA1 amino acid variants in a given function. A variety of variants have been analyzed in the context of short BRCA1 amino-terminal truncations for ubiquitin ligase activity [Morris et al., 2006]. In a similar vein, a variety of variants in the context of a short BRCA1 carboxy-terminal fragment have been analyzed for the activation of transcription [Carvalho et al., 2007; Lee et al., 2010]. Several variants in the context of the full-length protein have been analyzed in terms of resistance to ionizing radiation [Ruffner et al., 2001] and reversal of a lethal phenotype in murine embryonic stem cells [Chang et al., 2009].  We find that there are some discordancies between functional assays of the variants. The most striking are at T37R and I42V. BRCA1–T37R was defective for both DNA repair processes, but was fully functional for control of centrosomes. Conversely, BRCA1–I42V was defective for control of centrosome duplication [Kais et al., 2012] but functional in the DNA repair processes. From this result, we hypothesize that the protein–BRCA1 contacts in the DNA repair pathways depend on the T37 residue, whereas a different protein–BRCA1 contact is important for regulating the centrosome duplication. Such a notion is possible because the centrosome regulation occurs in the cytoplasm and the DNA repair occurs in the nucleus, and it is reasonable to suppose that different proteins are involved.  There were variants that distinguished between BRCA1 residues important for DSB repair by homologous recombination versus SSA. The observed differences between the SSA and HDR assays involved residues from 90 to 191. Several of these (Y105C, P142H, and E143K) that had intermediate phenotype in the SSA assay had been shown to have slow accumulation at sites of DSBs. Especially, P142H mutation abolished the association with Ku80 protein, which plays an important role in the repair of DSBs [Wei et al., 2008]. Perhaps the SSA pathway contributes to the accumulation of BRCA1 at sites of DNA damage in cells.  In summary, in this study, we evaluated missense variants of BRCA1 in two different DNA repair pathways. Data support that the function of BRCA1 in the HDR assay is consistent with the known cancer association of these variants, and we suggest that this test is predictive for breast cancer. By contrast, the repair of DNA by the related SSA pathway is not perfectly consistent with what is known about cancer predisposition, and the SSA assay yields intermediate results. On the basis of these current results, we suggest that the HDR assay is validated for predicting whether substitution at any residue of BRCA1 is disease associated.  
2507||There have been few published analyses of the effects of missense mutations of the BRCA1 gene on BRCA1 protein function. In this study, we adapted a previously described homology directed recombination (HDR) assay to the analysis of the effects of BRCA1 point substitutions on its function in recombination. We established a HeLa-derived cell line, which has integrated in its genome a recombination substrate. Following transfection of a plasmid that expresses the endonuclease that creates a double-stranded break in the recombination substrate, HDR is readily scored by the percentage of GFP-positive cells. By combining RNAi specific for the cellular BRCA1 mRNA with expression of BRCA1 mutants resistant to the RNAi, we could effectively replace the endogenous BRCA1 protein with selected point mutants of BRCA1 and test these in the recombination assay. We found that both, the amino- and carboxy-terminal ~300 residues of BRCA1 were essential for directing HDR. Sixteen missense mutants from the amino terminus of BRCA1 were analyzed for function in HDR, and we found that several point mutants fully replaced the wild-type BRCA1 and are neutral in this process. Mutation of any single zinc-coordinating residue was fully defective in this assay. Several protein variants due to missense mutations, including methionine-18 to threonine and threonine-37 to arginine were also found to be defective for recombination. We have thus established a robust assay system for the analysis of the effects of specific missense mutations of BRCA1 in regulating the homologous recombination process.  Go to: Introduction The Breast Cancer associated gene 1 (BRCA1) is a tumor suppressor that is specifically associated with familial cases of breast cancer and ovarian cancer (1). In familial breast cancer, a woman may inherit a BRCA1 allele with a mutation, and during her lifetime there is a high likelihood that in at least one breast epithelial cell the second, non-mutated, allele of BRCA1 will be lost by deletion. Such a cell is hemizygous for BRCA1 and the one remaining allele has a mutation. If that mutation renders the BRCA1 defective for a key biological function, then that cell has increased likelihood of transforming into a breast tumor.  The BRCA1 gene has been sequenced from many individuals with a family history of breast cancer, and many of the characterized mutations result in a frame shift or a stop codon and truncate the encoded BRCA1 protein. Clearly, such truncating mutations predispose to breast cancer. Missense mutations, however, can present a diagnostic dilemma since specific point mutations have low prevalence in the population and the disease association is often unclear. Several genetic and evolutionary analyses can predict whether a given point mutation is likely to predispose to breast cancer, but the interpretation can be ambiguous (2–4).  Although there have been many studies assessing the functional implication of BRCA1 mutations, there has been no systematic functional studies that are designed for analysis of the full length protein or that assess a biological process such as homologous recombination. Several in vitro biochemical assays have tested the effects of point mutations in protein-protein interactions (5), in BRCA1-dependent ubiquitin ligase activity (6), and in the control of the centrosome (7). A tissue culture cell-based assay fuses 468 amino acids from the BRCA1 carboxy-terminus to a DNA-binding domain and analyzes the effect of the mutant on a transcription-based reporter assay (8). This latter assay has been very successful in assigning whether a missense mutation is associated with loss of transcription function, but the assay cannot evaluate BRCA1 sequences in the amino-terminal three-fourths of the protein, and the assay does not address non-transcription functions of BRCA1, such as regulation of DNA repair.  In this study, we have adapted the homologous recombination assay that BRCA1 regulates (9–11) to a robust method to analyze specific BRCA1 protein variants. The modified assay tests specific BRCA1 missense mutations in the homologous recombination process. We have characterized a set of point mutations in the amino terminus of BRCA1 in this assay as an initial step in determining whether a BRCA1 variant of unknown function may predispose to breast cancer.  Go to: Materials and Methods Plasmids, siRNA, and Cell Lines  The plasmid encoding the recombination substrate, pDR-GFP, and the I-SceI expression plasmid, cBAS, were both kindly provided by Drs. K. Nakanishi and M. Jasin (Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Center, NY, NY). BRCA1 expression plasmid, pcDNA-5’HA-BRCA1, has been previously described (12), and site-specific point mutations identified on the Breast Cancer Information Core (BIC) were generated using the Quick Change Kit from Stratagene. Details of the subcloning are available upon request. Plasmids for the expression of BRCA1 deletion mutants have been previously described (12, 13).  Sequences of the 3’-UTR of BRCA1 were targeted with siRNA oligonucleotides based on the sequence GCUCCUCUCACUCUUCAGU specific for nucleotides 80,780 to 80,798 of the BRCA1 gene (accession number AY273801). BRCA2 was targeted using siRNA based on the sequence UAAAUUUGGACAUAAGGAGUCCUCC. The control siRNA, called GL2, targets the luciferase gene (14).  A stable derivative of HeLa cells was established by transfection with pDR-GFP using standard procedures and selection in 1.5 µg/ml puromycin. Puromycin-resistant cells were cloned by limiting dilution in 96 well plates, and an initial screen selected those colonies that had no detectable GFP fluorescence. Remaining colonies were replica plated and transfected in parallel with cBAS to express the I-SceI. The untransfected stocks of those clones with intense fluorescence in a high percentage of cells were selected and re-cloned by limiting dilution. The number of integration sites in the final cell line, HeLa-DR13-9, was determined by digesting genomic DNA with XhoI and analyzing by Southern blotting.  Homology Directed Recombination Assay  On day 1, HeLa-DR13-9 cells, approximately 4.0 × 104 cells in a 1.5 cm well were transfected with 5 pmoles of BRCA1 siRNA targeting the 3’-UTR of BRCA1 gene and 0.3 µg of the appropriate BRCA1 expression plasmid in the presence of 0.5 µl of lipofectamine-2000 (Invitrogen). On day 2, the transfected cells were transferred to 3.5 cm well dishes. On day 3, the cells were transfected with 25 pmoles of the BRCA1 siRNA, 0.75 µg of the appropriate BRCA1 expression plasmid, plus 0.75 µg of cBAS in the presence of 2.5 µl of lipofectamine-2000. On day 6, cells were trypsinized and 10,000 cells from each well were counted by flow cytometry using a Becton Dickinson FACSCalibur instrument in the OSU Comprehensive Cancer Center Analytical Cytometry shared resource.  All point mutants of BRCA1 analyzed were tested in triplicate and the percentage of cells with recombined locus encoding GFP were normalized to the same percentage from the control siRNA transfected cells. In the figures, the averages are shown with the standard error of the mean depicted by error bars.  Immunoprecipitation analysis  HEK293T cells were transfected with the same BRCA1 variant expression constructs as used in the HDR assay. Whole cell lysates were harvested 2 days post transfection and subjected to immunoaffinity purification using the HA.11 anti-HA tag antibody (Covance) by standard procedures (12). Western blots were analyzed with anti-HA antibody and anti-BARD1 antibody H-300 (Santa Cruz) by standard methods.  Go to: Results Both the amino- and carboxy-termini of BRCA1 are required for BRCA1 regulation of homology directed recombination  We adapted an established assay (15) for homologous recombination in which two inactive alleles of green fluorescent protein (GFP) are integrated in a single locus in the genome of the cell. One allele contains the 18 bp recognition element for the I-SceI endonuclease. Transfection into the cells of a plasmid for expressing the I-SceI results in a double strand break in one GFP allele, and this break can be repaired by homology directed recombination (HDR) using the second inactive allele of GFP. (The plasmids encoding the recombination substrate and the I-SceI endonuclease were the gift of M. Jasin, Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center, NY, NY.) This repair results in gene conversion that creates a GFP allele that encodes an active protein, and the recombination can be detected by identifying green fluorescing cells. This plasmid and strategy (Figure 1A) has been successfully used in a variety of experiments in which a cell line carrying a mutant version of a protein under study has had this recombination substrate inserted in the cell and the effect of the specific protein was then evaluated (15–17). We instead inserted a copy of this recombination substrate into HeLa cells and carefully selected a clone, called HeLa-DR13-9, which has no background GFP fluorescence, but following transfection of the I-SceI expressing plasmid there is a high level of GFP-positive cells. In many repeated experiments, between 10% and 20% of the cells will undergo recombination following I-SceI expression. This cell line is then useful for the analysis of RNAi-depletion of proteins and testing for their effects in HDR.  Figure 1 Figure 1 The Homology-Directed Recombination Assay HeLa-DR13-9 cells were transfected with either a control siRNA or an siRNA specific to BRCA1. Two days later these cells were re-transfected with the appropriate siRNA plus the plasmid for expression of I-SceI, and three days later the percentage of GFP-positive cells was determined by flow-cytometry. The reduction in GFP-positive cells when BRCA1 is depleted is evident from inspection of the resultant monolayers (Figure 1B) and is quantified by flow cytometry (10,000 cells counted per sample). In the experiment for Figure 2, in the absence of transfected I-SceI expression plasmid, there are no GFP-positive cells (Figure 2, lane 1). In the presence of I-SceI and a control siRNA 16% of the cells were GFP-positive (lane 2). Depletion of BRCA1 or BRCA2 reduced the number of cells with recombined GFP-alleles by eight-fold or 40-fold, respectively. Similar reductions in HDR were observed with siRNAs targeting other BRCA1 and BRCA2 sequences, indicating that these results are not due to off-target effects of the siRNA (data not shown). Further, these results are consistent with published observations (9, 18). Importantly, when the siRNA targets the 3’-UTR of the BRCA1, expression of exogenous BRCA1 from a plasmid with a different 3’-UTR results in complete restoration of HDR activity (Figure 2, lane 4). This result suggests that we have a robust assay for determining the effects of specific BRCA1 mutations in the regulation of the homologous recombination process.  Figure 2 Figure 2 Depletion of BRCA1 protein decreases HDR activity We next assayed a series of synthetic BRCA1 deletion mutants for function in the HDR assay. In Figure 3A, the four deletion mutants are diagrammed. Using the same time course as in Figure 2, the endogenous BRCA1 protein was depleted by 3’-UTR-targeting siRNA, and the test BRCA1 protein was expressed from a co-transfected plasmid. Multiple repeat experiments were done, and in each experiment the maximal recombination varies from 10% to 20%, depending on transfection efficiency. Within an experiment the ratio of GFP-positive cells in the BRCA1 depleted sample relative to the control RNAi was consistently 8- to 10-fold reduced. We thus normalized data in each experiment, allowing us to average the results from multiple experiments. Replacing the endogenous BRCA1 with ΔN-BRCA1, which has deleted residues 1–302, results in a 4- to 5-fold reduction in homologous recombination. Expression of the ΔM1-BRCA1, which has deleted residues 305–770, reduced recombination by about 40%. Similarly, expression of the ΔM2-BRCA1, which has deleted residues 775–1292, resulted in a decrease in recombination by about 60%. Expression of the ΔC-BRCA1, which has deleted residues 1527–1863, resulted in a 10-fold loss of recombination. Clearly, the amino-terminus and carboxy-terminus each had a significant role in controlling the recombination reaction. Expression of the two internal domains had intermediate effects. In each case, the concentrations of BRCA1 protein expressed from the transfected plasmid were at or higher levels than the endogenous BRCA1 protein (Figure 3C), indicating that the reduction in HDR activity was not due to failure to express the test protein. Since the expression level of the ΔN, ΔM1, and ΔM2 mutants were significantly higher than the endogenous BRCA1 protein, it is possible that the magnitudes of the deficiencies in HDR activity with these BRCA1 deletion mutants were underestimated. We decided to focus on point mutations in the amino terminus.  Figure 3 Figure 3 The BRCA1 N- and C-termini are important in regulation of HDR activity Identification of BRCA1 point mutations that are critical for homologous recombination activity  We decided to test point mutations in the amino-terminal 71 amino acid residues of BRCA1 that were derived from individuals with a family history of breast cancer and identified from the BIC database. The reasons for using mutations identified in breast or ovarian cancer clinics were two-fold: first, this is the most direct way to identify candidate amino acid residues for critical function without performing saturating mutagenesis and testing a large number of variants; and second, the results of our functional tests might be useful in counseling such individuals who carry these mutations. Sixteen different variants were produced by site-directed mutagenesis of the BRCA1 cDNA-expressing plasmid. One of these variants, C27A, is a synthetic mutation and is not derived from a variant obtained from an individual with a family history with breast cancer. Rather, the C27A variant completes the set of eight different Zn-coordinating residues of BRCA1 in this analysis. The results of multiple experiments are shown in Figure 4. Consistent with our previous experiments, depletion of BRCA1 by transfection of siRNA targeting the 3’-UTR and co-transfection of the empty plasmid vector, resulted in a 10-fold reduction in GFP-positive cells relative to the control siRNA. Transfection of this BRCA1-specific siRNA along with the wild-type BRCA1 expression plasmid fully restored homology-directed recombination (Figure 4A, lane 3). Strikingly, transfection of each mutant either fully restored recombination to 100% or was fully negative, at the same level of homologous recombination as the vector-transfected control. We note that the deletion mutants used in Figure 3 produced recombination levels that had intermediate results: the ΔM1 and ΔM2 deletions caused partial decrements in homologous recombination. Even deleting the amino terminus, containing all of the residues being tested did not have as severe an effect on the HDR assay as did the point mutants. The expression levels of the point mutants of BRCA1 all were similar to the endogenous protein level (Figure 4B, compare lane 3 to all other lanes) whereas the ΔN deletion, which encompassed all of these point mutants, was significantly overexpressed relative to the endogenous protein and perhaps causing a partial masking of the HDR defect. Alternatively, it is a formal possibility that the point mutations in the BRCA1 protein have both a loss of function phenotype and a dominant negative phenotype.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Identification of BRCA1 missense mutations that affect homologous recombination Eight of the residues that were tested coordinate zinc ions in the RING domain: C24R, C27A, C39Y, H41R, C44F, C47G, C61G, and C64G. It is anticipated that substitution of any of these amino acid residues would have major structural consequences to the protein. Consistent with that concept, replacement of the endogenous BRCA1 with any of these BRCA1 molecules with mutated zinc-coordinating residues was non-functional in HDR (Figure 4A, lanes 6, 7, 10, 11, 13, 14, 16, 17).  Eight other substitution mutants were tested for function in the homologous recombination pathway. The M18T and T37R variants did not complement the HDR assay. Variants that could complement the HDR activity were I21V, I31M, I42V, L52, D67Y, and R71G.  We tested whether the mutant BRCA1 proteins used in this study could bind to BARD1 (Figure 5). We transfected the HA-epitope tagged BRCA1 into HEK293T cells and purified proteins in complex with the variant BRCA1 protein by immunoaffinity purification (IP) using antibody recognizing the HA-tag. Purified proteins were analyzed by immunoblots specific for the HA-epitope to evaluate the effectiveness of expression and purification of the mutant BRCA1 protein and specific for the endogenous BARD1 protein. We found that BRCA1 variant proteins I21V, I31M, I42V, L52F, D67Y, and R71G effectively purified cellular BARD1 protein. These are the same proteins that functioned in homologous recombination. Of note, the BRCA1 variant proteins M18T and H41R had detectable low level of BARD1 binding, but these BRCA1 variants did not complement the HDR assay.  Figure 5 Figure 5 Effect of BRCA1 missense variants on association with BARD1 Correlation of biological function with available clinical data for each BRCA1 missense mutant  We have summarized the available information for each mutant in Table 1, including results of HDR function and BARD1 binding (this study), E3 ubiquitin ligase activity and resistance to ionizing radiation (6), and available clinical information. For many of these variants family history was unavailable, and this limited the analysis we could do. Examples of available family data are supplied in Supplemental Table 1. We applied an algorithm called VUS Predict (19) to the 16 variants. VUS Predict calculates the odds of a variant being detrimental based on a variety of characteristics of tumors including estrogen receptor, progesterone receptor, and Her2 status, tumor grade, histopathology, age of onset, and the position of the amino acid residue in a functional domain or evolutionary conserved sequence. If there were no clinical data, then the VUS Predict output was based on the single criterion of evolutionary conservation (asterisked values in Table 1).  Table 1 Table 1 Summary of biological functions of BRCA1 proteins in the context of available clinical information for each variant. Of the 16 BRCA1 variants in this study, four of the eight Zn-coordinating residues have been classified as deleterious when mutant (Table 1). One other variant, R71G, has been classified as deleterious (2, 20), and one, D67Y, had been classified as neutral (4). One of the substitution mutants, M18T, has a published odds ratio of being deleterious of 31:1 (4). Using VUS Predict, the M18T mutant has 170.8:1 odds of being deleterious. While these analyses clearly indicate the M18T variant has a trend as a deleterious allele, the magnitude of the ratio did not exceed the threshold of 1000:1 for making a clinical classification. We find that this mutation of BRCA1 causes a complete loss of HDR activity. Though this substitution, when expressed in a truncated BRCA1 peptide in the absence of the BARD1 did have ubiquitin ligase enzymatic activity, it was defective in protection of a cell against ionizing radiation (6). In another study using the BRCA1/BARD1 heterodimer, the M18T variant was inactive as a ubiquitin ligase (21). The M18T substitution could affect the BRCA1-BARD1 heterodimerization interface (22), resulting in reduced BARD1 association with the BRCA1 variant (Figure 5). Our results in the HDR assay are consistent with this substitution being deleterious.  Genetic analysis of one of these mutants, D67Y, has suggested that it is neutral with regard to cancer predisposition (4), and consistent with that notion it has the same phenotype as does wild-type BRCA1 in the HDR assay. Though the R71G substitution is considered cancer-promoting, the mutation is thought to affect the splicing of the mRNA (20), such a feature would be missed when expressing a cDNA as in this experiment. Mutant BRCA1(R71G) protein functioned in the HDR at similar levels as did wild-type BRCA1.  Among the remaining five variants of unknown clinical consequence, the T37R variant was defective in HDR (Figure 4A, lane 9). In new research published while this study was being written has indicated that the similar T37K variant is likely to be deleterious based on clinical and evolutionary analysis (3). The T37R substitution was also found to defective in providing ionizing radiation resistance (6), consistent with our HDR results. Taken together, the threonine-37 residue is likely critical to the homologous recombination process, and consequently to radio-resistance. The threonine-37 side chain is solvent exposed, but in a small cavity near the BRCA1-BARD1 heterodimerization interface (22). Perhaps the bulky lysine or arginine substitutions result in disruption of BRCA1-BARD1 binding, or alternatively another protein important to HDR binds to this pocket.  Go to: Discussion This study establishes a new assay for evaluating the function of BRCA1 protein variants. Critical components include the HeLa-derived cell line containing an integrated recombination substrate that is readily scored using flow cytometry. The very low background fluorescence in this cell, combined with the very high response to I-SceI expression, make this cell line ideal for analyzing the homologous recombination process. Since HeLa cells are readily transfected, we routinely obtain greater than 70% of the cells transfected in a monolayer (data not shown), this cell line is ideal for silencing a given gene by RNAi and re-expressing the gene via an RNAi-resistant plasmid expression vector. Though BRCA1 is associated with breast and ovarian cancers, this function for BRCA1 has been found in all cell types, and is thus valid to study in the HeLa cell line. While not high-throughput, the assay is relatively quick once the mutant plasmids are prepared. Several variants can be analyzed simultaneously in a one week experiment. We plan to expand this analysis to a number of variants in the amino- and carboxy-termini of the BRCA1 protein. This continuing effort will greatly expand the analysis of the functional consequences of missense mutations in BRCA1 function.  When a BRCA1 variant protein is defective in the homologous recombination process, is it cancer associated? So far, the results indicate a strong correlation with this HDR assay and cancer predisposition, but the analysis of more mutants will be important to determine whether there is an association. Conversely, are BRCA1 variants that have full HDR activity neutral mutations? The R71G variant has full HDR activity, but it is certainly cancer-associated but via splicing (20), a mechanism that would not be identified in this assay using fully spliced cDNAs. Thus, we already have one example indicating that the converse is not true. In addition, we are developing a similar assay for centrosome control by BRCA1 variants, and initial results suggest that some of these variants do indeed function differently in the two assays (Z. Kais, JDP, unpublished observations).  Combining the functional analysis described in this study with genetic and clinical analysis of point mutants (3, 4) will undoubtedly be important for counseling women who carry missense mutations of BRCA1. As the data become more complete, such results will likely become an excellent resource for guiding clinical decisions.  Mutations in BRCA1 and BRCA2 account for the majority of hereditary breast and ovarian cancers, and therefore sequence analysis of both genes is routinely conducted in patients with early-onset breast cancer. Besides mutations that clearly abolish protein function or are known to increase cancer risk, a large number of sequence variants of uncertain signifi cance (VUS) have been identifi ed. Although several functional assays for BRCA1 VUSs have been described, thus far it has not been possible to conduct a high-throughput analysis in the context of the full-length protein. We have developed a relatively fast and easy cDNA-based functional assay to classify BRCA1 VUSs based on their ability to functionally complement BRCA1-defi cient mouse embryonic stem cells. Using this assay, we have analyzed 74 unclassifi ed BRCA1 missense mutants for which all predicted pathogenic variants are confi ned to the BRCA1 RING and BRCT domains.  SIGNIFICANCE: BRCA1 VUSs are frequently found in patients with hereditary breast or ovarian cancer and present a serious problem for clinical geneticists. This article describes the generation, validation, and application of a reliable high-throughput assay for the functional classifi cation of BRCA1 sequence variants of uncertain signifi cance. Cancer Discov; 3(10); 1142–55. ©2013 AACR.  Authors’ Affi liations: 1 Division of Molecular Pathology and Cancer Genomics Centre and 2 Department of Pathology, The Netherlands Cancer Institute Amsterdam, The Netherlands; and 3 TaconicArtemis GmbH, Cologne, Germany  Note: Supplementary data for this article are available at Cancer Discovery Online (http://cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org/).  Current address for C. Klijn: Genentech Inc., South San Francisco, California.  Corresponding Author: Jos Jonkers, The Netherlands Cancer Institute, Plesmanlaan 121, Amsterdam, 1066 CX, The Netherlands. Phone: 31-20- 5122000; Fax: 31-20-5122050; E-mail: j.jonkers@nki.nl doi: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094 ©2013 American Association for Cancer Research.  INTRODUCTION  Germline loss-of-function mutations in BRCA1 and BRCA2 are known to result in an approximately tenfold increased lifetime risk of developing breast or ovarian cancer. Thus far, no other genes have been identifi ed with such a strong link to hereditary breast and ovarian cancer (HBOC), and in the past decades, many women have been screened for germline mutations in BRCA1 or BRCA2 . This has resulted in the identifi cation of numerous pathogenic mutations as well as a large number of sequence variants for which the clinical relevance is not clear. In the most recent publication of the ENIGMA (Evidence-based Network for the Interpretation of Germline Mutant Alleles) group, an international consortium for the evaluation of BRCA1 or BRCA2 sequence variants, a total of 1,273 unique BRCA1 variants is mentioned ( 1 ), but this number may increase even further because of the implementation of high-throughput sequencing methods. Of the BRCA1 variants of uncertain signifi cance (VUS), 920 are nontruncating exonic mutations that may affect protein function or mRNA splicing, but for which there is not enough linkage information to indicate whether they are pathogenic. To aid genetic counseling of individuals with BRCA1/2 VUS, both genetic and functional classifi cation methods have been developed. Genetic analysis of BRCA1 or BRCA2 VUSs relies on cosegregation with disease, cooccurrence with known pathogenic mutations, and family history of cancer. These data have been integrated into computational models to calculate the likelihood that a VUS is disease-causing ( 2 ). Additional in silico analysis of the evolutionary conservation of the amino acids affected by the mutation and the predicted impact of the mutant amino acids on protein folding are also implemented in such models. Functional assays do not rely on preexisting data, but directly test the effect of BRCA1/2 VUSs on known functions of the encoded proteins ( 3 ). Although this may seem relatively straightforward, it can be diffi cult to extrapolate data from functional assays into cancer risks for patients. For instance, in most assays only part of the BRCA1 protein is analyzed. In addition, some of the more elegant assays are technically demanding and not suitable to analyze large numbers of mutations. We reasoned that a good functional assay should fulfi ll three basic requirements: (i) it should investigate the biologic effects of a BRCA1 VUS in the context of the full-length protein; (ii) it should be conducted under normal physiologic conditions in a noncancerous cell type; and (iii) it should be based on a highly standardized and reproducible protocol.  These considerations led us to develop a functional assay based on physiologic expression of full-length human BRCA1 cDNA in mouse embryonic stem cells that are genetically engineered to allow conditional deletion of endogenous Brca1 . Mutant BRCA1 cDNAs are generated using site-directed mutagenesis (SDM) and introduced in a defi ned genomic locus of mouse embryonic stem cells by recombinase-mediated cassette exchange (RMCE). In this way, we have analyzed 86 BRCA1 variants for their effects on cell proliferation and drug sensitivity, including 74 clinically relevant VUSs.  RESULTS  Generation of Mouse Embryonic Stem Cells Expressing BRCA1 Sequence Variants  Although BRCA1-defi cient tumor cells proliferate rapidly in situ , loss of BRCA1 in normal cells leads to a severe proliferation defect ( 4 ). We decided to make use of this phenotype for the functional analysis of BRCA1 variants in Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1144 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. Brca1 -selectable conditional knockout (SCo) mouse embryonic stem cells ( 5 ). These cells carry one Brca1 -null allele and a selectable conditional Brca1SCo allele, which contains, in addition to loxP sites around exons 5–6, a split puromycin resistance marker that is activated upon Cre-mediated deletion of exons 5–6. They also contain a CreERT2 allele in the Rosa26 locus, which allows for controlled activation of Cre via administration of 4-hydroxy tamoxifen (4-OHT). Thus, BRCA1-defi cient embryonic stem cells can be easily obtained via 4-OHT–induced inactivation of the Brca1SCo allele and subsequent selection for puromycin resistance ( Fig.  1 ; ref.  5 ). To allow effi cient integration of human BRCA1 variants in one specifi c genomic locus, we supplied the other Rosa26 allele with F3 and Frt recombination sites for RMCE by the site-specifi c recombinase Flp ( Fig.  1 and Supplementary Fig. S1; ref. 6 ). Cells that have undergone successful RMCE can be selected because they express a truncated neomycin selection marker under control of the endogenous Rosa26 promoter, which further increases targeting effi ciency. Flpmediated recombination ensures single-copy integration of BRCA1 expression constructs at the same Rosa26 locus, thus avoiding position-effect variegation and copy number– dependent differences in expression.  RMCE vectors were equipped with a human BRCA1 cDNA expression construct, which was modifi ed using SDM to introduce defi ned mutations in BRCA1 . The focus of our analysis was on Dutch and Belgian VUSs that were found in families with HBOC. We also included a number of variants  Figure 1.   Schematic overview of the RMCE procedure in R26 CreERT2/RMCE ; Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells. Before the introduction of a human BRCA1 cDNA, R26 CreERT2/RMCE ; Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells are mouse BRCA1-profi cient and sensitive to both neomycin and puromycin. Targeting of singlecopy human BRCA1 cDNA variants to the Rosa26 locus by Flp RMCE results in expression of human BRCA1 and neomycin resistance. Addition of 4-OHT leads to CreERT2-mediated deletion of mouse Brca1 exons 5 and 6, resulting in loss of mouse BRCA1 protein and concomitant expression of puromycin from the phosphoglycerate kinase (PGK) promoter. This enables selection of mouse BRCA1-defi cient, human BRCA1-expressing R26 CreERT2/hBRCA1 ; Brca1Δ/Δ embryonic stem cells that can be used in functional complementation assays. R26 CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1SCo/Δ R26CreERT2/hBRCA1;Brca1SCo/Δ R26CreERT2/hBRCA1;Brca1Δ/Δ 3 5–6 3 5–6 7–8 3 3 14 7–8 7–8 3 7–8 5–6 Introduction of human BRCA1 by RMCE 3 14 SA SA Brca1SCo5–6 Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26RMCE Brca1Δ5–6 Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26hBRCA1 Brca1SCo5–6 Brca1SCo5–6 Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26RMCE Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26hBRCA1 3 14 CreERT2 CreERT2 CreERT2 CreERT2 Puro Puro Puro PGK PGK PGK Puro PGK zsgreen Hyg FLP zsgreen Hyg FLP SA SA NeoR Selection hBRCA1–, mBrca1+, neoS, puroS hBRCA1+, mBrca1+, neoR, puroS hBRCA1+, mBrca1–, neoR, puroR pA hBRCA1 hBRCA1 EF1α EF1α Δ5′ neo Δ5′ neo Δ5′ neo EF1α hBRCA1 Cre-mediated deletion of mouse Brca1 by 4-OHT addition 3 14 PuroR Selection SA SA SA SA Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1145 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE that were previously classifi ed using functional assays ( 7, 8 ) or a multifactorial likelihood model ( 9 ), as well as M1400V, L1407P, and M1411T, which have been reported to attenuate the interaction between BRCA1 and PALB2 ( 10 ). To allow validation of our functional complementation assay, we included a series of eight BRCA1 variants that are known to be deleterious or neutral according to the Breast Cancer Information Core database (BIC; http://research.nhgri .nih.gov/bic/ ; Supplementary Table S1). These controls include the well-known pathogenic BRCA1 founder mutations 185delAG and 5382insC and the neutral polymorphisms Y105C, R866C, and E1250K. The BIC designation is supported by the classifi cation according to the International Agency for Research on Cancer ( http://iarc.fr/ ), which includes the Align-GVGD score that indicates biophysical and evolutionary alterations ( http://agvgd.iarc.fr/ ; Supplementary Table S1; refs. 11, 12 ). Align-GVGD scores vary between C0 (likely neutral) and C65 (likely deleterious). Sequence-verifi ed constructs that contained the intended VUS, but no other BRCA1 mutations, were transfected into R26 CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells to undergo RMCE ( Fig.  2 ). Neomycin-resistant clones were pooled and RMCE was confi rmed by PCR analysis. Subsequently, protein expression of the human BRCA1 variants was analyzed by Western blot analysis with a human BRCA1-specifi c antibody ( Fig. 2 and Supplementary Fig. S2). Comparison with BRCA1 protein levels in embryonic stem cells expressing human BRCA1 from a bacterial artifi cial chromosome (BAC), which is known to rescue embryonic lethality of Brca1 -null mice ( 7 ,  13 ), showed that transcription of the human BRCA1 cDNA from the EF1A gene promoter results in physiologic levels of BRCA1 protein (Supplementary Fig.  S1). Most BRCA1 variants were expressed at equal levels, allowing comparison of their functional activities. A number of C-terminal BRCA1 mutants showed low levels of expression (Supplementary Table S2; Supplementary Fig. S2). Real-time RT-PCR analysis showed that decreased protein expression was not caused by decreased mRNA expression (Supplementary Fig.  S3), suggesting that the low abundance of BRCA1 protein results from posttranslational events. In fact, for most of these variants, mutation-associated protein instability has already been documented in previous publications (refs. 8 , 14 , 15 ; Supplementary Table S2).  Functional Complementation Assay of BRCA1 Sequence Variants in Mouse Brca1 -Null Embryonic Stem Cells  As a fi rst functional test, we assayed the ability of BRCA1 variants to restore the proliferation defect of switched R26 CreERT2/RMCE ;Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells ( Fig.  2 ). Expression of endogenous mouse Brca1 was shut off through overnight induction of Cre activity by 4-OHT, and 7 days  Figure 2.   Workfl ow for the functional classifi cation of BRCA1 sequence variants in Brca1 -null embryonic stem (ES) cells. Outline of the generation of mouse Brca1 -defi cient embryonic stem cells expressing human BRCA1 variants and functional complementation assays. Indicated are the experimental steps and the time it takes one person to analyze 20 mutants. Introduction of BRCA1 variants in R26CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1SCo/D ES cells BRCA1 Construct + G418 Selection of clones with correct RMCE BRCA1 Expression analysis SDM and sequencing RMCE in ES cells x + 4-OHT + Puromycin Functional assays Functional assays Cre-Mediated deletion of Brca1SCo allele Proliferation and cisplatin sensitivity assays Selection of Brca1ΔSCo/Δ ES cells Timecourse for the analysis of 20 BRCA1 variants Weeks 0 1 2 7 3 8 4 5 6 SDM and RMCE Functional assays Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1146 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. after switching, cells were plated in 96-well plates for proliferation assays, and were analyzed using Sulphorhodamine B staining. For each group of mutants tested, we included positive and negative controls consisting of embryonic stem cells containing, respectively, wild-type human BRCA1 cDNA and an empty RMCE vector. BRCA1 variants were evaluated on their ability to support growth compared with these controls (Supplementary Tables S3 and S4). Although we tested 28 mutations in the central domain encoded by exon 11 (aa 224–1366), BRCA1 variants that were unable to rescue the proliferation defect of Brca1 -null mouse embryonic stem cells to BRCA1 wild-type levels were confi ned to the conserved N- and C-terminal domains of BRCA1.  Cisplatin Sensitivity Assay for Classifi cation of BRCA1 Variants  Although the ability of BRCA1 variants to support proliferation appears to be indicative of VUS function, results were not always clear-cut (Supplementary Tables S3 and S4). BRCA1 is known to be important for DNA interstrand crosslink (ICL) repair through mechanisms that are both dependent ( 5 ) and independent ( 16 ) of its function in homologous recombination (HR). The role of BRCA1 in ICL repair is stressed by the occurrence of genetic reversion mutations restoring BRCA1 protein expression in platinum-resistant ovarian tumors in BRCA1 -mutation carriers ( 17, 18 ). We therefore decided to conduct a 96-well–based cisplatin sensitivity assay to allow a more stringent evaluation of BRCA1 VUS functionality.  Half-maximal inhibitory concentrations (IC 50 ) of cisplatin were determined using a resazurin cell viability assay, and BRCA1 variants were again classifi ed in comparison to wildtype BRCA1 and an empty RMCE vector. To obtain corrected cisplatin IC 50 values, we fi tted a log-logistic curve constrained at 1 and 0. We excluded a fi t if the residual squared error (RSE) exceeded 0.1. We then applied a Bayesian predictor to classify BRCA1 VUS as pathogenic or benign. Most variants that showed less than wild-type activity in the proliferation assay also scored as functionally impaired in the cisplatin sensitivity assay and were classifi ed as deleterious ( Table 1 ,  Table 1.   Functional classifi cation of BRCA1 VUS based on cisplatin response Variant DNA change Type of mutation a Classifi cation S4F c.11C>T VUS Not Clear M18T c.53T>C VUS Deleterious 185delAG c.68_69delAG Deleterious control Deleterious b K45Q c.133A>C VUS Neutral C61G c.181T>G Deleterious control Deleterious C64G c.190T>G VUS Deleterious b D67Y c.199G>T VUS Neutral Y105C c.314A>G Neutral control Neutral N132K c.396C>A VUS Neutral P142H c.425C>A VUS Neutral L147F c.441G>C VUS Neutral L165P c.494T>C VUS Neutral R170W c.508C>T VUS Neutral S186Y c.557C>A VUS Neutral V191I c.571G>A VUS Neutral T231M c.692C>T VUS Neutral D245V c.734A>T VUS Neutral L246V c.736T>G VUS Neutral V271L c.811G>C VUS Neutral S308A c.922A>G; c.923G>C Artifi cial h Not Clear L358R; C360R; E362H c.1073T>G; c.1078T>C; c.1084G>C; c.1086G>T Artifi cial Neutral L668F c.2002C>T VUS Neutral D695N c.2083G>A VUS Neutral P798L c.2393C>T VUS Neutral N810Y c.2428A>T VUS Neutral T826K c.2477C>A VUS Neutral (continued) Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1147 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE (continued) Variant DNA change Type of mutation a Classifi cation R841Q c.2522G>A VUS Neutral Y856H c.2566T>C VUS Neutral R866C c.2596C>T Neutral control Neutral S988A c.2962T>G Artifi cial Neutral M1008I c.3024G>A VUS Neutral E1060A c.3179A>C VUS Neutral S1101N c.3302G>A VUS Neutral K1110del c.3328_3330delAAG VUS Neutral S1140G c.3418A>G VUS Neutral E1214K c.3640G>A VUS Neutral N1236K c.3708T>G VUS Neutral E1250K c.3748G>A Neutral control Neutral L1267S c.3800T>C VUS Neutral E1282V c.3845A>T VUS Neutral S1297del c.3891_3893delTTC VUS Neutral S1301R c.3903T>A VUS Neutral E1346K c.4036G>A VUS Neutral V1378I c.4132G>A VUS Neutral M1400V c.4198A>G VUS Neutral L1407P c.4220T>C VUS Neutral b M1411T c.4232T>C VUS Neutral R1443G c.4327C>G VUS Neutral S1448G c.4342A>G VUS Neutral S1486C c.4456A>T VUS Neutral S1497A c.4489T>G Artifi cial Neutral V1534M c.4600G>A VUS Neutral R1589P c.4766G>C VUS Neutral M1628T c.4883T>C VUS Neutral S1651P c.4951T>C VUS Not Clear S1651F c.4952C>T VUS Not Clear M1652I c.4956G>A VUS Neutral S1655F c.4964C>T VUS Deleterious b H1686R c.5057A>G VUS Deleterious H1686Q c.5058T>A VUS Deleterious V1688del c.5062_5064delGTT VUS Deleterious T1691I c.5072C>T VUS Not clear R1699W c.5095C>T Deleterious control Deleterious b R1699Q c.5096G>A VUS Deleterious b G1706E c.5117G>A VUS Deleterious b G1706A c.5117G>C VUS Neutral A1708E c.5123C>A Deleterious control Deleterious W1718C c.5154G>T VUS Deleterious T1720A c.5158A>G VUS Neutral E1735K c.5203G>A VUS Not clear  Table 1.   Functional classifi cation of BRCA1 VUS based on cisplatin response (Continued) Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1148 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al.  Fig. 3 ). Variants showing increased cisplatin sensitivity were tested at least twice before they were classifi ed. The positive and negative controls classifi ed as expected, although the known pathogenic truncation mutation 5382insC scored as neutral in one of three assays, stressing the need for repeat experiments. Also BRCA1 variants that were previously tested in other assays conducted as expected. It should be noted that the artifi cial variants S308A and S1497A rescued proliferation and cisplatin responses of mouse Brca1 - defi cient embryonic stem cells in BAC complementation assays, but are predicted to be deleterious based on their effects on embryonic stem cell differentiation and their response to γ-irradiation, respectively ( 7 ). The V1804D mutation scored as a neutral variant in our assay, which is in line with most published data ( 8, 9 ), except for the results of an embryonic stem cell–based BAC complementation assay ( 7 ). Again, all BRCA1 mutations that were classifi ed as deleterious were confi ned to regions encoding the conserved N- and C-terminal domains ( Fig.  4 ), despite the observation that deletion of the central region encoded by exon 11 leads to genetic instability in mice ( 12 ). Remarkably, the three mutations that diminish the interaction between BRCA1 and PALB2 ( 10 ), just C-terminal of the region encoded by exon 11, had no effect on cisplatin sensitivity in this assay. Of note, there was in general good correlation between our classifi cation and the Align-GVGD score (Supplementary Table S4). Notable exceptions were the neutral control variant R866C, which validated our assay but scored as likely deleterious (C65) using Align-GVGD, and G1770V, which scored as likely neutral (C0) by Align-GVGD but was classi- fi ed as deleterious in our assay. Our assay also classifi ed some variants for which the Align-GVGD scores were less clear, emphasizing the usefulness of functional assays to complement in silico analysis.  We also analyzed the possible effects of all BRCA1 variants on mRNA splicing, which may have deleterious consequences but cannot be assessed in our cDNA-based assay. The predictive value for exonic variants outside the consensus splice sites is questionable ( 19, 20 ), but four missense mutations were present in existing splice sites (Supplementary Table S4). Although c.5154G>T (encoding W1718C) was deleterious, three of these variants were classifi ed as neutral in our assay. One of them, c.441G>C (encoding L147F), had an increased probability to damage the splice donor site of exon 7. Another variant, c.5072C>T (encoding T1691I), might also affect splicing, but no defect was measured in blood samples of mutation carriers ( 19 ). The third exonic splice site mutation that was classifi ed as neutral in our cisplatin sensitivity assay, c.133A>C (K45Q), is not predicted to lead to aberrant splicing.  Results from Proliferation and Cisplatin Sensitivity Assays Correlate with HR Activity of BRCA1 Variants  BRCA1 and BRCA2 are involved in DNA repair via HR ( 12 , 21 ). Together with non-homologous end joining (NHEJ), HR forms the cellular defense against DNA double-strand breaks (DSB), a severe type of DNA damage that is lethal if unrepaired. Although HR is essentially error-free, NHEJ is error-prone, and therefore defects in HR are known to lead to genomic instability. Although it is not clear whether other Variant DNA change Type of mutation a Classifi cation V1736A c.5207T>C VUS Not clear b D1739G c.5216A>G VUS Deleterious D1739V c.5216A>T VUS Deleterious H1746Q c.5238C>G VUS Not clear R1753T c.5258G>C VUS Not clear b 5382insC c.5266dupC Deleterious control Not clear b L1764P c.5291T>C VUS Deleterious b C1767S c.5300G>C VUS Neutral G1770V c.5309G>T VUS Deleterious b W1782C c.5346G>T VUS Neutral A1789T c.5365G>A VUS Deleterious E1794D c.5382G>C VUS Neutral V1804D c.5411T>A VUS Neutral P1812R c.5435C>G VUS Neutral W1837R c.5509T>C VUS Deleterious H1862L c.5585A>T VUS Neutral a Type of mutation indicates if a variant is a VUS according to the BIC database (http://research.nhgri.nih.gov/bic/). b Functionally impaired in the DR-GFP and/or combined PARP inhibitor/cisplatin sensitivity assay.  Table 1.   Functional classifi cation of BRCA1 VUS based on cisplatin response (Continued) Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1149 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE  Figure 3.   Waterfall chart of cisplatin IC 50 values normalized for wild-type human BRCA1 and empty RMCE vector controls. Corrected cisplatin IC 50 values for all tested human BRCA1 variants and controls, including repeat experiments. BRCA1 variants are classifi ed as functionally impaired or neutral when the corrected IC 50 values are similar to either the empty RMCE vector or the wild-type human BRCA1 controls ( P < 0.05). 4.0 –3.0 –2.0 –1.0 0.0 1.0 2.0 3.0 Corrected cisplatin IC50 (a.u.) Mutant hBRCA1 Wild-type hBRCA1 Empty RMCE vector Positive control Negative control  Figure 4.   Predicted pathogenic BRCA1 amino acid substitutions are confi ned to the evolutionarily conserved N- and C-terminal domains. Schematic representation of the BRCA1 protein with the positions of variants classifi ed as neutral (green) or deleterious (red) indicated. Positive and negative controls are depicted by open pinheads and the known deleterious truncation mutations 185delAG (N-terminal) and 5382insC (C-terminal) are marked in blue. The amino acid sequences of the evolutionarily conserved RING (N-terminal) and BRCT (C-terminal) domains are specifi ed to show the exact positions of deleterious (red) and neutral (green) variants. The amino acid substitutions or nonsense (X) mutations of positive and negative controls are encircled. RING domain BRCT domains Deleterious VUS Neutral VUS Deleterious truncation mutant Deleterious control variant Neutral control variant 1646 1706 1766 91 109 1826 1863 61 31 1 MDLSALRVEEVQNVINAMQKILECPICLEL VNKRMSMVVSGLTPEEFMLVYKFARKHHITLTNLITEETTHVVMKTDAEFVCERTLKYFL IKEPVSTKCDHIFCKFCMLKLLNQKKGPSQ GIAGGKWVVSYFWVTQSIKERKMLNEHDFEVRGDVVNGRNHQGPKRARESQDRKIFRGLE CPLCKNDITKRSLQESTRFSQLVEELLKII CAFQLDTGLEYANSYNFAK ICCYGPFTNMPTDQLEWMVQLCGASVVKELSSFTLGTGVHPIVVVQPDAWTEDNGFHAIG QMCEAPVVTREWVLDSVALYQCQELDTYLIPQIPHSHY T Q E C A X Y C GG F R - Q W Q I E A V R L S C D DR T V P G X Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1150 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. functions of BRCA1 are also important for tumor suppression ( 16 , 22 , 23–26 ), its role in HR is likely to be relevant. Therefore, we used the direct repeat (DR)-GFP assay ( 27 ) to measure the effects on HR for a subset of our BRCA1 VUSs. A number of predicted pathogenic variants and controls were shuttled into R26 CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1 SCo/Δ ;Pim1 DR-GFP/wt embryonic stem cells carrying the DR-GFP reporter in the Pim1 locus. Expression of endogenous mouse Brca1 was switched off, and cells were transfected with a plasmid encoding the I-SceI meganuclease as well as an mCherry fl uorescent marker to control for transfection effi ciency. Repair of I-SceI–induced DNA DSBs in DR-GFP via HR leads to expression of GFP, which can be monitored by fl ow cytometry. All but one of the predicted pathogenic variants tested resulted in defective HR, thereby confi rming our functional classifi cation ( Fig. 5 ). The only predicted deleterious variant that did not signifi cantly differ from wild-type BRCA1 , R1699Q, seemed to support intermediate levels of HR activity.  PARP Inhibitor Sensitivity Assay for Classifi cation of BRCA1 Variants with Intermediate Activity  Deleterious effects of variants with intermediate or partial activity may escape detection in certain functional assays. Although cisplatin sensitivity assays allow robust and  Figure 5.  BRCA1 sequence variants classifi ed as pathogenic do not restore HR. R26 CreERT2/hBRCA1; Brca1 SCo/Δ;Pim1 DR-GFP/wt embryonic stem cells carrying the DR-GFP reporter gene in the Pim1 locus and mutant BRCA1 or controls in the Rosa26 locus were switched using 4-OHT and transfected with a vector expressing I-SceI and mCherry. Transfected cells were analyzed for GFP expression as a measure of HR activity. Expression of BRCA1 wild-type (WT) cDNA resulted in increased HR compared to the empty RMCE vector (Vector) control. Error bars indicate the SD between the results of three independent I-SceI transfections. Signifi cantly decreased HR activity compared with the wild-type control (green line) is indicated. GFP-Positive cells (%) 0.0 0.5 1.0 1.5 2.0 2.5 3.0 3.5 4.0 4.5 ** ns ** * * ns * * * * * * * ns ns WT Vector 185delAG C64G V271L S1651F S1655F R1699Q R1699W G1706A G1706E V1736A R1753T 5382insC L1764P G1770V reproducible classifi cation of several functionally impaired BRCA1 variants, assays using other compounds may have additional value. It is known that BRCA1- and BRCA2- defi cient cells are extremely sensitive to PARP1 inhibition ( 28, 29 ), leading to a larger dynamic range between BRCA2- defi cient cells and isogenic BRCA2-profi cient controls than for cisplatin ( 30 ). We therefore tested complementation of PARP inhibitor sensitivity for a number of BRCA1 mutants and the BRCA1 wild-type control. Given the unexpected neutral effects of the M1400V, L1407P, and M1411T mutations in the PALB2 interaction domain, we decided to include these variants in this series, as well as the R1699Q and V1736A variants that have recently been shown to confer (intermediate) breast and ovarian cancer risk ( 31, 32 ). To allow direct comparison of results from different assays, we repeated the cisplatin sensitivity and proliferation assays in parallel to the olaparib sensitivity assay. Our results indicate that BRCA1 wild-type and empty vector controls indeed show a larger difference in sensitivity for olaparib than for cisplatin ( Fig.  6 ). However, this increase in dynamic range is accompanied by an increased variation between repeat experiments for BRCA1-profi cient samples. Nevertheless, the functional defect of the R1699Q and V1736A mutations becomes more evident, and there also Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1151 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE  Figure 6.   PARP inhibitor sensitivity assay of BRCA1 sequence variants. R26 CreERT2/hBRCA1 ;Brca1 SCo/Δ or R26CreERT2/RMCE; Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells carrying mutant BRCA1 , BRCA1 wild-type (WT), or empty RMCE vector (Vector) controls in the Rosa26 locus were switched using 4-OHT and assayed for sensitivity to cisplatin or the PARP inhibitor olaparib. The cytotoxicity assays were conducted in parallel and data were normalized to the average of the wild-type controls. Error bars indicate the SD between the results of biologic triplicates for which the cells were independently switched. Signifi cant deviation from the average IC 50 values of the wild-type control (green line) is indicated. IC50 Relative to WT controls (%) 0 20 40 60 80 100 120 140 160 Cisplatin Olaparib * **** **** * * ** *** **** ns ns ns ns WT Vector M1400V L1407P M1411T R1699Q V1736A seems to be a less than wild-type response for the PALB2 interaction mutant L1407P. In the concurrent proliferation analysis, R1699Q and V1736A both show an intermediate functional defect (Supplementary Fig.  S4). Also the M1411T mutation seems to affect the response to PARP inhibition, but the difference with BRCA1 wild-type is not signifi cant. Interestingly, the L1407P and M1411T variants have previously been shown to be more defective than M1400V in a gene conversion assay ( 10 ). It should also be noted that, in contrast with the large-scale classifi cation experiments, the cisplatin sensitivity assay conducted in parallel to the PARP inhibitor assay identifi ed signifi cant functional defects for L1407P and V1736A.  DISCUSSION  Over the past few years several functional assays for classifi cation of BRCA1 VUSs have been developed. Several of these assays are restricted to functions of the BRCA1 protein that reside in the evolutionarily conserved RING or BRCT domains. Examples include in vitro transactivation assays for BRCT peptides ( 8 ) and measurement of ubiquitin ligase activity for protein fragments encompassing the N-terminal RING domain ( 33 ). Other assays were designed to evaluate the functions of full-length mutant BRCA1 protein, either by monitoring general effects on proliferation or response to DNA damage ( 7 ), or by directly focusing on the role of BRCA1 in DNA repair via HR ( 34 ).  Because BRCA1 VUSs are not restricted to regions encoding the N- or C-terminal domains, and given the observation that interaction between these domains is required for recruitment of BRCA1 to damaged DNA ( 35 ), functional assays for the full-length protein would be ideal. In principle, such assays can be conducted in cell lines derived from BRCA1 - mutated tumors, but there are indications that the outcome of assays for BRCA1 function depends on the cellular context. As absence of BRCA1 leads to loss of cellular viability, it is thought that additional mutations are required for BRCA1- associated tumorigenesis. For example, loss of p53 alleviates the consequences of BRCA1 defi ciency both in vitro and in vivo ( 4 ) and is common in BRCA1-defi cient tumors ( 36, 37 ). Also, depletion of 53BP1 is known to suppress the defects caused by BRCA1 defi ciency ( 5 , 38 , 39 ). Therefore, aberrations in BRCA1-defi cient tumor cells may mask functional defects of BRCA1 VUSs. We reasoned that assays in normal cells that can be depleted from endogenous BRCA1 expression are most likely to reveal functional defects of BRCA1 VUSs. The usefulness of this approach has been previously shown by Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1152 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. BAC complementation assays in mouse embryonic stem cells ( 7 , 40 ). However, mutagenesis of large BAC clones by recombineering and functional complementation of cells with these mutant constructs is time-consuming and technically demanding, and therefore cannot be conducted in a high-throughput setting. We therefore set out to develop a cDNA-based functional complementation assay in mouse embryonic stem cells that is easier to control and scale up and more suitable for routine functional classifi cation of BRCA1 sequence variants.  One advantage of BAC transgenics in complementation assays is that genes are expressed at physiologically relevant levels. This is the result of low copy-number integrations and the presence of natural regulatory elements required for proper gene expression. We decided to use RMCE to allow single-copy integration of BRCA1 cDNAs at one specifi c genomic locus. The use of RMCE effectively prevents multiple or partial integrations, concatemers, and position-effect variegation. As a result, all variants are expressed at equal levels. Moreover, transcription of BRCA1 cDNAs from the EF1A gene promoter results in physiologic levels of BRCA1 protein, comparable with those observed in embryonic stem cells stably transfected with a BAC containing the human BRCA1 locus. Indeed, the wild-type human BRCA1 cDNA was able to complement Brca1 -null embryonic stem cells in cellular proliferation, drug sensitivity, and HR assays. Our RMCE strategy uses BRCA1 cDNA constructs in which mutations can be swiftly introduced using SDM, enabling a higher throughput than introduction of mutations via BAC recombineering. In addition, the introduction of BRCA1 cDNAs via RMCE obviates the need to analyze multiple embryonic stem cell clones for correct integration and expression.  As a proof of principle, we used our functional complementation assay to analyze exonic BRCA1 VUSs that were identifi ed in families with HBOC in the Netherlands and Belgium, as well as a set of previously analyzed BRCA1 variants. A number of mutations resulted in reduced BRCA1 protein levels, most likely because of structural destabilization. In all cases, this led to diminished capacity for functional complementation. Also, several variants that gave rise to normal BRCA1 protein levels were unable to rescue the proliferation defect and cisplatin sensitivity of Brca1 -null embryonic stem cells. As BRCA1 loss of function mutations are associated with increased cancer risk, variants that score as functionally impaired in our embryonic stem cell assay system may be causally involved in tumor formation. This notion is supported by the fact that seven of eight known pathogenic or neutral control variants in our validation series were correctly classifi ed by the cisplatin sensitivity assay. The pathogenic 5382insC truncation mutation could not be classifi ed because it scored as neutral in one of three transfection series. This was probably due to technical reasons, as the 5382insC mutation did not restore HR activity in Brca1 -defi cient embryonic stem cells, in contrast with R1699Q, which was recently shown to confer intermediate risk of HBOC ( 32 ).  Our assay system yielded ambivalent results for nine other variants: S4F, S308A, S1651P, S1651F, T1691I, V1736A, E1735K, H1746Q, and R1753T. T1691I and E1735K were classifi ed as functionally impaired in only one cisplatin sensitivity test, whereas values from repeat experiments could not be taken into account because of RSE values above 0.1. S4F, S1651P, S1651F, V1736A, H1746Q, and R1753T were differently classifi ed in repeat experiments, which may refl ect technical fl aws or intermediate activity of these variants. Of note, the V1736A mutation was recently identifi ed as a pathogenic variant with hypomorphic activity in DNA repair ( 31 ). Although we did not measure signifi cant HR activity of V1736A in a DR-GFP gene conversion assay, intermediate activity of this variant is supported by the results of the proliferation assays and additional cisplatin sensitivity assays. S1651F showed HR activity similar to wild-type BRCA1 , whereas R1753T was HR-defi cient. S308A is an artifi cial mutation of a BRCA1 phosphorylation site that was able to support proliferation and resistance to DNA damage in an embryonic stem cell-based BAC complementation assay. However, S308A-complemented embryonic stem cells did show increased apoptosis when cultured in embryoid bodies ( 7 ), indicating a partial defect that might explain the ambivalent results for this mutation in our assays.  Our results show that BRCA1 variants should ideally be assayed in triplicate to avoid misclassifi cation. This also applies to BRCA1 VUS that we classifi ed as neutral, most of which were tested only once because in our current study we focused on variants that showed functional impairment. The striking restriction of unambiguously predicted pathogenic mutants to the terminal RING and BRCT domains suggests that some plasticity is allowed for the central domain of BRCA1. However, our dataset is still limited and more experiments are required to gain insight into the function of this domain.  Our cDNA-based system allows for several additional functional assays that have been described previously for BAC transgenic embryonic stem cells ( 7 ). These include assays for defects during in vitro and in vivo embryonic stem cell differentiation but also treatments with other cytotoxic agents. As a proof of principle, we investigated the activity of a number of mutants in the response to the PARP inhibitor olaparib. These included M1400V, L1407, and M1411T, which were previously shown to impair PALB2 binding and have a negative effect on BRCA1 function ( 10 ). Although the differences in sensitivity of BRCA1-defi cient versus BRCA1-profi cient embryonic stem cells are larger for olaparib than for cisplatin, increased variation between repeat experiments allowed us to identify functional defects only for L1407 and not for the other two variants in the PALB2 interaction domain, M1400V and M1411T. However, the R1699Q and V1736A variants, which are known to have hypomorphic activity, clearly showed a defect in the response to olaparib. Interestingly, both mutations are in the BRCT domain, and it has recently been shown that mutation of this domain especially confers sensitivity to PARP inhibition ( 41 ). Together, our results show that PARP inhibitor sensitivity assays may have added value, especially for the classifi cation of BRCA1 VUSs with intermediate phenotypes.  Platinum drugs and PARP inhibitors are selectively toxic to BRCA1-defi cient cells because they target HR defi ciency. Although the role of BRCA1 in HR is thought to be essential for maintaining genomic integrity and preventing accumulation of (oncogenic) mutations, other activities may also contribute to its tumor suppression function. These activities Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1153 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE may include the HR-independent role for BRCA1 in ICL repair, which has been attributed to the facilitation of FANCD2 accumulation at cross-linked DNA ( 16 ). Nevertheless, we observed a good correlation between the results of the cisplatin sensitivity assay and the results of the DR-GFP HR assay. All BRCA1 variants that failed to restore the cisplatin response in Brca1 -null embryonic stem cells were also defective in catalyzing gene conversion, thereby confi rming our functional classifi cation. It will be interesting to see if this holds true for all BRCA1 variants or whether there are also pathogenic mutations that have no effect on HR.  As with any other in vitro approach, our functional complementation assay system might still fail to identify all pathogenic variants because it does not necessarily recapitulate all aspects of BRCA1 function in vivo . A limitation of our cDNA-based assay is also that it cannot be used to investigate effects on mRNA splicing. Although algorithms have been designed to predict possible splice defects, the consequences of mutations outside of the consensus splice sites especially require functional validation experiments. For this purpose, BAC complementation assays ( 7 ), minigene-based splicing assays, or BRCA1 transcript analysis of patient blood samples ( 19 ) may be instrumental. However, transacting factors also affect splicing, and these may be tissue specifi c ( 42 ). A possible solution would be to determine the presence of BRCA1 splice variants in tumor tissue from BRCA1 VUS carriers and use this information to generate a cDNA construct for analysis of the functional consequences. To evaluate BRCA1 VUSs, there remains a need for multifactorial models that combine results from functional assays and in silico analyses with genetic evidence and other information from mutation carriers. This also includes DNA copy number data from tumors from BRCA1 VUS carriers, as it is known that BRCA1- associated breast tumors show distinct genomic aberrations ( 43, 44 ). Our functional assay system does however provide a robust and easily implementable tool for the functional characterization of large numbers of BRCA1 VUSs within the context of the full-length protein. It is our hope that our assay system will fi nd its way to clinical genetics laboratories where it can be used to aid genetic counseling. Ideally, these tests should be coordinated on an international level and in close collaboration with the ENIGMA consortium.    Missense substitutions of uncertain clinical significance in the BRCA1 gene are a vexing problem in genetic counseling for women who have a family history of breast cancer. In this study, we evaluated the functions of 29 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in two DNA repair pathways. Repair of double-strand breaks by homology-directed recombination (HDR) had been previously analyzed for 16 of these BRCA1 variants, and 13 more variants were analyzed in this study. All 29 variants were also analyzed for function in double-strand break repair by the single-strand annealing (SSA) pathway. We found that among the pathogenic mutations in BRCA1, all were defective for DNA repair by either pathway. The HDR assay was accurate because all pathogenic mutants were defective for HDR, and all nonpathogenic variants were fully functional for HDR. Repair by SSA accurately identified pathogenic mutants, but several nonpathogenic variants were scored as defective or partially defective. These results indicated that specific amino acid residues of the BRCA1 protein have different effects in the two related DNA repair pathways, and these results validate the HDR assay as highly correlative with BRCA1-associated breast cancer.  Keywords: BRCA1, homologous recombination, single-strand annealing, centrosome, VUS Go to: Introduction Among the more than 70,000 women who had their BRCA1 gene (MIM# 113705) sequenced by 2006, approximately 2.3% were found to carry a BRCA1 variant of uncertain significance (VUS). These variants were classified as uncertain because they occurred in families wherein segregation analysis had not been done or in whom the segregation analysis was not informative and thus the VUS had unknown effects on breast and ovarian cancer risk [Hall et al., 2009; Spearman et al., 2008; Sweet et al., 2009]. As whole genome and exome sequencing becomes a more prevalent practice, more VUSs in BRCA1 will be uncovered, and increasingly women will face the quandary of an uninformative genetic test. This leads to individuals with a VUS test result making decisions about cancer screening and prevention without concrete information on which to base their decisions. Women who have an indeterminate BRCA1 sequence result and a family history of breast cancer have a high level of distress, and there are no consistent clinical guidelines for advising them [Dorval et al., 2005; Petrucelli et al., 2002; van Dijk et al., 2006]. Of the 567 BRCA1 missense substitutions listed in the current Breast Cancer Information Core (BIC) database, 14 are described as pathogenic (Class 5) and 27 as nonpathogenic (Class 1). By including the data from Collaborators for the Investigation of Modifiers of BRCA1/2 (CIMBA), a total of 24 BRCA1 variants are pathogenic (CIMBA database). Less than 10% of the missense substitutions in the BIC database have known cancer predisposition. In the absence of definitive genetic information on BRCA1 missense substitutions, other methods are needed to determine whether missense substitutions are pathogenic. Multifactorial approaches have augmented genetic segregation analysis with additional information about the proband and, in some cases, the tumor [Easton et al., 2007; Goldgar et al., 2004; Lindor et al., 2012; Plon et al., 2008; Spearman et al., 2008; Sweet et al., 2009]. These approaches have been successful in reclassification of variants but are also incomplete because they cannot definitively determine whether any given variant affects the critical cancer suppressing function(s) of the protein [Millot et al., 2012]. In contrast, a biological functional assay has the potential to determine whether any given BRCA1 missense substitution is defective in a process, and if that function is predictive of cancer predisposition (i.e., 100% sensitive and 100% specific), then the functional assay can, in theory, be used in genetic counseling.  A variety of biological assays have been analyzed for BRCA1 function and have been correlated with cancer predisposition to various extents [Carvalho et al., 2007; Cotta-Ramusino et al., 2011; Kais et al., 2012; Lee et al., 2010; Millot et al., 2012; Morris et al., 2006; Ransburgh et al., 2010; Vallee et al., 2012]. Several of these assays test single domains of BRCA1, and several address the variant within the context of the full-length protein. In this study, we analyzed the effects of 29 missense substitutions in BRCA1 on the repair of double-strand DNA breaks (DSBs) by homologous recombination and by the single-strand annealing (SSA) pathways. Our results indicate that the effects of specific missense mutations in these pathways strongly correlate with breast cancer predisposition. Further, we find that specific amino acid substitutions affect the two double-strand break repair pathways differentially.  Go to: Materials and Methods Plasmids and Cell Lines  All plasmids for the expression of human BRCA1 with missense substitutions were generated by site-directed mutagenesis from the wild-type sequence (GenBank: U14680.1). Several of these plasmids had been described in previous publications [Ransburgh et al., 2010; Wei et al., 2008]. The cell line for the homologous recombination assay, HeLa-DR, was based on the genomic integration of a specific vector that functions as a recombination substrate [Pierce et al., 2001]. The vector for homologous recombination had been the gift of M. Jasin (Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Institute, New York, NY). The HeLa-DR had been described before [Parvin et al., 2011; Ransburgh et al., 2010]. The repair of double-strand breaks by the SSA pathway was based on a vector kindly provided by J. Stark (City of Hope, Duarte, CA) [Bennardo et al., 2008; Stark et al., 2004] stably integrated into HeLa cells to make the HeLa–SSA cell line. The siRNA targeting the cellular BRCA1 3′ untranslated region (UTR) is the same as previously used [Ransburgh et al., 2010].  SSA Assay  HeLa–SSA cells were seeded in 15.6-mm-diameter wells in 24-well plates, and when cells were 50% confluent, cells were transfected with 5 pmol of the siRNA targeting the BRCA1 3′-UTR plus 0.3 μg of the BRCA1 expression plasmid in Lipofectamine 2000 reagent (Life Technologies, Grand Island, NY). At 24 hr after transfection, cells were transferred to 35-mm-diameter wells in six-well plates. At 48 hr, cells were transfected with 25 pmol of the BRCA1 3′-UTR-specific siRNA plus 0.75 μg BRCA1 expression plasmid plus 0.75 μg pCBASce (for the expression of I-SceI) in Lipofectamine 2000 reagent. After 3 days, cells are harvested by trypsinization, and the fraction of GFP-positive cells is determined using a FACScalibur flow cytometer (BD Biosciences, San Jose, CA) (Analytic Cytometry Shared Resource of The Ohio State University Comprehensive Cancer Center).  Western Blot Analysis of BRCA1 Protein  Immunoblots of the expressed BRCA1 protein were done as has been described previously [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Cells that had been transfected as in the SSA assay were, in parallel, extracted in 0.1% NP-40, 0.05 M Hepes (pH 7.5), and 0.005 M EDTA. Protein contents of extracts were determined using the Bradford reagent; and 50 μg of protein was electrophoresed on 3–8% Nu-PAGE gels (Life Technologies, Grand Island, NY) M. Jasin (Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Institute, NewYork, NY), transferred to polyvinylidene fluoride membranes, and immunoblotted using antibody specific to BRCA1(400–1,100). Densitometry analysis was performed from immunoblots using Kodak 1D software (Eastman Kodak Company, Rochester, NY).  Statistical Analysis of Results  The raw results in the SSA assay for the missense substitutions were compared with the control samples (either GL2 siRNA or BRCA1 siRNA with BRCA1-wt add back) using the unpaired Student’s t-test and obtained the one-tail P values; for intermediate-phenotype mutants, besides the above-mentioned comparisons, we also conducted the unpaired Student’s t-test against the control sample that contains BRCA1 siRNA with empty vector adding back, and obtained the one-tail P values. P values of less than 0.01 were considered significant.  Go to: Results Function of BRCA1 Variants in DNA Break Repair by Homologous Recombination  The BRCA1 protein has been shown to be a critical component of the response to DSBs. Cellular machinery can utilize homologous sequences to accurately repair the DSB, or the free ends can be joined by nonhomologous end joining. In addition to homologous recombination, the pathway of SSA exists by which the repair proteins resect DNA from the free ends of the DSB, and when short stretches of homologous sequence are exposed, then the DNA ends are rejoined [Stark et al., 2004]. The homologous recombination assay used in this study was based on a method developed by the Jasin laboratory in which a single integrated genomic locus contains two inactive GFP genes, and one of these contains the endonuclease cleavage site for the rare-cutting I-SceI enzyme [Pierce et al., 2001]. Upon expression of I-SceI in the cell, one inactive allele of GFP is cut, and if homologous recombination occurs using the second inactive GFP gene as the homology template, then the DNA repair results in gene conversion making the GFP gene become active (Fig. 1A). The SSA assay is based on an analogous strategy in which the GFP protein is not expressed because of intervening DNA sequence, with an I-SceI site at the 3′ end of the intervening DNA. Upon expression of the I-SceI endonuclease, the DSB is generated, and resection of the intervening sequence reveals homologous GFP sequences that are aligned and repaired [Stark et al., 2004] (Fig. 1B). These two processes depend on sequence homologies for the repair, but there are functional differences. The Rad51 and BRCA2 proteins are required for the homology-directed recombination (HDR) assay, but are not required for the SSA assay [Moynahan et al., 2001; Stark et al., 2004].  Figure 1 Figure 1 The double-strand DNA break (DSB) repair assay system. A: The HDR recombination substrate [Pierce et al. 2001] is diagrammed. The upstream GFP allele is defective because of the inclusion of an I-SceI site in its sequence. The downstream GFP allele is ... For each assay, we have established HeLa-derived cell lines with the published recombination substrate [Pierce et al., 2001; Stark et al., 2004] integrated in the genome at a single site. The HeLa-DR cell line assays HDR, and the HeLa–SSA cell line is used to assay SSA. The HDR and the SSA assays have a similar experimental design with a depletion of BRCA1 by transfection of a siRNA that is specific for the 3′-UTR of the BRCA1 mRNA. We cotransfect a BRCA1 expression plasmid that is not affected by the siRNA and which expresses the variant BRCA1 protein. After 2 days, we repeat the transfection and also transfect a plasmid that encodes the expression of the I-SceI endonuclease to generate the DSB in the presence of the variant BRCA1. After 3 days, we assay the cells for GFP expression by flow cytometry. The timeline of the experiment is shown in Figure 1C.  We have previously analyzed 16 variants of BRCA1 in a tissue-culture-cell-based assay for repair of DSBs via homologous recombination [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Using the HeLa-DR cell line developed by us, up to 20% of the cells convert to GFP positive. This high level of recombination enables the quantitative analysis of variants in BRCA1 in this process. The endogenous BRCA1 mRNA is depleted by siRNA targeting the 3′-UTR, and a BRCA1 variant that is resistant to the siRNA is simultaneously expressed from a plasmid [Parvin et al., 2011; Ransburgh, et al., 2010]. A quantitative measure of the function of the BRCA1 variant is determined from the percentage of cells that convert to GFP positive.  In this study, we first analyzed an additional 13 BRCA1 variants for function in HDR (Fig. 2). Twelve of the BRCA1 variants spanned amino acid residue 90 through 191 and were identified from the Breast Information Core (http://research.nhgri.nih.gov/bic/). These were expressed from the plasmid as full-length proteins. All 12 variants are listed in the BIC as having unknown phenotype with regard to predisposition to breast cancer. Several of these have been evaluated using a multifactorial classification system, and of these 12 variants, seven were nonpathogenic [Lindor et al., 2012]. These were chosen because the function of this domain was unknown and because many of these variants have been reported to be nonpathogenic. By testing the known nonpathogenic variants in this assay, we provide a specificity control for the functional test. The 13th variant tested is a known deleterious mutant in the carboxy terminus of the BRCA1 protein, M1775R. In these experiments, the percentage of cells that were GFP positive when transfected with the control siRNA and the control plasmid were set equal to 1%. All other results were normalized to this control, and all results were from three or more separate experiments. Depletion of BRCA1 and transfection with empty plasmid resulted in a value of 0.09 relative to the control (Fig. 2, lane 2). Thus, BRCA1 depletion has an over 10-fold effect reducing the level of homologous recombination. Depleting BRCA1 and transfecting a plasmid that expressed wild-type BRCA1 resulted in full restoration of homologous recombination (Fig. 2, lane 3). Among the variants with substitutions in residues from 90 to 191, all 12 functioned as wild type in the homologous recombination assay (Fig. 2, lanes 4–15) (P < 0.002 compared with depleted BRCA1). By contrast, the 13th tested missense substitution, a known pathogenic mutant BRCA1–M1775R, did not complement the depletion of BRCA1 in this assay (Fig. 2, lane 16) (Pv = 0.0014 compared with wild-type BRCA1).  Figure 2 Figure 2 Analysis of 13 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in the homology-directed repair assay. HeLa-DR cells were transfected with a siRNA that depleted the endogenous BRCA1 and with a plasmid that expressed the indicated BRCA1 variant. After generating a double-strand ... Function of 29 Variants of BRCA1 in the Repair of DNA Breaks by the SSA Pathway  The 16 BRCA1 variants that had previously been tested for function in homologous recombination [Ransburgh et al., 2010] and the 13 BRCA1 variants tested in this study (Fig. 2) were analyzed for function in SSA repair. The recombination substrate [Bennardo et al., 2008; Stark et al., 2004] was based on similar design as the homologous recombination substrate with the exception that restoration of GFP activity occurs when the two inactive GFP genes are repaired by SSA. HeLa cells were stably transfected with the SA–GFP construct, and a clone was selected that had no detectable background GFP signal. Upon transfection of the I-SceI-expressing plasmid, about 5–7% of cells became GFP positive, indicative of a functioning SSA pathway. Depletion of BRCA1 resulted in a decrease to about 1–2% GFP-positive cells (Fig. 3, lane 2), indicating a role for BRCA1 in the SSA repair pathway that had been previously observed [Stark et al., 2004]. Depletion of BRCA1 resulted in about 25% of the activity found in nondepleted cells. As had been observed with the homologous recombination assay, transfection of a plasmid expressing wild-type BRCA1 fully complemented the defect in SSA due to depletion of the endogenous BRCA1 (Fig. 3, lane 3). By contrast, depletion of endogenous BRCA1 and expression of a known pathogenic mutant of BRCA1, M1775R, was as defective in SSA as had been transfection of the empty vector (Fig. 3, lane 32). Similar to previous observations with the zinc-coordinating mutants of BRCA1, these residues were all required for SSA repair of double-strand breaks (Fig. 3, lanes: 6, 7, 10, 11, 13, 14, 16, and 17). As was found for the homologous recombination assay, the M18T variant and the T37R variant were defective for SSA repair. The L52F variant had reduced levels of SSA repair, approximately 69% of wild-type activity (Fig. 3, lane 15), although this value was not significantly different from wild type. The D67Y variant, a known nonpathogenic variant [Easton et al., 2007], was fully active in SSA repair (lane 18).  Figure 3 Figure 3 Analysis of 29 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in the SSA assay. HeLa–SSA cells were transfected as in Figure 2 with plasmids that express the 29 tested missense substitutions of BRCA1. Results of the fraction of cells that had converted to GFP ... Results diverged between the SSA and the homologous recombination assays for the variants in residues 90 through 191. The BRCA1–I90T variant functioned in the homologous recombination assay, but in the SSA assay, it was 47% as active as wild type (t-test for differing from wild-type P < 0.01; lane 20). The Y105C variant was statistically different from both wild-type BRCA1 and empty vector (indicated with both an asterisk and a cross; lane 21). This Y105C variant thus has intermediate phenotype, neither fully active nor fully defective. Similarly, the P142H, E143K, and the R170Q had intermediate phenotype (lanes 25, 26, and 28). The V191D variant was also defective for SSA repair (lane 31). Interestingly, the S153R and S186Y variants had diminished activity, but the change in activities was not statistically significant from the wild type. Thus, these variants were not scored as defective. Seven of the variants tested had assay-specific phenotypes, suggesting that how BRCA1 interacts with repair factors in the homologous recombination pathway is different from factors that BRCA1 binds in the SSA pathway.  When replacing the endogenous BRCA1 protein with a variant BRCA1, there is the concern that the expression levels be consistent with the levels of the endogenous in nondepleted cells. A defective phenotype could be masked by high levels of overexpression of the variant protein, or the phenotype of a functional protein might not be observed because of poor protein expression. The 16 variants with missense substitutions between residues 18 and 71 had been tested in HeLa-derived cells and the expression of each variant was similar to the endogenous in each case [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. For expression, we tested the missense substitutions between residues 90 and 191 and also residue 1775, and found that they all express approximately similarly as the endogenous BRCA1 (Fig. 4). Normalized results from densitometry analysis are presented beneath each lane. Protein from nontransfected cells and from control siRNA and empty vector transfected cells had similar amounts of BRCA1 protein (Fig. 4, lanes 1 and 2). Depletion of BRCA1 and add back with empty plasmid depleted the level of BRCA1 protein, which densitometry analysis indicated to be about 0.35 relative to the nontransfected cells (lane 3). All variants were detected at higher levels than the lysate from BRCA1-depleted cells. Some variants were expressed at higher levels than others, but at most 1.3-fold higher than the BRCA1 levels in nontransfected cells (compare, for example, lane 7 with lane 2). Because none of the BRCA1 variants were expressed at levels much higher than the endogenous BRCA1, in no case could the phenotype of a defective variant be masked by overexpression. The S186Y, V191D, and M1775R variants all had somewhat lower expression, but these lower levels of expression did not correlate with function in either homologous recombination or SSA repair. As an example, the S186Y variant was a low expresser (0.86 relative to control), but it was functional in both assays. We note that the M1775R mutant was expressed at lower levels (0.62 relative to endogenous BRCA1) than any other BRCA1 variant (lane 16). We interpret this level of expression to be similar to other variants and not an explanation for the defect in each double-strand break repair pathway. However, we cannot exclude the interpretation that the M1775R was defective in the DNA repair assays because there was lower BRCA1 expression of this isoform in our cells.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Analysis of the expression levels of 13 variants in HeLa–SSA cells. The expression levels of 16 previously tested BRCA1 substitution variants were tested in the HeLa-derived cell line [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Thirteen variants, with substitutions ... Comparison of Variants in Different Assays  The 29 BRCA1 variants analyzed in this study were compared for function in the two DNA repair assays and with available knowledge about cancer association (Table 1). Many of the variants were consistent across the two assays, but there were several variants demonstrating separation of function. All of the zinc-coordinating residues were required for function in both repair assays. The M18T variant was clearly defective, but it is currently classified as unknown clinical significance. There is one genetic model that classified this M18T variant as likely pathogenic (see below).  Table 1 Table 1 Summary of BRCA1 Variants Benchmarking Function to Clinical Relevance  Recently, a new classification system for variants has been proposed [Lindor et al., 2012; Plon et al., 2008]. According to this system, Class 1 denotes variants that are not pathogenic. Class 2 is likely nonpathogenic. Class 3 is uncertain. Class 4 is likely pathogenic (probability of being pathogenic is 0.95–0.99), and Class 5 is definitely pathogenic (probability >0.99). According to variants described in the [Lindor et al. (2012)] system, three of the variants in this study (M18T, C61G, and M1775R) were of Class 4, either likely pathogenic or definitely pathogenic. An additional five mutants are treated clinically as Class 5, pathogenic, (C39Y, C44F, C47G, C64G, and R71G). One of these pathogenic mutants, R71G, does not affect the BRCA1 protein, but rather the splicing of the mRNA [Vega et al., 2001]. Since the assays tested express BRCA1 from spliced cDNA, the R71G defective phenotype would not be detected. We thus exclude this mutant from the comparison of benchmarking these assays against known mutants. There were then seven pathogenic mutants (Class 4 or 5) analyzed and eight nonpathogenic variants (Class 1; Table 1). When comparing the results of our functional analyses with these previously classified variants, the HDR assay scored all seven pathogenic or likely pathogenic mutants as defective, and all eight nonpathogenic variants as functional. The results of the assay were, in the case of every variant, either fully active or fully defective (see examples in Fig. 2). To date, no variant tested in the HDR assay produced an intermediate score.  Compared with these benchmarks, the variants tested in the SSA assay did not score as well as the HDR assay. All pathogenic mutants were defective for SSA repair of double-strand breaks, but one nonpathogenic variant (I124V) was defective for SSA, and three Class 1 variants had intermediate phenotype in the SSA assay. Although the HDR assay was both highly sensitive and highly specific, the SSA assay was highly sensitive at association with cancer risk, but it was less specific. Of interest, it had been noted that four BRCA1 variants, Y105C, P142H, E143K, and Y179C, had decreased accumulation at the sites of DNA breaks [Wei et al., 2008]. Although these variants were normal for HDR, three of these had intermediate levels of function in the SSA assay (Table 1). Perhaps there is a link between the accumulation of BRCA1 at DNA repair sites and a factor important for the SSA assay.  Go to: Discussion Functional Assays as Predictive Tools for Assessing BRCA1 Variants  In this study, we analyzed a total of 29 BRCA1 variants in the repair of DSBs by homologous recombination and by SSA. For the sake of this discussion, we exclude the BRCA1–R71G variant that affects splicing [Vega et al., 2001] because all of our assays used prespliced cDNAs and would not be sensitive to a splicing defect. By comparing our results with those BRCA1 missense substitutions that have a known effect on breast cancer predisposition, we found that the HDR assay was 100% accurate: seven previously classified pathogenic mutants were defective for HDR, and eight previously classified nonpathogenic variants in BRCA1 were functional for HDR. Further, the results for the HDR assay were either fully active or fully defective. We interpret these results to indicate that the HDR assay is validated as a predictive tool for assessing BRCA1 variants.  By contrast to the HDR assay, the function of BRCA1 variants in the repair of DSBs by SSA had a number of differences that diminished the accuracy of this assay. On the basis of the benchmarks of variants that were classified using a genetic model [Lindor et al., 2012], the SSA assay was sensitive because it did not misclassify any pathogenic variants, but it was not specific because it misclassified several nonpathogenic variants as either intermediate or defective. Interpretation of the SSA assay was also complicated by intermediate results; by comparison, the HDR assay had no intermediate results among the 29 variants tested. It is possible, but remains to be determined, whether missense variants that are proficient for HDR, but deficient or intermediate for SSA, confer a lower or moderate risk of cancer. We thus conclude that the HDR assay is a more reliable predictive tool for assessing the function of BRCA1 variants than is the SSA assay.  We had previously performed a similar analysis of the control of centrosome duplication by BRCA1 variant proteins [Kais et al., 2012]. Fewer variants of the BRCA1 protein were analyzed in this earlier study using the centrosome assay, but it has several differences from the HDR assay. With regard to those variants with inferred breast cancer association, the centrosome duplication assay had an intermediate result for the BRCA1–D67Y variant, which is nonpathogenic. The T37R variant was defective for both DNA repair assays, but was functional in control of the centrosome duplication. Five amino acid residues away, the I42V variant had the opposite pattern as T37R, with defective centrosome control but fully functional in both DNA repair assays. Experimentally, the centrosome regulation assay is much more difficult to perform than the HDR assay, making it not as desirable an assay for analysis of BRCA1 variants. In addition, the centrosome assay appears, based on the limited set of variants, to be less accurate than the HDR assay. On the contrary, like the SSA, none of the tested seven variants that were previously classified as Class 4 or 5, were functional in the centrosomal assay, suggesting that this assay is sensitive.  It will be necessary to analyze many more variants in the HDR assay and then compare those results with the clinical experiences before this assay can be used for clinical interpretation. On the basis of the accuracy of the currently tested variants, we believe that the HDR assay will help with difficult to classify variants of unknown significance.  Functional Assays for Probing BRCA1 Residues Important in Biological Function  Separate from the clinical utility of the different functional tests, important biological information about the BRCA1 protein is available from the various functional assays. Very little structure–function information exists for BRCA1, and there have been limited systematic analyses of the effects of BRCA1 amino acid variants in a given function. A variety of variants have been analyzed in the context of short BRCA1 amino-terminal truncations for ubiquitin ligase activity [Morris et al., 2006]. In a similar vein, a variety of variants in the context of a short BRCA1 carboxy-terminal fragment have been analyzed for the activation of transcription [Carvalho et al., 2007; Lee et al., 2010]. Several variants in the context of the full-length protein have been analyzed in terms of resistance to ionizing radiation [Ruffner et al., 2001] and reversal of a lethal phenotype in murine embryonic stem cells [Chang et al., 2009].  We find that there are some discordancies between functional assays of the variants. The most striking are at T37R and I42V. BRCA1–T37R was defective for both DNA repair processes, but was fully functional for control of centrosomes. Conversely, BRCA1–I42V was defective for control of centrosome duplication [Kais et al., 2012] but functional in the DNA repair processes. From this result, we hypothesize that the protein–BRCA1 contacts in the DNA repair pathways depend on the T37 residue, whereas a different protein–BRCA1 contact is important for regulating the centrosome duplication. Such a notion is possible because the centrosome regulation occurs in the cytoplasm and the DNA repair occurs in the nucleus, and it is reasonable to suppose that different proteins are involved.  There were variants that distinguished between BRCA1 residues important for DSB repair by homologous recombination versus SSA. The observed differences between the SSA and HDR assays involved residues from 90 to 191. Several of these (Y105C, P142H, and E143K) that had intermediate phenotype in the SSA assay had been shown to have slow accumulation at sites of DSBs. Especially, P142H mutation abolished the association with Ku80 protein, which plays an important role in the repair of DSBs [Wei et al., 2008]. Perhaps the SSA pathway contributes to the accumulation of BRCA1 at sites of DNA damage in cells.  In summary, in this study, we evaluated missense variants of BRCA1 in two different DNA repair pathways. Data support that the function of BRCA1 in the HDR assay is consistent with the known cancer association of these variants, and we suggest that this test is predictive for breast cancer. By contrast, the repair of DNA by the related SSA pathway is not perfectly consistent with what is known about cancer predisposition, and the SSA assay yields intermediate results. On the basis of these current results, we suggest that the HDR assay is validated for predicting whether substitution at any residue of BRCA1 is disease associated.  
2509||Mutations in BRCA1 and BRCA2 account for the majority of hereditary breast and ovarian cancers, and therefore sequence analysis of both genes is routinely conducted in patients with early-onset breast cancer. Besides mutations that clearly abolish protein function or are known to increase cancer risk, a large number of sequence variants of uncertain signifi cance (VUS) have been identifi ed. Although several functional assays for BRCA1 VUSs have been described, thus far it has not been possible to conduct a high-throughput analysis in the context of the full-length protein. We have developed a relatively fast and easy cDNA-based functional assay to classify BRCA1 VUSs based on their ability to functionally complement BRCA1-defi cient mouse embryonic stem cells. Using this assay, we have analyzed 74 unclassifi ed BRCA1 missense mutants for which all predicted pathogenic variants are confi ned to the BRCA1 RING and BRCT domains.  SIGNIFICANCE: BRCA1 VUSs are frequently found in patients with hereditary breast or ovarian cancer and present a serious problem for clinical geneticists. This article describes the generation, validation, and application of a reliable high-throughput assay for the functional classifi cation of BRCA1 sequence variants of uncertain signifi cance. Cancer Discov; 3(10); 1142–55. ©2013 AACR.  Authors’ Affi liations: 1 Division of Molecular Pathology and Cancer Genomics Centre and 2 Department of Pathology, The Netherlands Cancer Institute Amsterdam, The Netherlands; and 3 TaconicArtemis GmbH, Cologne, Germany  Note: Supplementary data for this article are available at Cancer Discovery Online (http://cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org/).  Current address for C. Klijn: Genentech Inc., South San Francisco, California.  Corresponding Author: Jos Jonkers, The Netherlands Cancer Institute, Plesmanlaan 121, Amsterdam, 1066 CX, The Netherlands. Phone: 31-20- 5122000; Fax: 31-20-5122050; E-mail: j.jonkers@nki.nl doi: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094 ©2013 American Association for Cancer Research.  INTRODUCTION  Germline loss-of-function mutations in BRCA1 and BRCA2 are known to result in an approximately tenfold increased lifetime risk of developing breast or ovarian cancer. Thus far, no other genes have been identifi ed with such a strong link to hereditary breast and ovarian cancer (HBOC), and in the past decades, many women have been screened for germline mutations in BRCA1 or BRCA2 . This has resulted in the identifi cation of numerous pathogenic mutations as well as a large number of sequence variants for which the clinical relevance is not clear. In the most recent publication of the ENIGMA (Evidence-based Network for the Interpretation of Germline Mutant Alleles) group, an international consortium for the evaluation of BRCA1 or BRCA2 sequence variants, a total of 1,273 unique BRCA1 variants is mentioned ( 1 ), but this number may increase even further because of the implementation of high-throughput sequencing methods. Of the BRCA1 variants of uncertain signifi cance (VUS), 920 are nontruncating exonic mutations that may affect protein function or mRNA splicing, but for which there is not enough linkage information to indicate whether they are pathogenic. To aid genetic counseling of individuals with BRCA1/2 VUS, both genetic and functional classifi cation methods have been developed. Genetic analysis of BRCA1 or BRCA2 VUSs relies on cosegregation with disease, cooccurrence with known pathogenic mutations, and family history of cancer. These data have been integrated into computational models to calculate the likelihood that a VUS is disease-causing ( 2 ). Additional in silico analysis of the evolutionary conservation of the amino acids affected by the mutation and the predicted impact of the mutant amino acids on protein folding are also implemented in such models. Functional assays do not rely on preexisting data, but directly test the effect of BRCA1/2 VUSs on known functions of the encoded proteins ( 3 ). Although this may seem relatively straightforward, it can be diffi cult to extrapolate data from functional assays into cancer risks for patients. For instance, in most assays only part of the BRCA1 protein is analyzed. In addition, some of the more elegant assays are technically demanding and not suitable to analyze large numbers of mutations. We reasoned that a good functional assay should fulfi ll three basic requirements: (i) it should investigate the biologic effects of a BRCA1 VUS in the context of the full-length protein; (ii) it should be conducted under normal physiologic conditions in a noncancerous cell type; and (iii) it should be based on a highly standardized and reproducible protocol.  These considerations led us to develop a functional assay based on physiologic expression of full-length human BRCA1 cDNA in mouse embryonic stem cells that are genetically engineered to allow conditional deletion of endogenous Brca1 . Mutant BRCA1 cDNAs are generated using site-directed mutagenesis (SDM) and introduced in a defi ned genomic locus of mouse embryonic stem cells by recombinase-mediated cassette exchange (RMCE). In this way, we have analyzed 86 BRCA1 variants for their effects on cell proliferation and drug sensitivity, including 74 clinically relevant VUSs.  RESULTS  Generation of Mouse Embryonic Stem Cells Expressing BRCA1 Sequence Variants  Although BRCA1-defi cient tumor cells proliferate rapidly in situ , loss of BRCA1 in normal cells leads to a severe proliferation defect ( 4 ). We decided to make use of this phenotype for the functional analysis of BRCA1 variants in Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1144 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. Brca1 -selectable conditional knockout (SCo) mouse embryonic stem cells ( 5 ). These cells carry one Brca1 -null allele and a selectable conditional Brca1SCo allele, which contains, in addition to loxP sites around exons 5–6, a split puromycin resistance marker that is activated upon Cre-mediated deletion of exons 5–6. They also contain a CreERT2 allele in the Rosa26 locus, which allows for controlled activation of Cre via administration of 4-hydroxy tamoxifen (4-OHT). Thus, BRCA1-defi cient embryonic stem cells can be easily obtained via 4-OHT–induced inactivation of the Brca1SCo allele and subsequent selection for puromycin resistance ( Fig.  1 ; ref.  5 ). To allow effi cient integration of human BRCA1 variants in one specifi c genomic locus, we supplied the other Rosa26 allele with F3 and Frt recombination sites for RMCE by the site-specifi c recombinase Flp ( Fig.  1 and Supplementary Fig. S1; ref. 6 ). Cells that have undergone successful RMCE can be selected because they express a truncated neomycin selection marker under control of the endogenous Rosa26 promoter, which further increases targeting effi ciency. Flpmediated recombination ensures single-copy integration of BRCA1 expression constructs at the same Rosa26 locus, thus avoiding position-effect variegation and copy number– dependent differences in expression.  RMCE vectors were equipped with a human BRCA1 cDNA expression construct, which was modifi ed using SDM to introduce defi ned mutations in BRCA1 . The focus of our analysis was on Dutch and Belgian VUSs that were found in families with HBOC. We also included a number of variants  Figure 1.   Schematic overview of the RMCE procedure in R26 CreERT2/RMCE ; Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells. Before the introduction of a human BRCA1 cDNA, R26 CreERT2/RMCE ; Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells are mouse BRCA1-profi cient and sensitive to both neomycin and puromycin. Targeting of singlecopy human BRCA1 cDNA variants to the Rosa26 locus by Flp RMCE results in expression of human BRCA1 and neomycin resistance. Addition of 4-OHT leads to CreERT2-mediated deletion of mouse Brca1 exons 5 and 6, resulting in loss of mouse BRCA1 protein and concomitant expression of puromycin from the phosphoglycerate kinase (PGK) promoter. This enables selection of mouse BRCA1-defi cient, human BRCA1-expressing R26 CreERT2/hBRCA1 ; Brca1Δ/Δ embryonic stem cells that can be used in functional complementation assays. R26 CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1SCo/Δ R26CreERT2/hBRCA1;Brca1SCo/Δ R26CreERT2/hBRCA1;Brca1Δ/Δ 3 5–6 3 5–6 7–8 3 3 14 7–8 7–8 3 7–8 5–6 Introduction of human BRCA1 by RMCE 3 14 SA SA Brca1SCo5–6 Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26RMCE Brca1Δ5–6 Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26hBRCA1 Brca1SCo5–6 Brca1SCo5–6 Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26RMCE Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26hBRCA1 3 14 CreERT2 CreERT2 CreERT2 CreERT2 Puro Puro Puro PGK PGK PGK Puro PGK zsgreen Hyg FLP zsgreen Hyg FLP SA SA NeoR Selection hBRCA1–, mBrca1+, neoS, puroS hBRCA1+, mBrca1+, neoR, puroS hBRCA1+, mBrca1–, neoR, puroR pA hBRCA1 hBRCA1 EF1α EF1α Δ5′ neo Δ5′ neo Δ5′ neo EF1α hBRCA1 Cre-mediated deletion of mouse Brca1 by 4-OHT addition 3 14 PuroR Selection SA SA SA SA Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1145 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE that were previously classifi ed using functional assays ( 7, 8 ) or a multifactorial likelihood model ( 9 ), as well as M1400V, L1407P, and M1411T, which have been reported to attenuate the interaction between BRCA1 and PALB2 ( 10 ). To allow validation of our functional complementation assay, we included a series of eight BRCA1 variants that are known to be deleterious or neutral according to the Breast Cancer Information Core database (BIC; http://research.nhgri .nih.gov/bic/ ; Supplementary Table S1). These controls include the well-known pathogenic BRCA1 founder mutations 185delAG and 5382insC and the neutral polymorphisms Y105C, R866C, and E1250K. The BIC designation is supported by the classifi cation according to the International Agency for Research on Cancer ( http://iarc.fr/ ), which includes the Align-GVGD score that indicates biophysical and evolutionary alterations ( http://agvgd.iarc.fr/ ; Supplementary Table S1; refs. 11, 12 ). Align-GVGD scores vary between C0 (likely neutral) and C65 (likely deleterious). Sequence-verifi ed constructs that contained the intended VUS, but no other BRCA1 mutations, were transfected into R26 CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells to undergo RMCE ( Fig.  2 ). Neomycin-resistant clones were pooled and RMCE was confi rmed by PCR analysis. Subsequently, protein expression of the human BRCA1 variants was analyzed by Western blot analysis with a human BRCA1-specifi c antibody ( Fig. 2 and Supplementary Fig. S2). Comparison with BRCA1 protein levels in embryonic stem cells expressing human BRCA1 from a bacterial artifi cial chromosome (BAC), which is known to rescue embryonic lethality of Brca1 -null mice ( 7 ,  13 ), showed that transcription of the human BRCA1 cDNA from the EF1A gene promoter results in physiologic levels of BRCA1 protein (Supplementary Fig.  S1). Most BRCA1 variants were expressed at equal levels, allowing comparison of their functional activities. A number of C-terminal BRCA1 mutants showed low levels of expression (Supplementary Table S2; Supplementary Fig. S2). Real-time RT-PCR analysis showed that decreased protein expression was not caused by decreased mRNA expression (Supplementary Fig.  S3), suggesting that the low abundance of BRCA1 protein results from posttranslational events. In fact, for most of these variants, mutation-associated protein instability has already been documented in previous publications (refs. 8 , 14 , 15 ; Supplementary Table S2).  Functional Complementation Assay of BRCA1 Sequence Variants in Mouse Brca1 -Null Embryonic Stem Cells  As a fi rst functional test, we assayed the ability of BRCA1 variants to restore the proliferation defect of switched R26 CreERT2/RMCE ;Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells ( Fig.  2 ). Expression of endogenous mouse Brca1 was shut off through overnight induction of Cre activity by 4-OHT, and 7 days  Figure 2.   Workfl ow for the functional classifi cation of BRCA1 sequence variants in Brca1 -null embryonic stem (ES) cells. Outline of the generation of mouse Brca1 -defi cient embryonic stem cells expressing human BRCA1 variants and functional complementation assays. Indicated are the experimental steps and the time it takes one person to analyze 20 mutants. Introduction of BRCA1 variants in R26CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1SCo/D ES cells BRCA1 Construct + G418 Selection of clones with correct RMCE BRCA1 Expression analysis SDM and sequencing RMCE in ES cells x + 4-OHT + Puromycin Functional assays Functional assays Cre-Mediated deletion of Brca1SCo allele Proliferation and cisplatin sensitivity assays Selection of Brca1ΔSCo/Δ ES cells Timecourse for the analysis of 20 BRCA1 variants Weeks 0 1 2 7 3 8 4 5 6 SDM and RMCE Functional assays Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1146 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. after switching, cells were plated in 96-well plates for proliferation assays, and were analyzed using Sulphorhodamine B staining. For each group of mutants tested, we included positive and negative controls consisting of embryonic stem cells containing, respectively, wild-type human BRCA1 cDNA and an empty RMCE vector. BRCA1 variants were evaluated on their ability to support growth compared with these controls (Supplementary Tables S3 and S4). Although we tested 28 mutations in the central domain encoded by exon 11 (aa 224–1366), BRCA1 variants that were unable to rescue the proliferation defect of Brca1 -null mouse embryonic stem cells to BRCA1 wild-type levels were confi ned to the conserved N- and C-terminal domains of BRCA1.  Cisplatin Sensitivity Assay for Classifi cation of BRCA1 Variants  Although the ability of BRCA1 variants to support proliferation appears to be indicative of VUS function, results were not always clear-cut (Supplementary Tables S3 and S4). BRCA1 is known to be important for DNA interstrand crosslink (ICL) repair through mechanisms that are both dependent ( 5 ) and independent ( 16 ) of its function in homologous recombination (HR). The role of BRCA1 in ICL repair is stressed by the occurrence of genetic reversion mutations restoring BRCA1 protein expression in platinum-resistant ovarian tumors in BRCA1 -mutation carriers ( 17, 18 ). We therefore decided to conduct a 96-well–based cisplatin sensitivity assay to allow a more stringent evaluation of BRCA1 VUS functionality.  Half-maximal inhibitory concentrations (IC 50 ) of cisplatin were determined using a resazurin cell viability assay, and BRCA1 variants were again classifi ed in comparison to wildtype BRCA1 and an empty RMCE vector. To obtain corrected cisplatin IC 50 values, we fi tted a log-logistic curve constrained at 1 and 0. We excluded a fi t if the residual squared error (RSE) exceeded 0.1. We then applied a Bayesian predictor to classify BRCA1 VUS as pathogenic or benign. Most variants that showed less than wild-type activity in the proliferation assay also scored as functionally impaired in the cisplatin sensitivity assay and were classifi ed as deleterious ( Table 1 ,  Table 1.   Functional classifi cation of BRCA1 VUS based on cisplatin response Variant DNA change Type of mutation a Classifi cation S4F c.11C>T VUS Not Clear M18T c.53T>C VUS Deleterious 185delAG c.68_69delAG Deleterious control Deleterious b K45Q c.133A>C VUS Neutral C61G c.181T>G Deleterious control Deleterious C64G c.190T>G VUS Deleterious b D67Y c.199G>T VUS Neutral Y105C c.314A>G Neutral control Neutral N132K c.396C>A VUS Neutral P142H c.425C>A VUS Neutral L147F c.441G>C VUS Neutral L165P c.494T>C VUS Neutral R170W c.508C>T VUS Neutral S186Y c.557C>A VUS Neutral V191I c.571G>A VUS Neutral T231M c.692C>T VUS Neutral D245V c.734A>T VUS Neutral L246V c.736T>G VUS Neutral V271L c.811G>C VUS Neutral S308A c.922A>G; c.923G>C Artifi cial h Not Clear L358R; C360R; E362H c.1073T>G; c.1078T>C; c.1084G>C; c.1086G>T Artifi cial Neutral L668F c.2002C>T VUS Neutral D695N c.2083G>A VUS Neutral P798L c.2393C>T VUS Neutral N810Y c.2428A>T VUS Neutral T826K c.2477C>A VUS Neutral (continued) Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1147 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE (continued) Variant DNA change Type of mutation a Classifi cation R841Q c.2522G>A VUS Neutral Y856H c.2566T>C VUS Neutral R866C c.2596C>T Neutral control Neutral S988A c.2962T>G Artifi cial Neutral M1008I c.3024G>A VUS Neutral E1060A c.3179A>C VUS Neutral S1101N c.3302G>A VUS Neutral K1110del c.3328_3330delAAG VUS Neutral S1140G c.3418A>G VUS Neutral E1214K c.3640G>A VUS Neutral N1236K c.3708T>G VUS Neutral E1250K c.3748G>A Neutral control Neutral L1267S c.3800T>C VUS Neutral E1282V c.3845A>T VUS Neutral S1297del c.3891_3893delTTC VUS Neutral S1301R c.3903T>A VUS Neutral E1346K c.4036G>A VUS Neutral V1378I c.4132G>A VUS Neutral M1400V c.4198A>G VUS Neutral L1407P c.4220T>C VUS Neutral b M1411T c.4232T>C VUS Neutral R1443G c.4327C>G VUS Neutral S1448G c.4342A>G VUS Neutral S1486C c.4456A>T VUS Neutral S1497A c.4489T>G Artifi cial Neutral V1534M c.4600G>A VUS Neutral R1589P c.4766G>C VUS Neutral M1628T c.4883T>C VUS Neutral S1651P c.4951T>C VUS Not Clear S1651F c.4952C>T VUS Not Clear M1652I c.4956G>A VUS Neutral S1655F c.4964C>T VUS Deleterious b H1686R c.5057A>G VUS Deleterious H1686Q c.5058T>A VUS Deleterious V1688del c.5062_5064delGTT VUS Deleterious T1691I c.5072C>T VUS Not clear R1699W c.5095C>T Deleterious control Deleterious b R1699Q c.5096G>A VUS Deleterious b G1706E c.5117G>A VUS Deleterious b G1706A c.5117G>C VUS Neutral A1708E c.5123C>A Deleterious control Deleterious W1718C c.5154G>T VUS Deleterious T1720A c.5158A>G VUS Neutral E1735K c.5203G>A VUS Not clear  Table 1.   Functional classifi cation of BRCA1 VUS based on cisplatin response (Continued) Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1148 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al.  Fig. 3 ). Variants showing increased cisplatin sensitivity were tested at least twice before they were classifi ed. The positive and negative controls classifi ed as expected, although the known pathogenic truncation mutation 5382insC scored as neutral in one of three assays, stressing the need for repeat experiments. Also BRCA1 variants that were previously tested in other assays conducted as expected. It should be noted that the artifi cial variants S308A and S1497A rescued proliferation and cisplatin responses of mouse Brca1 - defi cient embryonic stem cells in BAC complementation assays, but are predicted to be deleterious based on their effects on embryonic stem cell differentiation and their response to γ-irradiation, respectively ( 7 ). The V1804D mutation scored as a neutral variant in our assay, which is in line with most published data ( 8, 9 ), except for the results of an embryonic stem cell–based BAC complementation assay ( 7 ). Again, all BRCA1 mutations that were classifi ed as deleterious were confi ned to regions encoding the conserved N- and C-terminal domains ( Fig.  4 ), despite the observation that deletion of the central region encoded by exon 11 leads to genetic instability in mice ( 12 ). Remarkably, the three mutations that diminish the interaction between BRCA1 and PALB2 ( 10 ), just C-terminal of the region encoded by exon 11, had no effect on cisplatin sensitivity in this assay. Of note, there was in general good correlation between our classifi cation and the Align-GVGD score (Supplementary Table S4). Notable exceptions were the neutral control variant R866C, which validated our assay but scored as likely deleterious (C65) using Align-GVGD, and G1770V, which scored as likely neutral (C0) by Align-GVGD but was classi- fi ed as deleterious in our assay. Our assay also classifi ed some variants for which the Align-GVGD scores were less clear, emphasizing the usefulness of functional assays to complement in silico analysis.  We also analyzed the possible effects of all BRCA1 variants on mRNA splicing, which may have deleterious consequences but cannot be assessed in our cDNA-based assay. The predictive value for exonic variants outside the consensus splice sites is questionable ( 19, 20 ), but four missense mutations were present in existing splice sites (Supplementary Table S4). Although c.5154G>T (encoding W1718C) was deleterious, three of these variants were classifi ed as neutral in our assay. One of them, c.441G>C (encoding L147F), had an increased probability to damage the splice donor site of exon 7. Another variant, c.5072C>T (encoding T1691I), might also affect splicing, but no defect was measured in blood samples of mutation carriers ( 19 ). The third exonic splice site mutation that was classifi ed as neutral in our cisplatin sensitivity assay, c.133A>C (K45Q), is not predicted to lead to aberrant splicing.  Results from Proliferation and Cisplatin Sensitivity Assays Correlate with HR Activity of BRCA1 Variants  BRCA1 and BRCA2 are involved in DNA repair via HR ( 12 , 21 ). Together with non-homologous end joining (NHEJ), HR forms the cellular defense against DNA double-strand breaks (DSB), a severe type of DNA damage that is lethal if unrepaired. Although HR is essentially error-free, NHEJ is error-prone, and therefore defects in HR are known to lead to genomic instability. Although it is not clear whether other Variant DNA change Type of mutation a Classifi cation V1736A c.5207T>C VUS Not clear b D1739G c.5216A>G VUS Deleterious D1739V c.5216A>T VUS Deleterious H1746Q c.5238C>G VUS Not clear R1753T c.5258G>C VUS Not clear b 5382insC c.5266dupC Deleterious control Not clear b L1764P c.5291T>C VUS Deleterious b C1767S c.5300G>C VUS Neutral G1770V c.5309G>T VUS Deleterious b W1782C c.5346G>T VUS Neutral A1789T c.5365G>A VUS Deleterious E1794D c.5382G>C VUS Neutral V1804D c.5411T>A VUS Neutral P1812R c.5435C>G VUS Neutral W1837R c.5509T>C VUS Deleterious H1862L c.5585A>T VUS Neutral a Type of mutation indicates if a variant is a VUS according to the BIC database (http://research.nhgri.nih.gov/bic/). b Functionally impaired in the DR-GFP and/or combined PARP inhibitor/cisplatin sensitivity assay.  Table 1.   Functional classifi cation of BRCA1 VUS based on cisplatin response (Continued) Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1149 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE  Figure 3.   Waterfall chart of cisplatin IC 50 values normalized for wild-type human BRCA1 and empty RMCE vector controls. Corrected cisplatin IC 50 values for all tested human BRCA1 variants and controls, including repeat experiments. BRCA1 variants are classifi ed as functionally impaired or neutral when the corrected IC 50 values are similar to either the empty RMCE vector or the wild-type human BRCA1 controls ( P < 0.05). 4.0 –3.0 –2.0 –1.0 0.0 1.0 2.0 3.0 Corrected cisplatin IC50 (a.u.) Mutant hBRCA1 Wild-type hBRCA1 Empty RMCE vector Positive control Negative control  Figure 4.   Predicted pathogenic BRCA1 amino acid substitutions are confi ned to the evolutionarily conserved N- and C-terminal domains. Schematic representation of the BRCA1 protein with the positions of variants classifi ed as neutral (green) or deleterious (red) indicated. Positive and negative controls are depicted by open pinheads and the known deleterious truncation mutations 185delAG (N-terminal) and 5382insC (C-terminal) are marked in blue. The amino acid sequences of the evolutionarily conserved RING (N-terminal) and BRCT (C-terminal) domains are specifi ed to show the exact positions of deleterious (red) and neutral (green) variants. The amino acid substitutions or nonsense (X) mutations of positive and negative controls are encircled. RING domain BRCT domains Deleterious VUS Neutral VUS Deleterious truncation mutant Deleterious control variant Neutral control variant 1646 1706 1766 91 109 1826 1863 61 31 1 MDLSALRVEEVQNVINAMQKILECPICLEL VNKRMSMVVSGLTPEEFMLVYKFARKHHITLTNLITEETTHVVMKTDAEFVCERTLKYFL IKEPVSTKCDHIFCKFCMLKLLNQKKGPSQ GIAGGKWVVSYFWVTQSIKERKMLNEHDFEVRGDVVNGRNHQGPKRARESQDRKIFRGLE CPLCKNDITKRSLQESTRFSQLVEELLKII CAFQLDTGLEYANSYNFAK ICCYGPFTNMPTDQLEWMVQLCGASVVKELSSFTLGTGVHPIVVVQPDAWTEDNGFHAIG QMCEAPVVTREWVLDSVALYQCQELDTYLIPQIPHSHY T Q E C A X Y C GG F R - Q W Q I E A V R L S C D DR T V P G X Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1150 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. functions of BRCA1 are also important for tumor suppression ( 16 , 22 , 23–26 ), its role in HR is likely to be relevant. Therefore, we used the direct repeat (DR)-GFP assay ( 27 ) to measure the effects on HR for a subset of our BRCA1 VUSs. A number of predicted pathogenic variants and controls were shuttled into R26 CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1 SCo/Δ ;Pim1 DR-GFP/wt embryonic stem cells carrying the DR-GFP reporter in the Pim1 locus. Expression of endogenous mouse Brca1 was switched off, and cells were transfected with a plasmid encoding the I-SceI meganuclease as well as an mCherry fl uorescent marker to control for transfection effi ciency. Repair of I-SceI–induced DNA DSBs in DR-GFP via HR leads to expression of GFP, which can be monitored by fl ow cytometry. All but one of the predicted pathogenic variants tested resulted in defective HR, thereby confi rming our functional classifi cation ( Fig. 5 ). The only predicted deleterious variant that did not signifi cantly differ from wild-type BRCA1 , R1699Q, seemed to support intermediate levels of HR activity.  PARP Inhibitor Sensitivity Assay for Classifi cation of BRCA1 Variants with Intermediate Activity  Deleterious effects of variants with intermediate or partial activity may escape detection in certain functional assays. Although cisplatin sensitivity assays allow robust and  Figure 5.  BRCA1 sequence variants classifi ed as pathogenic do not restore HR. R26 CreERT2/hBRCA1; Brca1 SCo/Δ;Pim1 DR-GFP/wt embryonic stem cells carrying the DR-GFP reporter gene in the Pim1 locus and mutant BRCA1 or controls in the Rosa26 locus were switched using 4-OHT and transfected with a vector expressing I-SceI and mCherry. Transfected cells were analyzed for GFP expression as a measure of HR activity. Expression of BRCA1 wild-type (WT) cDNA resulted in increased HR compared to the empty RMCE vector (Vector) control. Error bars indicate the SD between the results of three independent I-SceI transfections. Signifi cantly decreased HR activity compared with the wild-type control (green line) is indicated. GFP-Positive cells (%) 0.0 0.5 1.0 1.5 2.0 2.5 3.0 3.5 4.0 4.5 ** ns ** * * ns * * * * * * * ns ns WT Vector 185delAG C64G V271L S1651F S1655F R1699Q R1699W G1706A G1706E V1736A R1753T 5382insC L1764P G1770V reproducible classifi cation of several functionally impaired BRCA1 variants, assays using other compounds may have additional value. It is known that BRCA1- and BRCA2- defi cient cells are extremely sensitive to PARP1 inhibition ( 28, 29 ), leading to a larger dynamic range between BRCA2- defi cient cells and isogenic BRCA2-profi cient controls than for cisplatin ( 30 ). We therefore tested complementation of PARP inhibitor sensitivity for a number of BRCA1 mutants and the BRCA1 wild-type control. Given the unexpected neutral effects of the M1400V, L1407P, and M1411T mutations in the PALB2 interaction domain, we decided to include these variants in this series, as well as the R1699Q and V1736A variants that have recently been shown to confer (intermediate) breast and ovarian cancer risk ( 31, 32 ). To allow direct comparison of results from different assays, we repeated the cisplatin sensitivity and proliferation assays in parallel to the olaparib sensitivity assay. Our results indicate that BRCA1 wild-type and empty vector controls indeed show a larger difference in sensitivity for olaparib than for cisplatin ( Fig.  6 ). However, this increase in dynamic range is accompanied by an increased variation between repeat experiments for BRCA1-profi cient samples. Nevertheless, the functional defect of the R1699Q and V1736A mutations becomes more evident, and there also Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1151 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE  Figure 6.   PARP inhibitor sensitivity assay of BRCA1 sequence variants. R26 CreERT2/hBRCA1 ;Brca1 SCo/Δ or R26CreERT2/RMCE; Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells carrying mutant BRCA1 , BRCA1 wild-type (WT), or empty RMCE vector (Vector) controls in the Rosa26 locus were switched using 4-OHT and assayed for sensitivity to cisplatin or the PARP inhibitor olaparib. The cytotoxicity assays were conducted in parallel and data were normalized to the average of the wild-type controls. Error bars indicate the SD between the results of biologic triplicates for which the cells were independently switched. Signifi cant deviation from the average IC 50 values of the wild-type control (green line) is indicated. IC50 Relative to WT controls (%) 0 20 40 60 80 100 120 140 160 Cisplatin Olaparib * **** **** * * ** *** **** ns ns ns ns WT Vector M1400V L1407P M1411T R1699Q V1736A seems to be a less than wild-type response for the PALB2 interaction mutant L1407P. In the concurrent proliferation analysis, R1699Q and V1736A both show an intermediate functional defect (Supplementary Fig.  S4). Also the M1411T mutation seems to affect the response to PARP inhibition, but the difference with BRCA1 wild-type is not signifi cant. Interestingly, the L1407P and M1411T variants have previously been shown to be more defective than M1400V in a gene conversion assay ( 10 ). It should also be noted that, in contrast with the large-scale classifi cation experiments, the cisplatin sensitivity assay conducted in parallel to the PARP inhibitor assay identifi ed signifi cant functional defects for L1407P and V1736A.  DISCUSSION  Over the past few years several functional assays for classifi cation of BRCA1 VUSs have been developed. Several of these assays are restricted to functions of the BRCA1 protein that reside in the evolutionarily conserved RING or BRCT domains. Examples include in vitro transactivation assays for BRCT peptides ( 8 ) and measurement of ubiquitin ligase activity for protein fragments encompassing the N-terminal RING domain ( 33 ). Other assays were designed to evaluate the functions of full-length mutant BRCA1 protein, either by monitoring general effects on proliferation or response to DNA damage ( 7 ), or by directly focusing on the role of BRCA1 in DNA repair via HR ( 34 ).  Because BRCA1 VUSs are not restricted to regions encoding the N- or C-terminal domains, and given the observation that interaction between these domains is required for recruitment of BRCA1 to damaged DNA ( 35 ), functional assays for the full-length protein would be ideal. In principle, such assays can be conducted in cell lines derived from BRCA1 - mutated tumors, but there are indications that the outcome of assays for BRCA1 function depends on the cellular context. As absence of BRCA1 leads to loss of cellular viability, it is thought that additional mutations are required for BRCA1- associated tumorigenesis. For example, loss of p53 alleviates the consequences of BRCA1 defi ciency both in vitro and in vivo ( 4 ) and is common in BRCA1-defi cient tumors ( 36, 37 ). Also, depletion of 53BP1 is known to suppress the defects caused by BRCA1 defi ciency ( 5 , 38 , 39 ). Therefore, aberrations in BRCA1-defi cient tumor cells may mask functional defects of BRCA1 VUSs. We reasoned that assays in normal cells that can be depleted from endogenous BRCA1 expression are most likely to reveal functional defects of BRCA1 VUSs. The usefulness of this approach has been previously shown by Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1152 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. BAC complementation assays in mouse embryonic stem cells ( 7 , 40 ). However, mutagenesis of large BAC clones by recombineering and functional complementation of cells with these mutant constructs is time-consuming and technically demanding, and therefore cannot be conducted in a high-throughput setting. We therefore set out to develop a cDNA-based functional complementation assay in mouse embryonic stem cells that is easier to control and scale up and more suitable for routine functional classifi cation of BRCA1 sequence variants.  One advantage of BAC transgenics in complementation assays is that genes are expressed at physiologically relevant levels. This is the result of low copy-number integrations and the presence of natural regulatory elements required for proper gene expression. We decided to use RMCE to allow single-copy integration of BRCA1 cDNAs at one specifi c genomic locus. The use of RMCE effectively prevents multiple or partial integrations, concatemers, and position-effect variegation. As a result, all variants are expressed at equal levels. Moreover, transcription of BRCA1 cDNAs from the EF1A gene promoter results in physiologic levels of BRCA1 protein, comparable with those observed in embryonic stem cells stably transfected with a BAC containing the human BRCA1 locus. Indeed, the wild-type human BRCA1 cDNA was able to complement Brca1 -null embryonic stem cells in cellular proliferation, drug sensitivity, and HR assays. Our RMCE strategy uses BRCA1 cDNA constructs in which mutations can be swiftly introduced using SDM, enabling a higher throughput than introduction of mutations via BAC recombineering. In addition, the introduction of BRCA1 cDNAs via RMCE obviates the need to analyze multiple embryonic stem cell clones for correct integration and expression.  As a proof of principle, we used our functional complementation assay to analyze exonic BRCA1 VUSs that were identifi ed in families with HBOC in the Netherlands and Belgium, as well as a set of previously analyzed BRCA1 variants. A number of mutations resulted in reduced BRCA1 protein levels, most likely because of structural destabilization. In all cases, this led to diminished capacity for functional complementation. Also, several variants that gave rise to normal BRCA1 protein levels were unable to rescue the proliferation defect and cisplatin sensitivity of Brca1 -null embryonic stem cells. As BRCA1 loss of function mutations are associated with increased cancer risk, variants that score as functionally impaired in our embryonic stem cell assay system may be causally involved in tumor formation. This notion is supported by the fact that seven of eight known pathogenic or neutral control variants in our validation series were correctly classifi ed by the cisplatin sensitivity assay. The pathogenic 5382insC truncation mutation could not be classifi ed because it scored as neutral in one of three transfection series. This was probably due to technical reasons, as the 5382insC mutation did not restore HR activity in Brca1 -defi cient embryonic stem cells, in contrast with R1699Q, which was recently shown to confer intermediate risk of HBOC ( 32 ).  Our assay system yielded ambivalent results for nine other variants: S4F, S308A, S1651P, S1651F, T1691I, V1736A, E1735K, H1746Q, and R1753T. T1691I and E1735K were classifi ed as functionally impaired in only one cisplatin sensitivity test, whereas values from repeat experiments could not be taken into account because of RSE values above 0.1. S4F, S1651P, S1651F, V1736A, H1746Q, and R1753T were differently classifi ed in repeat experiments, which may refl ect technical fl aws or intermediate activity of these variants. Of note, the V1736A mutation was recently identifi ed as a pathogenic variant with hypomorphic activity in DNA repair ( 31 ). Although we did not measure signifi cant HR activity of V1736A in a DR-GFP gene conversion assay, intermediate activity of this variant is supported by the results of the proliferation assays and additional cisplatin sensitivity assays. S1651F showed HR activity similar to wild-type BRCA1 , whereas R1753T was HR-defi cient. S308A is an artifi cial mutation of a BRCA1 phosphorylation site that was able to support proliferation and resistance to DNA damage in an embryonic stem cell-based BAC complementation assay. However, S308A-complemented embryonic stem cells did show increased apoptosis when cultured in embryoid bodies ( 7 ), indicating a partial defect that might explain the ambivalent results for this mutation in our assays.  Our results show that BRCA1 variants should ideally be assayed in triplicate to avoid misclassifi cation. This also applies to BRCA1 VUS that we classifi ed as neutral, most of which were tested only once because in our current study we focused on variants that showed functional impairment. The striking restriction of unambiguously predicted pathogenic mutants to the terminal RING and BRCT domains suggests that some plasticity is allowed for the central domain of BRCA1. However, our dataset is still limited and more experiments are required to gain insight into the function of this domain.  Our cDNA-based system allows for several additional functional assays that have been described previously for BAC transgenic embryonic stem cells ( 7 ). These include assays for defects during in vitro and in vivo embryonic stem cell differentiation but also treatments with other cytotoxic agents. As a proof of principle, we investigated the activity of a number of mutants in the response to the PARP inhibitor olaparib. These included M1400V, L1407, and M1411T, which were previously shown to impair PALB2 binding and have a negative effect on BRCA1 function ( 10 ). Although the differences in sensitivity of BRCA1-defi cient versus BRCA1-profi cient embryonic stem cells are larger for olaparib than for cisplatin, increased variation between repeat experiments allowed us to identify functional defects only for L1407 and not for the other two variants in the PALB2 interaction domain, M1400V and M1411T. However, the R1699Q and V1736A variants, which are known to have hypomorphic activity, clearly showed a defect in the response to olaparib. Interestingly, both mutations are in the BRCT domain, and it has recently been shown that mutation of this domain especially confers sensitivity to PARP inhibition ( 41 ). Together, our results show that PARP inhibitor sensitivity assays may have added value, especially for the classifi cation of BRCA1 VUSs with intermediate phenotypes.  Platinum drugs and PARP inhibitors are selectively toxic to BRCA1-defi cient cells because they target HR defi ciency. Although the role of BRCA1 in HR is thought to be essential for maintaining genomic integrity and preventing accumulation of (oncogenic) mutations, other activities may also contribute to its tumor suppression function. These activities Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1153 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE may include the HR-independent role for BRCA1 in ICL repair, which has been attributed to the facilitation of FANCD2 accumulation at cross-linked DNA ( 16 ). Nevertheless, we observed a good correlation between the results of the cisplatin sensitivity assay and the results of the DR-GFP HR assay. All BRCA1 variants that failed to restore the cisplatin response in Brca1 -null embryonic stem cells were also defective in catalyzing gene conversion, thereby confi rming our functional classifi cation. It will be interesting to see if this holds true for all BRCA1 variants or whether there are also pathogenic mutations that have no effect on HR.  As with any other in vitro approach, our functional complementation assay system might still fail to identify all pathogenic variants because it does not necessarily recapitulate all aspects of BRCA1 function in vivo . A limitation of our cDNA-based assay is also that it cannot be used to investigate effects on mRNA splicing. Although algorithms have been designed to predict possible splice defects, the consequences of mutations outside of the consensus splice sites especially require functional validation experiments. For this purpose, BAC complementation assays ( 7 ), minigene-based splicing assays, or BRCA1 transcript analysis of patient blood samples ( 19 ) may be instrumental. However, transacting factors also affect splicing, and these may be tissue specifi c ( 42 ). A possible solution would be to determine the presence of BRCA1 splice variants in tumor tissue from BRCA1 VUS carriers and use this information to generate a cDNA construct for analysis of the functional consequences. To evaluate BRCA1 VUSs, there remains a need for multifactorial models that combine results from functional assays and in silico analyses with genetic evidence and other information from mutation carriers. This also includes DNA copy number data from tumors from BRCA1 VUS carriers, as it is known that BRCA1- associated breast tumors show distinct genomic aberrations ( 43, 44 ). Our functional assay system does however provide a robust and easily implementable tool for the functional characterization of large numbers of BRCA1 VUSs within the context of the full-length protein. It is our hope that our assay system will fi nd its way to clinical genetics laboratories where it can be used to aid genetic counseling. Ideally, these tests should be coordinated on an international level and in close collaboration with the ENIGMA consortium.    
2551||Mutations in BRCA1 and BRCA2 account for the majority of hereditary breast and ovarian cancers, and therefore sequence analysis of both genes is routinely conducted in patients with early-onset breast cancer. Besides mutations that clearly abolish protein function or are known to increase cancer risk, a large number of sequence variants of uncertain signifi cance (VUS) have been identifi ed. Although several functional assays for BRCA1 VUSs have been described, thus far it has not been possible to conduct a high-throughput analysis in the context of the full-length protein. We have developed a relatively fast and easy cDNA-based functional assay to classify BRCA1 VUSs based on their ability to functionally complement BRCA1-defi cient mouse embryonic stem cells. Using this assay, we have analyzed 74 unclassifi ed BRCA1 missense mutants for which all predicted pathogenic variants are confi ned to the BRCA1 RING and BRCT domains.  SIGNIFICANCE: BRCA1 VUSs are frequently found in patients with hereditary breast or ovarian cancer and present a serious problem for clinical geneticists. This article describes the generation, validation, and application of a reliable high-throughput assay for the functional classifi cation of BRCA1 sequence variants of uncertain signifi cance. Cancer Discov; 3(10); 1142–55. ©2013 AACR.  Authors’ Affi liations: 1 Division of Molecular Pathology and Cancer Genomics Centre and 2 Department of Pathology, The Netherlands Cancer Institute Amsterdam, The Netherlands; and 3 TaconicArtemis GmbH, Cologne, Germany  Note: Supplementary data for this article are available at Cancer Discovery Online (http://cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org/).  Current address for C. Klijn: Genentech Inc., South San Francisco, California.  Corresponding Author: Jos Jonkers, The Netherlands Cancer Institute, Plesmanlaan 121, Amsterdam, 1066 CX, The Netherlands. Phone: 31-20- 5122000; Fax: 31-20-5122050; E-mail: j.jonkers@nki.nl doi: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094 ©2013 American Association for Cancer Research.  INTRODUCTION  Germline loss-of-function mutations in BRCA1 and BRCA2 are known to result in an approximately tenfold increased lifetime risk of developing breast or ovarian cancer. Thus far, no other genes have been identifi ed with such a strong link to hereditary breast and ovarian cancer (HBOC), and in the past decades, many women have been screened for germline mutations in BRCA1 or BRCA2 . This has resulted in the identifi cation of numerous pathogenic mutations as well as a large number of sequence variants for which the clinical relevance is not clear. In the most recent publication of the ENIGMA (Evidence-based Network for the Interpretation of Germline Mutant Alleles) group, an international consortium for the evaluation of BRCA1 or BRCA2 sequence variants, a total of 1,273 unique BRCA1 variants is mentioned ( 1 ), but this number may increase even further because of the implementation of high-throughput sequencing methods. Of the BRCA1 variants of uncertain signifi cance (VUS), 920 are nontruncating exonic mutations that may affect protein function or mRNA splicing, but for which there is not enough linkage information to indicate whether they are pathogenic. To aid genetic counseling of individuals with BRCA1/2 VUS, both genetic and functional classifi cation methods have been developed. Genetic analysis of BRCA1 or BRCA2 VUSs relies on cosegregation with disease, cooccurrence with known pathogenic mutations, and family history of cancer. These data have been integrated into computational models to calculate the likelihood that a VUS is disease-causing ( 2 ). Additional in silico analysis of the evolutionary conservation of the amino acids affected by the mutation and the predicted impact of the mutant amino acids on protein folding are also implemented in such models. Functional assays do not rely on preexisting data, but directly test the effect of BRCA1/2 VUSs on known functions of the encoded proteins ( 3 ). Although this may seem relatively straightforward, it can be diffi cult to extrapolate data from functional assays into cancer risks for patients. For instance, in most assays only part of the BRCA1 protein is analyzed. In addition, some of the more elegant assays are technically demanding and not suitable to analyze large numbers of mutations. We reasoned that a good functional assay should fulfi ll three basic requirements: (i) it should investigate the biologic effects of a BRCA1 VUS in the context of the full-length protein; (ii) it should be conducted under normal physiologic conditions in a noncancerous cell type; and (iii) it should be based on a highly standardized and reproducible protocol.  These considerations led us to develop a functional assay based on physiologic expression of full-length human BRCA1 cDNA in mouse embryonic stem cells that are genetically engineered to allow conditional deletion of endogenous Brca1 . Mutant BRCA1 cDNAs are generated using site-directed mutagenesis (SDM) and introduced in a defi ned genomic locus of mouse embryonic stem cells by recombinase-mediated cassette exchange (RMCE). In this way, we have analyzed 86 BRCA1 variants for their effects on cell proliferation and drug sensitivity, including 74 clinically relevant VUSs.  RESULTS  Generation of Mouse Embryonic Stem Cells Expressing BRCA1 Sequence Variants  Although BRCA1-defi cient tumor cells proliferate rapidly in situ , loss of BRCA1 in normal cells leads to a severe proliferation defect ( 4 ). We decided to make use of this phenotype for the functional analysis of BRCA1 variants in Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1144 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. Brca1 -selectable conditional knockout (SCo) mouse embryonic stem cells ( 5 ). These cells carry one Brca1 -null allele and a selectable conditional Brca1SCo allele, which contains, in addition to loxP sites around exons 5–6, a split puromycin resistance marker that is activated upon Cre-mediated deletion of exons 5–6. They also contain a CreERT2 allele in the Rosa26 locus, which allows for controlled activation of Cre via administration of 4-hydroxy tamoxifen (4-OHT). Thus, BRCA1-defi cient embryonic stem cells can be easily obtained via 4-OHT–induced inactivation of the Brca1SCo allele and subsequent selection for puromycin resistance ( Fig.  1 ; ref.  5 ). To allow effi cient integration of human BRCA1 variants in one specifi c genomic locus, we supplied the other Rosa26 allele with F3 and Frt recombination sites for RMCE by the site-specifi c recombinase Flp ( Fig.  1 and Supplementary Fig. S1; ref. 6 ). Cells that have undergone successful RMCE can be selected because they express a truncated neomycin selection marker under control of the endogenous Rosa26 promoter, which further increases targeting effi ciency. Flpmediated recombination ensures single-copy integration of BRCA1 expression constructs at the same Rosa26 locus, thus avoiding position-effect variegation and copy number– dependent differences in expression.  RMCE vectors were equipped with a human BRCA1 cDNA expression construct, which was modifi ed using SDM to introduce defi ned mutations in BRCA1 . The focus of our analysis was on Dutch and Belgian VUSs that were found in families with HBOC. We also included a number of variants  Figure 1.   Schematic overview of the RMCE procedure in R26 CreERT2/RMCE ; Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells. Before the introduction of a human BRCA1 cDNA, R26 CreERT2/RMCE ; Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells are mouse BRCA1-profi cient and sensitive to both neomycin and puromycin. Targeting of singlecopy human BRCA1 cDNA variants to the Rosa26 locus by Flp RMCE results in expression of human BRCA1 and neomycin resistance. Addition of 4-OHT leads to CreERT2-mediated deletion of mouse Brca1 exons 5 and 6, resulting in loss of mouse BRCA1 protein and concomitant expression of puromycin from the phosphoglycerate kinase (PGK) promoter. This enables selection of mouse BRCA1-defi cient, human BRCA1-expressing R26 CreERT2/hBRCA1 ; Brca1Δ/Δ embryonic stem cells that can be used in functional complementation assays. R26 CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1SCo/Δ R26CreERT2/hBRCA1;Brca1SCo/Δ R26CreERT2/hBRCA1;Brca1Δ/Δ 3 5–6 3 5–6 7–8 3 3 14 7–8 7–8 3 7–8 5–6 Introduction of human BRCA1 by RMCE 3 14 SA SA Brca1SCo5–6 Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26RMCE Brca1Δ5–6 Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26hBRCA1 Brca1SCo5–6 Brca1SCo5–6 Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26RMCE Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26hBRCA1 3 14 CreERT2 CreERT2 CreERT2 CreERT2 Puro Puro Puro PGK PGK PGK Puro PGK zsgreen Hyg FLP zsgreen Hyg FLP SA SA NeoR Selection hBRCA1–, mBrca1+, neoS, puroS hBRCA1+, mBrca1+, neoR, puroS hBRCA1+, mBrca1–, neoR, puroR pA hBRCA1 hBRCA1 EF1α EF1α Δ5′ neo Δ5′ neo Δ5′ neo EF1α hBRCA1 Cre-mediated deletion of mouse Brca1 by 4-OHT addition 3 14 PuroR Selection SA SA SA SA Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1145 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE that were previously classifi ed using functional assays ( 7, 8 ) or a multifactorial likelihood model ( 9 ), as well as M1400V, L1407P, and M1411T, which have been reported to attenuate the interaction between BRCA1 and PALB2 ( 10 ). To allow validation of our functional complementation assay, we included a series of eight BRCA1 variants that are known to be deleterious or neutral according to the Breast Cancer Information Core database (BIC; http://research.nhgri .nih.gov/bic/ ; Supplementary Table S1). These controls include the well-known pathogenic BRCA1 founder mutations 185delAG and 5382insC and the neutral polymorphisms Y105C, R866C, and E1250K. The BIC designation is supported by the classifi cation according to the International Agency for Research on Cancer ( http://iarc.fr/ ), which includes the Align-GVGD score that indicates biophysical and evolutionary alterations ( http://agvgd.iarc.fr/ ; Supplementary Table S1; refs. 11, 12 ). Align-GVGD scores vary between C0 (likely neutral) and C65 (likely deleterious). Sequence-verifi ed constructs that contained the intended VUS, but no other BRCA1 mutations, were transfected into R26 CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells to undergo RMCE ( Fig.  2 ). Neomycin-resistant clones were pooled and RMCE was confi rmed by PCR analysis. Subsequently, protein expression of the human BRCA1 variants was analyzed by Western blot analysis with a human BRCA1-specifi c antibody ( Fig. 2 and Supplementary Fig. S2). Comparison with BRCA1 protein levels in embryonic stem cells expressing human BRCA1 from a bacterial artifi cial chromosome (BAC), which is known to rescue embryonic lethality of Brca1 -null mice ( 7 ,  13 ), showed that transcription of the human BRCA1 cDNA from the EF1A gene promoter results in physiologic levels of BRCA1 protein (Supplementary Fig.  S1). Most BRCA1 variants were expressed at equal levels, allowing comparison of their functional activities. A number of C-terminal BRCA1 mutants showed low levels of expression (Supplementary Table S2; Supplementary Fig. S2). Real-time RT-PCR analysis showed that decreased protein expression was not caused by decreased mRNA expression (Supplementary Fig.  S3), suggesting that the low abundance of BRCA1 protein results from posttranslational events. In fact, for most of these variants, mutation-associated protein instability has already been documented in previous publications (refs. 8 , 14 , 15 ; Supplementary Table S2).  Functional Complementation Assay of BRCA1 Sequence Variants in Mouse Brca1 -Null Embryonic Stem Cells  As a fi rst functional test, we assayed the ability of BRCA1 variants to restore the proliferation defect of switched R26 CreERT2/RMCE ;Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells ( Fig.  2 ). Expression of endogenous mouse Brca1 was shut off through overnight induction of Cre activity by 4-OHT, and 7 days  Figure 2.   Workfl ow for the functional classifi cation of BRCA1 sequence variants in Brca1 -null embryonic stem (ES) cells. Outline of the generation of mouse Brca1 -defi cient embryonic stem cells expressing human BRCA1 variants and functional complementation assays. Indicated are the experimental steps and the time it takes one person to analyze 20 mutants. Introduction of BRCA1 variants in R26CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1SCo/D ES cells BRCA1 Construct + G418 Selection of clones with correct RMCE BRCA1 Expression analysis SDM and sequencing RMCE in ES cells x + 4-OHT + Puromycin Functional assays Functional assays Cre-Mediated deletion of Brca1SCo allele Proliferation and cisplatin sensitivity assays Selection of Brca1ΔSCo/Δ ES cells Timecourse for the analysis of 20 BRCA1 variants Weeks 0 1 2 7 3 8 4 5 6 SDM and RMCE Functional assays Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1146 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. after switching, cells were plated in 96-well plates for proliferation assays, and were analyzed using Sulphorhodamine B staining. For each group of mutants tested, we included positive and negative controls consisting of embryonic stem cells containing, respectively, wild-type human BRCA1 cDNA and an empty RMCE vector. BRCA1 variants were evaluated on their ability to support growth compared with these controls (Supplementary Tables S3 and S4). Although we tested 28 mutations in the central domain encoded by exon 11 (aa 224–1366), BRCA1 variants that were unable to rescue the proliferation defect of Brca1 -null mouse embryonic stem cells to BRCA1 wild-type levels were confi ned to the conserved N- and C-terminal domains of BRCA1.  Cisplatin Sensitivity Assay for Classifi cation of BRCA1 Variants  Although the ability of BRCA1 variants to support proliferation appears to be indicative of VUS function, results were not always clear-cut (Supplementary Tables S3 and S4). BRCA1 is known to be important for DNA interstrand crosslink (ICL) repair through mechanisms that are both dependent ( 5 ) and independent ( 16 ) of its function in homologous recombination (HR). The role of BRCA1 in ICL repair is stressed by the occurrence of genetic reversion mutations restoring BRCA1 protein expression in platinum-resistant ovarian tumors in BRCA1 -mutation carriers ( 17, 18 ). We therefore decided to conduct a 96-well–based cisplatin sensitivity assay to allow a more stringent evaluation of BRCA1 VUS functionality.  Half-maximal inhibitory concentrations (IC 50 ) of cisplatin were determined using a resazurin cell viability assay, and BRCA1 variants were again classifi ed in comparison to wildtype BRCA1 and an empty RMCE vector. To obtain corrected cisplatin IC 50 values, we fi tted a log-logistic curve constrained at 1 and 0. We excluded a fi t if the residual squared error (RSE) exceeded 0.1. We then applied a Bayesian predictor to classify BRCA1 VUS as pathogenic or benign. Most variants that showed less than wild-type activity in the proliferation assay also scored as functionally impaired in the cisplatin sensitivity assay and were classifi ed as deleterious ( Table 1 ,  Table 1.   Functional classifi cation of BRCA1 VUS based on cisplatin response Variant DNA change Type of mutation a Classifi cation S4F c.11C>T VUS Not Clear M18T c.53T>C VUS Deleterious 185delAG c.68_69delAG Deleterious control Deleterious b K45Q c.133A>C VUS Neutral C61G c.181T>G Deleterious control Deleterious C64G c.190T>G VUS Deleterious b D67Y c.199G>T VUS Neutral Y105C c.314A>G Neutral control Neutral N132K c.396C>A VUS Neutral P142H c.425C>A VUS Neutral L147F c.441G>C VUS Neutral L165P c.494T>C VUS Neutral R170W c.508C>T VUS Neutral S186Y c.557C>A VUS Neutral V191I c.571G>A VUS Neutral T231M c.692C>T VUS Neutral D245V c.734A>T VUS Neutral L246V c.736T>G VUS Neutral V271L c.811G>C VUS Neutral S308A c.922A>G; c.923G>C Artifi cial h Not Clear L358R; C360R; E362H c.1073T>G; c.1078T>C; c.1084G>C; c.1086G>T Artifi cial Neutral L668F c.2002C>T VUS Neutral D695N c.2083G>A VUS Neutral P798L c.2393C>T VUS Neutral N810Y c.2428A>T VUS Neutral T826K c.2477C>A VUS Neutral (continued) Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1147 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE (continued) Variant DNA change Type of mutation a Classifi cation R841Q c.2522G>A VUS Neutral Y856H c.2566T>C VUS Neutral R866C c.2596C>T Neutral control Neutral S988A c.2962T>G Artifi cial Neutral M1008I c.3024G>A VUS Neutral E1060A c.3179A>C VUS Neutral S1101N c.3302G>A VUS Neutral K1110del c.3328_3330delAAG VUS Neutral S1140G c.3418A>G VUS Neutral E1214K c.3640G>A VUS Neutral N1236K c.3708T>G VUS Neutral E1250K c.3748G>A Neutral control Neutral L1267S c.3800T>C VUS Neutral E1282V c.3845A>T VUS Neutral S1297del c.3891_3893delTTC VUS Neutral S1301R c.3903T>A VUS Neutral E1346K c.4036G>A VUS Neutral V1378I c.4132G>A VUS Neutral M1400V c.4198A>G VUS Neutral L1407P c.4220T>C VUS Neutral b M1411T c.4232T>C VUS Neutral R1443G c.4327C>G VUS Neutral S1448G c.4342A>G VUS Neutral S1486C c.4456A>T VUS Neutral S1497A c.4489T>G Artifi cial Neutral V1534M c.4600G>A VUS Neutral R1589P c.4766G>C VUS Neutral M1628T c.4883T>C VUS Neutral S1651P c.4951T>C VUS Not Clear S1651F c.4952C>T VUS Not Clear M1652I c.4956G>A VUS Neutral S1655F c.4964C>T VUS Deleterious b H1686R c.5057A>G VUS Deleterious H1686Q c.5058T>A VUS Deleterious V1688del c.5062_5064delGTT VUS Deleterious T1691I c.5072C>T VUS Not clear R1699W c.5095C>T Deleterious control Deleterious b R1699Q c.5096G>A VUS Deleterious b G1706E c.5117G>A VUS Deleterious b G1706A c.5117G>C VUS Neutral A1708E c.5123C>A Deleterious control Deleterious W1718C c.5154G>T VUS Deleterious T1720A c.5158A>G VUS Neutral E1735K c.5203G>A VUS Not clear  Table 1.   Functional classifi cation of BRCA1 VUS based on cisplatin response (Continued) Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1148 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al.  Fig. 3 ). Variants showing increased cisplatin sensitivity were tested at least twice before they were classifi ed. The positive and negative controls classifi ed as expected, although the known pathogenic truncation mutation 5382insC scored as neutral in one of three assays, stressing the need for repeat experiments. Also BRCA1 variants that were previously tested in other assays conducted as expected. It should be noted that the artifi cial variants S308A and S1497A rescued proliferation and cisplatin responses of mouse Brca1 - defi cient embryonic stem cells in BAC complementation assays, but are predicted to be deleterious based on their effects on embryonic stem cell differentiation and their response to γ-irradiation, respectively ( 7 ). The V1804D mutation scored as a neutral variant in our assay, which is in line with most published data ( 8, 9 ), except for the results of an embryonic stem cell–based BAC complementation assay ( 7 ). Again, all BRCA1 mutations that were classifi ed as deleterious were confi ned to regions encoding the conserved N- and C-terminal domains ( Fig.  4 ), despite the observation that deletion of the central region encoded by exon 11 leads to genetic instability in mice ( 12 ). Remarkably, the three mutations that diminish the interaction between BRCA1 and PALB2 ( 10 ), just C-terminal of the region encoded by exon 11, had no effect on cisplatin sensitivity in this assay. Of note, there was in general good correlation between our classifi cation and the Align-GVGD score (Supplementary Table S4). Notable exceptions were the neutral control variant R866C, which validated our assay but scored as likely deleterious (C65) using Align-GVGD, and G1770V, which scored as likely neutral (C0) by Align-GVGD but was classi- fi ed as deleterious in our assay. Our assay also classifi ed some variants for which the Align-GVGD scores were less clear, emphasizing the usefulness of functional assays to complement in silico analysis.  We also analyzed the possible effects of all BRCA1 variants on mRNA splicing, which may have deleterious consequences but cannot be assessed in our cDNA-based assay. The predictive value for exonic variants outside the consensus splice sites is questionable ( 19, 20 ), but four missense mutations were present in existing splice sites (Supplementary Table S4). Although c.5154G>T (encoding W1718C) was deleterious, three of these variants were classifi ed as neutral in our assay. One of them, c.441G>C (encoding L147F), had an increased probability to damage the splice donor site of exon 7. Another variant, c.5072C>T (encoding T1691I), might also affect splicing, but no defect was measured in blood samples of mutation carriers ( 19 ). The third exonic splice site mutation that was classifi ed as neutral in our cisplatin sensitivity assay, c.133A>C (K45Q), is not predicted to lead to aberrant splicing.  Results from Proliferation and Cisplatin Sensitivity Assays Correlate with HR Activity of BRCA1 Variants  BRCA1 and BRCA2 are involved in DNA repair via HR ( 12 , 21 ). Together with non-homologous end joining (NHEJ), HR forms the cellular defense against DNA double-strand breaks (DSB), a severe type of DNA damage that is lethal if unrepaired. Although HR is essentially error-free, NHEJ is error-prone, and therefore defects in HR are known to lead to genomic instability. Although it is not clear whether other Variant DNA change Type of mutation a Classifi cation V1736A c.5207T>C VUS Not clear b D1739G c.5216A>G VUS Deleterious D1739V c.5216A>T VUS Deleterious H1746Q c.5238C>G VUS Not clear R1753T c.5258G>C VUS Not clear b 5382insC c.5266dupC Deleterious control Not clear b L1764P c.5291T>C VUS Deleterious b C1767S c.5300G>C VUS Neutral G1770V c.5309G>T VUS Deleterious b W1782C c.5346G>T VUS Neutral A1789T c.5365G>A VUS Deleterious E1794D c.5382G>C VUS Neutral V1804D c.5411T>A VUS Neutral P1812R c.5435C>G VUS Neutral W1837R c.5509T>C VUS Deleterious H1862L c.5585A>T VUS Neutral a Type of mutation indicates if a variant is a VUS according to the BIC database (http://research.nhgri.nih.gov/bic/). b Functionally impaired in the DR-GFP and/or combined PARP inhibitor/cisplatin sensitivity assay.  Table 1.   Functional classifi cation of BRCA1 VUS based on cisplatin response (Continued) Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1149 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE  Figure 3.   Waterfall chart of cisplatin IC 50 values normalized for wild-type human BRCA1 and empty RMCE vector controls. Corrected cisplatin IC 50 values for all tested human BRCA1 variants and controls, including repeat experiments. BRCA1 variants are classifi ed as functionally impaired or neutral when the corrected IC 50 values are similar to either the empty RMCE vector or the wild-type human BRCA1 controls ( P < 0.05). 4.0 –3.0 –2.0 –1.0 0.0 1.0 2.0 3.0 Corrected cisplatin IC50 (a.u.) Mutant hBRCA1 Wild-type hBRCA1 Empty RMCE vector Positive control Negative control  Figure 4.   Predicted pathogenic BRCA1 amino acid substitutions are confi ned to the evolutionarily conserved N- and C-terminal domains. Schematic representation of the BRCA1 protein with the positions of variants classifi ed as neutral (green) or deleterious (red) indicated. Positive and negative controls are depicted by open pinheads and the known deleterious truncation mutations 185delAG (N-terminal) and 5382insC (C-terminal) are marked in blue. The amino acid sequences of the evolutionarily conserved RING (N-terminal) and BRCT (C-terminal) domains are specifi ed to show the exact positions of deleterious (red) and neutral (green) variants. The amino acid substitutions or nonsense (X) mutations of positive and negative controls are encircled. RING domain BRCT domains Deleterious VUS Neutral VUS Deleterious truncation mutant Deleterious control variant Neutral control variant 1646 1706 1766 91 109 1826 1863 61 31 1 MDLSALRVEEVQNVINAMQKILECPICLEL VNKRMSMVVSGLTPEEFMLVYKFARKHHITLTNLITEETTHVVMKTDAEFVCERTLKYFL IKEPVSTKCDHIFCKFCMLKLLNQKKGPSQ GIAGGKWVVSYFWVTQSIKERKMLNEHDFEVRGDVVNGRNHQGPKRARESQDRKIFRGLE CPLCKNDITKRSLQESTRFSQLVEELLKII CAFQLDTGLEYANSYNFAK ICCYGPFTNMPTDQLEWMVQLCGASVVKELSSFTLGTGVHPIVVVQPDAWTEDNGFHAIG QMCEAPVVTREWVLDSVALYQCQELDTYLIPQIPHSHY T Q E C A X Y C GG F R - Q W Q I E A V R L S C D DR T V P G X Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1150 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. functions of BRCA1 are also important for tumor suppression ( 16 , 22 , 23–26 ), its role in HR is likely to be relevant. Therefore, we used the direct repeat (DR)-GFP assay ( 27 ) to measure the effects on HR for a subset of our BRCA1 VUSs. A number of predicted pathogenic variants and controls were shuttled into R26 CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1 SCo/Δ ;Pim1 DR-GFP/wt embryonic stem cells carrying the DR-GFP reporter in the Pim1 locus. Expression of endogenous mouse Brca1 was switched off, and cells were transfected with a plasmid encoding the I-SceI meganuclease as well as an mCherry fl uorescent marker to control for transfection effi ciency. Repair of I-SceI–induced DNA DSBs in DR-GFP via HR leads to expression of GFP, which can be monitored by fl ow cytometry. All but one of the predicted pathogenic variants tested resulted in defective HR, thereby confi rming our functional classifi cation ( Fig. 5 ). The only predicted deleterious variant that did not signifi cantly differ from wild-type BRCA1 , R1699Q, seemed to support intermediate levels of HR activity.  PARP Inhibitor Sensitivity Assay for Classifi cation of BRCA1 Variants with Intermediate Activity  Deleterious effects of variants with intermediate or partial activity may escape detection in certain functional assays. Although cisplatin sensitivity assays allow robust and  Figure 5.  BRCA1 sequence variants classifi ed as pathogenic do not restore HR. R26 CreERT2/hBRCA1; Brca1 SCo/Δ;Pim1 DR-GFP/wt embryonic stem cells carrying the DR-GFP reporter gene in the Pim1 locus and mutant BRCA1 or controls in the Rosa26 locus were switched using 4-OHT and transfected with a vector expressing I-SceI and mCherry. Transfected cells were analyzed for GFP expression as a measure of HR activity. Expression of BRCA1 wild-type (WT) cDNA resulted in increased HR compared to the empty RMCE vector (Vector) control. Error bars indicate the SD between the results of three independent I-SceI transfections. Signifi cantly decreased HR activity compared with the wild-type control (green line) is indicated. GFP-Positive cells (%) 0.0 0.5 1.0 1.5 2.0 2.5 3.0 3.5 4.0 4.5 ** ns ** * * ns * * * * * * * ns ns WT Vector 185delAG C64G V271L S1651F S1655F R1699Q R1699W G1706A G1706E V1736A R1753T 5382insC L1764P G1770V reproducible classifi cation of several functionally impaired BRCA1 variants, assays using other compounds may have additional value. It is known that BRCA1- and BRCA2- defi cient cells are extremely sensitive to PARP1 inhibition ( 28, 29 ), leading to a larger dynamic range between BRCA2- defi cient cells and isogenic BRCA2-profi cient controls than for cisplatin ( 30 ). We therefore tested complementation of PARP inhibitor sensitivity for a number of BRCA1 mutants and the BRCA1 wild-type control. Given the unexpected neutral effects of the M1400V, L1407P, and M1411T mutations in the PALB2 interaction domain, we decided to include these variants in this series, as well as the R1699Q and V1736A variants that have recently been shown to confer (intermediate) breast and ovarian cancer risk ( 31, 32 ). To allow direct comparison of results from different assays, we repeated the cisplatin sensitivity and proliferation assays in parallel to the olaparib sensitivity assay. Our results indicate that BRCA1 wild-type and empty vector controls indeed show a larger difference in sensitivity for olaparib than for cisplatin ( Fig.  6 ). However, this increase in dynamic range is accompanied by an increased variation between repeat experiments for BRCA1-profi cient samples. Nevertheless, the functional defect of the R1699Q and V1736A mutations becomes more evident, and there also Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1151 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE  Figure 6.   PARP inhibitor sensitivity assay of BRCA1 sequence variants. R26 CreERT2/hBRCA1 ;Brca1 SCo/Δ or R26CreERT2/RMCE; Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells carrying mutant BRCA1 , BRCA1 wild-type (WT), or empty RMCE vector (Vector) controls in the Rosa26 locus were switched using 4-OHT and assayed for sensitivity to cisplatin or the PARP inhibitor olaparib. The cytotoxicity assays were conducted in parallel and data were normalized to the average of the wild-type controls. Error bars indicate the SD between the results of biologic triplicates for which the cells were independently switched. Signifi cant deviation from the average IC 50 values of the wild-type control (green line) is indicated. IC50 Relative to WT controls (%) 0 20 40 60 80 100 120 140 160 Cisplatin Olaparib * **** **** * * ** *** **** ns ns ns ns WT Vector M1400V L1407P M1411T R1699Q V1736A seems to be a less than wild-type response for the PALB2 interaction mutant L1407P. In the concurrent proliferation analysis, R1699Q and V1736A both show an intermediate functional defect (Supplementary Fig.  S4). Also the M1411T mutation seems to affect the response to PARP inhibition, but the difference with BRCA1 wild-type is not signifi cant. Interestingly, the L1407P and M1411T variants have previously been shown to be more defective than M1400V in a gene conversion assay ( 10 ). It should also be noted that, in contrast with the large-scale classifi cation experiments, the cisplatin sensitivity assay conducted in parallel to the PARP inhibitor assay identifi ed signifi cant functional defects for L1407P and V1736A.  DISCUSSION  Over the past few years several functional assays for classifi cation of BRCA1 VUSs have been developed. Several of these assays are restricted to functions of the BRCA1 protein that reside in the evolutionarily conserved RING or BRCT domains. Examples include in vitro transactivation assays for BRCT peptides ( 8 ) and measurement of ubiquitin ligase activity for protein fragments encompassing the N-terminal RING domain ( 33 ). Other assays were designed to evaluate the functions of full-length mutant BRCA1 protein, either by monitoring general effects on proliferation or response to DNA damage ( 7 ), or by directly focusing on the role of BRCA1 in DNA repair via HR ( 34 ).  Because BRCA1 VUSs are not restricted to regions encoding the N- or C-terminal domains, and given the observation that interaction between these domains is required for recruitment of BRCA1 to damaged DNA ( 35 ), functional assays for the full-length protein would be ideal. In principle, such assays can be conducted in cell lines derived from BRCA1 - mutated tumors, but there are indications that the outcome of assays for BRCA1 function depends on the cellular context. As absence of BRCA1 leads to loss of cellular viability, it is thought that additional mutations are required for BRCA1- associated tumorigenesis. For example, loss of p53 alleviates the consequences of BRCA1 defi ciency both in vitro and in vivo ( 4 ) and is common in BRCA1-defi cient tumors ( 36, 37 ). Also, depletion of 53BP1 is known to suppress the defects caused by BRCA1 defi ciency ( 5 , 38 , 39 ). Therefore, aberrations in BRCA1-defi cient tumor cells may mask functional defects of BRCA1 VUSs. We reasoned that assays in normal cells that can be depleted from endogenous BRCA1 expression are most likely to reveal functional defects of BRCA1 VUSs. The usefulness of this approach has been previously shown by Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1152 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. BAC complementation assays in mouse embryonic stem cells ( 7 , 40 ). However, mutagenesis of large BAC clones by recombineering and functional complementation of cells with these mutant constructs is time-consuming and technically demanding, and therefore cannot be conducted in a high-throughput setting. We therefore set out to develop a cDNA-based functional complementation assay in mouse embryonic stem cells that is easier to control and scale up and more suitable for routine functional classifi cation of BRCA1 sequence variants.  One advantage of BAC transgenics in complementation assays is that genes are expressed at physiologically relevant levels. This is the result of low copy-number integrations and the presence of natural regulatory elements required for proper gene expression. We decided to use RMCE to allow single-copy integration of BRCA1 cDNAs at one specifi c genomic locus. The use of RMCE effectively prevents multiple or partial integrations, concatemers, and position-effect variegation. As a result, all variants are expressed at equal levels. Moreover, transcription of BRCA1 cDNAs from the EF1A gene promoter results in physiologic levels of BRCA1 protein, comparable with those observed in embryonic stem cells stably transfected with a BAC containing the human BRCA1 locus. Indeed, the wild-type human BRCA1 cDNA was able to complement Brca1 -null embryonic stem cells in cellular proliferation, drug sensitivity, and HR assays. Our RMCE strategy uses BRCA1 cDNA constructs in which mutations can be swiftly introduced using SDM, enabling a higher throughput than introduction of mutations via BAC recombineering. In addition, the introduction of BRCA1 cDNAs via RMCE obviates the need to analyze multiple embryonic stem cell clones for correct integration and expression.  As a proof of principle, we used our functional complementation assay to analyze exonic BRCA1 VUSs that were identifi ed in families with HBOC in the Netherlands and Belgium, as well as a set of previously analyzed BRCA1 variants. A number of mutations resulted in reduced BRCA1 protein levels, most likely because of structural destabilization. In all cases, this led to diminished capacity for functional complementation. Also, several variants that gave rise to normal BRCA1 protein levels were unable to rescue the proliferation defect and cisplatin sensitivity of Brca1 -null embryonic stem cells. As BRCA1 loss of function mutations are associated with increased cancer risk, variants that score as functionally impaired in our embryonic stem cell assay system may be causally involved in tumor formation. This notion is supported by the fact that seven of eight known pathogenic or neutral control variants in our validation series were correctly classifi ed by the cisplatin sensitivity assay. The pathogenic 5382insC truncation mutation could not be classifi ed because it scored as neutral in one of three transfection series. This was probably due to technical reasons, as the 5382insC mutation did not restore HR activity in Brca1 -defi cient embryonic stem cells, in contrast with R1699Q, which was recently shown to confer intermediate risk of HBOC ( 32 ).  Our assay system yielded ambivalent results for nine other variants: S4F, S308A, S1651P, S1651F, T1691I, V1736A, E1735K, H1746Q, and R1753T. T1691I and E1735K were classifi ed as functionally impaired in only one cisplatin sensitivity test, whereas values from repeat experiments could not be taken into account because of RSE values above 0.1. S4F, S1651P, S1651F, V1736A, H1746Q, and R1753T were differently classifi ed in repeat experiments, which may refl ect technical fl aws or intermediate activity of these variants. Of note, the V1736A mutation was recently identifi ed as a pathogenic variant with hypomorphic activity in DNA repair ( 31 ). Although we did not measure signifi cant HR activity of V1736A in a DR-GFP gene conversion assay, intermediate activity of this variant is supported by the results of the proliferation assays and additional cisplatin sensitivity assays. S1651F showed HR activity similar to wild-type BRCA1 , whereas R1753T was HR-defi cient. S308A is an artifi cial mutation of a BRCA1 phosphorylation site that was able to support proliferation and resistance to DNA damage in an embryonic stem cell-based BAC complementation assay. However, S308A-complemented embryonic stem cells did show increased apoptosis when cultured in embryoid bodies ( 7 ), indicating a partial defect that might explain the ambivalent results for this mutation in our assays.  Our results show that BRCA1 variants should ideally be assayed in triplicate to avoid misclassifi cation. This also applies to BRCA1 VUS that we classifi ed as neutral, most of which were tested only once because in our current study we focused on variants that showed functional impairment. The striking restriction of unambiguously predicted pathogenic mutants to the terminal RING and BRCT domains suggests that some plasticity is allowed for the central domain of BRCA1. However, our dataset is still limited and more experiments are required to gain insight into the function of this domain.  Our cDNA-based system allows for several additional functional assays that have been described previously for BAC transgenic embryonic stem cells ( 7 ). These include assays for defects during in vitro and in vivo embryonic stem cell differentiation but also treatments with other cytotoxic agents. As a proof of principle, we investigated the activity of a number of mutants in the response to the PARP inhibitor olaparib. These included M1400V, L1407, and M1411T, which were previously shown to impair PALB2 binding and have a negative effect on BRCA1 function ( 10 ). Although the differences in sensitivity of BRCA1-defi cient versus BRCA1-profi cient embryonic stem cells are larger for olaparib than for cisplatin, increased variation between repeat experiments allowed us to identify functional defects only for L1407 and not for the other two variants in the PALB2 interaction domain, M1400V and M1411T. However, the R1699Q and V1736A variants, which are known to have hypomorphic activity, clearly showed a defect in the response to olaparib. Interestingly, both mutations are in the BRCT domain, and it has recently been shown that mutation of this domain especially confers sensitivity to PARP inhibition ( 41 ). Together, our results show that PARP inhibitor sensitivity assays may have added value, especially for the classifi cation of BRCA1 VUSs with intermediate phenotypes.  Platinum drugs and PARP inhibitors are selectively toxic to BRCA1-defi cient cells because they target HR defi ciency. Although the role of BRCA1 in HR is thought to be essential for maintaining genomic integrity and preventing accumulation of (oncogenic) mutations, other activities may also contribute to its tumor suppression function. These activities Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1153 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE may include the HR-independent role for BRCA1 in ICL repair, which has been attributed to the facilitation of FANCD2 accumulation at cross-linked DNA ( 16 ). Nevertheless, we observed a good correlation between the results of the cisplatin sensitivity assay and the results of the DR-GFP HR assay. All BRCA1 variants that failed to restore the cisplatin response in Brca1 -null embryonic stem cells were also defective in catalyzing gene conversion, thereby confi rming our functional classifi cation. It will be interesting to see if this holds true for all BRCA1 variants or whether there are also pathogenic mutations that have no effect on HR.  As with any other in vitro approach, our functional complementation assay system might still fail to identify all pathogenic variants because it does not necessarily recapitulate all aspects of BRCA1 function in vivo . A limitation of our cDNA-based assay is also that it cannot be used to investigate effects on mRNA splicing. Although algorithms have been designed to predict possible splice defects, the consequences of mutations outside of the consensus splice sites especially require functional validation experiments. For this purpose, BAC complementation assays ( 7 ), minigene-based splicing assays, or BRCA1 transcript analysis of patient blood samples ( 19 ) may be instrumental. However, transacting factors also affect splicing, and these may be tissue specifi c ( 42 ). A possible solution would be to determine the presence of BRCA1 splice variants in tumor tissue from BRCA1 VUS carriers and use this information to generate a cDNA construct for analysis of the functional consequences. To evaluate BRCA1 VUSs, there remains a need for multifactorial models that combine results from functional assays and in silico analyses with genetic evidence and other information from mutation carriers. This also includes DNA copy number data from tumors from BRCA1 VUS carriers, as it is known that BRCA1- associated breast tumors show distinct genomic aberrations ( 43, 44 ). Our functional assay system does however provide a robust and easily implementable tool for the functional characterization of large numbers of BRCA1 VUSs within the context of the full-length protein. It is our hope that our assay system will fi nd its way to clinical genetics laboratories where it can be used to aid genetic counseling. Ideally, these tests should be coordinated on an international level and in close collaboration with the ENIGMA consortium.    Genetic screening of the breast and ovarian cancer susceptibility gene BRCA1 has uncovered a large number of variants of uncertain clinical significance. Here, we use biochemical and cellbased transcriptional assays to assess the structural and functional defects associated with a large set of 117 distinct BRCA1 missense variants within the essential BRCT domain of the BRCA1 protein that have been documented in individuals with a family history of breast or ovarian cancer. In the first method, we used limited proteolysis to assess the protein folding stability of each of the mutants compared with the wild-type. In the second method, we used a phosphopeptide pull-down assay to assess the ability of each of the variants to specifically interact with a peptide containing a pSer-X-X-Phe motif, a known functional target of the BRCA1 BRCT domain. Finally, we used transcriptional assays to assess the ability of each BRCT variant to act as a transcriptional activation domain in human cells. Through a correlation of the assay results with available family history and clinical data, we define limits to predict the disease risk associated with each variant. Forty-two of the variants show little effect on function and are likely to represent variants with little or no clinical significance; 50 display a clear functional effect and are likely to represent pathogenic variants; and the remaining 25 variants display intermediate activities. The excellent agreement between the structure/function effects of these mutations and available clinical data supports the notion that functional and structure information can be useful in the development of models to assess cancer risk. Introduction Since the cloning of BRCA1 in 1994, a large effort has been made to sequence the BRCA1 genes of women who are at increased risk for early-onset breast and ovarian cancers (1). Corresponding Author: J.N. Mark Glover or Alvaro N.A. Monteiro, Department of Biochemistry, University of Alberta, Edmonton, Alberta, T6G 2H7, Canada. Phone: 780-492-2136; Fax: 780-492-0886; mark.glover@ualberta.ca or alvaro.monteiro@moffitt.org. Reprints and Subscriptions: To order reprints of this article or to subscribe to the journal, contact the AACR Publications Department at pubs@aacr.org. Note: Supplementary data for this article are available at Cancer Research Online (http://cancerres.aacrjournals.org/). Disclosure of Potential Conflicts of Interest: No potential conflicts of interest were disclosed. NIH Public Access Author Manuscript Cancer Res. Author manuscript; available in PMC 2011 June 15. Published in final edited form as: Cancer Res. 2010 June 15; 70(12): 4880–4890. doi:10.1158/0008-5472.CAN-09-4563. NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript This effort has revealed several mutations that are strongly linked to cancer. Unfortunately, a large number of rare BRCA1 variants have been uncovered in the human population for which risk assessment has been problematic, due to a lack of informative pedigree data linking each mutation with disease risk. BRCA1 encodes a large, 1,863–amino acid nuclear protein that plays a critical role in the response of cells to genotoxic stress (2–4). BRCA1 is thought to act as an essential mediator protein in DNA damage–induced nuclear signaling events, in which it interacts with phosphorylated partner proteins such as the DNA helicase, BACH1, the nuclease CtIP, and another signaling protein, Abraxas, to relay signals generated from chromatin surrounding the damage to downstream targets such as DNA repair proteins and factors involved in cell cycle regulation (5–11). Interactions with phosphorylated partner proteins are mediated by a tandem pair of repeats at the COOH terminus of BRCA1, termed BRCT repeats (12–14). The BRCT repeat region can also act as a transcriptional activation domain when linked to a sequence-specific DNA binding module, and this activity may contribute to the ability of BRCA1 to regulate the expression of genes such as p21 and GADD45 (15,16) and modulate the activity of other transcription factors such as p53 and ER (17,18). The NH2-terminal region of the protein contains a RING domain, which forms a heterodimeric complex with the RING domain of BARD1 to form a ubiquitin ligase (19–21). Cancer-associated mutations tend to cluster in the RING and BRCT repeat regions, showing the critical role of these domains in BRCA1 tumor suppression. The BRCA1 BRCT domain specifically interacts with phosphorylated protein targets containing the motif pSer-x-x-Phe. Structural studies have revealed that recognition involves a conserved phosphoserine recognition pocket in the NH2-terminal BRCT repeat, composed of Ser1655, Gly1656, and Lys1702, which each supply ligands to recognize the phosphate (12–14). The phenylalanine residue at the +3 position of the peptide target is recognized by a largely hydrophobic groove formed at the interface between the repeats. Phosphopeptide recognition is likely a common function of BRCT domains in many proteins associated with DNA damage–mediated signal transduction. For example, the phosphorylated form of the histone variant, H2AX, which serves as a critical chromatin mark of DNA double-strand breaks, is specifically bound by the tandem BRCT repeats of MDC1 to initiate DNA doublestrand break signaling (22,23). Several studies have attempted to predict the cancer risks associated with unclassified missense variants in BRCA1 through bioinformatics analysis based on multiple sequence alignment data and protein structure prediction, as well as analyses of the clinical and family history data available for some of these mutations (1,24–28). These studies indicate that the RING and BRCT domains, which are the most highly conserved regions of BRCA1, likely contain the vast majority of cancer-associated mutations. Here, we use in vitro protein folding, phosphopeptide-binding, and cell-based transcriptional assays to assess the structural and functional consequences of a set of 117 distinct missense variants that have been uncovered in the BRCA1 BRCT domain in the human population. Our results indicate that nearly one half of the BRCT missense variants result in significant structural and/or functional defects that are likely associated with an increased cancer risk. Materials and Methods Proteolysis assays pLM1 plasmid (0.25 μg) encoding the BRCT variants was used directly as template for protein synthesis reactions with the TNT-Quick in vitro transcription/translation system (Promega). Both wild-type and mutant proteins were produced by in vitro transcription/ translation because many mutants could not be expressed in soluble form in Escherichia coli. The stability of the protein fold for the BRCA1 BRCT mutants was tested using Lee et al. Page 2 Cancer Res. Author manuscript; available in PMC 2011 June 15. NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript proteolysis assays, as previously reported (29). The measurements were normalized against the internal background, and the control measurements taken in the same day. The missense variants were tested in triplicate. Phosphopeptide-binding assays The BRCT variants were translated and labeled as in proteolysis assays. The ability of the BRCA1 BRCT mutants to bind pSer-containing peptides was tested using peptide-binding assays, as previously reported (14). Bead-immobilized peptide affinity resin was prepared by incubating a 10-fold molar excess of a biotinylated phosphopeptide (SRSTpSPTFNK) and the corresponding unphosphorylated peptide (SRSTSPTFNK) with streptavidin agarose beads (SigmaAldrich). Seven mutants, with the wild-type BRCA1-BRCT (1,646–1,858) as a positive control, and M1775R and A1708E as negative controls were examined at a time. The intensities of the bands were measured and the backgrounds were corrected using ImageQuaNT (Amersham Biosciences), and the measurements were normalized against the wild-type measurement taken in the same day. The missense variants were tested in triplicate. Transcriptional assays The construct containing wild-type BRCA1 amino acids 1,646 to 1,859 (wt) was used as a positive control and variants M1775R and Y1853X as negative controls. HEK293T cells were seeded in 24-well tissue culture plates, 1 × 105  cells per well, and 24 hours later were transfected in triplicates with Fugene 6 according to the manufacturer's instructions (Roche). The vectors containing the variants were cotransfected with pG5Luc, which contains a firefly luciferase reporter gene driven by GAL4-responsive binding sites, and phGR-TK, which contains a Renilla luciferase gene driven by a constitutive TK basal promoter used as an internal control. Cells were harvested 24 hours after transfection, and luciferase activity was measured using the Dual-Luciferase Reporter Assay System (Promega) following the manufacturer's instructions. Activity was plotted as a percentage of the wt BRCA1 activity. Thirty-four of 117 variants had already been assessed in previous articles, albeit in different amino acid contexts (amino acids 1,396–1863 or aa 1,560–1863; refs. 30–32). In only one case (G1706A), the qualitative assessment differed because it was considered of moderate effect previously and of no effect in the present study. This shows the high reproducibility of the transcriptional assays. Align-GVGD classification of BRCA1 BRCT variants The 117 BRCT variants were analyzed with the Align-GVGD algorithm at three depths of alignment. Nine mammalian BRCA1 sequences, chicken and one additional sequence (either frog, puffer fish, or sea urchin), were used for the alignment (for more detail, see ref. 33). A-class scores were assigned for variants in which the scores from at least two of three alignments agreed. Definition of a validation set To compile our validation set (Supplementary Table S1; Table 1), we identified variants that had been previously analyzed and classified by genetic (1) or integrative methods (25, 34– 40). Integrative methods use a combination of data from different sources, including cooccurrence with known deleterious mutations, personal and family history of patients carrying the variant, and cosegregation of the variant with disease within pedigrees, to assign an overall risk score. Sufficient data were available to assign 14 of the BRCA1 BRCT variants as associated with disease, whereas 10 of the variants were predicted to be neutral Lee et al. Page 3 Cancer Res. Author manuscript; available in PMC 2011 June 15. NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript (Table 1). Where possible, the probability of pathogenicity of each of these variants was classified according to the IARC scheme (Supplementary Table S1; ref. 41). We calculated specificity, sensitivity, and 95% confidence interval measures for each of the structure and functional assays based on a comparison with this variant set (Supplementary Table S2). A description of how the BRCA1 BRCT variant set was obtained is given in Supplementary Materials and Methods. Results Generation of a large set of BRCA1 BRCT missense variants Many of the BRCA1 variants that have been uncovered through worldwide sequencing efforts are now deposited within the Breast Cancer Information Core database (http://research.nhgri.nih.gov/bic/) as well as the Kathleen Cuningham Foundation Consortium for research into Familial Breast Cancer database (http://www.kconfab.org). To facilitate the assessment of the structural and functional defects associated with these mutations, we cloned all the currently available missense variants (Fig. 1) into an E. coli expression vector that we used previously for our structural and functional work of the BRCA1 BRCT domain. This vector places the BRCA1 BRCT coding sequence (corresponding to residues 1,646–1,859) under control of a T7 promotor. Using this plasmid system, recombinant protein can be expressed in E. coli and purified using established procedures for detailed biochemical and structural studies. The T7 promoter can also be used for in vitro transcription/translation of the recombinant protein. The in vitro transcription/translation system is rapid and allows the generation of multiple proteins in parallel and, because the recombinant protein is specifically labeled with 35S-methionine, no purification is required. All variants can be successfully made in this system, regardless of their folding stability. This is a further advantage over E. coli expression, in which we have found that only well-folded variants can be expressed in soluble form and purified. Thus, we have used in vitro transcribed/translated material for our structural stability and peptidebinding assays described below. We also evaluated the possibility that some of these variants could result in splicing abnormalities. We used the NNSplice 0.9 algorithm (42) to predict the effects of these changes on the efficiency with the BRCT coding region (see Supplementary Materials). Determination of the protein folding defects associated with BRCT missense variants We used limited proteolysis to determine the stability of the protein fold in the set of BRCA1 BRCT missense variants using in vitro transcribed/translated material (Supplementary Fig. S1). The wild-type protein is highly resistant to digestion by trypsin, elastase, or chymotrypsin, indicating that the in vitro produced BRCT protein is stably folded (43). On the other hand, a pilot study involving 25 of the BRCA1 BRCT missense variants showed that certain single amino acid substitutions in the BRCT domain of BRCA1 can destabilize its structure, leading to increased susceptibility to trypsin-mediated proteolysis (29). The assay is sufficiently sensitive to discriminate wild-type protein from the strongly destabilized variant A1708E as well as the moderately destabilized variant M1775R. Proteolysis of each of the missense variants was carried out at a series of trypsin concentrations, and the amount of full-length protein remaining was visualized by SDSPAGE. The results were compared with those of the wild-type protein as well as the M1775R and A1708E variants carried out in parallel. We quantified the percentages of fulllength protein remaining following digestion at different concentrations of trypsin and determined the severity of the destabilizing effects by comparing the percentage of protein remaining following digestion at 10 μg/mL trypsin to the controls (Supplementary Fig. S2A). We defined highly destabilizing mutations as those with similar rates of digestion to Lee et al. Page 4 Cancer Res. Author manuscript; available in PMC 2011 June 15. NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript the A1708E control (<5% of the protein remaining after digestion with 10 μg/mL of trypsin). Moderately destabilizing mutations were defined as those with a similar stability to M1775R (between 5% and 65% of the protein remaining after digestion with 10 μg/mL of trypsin). Finally, structurally stable variants were defined as those with a stability similar to the wild-type protein (>65% of the protein remaining after 10 μg/mL of trypsin digestion). Based on these criteria, 26 of 117 of the missense mutations showed high sensitivity to tryptic digestion; 30 of 117 showed intermediate sensitivity; and 61 of 117 showed a stability that was indistinguishable from the wild-type (Supplementary Figs. S2A and S3). We also noted that the C1697R mutant showed a particularly low protein expression level. Analysis of the phosphopeptide binding activity of BRCT missense variants The BRCA1 BRCT domain interacts with BACH1 and several other proteins through the selective recognition of the peptide motif pSer-x-x-Phe (10–14,44). All mutations that have been strongly linked to disease using family-based data, such as A1708E and M1775R (1,35), fail to bind specifically to pSer-x-x-Phe–containing peptides as shown in a pilot study that analyzed the peptide binding activities of 25 BRCA1 BRCT domain variants (14). This indicates the functional importance of the BRCA1 BRCT domain as a phosphopeptidebinding module in tumor suppression. We examined the ability of the BRCT domains containing missense variants to bind peptides derived from BACH1 using a pull-down assay in which biotinylated peptide was bound to streptavidin beads. We tested binding to a phosphorylated version of the peptide containing the BRCA1 target sequence pSer-Pro-Thr-Phe or an unphosphorylated version as a control. The results were compared with experiments with the wild-type BRCA1 BRCT as well as with the peptide binding–deficient variants A1708E and M1775R carried out in parallel. We present two analyses of the data. In the first analysis, we define “binding activity” as the fraction of the input protein that bound to the phosphorylated peptide, normalized against the binding of the wild-type protein (Supplementary Fig. S2B). In the second analysis, we define “binding specificity” as the ratio of the variant bound to the phosphopeptide compared with the nonphosphorylated counterpart, normalized to the wildtype control (Supplementary Fig. S2C). Classified in this way, we observed a range of binding activities and specificities. As observed for the protein stability assays, the variants tended to cluster near either 100% or 0% activity, with relatively few variants displaying intermediate binding activities/specificities (Supplementary Fig. S3). Thirty-eight of 117 of the variants displayed binding activities >80% of wild-type levels, whereas 35 of 117 variants displayed binding activities <20% of wild-type. The binding specificity analysis revealed 29 of 117 of the variants exhibited >80% of wild-type levels, whereas 50 of 117 of the variants exhibited <20% of wild-type levels. Analysis of the transcriptional activation activity of BRCA1 BRCT variants The transcriptional activation activity of the BRCA1 BRCT domain was the first identified activity of this region of the protein (15,16). Assays for BRCA1 BRCT transcriptional activation have been established in human and yeast cell systems (45). In either method, the BRCT domain is fused to a heterologous DNA binding domain that recognizes a defined regulatory sequence within the promoter of the reporter. Pilot studies involving subsets of the BRCA1 BRCT variants showed that mutations that have been associated with cancer using family-based data abrogate, or markedly diminish, the expression of the reporter gene (31,32,46). Moreover, the fact that mutations that destabilize the BRCT fold are strongly associated with a loss of transactivation function indicates that this assay is a monitor of the integrity of the BRCT domain (29). Lee et al. Page 5 Cancer Res. Author manuscript; available in PMC 2011 June 15. NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript As observed for the protein stability and phosphopeptide-binding assays, a wide range of transcriptional activities were observed for the variant set, with the observed values tending to cluster either at very low or very high activity levels (Supplementary Figs. S2D and S3). Thirty-eight of 117 variants displayed transcriptional activity levels at >80% of wild-type, whereas 54 of 117 were found to be <20% of wild-type levels. Correlation of structural and functional data with family history and clinical data The use of functional data in cancer risk assessment is predicated on rigorous validation of the results against sets of variants for which cancer risks are well defined. Easton and colleagues (35) have assigned risks based on genetic data for a large number of BRCA1 variants. We used these data, together with available genetic information for several other variants (25,34–40), to create a validation set of 24 variants, consisting of 14 deleterious mutations and 10 neutral variants (Table 1). We plotted the protein stability, peptide binding, and transcriptional activity data against the combined log10 likelihood ratio scores for the subset of 19 variants analyzed by Easton and colleagues (Fig. 2; likelihood ratio). In general, this analysis revealed a clear correlation between structural/functional defects and cancer risk (35). A comparison of all the genetically characterized variants with the experimental results is shown in Table 1. This comparison was used to define the sensitivities and specificities of the functional assays. Sensitivity ranged from 81.8% for phosphopeptide binding activity to 100% for phosphopeptide binding specificity and transcription assays. Specificity ranged from 75% for proteolysis assays to 87.5% for transcription assays, to 100% for binding activity assays (Supplementary Table S2). Although overall there is a good agreement between the assessed cancer risks and the functional activities of the variants, there are several variants in which cancer risk assessment and the structure/function results do not agree. For example, a significant number of cancer-associated (IARC classes 5 and 4) variants are not structurally destabilized as determined by the proteolysis assay. Each of these variants (R1699W, M1775R, and M1775K) is highly defective for specific phosphopeptide recognition and transcriptional activity. Structural studies reveal that both Arg1699 and Met1775 make critical direct contacts to the phosphopeptide (12–14), and structural investigations of the M1775R and M1775K variants reveal subtle structural rearrangements that block the +3 specificity pocket (37,47). Two of the cancer-associated (IARC class 5) variants, I1766S and G1788V, were highly defective in the proteolysis and transcriptional assays; however, they showed significant levels of nonspecific peptide binding, independent of phosphorylation. It is likely that the unfolded state of these variants exposes hydrophobic residues that are responsible for these nonspecific interactions, as suggested previously (14). G1706E, one of the cancer-associated (IARC class 5) variants, is defective in the proteolysis and peptidebinding assays; however, it shows an intermediate level of transcriptional activity. The neutral (IARC class 1) variant V1736A exhibited the least agreement between the different assays, showing significant sensitivity to proteolysis and a strong transcriptional defect while showing intermediate/strong levels of phosphopeptide interaction. Considering the overall high specificity and sensitivity obtained in the assays (Supplementary Table S2), we have defined limits to predict disease association for the uncharacterized variants based on the biochemical and transcriptional assay data (Table 1; Fig. 2). It is important to stress that the definition of these limits should not be used for classifying variants in terms of their pathogenicity in the absence of additional data. The cancer-associated (IARC classes 5 and 4) variants in general exhibited protein stability levels <58% of the wild-type, phosphopeptide binding activities <32% of wild-type, phosphopeptide specificity binding activities <21% of wild-type, and transcriptional activation function <35% of wild-type levels. Conversely, the neutral variants (IARC classes 1 and 2) in general had protein stability levels >59% of the wild-type, phosphopeptide Lee et al. Page 6 Cancer Res. Author manuscript; available in PMC 2011 June 15. NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript binding activities >67% of wild-type, phosphopeptide specificity binding activities >49% of wild-type, and transcriptional activation function >76% of wild-type levels. Variants falling between these limits are defined as uncertain. Using these limits, we have defined the structure and functional activities of each of the variants (Fig. 3). Comparison of results from different assays and overall classification Next, we compared the results from the different assays for the entire set of variants (Fig. 3). In 64 of 117 (54.7%) of the variants, there was complete concordance between the different assays, with 35 of 117 (29.9%) giving protein stability, peptide binding, and transcription activities within the limits that correspond to neutral variants in IARC classes 1 and 2, whereas 29 of 117 (24.8%) exhibited values in the range corresponding to cancer-associated (IARC classes 4 and 5) variants for each of the assays. Based on these results, we have classified the variants into groups based on their functional effect (Table 2). Although classification is straightforward for those variants in which there is a complete agreement between the different assays, for the variants in which there is not a complete agreement, classification is more complex. The largest class of discordant results includes variants that exhibit defects in binding and transcription but little or no folding defect (6 of 117 variants or 5.1%). These variants likely directly affect the phosphopeptide binding surface and may only affect residues that are exposed to the solvent preserving the overall fold structure. Because phosphopeptide recognition is critical for the tumorsuppressive function of BRCA1 (14,48), we have therefore included these variants in the strong functional effect class. Likewise, severely destabilized variants that show significant levels of phosphorylation-independent peptide binding but a strong transcriptional defect have also been categorized as strong functional effect (Table 2). We have also described eight of the variants as of “moderate functional effect” in which a preponderance of the data points to a loss of function. These include variants with intermediate levels of peptide binding specificity (W1837G and A1843P) or transcriptional activity (V1696L, G1706E, and H1746N), and strong defects in all of the other assays. In addition, we have included three additional mutants in this group that show poor agreement between the different assays but are likely to directly affect the peptide-binding surface. S1655F is predicted to impede recognition of the phosphoserine in the bound peptide, whereas G1656D could perturb the structure of the phosphoserine-binding pocket, and the introduction of a negatively charged side chain in this region would be expected to further inhibit phosphopeptide recognition. R1699L would remove a critical determinant for recognition of the phenylalanine residue at the +3 position of the phosphopeptide, and indeed, the similar R1699W variant is pathogenic (IARC class 5; Table 1). We predict a given variant to be neutral when each of the assays gives values similar to wild-type within the limits defined by comparison with the set of variants that have been characterized through family history and genetic data. In addition, we define a set of seven variants as “low functional effect” that display an intermediate activity for one of the assays and wild-type levels for the other three. Finally, there is a group of 25 variants (21.4%) that we define as “uncertain.” In general, these variants show a poor level of agreement between the different assays, and a significant number of assay results in the intermediate range. Correlation of mutant classification with predictions from Align-GVGD The Align-GVGD method (http://agvgd.iarc.fr/agvgd_input.php) uses protein multiple sequence alignment (PMSA) data to provide cancer risk estimates for BRCA1 mutations (33). In this method, each missense variant is classified based on the observed amino acid Lee et al. Page 7 Cancer Res. Author manuscript; available in PMC 2011 June 15. NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript fluctuation at that position in the PMSA (the Grantham variance, GV) as well as a comparison of the amino acid substitution with the range of amino acids observed at that position (Grantham difference, GD). In this way, seven classes of variants (C0, C15, C25, C35, C45, C55, and C65) that represent a graded series of GV-GD scores were defined. Variants in the C0 class correspond to variants that are well conserved in the PMSA and are therefore predicted to be neutral, whereas the C65 class contains missense variants that deviate from the PMSA and likely associated with an increased cancer risk. To assess the accuracy of the Align GV-GD method, we compared Align GV-GD scores to the results for the structure/function assays (Fig. 4). For the variants with no functional effect, a large majority (28 of 35, 80%) falls into the C0 class, three are classified as C15, and two are classified as C25. Only one of them, G1706A, received a high score in Align GV-GD, C55. Another variant at this position (G1706E) scored as C65, but this variant was classified with moderate functional effect by structure/function assays. These results suggest substitution of a small side chain at position 1,706 is tolerated, but not substitution of the larger, charged Glu. For the variants with strong functional effect, 25 of 42 (59.5%) are in the C65 class and 16 are spread throughout classes C15 to C55 (Fig. 4B). One missense variant (A1752P) was classified C0, but this variant shows strong defect in all assays. The substitution of a proline at position 1,752 likely destabilizes the linker α-helix, which may be responsible for the strong folding defect associated with this variant. Overall, there is strong agreement between Align GV-GD predictions and the results of functional assays, indicating that sequence alignment–based predictive methods can offer a valuable measure of risk assessment for variants in which there is no direct functional data. Discussion Here, we present the first comprehensive assessment of the structural and functional consequences of 117 BRCA1 variants corresponding to the complete set of BRCT missense variants detected to date in the human population (100% coverage). Our protein structure assay, peptide binding, and transcriptional assays show a remarkable degree of agreement and give us confidence in the validity of these results. Correlation of this experimental data with the available clinical and family history data for a subset of these variants defines limits that can be used to tentatively predict functional effect that is likely to be reflected in the disease risk associated with these variants. In this way, we show that 42.7% of the variants fall into the “clear functional effect” or “moderate functional effect” categories (Table 2) and are likely associated with an increased cancer risk, whereas 35.9% fall into the “no functional effect” or “low functional effect” categories. The remaining 21.4% falls into the uncertain category and could perhaps represent low-penetrance variants. The fact that a large proportion of variants tested displayed some functional effect lends support to the idea of applying higher prior probabilities for causality to variants found in the BRCT domains (35). The BRCA1 BRCT variant set provides a useful set of reagents for further detailed study of variants of particular interest. For example, variants that are moderately well folded based on proteolytic stability can often be purified and studied in more detail. Circular dicroism spectroscopy and differential scanning calorimetry have been used to quantitatively assess the fold stability of V1696L, R1699W, M1775K, M1775R, M1783T, V1808A, V1809F, and V1833M (49–51). Although our proteolytic assay indicated that the stability of two of these variants, R1699W and V1808A, were indistinguishable from wild-type, the more sensitive thermodynamic studies of the purified forms of these variants reveal a small but significant reduction in fold stability. In addition, quantitative assays of phosphopeptide binding, such as isothermal titration calorimetry, can reveal the detailed thermodynamics of peptide-BRCT interactions (50,51). The structural rearrangements induced by three of these variants, M1775R (47), M1775K (37), and V1809F (14), have been visualized through Lee et al. Page 8 Cancer Res. Author manuscript; available in PMC 2011 June 15. NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript NIH-PA Author Manuscript crystallographic structural analysis. Each of the variants affect the +3 specificity pocket formed at the interface between the two BRCT repeats. For M1775R and M1775K, the substituted positively charged side chain adopts an orientation that fills the specificity pocket and blocks the binding of the Phe side chain at the +3 position of the target peptide. Intriguingly, the V1809F substitution, which occurs far from the +3 pocket, induces a series of conformational adjustments that results in the movement of Met1775 to fill the specificity pocket, explaining the loss of peptide binding specificity and transcriptional activity associated with this variant. Nonsynonymous single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNP) that lead to amino acid substitutions are likely to have diverse phenotypic consequences and implications for human disease. Although computational methods have been proposed to assess the effect of individual SNPs (52), relatively little has been done at the experimental level to provide insight into the effects of SNPs. The database of BRCA1/BRCA2 mutations provides an important first look at the kind of genetic diversity that exists in the human population. Another example of a large mutation database is that assembled for mutations found in p53 from human tumors. Detailed studies of the stability of the p53 DNA binding domain indicate that, like the BRCA1 BRCT domain, this relatively unstable domain is sensitive to mutations that destabilize the protein fold in addition to other classes of mutations that do not significantly affect protein fold stability but instead modify DNA-binding or proteinprotein interaction surfaces (53). Thus, rapid, general assays of protein structure and function such as the proteolysis assay used here could potentially prove useful for the rapid, high-throughput assessment of the effect of SNPs on protein function. Ultimately, unambiguous classification of variants, as proposed by the IARC Unclassified Genetic variants Working Group (41), will need a comprehensive integrative model to incorporate data from several sources. Robust integrative models have been proposed but they still lack a coherent framework to incorporate functional data. A major roadblock in the development of such a model was the lack of an established series of functional assays with standardized controls, validated against available genetic data. The present study fills this gap and allows for the development of better predictive models. Although a systematic large-scale classification of all BRCA1 variants into the IARC classes has not yet been done, it is expected that a large number will fall into class 3 (uncertain), due to the lack of genetic-based data. Conceivably, even large-scale efforts may not be able to gather sufficient genetic data on individual variants because most are extremely rare. Thus, we anticipate that the use of structural and functional information will be instrumental to move variants from the class 3 into classes that provide a basis for better risk assessment and clinical decisions. In addition, the fact that variants can now also be functionally and structurally rationalized will provide an impulse for further functional dissection of the tumor-suppressive activities of BRCA1.  
2580||There have been few published analyses of the effects of missense mutations of the BRCA1 gene on BRCA1 protein function. In this study, we adapted a previously described homology directed recombination (HDR) assay to the analysis of the effects of BRCA1 point substitutions on its function in recombination. We established a HeLa-derived cell line, which has integrated in its genome a recombination substrate. Following transfection of a plasmid that expresses the endonuclease that creates a double-stranded break in the recombination substrate, HDR is readily scored by the percentage of GFP-positive cells. By combining RNAi specific for the cellular BRCA1 mRNA with expression of BRCA1 mutants resistant to the RNAi, we could effectively replace the endogenous BRCA1 protein with selected point mutants of BRCA1 and test these in the recombination assay. We found that both, the amino- and carboxy-terminal ~300 residues of BRCA1 were essential for directing HDR. Sixteen missense mutants from the amino terminus of BRCA1 were analyzed for function in HDR, and we found that several point mutants fully replaced the wild-type BRCA1 and are neutral in this process. Mutation of any single zinc-coordinating residue was fully defective in this assay. Several protein variants due to missense mutations, including methionine-18 to threonine and threonine-37 to arginine were also found to be defective for recombination. We have thus established a robust assay system for the analysis of the effects of specific missense mutations of BRCA1 in regulating the homologous recombination process.  Go to: Introduction The Breast Cancer associated gene 1 (BRCA1) is a tumor suppressor that is specifically associated with familial cases of breast cancer and ovarian cancer (1). In familial breast cancer, a woman may inherit a BRCA1 allele with a mutation, and during her lifetime there is a high likelihood that in at least one breast epithelial cell the second, non-mutated, allele of BRCA1 will be lost by deletion. Such a cell is hemizygous for BRCA1 and the one remaining allele has a mutation. If that mutation renders the BRCA1 defective for a key biological function, then that cell has increased likelihood of transforming into a breast tumor.  The BRCA1 gene has been sequenced from many individuals with a family history of breast cancer, and many of the characterized mutations result in a frame shift or a stop codon and truncate the encoded BRCA1 protein. Clearly, such truncating mutations predispose to breast cancer. Missense mutations, however, can present a diagnostic dilemma since specific point mutations have low prevalence in the population and the disease association is often unclear. Several genetic and evolutionary analyses can predict whether a given point mutation is likely to predispose to breast cancer, but the interpretation can be ambiguous (2–4).  Although there have been many studies assessing the functional implication of BRCA1 mutations, there has been no systematic functional studies that are designed for analysis of the full length protein or that assess a biological process such as homologous recombination. Several in vitro biochemical assays have tested the effects of point mutations in protein-protein interactions (5), in BRCA1-dependent ubiquitin ligase activity (6), and in the control of the centrosome (7). A tissue culture cell-based assay fuses 468 amino acids from the BRCA1 carboxy-terminus to a DNA-binding domain and analyzes the effect of the mutant on a transcription-based reporter assay (8). This latter assay has been very successful in assigning whether a missense mutation is associated with loss of transcription function, but the assay cannot evaluate BRCA1 sequences in the amino-terminal three-fourths of the protein, and the assay does not address non-transcription functions of BRCA1, such as regulation of DNA repair.  In this study, we have adapted the homologous recombination assay that BRCA1 regulates (9–11) to a robust method to analyze specific BRCA1 protein variants. The modified assay tests specific BRCA1 missense mutations in the homologous recombination process. We have characterized a set of point mutations in the amino terminus of BRCA1 in this assay as an initial step in determining whether a BRCA1 variant of unknown function may predispose to breast cancer.  Go to: Materials and Methods Plasmids, siRNA, and Cell Lines  The plasmid encoding the recombination substrate, pDR-GFP, and the I-SceI expression plasmid, cBAS, were both kindly provided by Drs. K. Nakanishi and M. Jasin (Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Center, NY, NY). BRCA1 expression plasmid, pcDNA-5’HA-BRCA1, has been previously described (12), and site-specific point mutations identified on the Breast Cancer Information Core (BIC) were generated using the Quick Change Kit from Stratagene. Details of the subcloning are available upon request. Plasmids for the expression of BRCA1 deletion mutants have been previously described (12, 13).  Sequences of the 3’-UTR of BRCA1 were targeted with siRNA oligonucleotides based on the sequence GCUCCUCUCACUCUUCAGU specific for nucleotides 80,780 to 80,798 of the BRCA1 gene (accession number AY273801). BRCA2 was targeted using siRNA based on the sequence UAAAUUUGGACAUAAGGAGUCCUCC. The control siRNA, called GL2, targets the luciferase gene (14).  A stable derivative of HeLa cells was established by transfection with pDR-GFP using standard procedures and selection in 1.5 µg/ml puromycin. Puromycin-resistant cells were cloned by limiting dilution in 96 well plates, and an initial screen selected those colonies that had no detectable GFP fluorescence. Remaining colonies were replica plated and transfected in parallel with cBAS to express the I-SceI. The untransfected stocks of those clones with intense fluorescence in a high percentage of cells were selected and re-cloned by limiting dilution. The number of integration sites in the final cell line, HeLa-DR13-9, was determined by digesting genomic DNA with XhoI and analyzing by Southern blotting.  Homology Directed Recombination Assay  On day 1, HeLa-DR13-9 cells, approximately 4.0 × 104 cells in a 1.5 cm well were transfected with 5 pmoles of BRCA1 siRNA targeting the 3’-UTR of BRCA1 gene and 0.3 µg of the appropriate BRCA1 expression plasmid in the presence of 0.5 µl of lipofectamine-2000 (Invitrogen). On day 2, the transfected cells were transferred to 3.5 cm well dishes. On day 3, the cells were transfected with 25 pmoles of the BRCA1 siRNA, 0.75 µg of the appropriate BRCA1 expression plasmid, plus 0.75 µg of cBAS in the presence of 2.5 µl of lipofectamine-2000. On day 6, cells were trypsinized and 10,000 cells from each well were counted by flow cytometry using a Becton Dickinson FACSCalibur instrument in the OSU Comprehensive Cancer Center Analytical Cytometry shared resource.  All point mutants of BRCA1 analyzed were tested in triplicate and the percentage of cells with recombined locus encoding GFP were normalized to the same percentage from the control siRNA transfected cells. In the figures, the averages are shown with the standard error of the mean depicted by error bars.  Immunoprecipitation analysis  HEK293T cells were transfected with the same BRCA1 variant expression constructs as used in the HDR assay. Whole cell lysates were harvested 2 days post transfection and subjected to immunoaffinity purification using the HA.11 anti-HA tag antibody (Covance) by standard procedures (12). Western blots were analyzed with anti-HA antibody and anti-BARD1 antibody H-300 (Santa Cruz) by standard methods.  Go to: Results Both the amino- and carboxy-termini of BRCA1 are required for BRCA1 regulation of homology directed recombination  We adapted an established assay (15) for homologous recombination in which two inactive alleles of green fluorescent protein (GFP) are integrated in a single locus in the genome of the cell. One allele contains the 18 bp recognition element for the I-SceI endonuclease. Transfection into the cells of a plasmid for expressing the I-SceI results in a double strand break in one GFP allele, and this break can be repaired by homology directed recombination (HDR) using the second inactive allele of GFP. (The plasmids encoding the recombination substrate and the I-SceI endonuclease were the gift of M. Jasin, Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center, NY, NY.) This repair results in gene conversion that creates a GFP allele that encodes an active protein, and the recombination can be detected by identifying green fluorescing cells. This plasmid and strategy (Figure 1A) has been successfully used in a variety of experiments in which a cell line carrying a mutant version of a protein under study has had this recombination substrate inserted in the cell and the effect of the specific protein was then evaluated (15–17). We instead inserted a copy of this recombination substrate into HeLa cells and carefully selected a clone, called HeLa-DR13-9, which has no background GFP fluorescence, but following transfection of the I-SceI expressing plasmid there is a high level of GFP-positive cells. In many repeated experiments, between 10% and 20% of the cells will undergo recombination following I-SceI expression. This cell line is then useful for the analysis of RNAi-depletion of proteins and testing for their effects in HDR.  Figure 1 Figure 1 The Homology-Directed Recombination Assay HeLa-DR13-9 cells were transfected with either a control siRNA or an siRNA specific to BRCA1. Two days later these cells were re-transfected with the appropriate siRNA plus the plasmid for expression of I-SceI, and three days later the percentage of GFP-positive cells was determined by flow-cytometry. The reduction in GFP-positive cells when BRCA1 is depleted is evident from inspection of the resultant monolayers (Figure 1B) and is quantified by flow cytometry (10,000 cells counted per sample). In the experiment for Figure 2, in the absence of transfected I-SceI expression plasmid, there are no GFP-positive cells (Figure 2, lane 1). In the presence of I-SceI and a control siRNA 16% of the cells were GFP-positive (lane 2). Depletion of BRCA1 or BRCA2 reduced the number of cells with recombined GFP-alleles by eight-fold or 40-fold, respectively. Similar reductions in HDR were observed with siRNAs targeting other BRCA1 and BRCA2 sequences, indicating that these results are not due to off-target effects of the siRNA (data not shown). Further, these results are consistent with published observations (9, 18). Importantly, when the siRNA targets the 3’-UTR of the BRCA1, expression of exogenous BRCA1 from a plasmid with a different 3’-UTR results in complete restoration of HDR activity (Figure 2, lane 4). This result suggests that we have a robust assay for determining the effects of specific BRCA1 mutations in the regulation of the homologous recombination process.  Figure 2 Figure 2 Depletion of BRCA1 protein decreases HDR activity We next assayed a series of synthetic BRCA1 deletion mutants for function in the HDR assay. In Figure 3A, the four deletion mutants are diagrammed. Using the same time course as in Figure 2, the endogenous BRCA1 protein was depleted by 3’-UTR-targeting siRNA, and the test BRCA1 protein was expressed from a co-transfected plasmid. Multiple repeat experiments were done, and in each experiment the maximal recombination varies from 10% to 20%, depending on transfection efficiency. Within an experiment the ratio of GFP-positive cells in the BRCA1 depleted sample relative to the control RNAi was consistently 8- to 10-fold reduced. We thus normalized data in each experiment, allowing us to average the results from multiple experiments. Replacing the endogenous BRCA1 with ΔN-BRCA1, which has deleted residues 1–302, results in a 4- to 5-fold reduction in homologous recombination. Expression of the ΔM1-BRCA1, which has deleted residues 305–770, reduced recombination by about 40%. Similarly, expression of the ΔM2-BRCA1, which has deleted residues 775–1292, resulted in a decrease in recombination by about 60%. Expression of the ΔC-BRCA1, which has deleted residues 1527–1863, resulted in a 10-fold loss of recombination. Clearly, the amino-terminus and carboxy-terminus each had a significant role in controlling the recombination reaction. Expression of the two internal domains had intermediate effects. In each case, the concentrations of BRCA1 protein expressed from the transfected plasmid were at or higher levels than the endogenous BRCA1 protein (Figure 3C), indicating that the reduction in HDR activity was not due to failure to express the test protein. Since the expression level of the ΔN, ΔM1, and ΔM2 mutants were significantly higher than the endogenous BRCA1 protein, it is possible that the magnitudes of the deficiencies in HDR activity with these BRCA1 deletion mutants were underestimated. We decided to focus on point mutations in the amino terminus.  Figure 3 Figure 3 The BRCA1 N- and C-termini are important in regulation of HDR activity Identification of BRCA1 point mutations that are critical for homologous recombination activity  We decided to test point mutations in the amino-terminal 71 amino acid residues of BRCA1 that were derived from individuals with a family history of breast cancer and identified from the BIC database. The reasons for using mutations identified in breast or ovarian cancer clinics were two-fold: first, this is the most direct way to identify candidate amino acid residues for critical function without performing saturating mutagenesis and testing a large number of variants; and second, the results of our functional tests might be useful in counseling such individuals who carry these mutations. Sixteen different variants were produced by site-directed mutagenesis of the BRCA1 cDNA-expressing plasmid. One of these variants, C27A, is a synthetic mutation and is not derived from a variant obtained from an individual with a family history with breast cancer. Rather, the C27A variant completes the set of eight different Zn-coordinating residues of BRCA1 in this analysis. The results of multiple experiments are shown in Figure 4. Consistent with our previous experiments, depletion of BRCA1 by transfection of siRNA targeting the 3’-UTR and co-transfection of the empty plasmid vector, resulted in a 10-fold reduction in GFP-positive cells relative to the control siRNA. Transfection of this BRCA1-specific siRNA along with the wild-type BRCA1 expression plasmid fully restored homology-directed recombination (Figure 4A, lane 3). Strikingly, transfection of each mutant either fully restored recombination to 100% or was fully negative, at the same level of homologous recombination as the vector-transfected control. We note that the deletion mutants used in Figure 3 produced recombination levels that had intermediate results: the ΔM1 and ΔM2 deletions caused partial decrements in homologous recombination. Even deleting the amino terminus, containing all of the residues being tested did not have as severe an effect on the HDR assay as did the point mutants. The expression levels of the point mutants of BRCA1 all were similar to the endogenous protein level (Figure 4B, compare lane 3 to all other lanes) whereas the ΔN deletion, which encompassed all of these point mutants, was significantly overexpressed relative to the endogenous protein and perhaps causing a partial masking of the HDR defect. Alternatively, it is a formal possibility that the point mutations in the BRCA1 protein have both a loss of function phenotype and a dominant negative phenotype.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Identification of BRCA1 missense mutations that affect homologous recombination Eight of the residues that were tested coordinate zinc ions in the RING domain: C24R, C27A, C39Y, H41R, C44F, C47G, C61G, and C64G. It is anticipated that substitution of any of these amino acid residues would have major structural consequences to the protein. Consistent with that concept, replacement of the endogenous BRCA1 with any of these BRCA1 molecules with mutated zinc-coordinating residues was non-functional in HDR (Figure 4A, lanes 6, 7, 10, 11, 13, 14, 16, 17).  Eight other substitution mutants were tested for function in the homologous recombination pathway. The M18T and T37R variants did not complement the HDR assay. Variants that could complement the HDR activity were I21V, I31M, I42V, L52, D67Y, and R71G.  We tested whether the mutant BRCA1 proteins used in this study could bind to BARD1 (Figure 5). We transfected the HA-epitope tagged BRCA1 into HEK293T cells and purified proteins in complex with the variant BRCA1 protein by immunoaffinity purification (IP) using antibody recognizing the HA-tag. Purified proteins were analyzed by immunoblots specific for the HA-epitope to evaluate the effectiveness of expression and purification of the mutant BRCA1 protein and specific for the endogenous BARD1 protein. We found that BRCA1 variant proteins I21V, I31M, I42V, L52F, D67Y, and R71G effectively purified cellular BARD1 protein. These are the same proteins that functioned in homologous recombination. Of note, the BRCA1 variant proteins M18T and H41R had detectable low level of BARD1 binding, but these BRCA1 variants did not complement the HDR assay.  Figure 5 Figure 5 Effect of BRCA1 missense variants on association with BARD1 Correlation of biological function with available clinical data for each BRCA1 missense mutant  We have summarized the available information for each mutant in Table 1, including results of HDR function and BARD1 binding (this study), E3 ubiquitin ligase activity and resistance to ionizing radiation (6), and available clinical information. For many of these variants family history was unavailable, and this limited the analysis we could do. Examples of available family data are supplied in Supplemental Table 1. We applied an algorithm called VUS Predict (19) to the 16 variants. VUS Predict calculates the odds of a variant being detrimental based on a variety of characteristics of tumors including estrogen receptor, progesterone receptor, and Her2 status, tumor grade, histopathology, age of onset, and the position of the amino acid residue in a functional domain or evolutionary conserved sequence. If there were no clinical data, then the VUS Predict output was based on the single criterion of evolutionary conservation (asterisked values in Table 1).  Table 1 Table 1 Summary of biological functions of BRCA1 proteins in the context of available clinical information for each variant. Of the 16 BRCA1 variants in this study, four of the eight Zn-coordinating residues have been classified as deleterious when mutant (Table 1). One other variant, R71G, has been classified as deleterious (2, 20), and one, D67Y, had been classified as neutral (4). One of the substitution mutants, M18T, has a published odds ratio of being deleterious of 31:1 (4). Using VUS Predict, the M18T mutant has 170.8:1 odds of being deleterious. While these analyses clearly indicate the M18T variant has a trend as a deleterious allele, the magnitude of the ratio did not exceed the threshold of 1000:1 for making a clinical classification. We find that this mutation of BRCA1 causes a complete loss of HDR activity. Though this substitution, when expressed in a truncated BRCA1 peptide in the absence of the BARD1 did have ubiquitin ligase enzymatic activity, it was defective in protection of a cell against ionizing radiation (6). In another study using the BRCA1/BARD1 heterodimer, the M18T variant was inactive as a ubiquitin ligase (21). The M18T substitution could affect the BRCA1-BARD1 heterodimerization interface (22), resulting in reduced BARD1 association with the BRCA1 variant (Figure 5). Our results in the HDR assay are consistent with this substitution being deleterious.  Genetic analysis of one of these mutants, D67Y, has suggested that it is neutral with regard to cancer predisposition (4), and consistent with that notion it has the same phenotype as does wild-type BRCA1 in the HDR assay. Though the R71G substitution is considered cancer-promoting, the mutation is thought to affect the splicing of the mRNA (20), such a feature would be missed when expressing a cDNA as in this experiment. Mutant BRCA1(R71G) protein functioned in the HDR at similar levels as did wild-type BRCA1.  Among the remaining five variants of unknown clinical consequence, the T37R variant was defective in HDR (Figure 4A, lane 9). In new research published while this study was being written has indicated that the similar T37K variant is likely to be deleterious based on clinical and evolutionary analysis (3). The T37R substitution was also found to defective in providing ionizing radiation resistance (6), consistent with our HDR results. Taken together, the threonine-37 residue is likely critical to the homologous recombination process, and consequently to radio-resistance. The threonine-37 side chain is solvent exposed, but in a small cavity near the BRCA1-BARD1 heterodimerization interface (22). Perhaps the bulky lysine or arginine substitutions result in disruption of BRCA1-BARD1 binding, or alternatively another protein important to HDR binds to this pocket.  Go to: Discussion This study establishes a new assay for evaluating the function of BRCA1 protein variants. Critical components include the HeLa-derived cell line containing an integrated recombination substrate that is readily scored using flow cytometry. The very low background fluorescence in this cell, combined with the very high response to I-SceI expression, make this cell line ideal for analyzing the homologous recombination process. Since HeLa cells are readily transfected, we routinely obtain greater than 70% of the cells transfected in a monolayer (data not shown), this cell line is ideal for silencing a given gene by RNAi and re-expressing the gene via an RNAi-resistant plasmid expression vector. Though BRCA1 is associated with breast and ovarian cancers, this function for BRCA1 has been found in all cell types, and is thus valid to study in the HeLa cell line. While not high-throughput, the assay is relatively quick once the mutant plasmids are prepared. Several variants can be analyzed simultaneously in a one week experiment. We plan to expand this analysis to a number of variants in the amino- and carboxy-termini of the BRCA1 protein. This continuing effort will greatly expand the analysis of the functional consequences of missense mutations in BRCA1 function.  When a BRCA1 variant protein is defective in the homologous recombination process, is it cancer associated? So far, the results indicate a strong correlation with this HDR assay and cancer predisposition, but the analysis of more mutants will be important to determine whether there is an association. Conversely, are BRCA1 variants that have full HDR activity neutral mutations? The R71G variant has full HDR activity, but it is certainly cancer-associated but via splicing (20), a mechanism that would not be identified in this assay using fully spliced cDNAs. Thus, we already have one example indicating that the converse is not true. In addition, we are developing a similar assay for centrosome control by BRCA1 variants, and initial results suggest that some of these variants do indeed function differently in the two assays (Z. Kais, JDP, unpublished observations).  Combining the functional analysis described in this study with genetic and clinical analysis of point mutants (3, 4) will undoubtedly be important for counseling women who carry missense mutations of BRCA1. As the data become more complete, such results will likely become an excellent resource for guiding clinical decisions.  Missense substitutions of uncertain clinical significance in the BRCA1 gene are a vexing problem in genetic counseling for women who have a family history of breast cancer. In this study, we evaluated the functions of 29 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in two DNA repair pathways. Repair of double-strand breaks by homology-directed recombination (HDR) had been previously analyzed for 16 of these BRCA1 variants, and 13 more variants were analyzed in this study. All 29 variants were also analyzed for function in double-strand break repair by the single-strand annealing (SSA) pathway. We found that among the pathogenic mutations in BRCA1, all were defective for DNA repair by either pathway. The HDR assay was accurate because all pathogenic mutants were defective for HDR, and all nonpathogenic variants were fully functional for HDR. Repair by SSA accurately identified pathogenic mutants, but several nonpathogenic variants were scored as defective or partially defective. These results indicated that specific amino acid residues of the BRCA1 protein have different effects in the two related DNA repair pathways, and these results validate the HDR assay as highly correlative with BRCA1-associated breast cancer.  Keywords: BRCA1, homologous recombination, single-strand annealing, centrosome, VUS Go to: Introduction Among the more than 70,000 women who had their BRCA1 gene (MIM# 113705) sequenced by 2006, approximately 2.3% were found to carry a BRCA1 variant of uncertain significance (VUS). These variants were classified as uncertain because they occurred in families wherein segregation analysis had not been done or in whom the segregation analysis was not informative and thus the VUS had unknown effects on breast and ovarian cancer risk [Hall et al., 2009; Spearman et al., 2008; Sweet et al., 2009]. As whole genome and exome sequencing becomes a more prevalent practice, more VUSs in BRCA1 will be uncovered, and increasingly women will face the quandary of an uninformative genetic test. This leads to individuals with a VUS test result making decisions about cancer screening and prevention without concrete information on which to base their decisions. Women who have an indeterminate BRCA1 sequence result and a family history of breast cancer have a high level of distress, and there are no consistent clinical guidelines for advising them [Dorval et al., 2005; Petrucelli et al., 2002; van Dijk et al., 2006]. Of the 567 BRCA1 missense substitutions listed in the current Breast Cancer Information Core (BIC) database, 14 are described as pathogenic (Class 5) and 27 as nonpathogenic (Class 1). By including the data from Collaborators for the Investigation of Modifiers of BRCA1/2 (CIMBA), a total of 24 BRCA1 variants are pathogenic (CIMBA database). Less than 10% of the missense substitutions in the BIC database have known cancer predisposition. In the absence of definitive genetic information on BRCA1 missense substitutions, other methods are needed to determine whether missense substitutions are pathogenic. Multifactorial approaches have augmented genetic segregation analysis with additional information about the proband and, in some cases, the tumor [Easton et al., 2007; Goldgar et al., 2004; Lindor et al., 2012; Plon et al., 2008; Spearman et al., 2008; Sweet et al., 2009]. These approaches have been successful in reclassification of variants but are also incomplete because they cannot definitively determine whether any given variant affects the critical cancer suppressing function(s) of the protein [Millot et al., 2012]. In contrast, a biological functional assay has the potential to determine whether any given BRCA1 missense substitution is defective in a process, and if that function is predictive of cancer predisposition (i.e., 100% sensitive and 100% specific), then the functional assay can, in theory, be used in genetic counseling.  A variety of biological assays have been analyzed for BRCA1 function and have been correlated with cancer predisposition to various extents [Carvalho et al., 2007; Cotta-Ramusino et al., 2011; Kais et al., 2012; Lee et al., 2010; Millot et al., 2012; Morris et al., 2006; Ransburgh et al., 2010; Vallee et al., 2012]. Several of these assays test single domains of BRCA1, and several address the variant within the context of the full-length protein. In this study, we analyzed the effects of 29 missense substitutions in BRCA1 on the repair of double-strand DNA breaks (DSBs) by homologous recombination and by the single-strand annealing (SSA) pathways. Our results indicate that the effects of specific missense mutations in these pathways strongly correlate with breast cancer predisposition. Further, we find that specific amino acid substitutions affect the two double-strand break repair pathways differentially.  Go to: Materials and Methods Plasmids and Cell Lines  All plasmids for the expression of human BRCA1 with missense substitutions were generated by site-directed mutagenesis from the wild-type sequence (GenBank: U14680.1). Several of these plasmids had been described in previous publications [Ransburgh et al., 2010; Wei et al., 2008]. The cell line for the homologous recombination assay, HeLa-DR, was based on the genomic integration of a specific vector that functions as a recombination substrate [Pierce et al., 2001]. The vector for homologous recombination had been the gift of M. Jasin (Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Institute, New York, NY). The HeLa-DR had been described before [Parvin et al., 2011; Ransburgh et al., 2010]. The repair of double-strand breaks by the SSA pathway was based on a vector kindly provided by J. Stark (City of Hope, Duarte, CA) [Bennardo et al., 2008; Stark et al., 2004] stably integrated into HeLa cells to make the HeLa–SSA cell line. The siRNA targeting the cellular BRCA1 3′ untranslated region (UTR) is the same as previously used [Ransburgh et al., 2010].  SSA Assay  HeLa–SSA cells were seeded in 15.6-mm-diameter wells in 24-well plates, and when cells were 50% confluent, cells were transfected with 5 pmol of the siRNA targeting the BRCA1 3′-UTR plus 0.3 μg of the BRCA1 expression plasmid in Lipofectamine 2000 reagent (Life Technologies, Grand Island, NY). At 24 hr after transfection, cells were transferred to 35-mm-diameter wells in six-well plates. At 48 hr, cells were transfected with 25 pmol of the BRCA1 3′-UTR-specific siRNA plus 0.75 μg BRCA1 expression plasmid plus 0.75 μg pCBASce (for the expression of I-SceI) in Lipofectamine 2000 reagent. After 3 days, cells are harvested by trypsinization, and the fraction of GFP-positive cells is determined using a FACScalibur flow cytometer (BD Biosciences, San Jose, CA) (Analytic Cytometry Shared Resource of The Ohio State University Comprehensive Cancer Center).  Western Blot Analysis of BRCA1 Protein  Immunoblots of the expressed BRCA1 protein were done as has been described previously [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Cells that had been transfected as in the SSA assay were, in parallel, extracted in 0.1% NP-40, 0.05 M Hepes (pH 7.5), and 0.005 M EDTA. Protein contents of extracts were determined using the Bradford reagent; and 50 μg of protein was electrophoresed on 3–8% Nu-PAGE gels (Life Technologies, Grand Island, NY) M. Jasin (Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Institute, NewYork, NY), transferred to polyvinylidene fluoride membranes, and immunoblotted using antibody specific to BRCA1(400–1,100). Densitometry analysis was performed from immunoblots using Kodak 1D software (Eastman Kodak Company, Rochester, NY).  Statistical Analysis of Results  The raw results in the SSA assay for the missense substitutions were compared with the control samples (either GL2 siRNA or BRCA1 siRNA with BRCA1-wt add back) using the unpaired Student’s t-test and obtained the one-tail P values; for intermediate-phenotype mutants, besides the above-mentioned comparisons, we also conducted the unpaired Student’s t-test against the control sample that contains BRCA1 siRNA with empty vector adding back, and obtained the one-tail P values. P values of less than 0.01 were considered significant.  Go to: Results Function of BRCA1 Variants in DNA Break Repair by Homologous Recombination  The BRCA1 protein has been shown to be a critical component of the response to DSBs. Cellular machinery can utilize homologous sequences to accurately repair the DSB, or the free ends can be joined by nonhomologous end joining. In addition to homologous recombination, the pathway of SSA exists by which the repair proteins resect DNA from the free ends of the DSB, and when short stretches of homologous sequence are exposed, then the DNA ends are rejoined [Stark et al., 2004]. The homologous recombination assay used in this study was based on a method developed by the Jasin laboratory in which a single integrated genomic locus contains two inactive GFP genes, and one of these contains the endonuclease cleavage site for the rare-cutting I-SceI enzyme [Pierce et al., 2001]. Upon expression of I-SceI in the cell, one inactive allele of GFP is cut, and if homologous recombination occurs using the second inactive GFP gene as the homology template, then the DNA repair results in gene conversion making the GFP gene become active (Fig. 1A). The SSA assay is based on an analogous strategy in which the GFP protein is not expressed because of intervening DNA sequence, with an I-SceI site at the 3′ end of the intervening DNA. Upon expression of the I-SceI endonuclease, the DSB is generated, and resection of the intervening sequence reveals homologous GFP sequences that are aligned and repaired [Stark et al., 2004] (Fig. 1B). These two processes depend on sequence homologies for the repair, but there are functional differences. The Rad51 and BRCA2 proteins are required for the homology-directed recombination (HDR) assay, but are not required for the SSA assay [Moynahan et al., 2001; Stark et al., 2004].  Figure 1 Figure 1 The double-strand DNA break (DSB) repair assay system. A: The HDR recombination substrate [Pierce et al. 2001] is diagrammed. The upstream GFP allele is defective because of the inclusion of an I-SceI site in its sequence. The downstream GFP allele is ... For each assay, we have established HeLa-derived cell lines with the published recombination substrate [Pierce et al., 2001; Stark et al., 2004] integrated in the genome at a single site. The HeLa-DR cell line assays HDR, and the HeLa–SSA cell line is used to assay SSA. The HDR and the SSA assays have a similar experimental design with a depletion of BRCA1 by transfection of a siRNA that is specific for the 3′-UTR of the BRCA1 mRNA. We cotransfect a BRCA1 expression plasmid that is not affected by the siRNA and which expresses the variant BRCA1 protein. After 2 days, we repeat the transfection and also transfect a plasmid that encodes the expression of the I-SceI endonuclease to generate the DSB in the presence of the variant BRCA1. After 3 days, we assay the cells for GFP expression by flow cytometry. The timeline of the experiment is shown in Figure 1C.  We have previously analyzed 16 variants of BRCA1 in a tissue-culture-cell-based assay for repair of DSBs via homologous recombination [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Using the HeLa-DR cell line developed by us, up to 20% of the cells convert to GFP positive. This high level of recombination enables the quantitative analysis of variants in BRCA1 in this process. The endogenous BRCA1 mRNA is depleted by siRNA targeting the 3′-UTR, and a BRCA1 variant that is resistant to the siRNA is simultaneously expressed from a plasmid [Parvin et al., 2011; Ransburgh, et al., 2010]. A quantitative measure of the function of the BRCA1 variant is determined from the percentage of cells that convert to GFP positive.  In this study, we first analyzed an additional 13 BRCA1 variants for function in HDR (Fig. 2). Twelve of the BRCA1 variants spanned amino acid residue 90 through 191 and were identified from the Breast Information Core (http://research.nhgri.nih.gov/bic/). These were expressed from the plasmid as full-length proteins. All 12 variants are listed in the BIC as having unknown phenotype with regard to predisposition to breast cancer. Several of these have been evaluated using a multifactorial classification system, and of these 12 variants, seven were nonpathogenic [Lindor et al., 2012]. These were chosen because the function of this domain was unknown and because many of these variants have been reported to be nonpathogenic. By testing the known nonpathogenic variants in this assay, we provide a specificity control for the functional test. The 13th variant tested is a known deleterious mutant in the carboxy terminus of the BRCA1 protein, M1775R. In these experiments, the percentage of cells that were GFP positive when transfected with the control siRNA and the control plasmid were set equal to 1%. All other results were normalized to this control, and all results were from three or more separate experiments. Depletion of BRCA1 and transfection with empty plasmid resulted in a value of 0.09 relative to the control (Fig. 2, lane 2). Thus, BRCA1 depletion has an over 10-fold effect reducing the level of homologous recombination. Depleting BRCA1 and transfecting a plasmid that expressed wild-type BRCA1 resulted in full restoration of homologous recombination (Fig. 2, lane 3). Among the variants with substitutions in residues from 90 to 191, all 12 functioned as wild type in the homologous recombination assay (Fig. 2, lanes 4–15) (P < 0.002 compared with depleted BRCA1). By contrast, the 13th tested missense substitution, a known pathogenic mutant BRCA1–M1775R, did not complement the depletion of BRCA1 in this assay (Fig. 2, lane 16) (Pv = 0.0014 compared with wild-type BRCA1).  Figure 2 Figure 2 Analysis of 13 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in the homology-directed repair assay. HeLa-DR cells were transfected with a siRNA that depleted the endogenous BRCA1 and with a plasmid that expressed the indicated BRCA1 variant. After generating a double-strand ... Function of 29 Variants of BRCA1 in the Repair of DNA Breaks by the SSA Pathway  The 16 BRCA1 variants that had previously been tested for function in homologous recombination [Ransburgh et al., 2010] and the 13 BRCA1 variants tested in this study (Fig. 2) were analyzed for function in SSA repair. The recombination substrate [Bennardo et al., 2008; Stark et al., 2004] was based on similar design as the homologous recombination substrate with the exception that restoration of GFP activity occurs when the two inactive GFP genes are repaired by SSA. HeLa cells were stably transfected with the SA–GFP construct, and a clone was selected that had no detectable background GFP signal. Upon transfection of the I-SceI-expressing plasmid, about 5–7% of cells became GFP positive, indicative of a functioning SSA pathway. Depletion of BRCA1 resulted in a decrease to about 1–2% GFP-positive cells (Fig. 3, lane 2), indicating a role for BRCA1 in the SSA repair pathway that had been previously observed [Stark et al., 2004]. Depletion of BRCA1 resulted in about 25% of the activity found in nondepleted cells. As had been observed with the homologous recombination assay, transfection of a plasmid expressing wild-type BRCA1 fully complemented the defect in SSA due to depletion of the endogenous BRCA1 (Fig. 3, lane 3). By contrast, depletion of endogenous BRCA1 and expression of a known pathogenic mutant of BRCA1, M1775R, was as defective in SSA as had been transfection of the empty vector (Fig. 3, lane 32). Similar to previous observations with the zinc-coordinating mutants of BRCA1, these residues were all required for SSA repair of double-strand breaks (Fig. 3, lanes: 6, 7, 10, 11, 13, 14, 16, and 17). As was found for the homologous recombination assay, the M18T variant and the T37R variant were defective for SSA repair. The L52F variant had reduced levels of SSA repair, approximately 69% of wild-type activity (Fig. 3, lane 15), although this value was not significantly different from wild type. The D67Y variant, a known nonpathogenic variant [Easton et al., 2007], was fully active in SSA repair (lane 18).  Figure 3 Figure 3 Analysis of 29 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in the SSA assay. HeLa–SSA cells were transfected as in Figure 2 with plasmids that express the 29 tested missense substitutions of BRCA1. Results of the fraction of cells that had converted to GFP ... Results diverged between the SSA and the homologous recombination assays for the variants in residues 90 through 191. The BRCA1–I90T variant functioned in the homologous recombination assay, but in the SSA assay, it was 47% as active as wild type (t-test for differing from wild-type P < 0.01; lane 20). The Y105C variant was statistically different from both wild-type BRCA1 and empty vector (indicated with both an asterisk and a cross; lane 21). This Y105C variant thus has intermediate phenotype, neither fully active nor fully defective. Similarly, the P142H, E143K, and the R170Q had intermediate phenotype (lanes 25, 26, and 28). The V191D variant was also defective for SSA repair (lane 31). Interestingly, the S153R and S186Y variants had diminished activity, but the change in activities was not statistically significant from the wild type. Thus, these variants were not scored as defective. Seven of the variants tested had assay-specific phenotypes, suggesting that how BRCA1 interacts with repair factors in the homologous recombination pathway is different from factors that BRCA1 binds in the SSA pathway.  When replacing the endogenous BRCA1 protein with a variant BRCA1, there is the concern that the expression levels be consistent with the levels of the endogenous in nondepleted cells. A defective phenotype could be masked by high levels of overexpression of the variant protein, or the phenotype of a functional protein might not be observed because of poor protein expression. The 16 variants with missense substitutions between residues 18 and 71 had been tested in HeLa-derived cells and the expression of each variant was similar to the endogenous in each case [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. For expression, we tested the missense substitutions between residues 90 and 191 and also residue 1775, and found that they all express approximately similarly as the endogenous BRCA1 (Fig. 4). Normalized results from densitometry analysis are presented beneath each lane. Protein from nontransfected cells and from control siRNA and empty vector transfected cells had similar amounts of BRCA1 protein (Fig. 4, lanes 1 and 2). Depletion of BRCA1 and add back with empty plasmid depleted the level of BRCA1 protein, which densitometry analysis indicated to be about 0.35 relative to the nontransfected cells (lane 3). All variants were detected at higher levels than the lysate from BRCA1-depleted cells. Some variants were expressed at higher levels than others, but at most 1.3-fold higher than the BRCA1 levels in nontransfected cells (compare, for example, lane 7 with lane 2). Because none of the BRCA1 variants were expressed at levels much higher than the endogenous BRCA1, in no case could the phenotype of a defective variant be masked by overexpression. The S186Y, V191D, and M1775R variants all had somewhat lower expression, but these lower levels of expression did not correlate with function in either homologous recombination or SSA repair. As an example, the S186Y variant was a low expresser (0.86 relative to control), but it was functional in both assays. We note that the M1775R mutant was expressed at lower levels (0.62 relative to endogenous BRCA1) than any other BRCA1 variant (lane 16). We interpret this level of expression to be similar to other variants and not an explanation for the defect in each double-strand break repair pathway. However, we cannot exclude the interpretation that the M1775R was defective in the DNA repair assays because there was lower BRCA1 expression of this isoform in our cells.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Analysis of the expression levels of 13 variants in HeLa–SSA cells. The expression levels of 16 previously tested BRCA1 substitution variants were tested in the HeLa-derived cell line [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Thirteen variants, with substitutions ... Comparison of Variants in Different Assays  The 29 BRCA1 variants analyzed in this study were compared for function in the two DNA repair assays and with available knowledge about cancer association (Table 1). Many of the variants were consistent across the two assays, but there were several variants demonstrating separation of function. All of the zinc-coordinating residues were required for function in both repair assays. The M18T variant was clearly defective, but it is currently classified as unknown clinical significance. There is one genetic model that classified this M18T variant as likely pathogenic (see below).  Table 1 Table 1 Summary of BRCA1 Variants Benchmarking Function to Clinical Relevance  Recently, a new classification system for variants has been proposed [Lindor et al., 2012; Plon et al., 2008]. According to this system, Class 1 denotes variants that are not pathogenic. Class 2 is likely nonpathogenic. Class 3 is uncertain. Class 4 is likely pathogenic (probability of being pathogenic is 0.95–0.99), and Class 5 is definitely pathogenic (probability >0.99). According to variants described in the [Lindor et al. (2012)] system, three of the variants in this study (M18T, C61G, and M1775R) were of Class 4, either likely pathogenic or definitely pathogenic. An additional five mutants are treated clinically as Class 5, pathogenic, (C39Y, C44F, C47G, C64G, and R71G). One of these pathogenic mutants, R71G, does not affect the BRCA1 protein, but rather the splicing of the mRNA [Vega et al., 2001]. Since the assays tested express BRCA1 from spliced cDNA, the R71G defective phenotype would not be detected. We thus exclude this mutant from the comparison of benchmarking these assays against known mutants. There were then seven pathogenic mutants (Class 4 or 5) analyzed and eight nonpathogenic variants (Class 1; Table 1). When comparing the results of our functional analyses with these previously classified variants, the HDR assay scored all seven pathogenic or likely pathogenic mutants as defective, and all eight nonpathogenic variants as functional. The results of the assay were, in the case of every variant, either fully active or fully defective (see examples in Fig. 2). To date, no variant tested in the HDR assay produced an intermediate score.  Compared with these benchmarks, the variants tested in the SSA assay did not score as well as the HDR assay. All pathogenic mutants were defective for SSA repair of double-strand breaks, but one nonpathogenic variant (I124V) was defective for SSA, and three Class 1 variants had intermediate phenotype in the SSA assay. Although the HDR assay was both highly sensitive and highly specific, the SSA assay was highly sensitive at association with cancer risk, but it was less specific. Of interest, it had been noted that four BRCA1 variants, Y105C, P142H, E143K, and Y179C, had decreased accumulation at the sites of DNA breaks [Wei et al., 2008]. Although these variants were normal for HDR, three of these had intermediate levels of function in the SSA assay (Table 1). Perhaps there is a link between the accumulation of BRCA1 at DNA repair sites and a factor important for the SSA assay.  Go to: Discussion Functional Assays as Predictive Tools for Assessing BRCA1 Variants  In this study, we analyzed a total of 29 BRCA1 variants in the repair of DSBs by homologous recombination and by SSA. For the sake of this discussion, we exclude the BRCA1–R71G variant that affects splicing [Vega et al., 2001] because all of our assays used prespliced cDNAs and would not be sensitive to a splicing defect. By comparing our results with those BRCA1 missense substitutions that have a known effect on breast cancer predisposition, we found that the HDR assay was 100% accurate: seven previously classified pathogenic mutants were defective for HDR, and eight previously classified nonpathogenic variants in BRCA1 were functional for HDR. Further, the results for the HDR assay were either fully active or fully defective. We interpret these results to indicate that the HDR assay is validated as a predictive tool for assessing BRCA1 variants.  By contrast to the HDR assay, the function of BRCA1 variants in the repair of DSBs by SSA had a number of differences that diminished the accuracy of this assay. On the basis of the benchmarks of variants that were classified using a genetic model [Lindor et al., 2012], the SSA assay was sensitive because it did not misclassify any pathogenic variants, but it was not specific because it misclassified several nonpathogenic variants as either intermediate or defective. Interpretation of the SSA assay was also complicated by intermediate results; by comparison, the HDR assay had no intermediate results among the 29 variants tested. It is possible, but remains to be determined, whether missense variants that are proficient for HDR, but deficient or intermediate for SSA, confer a lower or moderate risk of cancer. We thus conclude that the HDR assay is a more reliable predictive tool for assessing the function of BRCA1 variants than is the SSA assay.  We had previously performed a similar analysis of the control of centrosome duplication by BRCA1 variant proteins [Kais et al., 2012]. Fewer variants of the BRCA1 protein were analyzed in this earlier study using the centrosome assay, but it has several differences from the HDR assay. With regard to those variants with inferred breast cancer association, the centrosome duplication assay had an intermediate result for the BRCA1–D67Y variant, which is nonpathogenic. The T37R variant was defective for both DNA repair assays, but was functional in control of the centrosome duplication. Five amino acid residues away, the I42V variant had the opposite pattern as T37R, with defective centrosome control but fully functional in both DNA repair assays. Experimentally, the centrosome regulation assay is much more difficult to perform than the HDR assay, making it not as desirable an assay for analysis of BRCA1 variants. In addition, the centrosome assay appears, based on the limited set of variants, to be less accurate than the HDR assay. On the contrary, like the SSA, none of the tested seven variants that were previously classified as Class 4 or 5, were functional in the centrosomal assay, suggesting that this assay is sensitive.  It will be necessary to analyze many more variants in the HDR assay and then compare those results with the clinical experiences before this assay can be used for clinical interpretation. On the basis of the accuracy of the currently tested variants, we believe that the HDR assay will help with difficult to classify variants of unknown significance.  Functional Assays for Probing BRCA1 Residues Important in Biological Function  Separate from the clinical utility of the different functional tests, important biological information about the BRCA1 protein is available from the various functional assays. Very little structure–function information exists for BRCA1, and there have been limited systematic analyses of the effects of BRCA1 amino acid variants in a given function. A variety of variants have been analyzed in the context of short BRCA1 amino-terminal truncations for ubiquitin ligase activity [Morris et al., 2006]. In a similar vein, a variety of variants in the context of a short BRCA1 carboxy-terminal fragment have been analyzed for the activation of transcription [Carvalho et al., 2007; Lee et al., 2010]. Several variants in the context of the full-length protein have been analyzed in terms of resistance to ionizing radiation [Ruffner et al., 2001] and reversal of a lethal phenotype in murine embryonic stem cells [Chang et al., 2009].  We find that there are some discordancies between functional assays of the variants. The most striking are at T37R and I42V. BRCA1–T37R was defective for both DNA repair processes, but was fully functional for control of centrosomes. Conversely, BRCA1–I42V was defective for control of centrosome duplication [Kais et al., 2012] but functional in the DNA repair processes. From this result, we hypothesize that the protein–BRCA1 contacts in the DNA repair pathways depend on the T37 residue, whereas a different protein–BRCA1 contact is important for regulating the centrosome duplication. Such a notion is possible because the centrosome regulation occurs in the cytoplasm and the DNA repair occurs in the nucleus, and it is reasonable to suppose that different proteins are involved.  There were variants that distinguished between BRCA1 residues important for DSB repair by homologous recombination versus SSA. The observed differences between the SSA and HDR assays involved residues from 90 to 191. Several of these (Y105C, P142H, and E143K) that had intermediate phenotype in the SSA assay had been shown to have slow accumulation at sites of DSBs. Especially, P142H mutation abolished the association with Ku80 protein, which plays an important role in the repair of DSBs [Wei et al., 2008]. Perhaps the SSA pathway contributes to the accumulation of BRCA1 at sites of DNA damage in cells.  In summary, in this study, we evaluated missense variants of BRCA1 in two different DNA repair pathways. Data support that the function of BRCA1 in the HDR assay is consistent with the known cancer association of these variants, and we suggest that this test is predictive for breast cancer. By contrast, the repair of DNA by the related SSA pathway is not perfectly consistent with what is known about cancer predisposition, and the SSA assay yields intermediate results. On the basis of these current results, we suggest that the HDR assay is validated for predicting whether substitution at any residue of BRCA1 is disease associated.  The N-terminus of the Breast Cancer-1 predisposition protein (BRCA1) associates with the BRCA1-associated RING domain-1 protein (BARD1) to form a heterodimer, which exhibits ubiquitin ligase activity that is abrogated by known cancer-associated BRCA1 missense mutations. The majority of missense substitutions identified in patients with a personal or a family history of disease have not been followed in pedigrees, nor there is a functional understanding of their impact. We have examined, by extensive missense substitution, the interaction of BRCA1 with components that contribute to its ubiquitin ligase activity, BARD1 and the E2 ubiquitin-conjugating enzyme, UbcH5a. Selection from a randomly generated library of BRCA1 missense mutations for variants that inhibit the interaction with these components identified substitutions in residues found altered in patient DNA, indicating a correlation between loss of component-binding and propensity to disease development. We further show that the BRCA1:E2 interaction is sensitive to substitutions in all structural elements of the BRCA1 N-terminus, whereas the BARD1 interaction is sensitive to a subset of BRCA1 substitutions, which also inhibit E2-binding. Patient variants that inhibit the BRCA1:E2 interaction show loss of ubiquitin ligase activity and correlate with disease susceptibility and theoretical predictions of pathogenicity. These data link the loss of ubiquitin ligase activity, through loss of E2-binding, to the majority of non-polymorphic patient variants described within the N-terminus of BRCA1 and illustrate the likely significant role of BRCA1 ubiquitin ligase activity in tumour suppression. INTRODUCTION Inheritance of mutations in BRCA1 resulting in protein truncation predispose individuals to breast and ovarian cancer, whereas determining the significance of missense variants presents a major clinical problem (1). More than a quarter of entries recorded in the Breast cancer Information Core (BIC) dataset of BRCA1 sequence variants from patients are missense alterations (http://research.nhgri.nih.gov/bic/). This study examines the 100 N-terminal amino acids (aa) of BRCA1 that includes the Zn2þ-binding RING domain flanked by two a-helices (2). Forty-four different non-polymorphic missense variants have been reported in patient DNA encoding this region and the most frequently occurring are located within it. The pathogenicity of only a small number of these is known, and the rest remain unclassified. This is because it is not possible to follow the majority of variants by co-segregation analysis and the number of appropriate controls required to be content of a variant’s absence in unaffected individuals is prohibitive. For either approach, incomplete penetrance of the mutation may also be confounding. Thus far theoretical predictions based on evolutionary conservation # The Author 2006. Published by Oxford University Press. All rights reserved. For Permissions, please email: journals.permissions@oxfordjournals.org *To whom correspondence should be addressed at: Department of Medical and Molecular Genetics, Kings College London School of Medicine at Guy’s, Kings and St Thomas’ Hospitals, 8th Floor, Guy’s Tower, Guy’s Hospital, St Thomas’ Street, London SE1 9RT, UK. Tel: þ44 2071883699/82579; Fax: þ44 2071882585; Email: jo.morris@genetics.kcl.ac.uk { The authors wish it to be known that, in their opinion, the first two authors should be regarded as joint First Authors. Human Molecular Genetics, 2006, Vol. 15, No. 4 599–606 doi:10.1093/hmg/ddi476 Advance Access published on January 10, 2006 of the region and chemical difference of the substitution have been used to postulate the pathogenicity of many missense variants (3,4) and there is a need for functional understanding to validate such analysis. Currently, without a clinical assay for BRCA1 activity, the discovery of the majority of missense variants leaves both carriers and their families in an ambiguous position. Single exonic nucleotide mutations not associated with transcript stability, splicing or translational efficiency presumably confer loss of BRCA1 tumour suppressor ability through the loss of an activity brought about by protein conformational change. The BRCA1 N-terminal region has been reported to interact with seven protein partners and therefore potentially participates in several cellular activities (5 –10). Hence, in common with the study of many disease-associated proteins, a key challenge is to determine which interaction and activities are relevant to the disease process and which are not. An approach frequently taken in classifying a particular protein:protein interaction as significant has been to test the interaction with a disease-associated mutation in one of the protein partners. This approach may result in ambiguity when the disease-associated mutations tested have significant structural consequences (predicting an apparent plethora of significant interactions). The early discovery of BRCA1 and the subsequent reporting of variants from a population likely to be enriched for disease in a public database, the BIC, has provided a resource with which to more thoroughly test potentially important interactions. In the current study, we have made extensive use of, and reference to these variants to examine the likely relevance of the BRCA1 E3 ubiquitin ligase activity to its tumour suppressor function. The BRCA1 ubiquitin ligase is capable of forming covalently linked chains of ubiquitin on a substrate. Endogenous BRCA1-dependent ubiquitin conjugates occur at sites of double-strand DNA breaks and DNA repair in cells suggesting that BRCA1 ubiquitin ligase activity is linked to the DNA damage repair role of BRCA1 (11). The activity has also been linked to the control of centrosome duplication and microtubule nucleation, transcription and chromosome decatenation (12 – 15). Although classically thought of as a pathway for protein degradation, it is now becoming clear that the posttranslational addition of ubiquitin may act as a signal for other pathways (reviewed in (16)). In vitro, the BRCA1 ubiquitin ligase activity requires interaction with two proteins. The N-terminus of BRCA1 interacts with BARD1 to form a heterodimer. The heterodimer has substantial E3 ubiquitin ligase activity in vitro with the UbcH5 class of E2 ubiquitin conjugating enzymes, particularly UbcH5a (17,18). Importantly, loss of the activity is likely to occur in some forms of BRCA1-mediated cancer, as disease-associated mutations that substitute Zn2þ-binding residues within the BRCA1 RING affects BRCA1 ubiquitin ligase activity in vitro (19,20). However, as these mutations are structurally deleterious, it is unclear whether loss of ubiquitin ligase activity is causally linked to loss of tumour suppressor activity or an activity lost in conjunction with another, more relevant, interaction. Based on the significant body of structural work that describes the BRCA1 N-terminal region, a proportion of the 44 patient missense variants would be expected to inhibit the BARD1 interaction, and a proportion inhibit the E2 enzyme interaction, while the impact of the remainder cannot be easily predicted. The BRCA1:BARD1 interface is formed of the two helices that flank the BRCA1 RING and mutational analysis has shown that the hydrophobic core formed at the interface is required for this interaction (21,22). The interface BRCA1 makes with the E2 has been predicted to be formed of residues in the two Zn2þ-binding loops and central helix of the RING domain. A missense mutation in a residue within this region prevented the E2 interaction and also ubiquitin ligase activity (20). Thus, patient mutations located close to the predicted E2-binding face are also expected to inhibit E2-binding and ubiquitin ligase activity. Missense alterations that cause a loss of interaction with either BARD1 or the E2 ubiquitin conjugating enzyme would be expected to inhibit significant BRCA1 ubiquitin ligase activity in vitro (17,20). This study employs a comprehensive examination of missense variants derived from patient DNA to explore the relevance of BRCA1:protein interactions required for the E3 ubiquitin ligase activity of BRCA1. Our data show that loss of binding with the E2 component of the cascade correlates with variants found in a population enriched for a personal and family history of breast and ovarian cancer, ubiquitin ligase activity and theoretical predictions of pathogenicity. The data reveals the particular sensitivity of the BRCA1:E2 interaction to missense substitution within and beyond the predicted E2 interaction face and has implications for the clinical interpretation of missense variants within the N-terminus of BRCA1. RESULTS Selection of mutants from a randomly mutagenized BRCA1 library for loss of E2- or BARD1-binding identifies disease-associated mutations If BRCA1-mediated tumourigenesis is promoted through the loss of binding to components of the ubiquitin ligase cascade we predicted that a screen for substitutions that inhibit E2 or BARD1 protein interactions from a randomly generated series of BRCA1 variants should identify substitutions similar to non-polymorphic variants reported in DNA from individuals with a personal or family history of breast cancer. We therefore screened a BRCA1 library generated through random mutagenic PCR by positive selection in yeast for loss of the BRCA1:BARD1 interaction and the BRCA1:E2 interaction (as illustrated in Supplementary Material, Fig. S1). These screens identified residues within BRCA1 that are required for interaction with each protein. In a screen of the BRCA1 mutant library for substitutions that inhibit interaction with the E2 enzyme, UbcH5a, we identified 22 missense variants in 19 residues (Fig. 1, line 1). In the first screen against BARD1, we identified only truncating and frame-shift alterations (the truncation that deleted fewest residues removed amino acids from the C-terminal region of the peptide leaving aa 2– 90), indicating that few or no single amino acid substitutions prevent BRCA1:BARD1 heterodimer formation in this system. We therefore conducted a third screen in which we selected mutations that inhibit the 600 Human Molecular Genetics, 2006, Vol. 15, No. 4 interaction with BARD1 using a strain optimized for highaffinity interactions (23). From this experiment eight missense variants in seven residues were identified (Fig. 1, line 2). We sought sequence information of patient variants from the literature (24,25) and from the BIC dataset. This carries BRCA1 sequence information from over 10 000 individuals, most with a personal or a family history of breast or ovarian cancer, hence it is a database that is enriched with deleterious mutations in BRCA1 (although the pathogenicity of the majority of individual variants is not known) (3). Comparison of the BRCA1 variants selected from the screens against the E2 and BARD1 with non-polymorphic variants encoded by patient DNA show that both interactions are inhibited by substitutions in residues that because of their co-ordination with structurally integral Zn2þ have been strongly predicted, or confirmed, to be involved in disease (Fig. 1, lines 1 –3). A further four selected variants from the E2 screen result in the substitution of residues altered in patient DNA in non-Zn2þ-binding residues (Fig. 1), including the substitution of M18. The M18T/K missense variant has been identified in several independent families with breast and ovarian cancer (24,25). No variant identified in either screen is a known polymorphism. Hence, selection against either ubiquitin ligase cascade component, although interacting with BRCA1 at different affinities, identified substitutions of residues found altered in patient DNA, but only the E2 screen selected patient variants outside the structurally integral Zn2þ-binding residues. The E2 component is more sensitive to BRCA1 patient missense variants As experimental selection against the BARD1 and the E2 interactions identified variants that correlated with patient variants, we next wished to test directly the relative sensitivities of each protein interaction to non-polymorphic missense substitutions in BRCA1 encoded by patient DNA. We therefore generated constructs of all variants encoded within the first 100 amino acids of BRCA1 logged in the BIC database; both those known to be disease-associated and those that are unclassified. (Where multiple substitutions of Zn2þ-ligating cysteines have been reported, one variant was chosen; in addition M18K was generated (25).) These 35 variants were then tested for interaction with BARD1 and the E2 enzyme, UbcH5a, in a two-hybrid assay. Figure 2 shows that the wild-type BRCA1:BARD1 interaction was stronger than that of the BRCA1:E2 interaction as indicated by growth at high levels of the HIS3 competitor 3-amino-1,2,4-triazole (3AT) (Fig. 2A). A subset of BRCA1 missense substitutions inhibited growth with BARD1 at high 3AT concentrations (100 mM). These were mutations of Zn2þ-binding residues, either previously confirmed or strongly expected to be pathogenic (C24R, C44F, C61G and to a lesser extent H41R and C39R). The E2:BRCA1 interaction was more sensitive to missense substitution, 16 variants showed no interaction with the E2 at the lowest concentration of 3AT (1 mM), with 21 BRCA1 variants failed to grow at 3 mM 3AT (Fig. 2A). All Zn2þ- binding residue mutations inhibited the E2 interaction at 3 mM 3AT threshold and all patient variants that reduced the BARD1 interaction at a high threshold (100 mM 3AT), inhibited the E2 interaction at a lower one (1 mM 3AT). This was also the case for a non-patient mutation (L82D) selected for disruption of the BRCA1:BARD1 interaction (data not shown). Hence, we were unable to identify a missense mutation of BRCA1 that inhibited the BARD1 interaction, but that did not disrupt the interaction with the E2 enzyme. In a recent study, a combination of sequence alignment of BRCA1 orthologs and chemical difference of substitution was used to classify patient variants pathogenically (3). In the current study, seven of nine patient variants predicted to be deleterious using this approach inhibited the E2 interaction and all (five) variants predicted to be neutral, or of little significance, interacted with the E2 enzyme (Fig. 2C). (Experiments designed to test BRCA1 N-terminal homodimerization failed to reveal an interaction and we saw no interaction between BARD1 and UbcH5a (data not shown).) Loss of E2 interaction correlates with loss of BRCA1 ubiquitin ligase activity The sensitivity of the E2:BRCA1 interaction to missense substitution of BRCA1 suggested that the majority of nonpolymorphic missense variants reported in the population enriched for family or personal history of cancer might inhibit BRCA1 ubiquitin ligase activity, as confirmed breast cancer-associated missense variants do. In order to test this, we performed a biochemical assay which examined the ability of the BRCA1:BARD1 heterodimer to form ubiquitin Figure 1. Single amino acid substitutions in BRCA1 identified by split-hybrid selection against the E2 (UbcH5a) (line 1) and BARD1 (line 2): Variants from individuals recorded in the BIC database and reference (25) (line 3). Substitutions classified as known mutations are shown in bold (BIC database and references (24,25)). Green-shaded boxes illustrate residues substituted in variants identified from the E2 (UbcH5a) and BARD1 screens that are located in residues also substituted in patient DNA. Human Molecular Genetics, 2006, Vol. 15, No. 4 601 chains in the presence of the E2 ubiquitin conjugating enzyme, UbcH5a. In this assay, co-purified wild-type BRCA1: BARD1 N-terminal complex was able to generate polyubiquitin chains and underwent extensive auto-ubiquitination (Fig. 2B and Supplementary Material, Fig. S2). Nineteen of the 35 BRCA1 variants co-purified with BARD1 showed reduced activity in the assay. As expected all seven mutations in Zn2þ-ligating residues inhibited ubiquitin ligase activity and the activity of the remaining variants correlated with the BRCA1:E2 interaction (compare Fig. 2A with B, summarized in C). All variants that interacted with E2 at 10 mM 3AT had ubiquitin ligase activity and all but one that did not interact at this threshold showed no activity. The E2-binding activity of a single variant, with a helical substitution (I89T) correlates poorly with its ubiquitin ligase activity. It is possible that the E2 interaction is stabilized by the presence of BARD1 in the biochemical assay. The BRCA1:E2 interaction requires integrity of the BRCA1 N-terminus The BARD1 interaction was less sensitive to missense substitution of BRCA1 than the E2 interaction and restricted to the flanking helices that form the BRCA1:BARD1 interaction face (Q12Y, L82P) and the Zn2þ-ligating residues of the RING (C39S/L, H41R, C44R, C47R and C61L) (Fig. 3H). However, the impact of these variants was measurable only at high concentrations of 3AT, or in a high threshold assay, suggesting that these mutations weaken the high-affinity BARD1:BRCA1 interaction. Conversely, the BRCA1 Figure 2. (A) BARD1 (amino acids 26–119) or full length E2 (UbcH5a), were tested for interaction with wild-type or variant BRCA1 (amino acids 2 –101), using yeast two-hybrid. Growth on media lacking histidine (-HIS) indicates protein:protein interaction leading to HIS3 transcription. Growth on increasing concentrations of the HIS3 competitive inhibitor 3AT indicates strong protein:protein interaction. Triangles represent serial dilutions of yeast. (B) His-tagged BRCA1 (amino acids 1–147) and BARD1 (amino acids 26–142) were co-purified from bacteria, and checked for parity before being subjected to substrateindependent ubiquitin ligase assay with the E2 (UbcH5a) enzyme. The I26A BRCA1 variant fails to bind the E2 enzyme and is ubiquitin ligase dead (20), and was included here as a negative control. Ub-mix indicates the inclusion of all components of the assay except BRCA1:BARD1 heterodimer. Several blots are spliced together to allow ease of comparison with (A). (Full blots with relevant controls are shown in Supplementary Material, Fig. S3.) The BRCA1: protein interaction and ubiquitin ligase data are summarized in (C) together with known (K) or predicted pathogenic status (3). Substitutions predicted to be deleterious (D), likely to be neutral or of little significance (N) or because of splice junction defect (S) (32) are shown. 602 Human Molecular Genetics, 2006, Vol. 15, No. 4 interaction with E2 was disrupted by many missense substitutions and at low 3AT concentrations. Modelling the BRCA1:E2 interaction on the solved RING E3:E2 complex of c–Cbl (shown in Fig. 3) and comparing it with the NMR solution structure of BRCA1:BARD1 reveals that the face between the RING-E3 and E2 (UbcH7) is not as extensive as the BRCA1:BARD1 interaction. The BARD1:BRCA1 interface is bigger (1337 versus 869 A˚ 2 ), flatter and has a smaller gap volume, indicating that it is a tighter interaction. Both interactions have three hydrogen bonds but the BRCA1: BARD1 interaction also has two more salt bridges. Hence, single amino acid substitutions may be tolerated by the BRCA1:BARD1 interaction. Some of the amino acid substitutions of BRCA1 that inhibit the E2 interaction are located in the predicted E2 interface; in residues that co-ordinate with Zn2þ and that are within the central helix (Fig. 3C, E and H). However, the BRCA1:E2 interaction was also sensitive to non-E2 interface substitutions present within loops forming the cross-brace structure of the RING (Fig. 3D), at the join between the RING domain and flanking helices (Fig. 3F), as well as within the flanking helices (Fig. 3G). Substitutions that did not inhibit the E2 interaction are conservative in their nature (V11A, I15L, I21V, I42V, L87V), away from the E2 interface (D67E/Y, R71G, K38N) or in the distal portions of the a-helices (S4P, R7C, I90T, D96N, G98R and also Y105C, I124V and P142H (data not shown)) (illustrated in Supplementary Material, Fig. S4). Thus the locations and type of the majority of E2 disruptive variants Figure 3. Model of the BARD1:BRCA1:E2 (UbcH5b) complex. The RING domain of BRCA1 (PDB 1JM7 chain A (2)) was superimposed on the RING domain of Cbl-UbcH7 (PDB 1FBV (29)) and the structure of UbcH5b (PDB 1W4U (31)) was then superimposed on the structure of UbcH7 in the Cbl–UbcH7 complex. (UbcH5b is 88% identical to UbcH5a and both have activity with BRCA1:BARD1 (18).) BRCA1 is shown in green, BARD1 in orange and UbcH5b in blue. (A) Filled atom-model of BRCA1:BARD1 with UbcH5b. (B) Ribbon representation of BRCA1:BARD1 and UbcH5b, the Zn2þ are denoted by red spheres. (C–G) Structural classes of BRCA1:E2 disruptive variants are shown and listed beneath. (H) Summary of BARD1 and E2 disruptive missense variants. Line 1 shows secondary structure information based on the BRCA1 NMR structure (2). Line 2 shows residues in the BRCA1:BARD1 interface (blue) (2) and residues identi- fied by Brzovic et al., (20) whose resonances are perturbed by the binding of the E2 (UbcH5c) and are therefore likely to make up the E2 interface (black). Line 3 summarizes all the E2 disruptive substitutions identified in the study, and Line 4 the BARD1 disruptive substitutions. Human Molecular Genetics, 2006, Vol. 15, No. 4 603 illustrate that the integrity of the BRCA1 RING domain, the flanking helices and the relationship between these elements are required for interaction with the E2 (Table 1). DISCUSSION The identification of several interacting proteins have suggested alternative functions for the BRCA1 N-terminal region (6 –10). Although we cannot rule out the possibility that this region participates in a function unrelated to ubiquitin ligase activity, in our hands BRCA1 N-terminal interactions with full length ATF, BAP1 and reported interacting regions of ER-alpha, MSH2 and p300/CBP could not be confirmed (data not shown). Data reported here correlate missense variants from individuals with a personal or family history of breast cancer with loss of E2 enzyme interaction and ubiquitin ligase activity. Selection from a randomly generated library of BRCA1 mutations for variants that inhibit the interaction with BRCA1 ubiquitin ligase components, BARD1 or the E2 enzyme, UbcH5a, identified substitutions in residues found altered in patient DNA. The majority of patient variants inhibited the E2 interaction, and mutations in Zn2þ-binding residues reduced the already low-affinity BRCA1:E2 interaction (and weakened the high-affinity BRCA1:BARD1 interaction). Causal confirmation linking the loss of the BRCA1:E2 interaction with tumour susceptibility awaits further experiments where the subtle disruption of the E2 interaction, perhaps in an animal model, is shown to be tumourigenic. However, concordance of loss of BRCA1:E2-binding with variants confirmed or theoretically predicted to be pathogenic suggests that the BRCA1:E2 interaction may be an indicator of variant pathogenicity and may therefore form the basis of a functional assay. Further validation through investigation of BRCA1 families bearing currently unclassified variants, and continued reporting in public databases such as the BIC will be needed to confirm this for the purposes of diagnosis, counselling and clinical intervention. Our data are unable to dissect BARD1 from the E2 interaction as a cause of loss of ubiquitin ligase activity for the Zn2þ-ligating residue class of mutations as these variants cause loss of binding to BARD1 and the E2 enzyme. This is presumably because of the deleterious impact these variants have on the N-terminal structure as a whole, preventing both correct folding of the RING domain and proper folding of the half helical bundle for high-affinity interaction with BARD1. Importantly, the inhibition of ubiquitin ligase activity, through loss of the E2 interaction, was not restricted to structurally detrimental mutations in Zn2þ-ligating residues, Table 1. Predicted impact of missense substitutions in BRCA1 that prevent interaction with the E2 ubiquitin conjugating enzyme UbcH5a Class Substitution Predicted effect of substitution (based on superimposition of BRCA1 (2) and UbcH5b (31) structures over RING E3:E2 structure of Cbl:UbcH7 (29)) Zn2þ ligand C24R Loss of Zn2þ ligand likely to weaken RING domain folding C39S/R H41L/Y/R C44F/R C47G/T C61G C64G RING domain I31T or N Hydrophobic to polar: expected to disrupt RING domain T37R Non-conservative substitution of a buried residue: likely to disrupt the RING domain K45E/T/N Substitution disrupts salt bridge to BRCA1 Glu75: likely to weaken overall fold L52F/H Introduction of more bulky or polar group to a buried residue: likely to weaken overall fold S59R Charged substitution of largely buried hydrophobic group: likely to disrupt RING domain I68K Charged substitution of buried hydrophobic group: likely to disrupt RING domain S72R Disrupts hydrogen bond to T69: predicted to weaken overall fold T77M May form H-bond to S80 in some conformations; substitution to a hydrophobic surface residue predicted to weaken folding by removal of H-bond L63F Introduction of a larger buried group likely to disrupt RING domain Interface with UbcH5a E29V Disrupts salt bridge (to K4 in UbcH5b) and weaken binding to the E2 K50L/E May disrupt salt bridge (to D59 of UbcH5b) and weaken binding to the E2 K56N May disrupt H-bond (to S91 of UbcH5b) and to weaken binding to the E2 Q60L Lies close to E2 binding site; substitution likely to disrupt H bonds or salt bridge K65M May disrupt H bonding or salt bridge (to UbcH5b Q92) I26N May form part of the E2 interface or may be a structural disruption (I26 forms packing interactions within the RING domain) L28P Loss of hydrophobic contact with the E2 enzyme, proline substitution likely also to disrupt backbone preventing folding G57R BRCA1:Cbl backbones differ at this point, may alter packing with E2 or within RING Orientation of helical bundle to RING F79S F79 lies at interface between RING and helical domains. Mutation to a polar group is predicted to alter RING-domain to helical-domain packing Helical bundle I15T Polar substitution of buried hydrophobic group: likely to induce distortion to helices M18K T Polar/charged substitution of buried hydrophobic group: likely to induce distortion to helices I89T or N Polar substitution of buried hydrophobic group: likely to induce distortion to helices 604 Human Molecular Genetics, 2006, Vol. 15, No. 4 but was also caused by the majority of reported patient variants, whose structural impact is more subtle. The profile of BARD1 and E2 disruptive variants overlap; while E2 disruptive substitutions include Zn2þ residue binding mutants, they are also located throughout the N-terminal region, as are patient variants (Figs 1 and 3H). Our findings have revealed the fragility of the BRCA1:E2 interaction, which is sensitive to missense substitution in all elements of the BRCA1-N-terminus. The high density of missense variants in the BIC patient database in this region of BRCA1 may reflect a requirement for interaction with the E2 enzyme in tumour suppression. In cells, the formation of ubiquitin conjugates by exogenous BRCA1 is dependent both on BARD1 and on an intact BRCA1:E2-binding face, suggesting that loss of the E2 interaction alone is sufficient to inhibit BRCA1 ubiquitin ligase activity in cells (11). However, as substitution of Zn2þ-binding residues are many times more frequent in patients than those elsewhere in the N-terminal region, it may be that the additional loss of interaction with BARD1, perhaps resulting in reduced BRCA1 protein stability (19,26), or loss of a further function, causes greater inhibition of BRCA1 tumour suppressor function, and more frequently results in tumourigenesis than loss of the E2 interaction alone. We speculate that a weak interaction between the E3 RING and its E2 component may be a necessary part of enzyme turnover in the generation of ubiquitin chains. The E3 RING:E2 interaction is a common biological interface, with more than 300 RING-bearing proteins in the human database, many of which may function as E3 ligases for ubiquitin or ubiquitin like molecules (27). Hence, if the conclusions made in relation to the BRCA1 RING:E2 interaction can be extrapolated to other RING:E2s, then we would expect perturbations in this interactive face to occur in other diseases and syndromes.  
2587||Mutations in BRCA1 and BRCA2 account for the majority of hereditary breast and ovarian cancers, and therefore sequence analysis of both genes is routinely conducted in patients with early-onset breast cancer. Besides mutations that clearly abolish protein function or are known to increase cancer risk, a large number of sequence variants of uncertain signifi cance (VUS) have been identifi ed. Although several functional assays for BRCA1 VUSs have been described, thus far it has not been possible to conduct a high-throughput analysis in the context of the full-length protein. We have developed a relatively fast and easy cDNA-based functional assay to classify BRCA1 VUSs based on their ability to functionally complement BRCA1-defi cient mouse embryonic stem cells. Using this assay, we have analyzed 74 unclassifi ed BRCA1 missense mutants for which all predicted pathogenic variants are confi ned to the BRCA1 RING and BRCT domains.  SIGNIFICANCE: BRCA1 VUSs are frequently found in patients with hereditary breast or ovarian cancer and present a serious problem for clinical geneticists. This article describes the generation, validation, and application of a reliable high-throughput assay for the functional classifi cation of BRCA1 sequence variants of uncertain signifi cance. Cancer Discov; 3(10); 1142–55. ©2013 AACR.  Authors’ Affi liations: 1 Division of Molecular Pathology and Cancer Genomics Centre and 2 Department of Pathology, The Netherlands Cancer Institute Amsterdam, The Netherlands; and 3 TaconicArtemis GmbH, Cologne, Germany  Note: Supplementary data for this article are available at Cancer Discovery Online (http://cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org/).  Current address for C. Klijn: Genentech Inc., South San Francisco, California.  Corresponding Author: Jos Jonkers, The Netherlands Cancer Institute, Plesmanlaan 121, Amsterdam, 1066 CX, The Netherlands. Phone: 31-20- 5122000; Fax: 31-20-5122050; E-mail: j.jonkers@nki.nl doi: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094 ©2013 American Association for Cancer Research.  INTRODUCTION  Germline loss-of-function mutations in BRCA1 and BRCA2 are known to result in an approximately tenfold increased lifetime risk of developing breast or ovarian cancer. Thus far, no other genes have been identifi ed with such a strong link to hereditary breast and ovarian cancer (HBOC), and in the past decades, many women have been screened for germline mutations in BRCA1 or BRCA2 . This has resulted in the identifi cation of numerous pathogenic mutations as well as a large number of sequence variants for which the clinical relevance is not clear. In the most recent publication of the ENIGMA (Evidence-based Network for the Interpretation of Germline Mutant Alleles) group, an international consortium for the evaluation of BRCA1 or BRCA2 sequence variants, a total of 1,273 unique BRCA1 variants is mentioned ( 1 ), but this number may increase even further because of the implementation of high-throughput sequencing methods. Of the BRCA1 variants of uncertain signifi cance (VUS), 920 are nontruncating exonic mutations that may affect protein function or mRNA splicing, but for which there is not enough linkage information to indicate whether they are pathogenic. To aid genetic counseling of individuals with BRCA1/2 VUS, both genetic and functional classifi cation methods have been developed. Genetic analysis of BRCA1 or BRCA2 VUSs relies on cosegregation with disease, cooccurrence with known pathogenic mutations, and family history of cancer. These data have been integrated into computational models to calculate the likelihood that a VUS is disease-causing ( 2 ). Additional in silico analysis of the evolutionary conservation of the amino acids affected by the mutation and the predicted impact of the mutant amino acids on protein folding are also implemented in such models. Functional assays do not rely on preexisting data, but directly test the effect of BRCA1/2 VUSs on known functions of the encoded proteins ( 3 ). Although this may seem relatively straightforward, it can be diffi cult to extrapolate data from functional assays into cancer risks for patients. For instance, in most assays only part of the BRCA1 protein is analyzed. In addition, some of the more elegant assays are technically demanding and not suitable to analyze large numbers of mutations. We reasoned that a good functional assay should fulfi ll three basic requirements: (i) it should investigate the biologic effects of a BRCA1 VUS in the context of the full-length protein; (ii) it should be conducted under normal physiologic conditions in a noncancerous cell type; and (iii) it should be based on a highly standardized and reproducible protocol.  These considerations led us to develop a functional assay based on physiologic expression of full-length human BRCA1 cDNA in mouse embryonic stem cells that are genetically engineered to allow conditional deletion of endogenous Brca1 . Mutant BRCA1 cDNAs are generated using site-directed mutagenesis (SDM) and introduced in a defi ned genomic locus of mouse embryonic stem cells by recombinase-mediated cassette exchange (RMCE). In this way, we have analyzed 86 BRCA1 variants for their effects on cell proliferation and drug sensitivity, including 74 clinically relevant VUSs.  RESULTS  Generation of Mouse Embryonic Stem Cells Expressing BRCA1 Sequence Variants  Although BRCA1-defi cient tumor cells proliferate rapidly in situ , loss of BRCA1 in normal cells leads to a severe proliferation defect ( 4 ). We decided to make use of this phenotype for the functional analysis of BRCA1 variants in Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1144 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. Brca1 -selectable conditional knockout (SCo) mouse embryonic stem cells ( 5 ). These cells carry one Brca1 -null allele and a selectable conditional Brca1SCo allele, which contains, in addition to loxP sites around exons 5–6, a split puromycin resistance marker that is activated upon Cre-mediated deletion of exons 5–6. They also contain a CreERT2 allele in the Rosa26 locus, which allows for controlled activation of Cre via administration of 4-hydroxy tamoxifen (4-OHT). Thus, BRCA1-defi cient embryonic stem cells can be easily obtained via 4-OHT–induced inactivation of the Brca1SCo allele and subsequent selection for puromycin resistance ( Fig.  1 ; ref.  5 ). To allow effi cient integration of human BRCA1 variants in one specifi c genomic locus, we supplied the other Rosa26 allele with F3 and Frt recombination sites for RMCE by the site-specifi c recombinase Flp ( Fig.  1 and Supplementary Fig. S1; ref. 6 ). Cells that have undergone successful RMCE can be selected because they express a truncated neomycin selection marker under control of the endogenous Rosa26 promoter, which further increases targeting effi ciency. Flpmediated recombination ensures single-copy integration of BRCA1 expression constructs at the same Rosa26 locus, thus avoiding position-effect variegation and copy number– dependent differences in expression.  RMCE vectors were equipped with a human BRCA1 cDNA expression construct, which was modifi ed using SDM to introduce defi ned mutations in BRCA1 . The focus of our analysis was on Dutch and Belgian VUSs that were found in families with HBOC. We also included a number of variants  Figure 1.   Schematic overview of the RMCE procedure in R26 CreERT2/RMCE ; Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells. Before the introduction of a human BRCA1 cDNA, R26 CreERT2/RMCE ; Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells are mouse BRCA1-profi cient and sensitive to both neomycin and puromycin. Targeting of singlecopy human BRCA1 cDNA variants to the Rosa26 locus by Flp RMCE results in expression of human BRCA1 and neomycin resistance. Addition of 4-OHT leads to CreERT2-mediated deletion of mouse Brca1 exons 5 and 6, resulting in loss of mouse BRCA1 protein and concomitant expression of puromycin from the phosphoglycerate kinase (PGK) promoter. This enables selection of mouse BRCA1-defi cient, human BRCA1-expressing R26 CreERT2/hBRCA1 ; Brca1Δ/Δ embryonic stem cells that can be used in functional complementation assays. R26 CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1SCo/Δ R26CreERT2/hBRCA1;Brca1SCo/Δ R26CreERT2/hBRCA1;Brca1Δ/Δ 3 5–6 3 5–6 7–8 3 3 14 7–8 7–8 3 7–8 5–6 Introduction of human BRCA1 by RMCE 3 14 SA SA Brca1SCo5–6 Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26RMCE Brca1Δ5–6 Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26hBRCA1 Brca1SCo5–6 Brca1SCo5–6 Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26RMCE Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26hBRCA1 3 14 CreERT2 CreERT2 CreERT2 CreERT2 Puro Puro Puro PGK PGK PGK Puro PGK zsgreen Hyg FLP zsgreen Hyg FLP SA SA NeoR Selection hBRCA1–, mBrca1+, neoS, puroS hBRCA1+, mBrca1+, neoR, puroS hBRCA1+, mBrca1–, neoR, puroR pA hBRCA1 hBRCA1 EF1α EF1α Δ5′ neo Δ5′ neo Δ5′ neo EF1α hBRCA1 Cre-mediated deletion of mouse Brca1 by 4-OHT addition 3 14 PuroR Selection SA SA SA SA Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1145 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE that were previously classifi ed using functional assays ( 7, 8 ) or a multifactorial likelihood model ( 9 ), as well as M1400V, L1407P, and M1411T, which have been reported to attenuate the interaction between BRCA1 and PALB2 ( 10 ). To allow validation of our functional complementation assay, we included a series of eight BRCA1 variants that are known to be deleterious or neutral according to the Breast Cancer Information Core database (BIC; http://research.nhgri .nih.gov/bic/ ; Supplementary Table S1). These controls include the well-known pathogenic BRCA1 founder mutations 185delAG and 5382insC and the neutral polymorphisms Y105C, R866C, and E1250K. The BIC designation is supported by the classifi cation according to the International Agency for Research on Cancer ( http://iarc.fr/ ), which includes the Align-GVGD score that indicates biophysical and evolutionary alterations ( http://agvgd.iarc.fr/ ; Supplementary Table S1; refs. 11, 12 ). Align-GVGD scores vary between C0 (likely neutral) and C65 (likely deleterious). Sequence-verifi ed constructs that contained the intended VUS, but no other BRCA1 mutations, were transfected into R26 CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells to undergo RMCE ( Fig.  2 ). Neomycin-resistant clones were pooled and RMCE was confi rmed by PCR analysis. Subsequently, protein expression of the human BRCA1 variants was analyzed by Western blot analysis with a human BRCA1-specifi c antibody ( Fig. 2 and Supplementary Fig. S2). Comparison with BRCA1 protein levels in embryonic stem cells expressing human BRCA1 from a bacterial artifi cial chromosome (BAC), which is known to rescue embryonic lethality of Brca1 -null mice ( 7 ,  13 ), showed that transcription of the human BRCA1 cDNA from the EF1A gene promoter results in physiologic levels of BRCA1 protein (Supplementary Fig.  S1). Most BRCA1 variants were expressed at equal levels, allowing comparison of their functional activities. A number of C-terminal BRCA1 mutants showed low levels of expression (Supplementary Table S2; Supplementary Fig. S2). Real-time RT-PCR analysis showed that decreased protein expression was not caused by decreased mRNA expression (Supplementary Fig.  S3), suggesting that the low abundance of BRCA1 protein results from posttranslational events. In fact, for most of these variants, mutation-associated protein instability has already been documented in previous publications (refs. 8 , 14 , 15 ; Supplementary Table S2).  Functional Complementation Assay of BRCA1 Sequence Variants in Mouse Brca1 -Null Embryonic Stem Cells  As a fi rst functional test, we assayed the ability of BRCA1 variants to restore the proliferation defect of switched R26 CreERT2/RMCE ;Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells ( Fig.  2 ). Expression of endogenous mouse Brca1 was shut off through overnight induction of Cre activity by 4-OHT, and 7 days  Figure 2.   Workfl ow for the functional classifi cation of BRCA1 sequence variants in Brca1 -null embryonic stem (ES) cells. Outline of the generation of mouse Brca1 -defi cient embryonic stem cells expressing human BRCA1 variants and functional complementation assays. Indicated are the experimental steps and the time it takes one person to analyze 20 mutants. Introduction of BRCA1 variants in R26CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1SCo/D ES cells BRCA1 Construct + G418 Selection of clones with correct RMCE BRCA1 Expression analysis SDM and sequencing RMCE in ES cells x + 4-OHT + Puromycin Functional assays Functional assays Cre-Mediated deletion of Brca1SCo allele Proliferation and cisplatin sensitivity assays Selection of Brca1ΔSCo/Δ ES cells Timecourse for the analysis of 20 BRCA1 variants Weeks 0 1 2 7 3 8 4 5 6 SDM and RMCE Functional assays Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1146 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. after switching, cells were plated in 96-well plates for proliferation assays, and were analyzed using Sulphorhodamine B staining. For each group of mutants tested, we included positive and negative controls consisting of embryonic stem cells containing, respectively, wild-type human BRCA1 cDNA and an empty RMCE vector. BRCA1 variants were evaluated on their ability to support growth compared with these controls (Supplementary Tables S3 and S4). Although we tested 28 mutations in the central domain encoded by exon 11 (aa 224–1366), BRCA1 variants that were unable to rescue the proliferation defect of Brca1 -null mouse embryonic stem cells to BRCA1 wild-type levels were confi ned to the conserved N- and C-terminal domains of BRCA1.  Cisplatin Sensitivity Assay for Classifi cation of BRCA1 Variants  Although the ability of BRCA1 variants to support proliferation appears to be indicative of VUS function, results were not always clear-cut (Supplementary Tables S3 and S4). BRCA1 is known to be important for DNA interstrand crosslink (ICL) repair through mechanisms that are both dependent ( 5 ) and independent ( 16 ) of its function in homologous recombination (HR). The role of BRCA1 in ICL repair is stressed by the occurrence of genetic reversion mutations restoring BRCA1 protein expression in platinum-resistant ovarian tumors in BRCA1 -mutation carriers ( 17, 18 ). We therefore decided to conduct a 96-well–based cisplatin sensitivity assay to allow a more stringent evaluation of BRCA1 VUS functionality.  Half-maximal inhibitory concentrations (IC 50 ) of cisplatin were determined using a resazurin cell viability assay, and BRCA1 variants were again classifi ed in comparison to wildtype BRCA1 and an empty RMCE vector. To obtain corrected cisplatin IC 50 values, we fi tted a log-logistic curve constrained at 1 and 0. We excluded a fi t if the residual squared error (RSE) exceeded 0.1. We then applied a Bayesian predictor to classify BRCA1 VUS as pathogenic or benign. Most variants that showed less than wild-type activity in the proliferation assay also scored as functionally impaired in the cisplatin sensitivity assay and were classifi ed as deleterious ( Table 1 ,  Table 1.   Functional classifi cation of BRCA1 VUS based on cisplatin response Variant DNA change Type of mutation a Classifi cation S4F c.11C>T VUS Not Clear M18T c.53T>C VUS Deleterious 185delAG c.68_69delAG Deleterious control Deleterious b K45Q c.133A>C VUS Neutral C61G c.181T>G Deleterious control Deleterious C64G c.190T>G VUS Deleterious b D67Y c.199G>T VUS Neutral Y105C c.314A>G Neutral control Neutral N132K c.396C>A VUS Neutral P142H c.425C>A VUS Neutral L147F c.441G>C VUS Neutral L165P c.494T>C VUS Neutral R170W c.508C>T VUS Neutral S186Y c.557C>A VUS Neutral V191I c.571G>A VUS Neutral T231M c.692C>T VUS Neutral D245V c.734A>T VUS Neutral L246V c.736T>G VUS Neutral V271L c.811G>C VUS Neutral S308A c.922A>G; c.923G>C Artifi cial h Not Clear L358R; C360R; E362H c.1073T>G; c.1078T>C; c.1084G>C; c.1086G>T Artifi cial Neutral L668F c.2002C>T VUS Neutral D695N c.2083G>A VUS Neutral P798L c.2393C>T VUS Neutral N810Y c.2428A>T VUS Neutral T826K c.2477C>A VUS Neutral (continued) Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1147 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE (continued) Variant DNA change Type of mutation a Classifi cation R841Q c.2522G>A VUS Neutral Y856H c.2566T>C VUS Neutral R866C c.2596C>T Neutral control Neutral S988A c.2962T>G Artifi cial Neutral M1008I c.3024G>A VUS Neutral E1060A c.3179A>C VUS Neutral S1101N c.3302G>A VUS Neutral K1110del c.3328_3330delAAG VUS Neutral S1140G c.3418A>G VUS Neutral E1214K c.3640G>A VUS Neutral N1236K c.3708T>G VUS Neutral E1250K c.3748G>A Neutral control Neutral L1267S c.3800T>C VUS Neutral E1282V c.3845A>T VUS Neutral S1297del c.3891_3893delTTC VUS Neutral S1301R c.3903T>A VUS Neutral E1346K c.4036G>A VUS Neutral V1378I c.4132G>A VUS Neutral M1400V c.4198A>G VUS Neutral L1407P c.4220T>C VUS Neutral b M1411T c.4232T>C VUS Neutral R1443G c.4327C>G VUS Neutral S1448G c.4342A>G VUS Neutral S1486C c.4456A>T VUS Neutral S1497A c.4489T>G Artifi cial Neutral V1534M c.4600G>A VUS Neutral R1589P c.4766G>C VUS Neutral M1628T c.4883T>C VUS Neutral S1651P c.4951T>C VUS Not Clear S1651F c.4952C>T VUS Not Clear M1652I c.4956G>A VUS Neutral S1655F c.4964C>T VUS Deleterious b H1686R c.5057A>G VUS Deleterious H1686Q c.5058T>A VUS Deleterious V1688del c.5062_5064delGTT VUS Deleterious T1691I c.5072C>T VUS Not clear R1699W c.5095C>T Deleterious control Deleterious b R1699Q c.5096G>A VUS Deleterious b G1706E c.5117G>A VUS Deleterious b G1706A c.5117G>C VUS Neutral A1708E c.5123C>A Deleterious control Deleterious W1718C c.5154G>T VUS Deleterious T1720A c.5158A>G VUS Neutral E1735K c.5203G>A VUS Not clear  Table 1.   Functional classifi cation of BRCA1 VUS based on cisplatin response (Continued) Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1148 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al.  Fig. 3 ). Variants showing increased cisplatin sensitivity were tested at least twice before they were classifi ed. The positive and negative controls classifi ed as expected, although the known pathogenic truncation mutation 5382insC scored as neutral in one of three assays, stressing the need for repeat experiments. Also BRCA1 variants that were previously tested in other assays conducted as expected. It should be noted that the artifi cial variants S308A and S1497A rescued proliferation and cisplatin responses of mouse Brca1 - defi cient embryonic stem cells in BAC complementation assays, but are predicted to be deleterious based on their effects on embryonic stem cell differentiation and their response to γ-irradiation, respectively ( 7 ). The V1804D mutation scored as a neutral variant in our assay, which is in line with most published data ( 8, 9 ), except for the results of an embryonic stem cell–based BAC complementation assay ( 7 ). Again, all BRCA1 mutations that were classifi ed as deleterious were confi ned to regions encoding the conserved N- and C-terminal domains ( Fig.  4 ), despite the observation that deletion of the central region encoded by exon 11 leads to genetic instability in mice ( 12 ). Remarkably, the three mutations that diminish the interaction between BRCA1 and PALB2 ( 10 ), just C-terminal of the region encoded by exon 11, had no effect on cisplatin sensitivity in this assay. Of note, there was in general good correlation between our classifi cation and the Align-GVGD score (Supplementary Table S4). Notable exceptions were the neutral control variant R866C, which validated our assay but scored as likely deleterious (C65) using Align-GVGD, and G1770V, which scored as likely neutral (C0) by Align-GVGD but was classi- fi ed as deleterious in our assay. Our assay also classifi ed some variants for which the Align-GVGD scores were less clear, emphasizing the usefulness of functional assays to complement in silico analysis.  We also analyzed the possible effects of all BRCA1 variants on mRNA splicing, which may have deleterious consequences but cannot be assessed in our cDNA-based assay. The predictive value for exonic variants outside the consensus splice sites is questionable ( 19, 20 ), but four missense mutations were present in existing splice sites (Supplementary Table S4). Although c.5154G>T (encoding W1718C) was deleterious, three of these variants were classifi ed as neutral in our assay. One of them, c.441G>C (encoding L147F), had an increased probability to damage the splice donor site of exon 7. Another variant, c.5072C>T (encoding T1691I), might also affect splicing, but no defect was measured in blood samples of mutation carriers ( 19 ). The third exonic splice site mutation that was classifi ed as neutral in our cisplatin sensitivity assay, c.133A>C (K45Q), is not predicted to lead to aberrant splicing.  Results from Proliferation and Cisplatin Sensitivity Assays Correlate with HR Activity of BRCA1 Variants  BRCA1 and BRCA2 are involved in DNA repair via HR ( 12 , 21 ). Together with non-homologous end joining (NHEJ), HR forms the cellular defense against DNA double-strand breaks (DSB), a severe type of DNA damage that is lethal if unrepaired. Although HR is essentially error-free, NHEJ is error-prone, and therefore defects in HR are known to lead to genomic instability. Although it is not clear whether other Variant DNA change Type of mutation a Classifi cation V1736A c.5207T>C VUS Not clear b D1739G c.5216A>G VUS Deleterious D1739V c.5216A>T VUS Deleterious H1746Q c.5238C>G VUS Not clear R1753T c.5258G>C VUS Not clear b 5382insC c.5266dupC Deleterious control Not clear b L1764P c.5291T>C VUS Deleterious b C1767S c.5300G>C VUS Neutral G1770V c.5309G>T VUS Deleterious b W1782C c.5346G>T VUS Neutral A1789T c.5365G>A VUS Deleterious E1794D c.5382G>C VUS Neutral V1804D c.5411T>A VUS Neutral P1812R c.5435C>G VUS Neutral W1837R c.5509T>C VUS Deleterious H1862L c.5585A>T VUS Neutral a Type of mutation indicates if a variant is a VUS according to the BIC database (http://research.nhgri.nih.gov/bic/). b Functionally impaired in the DR-GFP and/or combined PARP inhibitor/cisplatin sensitivity assay.  Table 1.   Functional classifi cation of BRCA1 VUS based on cisplatin response (Continued) Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1149 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE  Figure 3.   Waterfall chart of cisplatin IC 50 values normalized for wild-type human BRCA1 and empty RMCE vector controls. Corrected cisplatin IC 50 values for all tested human BRCA1 variants and controls, including repeat experiments. BRCA1 variants are classifi ed as functionally impaired or neutral when the corrected IC 50 values are similar to either the empty RMCE vector or the wild-type human BRCA1 controls ( P < 0.05). 4.0 –3.0 –2.0 –1.0 0.0 1.0 2.0 3.0 Corrected cisplatin IC50 (a.u.) Mutant hBRCA1 Wild-type hBRCA1 Empty RMCE vector Positive control Negative control  Figure 4.   Predicted pathogenic BRCA1 amino acid substitutions are confi ned to the evolutionarily conserved N- and C-terminal domains. Schematic representation of the BRCA1 protein with the positions of variants classifi ed as neutral (green) or deleterious (red) indicated. Positive and negative controls are depicted by open pinheads and the known deleterious truncation mutations 185delAG (N-terminal) and 5382insC (C-terminal) are marked in blue. The amino acid sequences of the evolutionarily conserved RING (N-terminal) and BRCT (C-terminal) domains are specifi ed to show the exact positions of deleterious (red) and neutral (green) variants. The amino acid substitutions or nonsense (X) mutations of positive and negative controls are encircled. RING domain BRCT domains Deleterious VUS Neutral VUS Deleterious truncation mutant Deleterious control variant Neutral control variant 1646 1706 1766 91 109 1826 1863 61 31 1 MDLSALRVEEVQNVINAMQKILECPICLEL VNKRMSMVVSGLTPEEFMLVYKFARKHHITLTNLITEETTHVVMKTDAEFVCERTLKYFL IKEPVSTKCDHIFCKFCMLKLLNQKKGPSQ GIAGGKWVVSYFWVTQSIKERKMLNEHDFEVRGDVVNGRNHQGPKRARESQDRKIFRGLE CPLCKNDITKRSLQESTRFSQLVEELLKII CAFQLDTGLEYANSYNFAK ICCYGPFTNMPTDQLEWMVQLCGASVVKELSSFTLGTGVHPIVVVQPDAWTEDNGFHAIG QMCEAPVVTREWVLDSVALYQCQELDTYLIPQIPHSHY T Q E C A X Y C GG F R - Q W Q I E A V R L S C D DR T V P G X Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1150 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. functions of BRCA1 are also important for tumor suppression ( 16 , 22 , 23–26 ), its role in HR is likely to be relevant. Therefore, we used the direct repeat (DR)-GFP assay ( 27 ) to measure the effects on HR for a subset of our BRCA1 VUSs. A number of predicted pathogenic variants and controls were shuttled into R26 CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1 SCo/Δ ;Pim1 DR-GFP/wt embryonic stem cells carrying the DR-GFP reporter in the Pim1 locus. Expression of endogenous mouse Brca1 was switched off, and cells were transfected with a plasmid encoding the I-SceI meganuclease as well as an mCherry fl uorescent marker to control for transfection effi ciency. Repair of I-SceI–induced DNA DSBs in DR-GFP via HR leads to expression of GFP, which can be monitored by fl ow cytometry. All but one of the predicted pathogenic variants tested resulted in defective HR, thereby confi rming our functional classifi cation ( Fig. 5 ). The only predicted deleterious variant that did not signifi cantly differ from wild-type BRCA1 , R1699Q, seemed to support intermediate levels of HR activity.  PARP Inhibitor Sensitivity Assay for Classifi cation of BRCA1 Variants with Intermediate Activity  Deleterious effects of variants with intermediate or partial activity may escape detection in certain functional assays. Although cisplatin sensitivity assays allow robust and  Figure 5.  BRCA1 sequence variants classifi ed as pathogenic do not restore HR. R26 CreERT2/hBRCA1; Brca1 SCo/Δ;Pim1 DR-GFP/wt embryonic stem cells carrying the DR-GFP reporter gene in the Pim1 locus and mutant BRCA1 or controls in the Rosa26 locus were switched using 4-OHT and transfected with a vector expressing I-SceI and mCherry. Transfected cells were analyzed for GFP expression as a measure of HR activity. Expression of BRCA1 wild-type (WT) cDNA resulted in increased HR compared to the empty RMCE vector (Vector) control. Error bars indicate the SD between the results of three independent I-SceI transfections. Signifi cantly decreased HR activity compared with the wild-type control (green line) is indicated. GFP-Positive cells (%) 0.0 0.5 1.0 1.5 2.0 2.5 3.0 3.5 4.0 4.5 ** ns ** * * ns * * * * * * * ns ns WT Vector 185delAG C64G V271L S1651F S1655F R1699Q R1699W G1706A G1706E V1736A R1753T 5382insC L1764P G1770V reproducible classifi cation of several functionally impaired BRCA1 variants, assays using other compounds may have additional value. It is known that BRCA1- and BRCA2- defi cient cells are extremely sensitive to PARP1 inhibition ( 28, 29 ), leading to a larger dynamic range between BRCA2- defi cient cells and isogenic BRCA2-profi cient controls than for cisplatin ( 30 ). We therefore tested complementation of PARP inhibitor sensitivity for a number of BRCA1 mutants and the BRCA1 wild-type control. Given the unexpected neutral effects of the M1400V, L1407P, and M1411T mutations in the PALB2 interaction domain, we decided to include these variants in this series, as well as the R1699Q and V1736A variants that have recently been shown to confer (intermediate) breast and ovarian cancer risk ( 31, 32 ). To allow direct comparison of results from different assays, we repeated the cisplatin sensitivity and proliferation assays in parallel to the olaparib sensitivity assay. Our results indicate that BRCA1 wild-type and empty vector controls indeed show a larger difference in sensitivity for olaparib than for cisplatin ( Fig.  6 ). However, this increase in dynamic range is accompanied by an increased variation between repeat experiments for BRCA1-profi cient samples. Nevertheless, the functional defect of the R1699Q and V1736A mutations becomes more evident, and there also Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1151 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE  Figure 6.   PARP inhibitor sensitivity assay of BRCA1 sequence variants. R26 CreERT2/hBRCA1 ;Brca1 SCo/Δ or R26CreERT2/RMCE; Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells carrying mutant BRCA1 , BRCA1 wild-type (WT), or empty RMCE vector (Vector) controls in the Rosa26 locus were switched using 4-OHT and assayed for sensitivity to cisplatin or the PARP inhibitor olaparib. The cytotoxicity assays were conducted in parallel and data were normalized to the average of the wild-type controls. Error bars indicate the SD between the results of biologic triplicates for which the cells were independently switched. Signifi cant deviation from the average IC 50 values of the wild-type control (green line) is indicated. IC50 Relative to WT controls (%) 0 20 40 60 80 100 120 140 160 Cisplatin Olaparib * **** **** * * ** *** **** ns ns ns ns WT Vector M1400V L1407P M1411T R1699Q V1736A seems to be a less than wild-type response for the PALB2 interaction mutant L1407P. In the concurrent proliferation analysis, R1699Q and V1736A both show an intermediate functional defect (Supplementary Fig.  S4). Also the M1411T mutation seems to affect the response to PARP inhibition, but the difference with BRCA1 wild-type is not signifi cant. Interestingly, the L1407P and M1411T variants have previously been shown to be more defective than M1400V in a gene conversion assay ( 10 ). It should also be noted that, in contrast with the large-scale classifi cation experiments, the cisplatin sensitivity assay conducted in parallel to the PARP inhibitor assay identifi ed signifi cant functional defects for L1407P and V1736A.  DISCUSSION  Over the past few years several functional assays for classifi cation of BRCA1 VUSs have been developed. Several of these assays are restricted to functions of the BRCA1 protein that reside in the evolutionarily conserved RING or BRCT domains. Examples include in vitro transactivation assays for BRCT peptides ( 8 ) and measurement of ubiquitin ligase activity for protein fragments encompassing the N-terminal RING domain ( 33 ). Other assays were designed to evaluate the functions of full-length mutant BRCA1 protein, either by monitoring general effects on proliferation or response to DNA damage ( 7 ), or by directly focusing on the role of BRCA1 in DNA repair via HR ( 34 ).  Because BRCA1 VUSs are not restricted to regions encoding the N- or C-terminal domains, and given the observation that interaction between these domains is required for recruitment of BRCA1 to damaged DNA ( 35 ), functional assays for the full-length protein would be ideal. In principle, such assays can be conducted in cell lines derived from BRCA1 - mutated tumors, but there are indications that the outcome of assays for BRCA1 function depends on the cellular context. As absence of BRCA1 leads to loss of cellular viability, it is thought that additional mutations are required for BRCA1- associated tumorigenesis. For example, loss of p53 alleviates the consequences of BRCA1 defi ciency both in vitro and in vivo ( 4 ) and is common in BRCA1-defi cient tumors ( 36, 37 ). Also, depletion of 53BP1 is known to suppress the defects caused by BRCA1 defi ciency ( 5 , 38 , 39 ). Therefore, aberrations in BRCA1-defi cient tumor cells may mask functional defects of BRCA1 VUSs. We reasoned that assays in normal cells that can be depleted from endogenous BRCA1 expression are most likely to reveal functional defects of BRCA1 VUSs. The usefulness of this approach has been previously shown by Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1152 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. BAC complementation assays in mouse embryonic stem cells ( 7 , 40 ). However, mutagenesis of large BAC clones by recombineering and functional complementation of cells with these mutant constructs is time-consuming and technically demanding, and therefore cannot be conducted in a high-throughput setting. We therefore set out to develop a cDNA-based functional complementation assay in mouse embryonic stem cells that is easier to control and scale up and more suitable for routine functional classifi cation of BRCA1 sequence variants.  One advantage of BAC transgenics in complementation assays is that genes are expressed at physiologically relevant levels. This is the result of low copy-number integrations and the presence of natural regulatory elements required for proper gene expression. We decided to use RMCE to allow single-copy integration of BRCA1 cDNAs at one specifi c genomic locus. The use of RMCE effectively prevents multiple or partial integrations, concatemers, and position-effect variegation. As a result, all variants are expressed at equal levels. Moreover, transcription of BRCA1 cDNAs from the EF1A gene promoter results in physiologic levels of BRCA1 protein, comparable with those observed in embryonic stem cells stably transfected with a BAC containing the human BRCA1 locus. Indeed, the wild-type human BRCA1 cDNA was able to complement Brca1 -null embryonic stem cells in cellular proliferation, drug sensitivity, and HR assays. Our RMCE strategy uses BRCA1 cDNA constructs in which mutations can be swiftly introduced using SDM, enabling a higher throughput than introduction of mutations via BAC recombineering. In addition, the introduction of BRCA1 cDNAs via RMCE obviates the need to analyze multiple embryonic stem cell clones for correct integration and expression.  As a proof of principle, we used our functional complementation assay to analyze exonic BRCA1 VUSs that were identifi ed in families with HBOC in the Netherlands and Belgium, as well as a set of previously analyzed BRCA1 variants. A number of mutations resulted in reduced BRCA1 protein levels, most likely because of structural destabilization. In all cases, this led to diminished capacity for functional complementation. Also, several variants that gave rise to normal BRCA1 protein levels were unable to rescue the proliferation defect and cisplatin sensitivity of Brca1 -null embryonic stem cells. As BRCA1 loss of function mutations are associated with increased cancer risk, variants that score as functionally impaired in our embryonic stem cell assay system may be causally involved in tumor formation. This notion is supported by the fact that seven of eight known pathogenic or neutral control variants in our validation series were correctly classifi ed by the cisplatin sensitivity assay. The pathogenic 5382insC truncation mutation could not be classifi ed because it scored as neutral in one of three transfection series. This was probably due to technical reasons, as the 5382insC mutation did not restore HR activity in Brca1 -defi cient embryonic stem cells, in contrast with R1699Q, which was recently shown to confer intermediate risk of HBOC ( 32 ).  Our assay system yielded ambivalent results for nine other variants: S4F, S308A, S1651P, S1651F, T1691I, V1736A, E1735K, H1746Q, and R1753T. T1691I and E1735K were classifi ed as functionally impaired in only one cisplatin sensitivity test, whereas values from repeat experiments could not be taken into account because of RSE values above 0.1. S4F, S1651P, S1651F, V1736A, H1746Q, and R1753T were differently classifi ed in repeat experiments, which may refl ect technical fl aws or intermediate activity of these variants. Of note, the V1736A mutation was recently identifi ed as a pathogenic variant with hypomorphic activity in DNA repair ( 31 ). Although we did not measure signifi cant HR activity of V1736A in a DR-GFP gene conversion assay, intermediate activity of this variant is supported by the results of the proliferation assays and additional cisplatin sensitivity assays. S1651F showed HR activity similar to wild-type BRCA1 , whereas R1753T was HR-defi cient. S308A is an artifi cial mutation of a BRCA1 phosphorylation site that was able to support proliferation and resistance to DNA damage in an embryonic stem cell-based BAC complementation assay. However, S308A-complemented embryonic stem cells did show increased apoptosis when cultured in embryoid bodies ( 7 ), indicating a partial defect that might explain the ambivalent results for this mutation in our assays.  Our results show that BRCA1 variants should ideally be assayed in triplicate to avoid misclassifi cation. This also applies to BRCA1 VUS that we classifi ed as neutral, most of which were tested only once because in our current study we focused on variants that showed functional impairment. The striking restriction of unambiguously predicted pathogenic mutants to the terminal RING and BRCT domains suggests that some plasticity is allowed for the central domain of BRCA1. However, our dataset is still limited and more experiments are required to gain insight into the function of this domain.  Our cDNA-based system allows for several additional functional assays that have been described previously for BAC transgenic embryonic stem cells ( 7 ). These include assays for defects during in vitro and in vivo embryonic stem cell differentiation but also treatments with other cytotoxic agents. As a proof of principle, we investigated the activity of a number of mutants in the response to the PARP inhibitor olaparib. These included M1400V, L1407, and M1411T, which were previously shown to impair PALB2 binding and have a negative effect on BRCA1 function ( 10 ). Although the differences in sensitivity of BRCA1-defi cient versus BRCA1-profi cient embryonic stem cells are larger for olaparib than for cisplatin, increased variation between repeat experiments allowed us to identify functional defects only for L1407 and not for the other two variants in the PALB2 interaction domain, M1400V and M1411T. However, the R1699Q and V1736A variants, which are known to have hypomorphic activity, clearly showed a defect in the response to olaparib. Interestingly, both mutations are in the BRCT domain, and it has recently been shown that mutation of this domain especially confers sensitivity to PARP inhibition ( 41 ). Together, our results show that PARP inhibitor sensitivity assays may have added value, especially for the classifi cation of BRCA1 VUSs with intermediate phenotypes.  Platinum drugs and PARP inhibitors are selectively toxic to BRCA1-defi cient cells because they target HR defi ciency. Although the role of BRCA1 in HR is thought to be essential for maintaining genomic integrity and preventing accumulation of (oncogenic) mutations, other activities may also contribute to its tumor suppression function. These activities Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1153 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE may include the HR-independent role for BRCA1 in ICL repair, which has been attributed to the facilitation of FANCD2 accumulation at cross-linked DNA ( 16 ). Nevertheless, we observed a good correlation between the results of the cisplatin sensitivity assay and the results of the DR-GFP HR assay. All BRCA1 variants that failed to restore the cisplatin response in Brca1 -null embryonic stem cells were also defective in catalyzing gene conversion, thereby confi rming our functional classifi cation. It will be interesting to see if this holds true for all BRCA1 variants or whether there are also pathogenic mutations that have no effect on HR.  As with any other in vitro approach, our functional complementation assay system might still fail to identify all pathogenic variants because it does not necessarily recapitulate all aspects of BRCA1 function in vivo . A limitation of our cDNA-based assay is also that it cannot be used to investigate effects on mRNA splicing. Although algorithms have been designed to predict possible splice defects, the consequences of mutations outside of the consensus splice sites especially require functional validation experiments. For this purpose, BAC complementation assays ( 7 ), minigene-based splicing assays, or BRCA1 transcript analysis of patient blood samples ( 19 ) may be instrumental. However, transacting factors also affect splicing, and these may be tissue specifi c ( 42 ). A possible solution would be to determine the presence of BRCA1 splice variants in tumor tissue from BRCA1 VUS carriers and use this information to generate a cDNA construct for analysis of the functional consequences. To evaluate BRCA1 VUSs, there remains a need for multifactorial models that combine results from functional assays and in silico analyses with genetic evidence and other information from mutation carriers. This also includes DNA copy number data from tumors from BRCA1 VUS carriers, as it is known that BRCA1- associated breast tumors show distinct genomic aberrations ( 43, 44 ). Our functional assay system does however provide a robust and easily implementable tool for the functional characterization of large numbers of BRCA1 VUSs within the context of the full-length protein. It is our hope that our assay system will fi nd its way to clinical genetics laboratories where it can be used to aid genetic counseling. Ideally, these tests should be coordinated on an international level and in close collaboration with the ENIGMA consortium.    Missense substitutions of uncertain clinical significance in the BRCA1 gene are a vexing problem in genetic counseling for women who have a family history of breast cancer. In this study, we evaluated the functions of 29 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in two DNA repair pathways. Repair of double-strand breaks by homology-directed recombination (HDR) had been previously analyzed for 16 of these BRCA1 variants, and 13 more variants were analyzed in this study. All 29 variants were also analyzed for function in double-strand break repair by the single-strand annealing (SSA) pathway. We found that among the pathogenic mutations in BRCA1, all were defective for DNA repair by either pathway. The HDR assay was accurate because all pathogenic mutants were defective for HDR, and all nonpathogenic variants were fully functional for HDR. Repair by SSA accurately identified pathogenic mutants, but several nonpathogenic variants were scored as defective or partially defective. These results indicated that specific amino acid residues of the BRCA1 protein have different effects in the two related DNA repair pathways, and these results validate the HDR assay as highly correlative with BRCA1-associated breast cancer.  Keywords: BRCA1, homologous recombination, single-strand annealing, centrosome, VUS Go to: Introduction Among the more than 70,000 women who had their BRCA1 gene (MIM# 113705) sequenced by 2006, approximately 2.3% were found to carry a BRCA1 variant of uncertain significance (VUS). These variants were classified as uncertain because they occurred in families wherein segregation analysis had not been done or in whom the segregation analysis was not informative and thus the VUS had unknown effects on breast and ovarian cancer risk [Hall et al., 2009; Spearman et al., 2008; Sweet et al., 2009]. As whole genome and exome sequencing becomes a more prevalent practice, more VUSs in BRCA1 will be uncovered, and increasingly women will face the quandary of an uninformative genetic test. This leads to individuals with a VUS test result making decisions about cancer screening and prevention without concrete information on which to base their decisions. Women who have an indeterminate BRCA1 sequence result and a family history of breast cancer have a high level of distress, and there are no consistent clinical guidelines for advising them [Dorval et al., 2005; Petrucelli et al., 2002; van Dijk et al., 2006]. Of the 567 BRCA1 missense substitutions listed in the current Breast Cancer Information Core (BIC) database, 14 are described as pathogenic (Class 5) and 27 as nonpathogenic (Class 1). By including the data from Collaborators for the Investigation of Modifiers of BRCA1/2 (CIMBA), a total of 24 BRCA1 variants are pathogenic (CIMBA database). Less than 10% of the missense substitutions in the BIC database have known cancer predisposition. In the absence of definitive genetic information on BRCA1 missense substitutions, other methods are needed to determine whether missense substitutions are pathogenic. Multifactorial approaches have augmented genetic segregation analysis with additional information about the proband and, in some cases, the tumor [Easton et al., 2007; Goldgar et al., 2004; Lindor et al., 2012; Plon et al., 2008; Spearman et al., 2008; Sweet et al., 2009]. These approaches have been successful in reclassification of variants but are also incomplete because they cannot definitively determine whether any given variant affects the critical cancer suppressing function(s) of the protein [Millot et al., 2012]. In contrast, a biological functional assay has the potential to determine whether any given BRCA1 missense substitution is defective in a process, and if that function is predictive of cancer predisposition (i.e., 100% sensitive and 100% specific), then the functional assay can, in theory, be used in genetic counseling.  A variety of biological assays have been analyzed for BRCA1 function and have been correlated with cancer predisposition to various extents [Carvalho et al., 2007; Cotta-Ramusino et al., 2011; Kais et al., 2012; Lee et al., 2010; Millot et al., 2012; Morris et al., 2006; Ransburgh et al., 2010; Vallee et al., 2012]. Several of these assays test single domains of BRCA1, and several address the variant within the context of the full-length protein. In this study, we analyzed the effects of 29 missense substitutions in BRCA1 on the repair of double-strand DNA breaks (DSBs) by homologous recombination and by the single-strand annealing (SSA) pathways. Our results indicate that the effects of specific missense mutations in these pathways strongly correlate with breast cancer predisposition. Further, we find that specific amino acid substitutions affect the two double-strand break repair pathways differentially.  Go to: Materials and Methods Plasmids and Cell Lines  All plasmids for the expression of human BRCA1 with missense substitutions were generated by site-directed mutagenesis from the wild-type sequence (GenBank: U14680.1). Several of these plasmids had been described in previous publications [Ransburgh et al., 2010; Wei et al., 2008]. The cell line for the homologous recombination assay, HeLa-DR, was based on the genomic integration of a specific vector that functions as a recombination substrate [Pierce et al., 2001]. The vector for homologous recombination had been the gift of M. Jasin (Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Institute, New York, NY). The HeLa-DR had been described before [Parvin et al., 2011; Ransburgh et al., 2010]. The repair of double-strand breaks by the SSA pathway was based on a vector kindly provided by J. Stark (City of Hope, Duarte, CA) [Bennardo et al., 2008; Stark et al., 2004] stably integrated into HeLa cells to make the HeLa–SSA cell line. The siRNA targeting the cellular BRCA1 3′ untranslated region (UTR) is the same as previously used [Ransburgh et al., 2010].  SSA Assay  HeLa–SSA cells were seeded in 15.6-mm-diameter wells in 24-well plates, and when cells were 50% confluent, cells were transfected with 5 pmol of the siRNA targeting the BRCA1 3′-UTR plus 0.3 μg of the BRCA1 expression plasmid in Lipofectamine 2000 reagent (Life Technologies, Grand Island, NY). At 24 hr after transfection, cells were transferred to 35-mm-diameter wells in six-well plates. At 48 hr, cells were transfected with 25 pmol of the BRCA1 3′-UTR-specific siRNA plus 0.75 μg BRCA1 expression plasmid plus 0.75 μg pCBASce (for the expression of I-SceI) in Lipofectamine 2000 reagent. After 3 days, cells are harvested by trypsinization, and the fraction of GFP-positive cells is determined using a FACScalibur flow cytometer (BD Biosciences, San Jose, CA) (Analytic Cytometry Shared Resource of The Ohio State University Comprehensive Cancer Center).  Western Blot Analysis of BRCA1 Protein  Immunoblots of the expressed BRCA1 protein were done as has been described previously [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Cells that had been transfected as in the SSA assay were, in parallel, extracted in 0.1% NP-40, 0.05 M Hepes (pH 7.5), and 0.005 M EDTA. Protein contents of extracts were determined using the Bradford reagent; and 50 μg of protein was electrophoresed on 3–8% Nu-PAGE gels (Life Technologies, Grand Island, NY) M. Jasin (Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Institute, NewYork, NY), transferred to polyvinylidene fluoride membranes, and immunoblotted using antibody specific to BRCA1(400–1,100). Densitometry analysis was performed from immunoblots using Kodak 1D software (Eastman Kodak Company, Rochester, NY).  Statistical Analysis of Results  The raw results in the SSA assay for the missense substitutions were compared with the control samples (either GL2 siRNA or BRCA1 siRNA with BRCA1-wt add back) using the unpaired Student’s t-test and obtained the one-tail P values; for intermediate-phenotype mutants, besides the above-mentioned comparisons, we also conducted the unpaired Student’s t-test against the control sample that contains BRCA1 siRNA with empty vector adding back, and obtained the one-tail P values. P values of less than 0.01 were considered significant.  Go to: Results Function of BRCA1 Variants in DNA Break Repair by Homologous Recombination  The BRCA1 protein has been shown to be a critical component of the response to DSBs. Cellular machinery can utilize homologous sequences to accurately repair the DSB, or the free ends can be joined by nonhomologous end joining. In addition to homologous recombination, the pathway of SSA exists by which the repair proteins resect DNA from the free ends of the DSB, and when short stretches of homologous sequence are exposed, then the DNA ends are rejoined [Stark et al., 2004]. The homologous recombination assay used in this study was based on a method developed by the Jasin laboratory in which a single integrated genomic locus contains two inactive GFP genes, and one of these contains the endonuclease cleavage site for the rare-cutting I-SceI enzyme [Pierce et al., 2001]. Upon expression of I-SceI in the cell, one inactive allele of GFP is cut, and if homologous recombination occurs using the second inactive GFP gene as the homology template, then the DNA repair results in gene conversion making the GFP gene become active (Fig. 1A). The SSA assay is based on an analogous strategy in which the GFP protein is not expressed because of intervening DNA sequence, with an I-SceI site at the 3′ end of the intervening DNA. Upon expression of the I-SceI endonuclease, the DSB is generated, and resection of the intervening sequence reveals homologous GFP sequences that are aligned and repaired [Stark et al., 2004] (Fig. 1B). These two processes depend on sequence homologies for the repair, but there are functional differences. The Rad51 and BRCA2 proteins are required for the homology-directed recombination (HDR) assay, but are not required for the SSA assay [Moynahan et al., 2001; Stark et al., 2004].  Figure 1 Figure 1 The double-strand DNA break (DSB) repair assay system. A: The HDR recombination substrate [Pierce et al. 2001] is diagrammed. The upstream GFP allele is defective because of the inclusion of an I-SceI site in its sequence. The downstream GFP allele is ... For each assay, we have established HeLa-derived cell lines with the published recombination substrate [Pierce et al., 2001; Stark et al., 2004] integrated in the genome at a single site. The HeLa-DR cell line assays HDR, and the HeLa–SSA cell line is used to assay SSA. The HDR and the SSA assays have a similar experimental design with a depletion of BRCA1 by transfection of a siRNA that is specific for the 3′-UTR of the BRCA1 mRNA. We cotransfect a BRCA1 expression plasmid that is not affected by the siRNA and which expresses the variant BRCA1 protein. After 2 days, we repeat the transfection and also transfect a plasmid that encodes the expression of the I-SceI endonuclease to generate the DSB in the presence of the variant BRCA1. After 3 days, we assay the cells for GFP expression by flow cytometry. The timeline of the experiment is shown in Figure 1C.  We have previously analyzed 16 variants of BRCA1 in a tissue-culture-cell-based assay for repair of DSBs via homologous recombination [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Using the HeLa-DR cell line developed by us, up to 20% of the cells convert to GFP positive. This high level of recombination enables the quantitative analysis of variants in BRCA1 in this process. The endogenous BRCA1 mRNA is depleted by siRNA targeting the 3′-UTR, and a BRCA1 variant that is resistant to the siRNA is simultaneously expressed from a plasmid [Parvin et al., 2011; Ransburgh, et al., 2010]. A quantitative measure of the function of the BRCA1 variant is determined from the percentage of cells that convert to GFP positive.  In this study, we first analyzed an additional 13 BRCA1 variants for function in HDR (Fig. 2). Twelve of the BRCA1 variants spanned amino acid residue 90 through 191 and were identified from the Breast Information Core (http://research.nhgri.nih.gov/bic/). These were expressed from the plasmid as full-length proteins. All 12 variants are listed in the BIC as having unknown phenotype with regard to predisposition to breast cancer. Several of these have been evaluated using a multifactorial classification system, and of these 12 variants, seven were nonpathogenic [Lindor et al., 2012]. These were chosen because the function of this domain was unknown and because many of these variants have been reported to be nonpathogenic. By testing the known nonpathogenic variants in this assay, we provide a specificity control for the functional test. The 13th variant tested is a known deleterious mutant in the carboxy terminus of the BRCA1 protein, M1775R. In these experiments, the percentage of cells that were GFP positive when transfected with the control siRNA and the control plasmid were set equal to 1%. All other results were normalized to this control, and all results were from three or more separate experiments. Depletion of BRCA1 and transfection with empty plasmid resulted in a value of 0.09 relative to the control (Fig. 2, lane 2). Thus, BRCA1 depletion has an over 10-fold effect reducing the level of homologous recombination. Depleting BRCA1 and transfecting a plasmid that expressed wild-type BRCA1 resulted in full restoration of homologous recombination (Fig. 2, lane 3). Among the variants with substitutions in residues from 90 to 191, all 12 functioned as wild type in the homologous recombination assay (Fig. 2, lanes 4–15) (P < 0.002 compared with depleted BRCA1). By contrast, the 13th tested missense substitution, a known pathogenic mutant BRCA1–M1775R, did not complement the depletion of BRCA1 in this assay (Fig. 2, lane 16) (Pv = 0.0014 compared with wild-type BRCA1).  Figure 2 Figure 2 Analysis of 13 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in the homology-directed repair assay. HeLa-DR cells were transfected with a siRNA that depleted the endogenous BRCA1 and with a plasmid that expressed the indicated BRCA1 variant. After generating a double-strand ... Function of 29 Variants of BRCA1 in the Repair of DNA Breaks by the SSA Pathway  The 16 BRCA1 variants that had previously been tested for function in homologous recombination [Ransburgh et al., 2010] and the 13 BRCA1 variants tested in this study (Fig. 2) were analyzed for function in SSA repair. The recombination substrate [Bennardo et al., 2008; Stark et al., 2004] was based on similar design as the homologous recombination substrate with the exception that restoration of GFP activity occurs when the two inactive GFP genes are repaired by SSA. HeLa cells were stably transfected with the SA–GFP construct, and a clone was selected that had no detectable background GFP signal. Upon transfection of the I-SceI-expressing plasmid, about 5–7% of cells became GFP positive, indicative of a functioning SSA pathway. Depletion of BRCA1 resulted in a decrease to about 1–2% GFP-positive cells (Fig. 3, lane 2), indicating a role for BRCA1 in the SSA repair pathway that had been previously observed [Stark et al., 2004]. Depletion of BRCA1 resulted in about 25% of the activity found in nondepleted cells. As had been observed with the homologous recombination assay, transfection of a plasmid expressing wild-type BRCA1 fully complemented the defect in SSA due to depletion of the endogenous BRCA1 (Fig. 3, lane 3). By contrast, depletion of endogenous BRCA1 and expression of a known pathogenic mutant of BRCA1, M1775R, was as defective in SSA as had been transfection of the empty vector (Fig. 3, lane 32). Similar to previous observations with the zinc-coordinating mutants of BRCA1, these residues were all required for SSA repair of double-strand breaks (Fig. 3, lanes: 6, 7, 10, 11, 13, 14, 16, and 17). As was found for the homologous recombination assay, the M18T variant and the T37R variant were defective for SSA repair. The L52F variant had reduced levels of SSA repair, approximately 69% of wild-type activity (Fig. 3, lane 15), although this value was not significantly different from wild type. The D67Y variant, a known nonpathogenic variant [Easton et al., 2007], was fully active in SSA repair (lane 18).  Figure 3 Figure 3 Analysis of 29 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in the SSA assay. HeLa–SSA cells were transfected as in Figure 2 with plasmids that express the 29 tested missense substitutions of BRCA1. Results of the fraction of cells that had converted to GFP ... Results diverged between the SSA and the homologous recombination assays for the variants in residues 90 through 191. The BRCA1–I90T variant functioned in the homologous recombination assay, but in the SSA assay, it was 47% as active as wild type (t-test for differing from wild-type P < 0.01; lane 20). The Y105C variant was statistically different from both wild-type BRCA1 and empty vector (indicated with both an asterisk and a cross; lane 21). This Y105C variant thus has intermediate phenotype, neither fully active nor fully defective. Similarly, the P142H, E143K, and the R170Q had intermediate phenotype (lanes 25, 26, and 28). The V191D variant was also defective for SSA repair (lane 31). Interestingly, the S153R and S186Y variants had diminished activity, but the change in activities was not statistically significant from the wild type. Thus, these variants were not scored as defective. Seven of the variants tested had assay-specific phenotypes, suggesting that how BRCA1 interacts with repair factors in the homologous recombination pathway is different from factors that BRCA1 binds in the SSA pathway.  When replacing the endogenous BRCA1 protein with a variant BRCA1, there is the concern that the expression levels be consistent with the levels of the endogenous in nondepleted cells. A defective phenotype could be masked by high levels of overexpression of the variant protein, or the phenotype of a functional protein might not be observed because of poor protein expression. The 16 variants with missense substitutions between residues 18 and 71 had been tested in HeLa-derived cells and the expression of each variant was similar to the endogenous in each case [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. For expression, we tested the missense substitutions between residues 90 and 191 and also residue 1775, and found that they all express approximately similarly as the endogenous BRCA1 (Fig. 4). Normalized results from densitometry analysis are presented beneath each lane. Protein from nontransfected cells and from control siRNA and empty vector transfected cells had similar amounts of BRCA1 protein (Fig. 4, lanes 1 and 2). Depletion of BRCA1 and add back with empty plasmid depleted the level of BRCA1 protein, which densitometry analysis indicated to be about 0.35 relative to the nontransfected cells (lane 3). All variants were detected at higher levels than the lysate from BRCA1-depleted cells. Some variants were expressed at higher levels than others, but at most 1.3-fold higher than the BRCA1 levels in nontransfected cells (compare, for example, lane 7 with lane 2). Because none of the BRCA1 variants were expressed at levels much higher than the endogenous BRCA1, in no case could the phenotype of a defective variant be masked by overexpression. The S186Y, V191D, and M1775R variants all had somewhat lower expression, but these lower levels of expression did not correlate with function in either homologous recombination or SSA repair. As an example, the S186Y variant was a low expresser (0.86 relative to control), but it was functional in both assays. We note that the M1775R mutant was expressed at lower levels (0.62 relative to endogenous BRCA1) than any other BRCA1 variant (lane 16). We interpret this level of expression to be similar to other variants and not an explanation for the defect in each double-strand break repair pathway. However, we cannot exclude the interpretation that the M1775R was defective in the DNA repair assays because there was lower BRCA1 expression of this isoform in our cells.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Analysis of the expression levels of 13 variants in HeLa–SSA cells. The expression levels of 16 previously tested BRCA1 substitution variants were tested in the HeLa-derived cell line [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Thirteen variants, with substitutions ... Comparison of Variants in Different Assays  The 29 BRCA1 variants analyzed in this study were compared for function in the two DNA repair assays and with available knowledge about cancer association (Table 1). Many of the variants were consistent across the two assays, but there were several variants demonstrating separation of function. All of the zinc-coordinating residues were required for function in both repair assays. The M18T variant was clearly defective, but it is currently classified as unknown clinical significance. There is one genetic model that classified this M18T variant as likely pathogenic (see below).  Table 1 Table 1 Summary of BRCA1 Variants Benchmarking Function to Clinical Relevance  Recently, a new classification system for variants has been proposed [Lindor et al., 2012; Plon et al., 2008]. According to this system, Class 1 denotes variants that are not pathogenic. Class 2 is likely nonpathogenic. Class 3 is uncertain. Class 4 is likely pathogenic (probability of being pathogenic is 0.95–0.99), and Class 5 is definitely pathogenic (probability >0.99). According to variants described in the [Lindor et al. (2012)] system, three of the variants in this study (M18T, C61G, and M1775R) were of Class 4, either likely pathogenic or definitely pathogenic. An additional five mutants are treated clinically as Class 5, pathogenic, (C39Y, C44F, C47G, C64G, and R71G). One of these pathogenic mutants, R71G, does not affect the BRCA1 protein, but rather the splicing of the mRNA [Vega et al., 2001]. Since the assays tested express BRCA1 from spliced cDNA, the R71G defective phenotype would not be detected. We thus exclude this mutant from the comparison of benchmarking these assays against known mutants. There were then seven pathogenic mutants (Class 4 or 5) analyzed and eight nonpathogenic variants (Class 1; Table 1). When comparing the results of our functional analyses with these previously classified variants, the HDR assay scored all seven pathogenic or likely pathogenic mutants as defective, and all eight nonpathogenic variants as functional. The results of the assay were, in the case of every variant, either fully active or fully defective (see examples in Fig. 2). To date, no variant tested in the HDR assay produced an intermediate score.  Compared with these benchmarks, the variants tested in the SSA assay did not score as well as the HDR assay. All pathogenic mutants were defective for SSA repair of double-strand breaks, but one nonpathogenic variant (I124V) was defective for SSA, and three Class 1 variants had intermediate phenotype in the SSA assay. Although the HDR assay was both highly sensitive and highly specific, the SSA assay was highly sensitive at association with cancer risk, but it was less specific. Of interest, it had been noted that four BRCA1 variants, Y105C, P142H, E143K, and Y179C, had decreased accumulation at the sites of DNA breaks [Wei et al., 2008]. Although these variants were normal for HDR, three of these had intermediate levels of function in the SSA assay (Table 1). Perhaps there is a link between the accumulation of BRCA1 at DNA repair sites and a factor important for the SSA assay.  Go to: Discussion Functional Assays as Predictive Tools for Assessing BRCA1 Variants  In this study, we analyzed a total of 29 BRCA1 variants in the repair of DSBs by homologous recombination and by SSA. For the sake of this discussion, we exclude the BRCA1–R71G variant that affects splicing [Vega et al., 2001] because all of our assays used prespliced cDNAs and would not be sensitive to a splicing defect. By comparing our results with those BRCA1 missense substitutions that have a known effect on breast cancer predisposition, we found that the HDR assay was 100% accurate: seven previously classified pathogenic mutants were defective for HDR, and eight previously classified nonpathogenic variants in BRCA1 were functional for HDR. Further, the results for the HDR assay were either fully active or fully defective. We interpret these results to indicate that the HDR assay is validated as a predictive tool for assessing BRCA1 variants.  By contrast to the HDR assay, the function of BRCA1 variants in the repair of DSBs by SSA had a number of differences that diminished the accuracy of this assay. On the basis of the benchmarks of variants that were classified using a genetic model [Lindor et al., 2012], the SSA assay was sensitive because it did not misclassify any pathogenic variants, but it was not specific because it misclassified several nonpathogenic variants as either intermediate or defective. Interpretation of the SSA assay was also complicated by intermediate results; by comparison, the HDR assay had no intermediate results among the 29 variants tested. It is possible, but remains to be determined, whether missense variants that are proficient for HDR, but deficient or intermediate for SSA, confer a lower or moderate risk of cancer. We thus conclude that the HDR assay is a more reliable predictive tool for assessing the function of BRCA1 variants than is the SSA assay.  We had previously performed a similar analysis of the control of centrosome duplication by BRCA1 variant proteins [Kais et al., 2012]. Fewer variants of the BRCA1 protein were analyzed in this earlier study using the centrosome assay, but it has several differences from the HDR assay. With regard to those variants with inferred breast cancer association, the centrosome duplication assay had an intermediate result for the BRCA1–D67Y variant, which is nonpathogenic. The T37R variant was defective for both DNA repair assays, but was functional in control of the centrosome duplication. Five amino acid residues away, the I42V variant had the opposite pattern as T37R, with defective centrosome control but fully functional in both DNA repair assays. Experimentally, the centrosome regulation assay is much more difficult to perform than the HDR assay, making it not as desirable an assay for analysis of BRCA1 variants. In addition, the centrosome assay appears, based on the limited set of variants, to be less accurate than the HDR assay. On the contrary, like the SSA, none of the tested seven variants that were previously classified as Class 4 or 5, were functional in the centrosomal assay, suggesting that this assay is sensitive.  It will be necessary to analyze many more variants in the HDR assay and then compare those results with the clinical experiences before this assay can be used for clinical interpretation. On the basis of the accuracy of the currently tested variants, we believe that the HDR assay will help with difficult to classify variants of unknown significance.  Functional Assays for Probing BRCA1 Residues Important in Biological Function  Separate from the clinical utility of the different functional tests, important biological information about the BRCA1 protein is available from the various functional assays. Very little structure–function information exists for BRCA1, and there have been limited systematic analyses of the effects of BRCA1 amino acid variants in a given function. A variety of variants have been analyzed in the context of short BRCA1 amino-terminal truncations for ubiquitin ligase activity [Morris et al., 2006]. In a similar vein, a variety of variants in the context of a short BRCA1 carboxy-terminal fragment have been analyzed for the activation of transcription [Carvalho et al., 2007; Lee et al., 2010]. Several variants in the context of the full-length protein have been analyzed in terms of resistance to ionizing radiation [Ruffner et al., 2001] and reversal of a lethal phenotype in murine embryonic stem cells [Chang et al., 2009].  We find that there are some discordancies between functional assays of the variants. The most striking are at T37R and I42V. BRCA1–T37R was defective for both DNA repair processes, but was fully functional for control of centrosomes. Conversely, BRCA1–I42V was defective for control of centrosome duplication [Kais et al., 2012] but functional in the DNA repair processes. From this result, we hypothesize that the protein–BRCA1 contacts in the DNA repair pathways depend on the T37 residue, whereas a different protein–BRCA1 contact is important for regulating the centrosome duplication. Such a notion is possible because the centrosome regulation occurs in the cytoplasm and the DNA repair occurs in the nucleus, and it is reasonable to suppose that different proteins are involved.  There were variants that distinguished between BRCA1 residues important for DSB repair by homologous recombination versus SSA. The observed differences between the SSA and HDR assays involved residues from 90 to 191. Several of these (Y105C, P142H, and E143K) that had intermediate phenotype in the SSA assay had been shown to have slow accumulation at sites of DSBs. Especially, P142H mutation abolished the association with Ku80 protein, which plays an important role in the repair of DSBs [Wei et al., 2008]. Perhaps the SSA pathway contributes to the accumulation of BRCA1 at sites of DNA damage in cells.  In summary, in this study, we evaluated missense variants of BRCA1 in two different DNA repair pathways. Data support that the function of BRCA1 in the HDR assay is consistent with the known cancer association of these variants, and we suggest that this test is predictive for breast cancer. By contrast, the repair of DNA by the related SSA pathway is not perfectly consistent with what is known about cancer predisposition, and the SSA assay yields intermediate results. On the basis of these current results, we suggest that the HDR assay is validated for predicting whether substitution at any residue of BRCA1 is disease associated.  
2591||Mutations in BRCA1 and BRCA2 account for the majority of hereditary breast and ovarian cancers, and therefore sequence analysis of both genes is routinely conducted in patients with early-onset breast cancer. Besides mutations that clearly abolish protein function or are known to increase cancer risk, a large number of sequence variants of uncertain signifi cance (VUS) have been identifi ed. Although several functional assays for BRCA1 VUSs have been described, thus far it has not been possible to conduct a high-throughput analysis in the context of the full-length protein. We have developed a relatively fast and easy cDNA-based functional assay to classify BRCA1 VUSs based on their ability to functionally complement BRCA1-defi cient mouse embryonic stem cells. Using this assay, we have analyzed 74 unclassifi ed BRCA1 missense mutants for which all predicted pathogenic variants are confi ned to the BRCA1 RING and BRCT domains.  SIGNIFICANCE: BRCA1 VUSs are frequently found in patients with hereditary breast or ovarian cancer and present a serious problem for clinical geneticists. This article describes the generation, validation, and application of a reliable high-throughput assay for the functional classifi cation of BRCA1 sequence variants of uncertain signifi cance. Cancer Discov; 3(10); 1142–55. ©2013 AACR.  Authors’ Affi liations: 1 Division of Molecular Pathology and Cancer Genomics Centre and 2 Department of Pathology, The Netherlands Cancer Institute Amsterdam, The Netherlands; and 3 TaconicArtemis GmbH, Cologne, Germany  Note: Supplementary data for this article are available at Cancer Discovery Online (http://cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org/).  Current address for C. Klijn: Genentech Inc., South San Francisco, California.  Corresponding Author: Jos Jonkers, The Netherlands Cancer Institute, Plesmanlaan 121, Amsterdam, 1066 CX, The Netherlands. Phone: 31-20- 5122000; Fax: 31-20-5122050; E-mail: j.jonkers@nki.nl doi: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094 ©2013 American Association for Cancer Research.  INTRODUCTION  Germline loss-of-function mutations in BRCA1 and BRCA2 are known to result in an approximately tenfold increased lifetime risk of developing breast or ovarian cancer. Thus far, no other genes have been identifi ed with such a strong link to hereditary breast and ovarian cancer (HBOC), and in the past decades, many women have been screened for germline mutations in BRCA1 or BRCA2 . This has resulted in the identifi cation of numerous pathogenic mutations as well as a large number of sequence variants for which the clinical relevance is not clear. In the most recent publication of the ENIGMA (Evidence-based Network for the Interpretation of Germline Mutant Alleles) group, an international consortium for the evaluation of BRCA1 or BRCA2 sequence variants, a total of 1,273 unique BRCA1 variants is mentioned ( 1 ), but this number may increase even further because of the implementation of high-throughput sequencing methods. Of the BRCA1 variants of uncertain signifi cance (VUS), 920 are nontruncating exonic mutations that may affect protein function or mRNA splicing, but for which there is not enough linkage information to indicate whether they are pathogenic. To aid genetic counseling of individuals with BRCA1/2 VUS, both genetic and functional classifi cation methods have been developed. Genetic analysis of BRCA1 or BRCA2 VUSs relies on cosegregation with disease, cooccurrence with known pathogenic mutations, and family history of cancer. These data have been integrated into computational models to calculate the likelihood that a VUS is disease-causing ( 2 ). Additional in silico analysis of the evolutionary conservation of the amino acids affected by the mutation and the predicted impact of the mutant amino acids on protein folding are also implemented in such models. Functional assays do not rely on preexisting data, but directly test the effect of BRCA1/2 VUSs on known functions of the encoded proteins ( 3 ). Although this may seem relatively straightforward, it can be diffi cult to extrapolate data from functional assays into cancer risks for patients. For instance, in most assays only part of the BRCA1 protein is analyzed. In addition, some of the more elegant assays are technically demanding and not suitable to analyze large numbers of mutations. We reasoned that a good functional assay should fulfi ll three basic requirements: (i) it should investigate the biologic effects of a BRCA1 VUS in the context of the full-length protein; (ii) it should be conducted under normal physiologic conditions in a noncancerous cell type; and (iii) it should be based on a highly standardized and reproducible protocol.  These considerations led us to develop a functional assay based on physiologic expression of full-length human BRCA1 cDNA in mouse embryonic stem cells that are genetically engineered to allow conditional deletion of endogenous Brca1 . Mutant BRCA1 cDNAs are generated using site-directed mutagenesis (SDM) and introduced in a defi ned genomic locus of mouse embryonic stem cells by recombinase-mediated cassette exchange (RMCE). In this way, we have analyzed 86 BRCA1 variants for their effects on cell proliferation and drug sensitivity, including 74 clinically relevant VUSs.  RESULTS  Generation of Mouse Embryonic Stem Cells Expressing BRCA1 Sequence Variants  Although BRCA1-defi cient tumor cells proliferate rapidly in situ , loss of BRCA1 in normal cells leads to a severe proliferation defect ( 4 ). We decided to make use of this phenotype for the functional analysis of BRCA1 variants in Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1144 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. Brca1 -selectable conditional knockout (SCo) mouse embryonic stem cells ( 5 ). These cells carry one Brca1 -null allele and a selectable conditional Brca1SCo allele, which contains, in addition to loxP sites around exons 5–6, a split puromycin resistance marker that is activated upon Cre-mediated deletion of exons 5–6. They also contain a CreERT2 allele in the Rosa26 locus, which allows for controlled activation of Cre via administration of 4-hydroxy tamoxifen (4-OHT). Thus, BRCA1-defi cient embryonic stem cells can be easily obtained via 4-OHT–induced inactivation of the Brca1SCo allele and subsequent selection for puromycin resistance ( Fig.  1 ; ref.  5 ). To allow effi cient integration of human BRCA1 variants in one specifi c genomic locus, we supplied the other Rosa26 allele with F3 and Frt recombination sites for RMCE by the site-specifi c recombinase Flp ( Fig.  1 and Supplementary Fig. S1; ref. 6 ). Cells that have undergone successful RMCE can be selected because they express a truncated neomycin selection marker under control of the endogenous Rosa26 promoter, which further increases targeting effi ciency. Flpmediated recombination ensures single-copy integration of BRCA1 expression constructs at the same Rosa26 locus, thus avoiding position-effect variegation and copy number– dependent differences in expression.  RMCE vectors were equipped with a human BRCA1 cDNA expression construct, which was modifi ed using SDM to introduce defi ned mutations in BRCA1 . The focus of our analysis was on Dutch and Belgian VUSs that were found in families with HBOC. We also included a number of variants  Figure 1.   Schematic overview of the RMCE procedure in R26 CreERT2/RMCE ; Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells. Before the introduction of a human BRCA1 cDNA, R26 CreERT2/RMCE ; Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells are mouse BRCA1-profi cient and sensitive to both neomycin and puromycin. Targeting of singlecopy human BRCA1 cDNA variants to the Rosa26 locus by Flp RMCE results in expression of human BRCA1 and neomycin resistance. Addition of 4-OHT leads to CreERT2-mediated deletion of mouse Brca1 exons 5 and 6, resulting in loss of mouse BRCA1 protein and concomitant expression of puromycin from the phosphoglycerate kinase (PGK) promoter. This enables selection of mouse BRCA1-defi cient, human BRCA1-expressing R26 CreERT2/hBRCA1 ; Brca1Δ/Δ embryonic stem cells that can be used in functional complementation assays. R26 CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1SCo/Δ R26CreERT2/hBRCA1;Brca1SCo/Δ R26CreERT2/hBRCA1;Brca1Δ/Δ 3 5–6 3 5–6 7–8 3 3 14 7–8 7–8 3 7–8 5–6 Introduction of human BRCA1 by RMCE 3 14 SA SA Brca1SCo5–6 Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26RMCE Brca1Δ5–6 Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26hBRCA1 Brca1SCo5–6 Brca1SCo5–6 Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26RMCE Brca1Δ5–13 R26CreERT2 R26hBRCA1 3 14 CreERT2 CreERT2 CreERT2 CreERT2 Puro Puro Puro PGK PGK PGK Puro PGK zsgreen Hyg FLP zsgreen Hyg FLP SA SA NeoR Selection hBRCA1–, mBrca1+, neoS, puroS hBRCA1+, mBrca1+, neoR, puroS hBRCA1+, mBrca1–, neoR, puroR pA hBRCA1 hBRCA1 EF1α EF1α Δ5′ neo Δ5′ neo Δ5′ neo EF1α hBRCA1 Cre-mediated deletion of mouse Brca1 by 4-OHT addition 3 14 PuroR Selection SA SA SA SA Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1145 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE that were previously classifi ed using functional assays ( 7, 8 ) or a multifactorial likelihood model ( 9 ), as well as M1400V, L1407P, and M1411T, which have been reported to attenuate the interaction between BRCA1 and PALB2 ( 10 ). To allow validation of our functional complementation assay, we included a series of eight BRCA1 variants that are known to be deleterious or neutral according to the Breast Cancer Information Core database (BIC; http://research.nhgri .nih.gov/bic/ ; Supplementary Table S1). These controls include the well-known pathogenic BRCA1 founder mutations 185delAG and 5382insC and the neutral polymorphisms Y105C, R866C, and E1250K. The BIC designation is supported by the classifi cation according to the International Agency for Research on Cancer ( http://iarc.fr/ ), which includes the Align-GVGD score that indicates biophysical and evolutionary alterations ( http://agvgd.iarc.fr/ ; Supplementary Table S1; refs. 11, 12 ). Align-GVGD scores vary between C0 (likely neutral) and C65 (likely deleterious). Sequence-verifi ed constructs that contained the intended VUS, but no other BRCA1 mutations, were transfected into R26 CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells to undergo RMCE ( Fig.  2 ). Neomycin-resistant clones were pooled and RMCE was confi rmed by PCR analysis. Subsequently, protein expression of the human BRCA1 variants was analyzed by Western blot analysis with a human BRCA1-specifi c antibody ( Fig. 2 and Supplementary Fig. S2). Comparison with BRCA1 protein levels in embryonic stem cells expressing human BRCA1 from a bacterial artifi cial chromosome (BAC), which is known to rescue embryonic lethality of Brca1 -null mice ( 7 ,  13 ), showed that transcription of the human BRCA1 cDNA from the EF1A gene promoter results in physiologic levels of BRCA1 protein (Supplementary Fig.  S1). Most BRCA1 variants were expressed at equal levels, allowing comparison of their functional activities. A number of C-terminal BRCA1 mutants showed low levels of expression (Supplementary Table S2; Supplementary Fig. S2). Real-time RT-PCR analysis showed that decreased protein expression was not caused by decreased mRNA expression (Supplementary Fig.  S3), suggesting that the low abundance of BRCA1 protein results from posttranslational events. In fact, for most of these variants, mutation-associated protein instability has already been documented in previous publications (refs. 8 , 14 , 15 ; Supplementary Table S2).  Functional Complementation Assay of BRCA1 Sequence Variants in Mouse Brca1 -Null Embryonic Stem Cells  As a fi rst functional test, we assayed the ability of BRCA1 variants to restore the proliferation defect of switched R26 CreERT2/RMCE ;Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells ( Fig.  2 ). Expression of endogenous mouse Brca1 was shut off through overnight induction of Cre activity by 4-OHT, and 7 days  Figure 2.   Workfl ow for the functional classifi cation of BRCA1 sequence variants in Brca1 -null embryonic stem (ES) cells. Outline of the generation of mouse Brca1 -defi cient embryonic stem cells expressing human BRCA1 variants and functional complementation assays. Indicated are the experimental steps and the time it takes one person to analyze 20 mutants. Introduction of BRCA1 variants in R26CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1SCo/D ES cells BRCA1 Construct + G418 Selection of clones with correct RMCE BRCA1 Expression analysis SDM and sequencing RMCE in ES cells x + 4-OHT + Puromycin Functional assays Functional assays Cre-Mediated deletion of Brca1SCo allele Proliferation and cisplatin sensitivity assays Selection of Brca1ΔSCo/Δ ES cells Timecourse for the analysis of 20 BRCA1 variants Weeks 0 1 2 7 3 8 4 5 6 SDM and RMCE Functional assays Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1146 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. after switching, cells were plated in 96-well plates for proliferation assays, and were analyzed using Sulphorhodamine B staining. For each group of mutants tested, we included positive and negative controls consisting of embryonic stem cells containing, respectively, wild-type human BRCA1 cDNA and an empty RMCE vector. BRCA1 variants were evaluated on their ability to support growth compared with these controls (Supplementary Tables S3 and S4). Although we tested 28 mutations in the central domain encoded by exon 11 (aa 224–1366), BRCA1 variants that were unable to rescue the proliferation defect of Brca1 -null mouse embryonic stem cells to BRCA1 wild-type levels were confi ned to the conserved N- and C-terminal domains of BRCA1.  Cisplatin Sensitivity Assay for Classifi cation of BRCA1 Variants  Although the ability of BRCA1 variants to support proliferation appears to be indicative of VUS function, results were not always clear-cut (Supplementary Tables S3 and S4). BRCA1 is known to be important for DNA interstrand crosslink (ICL) repair through mechanisms that are both dependent ( 5 ) and independent ( 16 ) of its function in homologous recombination (HR). The role of BRCA1 in ICL repair is stressed by the occurrence of genetic reversion mutations restoring BRCA1 protein expression in platinum-resistant ovarian tumors in BRCA1 -mutation carriers ( 17, 18 ). We therefore decided to conduct a 96-well–based cisplatin sensitivity assay to allow a more stringent evaluation of BRCA1 VUS functionality.  Half-maximal inhibitory concentrations (IC 50 ) of cisplatin were determined using a resazurin cell viability assay, and BRCA1 variants were again classifi ed in comparison to wildtype BRCA1 and an empty RMCE vector. To obtain corrected cisplatin IC 50 values, we fi tted a log-logistic curve constrained at 1 and 0. We excluded a fi t if the residual squared error (RSE) exceeded 0.1. We then applied a Bayesian predictor to classify BRCA1 VUS as pathogenic or benign. Most variants that showed less than wild-type activity in the proliferation assay also scored as functionally impaired in the cisplatin sensitivity assay and were classifi ed as deleterious ( Table 1 ,  Table 1.   Functional classifi cation of BRCA1 VUS based on cisplatin response Variant DNA change Type of mutation a Classifi cation S4F c.11C>T VUS Not Clear M18T c.53T>C VUS Deleterious 185delAG c.68_69delAG Deleterious control Deleterious b K45Q c.133A>C VUS Neutral C61G c.181T>G Deleterious control Deleterious C64G c.190T>G VUS Deleterious b D67Y c.199G>T VUS Neutral Y105C c.314A>G Neutral control Neutral N132K c.396C>A VUS Neutral P142H c.425C>A VUS Neutral L147F c.441G>C VUS Neutral L165P c.494T>C VUS Neutral R170W c.508C>T VUS Neutral S186Y c.557C>A VUS Neutral V191I c.571G>A VUS Neutral T231M c.692C>T VUS Neutral D245V c.734A>T VUS Neutral L246V c.736T>G VUS Neutral V271L c.811G>C VUS Neutral S308A c.922A>G; c.923G>C Artifi cial h Not Clear L358R; C360R; E362H c.1073T>G; c.1078T>C; c.1084G>C; c.1086G>T Artifi cial Neutral L668F c.2002C>T VUS Neutral D695N c.2083G>A VUS Neutral P798L c.2393C>T VUS Neutral N810Y c.2428A>T VUS Neutral T826K c.2477C>A VUS Neutral (continued) Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1147 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE (continued) Variant DNA change Type of mutation a Classifi cation R841Q c.2522G>A VUS Neutral Y856H c.2566T>C VUS Neutral R866C c.2596C>T Neutral control Neutral S988A c.2962T>G Artifi cial Neutral M1008I c.3024G>A VUS Neutral E1060A c.3179A>C VUS Neutral S1101N c.3302G>A VUS Neutral K1110del c.3328_3330delAAG VUS Neutral S1140G c.3418A>G VUS Neutral E1214K c.3640G>A VUS Neutral N1236K c.3708T>G VUS Neutral E1250K c.3748G>A Neutral control Neutral L1267S c.3800T>C VUS Neutral E1282V c.3845A>T VUS Neutral S1297del c.3891_3893delTTC VUS Neutral S1301R c.3903T>A VUS Neutral E1346K c.4036G>A VUS Neutral V1378I c.4132G>A VUS Neutral M1400V c.4198A>G VUS Neutral L1407P c.4220T>C VUS Neutral b M1411T c.4232T>C VUS Neutral R1443G c.4327C>G VUS Neutral S1448G c.4342A>G VUS Neutral S1486C c.4456A>T VUS Neutral S1497A c.4489T>G Artifi cial Neutral V1534M c.4600G>A VUS Neutral R1589P c.4766G>C VUS Neutral M1628T c.4883T>C VUS Neutral S1651P c.4951T>C VUS Not Clear S1651F c.4952C>T VUS Not Clear M1652I c.4956G>A VUS Neutral S1655F c.4964C>T VUS Deleterious b H1686R c.5057A>G VUS Deleterious H1686Q c.5058T>A VUS Deleterious V1688del c.5062_5064delGTT VUS Deleterious T1691I c.5072C>T VUS Not clear R1699W c.5095C>T Deleterious control Deleterious b R1699Q c.5096G>A VUS Deleterious b G1706E c.5117G>A VUS Deleterious b G1706A c.5117G>C VUS Neutral A1708E c.5123C>A Deleterious control Deleterious W1718C c.5154G>T VUS Deleterious T1720A c.5158A>G VUS Neutral E1735K c.5203G>A VUS Not clear  Table 1.   Functional classifi cation of BRCA1 VUS based on cisplatin response (Continued) Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1148 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al.  Fig. 3 ). Variants showing increased cisplatin sensitivity were tested at least twice before they were classifi ed. The positive and negative controls classifi ed as expected, although the known pathogenic truncation mutation 5382insC scored as neutral in one of three assays, stressing the need for repeat experiments. Also BRCA1 variants that were previously tested in other assays conducted as expected. It should be noted that the artifi cial variants S308A and S1497A rescued proliferation and cisplatin responses of mouse Brca1 - defi cient embryonic stem cells in BAC complementation assays, but are predicted to be deleterious based on their effects on embryonic stem cell differentiation and their response to γ-irradiation, respectively ( 7 ). The V1804D mutation scored as a neutral variant in our assay, which is in line with most published data ( 8, 9 ), except for the results of an embryonic stem cell–based BAC complementation assay ( 7 ). Again, all BRCA1 mutations that were classifi ed as deleterious were confi ned to regions encoding the conserved N- and C-terminal domains ( Fig.  4 ), despite the observation that deletion of the central region encoded by exon 11 leads to genetic instability in mice ( 12 ). Remarkably, the three mutations that diminish the interaction between BRCA1 and PALB2 ( 10 ), just C-terminal of the region encoded by exon 11, had no effect on cisplatin sensitivity in this assay. Of note, there was in general good correlation between our classifi cation and the Align-GVGD score (Supplementary Table S4). Notable exceptions were the neutral control variant R866C, which validated our assay but scored as likely deleterious (C65) using Align-GVGD, and G1770V, which scored as likely neutral (C0) by Align-GVGD but was classi- fi ed as deleterious in our assay. Our assay also classifi ed some variants for which the Align-GVGD scores were less clear, emphasizing the usefulness of functional assays to complement in silico analysis.  We also analyzed the possible effects of all BRCA1 variants on mRNA splicing, which may have deleterious consequences but cannot be assessed in our cDNA-based assay. The predictive value for exonic variants outside the consensus splice sites is questionable ( 19, 20 ), but four missense mutations were present in existing splice sites (Supplementary Table S4). Although c.5154G>T (encoding W1718C) was deleterious, three of these variants were classifi ed as neutral in our assay. One of them, c.441G>C (encoding L147F), had an increased probability to damage the splice donor site of exon 7. Another variant, c.5072C>T (encoding T1691I), might also affect splicing, but no defect was measured in blood samples of mutation carriers ( 19 ). The third exonic splice site mutation that was classifi ed as neutral in our cisplatin sensitivity assay, c.133A>C (K45Q), is not predicted to lead to aberrant splicing.  Results from Proliferation and Cisplatin Sensitivity Assays Correlate with HR Activity of BRCA1 Variants  BRCA1 and BRCA2 are involved in DNA repair via HR ( 12 , 21 ). Together with non-homologous end joining (NHEJ), HR forms the cellular defense against DNA double-strand breaks (DSB), a severe type of DNA damage that is lethal if unrepaired. Although HR is essentially error-free, NHEJ is error-prone, and therefore defects in HR are known to lead to genomic instability. Although it is not clear whether other Variant DNA change Type of mutation a Classifi cation V1736A c.5207T>C VUS Not clear b D1739G c.5216A>G VUS Deleterious D1739V c.5216A>T VUS Deleterious H1746Q c.5238C>G VUS Not clear R1753T c.5258G>C VUS Not clear b 5382insC c.5266dupC Deleterious control Not clear b L1764P c.5291T>C VUS Deleterious b C1767S c.5300G>C VUS Neutral G1770V c.5309G>T VUS Deleterious b W1782C c.5346G>T VUS Neutral A1789T c.5365G>A VUS Deleterious E1794D c.5382G>C VUS Neutral V1804D c.5411T>A VUS Neutral P1812R c.5435C>G VUS Neutral W1837R c.5509T>C VUS Deleterious H1862L c.5585A>T VUS Neutral a Type of mutation indicates if a variant is a VUS according to the BIC database (http://research.nhgri.nih.gov/bic/). b Functionally impaired in the DR-GFP and/or combined PARP inhibitor/cisplatin sensitivity assay.  Table 1.   Functional classifi cation of BRCA1 VUS based on cisplatin response (Continued) Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1149 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE  Figure 3.   Waterfall chart of cisplatin IC 50 values normalized for wild-type human BRCA1 and empty RMCE vector controls. Corrected cisplatin IC 50 values for all tested human BRCA1 variants and controls, including repeat experiments. BRCA1 variants are classifi ed as functionally impaired or neutral when the corrected IC 50 values are similar to either the empty RMCE vector or the wild-type human BRCA1 controls ( P < 0.05). 4.0 –3.0 –2.0 –1.0 0.0 1.0 2.0 3.0 Corrected cisplatin IC50 (a.u.) Mutant hBRCA1 Wild-type hBRCA1 Empty RMCE vector Positive control Negative control  Figure 4.   Predicted pathogenic BRCA1 amino acid substitutions are confi ned to the evolutionarily conserved N- and C-terminal domains. Schematic representation of the BRCA1 protein with the positions of variants classifi ed as neutral (green) or deleterious (red) indicated. Positive and negative controls are depicted by open pinheads and the known deleterious truncation mutations 185delAG (N-terminal) and 5382insC (C-terminal) are marked in blue. The amino acid sequences of the evolutionarily conserved RING (N-terminal) and BRCT (C-terminal) domains are specifi ed to show the exact positions of deleterious (red) and neutral (green) variants. The amino acid substitutions or nonsense (X) mutations of positive and negative controls are encircled. RING domain BRCT domains Deleterious VUS Neutral VUS Deleterious truncation mutant Deleterious control variant Neutral control variant 1646 1706 1766 91 109 1826 1863 61 31 1 MDLSALRVEEVQNVINAMQKILECPICLEL VNKRMSMVVSGLTPEEFMLVYKFARKHHITLTNLITEETTHVVMKTDAEFVCERTLKYFL IKEPVSTKCDHIFCKFCMLKLLNQKKGPSQ GIAGGKWVVSYFWVTQSIKERKMLNEHDFEVRGDVVNGRNHQGPKRARESQDRKIFRGLE CPLCKNDITKRSLQESTRFSQLVEELLKII CAFQLDTGLEYANSYNFAK ICCYGPFTNMPTDQLEWMVQLCGASVVKELSSFTLGTGVHPIVVVQPDAWTEDNGFHAIG QMCEAPVVTREWVLDSVALYQCQELDTYLIPQIPHSHY T Q E C A X Y C GG F R - Q W Q I E A V R L S C D DR T V P G X Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1150 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. functions of BRCA1 are also important for tumor suppression ( 16 , 22 , 23–26 ), its role in HR is likely to be relevant. Therefore, we used the direct repeat (DR)-GFP assay ( 27 ) to measure the effects on HR for a subset of our BRCA1 VUSs. A number of predicted pathogenic variants and controls were shuttled into R26 CreERT2/RMCE;Brca1 SCo/Δ ;Pim1 DR-GFP/wt embryonic stem cells carrying the DR-GFP reporter in the Pim1 locus. Expression of endogenous mouse Brca1 was switched off, and cells were transfected with a plasmid encoding the I-SceI meganuclease as well as an mCherry fl uorescent marker to control for transfection effi ciency. Repair of I-SceI–induced DNA DSBs in DR-GFP via HR leads to expression of GFP, which can be monitored by fl ow cytometry. All but one of the predicted pathogenic variants tested resulted in defective HR, thereby confi rming our functional classifi cation ( Fig. 5 ). The only predicted deleterious variant that did not signifi cantly differ from wild-type BRCA1 , R1699Q, seemed to support intermediate levels of HR activity.  PARP Inhibitor Sensitivity Assay for Classifi cation of BRCA1 Variants with Intermediate Activity  Deleterious effects of variants with intermediate or partial activity may escape detection in certain functional assays. Although cisplatin sensitivity assays allow robust and  Figure 5.  BRCA1 sequence variants classifi ed as pathogenic do not restore HR. R26 CreERT2/hBRCA1; Brca1 SCo/Δ;Pim1 DR-GFP/wt embryonic stem cells carrying the DR-GFP reporter gene in the Pim1 locus and mutant BRCA1 or controls in the Rosa26 locus were switched using 4-OHT and transfected with a vector expressing I-SceI and mCherry. Transfected cells were analyzed for GFP expression as a measure of HR activity. Expression of BRCA1 wild-type (WT) cDNA resulted in increased HR compared to the empty RMCE vector (Vector) control. Error bars indicate the SD between the results of three independent I-SceI transfections. Signifi cantly decreased HR activity compared with the wild-type control (green line) is indicated. GFP-Positive cells (%) 0.0 0.5 1.0 1.5 2.0 2.5 3.0 3.5 4.0 4.5 ** ns ** * * ns * * * * * * * ns ns WT Vector 185delAG C64G V271L S1651F S1655F R1699Q R1699W G1706A G1706E V1736A R1753T 5382insC L1764P G1770V reproducible classifi cation of several functionally impaired BRCA1 variants, assays using other compounds may have additional value. It is known that BRCA1- and BRCA2- defi cient cells are extremely sensitive to PARP1 inhibition ( 28, 29 ), leading to a larger dynamic range between BRCA2- defi cient cells and isogenic BRCA2-profi cient controls than for cisplatin ( 30 ). We therefore tested complementation of PARP inhibitor sensitivity for a number of BRCA1 mutants and the BRCA1 wild-type control. Given the unexpected neutral effects of the M1400V, L1407P, and M1411T mutations in the PALB2 interaction domain, we decided to include these variants in this series, as well as the R1699Q and V1736A variants that have recently been shown to confer (intermediate) breast and ovarian cancer risk ( 31, 32 ). To allow direct comparison of results from different assays, we repeated the cisplatin sensitivity and proliferation assays in parallel to the olaparib sensitivity assay. Our results indicate that BRCA1 wild-type and empty vector controls indeed show a larger difference in sensitivity for olaparib than for cisplatin ( Fig.  6 ). However, this increase in dynamic range is accompanied by an increased variation between repeat experiments for BRCA1-profi cient samples. Nevertheless, the functional defect of the R1699Q and V1736A mutations becomes more evident, and there also Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1151 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE  Figure 6.   PARP inhibitor sensitivity assay of BRCA1 sequence variants. R26 CreERT2/hBRCA1 ;Brca1 SCo/Δ or R26CreERT2/RMCE; Brca1 SCo/Δ embryonic stem cells carrying mutant BRCA1 , BRCA1 wild-type (WT), or empty RMCE vector (Vector) controls in the Rosa26 locus were switched using 4-OHT and assayed for sensitivity to cisplatin or the PARP inhibitor olaparib. The cytotoxicity assays were conducted in parallel and data were normalized to the average of the wild-type controls. Error bars indicate the SD between the results of biologic triplicates for which the cells were independently switched. Signifi cant deviation from the average IC 50 values of the wild-type control (green line) is indicated. IC50 Relative to WT controls (%) 0 20 40 60 80 100 120 140 160 Cisplatin Olaparib * **** **** * * ** *** **** ns ns ns ns WT Vector M1400V L1407P M1411T R1699Q V1736A seems to be a less than wild-type response for the PALB2 interaction mutant L1407P. In the concurrent proliferation analysis, R1699Q and V1736A both show an intermediate functional defect (Supplementary Fig.  S4). Also the M1411T mutation seems to affect the response to PARP inhibition, but the difference with BRCA1 wild-type is not signifi cant. Interestingly, the L1407P and M1411T variants have previously been shown to be more defective than M1400V in a gene conversion assay ( 10 ). It should also be noted that, in contrast with the large-scale classifi cation experiments, the cisplatin sensitivity assay conducted in parallel to the PARP inhibitor assay identifi ed signifi cant functional defects for L1407P and V1736A.  DISCUSSION  Over the past few years several functional assays for classifi cation of BRCA1 VUSs have been developed. Several of these assays are restricted to functions of the BRCA1 protein that reside in the evolutionarily conserved RING or BRCT domains. Examples include in vitro transactivation assays for BRCT peptides ( 8 ) and measurement of ubiquitin ligase activity for protein fragments encompassing the N-terminal RING domain ( 33 ). Other assays were designed to evaluate the functions of full-length mutant BRCA1 protein, either by monitoring general effects on proliferation or response to DNA damage ( 7 ), or by directly focusing on the role of BRCA1 in DNA repair via HR ( 34 ).  Because BRCA1 VUSs are not restricted to regions encoding the N- or C-terminal domains, and given the observation that interaction between these domains is required for recruitment of BRCA1 to damaged DNA ( 35 ), functional assays for the full-length protein would be ideal. In principle, such assays can be conducted in cell lines derived from BRCA1 - mutated tumors, but there are indications that the outcome of assays for BRCA1 function depends on the cellular context. As absence of BRCA1 leads to loss of cellular viability, it is thought that additional mutations are required for BRCA1- associated tumorigenesis. For example, loss of p53 alleviates the consequences of BRCA1 defi ciency both in vitro and in vivo ( 4 ) and is common in BRCA1-defi cient tumors ( 36, 37 ). Also, depletion of 53BP1 is known to suppress the defects caused by BRCA1 defi ciency ( 5 , 38 , 39 ). Therefore, aberrations in BRCA1-defi cient tumor cells may mask functional defects of BRCA1 VUSs. We reasoned that assays in normal cells that can be depleted from endogenous BRCA1 expression are most likely to reveal functional defects of BRCA1 VUSs. The usefulness of this approach has been previously shown by Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  1152 | CANCER DISCOVERY OCTOBER 2013 www.aacrjournals.org RESEARCH ARTICLE Bouwman et al. BAC complementation assays in mouse embryonic stem cells ( 7 , 40 ). However, mutagenesis of large BAC clones by recombineering and functional complementation of cells with these mutant constructs is time-consuming and technically demanding, and therefore cannot be conducted in a high-throughput setting. We therefore set out to develop a cDNA-based functional complementation assay in mouse embryonic stem cells that is easier to control and scale up and more suitable for routine functional classifi cation of BRCA1 sequence variants.  One advantage of BAC transgenics in complementation assays is that genes are expressed at physiologically relevant levels. This is the result of low copy-number integrations and the presence of natural regulatory elements required for proper gene expression. We decided to use RMCE to allow single-copy integration of BRCA1 cDNAs at one specifi c genomic locus. The use of RMCE effectively prevents multiple or partial integrations, concatemers, and position-effect variegation. As a result, all variants are expressed at equal levels. Moreover, transcription of BRCA1 cDNAs from the EF1A gene promoter results in physiologic levels of BRCA1 protein, comparable with those observed in embryonic stem cells stably transfected with a BAC containing the human BRCA1 locus. Indeed, the wild-type human BRCA1 cDNA was able to complement Brca1 -null embryonic stem cells in cellular proliferation, drug sensitivity, and HR assays. Our RMCE strategy uses BRCA1 cDNA constructs in which mutations can be swiftly introduced using SDM, enabling a higher throughput than introduction of mutations via BAC recombineering. In addition, the introduction of BRCA1 cDNAs via RMCE obviates the need to analyze multiple embryonic stem cell clones for correct integration and expression.  As a proof of principle, we used our functional complementation assay to analyze exonic BRCA1 VUSs that were identifi ed in families with HBOC in the Netherlands and Belgium, as well as a set of previously analyzed BRCA1 variants. A number of mutations resulted in reduced BRCA1 protein levels, most likely because of structural destabilization. In all cases, this led to diminished capacity for functional complementation. Also, several variants that gave rise to normal BRCA1 protein levels were unable to rescue the proliferation defect and cisplatin sensitivity of Brca1 -null embryonic stem cells. As BRCA1 loss of function mutations are associated with increased cancer risk, variants that score as functionally impaired in our embryonic stem cell assay system may be causally involved in tumor formation. This notion is supported by the fact that seven of eight known pathogenic or neutral control variants in our validation series were correctly classifi ed by the cisplatin sensitivity assay. The pathogenic 5382insC truncation mutation could not be classifi ed because it scored as neutral in one of three transfection series. This was probably due to technical reasons, as the 5382insC mutation did not restore HR activity in Brca1 -defi cient embryonic stem cells, in contrast with R1699Q, which was recently shown to confer intermediate risk of HBOC ( 32 ).  Our assay system yielded ambivalent results for nine other variants: S4F, S308A, S1651P, S1651F, T1691I, V1736A, E1735K, H1746Q, and R1753T. T1691I and E1735K were classifi ed as functionally impaired in only one cisplatin sensitivity test, whereas values from repeat experiments could not be taken into account because of RSE values above 0.1. S4F, S1651P, S1651F, V1736A, H1746Q, and R1753T were differently classifi ed in repeat experiments, which may refl ect technical fl aws or intermediate activity of these variants. Of note, the V1736A mutation was recently identifi ed as a pathogenic variant with hypomorphic activity in DNA repair ( 31 ). Although we did not measure signifi cant HR activity of V1736A in a DR-GFP gene conversion assay, intermediate activity of this variant is supported by the results of the proliferation assays and additional cisplatin sensitivity assays. S1651F showed HR activity similar to wild-type BRCA1 , whereas R1753T was HR-defi cient. S308A is an artifi cial mutation of a BRCA1 phosphorylation site that was able to support proliferation and resistance to DNA damage in an embryonic stem cell-based BAC complementation assay. However, S308A-complemented embryonic stem cells did show increased apoptosis when cultured in embryoid bodies ( 7 ), indicating a partial defect that might explain the ambivalent results for this mutation in our assays.  Our results show that BRCA1 variants should ideally be assayed in triplicate to avoid misclassifi cation. This also applies to BRCA1 VUS that we classifi ed as neutral, most of which were tested only once because in our current study we focused on variants that showed functional impairment. The striking restriction of unambiguously predicted pathogenic mutants to the terminal RING and BRCT domains suggests that some plasticity is allowed for the central domain of BRCA1. However, our dataset is still limited and more experiments are required to gain insight into the function of this domain.  Our cDNA-based system allows for several additional functional assays that have been described previously for BAC transgenic embryonic stem cells ( 7 ). These include assays for defects during in vitro and in vivo embryonic stem cell differentiation but also treatments with other cytotoxic agents. As a proof of principle, we investigated the activity of a number of mutants in the response to the PARP inhibitor olaparib. These included M1400V, L1407, and M1411T, which were previously shown to impair PALB2 binding and have a negative effect on BRCA1 function ( 10 ). Although the differences in sensitivity of BRCA1-defi cient versus BRCA1-profi cient embryonic stem cells are larger for olaparib than for cisplatin, increased variation between repeat experiments allowed us to identify functional defects only for L1407 and not for the other two variants in the PALB2 interaction domain, M1400V and M1411T. However, the R1699Q and V1736A variants, which are known to have hypomorphic activity, clearly showed a defect in the response to olaparib. Interestingly, both mutations are in the BRCT domain, and it has recently been shown that mutation of this domain especially confers sensitivity to PARP inhibition ( 41 ). Together, our results show that PARP inhibitor sensitivity assays may have added value, especially for the classifi cation of BRCA1 VUSs with intermediate phenotypes.  Platinum drugs and PARP inhibitors are selectively toxic to BRCA1-defi cient cells because they target HR defi ciency. Although the role of BRCA1 in HR is thought to be essential for maintaining genomic integrity and preventing accumulation of (oncogenic) mutations, other activities may also contribute to its tumor suppression function. These activities Downloaded from cancerdiscovery.aacrjournals.org on May 26, 2017. © 2013 American Association for Cancer Research. Published OnlineFirst July 18, 2013; DOI: 10.1158/2159-8290.CD-13-0094  OCTOBER 2013CANCER DISCOVERY | 1153 Functional Analysis of BRCA1 Sequence Variants RESEARCH ARTICLE may include the HR-independent role for BRCA1 in ICL repair, which has been attributed to the facilitation of FANCD2 accumulation at cross-linked DNA ( 16 ). Nevertheless, we observed a good correlation between the results of the cisplatin sensitivity assay and the results of the DR-GFP HR assay. All BRCA1 variants that failed to restore the cisplatin response in Brca1 -null embryonic stem cells were also defective in catalyzing gene conversion, thereby confi rming our functional classifi cation. It will be interesting to see if this holds true for all BRCA1 variants or whether there are also pathogenic mutations that have no effect on HR.  As with any other in vitro approach, our functional complementation assay system might still fail to identify all pathogenic variants because it does not necessarily recapitulate all aspects of BRCA1 function in vivo . A limitation of our cDNA-based assay is also that it cannot be used to investigate effects on mRNA splicing. Although algorithms have been designed to predict possible splice defects, the consequences of mutations outside of the consensus splice sites especially require functional validation experiments. For this purpose, BAC complementation assays ( 7 ), minigene-based splicing assays, or BRCA1 transcript analysis of patient blood samples ( 19 ) may be instrumental. However, transacting factors also affect splicing, and these may be tissue specifi c ( 42 ). A possible solution would be to determine the presence of BRCA1 splice variants in tumor tissue from BRCA1 VUS carriers and use this information to generate a cDNA construct for analysis of the functional consequences. To evaluate BRCA1 VUSs, there remains a need for multifactorial models that combine results from functional assays and in silico analyses with genetic evidence and other information from mutation carriers. This also includes DNA copy number data from tumors from BRCA1 VUS carriers, as it is known that BRCA1- associated breast tumors show distinct genomic aberrations ( 43, 44 ). Our functional assay system does however provide a robust and easily implementable tool for the functional characterization of large numbers of BRCA1 VUSs within the context of the full-length protein. It is our hope that our assay system will fi nd its way to clinical genetics laboratories where it can be used to aid genetic counseling. Ideally, these tests should be coordinated on an international level and in close collaboration with the ENIGMA consortium.    ABSTRACT: The BRCA1 tumor suppressor gene is found mutated in familial breast cancer. Although many of the mutations are clearly pathological because they give rise to truncated proteins, several missense variants of uncertain pathological consequences have been identified. A novel functional assay to screen for BRCA1 missense variants in a simple genetic system could be very useful for the identification of potentially deleterious mutations. By using two prediction computer programs, Sorting Intolerant from Tolerant (SIFT) and Polymorphism Phenotyping (PolyPhen), seven nonsynonymous missense BRCA1 variants likely disrupting the gene function were selected as potentially deleterious. The budding yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae (S. cerevisiae) was used to test these cancer-related missense mutations for their ability to affect cell growth and homologous recombination (HR) at the HIS3 and ADE2 loci. The variants localized in the BRCA1 C-Terminus (BRCT) domain did not show any growth inhibition when overexpressed in agreement with previous results. Overexpression of either wild-type BRCA1 or two neutral missense variants did not increase yeast HR but when cancer-related variants were overexpressed a significant increase in recombination was observed. Results clearly showed that this genetic system can be useful to discriminate between neutral and deleterious BRCA1 missense variants. Hum Mutat 30, 123–133, 2009. & 2008 Wiley-Liss, Inc. KEY WORDS: BRCA1 missense variants; Saccharomyces cerevisiae; homologous recombination; yeast small colony phenotype assay Introduction In the Western world, one of the most common neoplasia of women is breast cancer, which affects approximately 6 out of 100 women before the age of 74 years. About 80% of breast cancers is sporadic and is diagnosed in women without any familial aggregation. However, the remaining 20% of cases are inheritable and about 40% of those are caused by mutations in one of the two tumor suppressor genes, BRCA1 (MIM] 113705) and BRCA2 (MIM] 600185) [Miki et al., 1994; Wooster et al., 1994]. The tumor suppressor BRCA1 gene encodes a nuclear phosphoprotein that is involved in many cellular processes including homologous recombination (HR) and DNA repair [Narod and Foulkes, 2004]. The gene is highly polymorphic, with many common single-base changes. Many of the germ-line mutations found in BRCA1 give rise to truncated nonfunctional proteins that can predispose to breast and ovarian cancer. However, the pathological consequence of many missense mutations found in breast and/or ovarian cancer families remains to be ascertained. Several predictive methods have been proposed to distinguish cancer-related variants from neutral polymorphisms, including the pattern of cosegregation of the variant with disease in affected carrier families [Goldgar et al., 2004], the nature and the position of amino acid substitution [Grantham, 1974; Mirkovic et al., 2004], the degree of conservation among species [Abkevich et al., 2004], and the inactivation of the wild-type allele either by loss of heterozygosity (LOH) or promoter hypermethylation in the tumor of the carrier[Blackwood and Weber, 1998]. Recently, a combined method that integrates the molecular biology data with the familial and clinical history has been useful classify the missense mutations [Osorio et al., 2007]. Several functional assays to identify missense mutations of BRCA1 are also available [Carvalho et al., 2007]; some methods take advantage of the ability of the BRCT domain to activate the transcription of a reporter gene both in mammalian cells and in Saccharomyces cerevisiae (S. cerevisiae) [Phelan et al., 2005]. Other functional assays rely on the ability of BRCA1 mutations to rescue the radiation resistance of the BRCA1 defective HCC1937 human cell line or are based on the determination of the ubiquitin ligase activity, mediated by the interaction of the RING domain of BRCA1 with the BARD1 gene [Carvalho et al., 2007; Scully et al., 1999]. The expression of human wild-type BRCA1 in the budding yeast S. cerevisiae inhibits growth and this peculiar phenotype has been exploited to characterize several missense mutations [Coyne OFFICIAL JOURNAL www.hgvs.org & 2008 WILEY-LISS, INC. Additional Supporting Information may be found in the online version of this article. Contract grant sponsor: Regional Grant from Italian Association for Cancer Research (AIRC). Correspondence to: Alvaro Galli, Laboratorio di Terapia Genica e Molecolare, IFC, Area della Ricerca CNR, via Moruzzi 1, 56125 Pisa, Italy. E-mail: alvaro.galli@ifc.cnr.it et al., 2004; Humphrey et al., 1997]. A functional assay named ‘‘yeast small colony phenotype assay’’ (SCP) has been proposed to evaluate the pathogenicity of BRCA1 missense mutations. In general, the SCP assay can only identify mutations localized within the BRCT and this is in agreement with predictions based on structure modeling [Coyne et al., 2004]. In this study, we identified several BRCA1 missense variants by the mutational analysis of 276 breast and/or ovarian cancer families. By in silico analysis, seven missense variants were identified as potentially not functional. Then, we tested them for the identification of potentially deleterious mutations by SCP assay. Moreover, as BRCA1 is involved in HR and the yeast is an excellent genetic model system to investigate factors affecting HR, we determined the effect of BRCA1 missense variant expression on yeast HR at two distinct chromosomal loci (HIS3 for intrachromosomal and ADE2 for interchromosomal recombination). Results clearly indicate that the yeast S. cerevisiae can be a very helpful tool to classify BRCA1 missense variants. Materials and Methods Samples DNA samples from 276 individuals belonging to 276 breast and/or ovarian cancer families were analyzed for BRCA1 and BRCA2 germline mutations. All patients were from the University Hospital of Pisa. The selection criteria were as follows: 1) occurrence of two or more cases of breast and/or ovarian cancer in first or second-degree relatives; 2) early onset of the disease (o50 years of age); 3) occurrence of bilateral breast cancer; or 4) occurrence of breast and ovarian cancer in the same individual. Mutation Screening The screening of mutations in the BRCA1 and BRCA2 genes was performed by direct sequencing. DNA sequencing was carried out using BigDye terminator v 3.1 mix (Applera-Applied Biosystems, Foster City, CA) and different primers (available upon request). Capillary gel electrophoresis and data collection was performed on an automated DNA sequencer (ABI 3100; Applera-Applied Biosystems). Sequences analysis were performed using SeqScape Software (Applera-Applied Biosystems). Variant Selection To identify nonsynonymous amino acid changes likely to disrupt BRCA1 gene function we used two comparative evolutionary bioinformatic programs: Sorting Intolerant From Tolerant (SIFT; http://blocks.fhcrc.org/sift/SIFT.html) and Polymorphism Phenotyping (PolyPhen; http://tux.embl-heidelberg.de/ ramensky/polyphen.cgi). SIFT is a multiple sequence alignment tool based on the premise that important amino acids will be conserved among species in a protein family, so that changes of amino acids conserved in the family should affect protein function [Ng and Henikoff, 2003]. PolyPhen is an automatic tool for prediction of possible impact of an amino acid substitution on the structure and function of a human protein [Ramensky et al., 2002]. The DNA mutation numbering is based on the cDNA sequence of BRCA1 (GenBank: U14680.1), with a ‘‘c’’ symbol before the number. For the numbering, 11 corresponds to the A of the ATG translation initiation codon in the reference sequence, following the journal guidelines (www.hgvs.org/mutnomen). Otherwise, the DNA mutation nomenclature is as in the Breast Cancer Information Core (BIC) database according to reference sequence GenBank U14680.1, where 11 corresponds to the first base of exon 1. LOH Analysis LOH analysis was carried out on tumor tissue excised from the index individual case of each family. Neoplastic and normal cells were collected separately by manual microdissection from 7-mm sections of the formalin-fixed paraffin-embedded breast carcinoma tissue block. The DNA was extracted from the dissected tumor and normal cells using a QIAamp DNA Mini Kit (Qiagen, Hilden, Germany). Amplification was carried out by PCR using primers located in the exon in which the missense variant was identified and the resulting products were analyzed by sequencing on an ABI PRISM 3100 Genetic Analyzer (Applied Biosystems). Sequences analysis were performed using SeqScape Software. If one of the two bases identified in the electropherogram at the same position, corresponding to the variant position, disappeared, the sample was scored as positive for LOH. BRCA1 Promoter Methylation Profile DNA was extracted from formalin-fixed paraffin-embedded tumoral sections after manual microdissection. The methylation profile of BRCA1 gene promoter was evaluated by methylation specific PCR (MSP) using the EZ DNA methylation kit (Zymo Research, Orange, CA). The method is based on the conversion of unmethylated cytosines to uracil by sodium bisulfite treatment. By using specific primers that distinguish methylated cytosines from unmethylated cytosines uracil-transformed in the same promoter region, it is possible to PCR amplify differentially methylated DNA. We considered a promoter as methylated if a PCR product is obtained by using primers specific for methyl-CpG. Plasmids and DNA Manipulation The plasmid YCpGAL::BRCA1 which contains the human BRCA1 gene under the galactose-inducible promoter GAL1p was obtained from Craig Bennett (Duke University, Durham, NC) [Westmoreland et al., 2003]. The missense variants were constructed by site-directed mutagenesis with specific oligonucleotides using QuikChange II XL site-directed mutagenesis kit (Stratagene, La Jolla, CA). The primer sequence is available upon request. Plasmid DNA preparation was carried out using the Wizard miniprep kit (Promega, Madison, WI). The mutations were checked by DNA sequence analysis. Yeast Strain The diploid strain RS112 of S. cerevisiae, obtained from Robert Schiestl (University of California, Los Angeles [UCLA], Los Angeles, CA) has the following genotype: MATa/MATa ura3-52/ ura3-52 leu2-3,112/leu2-D98 trp5-27/TRP5 ade2-40/ade 2-101 ilv1- 92/ilv1-92 arg4-3/ARG4 his3D50 -pRS6-his3D30 /his3-D200 LYS2/ lys2-801. Media preparation and yeast culturing was carried out according to standard techniques. Yeast was transformed with plasmid DNA by using the lithium acetate method with singlestrand DNA as carrier, following the procedure described in [Gietz et al., 1995]. Transformants were selected in solid medium lacking uracil (SC–URA). Colonies were grown for 4 days at 301C and analyzed further. 124 HUMAN MUTATION, Vol. 30, No. 1, 123–133, 2009 Protein Extract Preparation and Western Blotting The level of BRCA1 expression was determined in yeast cells transformed with the BRCA1 expression vector after 24 hr induction in galactose medium. Single clones were pregrown in 10–20 ml of SC–URA glucose medium for 24 hr at 301C. Then, cell pellets were washed in water and split in two aliquots: one was inoculated in 20 ml of SC–URA glucose and the other one in 20 ml of SC–URA galactose. The cultures were incubated at 301C for 24 hr under constant shaking. Thereafter, pellets were washed twice in ice cold water and resuspended in 0.5 ml of suspension buffer (50 mM KCl, 5 mM MgCl2, 0.1 M EDTA, 25 mM HEPES, 5 mM dithiothreitol, 0.3 M (NH4)2SO4, and 10% glycerol; pH 7.4) plus 10 ml of protease inhibitor solution (4.4 mg phenylmethylsulphonyl fluoride, 62 mg pepstatin, 50 mg chemostatin, and 725 ml DMSO in 1 ml H2O). Total protein extracts were prepared according to the method of Kimmerly et al. [1988]. Cell lysis was performed by vortexing five times for 30 s with acid-washed glass beads [Del Carratore et al., 2004]. A total of 30 mg of protein yeast extract was electrophoresed on a 6% SDS-polyacrylamide gel and transferred overnight in a cold room on a polyvinylidene fluoride membrane. BRCA1p is analyzed using anti-BRCA1 monoclonal antibody Ab4 diluted 1:100 (clone SD118; Calbiochem, Gibbstown, NJ), which recognizes the exon 11 of the BRCA1 protein. Anti-mouse horseradish peroxidase-linked (Amersham Biosciences, Piscataway, NJ), diluted 1:5,000, is used as secondary antibody. As loading control, we determined the level of the 3- phosphoglycerate kinase (PGK) with the anti-&agr3PGK antibody from Molecular Probes (Invitrogen, Carlsbad, CA). SCP Assay For each missense variants three independent transformants were analyzed. Single colonies were picked up from –URA glucose plates and inoculated in 5 ml liquid –URA medium containing 2% glucose. Under these growth conditions the synthesis of BRCA1 is repressed. Cultures were then incubated at 301C for 48 hr under constant shaking. Thereafter, cells were counted, diluted in sterile distilled water, and plated in SC–URA plates containing 5% galactose. Usually, 200–250 cells per dish were plated. Under these conditions, the GAL1 promoter confers a high level of protein expression [Galli and Schiestl, 1998]. Plates were incubated at 301C for 4–6 days or until colonies reached the largest size. Then, three colonies were picked up from each plate, resuspended in 1 ml sterile water, and counted with a hemocytometer. Intra- and Interchromosomal Recombination Assay The RS112 strain was constructed from the haploid RSY6 and, consequently, carries the same intrachromosomal recombination substrate as RSY6 [Schiestl et al., 1988, 1989]. This substrate consists of two his3 alleles, one with a deletion at the 30 end and the other with a deletion at the 50 end, which share 400 bp of homology. These two alleles are separated by the LEU2 marker and by the plasmid DNA sequence. An intrachromosomal recombination event leads to HIS3 reversion and loss of LEU2 [Schiestl et al., 1988]. The diploid RS112 strain also contains the two alleles ade2-40 and ade2-101, located in two homologous chromosomes that allow the measurement of interchromosomal recombination events [Schiestl, 1989]. To determine the frequency of intrachromosomal and interchromosomal recombination, single colonies were inoculated into 5 ml of SC–URA–LEU medium and incubated at 301 C for 24 hr. Thereafter, cultures were washed twice in sterile distilled water and counted. For each BRCA1 variant as well as the BRCA1wt and the controls, aliquots containing 107 cells were inoculated in 5 ml of SC–URA–LEU medium containing 5% galactose. In parallel, the same number of cells was inoculated in 5 ml of SC–URA–LEU glucose-containing medium. Both glucose and galactose cultures were incubated at 301C for 24–30 hr under constant shaking. Thereafter, cells were washed twice, counted, and appropriate numbers were plated onto complete medium to determine the number of vital cells, and onto solid medium lacking histidine or adenine to determine the frequency of intrachromosomal and interchromosomal recombination, respectively. The RS112 strain carrying the empty vector was exposed to methyl methanesulfonate (MMS) as follows: aliquots containing 5  107 cells/ml were inoculated in a total volume of 5 ml (107 cells/ml) of SC–URA–LEU glucose or galactose with different doses of MMS. Then, cultures were incubated at 301C for 4 hr under shaking, washed, counted, and plated as described [Schiestl, 1989; Schiestl et al., 1989]. Data Comparison and Statistical Analysis The frequency of recombination obtained after growth in galactose medium was compared to that in glucose medium. For each BRCA1 protein, at least six independent experiments were carried out. Results were statistically analyzed using the Student’s t-test. Results SIFT and PolyPhen Prediction Programs Identify Probably Deleterious Nonsynonymous Missense Variants The mutational analysis of 276 hereditary breast and ovarian cancer families, performed by automatic direct sequencing of all coding regions and intron–exon boundaries, has revealed several novel as well as previously described variants of BRCA1 gene. By using two prediction software programs, SIFT and PolyPhen, seven nonsynonymous variants likely disrupting the gene function, p.N132 K, p.Y179C, p.N550 H, p.S1164I, p.S1512I, p.I1766S, p.A1789 T, were identified. Among those, two variants, the 3610G4T (c.3491G4T, p.S1164I) and the 5484G4A (c.5365G4A, p.A1789 T), were studied for the first time in this analysis; the variant 5416T4G (c.5295T4G, p.I1766S) has been classified as deleterious mutation by other studies [Carvalho et al., 2007]. Three have been previously reported as probably neutral: the 655A4G (c.536A4G, p.Y179C) has been reported by Judkins et al. [2005]; the 1767A4C (c.1648A4C, p.N550 H) was classified as probably neutral by Tavtigian et al. [2006]; and the 515C4A (c.396C4A, p.N132 K) has been reported as likely to be of no or little clinical significance by Easton et al. [2007]. Finally, the variant 4654G4T (c.4535G4T, p.S1512I) was reported as neutral by Deffenbaugh et al. [2002] and confirmed by Tavtigian et al. [2006]. Out of the 13, 6 were predicted as neutral by both programs: 477G4A (c.358G4A, p.D120N); 1118A4G (c.999A4G, p.T333A); 1575T4C (c.1575T4C, p.F486L); 2576T4C (c.2457T4C, p.S819P); 3147C4T (c.3028C4T, p.P1010S); and 5057G4A (c.4956G4A, p.M1652I). Two of them, p.F486L and p.P1010S, were selected as negative controls; p.F486L was previously reported as neutral variant [Judkins et al., 2005], whereas p.P1010S has never been reported before. Summary information on the 13 BRCA1 missense variants is reported in Table 1. Finally, three known missense variants (p.C61G, p.A1708E, and p.M1775R) previously reported as deleterious mutations were chosen as positive (i.e., loss of function) controls; the first one maps in the RING FINGER domain and the last two in the BRCT HUMAN MUTATION, Vol. 30, No. 1, 123–133, 2009 125 domains [Ruffner et al., 2001; Carvalho et al., 2007]. The mutation p.C61G is due to a G to T transversion at nt 181 of the BRCA1 cDNA. p.A1708E is due to a C4A transversion at nt 5123 of the BRCA1 cDNA, and p.M1775R it is due to a T4G transversion at nt 5324 of the BRCA1 cDNA. The location of selected missense variants and negative and positive controls is depicted in Figure 1. Each selected variant was found in a single family with the exception of the three variants, p.Y179C, p.F486L, and p.N550 H, which were found to be associated in two unrelated families. The control variants p.C61G, p.A1708E, and p.M1775R were not found in the breast and ovarian cancer family group we studied. The histopathological features of the proband’s tumor are shown in Table 2. Segregation Analysis Familial history information was available for all carriers of the variants considered and the pedigrees are included in the Supplementary Figs. S1 and S2 (available online at http:// www.interscience.wiley.com/jpages/1059-7794/suppmat). The segregation analysis of the variant allele with the disease was performed only in Families PI403, PI397, PI258, and PI222, for which DNA samples of unaffected or affected relatives were available. The variants p.Y179C and p.N550 H were both detected in two unrelated families, Families PI403 and PI340, in which the neutral variant p.F486L has also been found. The proband from Family PI403 was affected by breast cancer at 42 years of age. Two seconddegree relatives in the paternal branch, the proband’s grandmother and a cousin, were affected by breast cancer. The affected cousin was found negative for the variants (Supplementary Figs. S1 and S2). The variant p.S1164I was detected in Family PI397, also the carrier of the p.E1172X BRCA1 deleterious mutation. The proband was unaffected, but her mother and three of her mother’s sisters were affected by ovarian cancer; moreover, four third-degree relatives were affected by breast and ovarian cancer. We showed the presence of a variant allele, in association with the deleterious mutation, in a unaffected cousin and an unaffected aunt of the proband, and their absence in three unaffected cousins of the proband (Supplementary Fig. S1). The variant p.A1789 T was detected in Family PI258. The proband was affected by breast cancer at 32 years of age. The proband’s mother, affected by breast and ovarian cancer diagnosed at 46 and 50 years of age, respectively, was found to be the carrier of the variant (Supplementary Fig. S1). The variant p.I1766S was found in Family PI222. The proband had ovarian carcinoma diagnosed at 42 years of age. A DNA sample was available from an unaffected sister of the proband; she tested negative for the mutation (Supplementary Fig. S1). Inactivation of the BRCA1wt Allele by LOH or Promoter Methylation The inactivation of the wild-type allele in the tumor tissue of the patient carrying the variant allele is considered to be indicative of the pathogenicity of such a variant. Inactivation may occur through loss of part of a chromosome, detected by LOH analysis, or by gene expression silencing due to promoter hypermethylation. LOH analysis of four cases and a methylation profile of two cases was performed. LOH was not observed in the tumor DNA of the p.N132 K carrier in Family PI432. The wild-type allele was lost in the tumor DNA of the proband of Family PI340 carrying the three variants p.Y179C, p.F486L, and p.N550 H. The tumor DNA of both patients carrying the variant p.A1789 T showed no LOH of the wild-type allele but the methylation profile of BRCA1 gene promoter of both samples showed hypermethylation. Co-Occurrence Co-occurrence is really a test for embryonic lethality due to inheritance of a compound heterozygous null genotype. The underlying assumption is that inheritance of a genuine high-risk missense substitution in BRCA1, along with a clearly deleterious Table 1. Description of the BRCA1 Missense Variants Analyzed BRCA1 varianta Systematic nomenclatureb Number of families harboring the variant Siftc Polyphend BICe Pathogenicity Previous classification 477G4A, p.D120N c.358G4A 1 0.25 0.45 0 Null Not classified 515C4A, p.N132K c.396C4A 1 0 1.924 1 Damaging Neutral [Easton et al., 2007] 655A4G, p.Y179Cf c.536A4G 2 0.03 2.41 35 Damaging Probably neutral [Judkins et al., 2005] 1118A4G, p.T333A c.999A4G 1 0.19 1.151 0 Null Not classified 1575T4C, p.F486Lf c.1456T4C 2 0.71 0.815 37 Null Neutral [Judkins et al., 2005] 1767A4C, p.N550Hf c.1648A4C 2 0.13 1.570 35 Probably deleterious Probably neutral [Judkins et al., 2005] 2576T4C, p.S819P c.2457T4C 1 0.08 0.08 0 Null Not classified 3147C4T, p.P1010S c.3028C4T 1 0.9 0.618 0 Null Not classified 3610G4T, p.S1164I c.3491G4T 1 0.01 2.158 0 Damaging Not classified 4654G4T, p.S1512I c.4535G4T 2 0.03 1.77 50 Damaging Neutral [Tavtigian et al., 2006] 5075G4A, p.M1652I c.4956G4A 4 0.00 1.713 39 Probably neutral Neutral Tavtigian et al., 2006] 5416T4G, p.I1766S c.5295T4G 1 0.01 1.94 5 Damaging Deleterious [Carvalho et al., 2007] 5484G4A, p.A1789T c.5365G4A 1 0.02 1.23 0 Probably deleterious Not classified a DNA mutation nomenclature is as used in the BIC database (http://research.nhgri.nih.gov/bic) according to GenBank accession number U14680.1 with numbering starting at the first residue. b Mutation nomenclature listed with a ‘‘c.’’ uses GenBank cDNA reference sequence U14860.1 with 11 corresponding to the A of the ATG translation initiation codon in the reference sequence, following the journal guidelines (www.hgvs.org/mutnomen). c Po0.05, deleterious substitution. d Score: 1.5–2, probably damaging substitution; and 42, damaging substitution. e Number of times that the variant has been described in Breast Cancer Information Core (http://research.nhgri.nih.gov/bic/) revised in January 2006. f Both patients with the p.Y179C variant also carried the p.F486L and the p.N550H variants. 126 HUMAN MUTATION, Vol. 30, No. 1, 123–133, 2009 mutation, will lead to death during embryogenesis. The method has the pitfall that the clearly deleterious mutation and the sequence variant of interest must be in trans for the analysis to be valid. We evaluated the co-occurrence in our sample of 276 families. Only the variant p.S1164I was found to co-occur in a family (Family PI397) in which a deleterious mutation was found. This variant co-occurs with the stop mutation p.E1172X in all six individuals we tested in the family, so we supposed that it is localized in the same allele (in cis), with respect to the deleterious mutation. The BRCT Missense Variants Inhibit the Growth Suppression Phenotype The expression of the wild-type BRCA1 gene inhibits growth in S. cerevisiae [Humphrey et al., 1997]. Taking advantage of this phenotype, the SCP assay has been proposed to distinguish cancer predisposing missense mutations from harmless polymorphisms [Coyne et al., 2004]. In this study, we constructed 12 missense mutations localized throughout the whole sequence of the BRCA1 gene. To further validate the SCP assay, we constructed one mutant within the RING FINGER domain, two mutants downstream from this domain, four mutants in the DNA binding domain, one in the serine and threonine (SQ) cluster domain, and four in the BRCT domains (Fig. 1). The vector allows a high level of protein expression when galactose is present in the culture medium [Humphrey et al., 1997]. To determine if the BRCA1 was expressed in the RS112 strain, we carried out Western blot analysis of the total protein extract from yeast culture in galactose. The BRCA1wt protein was expressed after 24 hr in galactose (Fig. 2A, lane 1). No protein was seen when the same culture was grown in glucose (Fig. 2A, lane 2) or in the extracts from yeast carrying the vector (Fig. 2A, lane 3). We also checked the expression of five missense variants: the three BRCT mutants p.A1789 T, p.I1766S, and p.A1708E; the neutral p.P1010S; and the p.Y179C. The expression of these proteins assessed by Western blot indicated different levels of expression (Fig. 2A, lanes 4–8), suggesting that the stability of the proteins may be affected by the mutations. However, in another yeast strain this difference has not been seen, indicating that the different protein level might be dependent on the genetic background of the strain used [Bennett et al., 2008]. When the same amount of cells from the same culture were plated onto galactose, the expression of BRCA1wt led to formation of colonies much smaller than those formed by the strain carrying the empty vector, confirming that BRCA1wt inhibited yeast growth (Fig. 2B) [Humphrey et al., 1997; Coyne et al., 2004]. We quantified this effect by counting the number of cells per colony by picking up three colonies per plate and counting the cells as previously reported [Coyne et al., 2004]. The colonies from the BRCA1-expressing strain contained an average of 7,000 cells per colony; on the other hand, colonies carrying the empty vector contained an average of 459,000 cells per colony (Fig. 2C). The missense variants p.C61G, p.N132 K, p.Y179C, p.F486L, p.N550 H, p.P1010S, p.S1164I, and p.S1512I did not complement the growth suppression phenotype, in fact the average number of cells per colony ranged from 4,000 to 22,000 (Fig. 2C), but they could not be classified as neutral because they map outside the BRCT domains. The three BRCT mutants p.A1708E, p.I1766S, and p.A1789 T fully inhibited the growth suppression, as the number of cells per colony ranged from 402,000 to 457,500. The expression of the p.M1775R variants that gave colonies containing about 180,500 cells per colony only partially complemented the SCP, as reported by others (Fig. 2C) [Coyne et al., 2004; Humphrey et al., 1997]. The Expression of Known Cancer-Related Missense BRCA1 Variants But Not the BRCA1 Wild-Type Increased Recombination in Yeast The SCP assay can evaluate missense variants that are located only within the BRCT domains of the BRCA1 protein [Billack and Figure 1. Location of variants in BRCA1. Location of variants and negative (black triangle) and positive (open triangle) controls. SQ, serine and threonine cluster domain; NLS, nuclear localization signal; BRCT, BRCA1 C-terminus domain; RING, RING FINGER domain. [Color figure can be viewed in the online issue, which is available at www.interscience.wiley.com.] Table 2. Histopathological Features of Tumors Sample Variants Tumor Age at diagnosis Histopathology type Gradea Lymph node metastasis ER/PR PI432 N132K Breast 47 DCI 3 – 1/1 PI340 Y179C/F486L/N550H Breast 48 DCI 3 – 1/1 PI403 Y179C/F486L/N550H Breast 42 DCI n.a. n.a. n.a. PI98 S1512I Breast 39 DCI 3 – –/– PI226 S1512I Breast 39 n.a. n.a. n.a. n.a. PI222 I1766S Ovary 52 n.a. n.a. n.a. n.a. PI335 P1010S Breast 29 DCI 3 – n.a. PI258 A1789T Breast 32 DCI 3 – n.a. a According to the Bloom-Richardson grading system for breast cancer (www.ccrcal.org/Vol_1/BloomRichardsonGradeForBreastCancer_CA.htm). ER, estrogen receptor; PR, progesterone receptor; DCI, ductal carcinoma infiltrating; n.a., data not available; –, absence; 1, presence. HUMAN MUTATION, Vol. 30, No. 1, 123–133, 2009 127 Monteiro, 2004; Coyne et al., 2004; Humphrey et al., 1997]. Therefore, novel assays to investigate the pathogenic impact of BRCA1 missense mutations located throughout all of the BRCA1 domains are needed. As the biological functions of BRCA1 appear to be related to DNA repair and recombination, we tested the effect of the expression of the wild-type and 12 missense variants of the BRCA1 protein on yeast HR [Narod and Foulkes, 2004; Scully et al., 2004; Zhang and Powell, 2005]. For a more complete 128 HUMAN MUTATION, Vol. 30, No. 1, 123–133, 2009 evaluation we used the diploid yeast strain RS112 that contains two distinct HR systems and, therefore, allows the simultaneous measurement of intrachromosomal and interchromosomal recombination events at the HIS3 and ADE2 loci, respectively (Fig. 3A and D) [Schiestl, 1989; Schiestl, et al., 1989]. The mechanisms by which HR occurs in this strain have been extensively studied and we previously reported that DNA double strand breaks formed during DNA replication are able to stimulate HR [Galli and Schiestl, 1995, 1998, 1999; Schiestl et al., 1988]. Although this yeast strain is widely used to study HR, there are few data on induced recombination in galactose media. Recently, we used this strain to screen a human cDNA library and we found that many human cDNAs increase yeast HR by two- to six-fold in galactose [Collavoli et al., 2008]. Here, we further characterized the HR induction by exposing the cells to different MMS doses in galactose or glucose SC–URA–LEU medium. Each MMS dose induced a significant increase of intra- and interchromosomal recombination as compared to the control. Particularly, at the lowest MMS dose the HR was stimulated at both loci by two- to four-fold in glucose and in galactose. The increase of HR is not affected by the medium because both intra- and interchromosomal recombination were induced to the same extent in glucose and in galactose (Fig. 3B and D). To determine whether BRCA1 expression affects HR, yeast cells containing the vector with the BRCA1wt or the missense variants under the galactose-inducible promoter were pregrown in glucose medium. As reported in Materials and Methods, 1  107 cells were inoculated in 5 ml of galactose medium and, for comparison, in glucose medium. Cultures were incubated at 301C for 24 hr. Thereafter, cells were counted and plated in complete and selective media to score for vital cells and recombinants, and incubated at 301C until colonies formed. The expression of full-length BRCA1 did not affect either HIS3 or ADE2 recombination (Fig. 3A and B). The expression of the three variants, p.C61G (located in the RING FINGER domain) and p.N132 K and p.Y179C (located downstream from the RING FINGER domain) induced a significant increase of HIS3 and ADE2 recombination (Fig. 4A and B). The expression of missense variants carrying mutation within the DNA binding and BRCT domain gave quite different results. The expression of the p.F486L, p.N550 H, and p.P1010S mutants did not increase recombination, while the expression of the p.S1164I variant showed a significant increase of both intraand interchromosomal recombination (Fig. 3A and B). The p.S1512I variant did not have any influence on yeast recombination, nor did the BRCT variant p.A1789 T. The expression of the known cancer-related missense variant p.A1708E induced a significant increase of HIS3 recombination but not of ADE2 recombination. However, the other known deleterious variant p.M1775R significantly increased both recombination events (Fig. 4A and B) [Mirkovic et al., 2004; Phelan et al., 2005]. Moreover, the expression of the I1766S variant showed a significant increase of intra- and interchromosomal recombination (Fig. 4A and B). We also constructed two new BRCA1 mutants that expressed two deleted proteins: the p.R1443X and the p.E143X. The p.R1443X deletion mutant was constructed by the insertion of a stop codon at nucleotide 4446 in exon 13 encoding a protein lacking the BRCT domains (Fig. 1), with a putative molecular weight of 170 kDa. The p.E143X deletion mutant was constructed by the insertion of a stop codon at nucleotide 546 in exon 7. The molecular weight of this truncated protein is expected to be 17 kDa. As shown in Figure 2A, the p.R1443X indeed is smaller than the BRCA1wt (Fig. 2A, lanes 9 and 10). When the total protein extract from yeast cells producing the p.E143X was analyzed by western blot, no band was detectable at high molecular weight; this demonstrated that the BRCA1wt is not produced. On the other hand, the early truncated protein (17 kDa) is not recognized by the antibody used (see Materials and Methods). The expression of these BRCA1-truncated proteins did not affect HR in yeast (Fig. 4A and B). Discussion Several assays have been proposed to distinguish between cancer-related mutations and neutral polymorphisms of the tumor suppressor gene BRCA1 [Mirkovic et al., 2004; Phelan et al., 2002]. Prediction programs, such as SIFT and PolyPhen, are very useful as a starting point, but often can produce misclassification of the variants and need to be supported by functional assays [Easton et al., 2007; Rajasekaran et al., 2007]. Transcriptional activation assays using a heterologous DNA binding domain have been recognized as very helpful systems to correlate the BRCA1 mutations to cancer [Monteiro and Humphrey, 1998; Vallon-Christersson et al., 2001; Monteiro et al., 1997]. In the present study, we chose seven missense variants, identified among 267 breast and/or ovarian cancer families; two nonpathogenic variants; and three cancer-related missense variants. As novel functional assays are necessary to classify BRCA1 missense variants as pathogenetic, we proposed to use the yeast S. cerevisiae as genetic tool. This organism is very easy to manipulate, simple to cultivate, and provides a large collection of viable mutants that could be very helpful to identify new genetic factors involved in the BRCA1 pathway [Westmoreland et al., 2003]. The expression of full-length BRCA1, achieved by using a galactose-inducible promoter, has been previously reported to inhibit yeast cell growth in a haploid yeast strain [Humphrey et al., 1997]. Here, we demonstrated that the GAL1 promoter-driven expression of full-length BRCA1 is also able to inhibit cell growth in a diploid strain. As previously reported, only Figure 2. Expression and effect of BRCA1 missense variant on colony size in yeast. The strain RS112 of S. cerevisiae was transformed with plasmids carrying BRCA1wt or the selected missense variants. Single URA31 transformants were grown in –URA glucose for 24 hr at 301C and then plated in –URA galactose. A: Western blot analysis of yeast cells expressing BRCA1wt and five missense variants; 30 &mgrg of total proteins were loaded on each lane: lane 1, extract from RS112 expressing BRCA1wt (galactose); lane 2 and 3, extracts from noninduced RS112 (glucose) and RS112 carrying the empty vector. In lane 4 to 8, extracts from RS112 expressing the variants were loaded as follows: p.A1789 T, p.I1766S, p.A1708E, p.P1010S, and p.Y179C. In lanes 9 and 10, extracts from yeast expressing the truncated p.R1443X protein and BRCA1wt were loaded; in lane 11, extracts from yeast expressing the truncated p.E143X were loaded. The level of the 3-PGK was determined as loading control. B: The expression of BRCA1wt or the missense variants affect the colony size in the RS112 strain. Here, 200–250 cells were plated in SC–URA galactose and incubated for 4–5 days. The expression of BRCA1wt and p.S1512I gave smaller colonies than those derived from the expression of the p.M1775R variants or from the RS112 containing the empty vector. C: The effects on colony size were quantified by counting the number of cells per colony. Then, single colonies each plates were resuspended in 1 ml water and the number of cells was counted by a hemocytometer. Three colonies on each plate were checked for cell number. Results are reported as mean of four independent experiments7standard deviation. [Color figure can be viewed in the online issue, which is available at www.interscience.wiley.com.] HUMAN MUTATION, Vol. 30, No. 1, 123–133, 2009 129 the BRCA1 variants carrying mutations in the BRCT domain are capable of suppressing the growth-inhibition phenotype [Coyne et al., 2004]. The expression of BRCT missense variants also inhibited the growth suppression in the RS112 yeast strain, confirming that the SCP assay could help to classify some BRCA1 missense variants as deleterious. Western blot analysis showed that the level of the p.A1708E and p.I1766S, which suppressed the growth inhibition phenotype, was higher than in the wild-type and the other variants. On the other hand, the level of the variant p.A1789 T is lower than the level of the other two BRCT variants, indicating that the growth suppression phenotype is not due to changes in the expression and/or stability of the BRCA1 variants. As the SCP assay is BRCT domain–specific, we set up a novel test named ‘‘yeast HR–based assay,’’ which could help to distinguish the deleterious variants from the neutral polymorphisms. The assay measures the properties of BRCA1 variants to affect spontaneous HR in the model organism S. cerevisiae. We showed that the expression of the cancer-related mutations p.C61G, p.A1708E, and p.M1775R significantly affected intrachromosomal and/or interchromosomal recombination in yeast, while the neutral p.F486L and p.P1010S did not. Moreover, the BRCA1wt did not affect yeast HR, suggesting that missense variants that do not alter HR frequency should be considered as potentially neutral. These results strongly suggest that the yeast S. cerevisiae could be a useful genetic tool to classify BRCA1 missense variants as deleterious. Particularly, our results indicated that the variants p.N132 K, p.Y179C, p.S1164I, and p.I1766S should be assessed as potentially deleterious, and the p.N550 H and p.S1512I variant as neutral. The p.A1789 T variant might also be deleterious, although it did not affect HR as it showed a clear effect on cell growth inhibition and clinical data showed cosegregation with disease in the family and wild-type allele inactivation in the tumor sample. The HR results are not dependent on the expression level of the proteins because the five BRCA1 variants that are expressed at different levels have different effects on HR. Figure 3. HR is induced by MMS in glucose and in galactose. The RS112 strain of S. cerevisiae contains two HR systems. A: The intrachromosomal recombination event occurs between the two duplicated and differentially deleted his3 alleles, leading to the HIS3 reversion and the loss of LEU2 [Schiestl et al., 1988]. B: The inducibility of intrachromosomal recombination was assayed in glucose and galactose media after exposing yeast cells to different MMS doses. The frequency of intrachromosomal recombination is expressed as the number of HIS3 colonies/10,000 cells. Data are reported as mean of four independent experiments7standard deviation. Results were statistically analyzed using the Student’s t-test. The P value was o0.001 at any MMS dose compared to the control. C: The RS112 strain is also heteroallelic for ade2-40 and ade2-101 so that interchromosomal recombination events between homologs leading to ADE2 can be measured [Schiestl et al., 1989]. D: The inducibility of interchromosomal recombination was determined in glucose and in galactose after exposing yeast cells to different MMS doses. The frequency is expressed as the number of ADE2 colonies/100,000 cells. Data are reported as the mean of four independent experiments7standard deviation. Results were statistically analyzed using the Student’s t-test. The P value was o0.001 at any MMS dose compared to the control. Roughly, by comparing results from glucose vs. galactose, intra- and interchromosomal recombination were increased to the same extent at both loci. [Color figure can be viewed in the online issue, which is available at www.interscience.wiley.com.] 130 HUMAN MUTATION, Vol. 30, No. 1, 123–133, 2009 In general, this novel yeast recombination assay has provided data that are in agreement with the predictive analysis carried out by the computer programs (see Table 1). In fact, any predicted deleterious mutation increased recombination, at least at one locus (see Fig. 4). Although this novel functional assay is not directly applicable in clinical practice because it requires expressing the missense variant in yeast, it could be a very useful aid in the evaluation of the pathological significance of BRCA1 missense variants. However, results from this assay have to be compared and evaluated with all data obtained from other assays to give a more complete characterization of the missense variants. Importantly, our assay allows the characterization of mutations located within a specific domain. Indeed, while all four BRCT mutants were positive in the SCP assay, 3 out of 4 BRCT mutants affected HR. DNA damage such as double strand breaks induces HR in mitotically growing cells of S. cerevisiae in order to repair the DNA [Galli and Schiestl, 1995, 1998; Kupiec, 2000]. Conversely in mammalian cells, DNA double strand breaks are primarily repaired by nonhomologous end joining. In addition, HR has been shown to provide a very faithful and efficient DNA repair pathway mainly in mammalian replicating cells where it is critical to maintain genome integrity [West, 2003]. The main goal of this study is to develop a new assay to characterize BRCA1 missense variants and not to deeply investigate the role of BRCA1 in HR. However, we could hypothesize that those BRCA1 variants affecting recombination could have some impact on yeast DNA repair or interact with proteins that lead to an elevated level of endogenous DNA damage. Recently, we reported that BRCA1 interaction with the carboxy-terminal domain of RNA polymerase II is mediated by the BRCT domain of BRCA1 [Bennett et al., 2008]. To address whether the BRCT domain was important for HR, we measured the HR in the strain expressing the BRCT deleted p.R1443X variant. As this protein did not affect recombination, we conclude that this domain is involved in HR. As expected, the earlytruncated p.R143X did not affect HR again indicating that protein-protein interactions are important. Figure 4. Effect of BRCA1 missense variant expression on yeast HR. Single colonies of the RS112 strain containing the plasmid expressing the BRCA1wt or missense variants were first pregrown in glucose. Then, 107 cells were inoculated in glucose and galactose medium for 24 hr at 301C. As described in Materials and Methods, cells were counted and plated to score for cell surviving fraction, the frequency of HIS3 intrachromosomal recombination, and ADE2 interchromosomal recombination. A: Effect of BRCA1 protein expression on HIS3 intrachromosomal recombination. B: Effect of BRCA1 protein expression on ADE2 interchromosomal recombination. Data are reported as mean of six to nine independent experiments7standard deviation. Results were statistically analyzed using the Student’s t-test. Po0.05, Po0.01, Po0.001. HUMAN MUTATION, Vol. 30, No. 1, 123–133, 2009 131 Some yeast mutants affecting DNA replication have a hyperrecombination phenotype, indicating that HR is also stimulated when the DNA replication is impaired [Galli et al., 2003]. Although there is no direct evidence that BRCA1 is directly involved in DNA replication, it interacts with several proteins that function in cell cycle checkpoint activation and the genome surveillance complex [Wang et al., 2000; Durant and Nickoloff, 2005]. Many BRCA1 interacting proteins have a yeast counterpart; therefore, the expression of such variants could affect the activity of these proteins leading to an increase of HR. It seems somehow contradictory that some BRCA1 variants negative in the SCP assay and, therefore, growth suppressors, were able to increase HR as much as the BRCA1wt. This is probably due to the profound difference between the two assays. In the SCP assay, yeast cells are plated onto galactose and incubated for several days (4–6 days). During that time, the BRCA1wt protein can accumulate and, consequently, inhibit the ‘‘colony’’ growth. We basically measured the colony growing efficiency of a single cell that has been ‘‘forced’’ to form a colony. In the recombination assay, yeast cells were grown for 24 hr in galactose or glucose, washed, and then plated in glucose media to score for recombinants and survivors. Therefore, this assay measures the HR events occurring during the 24-hr induction in liquid medium. To determine whether the growth suppressor variants inhibited cell replication during the 24 hr in galactose, the colony-forming efficiency of the BRCA1wt-expressing strain was measured after 24 hr in galactose by plating 200 cells per plate in glucose medium. The results showed that the colony-forming efficiency was as high as 80% and, under 24-hr galactose induction, the culture underwent one replication cycle. This indicates that DNA replication has occurred and could be related to HR. As mentioned before, BRCA1 is involved in many aspects of DNA damage response and affects DNA double strand break repair, cell cycle checkpoint, and HR; therefore, this novel functional assay could be also exploited to investigate the biological activity of BRCA1 and the mechanisms underlying BRCA1 tumorigenesis [Deng, 2006; Narod and Foulkes, 2004; Durant and Nickoloff, 2005]. The HR assay clearly has potential predictive value and can be added to the other previously used modalities to help understanding the pathogenic role of specific BRCA1 variants. However, the characteristics of the assay are not well defined and, like SIFT and PolyPhen, the yeast-based HR assay is not yet applicable in the clinical setting with a high level of confidence.  Missense substitutions of uncertain clinical significance in the BRCA1 gene are a vexing problem in genetic counseling for women who have a family history of breast cancer. In this study, we evaluated the functions of 29 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in two DNA repair pathways. Repair of double-strand breaks by homology-directed recombination (HDR) had been previously analyzed for 16 of these BRCA1 variants, and 13 more variants were analyzed in this study. All 29 variants were also analyzed for function in double-strand break repair by the single-strand annealing (SSA) pathway. We found that among the pathogenic mutations in BRCA1, all were defective for DNA repair by either pathway. The HDR assay was accurate because all pathogenic mutants were defective for HDR, and all nonpathogenic variants were fully functional for HDR. Repair by SSA accurately identified pathogenic mutants, but several nonpathogenic variants were scored as defective or partially defective. These results indicated that specific amino acid residues of the BRCA1 protein have different effects in the two related DNA repair pathways, and these results validate the HDR assay as highly correlative with BRCA1-associated breast cancer.  Keywords: BRCA1, homologous recombination, single-strand annealing, centrosome, VUS Go to: Introduction Among the more than 70,000 women who had their BRCA1 gene (MIM# 113705) sequenced by 2006, approximately 2.3% were found to carry a BRCA1 variant of uncertain significance (VUS). These variants were classified as uncertain because they occurred in families wherein segregation analysis had not been done or in whom the segregation analysis was not informative and thus the VUS had unknown effects on breast and ovarian cancer risk [Hall et al., 2009; Spearman et al., 2008; Sweet et al., 2009]. As whole genome and exome sequencing becomes a more prevalent practice, more VUSs in BRCA1 will be uncovered, and increasingly women will face the quandary of an uninformative genetic test. This leads to individuals with a VUS test result making decisions about cancer screening and prevention without concrete information on which to base their decisions. Women who have an indeterminate BRCA1 sequence result and a family history of breast cancer have a high level of distress, and there are no consistent clinical guidelines for advising them [Dorval et al., 2005; Petrucelli et al., 2002; van Dijk et al., 2006]. Of the 567 BRCA1 missense substitutions listed in the current Breast Cancer Information Core (BIC) database, 14 are described as pathogenic (Class 5) and 27 as nonpathogenic (Class 1). By including the data from Collaborators for the Investigation of Modifiers of BRCA1/2 (CIMBA), a total of 24 BRCA1 variants are pathogenic (CIMBA database). Less than 10% of the missense substitutions in the BIC database have known cancer predisposition. In the absence of definitive genetic information on BRCA1 missense substitutions, other methods are needed to determine whether missense substitutions are pathogenic. Multifactorial approaches have augmented genetic segregation analysis with additional information about the proband and, in some cases, the tumor [Easton et al., 2007; Goldgar et al., 2004; Lindor et al., 2012; Plon et al., 2008; Spearman et al., 2008; Sweet et al., 2009]. These approaches have been successful in reclassification of variants but are also incomplete because they cannot definitively determine whether any given variant affects the critical cancer suppressing function(s) of the protein [Millot et al., 2012]. In contrast, a biological functional assay has the potential to determine whether any given BRCA1 missense substitution is defective in a process, and if that function is predictive of cancer predisposition (i.e., 100% sensitive and 100% specific), then the functional assay can, in theory, be used in genetic counseling.  A variety of biological assays have been analyzed for BRCA1 function and have been correlated with cancer predisposition to various extents [Carvalho et al., 2007; Cotta-Ramusino et al., 2011; Kais et al., 2012; Lee et al., 2010; Millot et al., 2012; Morris et al., 2006; Ransburgh et al., 2010; Vallee et al., 2012]. Several of these assays test single domains of BRCA1, and several address the variant within the context of the full-length protein. In this study, we analyzed the effects of 29 missense substitutions in BRCA1 on the repair of double-strand DNA breaks (DSBs) by homologous recombination and by the single-strand annealing (SSA) pathways. Our results indicate that the effects of specific missense mutations in these pathways strongly correlate with breast cancer predisposition. Further, we find that specific amino acid substitutions affect the two double-strand break repair pathways differentially.  Go to: Materials and Methods Plasmids and Cell Lines  All plasmids for the expression of human BRCA1 with missense substitutions were generated by site-directed mutagenesis from the wild-type sequence (GenBank: U14680.1). Several of these plasmids had been described in previous publications [Ransburgh et al., 2010; Wei et al., 2008]. The cell line for the homologous recombination assay, HeLa-DR, was based on the genomic integration of a specific vector that functions as a recombination substrate [Pierce et al., 2001]. The vector for homologous recombination had been the gift of M. Jasin (Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Institute, New York, NY). The HeLa-DR had been described before [Parvin et al., 2011; Ransburgh et al., 2010]. The repair of double-strand breaks by the SSA pathway was based on a vector kindly provided by J. Stark (City of Hope, Duarte, CA) [Bennardo et al., 2008; Stark et al., 2004] stably integrated into HeLa cells to make the HeLa–SSA cell line. The siRNA targeting the cellular BRCA1 3′ untranslated region (UTR) is the same as previously used [Ransburgh et al., 2010].  SSA Assay  HeLa–SSA cells were seeded in 15.6-mm-diameter wells in 24-well plates, and when cells were 50% confluent, cells were transfected with 5 pmol of the siRNA targeting the BRCA1 3′-UTR plus 0.3 μg of the BRCA1 expression plasmid in Lipofectamine 2000 reagent (Life Technologies, Grand Island, NY). At 24 hr after transfection, cells were transferred to 35-mm-diameter wells in six-well plates. At 48 hr, cells were transfected with 25 pmol of the BRCA1 3′-UTR-specific siRNA plus 0.75 μg BRCA1 expression plasmid plus 0.75 μg pCBASce (for the expression of I-SceI) in Lipofectamine 2000 reagent. After 3 days, cells are harvested by trypsinization, and the fraction of GFP-positive cells is determined using a FACScalibur flow cytometer (BD Biosciences, San Jose, CA) (Analytic Cytometry Shared Resource of The Ohio State University Comprehensive Cancer Center).  Western Blot Analysis of BRCA1 Protein  Immunoblots of the expressed BRCA1 protein were done as has been described previously [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Cells that had been transfected as in the SSA assay were, in parallel, extracted in 0.1% NP-40, 0.05 M Hepes (pH 7.5), and 0.005 M EDTA. Protein contents of extracts were determined using the Bradford reagent; and 50 μg of protein was electrophoresed on 3–8% Nu-PAGE gels (Life Technologies, Grand Island, NY) M. Jasin (Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Institute, NewYork, NY), transferred to polyvinylidene fluoride membranes, and immunoblotted using antibody specific to BRCA1(400–1,100). Densitometry analysis was performed from immunoblots using Kodak 1D software (Eastman Kodak Company, Rochester, NY).  Statistical Analysis of Results  The raw results in the SSA assay for the missense substitutions were compared with the control samples (either GL2 siRNA or BRCA1 siRNA with BRCA1-wt add back) using the unpaired Student’s t-test and obtained the one-tail P values; for intermediate-phenotype mutants, besides the above-mentioned comparisons, we also conducted the unpaired Student’s t-test against the control sample that contains BRCA1 siRNA with empty vector adding back, and obtained the one-tail P values. P values of less than 0.01 were considered significant.  Go to: Results Function of BRCA1 Variants in DNA Break Repair by Homologous Recombination  The BRCA1 protein has been shown to be a critical component of the response to DSBs. Cellular machinery can utilize homologous sequences to accurately repair the DSB, or the free ends can be joined by nonhomologous end joining. In addition to homologous recombination, the pathway of SSA exists by which the repair proteins resect DNA from the free ends of the DSB, and when short stretches of homologous sequence are exposed, then the DNA ends are rejoined [Stark et al., 2004]. The homologous recombination assay used in this study was based on a method developed by the Jasin laboratory in which a single integrated genomic locus contains two inactive GFP genes, and one of these contains the endonuclease cleavage site for the rare-cutting I-SceI enzyme [Pierce et al., 2001]. Upon expression of I-SceI in the cell, one inactive allele of GFP is cut, and if homologous recombination occurs using the second inactive GFP gene as the homology template, then the DNA repair results in gene conversion making the GFP gene become active (Fig. 1A). The SSA assay is based on an analogous strategy in which the GFP protein is not expressed because of intervening DNA sequence, with an I-SceI site at the 3′ end of the intervening DNA. Upon expression of the I-SceI endonuclease, the DSB is generated, and resection of the intervening sequence reveals homologous GFP sequences that are aligned and repaired [Stark et al., 2004] (Fig. 1B). These two processes depend on sequence homologies for the repair, but there are functional differences. The Rad51 and BRCA2 proteins are required for the homology-directed recombination (HDR) assay, but are not required for the SSA assay [Moynahan et al., 2001; Stark et al., 2004].  Figure 1 Figure 1 The double-strand DNA break (DSB) repair assay system. A: The HDR recombination substrate [Pierce et al. 2001] is diagrammed. The upstream GFP allele is defective because of the inclusion of an I-SceI site in its sequence. The downstream GFP allele is ... For each assay, we have established HeLa-derived cell lines with the published recombination substrate [Pierce et al., 2001; Stark et al., 2004] integrated in the genome at a single site. The HeLa-DR cell line assays HDR, and the HeLa–SSA cell line is used to assay SSA. The HDR and the SSA assays have a similar experimental design with a depletion of BRCA1 by transfection of a siRNA that is specific for the 3′-UTR of the BRCA1 mRNA. We cotransfect a BRCA1 expression plasmid that is not affected by the siRNA and which expresses the variant BRCA1 protein. After 2 days, we repeat the transfection and also transfect a plasmid that encodes the expression of the I-SceI endonuclease to generate the DSB in the presence of the variant BRCA1. After 3 days, we assay the cells for GFP expression by flow cytometry. The timeline of the experiment is shown in Figure 1C.  We have previously analyzed 16 variants of BRCA1 in a tissue-culture-cell-based assay for repair of DSBs via homologous recombination [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Using the HeLa-DR cell line developed by us, up to 20% of the cells convert to GFP positive. This high level of recombination enables the quantitative analysis of variants in BRCA1 in this process. The endogenous BRCA1 mRNA is depleted by siRNA targeting the 3′-UTR, and a BRCA1 variant that is resistant to the siRNA is simultaneously expressed from a plasmid [Parvin et al., 2011; Ransburgh, et al., 2010]. A quantitative measure of the function of the BRCA1 variant is determined from the percentage of cells that convert to GFP positive.  In this study, we first analyzed an additional 13 BRCA1 variants for function in HDR (Fig. 2). Twelve of the BRCA1 variants spanned amino acid residue 90 through 191 and were identified from the Breast Information Core (http://research.nhgri.nih.gov/bic/). These were expressed from the plasmid as full-length proteins. All 12 variants are listed in the BIC as having unknown phenotype with regard to predisposition to breast cancer. Several of these have been evaluated using a multifactorial classification system, and of these 12 variants, seven were nonpathogenic [Lindor et al., 2012]. These were chosen because the function of this domain was unknown and because many of these variants have been reported to be nonpathogenic. By testing the known nonpathogenic variants in this assay, we provide a specificity control for the functional test. The 13th variant tested is a known deleterious mutant in the carboxy terminus of the BRCA1 protein, M1775R. In these experiments, the percentage of cells that were GFP positive when transfected with the control siRNA and the control plasmid were set equal to 1%. All other results were normalized to this control, and all results were from three or more separate experiments. Depletion of BRCA1 and transfection with empty plasmid resulted in a value of 0.09 relative to the control (Fig. 2, lane 2). Thus, BRCA1 depletion has an over 10-fold effect reducing the level of homologous recombination. Depleting BRCA1 and transfecting a plasmid that expressed wild-type BRCA1 resulted in full restoration of homologous recombination (Fig. 2, lane 3). Among the variants with substitutions in residues from 90 to 191, all 12 functioned as wild type in the homologous recombination assay (Fig. 2, lanes 4–15) (P < 0.002 compared with depleted BRCA1). By contrast, the 13th tested missense substitution, a known pathogenic mutant BRCA1–M1775R, did not complement the depletion of BRCA1 in this assay (Fig. 2, lane 16) (Pv = 0.0014 compared with wild-type BRCA1).  Figure 2 Figure 2 Analysis of 13 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in the homology-directed repair assay. HeLa-DR cells were transfected with a siRNA that depleted the endogenous BRCA1 and with a plasmid that expressed the indicated BRCA1 variant. After generating a double-strand ... Function of 29 Variants of BRCA1 in the Repair of DNA Breaks by the SSA Pathway  The 16 BRCA1 variants that had previously been tested for function in homologous recombination [Ransburgh et al., 2010] and the 13 BRCA1 variants tested in this study (Fig. 2) were analyzed for function in SSA repair. The recombination substrate [Bennardo et al., 2008; Stark et al., 2004] was based on similar design as the homologous recombination substrate with the exception that restoration of GFP activity occurs when the two inactive GFP genes are repaired by SSA. HeLa cells were stably transfected with the SA–GFP construct, and a clone was selected that had no detectable background GFP signal. Upon transfection of the I-SceI-expressing plasmid, about 5–7% of cells became GFP positive, indicative of a functioning SSA pathway. Depletion of BRCA1 resulted in a decrease to about 1–2% GFP-positive cells (Fig. 3, lane 2), indicating a role for BRCA1 in the SSA repair pathway that had been previously observed [Stark et al., 2004]. Depletion of BRCA1 resulted in about 25% of the activity found in nondepleted cells. As had been observed with the homologous recombination assay, transfection of a plasmid expressing wild-type BRCA1 fully complemented the defect in SSA due to depletion of the endogenous BRCA1 (Fig. 3, lane 3). By contrast, depletion of endogenous BRCA1 and expression of a known pathogenic mutant of BRCA1, M1775R, was as defective in SSA as had been transfection of the empty vector (Fig. 3, lane 32). Similar to previous observations with the zinc-coordinating mutants of BRCA1, these residues were all required for SSA repair of double-strand breaks (Fig. 3, lanes: 6, 7, 10, 11, 13, 14, 16, and 17). As was found for the homologous recombination assay, the M18T variant and the T37R variant were defective for SSA repair. The L52F variant had reduced levels of SSA repair, approximately 69% of wild-type activity (Fig. 3, lane 15), although this value was not significantly different from wild type. The D67Y variant, a known nonpathogenic variant [Easton et al., 2007], was fully active in SSA repair (lane 18).  Figure 3 Figure 3 Analysis of 29 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in the SSA assay. HeLa–SSA cells were transfected as in Figure 2 with plasmids that express the 29 tested missense substitutions of BRCA1. Results of the fraction of cells that had converted to GFP ... Results diverged between the SSA and the homologous recombination assays for the variants in residues 90 through 191. The BRCA1–I90T variant functioned in the homologous recombination assay, but in the SSA assay, it was 47% as active as wild type (t-test for differing from wild-type P < 0.01; lane 20). The Y105C variant was statistically different from both wild-type BRCA1 and empty vector (indicated with both an asterisk and a cross; lane 21). This Y105C variant thus has intermediate phenotype, neither fully active nor fully defective. Similarly, the P142H, E143K, and the R170Q had intermediate phenotype (lanes 25, 26, and 28). The V191D variant was also defective for SSA repair (lane 31). Interestingly, the S153R and S186Y variants had diminished activity, but the change in activities was not statistically significant from the wild type. Thus, these variants were not scored as defective. Seven of the variants tested had assay-specific phenotypes, suggesting that how BRCA1 interacts with repair factors in the homologous recombination pathway is different from factors that BRCA1 binds in the SSA pathway.  When replacing the endogenous BRCA1 protein with a variant BRCA1, there is the concern that the expression levels be consistent with the levels of the endogenous in nondepleted cells. A defective phenotype could be masked by high levels of overexpression of the variant protein, or the phenotype of a functional protein might not be observed because of poor protein expression. The 16 variants with missense substitutions between residues 18 and 71 had been tested in HeLa-derived cells and the expression of each variant was similar to the endogenous in each case [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. For expression, we tested the missense substitutions between residues 90 and 191 and also residue 1775, and found that they all express approximately similarly as the endogenous BRCA1 (Fig. 4). Normalized results from densitometry analysis are presented beneath each lane. Protein from nontransfected cells and from control siRNA and empty vector transfected cells had similar amounts of BRCA1 protein (Fig. 4, lanes 1 and 2). Depletion of BRCA1 and add back with empty plasmid depleted the level of BRCA1 protein, which densitometry analysis indicated to be about 0.35 relative to the nontransfected cells (lane 3). All variants were detected at higher levels than the lysate from BRCA1-depleted cells. Some variants were expressed at higher levels than others, but at most 1.3-fold higher than the BRCA1 levels in nontransfected cells (compare, for example, lane 7 with lane 2). Because none of the BRCA1 variants were expressed at levels much higher than the endogenous BRCA1, in no case could the phenotype of a defective variant be masked by overexpression. The S186Y, V191D, and M1775R variants all had somewhat lower expression, but these lower levels of expression did not correlate with function in either homologous recombination or SSA repair. As an example, the S186Y variant was a low expresser (0.86 relative to control), but it was functional in both assays. We note that the M1775R mutant was expressed at lower levels (0.62 relative to endogenous BRCA1) than any other BRCA1 variant (lane 16). We interpret this level of expression to be similar to other variants and not an explanation for the defect in each double-strand break repair pathway. However, we cannot exclude the interpretation that the M1775R was defective in the DNA repair assays because there was lower BRCA1 expression of this isoform in our cells.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Analysis of the expression levels of 13 variants in HeLa–SSA cells. The expression levels of 16 previously tested BRCA1 substitution variants were tested in the HeLa-derived cell line [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Thirteen variants, with substitutions ... Comparison of Variants in Different Assays  The 29 BRCA1 variants analyzed in this study were compared for function in the two DNA repair assays and with available knowledge about cancer association (Table 1). Many of the variants were consistent across the two assays, but there were several variants demonstrating separation of function. All of the zinc-coordinating residues were required for function in both repair assays. The M18T variant was clearly defective, but it is currently classified as unknown clinical significance. There is one genetic model that classified this M18T variant as likely pathogenic (see below).  Table 1 Table 1 Summary of BRCA1 Variants Benchmarking Function to Clinical Relevance  Recently, a new classification system for variants has been proposed [Lindor et al., 2012; Plon et al., 2008]. According to this system, Class 1 denotes variants that are not pathogenic. Class 2 is likely nonpathogenic. Class 3 is uncertain. Class 4 is likely pathogenic (probability of being pathogenic is 0.95–0.99), and Class 5 is definitely pathogenic (probability >0.99). According to variants described in the [Lindor et al. (2012)] system, three of the variants in this study (M18T, C61G, and M1775R) were of Class 4, either likely pathogenic or definitely pathogenic. An additional five mutants are treated clinically as Class 5, pathogenic, (C39Y, C44F, C47G, C64G, and R71G). One of these pathogenic mutants, R71G, does not affect the BRCA1 protein, but rather the splicing of the mRNA [Vega et al., 2001]. Since the assays tested express BRCA1 from spliced cDNA, the R71G defective phenotype would not be detected. We thus exclude this mutant from the comparison of benchmarking these assays against known mutants. There were then seven pathogenic mutants (Class 4 or 5) analyzed and eight nonpathogenic variants (Class 1; Table 1). When comparing the results of our functional analyses with these previously classified variants, the HDR assay scored all seven pathogenic or likely pathogenic mutants as defective, and all eight nonpathogenic variants as functional. The results of the assay were, in the case of every variant, either fully active or fully defective (see examples in Fig. 2). To date, no variant tested in the HDR assay produced an intermediate score.  Compared with these benchmarks, the variants tested in the SSA assay did not score as well as the HDR assay. All pathogenic mutants were defective for SSA repair of double-strand breaks, but one nonpathogenic variant (I124V) was defective for SSA, and three Class 1 variants had intermediate phenotype in the SSA assay. Although the HDR assay was both highly sensitive and highly specific, the SSA assay was highly sensitive at association with cancer risk, but it was less specific. Of interest, it had been noted that four BRCA1 variants, Y105C, P142H, E143K, and Y179C, had decreased accumulation at the sites of DNA breaks [Wei et al., 2008]. Although these variants were normal for HDR, three of these had intermediate levels of function in the SSA assay (Table 1). Perhaps there is a link between the accumulation of BRCA1 at DNA repair sites and a factor important for the SSA assay.  Go to: Discussion Functional Assays as Predictive Tools for Assessing BRCA1 Variants  In this study, we analyzed a total of 29 BRCA1 variants in the repair of DSBs by homologous recombination and by SSA. For the sake of this discussion, we exclude the BRCA1–R71G variant that affects splicing [Vega et al., 2001] because all of our assays used prespliced cDNAs and would not be sensitive to a splicing defect. By comparing our results with those BRCA1 missense substitutions that have a known effect on breast cancer predisposition, we found that the HDR assay was 100% accurate: seven previously classified pathogenic mutants were defective for HDR, and eight previously classified nonpathogenic variants in BRCA1 were functional for HDR. Further, the results for the HDR assay were either fully active or fully defective. We interpret these results to indicate that the HDR assay is validated as a predictive tool for assessing BRCA1 variants.  By contrast to the HDR assay, the function of BRCA1 variants in the repair of DSBs by SSA had a number of differences that diminished the accuracy of this assay. On the basis of the benchmarks of variants that were classified using a genetic model [Lindor et al., 2012], the SSA assay was sensitive because it did not misclassify any pathogenic variants, but it was not specific because it misclassified several nonpathogenic variants as either intermediate or defective. Interpretation of the SSA assay was also complicated by intermediate results; by comparison, the HDR assay had no intermediate results among the 29 variants tested. It is possible, but remains to be determined, whether missense variants that are proficient for HDR, but deficient or intermediate for SSA, confer a lower or moderate risk of cancer. We thus conclude that the HDR assay is a more reliable predictive tool for assessing the function of BRCA1 variants than is the SSA assay.  We had previously performed a similar analysis of the control of centrosome duplication by BRCA1 variant proteins [Kais et al., 2012]. Fewer variants of the BRCA1 protein were analyzed in this earlier study using the centrosome assay, but it has several differences from the HDR assay. With regard to those variants with inferred breast cancer association, the centrosome duplication assay had an intermediate result for the BRCA1–D67Y variant, which is nonpathogenic. The T37R variant was defective for both DNA repair assays, but was functional in control of the centrosome duplication. Five amino acid residues away, the I42V variant had the opposite pattern as T37R, with defective centrosome control but fully functional in both DNA repair assays. Experimentally, the centrosome regulation assay is much more difficult to perform than the HDR assay, making it not as desirable an assay for analysis of BRCA1 variants. In addition, the centrosome assay appears, based on the limited set of variants, to be less accurate than the HDR assay. On the contrary, like the SSA, none of the tested seven variants that were previously classified as Class 4 or 5, were functional in the centrosomal assay, suggesting that this assay is sensitive.  It will be necessary to analyze many more variants in the HDR assay and then compare those results with the clinical experiences before this assay can be used for clinical interpretation. On the basis of the accuracy of the currently tested variants, we believe that the HDR assay will help with difficult to classify variants of unknown significance.  Functional Assays for Probing BRCA1 Residues Important in Biological Function  Separate from the clinical utility of the different functional tests, important biological information about the BRCA1 protein is available from the various functional assays. Very little structure–function information exists for BRCA1, and there have been limited systematic analyses of the effects of BRCA1 amino acid variants in a given function. A variety of variants have been analyzed in the context of short BRCA1 amino-terminal truncations for ubiquitin ligase activity [Morris et al., 2006]. In a similar vein, a variety of variants in the context of a short BRCA1 carboxy-terminal fragment have been analyzed for the activation of transcription [Carvalho et al., 2007; Lee et al., 2010]. Several variants in the context of the full-length protein have been analyzed in terms of resistance to ionizing radiation [Ruffner et al., 2001] and reversal of a lethal phenotype in murine embryonic stem cells [Chang et al., 2009].  We find that there are some discordancies between functional assays of the variants. The most striking are at T37R and I42V. BRCA1–T37R was defective for both DNA repair processes, but was fully functional for control of centrosomes. Conversely, BRCA1–I42V was defective for control of centrosome duplication [Kais et al., 2012] but functional in the DNA repair processes. From this result, we hypothesize that the protein–BRCA1 contacts in the DNA repair pathways depend on the T37 residue, whereas a different protein–BRCA1 contact is important for regulating the centrosome duplication. Such a notion is possible because the centrosome regulation occurs in the cytoplasm and the DNA repair occurs in the nucleus, and it is reasonable to suppose that different proteins are involved.  There were variants that distinguished between BRCA1 residues important for DSB repair by homologous recombination versus SSA. The observed differences between the SSA and HDR assays involved residues from 90 to 191. Several of these (Y105C, P142H, and E143K) that had intermediate phenotype in the SSA assay had been shown to have slow accumulation at sites of DSBs. Especially, P142H mutation abolished the association with Ku80 protein, which plays an important role in the repair of DSBs [Wei et al., 2008]. Perhaps the SSA pathway contributes to the accumulation of BRCA1 at sites of DNA damage in cells.  In summary, in this study, we evaluated missense variants of BRCA1 in two different DNA repair pathways. Data support that the function of BRCA1 in the HDR assay is consistent with the known cancer association of these variants, and we suggest that this test is predictive for breast cancer. By contrast, the repair of DNA by the related SSA pathway is not perfectly consistent with what is known about cancer predisposition, and the SSA assay yields intermediate results. On the basis of these current results, we suggest that the HDR assay is validated for predicting whether substitution at any residue of BRCA1 is disease associated.  
2632||There have been few published analyses of the effects of missense mutations of the BRCA1 gene on BRCA1 protein function. In this study, we adapted a previously described homology directed recombination (HDR) assay to the analysis of the effects of BRCA1 point substitutions on its function in recombination. We established a HeLa-derived cell line, which has integrated in its genome a recombination substrate. Following transfection of a plasmid that expresses the endonuclease that creates a double-stranded break in the recombination substrate, HDR is readily scored by the percentage of GFP-positive cells. By combining RNAi specific for the cellular BRCA1 mRNA with expression of BRCA1 mutants resistant to the RNAi, we could effectively replace the endogenous BRCA1 protein with selected point mutants of BRCA1 and test these in the recombination assay. We found that both, the amino- and carboxy-terminal ~300 residues of BRCA1 were essential for directing HDR. Sixteen missense mutants from the amino terminus of BRCA1 were analyzed for function in HDR, and we found that several point mutants fully replaced the wild-type BRCA1 and are neutral in this process. Mutation of any single zinc-coordinating residue was fully defective in this assay. Several protein variants due to missense mutations, including methionine-18 to threonine and threonine-37 to arginine were also found to be defective for recombination. We have thus established a robust assay system for the analysis of the effects of specific missense mutations of BRCA1 in regulating the homologous recombination process.  Go to: Introduction The Breast Cancer associated gene 1 (BRCA1) is a tumor suppressor that is specifically associated with familial cases of breast cancer and ovarian cancer (1). In familial breast cancer, a woman may inherit a BRCA1 allele with a mutation, and during her lifetime there is a high likelihood that in at least one breast epithelial cell the second, non-mutated, allele of BRCA1 will be lost by deletion. Such a cell is hemizygous for BRCA1 and the one remaining allele has a mutation. If that mutation renders the BRCA1 defective for a key biological function, then that cell has increased likelihood of transforming into a breast tumor.  The BRCA1 gene has been sequenced from many individuals with a family history of breast cancer, and many of the characterized mutations result in a frame shift or a stop codon and truncate the encoded BRCA1 protein. Clearly, such truncating mutations predispose to breast cancer. Missense mutations, however, can present a diagnostic dilemma since specific point mutations have low prevalence in the population and the disease association is often unclear. Several genetic and evolutionary analyses can predict whether a given point mutation is likely to predispose to breast cancer, but the interpretation can be ambiguous (2–4).  Although there have been many studies assessing the functional implication of BRCA1 mutations, there has been no systematic functional studies that are designed for analysis of the full length protein or that assess a biological process such as homologous recombination. Several in vitro biochemical assays have tested the effects of point mutations in protein-protein interactions (5), in BRCA1-dependent ubiquitin ligase activity (6), and in the control of the centrosome (7). A tissue culture cell-based assay fuses 468 amino acids from the BRCA1 carboxy-terminus to a DNA-binding domain and analyzes the effect of the mutant on a transcription-based reporter assay (8). This latter assay has been very successful in assigning whether a missense mutation is associated with loss of transcription function, but the assay cannot evaluate BRCA1 sequences in the amino-terminal three-fourths of the protein, and the assay does not address non-transcription functions of BRCA1, such as regulation of DNA repair.  In this study, we have adapted the homologous recombination assay that BRCA1 regulates (9–11) to a robust method to analyze specific BRCA1 protein variants. The modified assay tests specific BRCA1 missense mutations in the homologous recombination process. We have characterized a set of point mutations in the amino terminus of BRCA1 in this assay as an initial step in determining whether a BRCA1 variant of unknown function may predispose to breast cancer.  Go to: Materials and Methods Plasmids, siRNA, and Cell Lines  The plasmid encoding the recombination substrate, pDR-GFP, and the I-SceI expression plasmid, cBAS, were both kindly provided by Drs. K. Nakanishi and M. Jasin (Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Center, NY, NY). BRCA1 expression plasmid, pcDNA-5’HA-BRCA1, has been previously described (12), and site-specific point mutations identified on the Breast Cancer Information Core (BIC) were generated using the Quick Change Kit from Stratagene. Details of the subcloning are available upon request. Plasmids for the expression of BRCA1 deletion mutants have been previously described (12, 13).  Sequences of the 3’-UTR of BRCA1 were targeted with siRNA oligonucleotides based on the sequence GCUCCUCUCACUCUUCAGU specific for nucleotides 80,780 to 80,798 of the BRCA1 gene (accession number AY273801). BRCA2 was targeted using siRNA based on the sequence UAAAUUUGGACAUAAGGAGUCCUCC. The control siRNA, called GL2, targets the luciferase gene (14).  A stable derivative of HeLa cells was established by transfection with pDR-GFP using standard procedures and selection in 1.5 µg/ml puromycin. Puromycin-resistant cells were cloned by limiting dilution in 96 well plates, and an initial screen selected those colonies that had no detectable GFP fluorescence. Remaining colonies were replica plated and transfected in parallel with cBAS to express the I-SceI. The untransfected stocks of those clones with intense fluorescence in a high percentage of cells were selected and re-cloned by limiting dilution. The number of integration sites in the final cell line, HeLa-DR13-9, was determined by digesting genomic DNA with XhoI and analyzing by Southern blotting.  Homology Directed Recombination Assay  On day 1, HeLa-DR13-9 cells, approximately 4.0 × 104 cells in a 1.5 cm well were transfected with 5 pmoles of BRCA1 siRNA targeting the 3’-UTR of BRCA1 gene and 0.3 µg of the appropriate BRCA1 expression plasmid in the presence of 0.5 µl of lipofectamine-2000 (Invitrogen). On day 2, the transfected cells were transferred to 3.5 cm well dishes. On day 3, the cells were transfected with 25 pmoles of the BRCA1 siRNA, 0.75 µg of the appropriate BRCA1 expression plasmid, plus 0.75 µg of cBAS in the presence of 2.5 µl of lipofectamine-2000. On day 6, cells were trypsinized and 10,000 cells from each well were counted by flow cytometry using a Becton Dickinson FACSCalibur instrument in the OSU Comprehensive Cancer Center Analytical Cytometry shared resource.  All point mutants of BRCA1 analyzed were tested in triplicate and the percentage of cells with recombined locus encoding GFP were normalized to the same percentage from the control siRNA transfected cells. In the figures, the averages are shown with the standard error of the mean depicted by error bars.  Immunoprecipitation analysis  HEK293T cells were transfected with the same BRCA1 variant expression constructs as used in the HDR assay. Whole cell lysates were harvested 2 days post transfection and subjected to immunoaffinity purification using the HA.11 anti-HA tag antibody (Covance) by standard procedures (12). Western blots were analyzed with anti-HA antibody and anti-BARD1 antibody H-300 (Santa Cruz) by standard methods.  Go to: Results Both the amino- and carboxy-termini of BRCA1 are required for BRCA1 regulation of homology directed recombination  We adapted an established assay (15) for homologous recombination in which two inactive alleles of green fluorescent protein (GFP) are integrated in a single locus in the genome of the cell. One allele contains the 18 bp recognition element for the I-SceI endonuclease. Transfection into the cells of a plasmid for expressing the I-SceI results in a double strand break in one GFP allele, and this break can be repaired by homology directed recombination (HDR) using the second inactive allele of GFP. (The plasmids encoding the recombination substrate and the I-SceI endonuclease were the gift of M. Jasin, Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center, NY, NY.) This repair results in gene conversion that creates a GFP allele that encodes an active protein, and the recombination can be detected by identifying green fluorescing cells. This plasmid and strategy (Figure 1A) has been successfully used in a variety of experiments in which a cell line carrying a mutant version of a protein under study has had this recombination substrate inserted in the cell and the effect of the specific protein was then evaluated (15–17). We instead inserted a copy of this recombination substrate into HeLa cells and carefully selected a clone, called HeLa-DR13-9, which has no background GFP fluorescence, but following transfection of the I-SceI expressing plasmid there is a high level of GFP-positive cells. In many repeated experiments, between 10% and 20% of the cells will undergo recombination following I-SceI expression. This cell line is then useful for the analysis of RNAi-depletion of proteins and testing for their effects in HDR.  Figure 1 Figure 1 The Homology-Directed Recombination Assay HeLa-DR13-9 cells were transfected with either a control siRNA or an siRNA specific to BRCA1. Two days later these cells were re-transfected with the appropriate siRNA plus the plasmid for expression of I-SceI, and three days later the percentage of GFP-positive cells was determined by flow-cytometry. The reduction in GFP-positive cells when BRCA1 is depleted is evident from inspection of the resultant monolayers (Figure 1B) and is quantified by flow cytometry (10,000 cells counted per sample). In the experiment for Figure 2, in the absence of transfected I-SceI expression plasmid, there are no GFP-positive cells (Figure 2, lane 1). In the presence of I-SceI and a control siRNA 16% of the cells were GFP-positive (lane 2). Depletion of BRCA1 or BRCA2 reduced the number of cells with recombined GFP-alleles by eight-fold or 40-fold, respectively. Similar reductions in HDR were observed with siRNAs targeting other BRCA1 and BRCA2 sequences, indicating that these results are not due to off-target effects of the siRNA (data not shown). Further, these results are consistent with published observations (9, 18). Importantly, when the siRNA targets the 3’-UTR of the BRCA1, expression of exogenous BRCA1 from a plasmid with a different 3’-UTR results in complete restoration of HDR activity (Figure 2, lane 4). This result suggests that we have a robust assay for determining the effects of specific BRCA1 mutations in the regulation of the homologous recombination process.  Figure 2 Figure 2 Depletion of BRCA1 protein decreases HDR activity We next assayed a series of synthetic BRCA1 deletion mutants for function in the HDR assay. In Figure 3A, the four deletion mutants are diagrammed. Using the same time course as in Figure 2, the endogenous BRCA1 protein was depleted by 3’-UTR-targeting siRNA, and the test BRCA1 protein was expressed from a co-transfected plasmid. Multiple repeat experiments were done, and in each experiment the maximal recombination varies from 10% to 20%, depending on transfection efficiency. Within an experiment the ratio of GFP-positive cells in the BRCA1 depleted sample relative to the control RNAi was consistently 8- to 10-fold reduced. We thus normalized data in each experiment, allowing us to average the results from multiple experiments. Replacing the endogenous BRCA1 with ΔN-BRCA1, which has deleted residues 1–302, results in a 4- to 5-fold reduction in homologous recombination. Expression of the ΔM1-BRCA1, which has deleted residues 305–770, reduced recombination by about 40%. Similarly, expression of the ΔM2-BRCA1, which has deleted residues 775–1292, resulted in a decrease in recombination by about 60%. Expression of the ΔC-BRCA1, which has deleted residues 1527–1863, resulted in a 10-fold loss of recombination. Clearly, the amino-terminus and carboxy-terminus each had a significant role in controlling the recombination reaction. Expression of the two internal domains had intermediate effects. In each case, the concentrations of BRCA1 protein expressed from the transfected plasmid were at or higher levels than the endogenous BRCA1 protein (Figure 3C), indicating that the reduction in HDR activity was not due to failure to express the test protein. Since the expression level of the ΔN, ΔM1, and ΔM2 mutants were significantly higher than the endogenous BRCA1 protein, it is possible that the magnitudes of the deficiencies in HDR activity with these BRCA1 deletion mutants were underestimated. We decided to focus on point mutations in the amino terminus.  Figure 3 Figure 3 The BRCA1 N- and C-termini are important in regulation of HDR activity Identification of BRCA1 point mutations that are critical for homologous recombination activity  We decided to test point mutations in the amino-terminal 71 amino acid residues of BRCA1 that were derived from individuals with a family history of breast cancer and identified from the BIC database. The reasons for using mutations identified in breast or ovarian cancer clinics were two-fold: first, this is the most direct way to identify candidate amino acid residues for critical function without performing saturating mutagenesis and testing a large number of variants; and second, the results of our functional tests might be useful in counseling such individuals who carry these mutations. Sixteen different variants were produced by site-directed mutagenesis of the BRCA1 cDNA-expressing plasmid. One of these variants, C27A, is a synthetic mutation and is not derived from a variant obtained from an individual with a family history with breast cancer. Rather, the C27A variant completes the set of eight different Zn-coordinating residues of BRCA1 in this analysis. The results of multiple experiments are shown in Figure 4. Consistent with our previous experiments, depletion of BRCA1 by transfection of siRNA targeting the 3’-UTR and co-transfection of the empty plasmid vector, resulted in a 10-fold reduction in GFP-positive cells relative to the control siRNA. Transfection of this BRCA1-specific siRNA along with the wild-type BRCA1 expression plasmid fully restored homology-directed recombination (Figure 4A, lane 3). Strikingly, transfection of each mutant either fully restored recombination to 100% or was fully negative, at the same level of homologous recombination as the vector-transfected control. We note that the deletion mutants used in Figure 3 produced recombination levels that had intermediate results: the ΔM1 and ΔM2 deletions caused partial decrements in homologous recombination. Even deleting the amino terminus, containing all of the residues being tested did not have as severe an effect on the HDR assay as did the point mutants. The expression levels of the point mutants of BRCA1 all were similar to the endogenous protein level (Figure 4B, compare lane 3 to all other lanes) whereas the ΔN deletion, which encompassed all of these point mutants, was significantly overexpressed relative to the endogenous protein and perhaps causing a partial masking of the HDR defect. Alternatively, it is a formal possibility that the point mutations in the BRCA1 protein have both a loss of function phenotype and a dominant negative phenotype.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Identification of BRCA1 missense mutations that affect homologous recombination Eight of the residues that were tested coordinate zinc ions in the RING domain: C24R, C27A, C39Y, H41R, C44F, C47G, C61G, and C64G. It is anticipated that substitution of any of these amino acid residues would have major structural consequences to the protein. Consistent with that concept, replacement of the endogenous BRCA1 with any of these BRCA1 molecules with mutated zinc-coordinating residues was non-functional in HDR (Figure 4A, lanes 6, 7, 10, 11, 13, 14, 16, 17).  Eight other substitution mutants were tested for function in the homologous recombination pathway. The M18T and T37R variants did not complement the HDR assay. Variants that could complement the HDR activity were I21V, I31M, I42V, L52, D67Y, and R71G.  We tested whether the mutant BRCA1 proteins used in this study could bind to BARD1 (Figure 5). We transfected the HA-epitope tagged BRCA1 into HEK293T cells and purified proteins in complex with the variant BRCA1 protein by immunoaffinity purification (IP) using antibody recognizing the HA-tag. Purified proteins were analyzed by immunoblots specific for the HA-epitope to evaluate the effectiveness of expression and purification of the mutant BRCA1 protein and specific for the endogenous BARD1 protein. We found that BRCA1 variant proteins I21V, I31M, I42V, L52F, D67Y, and R71G effectively purified cellular BARD1 protein. These are the same proteins that functioned in homologous recombination. Of note, the BRCA1 variant proteins M18T and H41R had detectable low level of BARD1 binding, but these BRCA1 variants did not complement the HDR assay.  Figure 5 Figure 5 Effect of BRCA1 missense variants on association with BARD1 Correlation of biological function with available clinical data for each BRCA1 missense mutant  We have summarized the available information for each mutant in Table 1, including results of HDR function and BARD1 binding (this study), E3 ubiquitin ligase activity and resistance to ionizing radiation (6), and available clinical information. For many of these variants family history was unavailable, and this limited the analysis we could do. Examples of available family data are supplied in Supplemental Table 1. We applied an algorithm called VUS Predict (19) to the 16 variants. VUS Predict calculates the odds of a variant being detrimental based on a variety of characteristics of tumors including estrogen receptor, progesterone receptor, and Her2 status, tumor grade, histopathology, age of onset, and the position of the amino acid residue in a functional domain or evolutionary conserved sequence. If there were no clinical data, then the VUS Predict output was based on the single criterion of evolutionary conservation (asterisked values in Table 1).  Table 1 Table 1 Summary of biological functions of BRCA1 proteins in the context of available clinical information for each variant. Of the 16 BRCA1 variants in this study, four of the eight Zn-coordinating residues have been classified as deleterious when mutant (Table 1). One other variant, R71G, has been classified as deleterious (2, 20), and one, D67Y, had been classified as neutral (4). One of the substitution mutants, M18T, has a published odds ratio of being deleterious of 31:1 (4). Using VUS Predict, the M18T mutant has 170.8:1 odds of being deleterious. While these analyses clearly indicate the M18T variant has a trend as a deleterious allele, the magnitude of the ratio did not exceed the threshold of 1000:1 for making a clinical classification. We find that this mutation of BRCA1 causes a complete loss of HDR activity. Though this substitution, when expressed in a truncated BRCA1 peptide in the absence of the BARD1 did have ubiquitin ligase enzymatic activity, it was defective in protection of a cell against ionizing radiation (6). In another study using the BRCA1/BARD1 heterodimer, the M18T variant was inactive as a ubiquitin ligase (21). The M18T substitution could affect the BRCA1-BARD1 heterodimerization interface (22), resulting in reduced BARD1 association with the BRCA1 variant (Figure 5). Our results in the HDR assay are consistent with this substitution being deleterious.  Genetic analysis of one of these mutants, D67Y, has suggested that it is neutral with regard to cancer predisposition (4), and consistent with that notion it has the same phenotype as does wild-type BRCA1 in the HDR assay. Though the R71G substitution is considered cancer-promoting, the mutation is thought to affect the splicing of the mRNA (20), such a feature would be missed when expressing a cDNA as in this experiment. Mutant BRCA1(R71G) protein functioned in the HDR at similar levels as did wild-type BRCA1.  Among the remaining five variants of unknown clinical consequence, the T37R variant was defective in HDR (Figure 4A, lane 9). In new research published while this study was being written has indicated that the similar T37K variant is likely to be deleterious based on clinical and evolutionary analysis (3). The T37R substitution was also found to defective in providing ionizing radiation resistance (6), consistent with our HDR results. Taken together, the threonine-37 residue is likely critical to the homologous recombination process, and consequently to radio-resistance. The threonine-37 side chain is solvent exposed, but in a small cavity near the BRCA1-BARD1 heterodimerization interface (22). Perhaps the bulky lysine or arginine substitutions result in disruption of BRCA1-BARD1 binding, or alternatively another protein important to HDR binds to this pocket.  Go to: Discussion This study establishes a new assay for evaluating the function of BRCA1 protein variants. Critical components include the HeLa-derived cell line containing an integrated recombination substrate that is readily scored using flow cytometry. The very low background fluorescence in this cell, combined with the very high response to I-SceI expression, make this cell line ideal for analyzing the homologous recombination process. Since HeLa cells are readily transfected, we routinely obtain greater than 70% of the cells transfected in a monolayer (data not shown), this cell line is ideal for silencing a given gene by RNAi and re-expressing the gene via an RNAi-resistant plasmid expression vector. Though BRCA1 is associated with breast and ovarian cancers, this function for BRCA1 has been found in all cell types, and is thus valid to study in the HeLa cell line. While not high-throughput, the assay is relatively quick once the mutant plasmids are prepared. Several variants can be analyzed simultaneously in a one week experiment. We plan to expand this analysis to a number of variants in the amino- and carboxy-termini of the BRCA1 protein. This continuing effort will greatly expand the analysis of the functional consequences of missense mutations in BRCA1 function.  When a BRCA1 variant protein is defective in the homologous recombination process, is it cancer associated? So far, the results indicate a strong correlation with this HDR assay and cancer predisposition, but the analysis of more mutants will be important to determine whether there is an association. Conversely, are BRCA1 variants that have full HDR activity neutral mutations? The R71G variant has full HDR activity, but it is certainly cancer-associated but via splicing (20), a mechanism that would not be identified in this assay using fully spliced cDNAs. Thus, we already have one example indicating that the converse is not true. In addition, we are developing a similar assay for centrosome control by BRCA1 variants, and initial results suggest that some of these variants do indeed function differently in the two assays (Z. Kais, JDP, unpublished observations).  Combining the functional analysis described in this study with genetic and clinical analysis of point mutants (3, 4) will undoubtedly be important for counseling women who carry missense mutations of BRCA1. As the data become more complete, such results will likely become an excellent resource for guiding clinical decisions.  Missense substitutions of uncertain clinical significance in the BRCA1 gene are a vexing problem in genetic counseling for women who have a family history of breast cancer. In this study, we evaluated the functions of 29 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in two DNA repair pathways. Repair of double-strand breaks by homology-directed recombination (HDR) had been previously analyzed for 16 of these BRCA1 variants, and 13 more variants were analyzed in this study. All 29 variants were also analyzed for function in double-strand break repair by the single-strand annealing (SSA) pathway. We found that among the pathogenic mutations in BRCA1, all were defective for DNA repair by either pathway. The HDR assay was accurate because all pathogenic mutants were defective for HDR, and all nonpathogenic variants were fully functional for HDR. Repair by SSA accurately identified pathogenic mutants, but several nonpathogenic variants were scored as defective or partially defective. These results indicated that specific amino acid residues of the BRCA1 protein have different effects in the two related DNA repair pathways, and these results validate the HDR assay as highly correlative with BRCA1-associated breast cancer.  Keywords: BRCA1, homologous recombination, single-strand annealing, centrosome, VUS Go to: Introduction Among the more than 70,000 women who had their BRCA1 gene (MIM# 113705) sequenced by 2006, approximately 2.3% were found to carry a BRCA1 variant of uncertain significance (VUS). These variants were classified as uncertain because they occurred in families wherein segregation analysis had not been done or in whom the segregation analysis was not informative and thus the VUS had unknown effects on breast and ovarian cancer risk [Hall et al., 2009; Spearman et al., 2008; Sweet et al., 2009]. As whole genome and exome sequencing becomes a more prevalent practice, more VUSs in BRCA1 will be uncovered, and increasingly women will face the quandary of an uninformative genetic test. This leads to individuals with a VUS test result making decisions about cancer screening and prevention without concrete information on which to base their decisions. Women who have an indeterminate BRCA1 sequence result and a family history of breast cancer have a high level of distress, and there are no consistent clinical guidelines for advising them [Dorval et al., 2005; Petrucelli et al., 2002; van Dijk et al., 2006]. Of the 567 BRCA1 missense substitutions listed in the current Breast Cancer Information Core (BIC) database, 14 are described as pathogenic (Class 5) and 27 as nonpathogenic (Class 1). By including the data from Collaborators for the Investigation of Modifiers of BRCA1/2 (CIMBA), a total of 24 BRCA1 variants are pathogenic (CIMBA database). Less than 10% of the missense substitutions in the BIC database have known cancer predisposition. In the absence of definitive genetic information on BRCA1 missense substitutions, other methods are needed to determine whether missense substitutions are pathogenic. Multifactorial approaches have augmented genetic segregation analysis with additional information about the proband and, in some cases, the tumor [Easton et al., 2007; Goldgar et al., 2004; Lindor et al., 2012; Plon et al., 2008; Spearman et al., 2008; Sweet et al., 2009]. These approaches have been successful in reclassification of variants but are also incomplete because they cannot definitively determine whether any given variant affects the critical cancer suppressing function(s) of the protein [Millot et al., 2012]. In contrast, a biological functional assay has the potential to determine whether any given BRCA1 missense substitution is defective in a process, and if that function is predictive of cancer predisposition (i.e., 100% sensitive and 100% specific), then the functional assay can, in theory, be used in genetic counseling.  A variety of biological assays have been analyzed for BRCA1 function and have been correlated with cancer predisposition to various extents [Carvalho et al., 2007; Cotta-Ramusino et al., 2011; Kais et al., 2012; Lee et al., 2010; Millot et al., 2012; Morris et al., 2006; Ransburgh et al., 2010; Vallee et al., 2012]. Several of these assays test single domains of BRCA1, and several address the variant within the context of the full-length protein. In this study, we analyzed the effects of 29 missense substitutions in BRCA1 on the repair of double-strand DNA breaks (DSBs) by homologous recombination and by the single-strand annealing (SSA) pathways. Our results indicate that the effects of specific missense mutations in these pathways strongly correlate with breast cancer predisposition. Further, we find that specific amino acid substitutions affect the two double-strand break repair pathways differentially.  Go to: Materials and Methods Plasmids and Cell Lines  All plasmids for the expression of human BRCA1 with missense substitutions were generated by site-directed mutagenesis from the wild-type sequence (GenBank: U14680.1). Several of these plasmids had been described in previous publications [Ransburgh et al., 2010; Wei et al., 2008]. The cell line for the homologous recombination assay, HeLa-DR, was based on the genomic integration of a specific vector that functions as a recombination substrate [Pierce et al., 2001]. The vector for homologous recombination had been the gift of M. Jasin (Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Institute, New York, NY). The HeLa-DR had been described before [Parvin et al., 2011; Ransburgh et al., 2010]. The repair of double-strand breaks by the SSA pathway was based on a vector kindly provided by J. Stark (City of Hope, Duarte, CA) [Bennardo et al., 2008; Stark et al., 2004] stably integrated into HeLa cells to make the HeLa–SSA cell line. The siRNA targeting the cellular BRCA1 3′ untranslated region (UTR) is the same as previously used [Ransburgh et al., 2010].  SSA Assay  HeLa–SSA cells were seeded in 15.6-mm-diameter wells in 24-well plates, and when cells were 50% confluent, cells were transfected with 5 pmol of the siRNA targeting the BRCA1 3′-UTR plus 0.3 μg of the BRCA1 expression plasmid in Lipofectamine 2000 reagent (Life Technologies, Grand Island, NY). At 24 hr after transfection, cells were transferred to 35-mm-diameter wells in six-well plates. At 48 hr, cells were transfected with 25 pmol of the BRCA1 3′-UTR-specific siRNA plus 0.75 μg BRCA1 expression plasmid plus 0.75 μg pCBASce (for the expression of I-SceI) in Lipofectamine 2000 reagent. After 3 days, cells are harvested by trypsinization, and the fraction of GFP-positive cells is determined using a FACScalibur flow cytometer (BD Biosciences, San Jose, CA) (Analytic Cytometry Shared Resource of The Ohio State University Comprehensive Cancer Center).  Western Blot Analysis of BRCA1 Protein  Immunoblots of the expressed BRCA1 protein were done as has been described previously [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Cells that had been transfected as in the SSA assay were, in parallel, extracted in 0.1% NP-40, 0.05 M Hepes (pH 7.5), and 0.005 M EDTA. Protein contents of extracts were determined using the Bradford reagent; and 50 μg of protein was electrophoresed on 3–8% Nu-PAGE gels (Life Technologies, Grand Island, NY) M. Jasin (Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Institute, NewYork, NY), transferred to polyvinylidene fluoride membranes, and immunoblotted using antibody specific to BRCA1(400–1,100). Densitometry analysis was performed from immunoblots using Kodak 1D software (Eastman Kodak Company, Rochester, NY).  Statistical Analysis of Results  The raw results in the SSA assay for the missense substitutions were compared with the control samples (either GL2 siRNA or BRCA1 siRNA with BRCA1-wt add back) using the unpaired Student’s t-test and obtained the one-tail P values; for intermediate-phenotype mutants, besides the above-mentioned comparisons, we also conducted the unpaired Student’s t-test against the control sample that contains BRCA1 siRNA with empty vector adding back, and obtained the one-tail P values. P values of less than 0.01 were considered significant.  Go to: Results Function of BRCA1 Variants in DNA Break Repair by Homologous Recombination  The BRCA1 protein has been shown to be a critical component of the response to DSBs. Cellular machinery can utilize homologous sequences to accurately repair the DSB, or the free ends can be joined by nonhomologous end joining. In addition to homologous recombination, the pathway of SSA exists by which the repair proteins resect DNA from the free ends of the DSB, and when short stretches of homologous sequence are exposed, then the DNA ends are rejoined [Stark et al., 2004]. The homologous recombination assay used in this study was based on a method developed by the Jasin laboratory in which a single integrated genomic locus contains two inactive GFP genes, and one of these contains the endonuclease cleavage site for the rare-cutting I-SceI enzyme [Pierce et al., 2001]. Upon expression of I-SceI in the cell, one inactive allele of GFP is cut, and if homologous recombination occurs using the second inactive GFP gene as the homology template, then the DNA repair results in gene conversion making the GFP gene become active (Fig. 1A). The SSA assay is based on an analogous strategy in which the GFP protein is not expressed because of intervening DNA sequence, with an I-SceI site at the 3′ end of the intervening DNA. Upon expression of the I-SceI endonuclease, the DSB is generated, and resection of the intervening sequence reveals homologous GFP sequences that are aligned and repaired [Stark et al., 2004] (Fig. 1B). These two processes depend on sequence homologies for the repair, but there are functional differences. The Rad51 and BRCA2 proteins are required for the homology-directed recombination (HDR) assay, but are not required for the SSA assay [Moynahan et al., 2001; Stark et al., 2004].  Figure 1 Figure 1 The double-strand DNA break (DSB) repair assay system. A: The HDR recombination substrate [Pierce et al. 2001] is diagrammed. The upstream GFP allele is defective because of the inclusion of an I-SceI site in its sequence. The downstream GFP allele is ... For each assay, we have established HeLa-derived cell lines with the published recombination substrate [Pierce et al., 2001; Stark et al., 2004] integrated in the genome at a single site. The HeLa-DR cell line assays HDR, and the HeLa–SSA cell line is used to assay SSA. The HDR and the SSA assays have a similar experimental design with a depletion of BRCA1 by transfection of a siRNA that is specific for the 3′-UTR of the BRCA1 mRNA. We cotransfect a BRCA1 expression plasmid that is not affected by the siRNA and which expresses the variant BRCA1 protein. After 2 days, we repeat the transfection and also transfect a plasmid that encodes the expression of the I-SceI endonuclease to generate the DSB in the presence of the variant BRCA1. After 3 days, we assay the cells for GFP expression by flow cytometry. The timeline of the experiment is shown in Figure 1C.  We have previously analyzed 16 variants of BRCA1 in a tissue-culture-cell-based assay for repair of DSBs via homologous recombination [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Using the HeLa-DR cell line developed by us, up to 20% of the cells convert to GFP positive. This high level of recombination enables the quantitative analysis of variants in BRCA1 in this process. The endogenous BRCA1 mRNA is depleted by siRNA targeting the 3′-UTR, and a BRCA1 variant that is resistant to the siRNA is simultaneously expressed from a plasmid [Parvin et al., 2011; Ransburgh, et al., 2010]. A quantitative measure of the function of the BRCA1 variant is determined from the percentage of cells that convert to GFP positive.  In this study, we first analyzed an additional 13 BRCA1 variants for function in HDR (Fig. 2). Twelve of the BRCA1 variants spanned amino acid residue 90 through 191 and were identified from the Breast Information Core (http://research.nhgri.nih.gov/bic/). These were expressed from the plasmid as full-length proteins. All 12 variants are listed in the BIC as having unknown phenotype with regard to predisposition to breast cancer. Several of these have been evaluated using a multifactorial classification system, and of these 12 variants, seven were nonpathogenic [Lindor et al., 2012]. These were chosen because the function of this domain was unknown and because many of these variants have been reported to be nonpathogenic. By testing the known nonpathogenic variants in this assay, we provide a specificity control for the functional test. The 13th variant tested is a known deleterious mutant in the carboxy terminus of the BRCA1 protein, M1775R. In these experiments, the percentage of cells that were GFP positive when transfected with the control siRNA and the control plasmid were set equal to 1%. All other results were normalized to this control, and all results were from three or more separate experiments. Depletion of BRCA1 and transfection with empty plasmid resulted in a value of 0.09 relative to the control (Fig. 2, lane 2). Thus, BRCA1 depletion has an over 10-fold effect reducing the level of homologous recombination. Depleting BRCA1 and transfecting a plasmid that expressed wild-type BRCA1 resulted in full restoration of homologous recombination (Fig. 2, lane 3). Among the variants with substitutions in residues from 90 to 191, all 12 functioned as wild type in the homologous recombination assay (Fig. 2, lanes 4–15) (P < 0.002 compared with depleted BRCA1). By contrast, the 13th tested missense substitution, a known pathogenic mutant BRCA1–M1775R, did not complement the depletion of BRCA1 in this assay (Fig. 2, lane 16) (Pv = 0.0014 compared with wild-type BRCA1).  Figure 2 Figure 2 Analysis of 13 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in the homology-directed repair assay. HeLa-DR cells were transfected with a siRNA that depleted the endogenous BRCA1 and with a plasmid that expressed the indicated BRCA1 variant. After generating a double-strand ... Function of 29 Variants of BRCA1 in the Repair of DNA Breaks by the SSA Pathway  The 16 BRCA1 variants that had previously been tested for function in homologous recombination [Ransburgh et al., 2010] and the 13 BRCA1 variants tested in this study (Fig. 2) were analyzed for function in SSA repair. The recombination substrate [Bennardo et al., 2008; Stark et al., 2004] was based on similar design as the homologous recombination substrate with the exception that restoration of GFP activity occurs when the two inactive GFP genes are repaired by SSA. HeLa cells were stably transfected with the SA–GFP construct, and a clone was selected that had no detectable background GFP signal. Upon transfection of the I-SceI-expressing plasmid, about 5–7% of cells became GFP positive, indicative of a functioning SSA pathway. Depletion of BRCA1 resulted in a decrease to about 1–2% GFP-positive cells (Fig. 3, lane 2), indicating a role for BRCA1 in the SSA repair pathway that had been previously observed [Stark et al., 2004]. Depletion of BRCA1 resulted in about 25% of the activity found in nondepleted cells. As had been observed with the homologous recombination assay, transfection of a plasmid expressing wild-type BRCA1 fully complemented the defect in SSA due to depletion of the endogenous BRCA1 (Fig. 3, lane 3). By contrast, depletion of endogenous BRCA1 and expression of a known pathogenic mutant of BRCA1, M1775R, was as defective in SSA as had been transfection of the empty vector (Fig. 3, lane 32). Similar to previous observations with the zinc-coordinating mutants of BRCA1, these residues were all required for SSA repair of double-strand breaks (Fig. 3, lanes: 6, 7, 10, 11, 13, 14, 16, and 17). As was found for the homologous recombination assay, the M18T variant and the T37R variant were defective for SSA repair. The L52F variant had reduced levels of SSA repair, approximately 69% of wild-type activity (Fig. 3, lane 15), although this value was not significantly different from wild type. The D67Y variant, a known nonpathogenic variant [Easton et al., 2007], was fully active in SSA repair (lane 18).  Figure 3 Figure 3 Analysis of 29 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in the SSA assay. HeLa–SSA cells were transfected as in Figure 2 with plasmids that express the 29 tested missense substitutions of BRCA1. Results of the fraction of cells that had converted to GFP ... Results diverged between the SSA and the homologous recombination assays for the variants in residues 90 through 191. The BRCA1–I90T variant functioned in the homologous recombination assay, but in the SSA assay, it was 47% as active as wild type (t-test for differing from wild-type P < 0.01; lane 20). The Y105C variant was statistically different from both wild-type BRCA1 and empty vector (indicated with both an asterisk and a cross; lane 21). This Y105C variant thus has intermediate phenotype, neither fully active nor fully defective. Similarly, the P142H, E143K, and the R170Q had intermediate phenotype (lanes 25, 26, and 28). The V191D variant was also defective for SSA repair (lane 31). Interestingly, the S153R and S186Y variants had diminished activity, but the change in activities was not statistically significant from the wild type. Thus, these variants were not scored as defective. Seven of the variants tested had assay-specific phenotypes, suggesting that how BRCA1 interacts with repair factors in the homologous recombination pathway is different from factors that BRCA1 binds in the SSA pathway.  When replacing the endogenous BRCA1 protein with a variant BRCA1, there is the concern that the expression levels be consistent with the levels of the endogenous in nondepleted cells. A defective phenotype could be masked by high levels of overexpression of the variant protein, or the phenotype of a functional protein might not be observed because of poor protein expression. The 16 variants with missense substitutions between residues 18 and 71 had been tested in HeLa-derived cells and the expression of each variant was similar to the endogenous in each case [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. For expression, we tested the missense substitutions between residues 90 and 191 and also residue 1775, and found that they all express approximately similarly as the endogenous BRCA1 (Fig. 4). Normalized results from densitometry analysis are presented beneath each lane. Protein from nontransfected cells and from control siRNA and empty vector transfected cells had similar amounts of BRCA1 protein (Fig. 4, lanes 1 and 2). Depletion of BRCA1 and add back with empty plasmid depleted the level of BRCA1 protein, which densitometry analysis indicated to be about 0.35 relative to the nontransfected cells (lane 3). All variants were detected at higher levels than the lysate from BRCA1-depleted cells. Some variants were expressed at higher levels than others, but at most 1.3-fold higher than the BRCA1 levels in nontransfected cells (compare, for example, lane 7 with lane 2). Because none of the BRCA1 variants were expressed at levels much higher than the endogenous BRCA1, in no case could the phenotype of a defective variant be masked by overexpression. The S186Y, V191D, and M1775R variants all had somewhat lower expression, but these lower levels of expression did not correlate with function in either homologous recombination or SSA repair. As an example, the S186Y variant was a low expresser (0.86 relative to control), but it was functional in both assays. We note that the M1775R mutant was expressed at lower levels (0.62 relative to endogenous BRCA1) than any other BRCA1 variant (lane 16). We interpret this level of expression to be similar to other variants and not an explanation for the defect in each double-strand break repair pathway. However, we cannot exclude the interpretation that the M1775R was defective in the DNA repair assays because there was lower BRCA1 expression of this isoform in our cells.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Analysis of the expression levels of 13 variants in HeLa–SSA cells. The expression levels of 16 previously tested BRCA1 substitution variants were tested in the HeLa-derived cell line [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Thirteen variants, with substitutions ... Comparison of Variants in Different Assays  The 29 BRCA1 variants analyzed in this study were compared for function in the two DNA repair assays and with available knowledge about cancer association (Table 1). Many of the variants were consistent across the two assays, but there were several variants demonstrating separation of function. All of the zinc-coordinating residues were required for function in both repair assays. The M18T variant was clearly defective, but it is currently classified as unknown clinical significance. There is one genetic model that classified this M18T variant as likely pathogenic (see below).  Table 1 Table 1 Summary of BRCA1 Variants Benchmarking Function to Clinical Relevance  Recently, a new classification system for variants has been proposed [Lindor et al., 2012; Plon et al., 2008]. According to this system, Class 1 denotes variants that are not pathogenic. Class 2 is likely nonpathogenic. Class 3 is uncertain. Class 4 is likely pathogenic (probability of being pathogenic is 0.95–0.99), and Class 5 is definitely pathogenic (probability >0.99). According to variants described in the [Lindor et al. (2012)] system, three of the variants in this study (M18T, C61G, and M1775R) were of Class 4, either likely pathogenic or definitely pathogenic. An additional five mutants are treated clinically as Class 5, pathogenic, (C39Y, C44F, C47G, C64G, and R71G). One of these pathogenic mutants, R71G, does not affect the BRCA1 protein, but rather the splicing of the mRNA [Vega et al., 2001]. Since the assays tested express BRCA1 from spliced cDNA, the R71G defective phenotype would not be detected. We thus exclude this mutant from the comparison of benchmarking these assays against known mutants. There were then seven pathogenic mutants (Class 4 or 5) analyzed and eight nonpathogenic variants (Class 1; Table 1). When comparing the results of our functional analyses with these previously classified variants, the HDR assay scored all seven pathogenic or likely pathogenic mutants as defective, and all eight nonpathogenic variants as functional. The results of the assay were, in the case of every variant, either fully active or fully defective (see examples in Fig. 2). To date, no variant tested in the HDR assay produced an intermediate score.  Compared with these benchmarks, the variants tested in the SSA assay did not score as well as the HDR assay. All pathogenic mutants were defective for SSA repair of double-strand breaks, but one nonpathogenic variant (I124V) was defective for SSA, and three Class 1 variants had intermediate phenotype in the SSA assay. Although the HDR assay was both highly sensitive and highly specific, the SSA assay was highly sensitive at association with cancer risk, but it was less specific. Of interest, it had been noted that four BRCA1 variants, Y105C, P142H, E143K, and Y179C, had decreased accumulation at the sites of DNA breaks [Wei et al., 2008]. Although these variants were normal for HDR, three of these had intermediate levels of function in the SSA assay (Table 1). Perhaps there is a link between the accumulation of BRCA1 at DNA repair sites and a factor important for the SSA assay.  Go to: Discussion Functional Assays as Predictive Tools for Assessing BRCA1 Variants  In this study, we analyzed a total of 29 BRCA1 variants in the repair of DSBs by homologous recombination and by SSA. For the sake of this discussion, we exclude the BRCA1–R71G variant that affects splicing [Vega et al., 2001] because all of our assays used prespliced cDNAs and would not be sensitive to a splicing defect. By comparing our results with those BRCA1 missense substitutions that have a known effect on breast cancer predisposition, we found that the HDR assay was 100% accurate: seven previously classified pathogenic mutants were defective for HDR, and eight previously classified nonpathogenic variants in BRCA1 were functional for HDR. Further, the results for the HDR assay were either fully active or fully defective. We interpret these results to indicate that the HDR assay is validated as a predictive tool for assessing BRCA1 variants.  By contrast to the HDR assay, the function of BRCA1 variants in the repair of DSBs by SSA had a number of differences that diminished the accuracy of this assay. On the basis of the benchmarks of variants that were classified using a genetic model [Lindor et al., 2012], the SSA assay was sensitive because it did not misclassify any pathogenic variants, but it was not specific because it misclassified several nonpathogenic variants as either intermediate or defective. Interpretation of the SSA assay was also complicated by intermediate results; by comparison, the HDR assay had no intermediate results among the 29 variants tested. It is possible, but remains to be determined, whether missense variants that are proficient for HDR, but deficient or intermediate for SSA, confer a lower or moderate risk of cancer. We thus conclude that the HDR assay is a more reliable predictive tool for assessing the function of BRCA1 variants than is the SSA assay.  We had previously performed a similar analysis of the control of centrosome duplication by BRCA1 variant proteins [Kais et al., 2012]. Fewer variants of the BRCA1 protein were analyzed in this earlier study using the centrosome assay, but it has several differences from the HDR assay. With regard to those variants with inferred breast cancer association, the centrosome duplication assay had an intermediate result for the BRCA1–D67Y variant, which is nonpathogenic. The T37R variant was defective for both DNA repair assays, but was functional in control of the centrosome duplication. Five amino acid residues away, the I42V variant had the opposite pattern as T37R, with defective centrosome control but fully functional in both DNA repair assays. Experimentally, the centrosome regulation assay is much more difficult to perform than the HDR assay, making it not as desirable an assay for analysis of BRCA1 variants. In addition, the centrosome assay appears, based on the limited set of variants, to be less accurate than the HDR assay. On the contrary, like the SSA, none of the tested seven variants that were previously classified as Class 4 or 5, were functional in the centrosomal assay, suggesting that this assay is sensitive.  It will be necessary to analyze many more variants in the HDR assay and then compare those results with the clinical experiences before this assay can be used for clinical interpretation. On the basis of the accuracy of the currently tested variants, we believe that the HDR assay will help with difficult to classify variants of unknown significance.  Functional Assays for Probing BRCA1 Residues Important in Biological Function  Separate from the clinical utility of the different functional tests, important biological information about the BRCA1 protein is available from the various functional assays. Very little structure–function information exists for BRCA1, and there have been limited systematic analyses of the effects of BRCA1 amino acid variants in a given function. A variety of variants have been analyzed in the context of short BRCA1 amino-terminal truncations for ubiquitin ligase activity [Morris et al., 2006]. In a similar vein, a variety of variants in the context of a short BRCA1 carboxy-terminal fragment have been analyzed for the activation of transcription [Carvalho et al., 2007; Lee et al., 2010]. Several variants in the context of the full-length protein have been analyzed in terms of resistance to ionizing radiation [Ruffner et al., 2001] and reversal of a lethal phenotype in murine embryonic stem cells [Chang et al., 2009].  We find that there are some discordancies between functional assays of the variants. The most striking are at T37R and I42V. BRCA1–T37R was defective for both DNA repair processes, but was fully functional for control of centrosomes. Conversely, BRCA1–I42V was defective for control of centrosome duplication [Kais et al., 2012] but functional in the DNA repair processes. From this result, we hypothesize that the protein–BRCA1 contacts in the DNA repair pathways depend on the T37 residue, whereas a different protein–BRCA1 contact is important for regulating the centrosome duplication. Such a notion is possible because the centrosome regulation occurs in the cytoplasm and the DNA repair occurs in the nucleus, and it is reasonable to suppose that different proteins are involved.  There were variants that distinguished between BRCA1 residues important for DSB repair by homologous recombination versus SSA. The observed differences between the SSA and HDR assays involved residues from 90 to 191. Several of these (Y105C, P142H, and E143K) that had intermediate phenotype in the SSA assay had been shown to have slow accumulation at sites of DSBs. Especially, P142H mutation abolished the association with Ku80 protein, which plays an important role in the repair of DSBs [Wei et al., 2008]. Perhaps the SSA pathway contributes to the accumulation of BRCA1 at sites of DNA damage in cells.  In summary, in this study, we evaluated missense variants of BRCA1 in two different DNA repair pathways. Data support that the function of BRCA1 in the HDR assay is consistent with the known cancer association of these variants, and we suggest that this test is predictive for breast cancer. By contrast, the repair of DNA by the related SSA pathway is not perfectly consistent with what is known about cancer predisposition, and the SSA assay yields intermediate results. On the basis of these current results, we suggest that the HDR assay is validated for predicting whether substitution at any residue of BRCA1 is disease associated.  
2676||Missense substitutions of uncertain clinical significance in the BRCA1 gene are a vexing problem in genetic counseling for women who have a family history of breast cancer. In this study, we evaluated the functions of 29 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in two DNA repair pathways. Repair of double-strand breaks by homology-directed recombination (HDR) had been previously analyzed for 16 of these BRCA1 variants, and 13 more variants were analyzed in this study. All 29 variants were also analyzed for function in double-strand break repair by the single-strand annealing (SSA) pathway. We found that among the pathogenic mutations in BRCA1, all were defective for DNA repair by either pathway. The HDR assay was accurate because all pathogenic mutants were defective for HDR, and all nonpathogenic variants were fully functional for HDR. Repair by SSA accurately identified pathogenic mutants, but several nonpathogenic variants were scored as defective or partially defective. These results indicated that specific amino acid residues of the BRCA1 protein have different effects in the two related DNA repair pathways, and these results validate the HDR assay as highly correlative with BRCA1-associated breast cancer.  Keywords: BRCA1, homologous recombination, single-strand annealing, centrosome, VUS Go to: Introduction Among the more than 70,000 women who had their BRCA1 gene (MIM# 113705) sequenced by 2006, approximately 2.3% were found to carry a BRCA1 variant of uncertain significance (VUS). These variants were classified as uncertain because they occurred in families wherein segregation analysis had not been done or in whom the segregation analysis was not informative and thus the VUS had unknown effects on breast and ovarian cancer risk [Hall et al., 2009; Spearman et al., 2008; Sweet et al., 2009]. As whole genome and exome sequencing becomes a more prevalent practice, more VUSs in BRCA1 will be uncovered, and increasingly women will face the quandary of an uninformative genetic test. This leads to individuals with a VUS test result making decisions about cancer screening and prevention without concrete information on which to base their decisions. Women who have an indeterminate BRCA1 sequence result and a family history of breast cancer have a high level of distress, and there are no consistent clinical guidelines for advising them [Dorval et al., 2005; Petrucelli et al., 2002; van Dijk et al., 2006]. Of the 567 BRCA1 missense substitutions listed in the current Breast Cancer Information Core (BIC) database, 14 are described as pathogenic (Class 5) and 27 as nonpathogenic (Class 1). By including the data from Collaborators for the Investigation of Modifiers of BRCA1/2 (CIMBA), a total of 24 BRCA1 variants are pathogenic (CIMBA database). Less than 10% of the missense substitutions in the BIC database have known cancer predisposition. In the absence of definitive genetic information on BRCA1 missense substitutions, other methods are needed to determine whether missense substitutions are pathogenic. Multifactorial approaches have augmented genetic segregation analysis with additional information about the proband and, in some cases, the tumor [Easton et al., 2007; Goldgar et al., 2004; Lindor et al., 2012; Plon et al., 2008; Spearman et al., 2008; Sweet et al., 2009]. These approaches have been successful in reclassification of variants but are also incomplete because they cannot definitively determine whether any given variant affects the critical cancer suppressing function(s) of the protein [Millot et al., 2012]. In contrast, a biological functional assay has the potential to determine whether any given BRCA1 missense substitution is defective in a process, and if that function is predictive of cancer predisposition (i.e., 100% sensitive and 100% specific), then the functional assay can, in theory, be used in genetic counseling.  A variety of biological assays have been analyzed for BRCA1 function and have been correlated with cancer predisposition to various extents [Carvalho et al., 2007; Cotta-Ramusino et al., 2011; Kais et al., 2012; Lee et al., 2010; Millot et al., 2012; Morris et al., 2006; Ransburgh et al., 2010; Vallee et al., 2012]. Several of these assays test single domains of BRCA1, and several address the variant within the context of the full-length protein. In this study, we analyzed the effects of 29 missense substitutions in BRCA1 on the repair of double-strand DNA breaks (DSBs) by homologous recombination and by the single-strand annealing (SSA) pathways. Our results indicate that the effects of specific missense mutations in these pathways strongly correlate with breast cancer predisposition. Further, we find that specific amino acid substitutions affect the two double-strand break repair pathways differentially.  Go to: Materials and Methods Plasmids and Cell Lines  All plasmids for the expression of human BRCA1 with missense substitutions were generated by site-directed mutagenesis from the wild-type sequence (GenBank: U14680.1). Several of these plasmids had been described in previous publications [Ransburgh et al., 2010; Wei et al., 2008]. The cell line for the homologous recombination assay, HeLa-DR, was based on the genomic integration of a specific vector that functions as a recombination substrate [Pierce et al., 2001]. The vector for homologous recombination had been the gift of M. Jasin (Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Institute, New York, NY). The HeLa-DR had been described before [Parvin et al., 2011; Ransburgh et al., 2010]. The repair of double-strand breaks by the SSA pathway was based on a vector kindly provided by J. Stark (City of Hope, Duarte, CA) [Bennardo et al., 2008; Stark et al., 2004] stably integrated into HeLa cells to make the HeLa–SSA cell line. The siRNA targeting the cellular BRCA1 3′ untranslated region (UTR) is the same as previously used [Ransburgh et al., 2010].  SSA Assay  HeLa–SSA cells were seeded in 15.6-mm-diameter wells in 24-well plates, and when cells were 50% confluent, cells were transfected with 5 pmol of the siRNA targeting the BRCA1 3′-UTR plus 0.3 μg of the BRCA1 expression plasmid in Lipofectamine 2000 reagent (Life Technologies, Grand Island, NY). At 24 hr after transfection, cells were transferred to 35-mm-diameter wells in six-well plates. At 48 hr, cells were transfected with 25 pmol of the BRCA1 3′-UTR-specific siRNA plus 0.75 μg BRCA1 expression plasmid plus 0.75 μg pCBASce (for the expression of I-SceI) in Lipofectamine 2000 reagent. After 3 days, cells are harvested by trypsinization, and the fraction of GFP-positive cells is determined using a FACScalibur flow cytometer (BD Biosciences, San Jose, CA) (Analytic Cytometry Shared Resource of The Ohio State University Comprehensive Cancer Center).  Western Blot Analysis of BRCA1 Protein  Immunoblots of the expressed BRCA1 protein were done as has been described previously [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Cells that had been transfected as in the SSA assay were, in parallel, extracted in 0.1% NP-40, 0.05 M Hepes (pH 7.5), and 0.005 M EDTA. Protein contents of extracts were determined using the Bradford reagent; and 50 μg of protein was electrophoresed on 3–8% Nu-PAGE gels (Life Technologies, Grand Island, NY) M. Jasin (Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Institute, NewYork, NY), transferred to polyvinylidene fluoride membranes, and immunoblotted using antibody specific to BRCA1(400–1,100). Densitometry analysis was performed from immunoblots using Kodak 1D software (Eastman Kodak Company, Rochester, NY).  Statistical Analysis of Results  The raw results in the SSA assay for the missense substitutions were compared with the control samples (either GL2 siRNA or BRCA1 siRNA with BRCA1-wt add back) using the unpaired Student’s t-test and obtained the one-tail P values; for intermediate-phenotype mutants, besides the above-mentioned comparisons, we also conducted the unpaired Student’s t-test against the control sample that contains BRCA1 siRNA with empty vector adding back, and obtained the one-tail P values. P values of less than 0.01 were considered significant.  Go to: Results Function of BRCA1 Variants in DNA Break Repair by Homologous Recombination  The BRCA1 protein has been shown to be a critical component of the response to DSBs. Cellular machinery can utilize homologous sequences to accurately repair the DSB, or the free ends can be joined by nonhomologous end joining. In addition to homologous recombination, the pathway of SSA exists by which the repair proteins resect DNA from the free ends of the DSB, and when short stretches of homologous sequence are exposed, then the DNA ends are rejoined [Stark et al., 2004]. The homologous recombination assay used in this study was based on a method developed by the Jasin laboratory in which a single integrated genomic locus contains two inactive GFP genes, and one of these contains the endonuclease cleavage site for the rare-cutting I-SceI enzyme [Pierce et al., 2001]. Upon expression of I-SceI in the cell, one inactive allele of GFP is cut, and if homologous recombination occurs using the second inactive GFP gene as the homology template, then the DNA repair results in gene conversion making the GFP gene become active (Fig. 1A). The SSA assay is based on an analogous strategy in which the GFP protein is not expressed because of intervening DNA sequence, with an I-SceI site at the 3′ end of the intervening DNA. Upon expression of the I-SceI endonuclease, the DSB is generated, and resection of the intervening sequence reveals homologous GFP sequences that are aligned and repaired [Stark et al., 2004] (Fig. 1B). These two processes depend on sequence homologies for the repair, but there are functional differences. The Rad51 and BRCA2 proteins are required for the homology-directed recombination (HDR) assay, but are not required for the SSA assay [Moynahan et al., 2001; Stark et al., 2004].  Figure 1 Figure 1 The double-strand DNA break (DSB) repair assay system. A: The HDR recombination substrate [Pierce et al. 2001] is diagrammed. The upstream GFP allele is defective because of the inclusion of an I-SceI site in its sequence. The downstream GFP allele is ... For each assay, we have established HeLa-derived cell lines with the published recombination substrate [Pierce et al., 2001; Stark et al., 2004] integrated in the genome at a single site. The HeLa-DR cell line assays HDR, and the HeLa–SSA cell line is used to assay SSA. The HDR and the SSA assays have a similar experimental design with a depletion of BRCA1 by transfection of a siRNA that is specific for the 3′-UTR of the BRCA1 mRNA. We cotransfect a BRCA1 expression plasmid that is not affected by the siRNA and which expresses the variant BRCA1 protein. After 2 days, we repeat the transfection and also transfect a plasmid that encodes the expression of the I-SceI endonuclease to generate the DSB in the presence of the variant BRCA1. After 3 days, we assay the cells for GFP expression by flow cytometry. The timeline of the experiment is shown in Figure 1C.  We have previously analyzed 16 variants of BRCA1 in a tissue-culture-cell-based assay for repair of DSBs via homologous recombination [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Using the HeLa-DR cell line developed by us, up to 20% of the cells convert to GFP positive. This high level of recombination enables the quantitative analysis of variants in BRCA1 in this process. The endogenous BRCA1 mRNA is depleted by siRNA targeting the 3′-UTR, and a BRCA1 variant that is resistant to the siRNA is simultaneously expressed from a plasmid [Parvin et al., 2011; Ransburgh, et al., 2010]. A quantitative measure of the function of the BRCA1 variant is determined from the percentage of cells that convert to GFP positive.  In this study, we first analyzed an additional 13 BRCA1 variants for function in HDR (Fig. 2). Twelve of the BRCA1 variants spanned amino acid residue 90 through 191 and were identified from the Breast Information Core (http://research.nhgri.nih.gov/bic/). These were expressed from the plasmid as full-length proteins. All 12 variants are listed in the BIC as having unknown phenotype with regard to predisposition to breast cancer. Several of these have been evaluated using a multifactorial classification system, and of these 12 variants, seven were nonpathogenic [Lindor et al., 2012]. These were chosen because the function of this domain was unknown and because many of these variants have been reported to be nonpathogenic. By testing the known nonpathogenic variants in this assay, we provide a specificity control for the functional test. The 13th variant tested is a known deleterious mutant in the carboxy terminus of the BRCA1 protein, M1775R. In these experiments, the percentage of cells that were GFP positive when transfected with the control siRNA and the control plasmid were set equal to 1%. All other results were normalized to this control, and all results were from three or more separate experiments. Depletion of BRCA1 and transfection with empty plasmid resulted in a value of 0.09 relative to the control (Fig. 2, lane 2). Thus, BRCA1 depletion has an over 10-fold effect reducing the level of homologous recombination. Depleting BRCA1 and transfecting a plasmid that expressed wild-type BRCA1 resulted in full restoration of homologous recombination (Fig. 2, lane 3). Among the variants with substitutions in residues from 90 to 191, all 12 functioned as wild type in the homologous recombination assay (Fig. 2, lanes 4–15) (P < 0.002 compared with depleted BRCA1). By contrast, the 13th tested missense substitution, a known pathogenic mutant BRCA1–M1775R, did not complement the depletion of BRCA1 in this assay (Fig. 2, lane 16) (Pv = 0.0014 compared with wild-type BRCA1).  Figure 2 Figure 2 Analysis of 13 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in the homology-directed repair assay. HeLa-DR cells were transfected with a siRNA that depleted the endogenous BRCA1 and with a plasmid that expressed the indicated BRCA1 variant. After generating a double-strand ... Function of 29 Variants of BRCA1 in the Repair of DNA Breaks by the SSA Pathway  The 16 BRCA1 variants that had previously been tested for function in homologous recombination [Ransburgh et al., 2010] and the 13 BRCA1 variants tested in this study (Fig. 2) were analyzed for function in SSA repair. The recombination substrate [Bennardo et al., 2008; Stark et al., 2004] was based on similar design as the homologous recombination substrate with the exception that restoration of GFP activity occurs when the two inactive GFP genes are repaired by SSA. HeLa cells were stably transfected with the SA–GFP construct, and a clone was selected that had no detectable background GFP signal. Upon transfection of the I-SceI-expressing plasmid, about 5–7% of cells became GFP positive, indicative of a functioning SSA pathway. Depletion of BRCA1 resulted in a decrease to about 1–2% GFP-positive cells (Fig. 3, lane 2), indicating a role for BRCA1 in the SSA repair pathway that had been previously observed [Stark et al., 2004]. Depletion of BRCA1 resulted in about 25% of the activity found in nondepleted cells. As had been observed with the homologous recombination assay, transfection of a plasmid expressing wild-type BRCA1 fully complemented the defect in SSA due to depletion of the endogenous BRCA1 (Fig. 3, lane 3). By contrast, depletion of endogenous BRCA1 and expression of a known pathogenic mutant of BRCA1, M1775R, was as defective in SSA as had been transfection of the empty vector (Fig. 3, lane 32). Similar to previous observations with the zinc-coordinating mutants of BRCA1, these residues were all required for SSA repair of double-strand breaks (Fig. 3, lanes: 6, 7, 10, 11, 13, 14, 16, and 17). As was found for the homologous recombination assay, the M18T variant and the T37R variant were defective for SSA repair. The L52F variant had reduced levels of SSA repair, approximately 69% of wild-type activity (Fig. 3, lane 15), although this value was not significantly different from wild type. The D67Y variant, a known nonpathogenic variant [Easton et al., 2007], was fully active in SSA repair (lane 18).  Figure 3 Figure 3 Analysis of 29 missense substitutions of BRCA1 in the SSA assay. HeLa–SSA cells were transfected as in Figure 2 with plasmids that express the 29 tested missense substitutions of BRCA1. Results of the fraction of cells that had converted to GFP ... Results diverged between the SSA and the homologous recombination assays for the variants in residues 90 through 191. The BRCA1–I90T variant functioned in the homologous recombination assay, but in the SSA assay, it was 47% as active as wild type (t-test for differing from wild-type P < 0.01; lane 20). The Y105C variant was statistically different from both wild-type BRCA1 and empty vector (indicated with both an asterisk and a cross; lane 21). This Y105C variant thus has intermediate phenotype, neither fully active nor fully defective. Similarly, the P142H, E143K, and the R170Q had intermediate phenotype (lanes 25, 26, and 28). The V191D variant was also defective for SSA repair (lane 31). Interestingly, the S153R and S186Y variants had diminished activity, but the change in activities was not statistically significant from the wild type. Thus, these variants were not scored as defective. Seven of the variants tested had assay-specific phenotypes, suggesting that how BRCA1 interacts with repair factors in the homologous recombination pathway is different from factors that BRCA1 binds in the SSA pathway.  When replacing the endogenous BRCA1 protein with a variant BRCA1, there is the concern that the expression levels be consistent with the levels of the endogenous in nondepleted cells. A defective phenotype could be masked by high levels of overexpression of the variant protein, or the phenotype of a functional protein might not be observed because of poor protein expression. The 16 variants with missense substitutions between residues 18 and 71 had been tested in HeLa-derived cells and the expression of each variant was similar to the endogenous in each case [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. For expression, we tested the missense substitutions between residues 90 and 191 and also residue 1775, and found that they all express approximately similarly as the endogenous BRCA1 (Fig. 4). Normalized results from densitometry analysis are presented beneath each lane. Protein from nontransfected cells and from control siRNA and empty vector transfected cells had similar amounts of BRCA1 protein (Fig. 4, lanes 1 and 2). Depletion of BRCA1 and add back with empty plasmid depleted the level of BRCA1 protein, which densitometry analysis indicated to be about 0.35 relative to the nontransfected cells (lane 3). All variants were detected at higher levels than the lysate from BRCA1-depleted cells. Some variants were expressed at higher levels than others, but at most 1.3-fold higher than the BRCA1 levels in nontransfected cells (compare, for example, lane 7 with lane 2). Because none of the BRCA1 variants were expressed at levels much higher than the endogenous BRCA1, in no case could the phenotype of a defective variant be masked by overexpression. The S186Y, V191D, and M1775R variants all had somewhat lower expression, but these lower levels of expression did not correlate with function in either homologous recombination or SSA repair. As an example, the S186Y variant was a low expresser (0.86 relative to control), but it was functional in both assays. We note that the M1775R mutant was expressed at lower levels (0.62 relative to endogenous BRCA1) than any other BRCA1 variant (lane 16). We interpret this level of expression to be similar to other variants and not an explanation for the defect in each double-strand break repair pathway. However, we cannot exclude the interpretation that the M1775R was defective in the DNA repair assays because there was lower BRCA1 expression of this isoform in our cells.  Figure 4 Figure 4 Analysis of the expression levels of 13 variants in HeLa–SSA cells. The expression levels of 16 previously tested BRCA1 substitution variants were tested in the HeLa-derived cell line [Ransburgh et al., 2010]. Thirteen variants, with substitutions ... Comparison of Variants in Different Assays  The 29 BRCA1 variants analyzed in this study were compared for function in the two DNA repair assays and with available knowledge about cancer association (Table 1). Many of the variants were consistent across the two assays, but there were several variants demonstrating separation of function. All of the zinc-coordinating residues were required for function in both repair assays. The M18T variant was clearly defective, but it is currently classified as unknown clinical significance. There is one genetic model that classified this M18T variant as likely pathogenic (see below).  Table 1 Table 1 Summary of BRCA1 Variants Benchmarking Function to Clinical Relevance  Recently, a new classification system for variants has been proposed [Lindor et al., 2012; Plon et al., 2008]. According to this system, Class 1 denotes variants that are not pathogenic. Class 2 is likely nonpathogenic. Class 3 is uncertain. Class 4 is likely pathogenic (probability of being pathogenic is 0.95–0.99), and Class 5 is definitely pathogenic (probability >0.99). According to variants described in the [Lindor et al. (2012)] system, three of the variants in this study (M18T, C61G, and M1775R) were of Class 4, either likely pathogenic or definitely pathogenic. An additional five mutants are treated clinically as Class 5, pathogenic, (C39Y, C44F, C47G, C64G, and R71G). One of these pathogenic mutants, R71G, does not affect the BRCA1 protein, but rather the splicing of the mRNA [Vega et al., 2001]. Since the assays tested express BRCA1 from spliced cDNA, the R71G defective phenotype would not be detected. We thus exclude this mutant from the comparison of benchmarking these assays against known mutants. There were then seven pathogenic mutants (Class 4 or 5) analyzed and eight nonpathogenic variants (Class 1; Table 1). When comparing the results of our functional analyses with these previously classified variants, the HDR assay scored all seven pathogenic or likely pathogenic mutants as defective, and all eight nonpathogenic variants as functional. The results of the assay were, in the case of every variant, either fully active or fully defective (see examples in Fig. 2). To date, no variant tested in the HDR assay produced an intermediate score.  Compared with these benchmarks, the variants tested in the SSA assay did not score as well as the HDR assay. All pathogenic mutants were defective for SSA repair of double-strand breaks, but one nonpathogenic variant (I124V) was defective for SSA, and three Class 1 variants had intermediate phenotype in the SSA assay. Although the HDR assay was both highly sensitive and highly specific, the SSA assay was highly sensitive at association with cancer risk, but it was less specific. Of interest, it had been noted that four BRCA1 variants, Y105C, P142H, E143K, and Y179C, had decreased accumulation at the sites of DNA breaks [Wei et al., 2008]. Although these variants were normal for HDR, three of these had intermediate levels of function in the SSA assay (Table 1). Perhaps there is a link between the accumulation of BRCA1 at DNA repair sites and a factor important for the SSA assay.  Go to: Discussion Functional Assays as Predictive Tools for Assessing BRCA1 Variants  In this study, we analyzed a total of 29 BRCA1 variants in the repair of DSBs by homologous recombination and by SSA. For the sake of this discussion, we exclude the BRCA1–R71G variant that affects splicing [Vega et al., 2001] because all of our assays used prespliced cDNAs and would not be sensitive to a splicing defect. By comparing our results with those BRCA1 missense substitutions that have a known effect on breast cancer predisposition, we found that the HDR assay was 100% accurate: seven previously classified pathogenic mutants were defective for HDR, and eight previously classified nonpathogenic variants in BRCA1 were functional for HDR. Further, the results for the HDR assay were either fully active or fully defective. We interpret these results to indicate that the HDR assay is validated as a predictive tool for assessing BRCA1 variants.  By contrast to the HDR assay, the function of BRCA1 variants in the repair of DSBs by SSA had a number of differences that diminished the accuracy of this assay. On the basis of the benchmarks of variants that were classified using a genetic model [Lindor et al., 2012], the SSA assay was sensitive because it did not misclassify any pathogenic variants, but it was not specific because it misclassified several nonpathogenic variants as either intermediate or defective. Interpretation of the SSA assay was also complicated by intermediate results; by comparison, the HDR assay had no intermediate results among the 29 variants tested. It is possible, but remains to be determined, whether missense variants that are proficient for HDR, but deficient or intermediate for SSA, confer a lower or moderate risk of cancer. We thus conclude that the HDR assay is a more reliable predictive tool for assessing the function of BRCA1 variants than is the SSA assay.  We had previously performed a similar analysis of the control of centrosome duplication by BRCA1 variant proteins [Kais et al., 2012]. Fewer variants of the BRCA1 protein were analyzed in this earlier study using the centrosome assay, but it has several differences from the HDR assay. With regard to those variants with inferred breast cancer association, the centrosome duplication assay had an intermediate result for the BRCA1–D67Y variant, which is nonpathogenic. The T37R variant was defective for both DNA repair assays, but was functional in control of the centrosome duplication. Five amino acid residues away, the I42V variant had the opposite pattern as T37R, with defective centrosome control but fully functional in both DNA repair assays. Experimentally, the centrosome regulation assay is much more difficult to perform than the HDR assay, making it not as desirable an assay for analysis of BRCA1 variants. In addition, the centrosome assay appears, based on the limited set of variants, to be less accurate than the HDR assay. On the contrary, like the SSA, none of the tested seven variants that were previously classified as Class 4 or 5, were functional in the centrosomal assay, suggesting that this assay is sensitive.  It will be necessary to analyze many more variants in the HDR assay and then compare those results with the clinical experiences before this assay can be used for clinical interpretation. On the basis of the accuracy of the currently tested variants, we believe that the HDR assay will help with difficult to classify variants of unknown significance.  Functional Assays for Probing BRCA1 Residues Important in Biological Function  Separate from the clinical utility of the different functional tests, important biological information about the BRCA1 protein is available from the various functional assays. Very little structure–function information exists for BRCA1, and there have been limited systematic analyses of the effects of BRCA1 amino acid variants in a given function. A variety of variants have been analyzed in the context of short BRCA1 amino-terminal truncations for ubiquitin ligase activity [Morris et al., 2006]. In a similar vein, a variety of variants in the context of a short BRCA1 carboxy-terminal fragment have been analyzed for the activation of transcription [Carvalho et al., 2007; Lee et al., 2010]. Several variants in the context of the full-length protein have been analyzed in terms of resistance to ionizing radiation [Ruffner et al., 2001] and reversal of a lethal phenotype in murine embryonic stem cells [Chang et al., 2009].  We find that there are some discordancies between functional assays of the variants. The most striking are at T37R and I42V. BRCA1–T37R was defective for both DNA repair processes, but was fully functional for control of centrosomes. Conversely, BRCA1–I42V was defective for control of centrosome duplication [Kais et al., 2012] but functional in the DNA repair processes. From this result, we hypothesize that the protein–BRCA1 contacts in the DNA repair pathways depend on the T37 residue, whereas a different protein–BRCA1 contact is important for regulating the centrosome duplication. Such a notion is possible because the centrosome regulation occurs in the cytoplasm and the DNA repair occurs in the nucleus, and it is reasonable to suppose that different proteins are involved.  There were variants that distinguished between BRCA1 residues important for DSB repair by homologous recombination versus SSA. The observed differences between the SSA and HDR assays involved residues from 90 to 191. Several of these (Y105C, P142H, and E143K) that had intermediate phenotype in the SSA assay had been shown to have slow accumulation at sites of DSBs. Especially, P142H mutation abolished the association with Ku80 protein, which plays an important role in the repair of DSBs [Wei et al., 2008]. Perhaps the SSA pathway contributes to the accumulation of BRCA1 at sites of DNA damage in cells.  In summary, in this study, we evaluated missense variants of BRCA1 in two different DNA repair pathways. Data support that the function of BRCA1 in the HDR assay is consistent with the known cancer association of these variants, and we suggest that this test is predictive for breast cancer. By contrast, the repair of DNA by the related SSA pathway is not perfectly consistent with what is known about cancer predisposition, and the SSA assay yields intermediate results. On the basis of these current results, we suggest that the HDR assay is validated for predicting whether substitution at any residue of BRCA1 is disease associated.  
2727||Recently, mutations in the B-Raf gene have been identified in a variety of human cancers, such as melanoma and colorectal carcinoma, and more than 80% of the B-Raf mutations have been V599E. Although other mutations have been reported, their functional consequences are poorly understood. In our earlier study, we demonstrated that colon tumor-associated B-Raf mutations within the kinase activation segment are not necessarily associated with an increase in mitogen-activated protein/extracellular signal-regulated kinase kinase/extracellular signal-regulated kinase (MEK/Erk) or nuclear factor κB (NFκB) signaling activity or in NIH3T3-transforming ability [T. Ikenoue et al., Cancer Res., 63: 8132–8137, 2003]. In this study, we examined the effect of colon tumor-associated mutations within the B-Raf glycine-rich loop (G loop) on MEK/Erk and NFκB signaling and on the transformation of NIH3T3 fibroblasts or IEC-6 intestinal epithelial cells. Of the six G loop mutations examined, only the B-Raf G468A significantly increased MEK/Erk and NFκB signaling and NIH3T3 transformation. Only this mutation induced transformed phenotypes of IEC-6 cells. In contrast, the B-Raf G468E mutation significantly decreased MEK/Erk signaling and NIH3T3 transformation and had no effect on NFκB signaling. The B-Raf F467C mutation moderately elevated MEK/Erk signaling and NIH3T3 transformation. The other three B-Raf mutations, R461I, I462S, and G463E, did not increase MEK/Erk or NFκB signaling or NIH3T3 transformation. Except for F467C, none of the tumors with B-Raf mutations examined in this study had K-Ras mutations. These results suggest that some of the B-Raf G loop mutations reported in colorectal tumors do not increase kinase or transforming activities but might contribute to carcinogenesis via other mechanisms or be irrelevant to carcinogenesis.  INTRODUCTION  The Raf serine/threonine kinases are key signal transducers in the Ras/Raf/mitogen-activated protein/extracellular signal-regulated kinase (Erk) kinase (MEK)/Erk cascade, which regulates a variety of physiological processes, including cell growth, differentiation, and apoptosis (1, 2, 3, 4) . The Raf kinases are also involved in nuclear factor κB (NFκB) signaling, which plays important roles in distinct cellular functions, such as immune responses, inflammation, cell proliferation, and apoptosis (5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11) . Activation of the NFκB signaling pathway is reported to be critical for cellular transformation by Raf (9 , 10) .  Activation of the Ras/Raf/MEK/Erk pathway by Ras mutations is commonly observed in human cancers. B-Raf, which is a human Raf isoform, is reportedly mutated in a high proportion of melanomas and in a small proportion of other cancers (12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26) . B-Raf mutations are restricted to two regions of the B-Raf kinase domain: the glycine-rich loop (G loop) and the kinase activation segment. More than 80% of the reported B-Raf mutations were T to A transversions at nucleotide 1796, which results in a substitution of glutamic acid for valine at codon 599 (V599E) in the kinase activation segment. Approximately 10% of the colon cancer-associated B-Raf mutations have been found in the G loop (13 , 14) .  The G loop, with the consensus sequence GXGXXG, is located in the first of the 12 subdomains of the catalytic domain and is a highly conserved protein kinase motif (27) . The three glycine residues of the motif are conserved in most of the known human kinases. The G loop is a part of a β-strand-loop-β-strand nucleotide-positioning motif with a critical role in ATP binding. This motif covers and anchors the ATP, shielding it from solvents (27) . The previously described mutations in any of the conserved glycines generally lead to a reduction in kinase activity and are responsible for enzymatic defects that lead to human diseases. For example, a form of diabetes, in which the third glycine in the G loop of the insulin receptor kinase is substituted by valine, leads to insulin resistance (28) . In contrast, the Raf-1 mutant G361S, in which the third glycine of the GXGXXG motif is replaced by serine, has recently been shown to possess higher catalytic activity than the wild-type Raf-1 (29) .  Of the G loop mutants that have been detected in human cancer, only two, G463V and G468A, have been examined with respect to their functional consequences; the replacement of these conserved glycine residues was found to increase B-Raf kinase activity (12) . In three other colon tumor-related G loop mutations, i.e., R461I, I462S, and F467C, the residues adjacent to the conserved glycines, not the glycines themselves, are mutated (13 , 14) .  In a previous study, we revealed that some of the B-Raf mutations within the kinase activation segment do not activate MEK/Erk or NFκB signaling or NIH3T3 transformation (30) . In the present study, we analyzed the functional consequences of colon cancer-associated mutations in the G loop of B-Raf, and we demonstrate that they do not necessarily activate MEK/Erk or NFκB signaling pathways or increase transforming ability.  MATERIALS AND METHODS  Plasmids.  The expression vectors for FLAG-tagged wild-type B-Raf and the B-Raf V599E mutant, constitutively active MEK kinase, dominant-negative inhibitor of nuclear factor-κB α (IκBα), the wild-type and dominant-negative IκB kinase (IKK) α or β, the NFκB-inducible reporter, and the Renilla luciferase control vector have been described previously (30) . Hemagglutinin-tagged wild-type B-Raf expression vector, pcDNA3-HA-B-Raf, was kindly provided by Dr. Anne Vojtek (University of Michigan, Ann Arbor, MI). The B-Raf G loop mutant constructs found in colorectal tumors (R461I, I462S, G463E, F467C, G468E, and G468A; Refs. 12, 13, 14, 15, 16 ) and B-Raf K482M, which is considered a kinase-dead mutant, were created by oligonucleotide-directed mutagenesis as described previously (30) . To create dominant-negative B-Raf, the cDNA fragment encoding amino acids 1–442 of B-Raf was amplified by PCR and subcloned into the pcDNA3-HA vector. To create bacterially expressed glutathione S-transferase (GST) fusion IκBα (2–54) expression vector pGEX-IκBα (2–54), the cDNA fragment encoding amino acids 2–54 of IκBα was amplified by PCR and subcloned into the pGEX-2T vector (Amersham Biosciences, Buckinghamshire, United Kingdom). The constitutively active H-Ras expression vector pCMV-Ras V12 was purchased from Clontech (Palo Alto, CA). The pFA-Elk1 encoding the DNA-binding domain of yeast Gal4 fused to the activation domain of Elk1 and the pFR-luc, in which a promoter containing Gal4-binding sites controls the luciferase expression, were purchased from Stratagene (La Jolla, CA).  Cell Culture and Transfection.  COS7 and NIH3T3 cells were cultured and transfected as described previously (30) . IEC-6 cells were obtained from the RIKEN Cell Bank (Tsukuba, Japan) and cultured in DMEM containing 5% fetal bovine serum and 4 μg/ml insulin.  To generate NIH3T3 and IEC-6 cells stably expressing the FLAG-B-Raf wild type or mutants, cells were maintained in growth medium containing 400 μg/ml Geneticin (Invitrogen, Carlsbad, CA). Multiple Geneticin-resistant colonies were then pooled together (>50 colonies) for use for proliferation and soft agar assays as described previously (31) .  In Vitro Kinase Assay.  The B-Raf activity assays were performed as described previously (30) . In brief, COS7 cells were transfected with the FLAG-B-Raf constructs in the presence or absence of H-Ras V12. Three h after transfection, the cells were transferred to medium containing 0.1% serum and cultured for an additional 24 h. The cells were lysed in radioimmunoprecipitation assay buffer. FLAG-B-Raf was immunoprecipitated using anti-FLAG M2 affinity gel (Sigma, St. Louis, MO) and assayed with the B-Raf kinase cascade assay (Upstate Biotechnology, Lake Placid, NY), using GST-MEK1, GST-Erk2, and myelin basic protein as sequential substrates, according to the manufacturer’s protocol.  For the IKKβ kinase assay, NIH3T3 cells in 6-well plates were transfected with the indicated amount of the FLAG-B-Raf G468A mutant, constitutively active MEK kinase, or empty vector in the presence of wild-type IKKβ expression vector (0.5 μg). IKKβ was immunoprecipitated using the protein A/G agarose (Santa Cruz Biotechnology, Santa Cruz, CA) and anti-IKKβ polyclonal antibody (H-470; Santa Cruz Biotechnology). The immunoprecipitated IKKβ complex was added to a mixture that contained 2 μg of GST-IκBα (2–54) and 10 μCi of [γ-32P]ATP in kinase assay buffer [20 mm 4-morpholinepropanesulfonic acid (pH 7.2), 25 mm β-glycerol phosphate, 15 mm MgCl2, 5 mm EGTA, 1 mm sodium vanadate, 1 mm DTT, and 100 μm ATP], and the mixture was incubated for 20 min at 30°C. The samples were then subjected to SDS-PAGE and then detected with the GS-525 Molecular Imager using Screen-CH (Bio-Rad, Hercules, CA).  Erk Activation Assay.  The Erk activation assay was performed as described previously (30) . In brief, COS7 cells in 6-well plates were transfected with FLAG-B-Raf constructs, oncogenic H-Ras, or empty vector. The cells were further cultured for 24 h in medium containing 0.1% fetal bovine serum. The cell lysates were then analyzed using SDS-PAGE and immunoblotted using anti-phospho-p44/42 mitogen-activated protein kinase and anti-p44/42 mitogen-activated protein kinase antibodies (Cell Signaling Technology, Beverly, MA).  Luciferase Reporter Assay.  For the Elk1-dependent luciferase reporter assay, COS7 or IEC-6 cells in 12-well plates were cotransfected with 0.03 μg of pFA-Elk1, 0.3 μg of pFR-luc, 0.05 μg of pRL-TK, and 0.5 μg of the wild-type or mutant FLAG-B-Raf constructs or 0.05 μg of H-Ras V12. The NFκB-dependent luciferase reporter assay was performed as described previously (30) . NIH3T3 cells were cotransfected with pNFκB-luc, pRL-TK, and the wild-type or mutant FLAG-B-Raf constructs. To examine the effects of the dominant-negative mutants IκBα, IKKα, or IKKβ on B-Raf-induced NFκB-dependent transcription, NIH3T3 cells were cotransfected with pNFκB Luc, pRL-TK, B-Raf mutants, and dominant-negative vectors.  Focus Formation Assay.  The focus-formation assay was performed as described previously (30) . In brief, the cells in 10-cm dishes were transfected with 0.5 μg (NIH3T3) or 5.0 μg (IEC-6) of empty vector, FLAG-B-Raf constructs, or H-Ras V12 expression vector, cultured in DMEM containing 5% serum, and stained with crystal violet 14 (NIH3T3) or 21 (IEC-6) days later, and the number of transformed foci was counted.  3-(4,5-Dimethylthiazol-2-yl)-2,5-Diphenyl Tetrazolium Bromide (MTT) Assay.  NIH3T3 cells stably expressing FLAG-B-Raf constructs were seeded in 96-well plates at a density of 1 × 103 cells/well and grown in medium containing 1% calf serum. One, 4, and 7 days after seeding, MTT solution (Sigma) was added at 0.5 mg/ml, and after an additional 4-h incubation, 100 μl of isopropanol containing 0.04 n HCl was added to extract the reduced formazan product. The reduction of MTT was quantified by measuring the absorbance at 570 nm.  Soft Agar Assay.  NIH3T3 cells stably expressing FLAG-B-Raf constructs were trypsinized, suspended in medium containing 0.3% agar and 10% calf serum, and plated onto a bottom layer containing 0.6% agar. The cells were plated at a density of 3 × 104 cells/6-cm dish, and the number of colonies >0.5 mm in diameter was counted 14 days later.  RESULTS  In Vitro Kinase Activities of B-Raf G Loop Mutants.  In this study, we analyzed the biological effects of B-Raf mutations within the G loop that have been previously reported in colorectal cancer cases (Fig. 1) ⇓ . As listed in Table 1 ⇓ , the wild-type K-Ras gene was present in all of the tumors with B-Raf mutations except F467C. Both the B-Raf G468A mutation, which was reported in a colorectal polyp as well as in lung and oropharynx cancers (12 , 15 , 26) , and the B-Raf V599E mutation, which is the mutation that is most commonly found in human cancers (12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26) , have been reported to constitutively activate the MEK/Erk signaling pathway (12) .  Fig. 1. Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Fig. 1. Alignment of amino acid sequences surrounding the G loop of human B-Raf, Raf-1, A-Raf, protein kinase A (PKA), insulin receptor kinase (InsR), phosphorylase kinase (PhK), and atypical protein kinase C-ι (aPKC-ι). Arrows indicate the B-Raf mutants examined in this study. The conserved GXGXXG motif is boxed. The third glycine of the G loop is naturally replaced by serine in PhK and by alanine in aPKC-ι, respectively. View inlineView popup Table 1 B-Raf G loop mutations, their basal kinase activities, and K-Ras status of the colon tumors examined in this study First, we examined whether individual B-Raf mutants could activate the MEK/Erk signaling cascade using the in vitro-coupled B-Raf kinase assay (Fig. 2) ⇓ . Consistent with a previous report (12) , both the B-Raf V599E and G468A mutants showed high basal kinase activities (6.3- and 7.2-fold increases, respectively, compared with the wild type). B-Raf F467C had moderately high basal kinase activity (2.5 times that of the wild type); the B-Raf R461I, I462S, and G463E mutants had basal kinase activities that were not higher than the wild-type B-Raf activity (0.89-, 0.82-, and 0.77-fold increases, respectively, versus the wild type). In contrast to the B-Raf G468A mutant, the B-Raf G468E mutant showed reduced basal kinase activity (0.24 times that of the wild type), although the activity was higher than that of kinase-dead B-Raf, B-Raf K482M.  Fig. 2. Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Fig. 2. In vitro kinase activities of the B-Raf G loop mutants. FLAG-tagged B-Raf wild type (WT), G loop mutants, and kinase-dead mutant were transiently transfected in COS7 cells alone or with oncogenic H-Ras. After 24 h, the activity of immunoprecipitated B-Raf was measured by a kinase cascade assay. Results are mean ± SD from at least three independent experiments. Moreover, as shown in Fig. 2 ⇓ , oncogenic H-Ras increased the kinase activity of the wild-type B-Raf 6.2-fold. The B-Raf mutants were stimulated to different degrees by oncogenic H-Ras, but the fold-activation levels of the individual G loop mutants examined were not higher than that of the wild type (1.5–6.1-fold; Fig. 2 ⇓ ), which was not the case for B-Raf K482M.  Effects of B-Raf G Loop Mutants on Erk Activation.  Next, we examined whether the B-Raf G loop mutants activate the MEK/Erk cascade in vivo. COS7 cells were transfected with wild-type or B-Raf mutant constructs, and the Erk activities were determined by immunoblotting using phosphospecific Erk antibody. As expected, the Erk activity was elevated in cells expressing B-Raf G468A and F467C and was comparable with that in H-Ras V12-expressing cells, whereas the Erk activity was not increased significantly in the other G loop mutants compared with wild-type B-Raf (Fig. 3A) ⇓ .  Fig. 3. Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Fig. 3. Erk activation induced by the B-Raf G loop mutants. A, COS7 cells were transfected with the empty vector, wild-type B-Raf (WT), various mutants, or oncogenic H-Ras. After 48 h, the cell lysates were analyzed on immunoblots using anti-phosphospecific Erk1/2, Erk1/2, and FLAG antibodies. B, COS7 cells were transfected with pFA-Elk1, pFR-luc, and either the empty vector, wild-type B-Raf, B-Raf G468E, or dominant-negative B-Raf (N-B-Raf) in the presence of oncogenic H-Ras. C, IEC-6 cells were transfected with pFA-Elk1, pFR-luc, and the empty vector, wild-type B-Raf, various mutants, or oncogenic H-Ras. After 24 h, the dual luciferase assay was performed. The results are mean ± SD from three independent experiments. Then we assessed whether the B-Raf G468E mutant acts as dominant negative and inhibits Ras-induced Erk activation by the Elk1-dependent reporter assay. When the cells were cotransfected with the H-Ras V12 and wild-type B-Raf, the Elk1-dependent reporter activity was increased further (Fig. 3B) ⇓ . Cotransfection of dominant-negative B-Raf strongly inhibited H-Ras V12-induced reporter activity, whereas cotransfection of the B-Raf G468E did not significantly decrease the H-Ras V12-induced reporter activity, indicating that this mutant does not have a dominant-negative effect (Fig. 3B) ⇓ .  We also assessed whether the B-Raf G loop mutants also activate the MEK/Erk cascade in intestinal cells by measuring the Elk1-dependent transcriptional activity. As shown in Fig. 3C ⇓ , only B-Raf G468A showed significantly elevated Elk1-dependent reporter activity in IEC-6 cells, whereas the other B-Raf G loop mutants did not.  These results indicate that the B-Raf G loop mutants reported in colorectal tumors do not necessarily elevate MEK/Erk signaling activity, as compared with wild-type B-Raf.  Effects of B-Raf G Loop Mutants on NFκB-Dependent Transcription.  Because activation of NFκB signaling pathway is reported to be critical for Raf-induced transformation (9 , 10) , we then examined whether colon cancer-associated B-Raf G loop mutants activate the NFκB pathway using the luciferase reporter assay. The NFκB-inducible reporter activity was elevated slightly by transfection with the wild-type B-Raf (1.2-fold compared with the empty vector; Fig. 4A ⇓ ). The positive control B-Raf V599E increased NFκB reporter activity more than the wild type did (4.8-fold compared with wild-type B-Raf). Of the G loop mutants examined in this study, only B-Raf G468A strongly induced NFκB reporter activity (4.1-fold compared with the wild type). The other G loop mutants did not significantly increase NFκB reporter activity compared with wild-type B-Raf (0.95–1.5 times that of the wild-type B-Raf; Fig. 4A ⇓ ).  Fig. 4. Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Fig. 4. Activation of NFκB-dependent transcription by the B-Raf G loop mutants. A, NIH3T3 cells were transiently transfected with the NFκB reporter construct (pNFκB-Luc) together with empty vector, wild-type B-Raf (WT), or various mutants. B, NIH3T3 cells were transiently transfected with pNFκB-luc and B-Raf G468A or V599E mutants together with the indicated amounts of a dominant-negative IκBα expression vector (IκBα SS32/36AA). After 24 h, dual luciferase assay was performed. The results are mean ± SD from three independent experiments. NFκB is regulated by inhibitor proteins, IκBs, which reside in the cytoplasm. To examine the specificity of the reporter construct, cotransfection of the B-Raf G468A mutant with the dominant-negative form of IκBα, IκBα SS32/36AA, was performed. The B-Raf G468A-induced NFκB reporter activity was completely blocked by the dominant-negative IκBα (Fig. 4B) ⇓ . These results indicate that some B-Raf G loop mutants can activate NFκB signaling.  Activation of IKKβ by B-Raf G Loop Mutants.  The signal-induced phosphorylation of the IκBs by IKKα and IKKβ and their subsequent degradation by ubiquitination-dependent processes are required for NFκB activation (5, 6, 7) . Next, we examined whether the G loop mutant G468A could activate NFκB signaling through IKKβ, as did the B-Raf V599E and K600E activation segment mutants, examined in our previous study (30) . As shown in Fig. 5A ⇓ , the B-Raf G468A-induced NFκB reporter activity was completely blocked by the dominant-negative form of IKKβ, but only partially blocked by that of IKKα. Furthermore, coexpression of wild-type IKKβ, but not IKKα, with the B-Raf G468A mutant further induced NFκB reporter activity (Fig. 5A) ⇓ .  Fig. 5. Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Fig. 5. Involvement of IKKβ in the activation of NFκB signaling induced by the B-Raf G loop mutants. A, NIH3T3 cells were transiently transfected with pNFκB-luc and B-Raf G468A mutant together with the indicated amounts of a dominant-negative IKKα or IKKβ expression vector. After 24 h, the dual luciferase assay was performed. The results are mean ± SD from three independent experiments. WT, wild-type. B, NIH3T3 cells were transiently transfected with the indicated amounts of B-Raf G468A mutant, constitutively active MEK kinase, or empty vector in the presence of the wild-type IKKβ expression vector. The kinase activity of immunoprecipitated IKKβ was determined using GST-IκBα (2–54) as a substrate. In the bottom panel, immunoblot analysis was performed with anti-FLAG M2 antibody. The ability of the B-Raf G468A mutant to induce IKKβ activation was then determined using in vitro kinase assays, with GST-IκBα (2–54) as the substrate. As shown in Fig. 5B ⇓ , the B-Raf G468A mutant increased IKKβ kinase activity in a dose-dependent manner; B-Raf V599E also increased the kinase activity of IKKβ (data not shown). These results suggest that the B-Raf G468A mutant activates NFκB signaling pathway primarily through IKKβ.  Morphologically Transforming Activities of B-Raf G Loop Mutants.  We then examined the transforming ability of each B-Raf G loop mutant. The morphology of NIH3T3 fibroblasts stably expressing wild-type or mutant FLAG-B-Raf is shown in Fig. 6A ⇓ . The cells expressing B-Raf G468A and F467C were more refractile and less flattened, constituting typical morphological changes of transformed cells. In contrast, the NIH3T3 cells expressing the other G loop mutants or wild-type B-Raf were unlikely to be morphologically transformed. Oncogenic H-Ras displayed morphological changes not only in NIH3T3 fibroblasts but also in IEC-6 intestinal epithelial cells.  Fig. 6. Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Fig. 6. Morphological transforming ability of B-Raf G loop mutants. A, the morphology of NIH3T3 cells stably expressing empty vector, wild-type B-Raf (WT), B-Raf F467C, G468E, G468A mutants, or H-Ras V12. B, the morphology of IEC-6 cells stably expressing wild-type B-Raf, B-Raf G468A mutant, or H-Ras V12. Some Geneticin-resistant clones of IEC-6 cells expressing the G468A mutant induced morphological changes that were easily distinguishable from the cells expressing empty vector and wild-type B-Raf (Fig. 6B) ⇓ . However, there were far fewer colonies of G468A-expressing IEC-6 cells that were morphologically transformed than there were those of oncogenic-Ras-expressing cells. The other G loop mutants expressing IEC-6 cells did not show any morphological changes (data not shown).  Loss of Contact Inhibition Induced by B-Raf G Loop Mutants.  Next, we quantified the transforming ability of the B-Raf mutants. First, we performed a focus-formation assay to test for loss of contact inhibition. Wild-type B-Raf induced a small number of foci in the subline of NIH3T3 cells used for the focus formation assay as described previously (30) . The B-Raf G468A mutant induced approximately 28 times more foci than did the wild-type B-Raf (Fig. 7A) ⇓ ; this was comparable with the results with the B-Raf V599E mutant. The B-Raf F467C mutant induced 5.8-fold more foci than did wild-type B-Raf. The B-Raf G468E mutant induced no foci in this study. The other three G loop mutants, R461I, I462S, and G463E, induced only a small number of foci (Fig. 7A) ⇓ , which was similar to the number of foci produced by the wild type.  Fig. 7. Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Fig. 7. Focus-forming ability of B-Raf with G loop mutations. A, NIH3T3 cells were transfected with constructs expressing the indicated proteins. After a 14-day incubation in 5% serum, foci of morphologically transformed cells were counted by microscopic observation. Relative focus-forming activity was determined from mean ± SD of three independent experiments. B, appearance of transformed foci in IEC-6 cells expressing wild-type B-Raf (WT), B-Raf G468A mutant, or H-Ras V12 was detected 21 days after transfection. C, representative dishes were stained with crystal violet to visualize transformed foci. Of the G loop mutants, only the G468A mutant induced transformed foci in IEC-6 epithelial cells; however, the number of foci was much less than that induced by oncogenic H-Ras (Fig. 7, B and C) ⇓ .  Proliferation Abilities Induced by B-Raf G Loop Mutants under Low-Serum Conditions.  Next, we examined the proliferation ability of the cells stably expressing wild type or each mutant B-Raf under low-serum conditions. Cells expressing each B-Raf construct were seeded and grown in 1% serum, and cell proliferation was analyzed using MTT assays 1, 4, and 7 days later. Of the NIH3T3 cells expressing the B-Raf G loop mutants, the cells expressing B-Raf G468A and F467C mutants showed significantly increased proliferation rates, as compared with the cells expressing wild-type B-Raf (Fig. 8) ⇓ . By contrast, the cells expressing other B-Raf G loop mutants showed no increase in proliferation rates.  Fig. 8. Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Fig. 8. Proliferation activity of B-Raf G loop mutants. NIH3T3 cells stably expressing empty vector, wild-type B-Raf (WT), B-Raf with G loop mutations, or H-Ras V12 were grown in low serum (1% calf serum) medium. Cell proliferation was analyzed using MTT assays 1, 4, and 7 days after seeding. Relative MTT reduction over wild-type B-Raf was shown from the representative data from three independent experiments, in which triplicate samples were measured. We also examined the proliferation ability of the IEC-6 cells expressing each G loop mutant in low-serum medium. However, the cells expressing each B-Raf mutant did not have a significantly increased proliferation rate, as compared with the cells expressing wild-type B-Raf (data not shown).  Anchorage-Independent Growth Induced by B-Raf G Loop Mutants.  Finally, we used a soft agar assay to examine the effects of the B-Raf G loop mutants on anchorage-independent growth. The B-Raf G468A mutant-expressing NIH3T3 cells had the highest colony-forming activity (14.6 times that of wild-type B-Raf); this was comparable with that of the V599E-expressing cells (Fig. 9, A and B) ⇓ . The F467C mutant showed moderately increased colony formation ability (3.2 times that of wild-type B-Raf). The other B-Raf mutants did not show significantly elevated colony-forming activity in NIH3T3 cells, as compared with the wild type (Fig. 9B) ⇓ .  Fig. 9. Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Fig. 9. Anchorage-independent growth induced by B-Raf G loop mutants. A, appearance of transformed colonies of the NIH3T3 cells stably expressing empty vector, wild-type B-Raf (WT), B-Raf F467C, or G468A mutants in soft agar. B, colonies of NIH3T3 cells expressing the indicated proteins were counted 14 days after seeding. Relative colony-forming activity was determined from mean ± SD of three independent experiments. C, appearance of colonies of the IEC-6 cells stably expressing wild-type B-Raf, B-Raf G468A mutant, or H-Ras V12 in soft agar. As shown in Fig. 9C ⇓ , the IEC-6 cells expressing oncogenic H-Ras induced a large number of colonies in soft agar. Of the G loop mutants expressing IEC-6 cells, only the G468A-expressing cells induced a considerable number of colonies in soft agar (Fig. 9C) ⇓ ; however, there were fewer colonies than induced by oncogenic-Ras-expressing cells. By contrast, the IEC cells expressing the other G loop mutants induced no colonies in soft agar (data not shown).  Ultimately, several transformation assays showed that the G468A and F467C mutations rendered B-Raf transforming, as compared with the wild type in NIH3T3 fibroblasts, whereas only the former had that effect in IEC-6 intestinal epithelial cells. Moreover, the IEC-6 transforming activity of the B-Raf G468A mutant was modest compared with that of oncogenic H-Ras. Conversely, the other B-Raf G loop mutations examined in this study did not increase the transforming activity in either NIH3T3 or IEC-6 cells.  DISCUSSION  In our earlier study, we analyzed the functional consequences of B-Raf mutations within the kinase activation segment (30) . Although several types of non-V599E mutations have been reported, they do not necessarily increase kinase activity or NIH3T3 transformation (30) . In this study, we analyzed the association between mutations within the G loop of B-Raf that have been identified in colorectal tumors and the up-regulation of B-Raf kinase activity and transforming ability. Two of the B-Raf G loop mutations found in colorectal tumors, G463V and G468A, were analyzed in the previous study and were found to have high basal kinase activities, as compared with the wild-type B-Raf, according to the in vitro B-Raf kinase cascade assay. In addition, both mutants had much higher NIH3T3 focus-forming activities than the wild-type B-Raf (12) .  In this study, the basal kinase activity of the B-Raf V599E mutant, which is the most common mutation in human cancers, was 6.2-fold higher than that of wild-type B-Raf. Three of the G loop mutants examined in this study, B-Raf G463E, G468E, and G468A, had mutations in conserved glycine residues. Intriguingly, the B-Raf G468E mutant had reduced basal kinase activity in the MEK/Erk pathway; it did not up-regulate NFκB-dependent transcription, and it did not exhibit increased NIH3T3 focus-forming activity. This mutant contrasts with the B-Raf G468A mutant, which strongly activated MEK/Erk and NFκB signaling and increased NIH3T3 transformation.  The G loop forms a β-hairpin, which is thought to act as a highly flexible molecular lid that anchors ATP and shields it from water. The three glycines in the G loop are among the most highly conserved residues in the protein kinase family. The first, second, and third G are reportedly conserved in 94.4, 99.8, and 84.7% of known protein kinases, respectively (32) . Although the third glycine is the least conserved, greater than 99% of all protein kinases have a small amino acid (G, A, or S) at this position. A truncated form of phosphorylase kinase, which naturally has a serine at the third position, maintained the same activity when the S was replaced with G (Fig. 1 ⇓ ; Ref. 33 ); the atypical protein kinase C-ι naturally contains an A residue instead of the third G (Fig. 1 ⇓ ; Ref. 34 ). Furthermore, the Raf-1 mutant G361S, in which the third glycine of the G loop is replaced by serine, has recently been shown to possess a level of catalytic activity that is higher than that of the wild-type Raf-1 (29) . In contrast, a mutant form of the insulin receptor kinase, in which V replaces the third G, showed a 90% decrease in kinase activity (28) . These facts indicate that residues larger than S cannot maintain the β-hairpin conformation of the phosphate-binding loop that is necessary for the avoidance of steric interference with ATP binding. This is consistent with our finding that replacement of the third G by E in the B-Raf G loop decreases enzymatic activity, whereas the replacement of the third G by A increases enzymatic activity.  In the B-Raf G463E mutant, the first G of the G loop is affected. Based on studies of the PKA catalytic subunit, the first G is thought to be in direct contact with the ribose ring of ATP. Although the first G in the G loop is reportedly more highly conserved than the third G, it is naturally replaced by a larger residue than A or S in approximately 3% of human protein kinases (33) . The substitution of the first G with A or S has been reported to decrease PKA kinase activity (32) . In this study, the B-Raf G463E mutant showed slightly decreased kinase activity. In contrast, the B-Raf G463V mutant has been reported to have increased enzymatic activity (12) . Therefore, the mutation of the first G residue does not seem to have equivalent effects on the catalytic activity of protein kinases.  In the three other B-Raf mutants (R461I, I462S, and F467C), residues adjacent to the conserved G, but not the G residues themselves, were affected. The B-Raf R461I and I462S mutants did not up-regulate MEK/Erk or NFκB signaling or NIH3T3 transformation as compared with the wild-type B-Raf; the B-Raf F467C mutant showed moderate up-regulation. These results indicate that colon cancer-associated mutations of the residues adjacent to the conserved Gs of B-Raf have different effects on enzymatic activity. Additional studies on the structure of the B-Raf catalytic domain are needed to elucidate the mechanisms of these effects.  Of the B-Raf G loop mutations in this study, only the G468A mutation that showed greatly elevated kinase activity and NIH3T3-transforming ability was able to induce morphological changes and generated some foci in IEC-6 intestinal epithelial cells. Furthermore, the G468A-expressing IEC-6 cells induced a considerable number of colonies in soft agar. These results contrast with a previous report, which indicated that both c Over 30 mutations of the B-RAF gene associated with human cancers have been identified, the majority of which are located within the kinase domain. Here we show that of 22 B-RAF mutants analyzed, 18 have elevated kinase activity and signal to ERK in vivo. Surprisingly, three mutants have reduced kinase activity towards MEK in vitro but, by activating C-RAF in vivo, signal to ERK in cells. The structures of wild type and oncogenic V599EB-RAF kinase domains in complex with the RAF inhibitor BAY43-9006 show that the activation segment is held in an inactive conformation by association with the P loop. The clustering of most mutations to these two regions suggests that disruption of this interaction converts B-RAF into its active conformation. The high activity mutants signal to ERK by directly phosphorylating MEK, whereas the impaired activity mutants stimulate MEK by activating endogenous C-RAF, possibly via an allosteric or transphosphorylation mechanism. Introduction The RAF-MEK-ERK signal transduction pathway is a conserved RAS-activated protein kinase cascade that regulates cell growth, proliferation, and differentiation in response to growth factors, cytokines, and hormones (Robinson and Cobb, 1997). The transforming activities of the viral oncogenic forms of RAS and RAF were key to their discovery (Rapp et al., 1983), and RAF was the first effector identified downstream of RAS (Avruch et al., 2001; Malumbres and Barbacid, 2003). RAF activation is initiated by RAS-GTP association with the RAS binding domain (RBD) situated within the N-terminal regulatory region of the kinase. Concomitant conformational changes and recruitment to the cell membrane promote changes in RAF phosphorylation that combine to stimulate its serine/threonine kinase activity, triggering sequential phosphorylation and activation of MEK and ERK (Kolch, 2000; Morrison and Cutler, 1997). The three functional RAF proteins in humans, A-RAF, B-RAF, and C-RAF (also termed c-Raf-1), are dependent on activation segment phosphorylation for activity (Chong et al., 2001; Zhang and Guan, 2000). However, the details of their regulatory mechanisms differ because C-RAF and A-RAF require additional serine and tyrosine phosphorylation within the N region of the kinase domain for full activity (Mason et al., 1999), and B-RAF has a much higher basal kinase activity than either A-RAF or C-RAF. Communication between RAF, MEK, and ERK requires the scaffolding protein KSR1, a RAF homolog that is devoid of kinase activity (Morrison, 2001). Constitutive activation of the RAS-ERK signaling pathway is common to numerous cancers. Approximately 15% of human cancers have activating RAS mutations (Malumbres and Barbacid, 2003), and recently mutations in B-RAF were identified in a large-scale screen for genes mutated in human cancer (Davies et al., 2002). Somatic mutations of B-RAF are associated with 60% of malignant melanomas and occur with moderate to high frequency in colorectal (Rajagopalan et al., 2002), ovarian (Singer et al., 2003), and papillary thyroid carcinomas (Brose et al., 2002; Cohen et al., 2003), implicating activating oncogenic mutations of B-RAF as critical promoters of malignancy. Significantly, B-RAF and RAS mutations are restricted to the same tumor types, usually in a mutually exclusive fashion, suggesting that these genes are on the same oncogenic signaling pathway and that RAS acts to activate B-RAF in these tumors. Sequence analysis of the B-RAF gene associated with human cancers has identified over 30 single site missense mutations, mostly within the kinase domain. The mechanism of oncogenic activation of B-RAF therefore differs fundamentally from that of v-Raf, a retroviral oncogene derived from C-RAF. The constitutive activity and high transforming potential of v-Raf most likely results from loss of the autoinhibitory N-terminal region combined with targeting to the plasma membrane. Most of the mutations of B-RAF are clustered to two regions: the glycine-rich P loop of the N lobe and the activation segment and flanking regions. A Glu for Val substitution at residue 599 in the activation segment, adjacent to the conserved DFG motif, accounts for 90% of B-RAF mutations in human cancers. The V599E mutant of B-RAF possesses the hallmarks of a conventional oncogene. The kinase activity of this mutant protein is greatly elevated, it constitutively stimulates ERK activity in vivo independent of RAS, and it potently transforms NIH3T3 cells. Interestingly, the conserved regulatory phosphorylation sites within the activation segment of B-RAF, Thr598 and Ser601, flank Val599, leading to the suggestion that the Glu substitution at this position functions as a phospho-mimetic (Davies et al., 2002). Analysis of three other oncogenic mutants of B-RAF showed that they stimulate kinase activity in a manner similar to V599EB-RAF (Davies et al., 2002). Intriguingly however, extensive analysis of B-RAF mutations in cancer shows that seven of the mutations involve highly conserved or invariant residues in the catalytic domain (Davies et al., 2002; Yuen et al., 2002) that in other kinases are known to be required for optimal catalytic activity (Johnson et al., 1996; Manning et al., 2002), raising the question of how these mutants promote tumorigenesis. To investigate the mechanisms by which mutant oncogenic forms of B-RAF promote cancer, we have examined a panel of 22 mutants. We show that eighteen mutants activate B-RAF in vitro and stimulate ERK signaling in vivo, conforming to the conventional model of an activating oncogene. However, four mutants have reduced kinase activity in vitro, but surprisingly, three of these can activate wild-type C-RAF and thereby signal to ERK. We present a crystallographic analysis of the WTB-RAF and V599EB-RAF kinase domains in complex with the C-RAF inhibitor BAY43-9006 (Lyons et al., 2001). These structures suggest that many of the residues that are mutated in cancer contribute to stabilization of an inactive conformation of the B-RAF kinase domain. Mutation of these residues destabilizes this inactive conformation, promoting the active state. For most mutants, this stimulates enhanced B-RAF kinase activity toward MEK. However, a few mutants act through a different mechanism because although their activity toward MEK is reduced, they adopt a conformation that activates wild-type C-RAF, which then signals to ERK. Results and Discussion The Majority of Mutant B-RAF Proteins in Human Cancer Have Elevated Kinase Activity To characterize B-RAF mutants, we transiently expressed them as myc-epitope-tagged fusion proteins in COS cells and measured their in vitro kinase activity. Some of the mutants have an increased Km for ATP compared to WTB-RAF, resulting in a relative underestimation of their activity when assayed at subphysiological concentrations of ATP (Supplemental Figure S2 at http://www.cell.com/cgi/content/full/116/6/855/DC1). However, there was little apparent difference in the Km of wild-type and mutant B-RAF for MEK (Supplemental Figure S3 online). Equivalent amounts of each mutant protein were immunoprecipitated (Supplemental Figure S1), and their kinase activity was determined by measuring direct MEK phosphorylation using ATP at a physiological concentration of 5 mM and MEK at 30 μM. Oncogenic RAS (G12VRAS) activates wild-type B-RAF (WTB-RAF) by ∼95-fold (Figures 1A and 1B, Supplemental Table S1 on Cell website). Seven of the mutants had basal kinase activities that exceeded G12VRAS-stimulated WTB-RAF activity, being ∼130 (E585KB-RAF) to 700 (V599DB-RAF) fold more active than basal WTB-RAF (Figure 1A). We refer to these mutants as the high activity group. A further eleven mutants had basal kinase activities some 1.3 (G468EB-RAF) to 64 (L596VB-RAF) fold higher than WTB-RAF (Figure 1B), and because their activities were between basal and G12VRAS-activated WTB-RAF, we refer to these mutants as the intermediate activity group. The activities relative to WTB-RAF we observe are significantly higher than those recently published for four of the mutants (Ikenoue et al., 2003). However, in that study, ATP was used at the subphysiological concentration of ∼130 μM, which may account for their relatively low activity. Characterization of Activated Mutant B-RAF Proteins from Human CancerThe… Download high-res image (646KB)Download full-size image Figure 1. Characterization of Activated Mutant B-RAF Proteins from Human Cancer The indicated myc-epitope-tagged wild-type and mutant B-RAF proteins were expressed in COS cells and their kinase activity was measured. Where indicated, G12VRAS (RAS) was included in the transfections. (A) B-RAF kinase activity for high activity mutants. (B) B-RAF kinase activity for intermediate activity mutants. (C) Western blot of myc-tagged B-RAF, total ERK2, and ppERK in COS cells expressing the high and intermediate activity mutants. (D) ERK kinase activity in COS cells expressing B-RAF mutant proteins. Next, we examined the ability of these mutants to activate endogenous ERK in COS cells. Western blotting with an antibody that specifically recognizes the dually phosphorylated and active forms of ERK1 and ERK2 indicated that all eighteen mutants stimulate endogenous ERK in COS cells (Figures 1C and Supplemental Table S1 online). The high activity mutants stimulated ERK phosphorylation to a similar level as that stimulated by G12VRAS, whereas the intermediate activity mutants were less efficient at stimulating ERK phosphorylation (Figure 1C). We used an immunoprecipitation kinase assay to measure ERK activity directly. G12VRAS activated ERK by approximately 4-fold (Figure 1D). G465AB-RAF, G468EB-RAF, N580SB-RAF, and V599EB-RAF, whose in vitro basal kinase activities are between 1.3- and 480-fold higher than WTB-RAF activity (Figures 1A and 1B), activated ERK by 2- to 4.6-fold (Figure 1D). Thus, despite possessing widely differing in vitro kinase activities, individual B-RAF mutants activated ERK to similar levels as G12VRAS. Finally, several high and intermediate activity mutants transformed NIH3T3 cells (Supplemental Table S1 on Cell website). Three B-RAF Cancer Mutants Have Impaired Kinase Activity but Activate ERK in Cells We identified four cancer-associated B-RAF mutants whose basal kinase activities were reduced to between 30% and 80% of the activity of WTB-RAF (Figure 2A). We term these mutants the impaired activity group. Strikingly, however, despite their reduced in vitro kinase activity, three of the mutants still activated endogenous ERK in COS cells, although to lower levels than other mutants (Figures 2B and 2C). One mutant, D593VB-RAF, failed to activate ERK in COS cells and behaved similarly to a mutant (KDB-RAF) in which the catalytic lysine (Lys482) is mutated to methionine (Figures 2B and 2C). The three impaired activity mutants that activate ERK also activate MEK in COS cells (Figure 2D). To further analyze these mutants in vivo, we expressed them in developing Xenopus embryos and stained for active ERK. WTB-RAF did not activate ERK in Xenopus cells, whereas V599EB-RAF and the three impaired activity mutants that activate ERK in COS cells induced strong activation in Xenopus cells (Figure 2E). As in COS cells, D593VB-RAF and KDB-RAF did not activate ERK in Xenopus cells (Figure 2E). Characterization of Impaired Activity B-RAF Mutants(A) B-RAF kinase activity Download high-res image (372KB)Download full-size image Figure 2. Characterization of Impaired Activity B-RAF Mutants (A) B-RAF kinase activity. (B) ppERK staining in COS cells extracts. (C) ERK kinase activity in COS cell extracts. (D) MEK phosphorylation in COS cells expressing B-RAF mutants or G12VRAS. (E) ERK activation in Xenopus embryos expressing the indicated B-RAF mutants or uninjected control. Impaired Activity Mutants Stimulate C-RAF In Vivo One explanation for how impaired activity mutants stimulate MEK in vivo is that they activate endogenous C-RAF. Previous studies had demonstrated that C-RAF and B-RAF form complexes in mammalian cells (Weber et al., 2001). Consistent with these data, we found that exogenously expressed WTB-RAF formed a complex with endogenous C-RAF (Figure 3A). This complex was not disrupted by G12VRAS, and C-RAF also formed complexes with high (V599EB-RAF), intermediate (G465AB-RAF, G468EB-RAF), and impaired (G465EB-RAF, G465VB-RAF, G595RB-RAF) activity B-RAF mutants (Figure 3A). Thus the complexes are not affected by either B-RAF activity or mutational status. To test whether C-RAF was activated, we used an antibody to immunoprecipitate C-RAF and measured the immunoprecipitates for RAF kinase activity in a coupled kinase cascade assay at 800 μM ATP, conditions where intermediate and impaired activity mutants have negligible activity (Supplemental Figure S2 on Cell website), whereas C-RAF activity remains high (Mason et al., 1999). Remarkably, the three impaired activity B-RAF mutants that induce ERK activation in COS and Xenopus cells induced strong C-RAF activation, as did the intermediate activity mutants (Figure 3B). WTB-RAF, D593VB-RAF, and KDB-RAF, which do not activate ERK in COS cells, do not activate C-RAF (Figure 3B). C-RAF Is Required for ERK Activation by the Impaired B-RAF Mutants(A) B-RAF and… Download high-res image (1MB)Download full-size image Figure 3. C-RAF Is Required for ERK Activation by the Impaired B-RAF Mutants (A) B-RAF and C-RAF complex analysis in COS cells. Levels of exogenous B-RAF and endogenous C-RAF are shown in the lower two panels and B-RAF in the C-RAF IP in the upper panel. Identical results were obtained using two different anti-C-RAF antibodies.  (B) Kinase activity of endogenous C-RAF from COS cells expressing the indicated B-RAF mutant.  (C) The RAF activity in C-RAF immunoprecipitates from COS cells expressing WTC-RAF (WT) or KDC-RAF (KD) together with the indicated B-RAF constructs. (D) C-RAF depletion in COS cells. COS cells expressing the B-RAF mutant indicated were treated with C-RAF or scrambled control (SCR) siRNA oligonucleotides as indicated and the levels of mutant B-RAF, endogenous C-RAF, phosphorylated ERK, and total ERK are shown.  (E) Endogenous ERK kinase activity in COS cells expressing B-RAF mutants and treated with siRNA.  (F) C-RAF depletion in cancer cell lines. WM266-4 and H1666 cells were treated under mock conditions or with the C-RAF, B-RAF, and scrambled control (SCR) siRNA oligonucleotides as indicated, and the levels of endogenous B-RAF, C-RAF, phosphorylated ERK, and total ERK are shown.  To test whether the high activity mutant V599EB-RAF can also activate C-RAF, we expressed HA-tagged C-RAF with myc-tagged V599EB-RAF in COS cells, immunoprecipitated C-RAF, and measured its activity. To demonstrate that the activity being measured is due to C-RAF, we show that G465AB-RAF, which activates endogenous C-RAF in COS cells (Figure 3B), activates exogenous WTC-RAF but not KDC-RAF (Figure 3C). When V599EB-RAF was coexpressed with WTC-RAF, substantial RAF kinase activity was observed in the C-RAF immunoprecipitate, but this was reduced by ∼80% when KDC-RAF was substituted for WTC-RAF (Figure 3C). We assume that the residual activity represents the contribution from coimmunoprecipitated V599EB-RAF and conclude that V599EB-RAF activates C-RAF. Mutant B-RAF proteins were extremely efficient at activating C-RAF, inducing 5- to 8-fold more activity than was induced by G12VRAS (Figure 3C). To provide additional evidence that the impaired activity B-RAF mutants stimulate ERK activity in vivo through activation of WTC-RAF, we used an RNA interference approach. A C-RAF-specific siRNA oligonucleotide reduced C-RAF protein by 50%–60% compared to the nonspecific, scrambled control but did not alter the levels of either B-RAF (Figure 3D) or A-RAF protein (C. Wellbrook and R.M., unpublished data). Depleting C-RAF had little effect on ERK activity in COS cells expressing WTB-RAF, the intermediate activity mutant G465AB-RAF, or the high activity mutant V599EB-RAF (Figures 3D and 3E). In contrast, in COS cells expressing the impaired activity mutants, C-RAF depletion significantly suppressed ERK activation (Figure 3E). Similarly, in the human cancer cell line WM266-4, which expresses the high activity mutant V599DB-RAF (Davies et al., 2002), C-RAF depletion did not affect ERK activity, whereas B-RAF depletion blocked ERK activity (Figure 3F). In H1666 cells, however, which express the impaired activity mutant G465VB-RAF (Davies et al., 2002), both B-RAF and C-RAF are required for ERK activation (Figure 3F). Thus, although C-RAF is not required for ERK activation by either the high or intermediate activity B-RAF mutants, the ability of impaired activity B-RAF mutants to stimulate ERK is dependent on C-RAF. Expression, Purification, and Enzyme Activity of WTB-RAF and V599EB-RAF Kinase Domains To understand how cancer-associated mutations influence the activity and function of the protein, we determined the crystal structures of the WTB-RAF and V599EB-RAF kinase domains. We expressed the kinase domain of human B-RAF equivalent to v-Raf using the baculovirus/insect cell system. B-RAF is a client protein of the Hsp90/p50Cdc37 chaperone (Blagosklonny, 2002; Stancato et al., 1993), and coexpression of B-RAF with human p50Cdc37 significantly increased expression levels (data not shown), most likely because endogenous insect cell Hsp90 stabilizes the human B-RAF protein. Using this system, B-RAF was isolated as a complex with p50Cdc37 and two insect cell proteins, Hsp90 and 14-3-3. The role of 14-3-3 binding to the C terminus of C-RAF is controversial. Some studies suggest that binding is necessary for activity (Avruch et al., 2001; Kolch, 2000). However, under some conditions, dissociation of 14-3-3 from C-RAF does not alter its kinase activity toward MEK in vitro (Michaud et al., 1995), and 14-3-3 binding to the C terminus of B-RAF is not required for the ability of B-RAF to phosphorylate MEK in vitro but instead couples the kinase to downstream effector complexes (MacNicol et al., 2000). To isolate a more homogeneous preparation of B-RAF for crystallographic studies, we expressed a C-terminal truncated form of the kinase that removed the 14-3-3 binding site. This isolated B-RAF kinase domain (termed WTΔB-RAF) was separated from Hsp90/p50Cdc37 during purification and was then dephosphorylated. To analyze the consequence of a Glu substitution for Val599, we also expressed the kinase domain of V599EB-RAF (V599EΔB-RAF). The V599EΔB-RAF kinase domain was ∼500-fold more active than WTΔB-RAF (data not shown). Thus the Glu substitution for Val599 exerts its stimulatory effect on kinase activity within the context of the kinase domain of B-RAF, and this suggests that B-RAF activation is not simply a release from the autoinhibitory restraints conferred by the N-terminal region. Moreover, because we dephosphorylated the purified B-RAF kinase domain, the high activity of V599EΔB-RAF indicates that activation segment phosphorylation is not required for the kinase activity of the mutant protein. Overall Structure and B-RAF BAY43-9006 Interactions The crystals that we obtained with the WTΔB-RAF and V599EΔB-RAF kinase domains alone were not suitable for analysis. However, in the presence of the RAF inhibitor BAY43-9006, suitable crystals were obtained with both preparations. The crystals in the presence of BAY43-9006 grew as thin needles with a maximum thickness of 15–20 μm and diffracted to resolutions of 2.9 Å and 3.4 Å for WTΔB-RAF and V599EΔB-RAF, respectively. Details of the structure determination are described in Experimental Procedures and Supplemental Table S2 online. Wild-type and V599EΔB-RAF kinase domains adopt essentially identical conformations in the presence of the inhibitor (rmsd between equivalent Cα-atoms of 0.64 Å, Supplemental Figure S4). The protein is well ordered, except for the N terminus (Gln432–Ser446), and a region of the activation segment, residues Lys600–Gln611. The kinase domain of ΔB-RAF adopts the bilobal architecture characteristic of other members of the protein kinase family (Figure 4). In both wild-type and mutant ΔB-RAF, the BAY43-9006 molecule is well resolved in the electron density maps, with the inhibitor spanning the length of the interfacial cleft, buried deeply between the N and C lobes (Figures 4 and 5A). Numerous interactions are formed between the protein and inhibitor, and residues that contact BAY43-9006 are conserved in C-RAF, consistent with much of the structure-activity relationships of C-RAF inhibition by BAY43-9006 and its derivatives (Lowinger et al., 2002). The distal pyridyl ring of the inhibitor occupies the ATP adenine binding pocket, interacting with three aromatic residues: Trp530 of the hinge region, Phe582 at the end of the catalytic loop, and Phe594 of the DFG motif, which also contacts the central phenyl ring of the inhibitor. At the opposite end of the inhibitor, the lipophilic trifluoromethyl phenyl ring inserts into a hydrophobic pocket formed between the αC and αE helices and N-terminal regions of the DFG motif and catalytic loop. The aliphatic side chains of Lys482, Leu513, and Thr528 contact the central phenyl ring of the inhibitor. In addition to the van der Waals interactions that dominate B-RAF-inhibitor contacts, polar interactions also contribute to binding. Importantly, the urea group of the inhibitor forms two hydrogen bonds with the protein, one via its amide nitrogen atom to the carboxylate side chain of the catalytic Glu500 residue and the second via the carbonyl moiety to the main chain nitrogen of Asp593 of the DFG motif. An equivalent constellation of hydrogen bonds contributes to the interactions between c-Abl and p38 MAP kinase and their respective inhibitors STI-571 and BIRB-796 (Nagar et al., 2002; Pargellis et al., 2002; Schindler et al., 2000). Finally, the ring nitrogen atom of the pyridyl moiety, which enhances affinity some 5-fold compared with a carbon atom (Lowinger et al., 2002), accepts a hydrogen bond from the main chain nitrogen of Cys531 of the interdomain hinge region, whereas the methyl amide side group contacts the main chain carbonyl of Cys531. Structure of WTΔB-RAF Kinase Domain(A) Ribbons diagram of WTΔB-RAF kinase… Download high-res image (266KB)Download full-size image Figure 4. Structure of WTΔB-RAF Kinase Domain (A) Ribbons diagram of WTΔB-RAF kinase domain in complex with BAY43-9006. The positions of Asp593 and Phe594 of the DFG motif, Asn580 of the catalytic loop, and Glu585 are shown, DFG and APE motif in yellow, rest of activation segment and the N region are in red. N lobe is in magenta, C lobe in marine, and P loop in orange. Residues 600–611 of the activation loop are disordered (dashed lines). (B) Schematic of B-RAF primary structure, showing functional domains and position of 32 observed cancer-associated mutants of B-RAF. The amino acid substitutions are color coded according to their activity class. Figures were made with PyMOL (http://www.pymol.org). Interactions between BAY43-9006 and ΔB-RAF and Comparison with c-Abl Inhibitor… Download high-res image (596KB)Download full-size image Figure 5. Interactions between BAY43-9006 and ΔB-RAF and Comparison with c-Abl Inhibitor Complexes (A) Stereoview of BAY43-9006 bound to the interdomain cleft of ΔB-RAF. The 2Fo-Fc electron density omit map was calculated from phases derived from a simulated annealing refinement of the structure omitting the inhibitor. The map is contoured at 1σ. For clarity, the activation segment is not shown.  (B) c-Abl-STI-571 and (C) c-Abl-PD173855. The color scheme for ΔB-RAF is the same as Figure 4, c-Abl is cyan. The side chain of the DFG motif Phe residue is shown for both kinases. In the STI-571 complex, the DFG motif overlaps that of ΔB-RAF. The structure of ΔB-RAF is markedly reminiscent of the inactive conformation of the c-Abl tyrosine kinase domain associated with the inhibitor STI-571 (Gleevec) (Figure 5B)(Nagar et al., 2002; Schindler et al., 2000), and it also shares significant similarities with the p38 MAP kinase-BIRB 796 complex (Pargellis et al., 2002). There is considerable overlap between the B-RAF and c-Abl inhibitors, and each molecule interacts with their cognate kinases in essentially the same way. Specifically, in the two proteins, the relative dispositions of the N and C lobes, αC helix, and DFG motif are virtually identical. The DFG motif Phe residues in both ΔB-RAF and c-Abl (Phe594 in ΔB-RAF) are shifted by some 8 Å relative to their counterparts in active protein kinases. BAY43-9006 contributes to the inactive conformation of the DFG motif both by interacting with the phenyl ring of Phe594 and because the trifluoromethyl phenyl moiety of the inhibitor inserts into the site that Phe594 would presumably occupy in the active state. Significantly, the structure of the c-Abl STI-571 complex indicates that the STI-571 inhibitor promotes the inactive conformation of the DFG motif of c-Abl by a similar mechanism. In the active conformation of protein kinases, the activation segment adjacent to the DFG motif forms a β sheet interaction with the β6 strand. However, in the inactive ΔB-RAF and c-Abl structures, similar to the unphosphorylated insulin receptor kinase (Hubbard et al., 1994), the flipped conformation of the DFG motif orients this region of the activation segment toward the P loop of the N lobe. Consequently, in ΔB-RAF, residues Gly595–Val599 of the activation segment form an array of hydrophobic interactions with the P loop residues Gly463–Val470 (Figure 6A). These interactions, which comprise the side chains of Leu596 and Val599 of the activation segment contacting Gly465, Phe467, and Val470 of the P loop, function to establish an inactive conformer of the ΔB-RAF kinase domain, linking the two regions of the kinase in which the cancer-associated mutations occur. Apart from the inactive conformation of the DFG motif/activation segment, which is not aligned for ATP and peptide substrate recognition and is partially disordered, all other key residues of ΔB-RAF required for the phosphotransfer reaction are aligned as in active kinases. Specifically, the P loop, which coordinates the phosphate and adenine moieties of ATP, the catalytic Lys482 and Glu500 of the N lobe and the C lobe catalytic loop (Asn580, Arg574, and Asp575) are all correctly aligned. Therefore only a change in position of the DFG motif/activation segment is required for conversion to the active state. Position of Oncogenic Mutants of B-RAF and Mechanism of Activation by Thr598… Download high-res image (384KB)Download full-size image Figure 6. Position of Oncogenic Mutants of B-RAF and Mechanism of Activation by Thr598 Phosphorylation (A) The molecular surface generated by the P loop (residues 463–468) and the DFG motif/activation segment (residues 593–599) are colored green and yellow, respectively, demonstrating the hydrophobic cluster created by the association of the P loop with the DFG motif, a conformation stabilized by the hydrogen bond between the amide side chain of Asn580 and the main chain amide of Phe594.  (B) A ribbon representation of the structure of the activation segment of PKB is superimposed onto ΔB-RAF, together with the side chains of Asp293 (Asp593), Lys298 (Thr598), Glu299 (Val599), Ile301 (Ser601), phosphoThr309, and the catalytic Asp275 (Asp575) and Arg274 (B-RAF residues in parenthesis). In B-RAF, Glu599 and Glu600 (equivalent to Glu299 and Glu300 of PKB) could contact Lys569 of the αE helix. Any substitution at Val599 will be tolerated. The position of Glu600 is modeled from Gly300 of PKB. Structure of the activation segment is taken from PKB (Yang et al., 2002). Phosphorylation of Thr598 of B-RAF would position a phosphate group in the equivalent position as the phosphate of Thr309 of PKB, allowing interaction with Arg575 of the B-RAF catalytic loop RD motif. The equivalent of B-RAF Val599 is a Glu in PKB, suggesting that in the V599EB-RAF mutant, Glu599 will be solvent exposed and likely to interact with Lys506 of the αC helix. Structural Basis for Activating Oncogenic Mutations We have classified cancer-associated mutants of B-RAF into high, intermediate, or impaired activity groups according to their ability to stimulate in vitro B-RAF kinase activity (Figures 1, 2, and 4B, Supplemental Table S1 on Cell website). Given the phenotypic differences between the various oncogenic mutants, it is striking that nearly all mutants (>80%) are located within either the P loop or the activation segment within or adjacent to the DFG motif (Figure 4B). An apparent paradox of some mutants is that depending on the amino acid substitution, the mutant protein has either an elevated or reduced kinase activity (Figure 4B). Significantly, the high and intermediate activating mutations comprise substitutions of amino acids that are compatible with catalysis. Such mutations either occur at nonconserved positions or replace conserved residues with amino acids observed in other protein kinases (Supplemental Table S1 online). In contrast, the impaired activity mutants correspond to amino acid substitutions of highly conserved/invariant residues that are required for an optimal protein kinase catalytic reaction. As discussed below, a unifying feature of oncogenic mutations located in the P loop and DFG motif is the prediction that the inactive conformation of the DFG motif/activation segment will be destabilized because the hydrophobic cluster linking the DFG motif to the P loop is disrupted (Figure 6A). To explain the molecular mechanism of B-RAF oncogenic mutations, we discuss the three classes of mutants in turn, and the structural consequences of all mutations are described fully in Supplemental Table S3 online. Here we illustrate the principles underlying oncogenic B-RAF activation by reference to specific examples. Beginning with the high activity mutants, we note that all the Val599 mutants belong to this group, as does the neighboring mutant K600E and the P loop mutant G468A (Figure 1A). Activating mutants of B-RAF presumably mimic the conformational changes promoted by activation segment phosphorylation, and importantly the V599EB-RAF mutation appears to obviate the requirement for activation segment phosphorylation. The structure of the wild-type ΔB-RAF kinase domain indicates that the aliphatic side chain of Val599 interacts with the phenyl ring of Phe467 in the P loop (Figure 6A). Replacing the medium sized hydrophobic Val side chain with a larger and charged residue as found in human cancer (Glu, Asp, Lys, or Arg) would be expected to destabilize the interactions that maintain the DFG motif in an inactive conformation, so flipping the activation segment into the active position. Consistent with this notion is the discovery that mutation of Phe467 (F467CB-RAF) also occurs in cancer. In the V599EΔB-RAF structure, the DFG motif adopts the same inactive conformation seen in the wild-type protein, although the side chain of Glu599 is disordered and does not contact the Phe467 side chain. The presence of BAY43-9006 presumably restrains the DFG motif in the inactive conformation in V599EΔB-RAF. The diverse amino acid substitutions of Val599 capable of activating B-RAF suggest that the mutations all function by disrupting the inactive conformation. However, it is possible that acidic amino acids at position 599 could also interact with Lys506 of the αC helix to provide additional contacts that promote the active state (Figure 6B). In the active state of the AGC kinase PKB/Akt, Glu299 (equivalent to 599 of B-RAF) contacts Arg202 (equivalent to Lys506 of B-RAF) (Yang et al., 2002). In support of this notion, Glu and Asp substitutions at position 599 of B-RAF are 2- to 4-fold more active than the Arg and Lys substitutions (Figure 1A). Although all four substitutions at position 599 possess similar activity in vitro and in vivo, the Glu substitution accounts for over 95% of the mutations at this site. It is likely that a Glu mutation occurs at high frequency because it only requires a single base substitution, rather than the two necessary for conversion to the other amino acids. Intriguingly, a Glu for Lys substitution at the neighboring position 600 is also a high activity mutant (Figure 1A). In the wild-type ΔB-RAF kinase domain structure, Lys600 is disordered, suggesting that it does not participate in stabilization of the inactive conformation. However, in the active conformation of ΔB-RAF, a Glu at residue 600 may be positioned to interact with Lys506 and/or Lys569 of the αC and αE helices, respectively (Figure 6B). The only high activity mutant lying outside of the P loop and DFG motif is E585KB-RAF. Glu585 lies on the opposite surface of the kinase domain from the DFG motif (Figure 4A), and it is possible that its mutation disrupts potential interdomain interactions within full-length B-RAF that relieves N-terminal domain autoinhibition. Intermediate activating mutants are most likely explained by their ability to disrupt the inactive conformation of the DFG motif; however, the overall kinase activity is reduced relative to the strongly activating mutants due to suboptimal B-RAF catalytic efficiency. This is best illustrated by comparing the properties of the strongly activating G468AB-RAF mutant with the intermediate activity mutant G468EB-RAF, different substitutions of the same amino acid which differ 200-fold in their activities (Figures 1A and 1B, Supplemental Table S1 online). Gly468 of the P loop is wedged against Leu596 of the activation segment and substitutions of Gly468 would therefore perturb P loop-DFG contacts, destabilizing the inactivated state (Figure 6A). The difference in activity between G468AB-RAF and G468EB-RAF may be explained by the observation that in all known protein kinases, only Gly, Ala, or Ser occur at this position (the third Gly residue of the P loop) (Manning et al., 2002) and that an Ala for Gly substitution at the equivalent position in PKA has little influence on PKA activity (Grant et al., 1998). We propose that both the Ala and Glu substitutions of Gly468 of B-RAF share the property of destabilizing the inactive conformation, but whereas the Ala is permissive for high activity, the bulky Glu interferes with P loop/ATP interactions reducing its potential to elevate kinase activity. In another example, while replacing Gly463 (the 1st Gly of the P loop) with Val would destabilize the inactive conformation of the DFG motif, it may also interfere with the optimal interactions between the P loop and phosphate groups of ATP. A survey of all human kinase sequences indicates that Gly is observed in 94% of kinases, and only Ala and Ser are also tolerated at this position (Manning et al., 2002). Asn580 is a highly conserved metal coordinating residue of the catalytic loop of the kinase domain. Surprisingly the N580SB-RAF mutant is 6-fold more active than WTB-RAF. Although Asn580 is located outside of the P loop and DFG/activation segment, its replacement by Ser is likely to disrupt the inactive conformation of the DFG motif. In the inactive ΔB-RAF structure, the amide side chain of Asn580 accepts a hydrogen bond from the main chain amide group of Phe594 of the DFG motif (Figure 6A), indicating that the Asn580 and Phe594 interactions contribute to the inactive conformation and explaining how mutation of either of these residues disrupts the inactive DFG conformation. The properties of other intermediate mutants are listed in Supplemental Table S3 on the Cell website. The third class of B-RAF oncogenic mutants is the most surprising because these comprise nonconservative amino acid substitutions of catalytic site residues that are required for optimal kinase activity. Although these mutations result in the expected reduction of in vitro B-RAF kinase activity, the activity of ERK is stimulated in vivo. We propose that the oncogenic potential of these mutants results from a disruption of the inactive DFG conformation. Experiments described above suggest that this conformational change is transmitted to elevate ERK activity via a cooperative activation of wild-type C-RAF (and possibly B-RAF; M.J.G. and R.M., unpublished data) although the mechanism of cooperativity is unclear (discussed below). The second Gly of the P loop (Gly465 in B-RAF) is invariant in all kinases (Manning et al., 2002), suggesting that any substitution of this residue cannot be readily tolerated. Mutations to the corresponding residue in PKA are detrimental to kinase activity (Grant et al., 1998). However, by analogy to mutants of the 1st and 3rd Gly residues of the P loop that generate activated B-RAF, we predict that these mutations destabilize the inactive conformation of the DFG motif (Figure 6A). Similarly, within the DFG motif itself, the introduction of a bulky charged residue at Gly595 in the G595RB-RAF mutant is not compatible with the DFG motif in the inactive conformation. Our analysis provides a satisfactory explanation for the prevalence of B-RAF mutations within the P loop and DFG motif/activation segment. Such mutations disrupt the inactive conformation of the DFG motif, converting the activation segment into the active state, thereby mimicking its phosphorylation. However, one cancer-associated mutant D593VB-RAF behaves differently from the three classes of mutants we have characterized. Significantly, this mutant is almost completely inactive in vitro and is unable to activate either ERK or C-RAF in vivo. Consistent with these findings, it is not obvious from the ΔB-RAF structure how replacing Asp593 would promote the active conformation of the kinase. Implications for Regulation of B-RAF by Activation Segment and N Region Phosphorylation Thr598 is the major activation segment phosphorylation site whereas Ser601 is a relatively minor one (Zhang and Guan, 2000). Substitution of Thr598 with alanine blocks B-RAF activity (Zhang and Guan, 2000), whereas substitution with isoleucine as occurs in cancer strongly activates B-RAF (Figure 1B). Presumably, the bulky side chain of isoleucine disrupts the inactive conformation of the activation segment, whereas the small Ala side chain does not (Figure 6A). In a similar fashion, we propose that phosphorylation of Thr598 would also destabilize the inactive conformation. In addition, by comparing B-RAF to other protein kinases that are regulated by activation segment phosphorylation, we suggest that pThr598 provides additional contacts to the conserved Arg574 residue adjacent to the catalytic Asp575 of the catalytic loop, stabilizing the active form (Johnson et al., 1996)(Figure 6B). The structure of ΔB-RAF also provides insight into the role of the regulatory N region. B-RAF is constitutively phosphorylated on the N region Ser445 within the motif Ser445-Ser-Asp-Asp448, but the equivalent motif in C-RAF, Ser338-Ser-Tyr-Tyr341, is subject to regulatory phosphorylation on both Ser338 and Tyr341 (Mason et al., 1999). In C-RAF, replacing the Tyr residues with Asp mimics the effects of Tyr341 phosphorylation and substituting the Asp residues in B-RAF suppresses basal and RAS-stimulated kinase activity (Fabian et al., 1993; Mason et al., 1999). In our ΔB-RAF structure, Asp447 contacts Arg505 of the αC helix, suggesting that this interaction stabilizes the active conformation, providing a molecular explanation for why this Asp is important for the basal and RAS-stimulated kinase activity of B-RAF. It is less clear what role Ser445 plays in activating B-RAF. However, in our V599EΔB-RAF protein, Ser445 is unphosphorylated and yet the kinase domain is highly active and (excluding the activation segment) resembles an activated kinase. These data suggest that phosphorylation of Ser445 (and Ser338 in C-RAF) may relieve constraints imposed by the N terminus. Concluding Remarks The discovery that oncogenic activating mutations of B-RAF occur in two thirds of malignant melanomas and at high frequency in other human cancers confirms the significance of the RAS-RAF-MEK-ERK pathway in promoting tumorigenesis. A significantly high frequency of mutants cluster to the conserved P loop and DFG motif of the kinase, and we show that a unifying feature of these mutants is to destabilize the inactive ΔB-RAF structure, thereby promoting an active conformation. Mutations of Val599 occur in 92% of oncogenic forms of B-RAF, and V599EB-RAF represents 90% of oncogenic B-RAF mutants (Supplemental Table S1 online). Interestingly, oncogenic activating mutants of c-Kit and Met (a Val for Asp substitution; Glover et al., 1995; Kitayama et al., 1995) correspond to Val599 of B-RAF, raising the possibility that a related structural mechanism may underlie oncogenic activation of these tyrosine kinases. We propose that other activating mutants also destabilize the inactive conformation of the DFG motif, although it is noteworthy that these mutants constitute on average 0.3% of B-RAF mutations (Supplemental Table S1 online). Oncogenic mutants of B-RAF also have analogies with STI-571-resistant mutants of BCR-ABL (Azam et al., 2003). Two such mutations, situated within the activation segment (equivalent to Leu596 and Lys600 of B-RAF), are likely to destabilize the inactive conformation of the DFG/activation segment of the kinase, disrupting the binding site for the drug. Our findings that BAY43-9006 interacts with an inactive conformation of B-RAF would suggest that activating oncogenic mutants of B-RAF would be less sensitive to the inhibitor than WTB-RAF, with consequent implications for potential BAY43-9006-induced resistant mutations of the kinase. Consistent with this prediction, kinetic studies from BAYER pharmaceuticals have recently shown that V599EB-RAF is 2-fold less sensitive to BAY43-9006 than WTB-RAF (IC50s of 38 and 22 nM, respectively; Brian Schwartz, personal communication). We have also characterized a class of oncogenic mutants that reduce kinase activity relative to WTB-RAF (Figure 2). These mutants have weak oncogenic potential as judged by their inability to transform NIH3T3 cells (Supplemental Table S1 online), which is correlated to the relatively low level of ERK activation. We present data that impaired activity mutants of B-RAF trigger the activity of wild-type C-RAF and B-RAF, and our siRNA study demonstrates that the ability of these B-RAF mutants to stimulate ERK is dependent on WTC-RAF. Crucially, these mutations are predicted to induce an active kinase conformation. It is this property of the impaired activity mutants that may explain their ability to activate ERK via C-RAF even though their kinase activity toward MEK is severely impaired. However, D593VB-RAF and the kinase dead mutant K482MB-RAF, which we predict would not promote the active state, do not induce either ERK or C-RAF activity. We propose that whereas the high activity B-RAF mutants primarily stimulate ERK via direct MEK phosphorylation, the impaired activity mutants, which are defective in direct MEK phosphorylation, induce ERK by triggering C-RAF activity (Figure 7). Activating and Impaired Activity B-RAF Mutants Stimulate ERK Signaling through… Download high-res image (176KB)Download full-size image Figure 7. Activating and Impaired Activity B-RAF Mutants Stimulate ERK Signaling through Distinct Mechanisms (A) The activated mutants can directly phosphorylate and activate MEK and although they also activate C-RAF, their ability to signal to ERK does not require this pathway.  (B) The impaired activity B-RAF mutants cannot stimulate efficient activation of MEK, but can stimulate C-RAF activity, which then activates MEK. Their ability to signal to ERK is therefore dependent on C-RAF protein.  There are various possibilities for how the impaired activity mutants of B-RAF generate elevated wild-type C-RAF and B-RAF activity. First, the presence of the active conformation of B-RAF sequesters negative inhibitors of RAF kinases (for example, protein phosphatases or the RAF inhibitory protein RKIP; Kolch, 2000). Alternatively, the active conformation may recruit positive effectors of the pathway that act on wild-type RAF kinases. Finally, the active conformation of B-RAF may promote the active conformation of C-RAF via an allosteric mechanism or directly phosphorylate the activation segment of wild-type RAF kinases. The possibility that an autocrine feedback loop activates C-RAF is not consistent with our findings that the MEK inhibitor UO126 has no effect on the ability of B-RAF mutants to stimulate C-RAF, whose activity is also independent of RAS (M.J.G. and R.M., unpublished data). It is unlikely that the lack of activity of these mutants is due to their altered binding to Hsp90 and 14-3-3 because a recent study has shown that D593VB-RAF and G595RB-RAF bind these proteins with similar affinity as WTB-RAF (Ikenoue et al., 2003). An interesting possibility is that communication between impaired activity mutants of B-RAF and endogenous wild-type RAF kinases could be mediated via scaffolding molecules such as KSR1, and it has been demonstrated previously that C-RAF forms oligomers with itself (Luo et al., 1996) and with B-RAF (Weber et al., 2001), a finding confirmed in our studies. Furthermore, induced dimerization of C-RAF stimulates ERK activity (Farrar et al., 1996; Luo et al., 1996). The finding that the active conformation of B-RAF is sufficient to stimulate endogenous wild-type RAF and ERK represents a novel paradigm for the action of an oncogene.  
2968||c-KIT is a member of the type 3 subclass of transmembrane receptor tyrosine kinases, characterized by 5 immunoglobulin-like domains in the extracellular region, a negative regulatory juxtamembrane (JM) domain and a split adenosine triphosphate-binding and phosphotransferase tyrosine kinase domain (reviewed in Broudy1). c-KIT activation by stem cell factor (SCF) promotes dimerization and transphosphorylation at tyrosine residues, resulting in downstream signaling events leading to cell growth. Mutations of c-KIT have been associated with hematopoietic and nonhematopoietic tumors, including systemic mast cell disease (SMCD),2-4 acute myeloid leukemia (AML),5-8 and gastrointestinal stromal tumors (GISTs).9-12  The tyrosine kinase inhibitor imatinib mesylate (Gleevec; Novartis Pharma AG, Basel, Switzerland) is efficacious in the majority of patients with GIST harboring c-KIT mutations.9,13 c-KIT is most commonly activated in GIST tumors by small deletions in the JM that are thought to constitutively activate the tyrosine kinase by loss of autoinhibitory function.14 All c-KIT JM deletion mutants tested thus far are sensitive to inhibition by imatinib mesylate. These observations have suggested that imatinib mesylate might be of value in the treatment of SMCD or AML that also have activating mutations in c-KIT. However, the most common activating alleles in the context of SMCD and AML are the D816V and D816Y mutations in the c-KIT activation loop, and these mutations have been shown to be highly resistant to imatinib mesylate in vivo15 and in vitro.16-19  PKC412 is a novel staurosporine-derived tyrosine kinase inhibitor that targets protein kinase C (PKC), kinase insert domain-containing receptor (KDR), vascular endothelial growth factor receptor-2 (VEGF-R2), platelet-derived growth factor receptor α (PDGFRα), Fms-like tyrosine kinase 3 (FLT3), and c-KIT.20 PKC412 has previously been shown to be effective against the fusion protein Fip1-like 1 (FIP1L1)-PDGFRα with mutations in the kinase domain that are resistant to imatinib mesylate.21 Since inhibitors of D816V/Y c-KIT mutations would potentially have therapeutic activity in SMCD and AML, we have evaluated the effectiveness of PKC412 against a panel of c-KIT mutations identified in patients with SMCD, GIST, and AML.  Study design  Cell culture  A 2.9-kB XhoI cDNA fragment encoding human (hu)-c-KIT (lacking amino acids 510-513, GNNK) was cloned into the XhoI site of pCDNA3. c-KIT point mutations (Table 1) were generated (Transformer Site-Directed Mutagenesis Kit; Clontech, Palo Alto, CA) and subcloned into the XhoI site of MSCV-IRES-GFP and MSCV-PGK-NEO. The IL-3-dependent mouse pre-B-cell line Ba/F3 was maintained, and retrovirus was prepared, as previously described.22 Ba/F3 cells were transduced with viral supernatant, expanded for 2 passages (with 10 ng/mL rmIL-3), then selected for IL-3-independent growth. Ba/F3 cells transduced with Neo-containing vectors were first selected in IL-3 with 100 mg/mL G418. IL-3-independent Ba/F3 cells transduced with wild-type (WT) c-KIT were selected with 20 ng/mL rhSCF.  View inlineView popup Table 1. Imatinib mesylate and PKC412 IC50s of transforming c-KIT mutations Patient samples were collected following informed consent in accordance with the institutional review board (IRB)-approved Dana-Farber Cancer Institute protocol 01-206.  Growth inhibition  Cells (1 × 104) in 100 μL medium with or without IL-3 were incubated with various concentrations of imatinib mesylate or PKC412 in 96-well plates for 48 hours in triplicate. 3H-thymidine (1 μCi [0.037 MBq]) was added, and cells were incubated for 4 hours. Cells were harvested, and 3H-thymidine incorporation was determined. Growth inhibition was plotted as the ratio of the average 3H-thymidine incorporation in drug-treated wells relative to no-drug controls. IC50s for imatinib mesylate or PKC412 were calculated by sigmoidal curve fitting software (OriginLab, Northampton, MA).  Immunoprecipitations  Cell lysates, immunoprecipitations, and immunoblotting were performed as previously described.22 c-KIT was precipitated with 5 μg anti-human c-KIT antibody (Assay Design Systems, Ann Arbor, MI), separated on a 7.5% denaturing polyacrylamide gel and transferred to nitrocellulose. Blots were probed with mouse anti-phosphotyrosine antibody 4G10 (Upstate, Charlottesville, VA), stripped, and reprobed with mouse anti-human c-KIT (E1): SC-17806 (Santa Cruz Biotechnology, Santa Cruz, CA). Whole-cell lysates (1/10th volume immunoprecipitate [IP] input) were similarly separated and probed with rabbit anti-phospho-Stat5 (signal transducer and transcriptional activator 5) or rabbit anti-phospho-Stat3, stripped, and reprobed with rabbit anti-Stat5a or rabbit anti-Stat3 (Cell Signaling Technology, Beverly, MA).  To assess constitutive tyrosine kinase autophosphorylation, cells were grown in RPMI plus 10% fetal calf serum (FCS), and 4 mg cell lysate was immunoprecipitated. To assess PKC412 inhibition of c-KIT autophosphorylation, cells were washed 3 times in RPMI without FCS or IL-3, then incubated with or without IL-3 and PKC412 (0-500 nM) for 4 hours. WT Ba/F3 cells were starved of IL-3 and serum for 4 hours prior to addition of IL-3 and PKC412. Cell equivalents (1 × 107) of cell lysate were immunoprecipitated.  Results and discussion  The IL-3-dependent murine pre-B-cell line Ba/F3 was transduced with retroviruses expressing WT c-KIT or 1 of 14 c-KIT mutants and selected for IL-3-independent growth (Table 1; Figure 1A). Ten of 14 mutant forms of c-KIT transformed Ba/F3 cells to IL-3-independent growth in the absence of rhSCF. Transforming mutations mapped to the extracellular domain (delTYD (417-419) + I,8 delTYD (417-419) + RG,8 and A502Y503dup (AYdup)10), the juxtamembrane domain (V559D,11 V560G,2 and delV559V560 (delVV)11), and the kinase domain (R634W, D816Y,3 D816V,2 and N822K7). This is the first report of the kinase domain mutation R634W, identified from a patient with chronic myelomonocytic leukemia. Consistent with a report that E839K inactivates the kinase domain,12 E839K did not transform Ba/F3 cells to IL-3-independent growth. K642E has been shown to be constitutively phosphorylated in a GIST-derived cell line10,23 but did not transform Ba/F3 cells in this study. D820G4 and V530I,8 each identified in a single patient, also did not transform Ba/F3 cells.  Immunoprecipitated c-KIT was constitutively phosphorylated in all transformed cell lines and Ba/F3 cells expressing WT c-KIT grown with 20 ng/mL rhSCF (Figure 1B). We observed differential phosphorylation of 2 c-KIT bands of approximately 160 and 145 kDa, representing the fully glycosylated cell surface receptor, and incompletely processed internalized forms of c-KIT, respectively. Our findings confirm reports that Stat3 is aberrantly phosphorylated by D816V and other c-KIT-activating mutations.24,25 Stat5 was constitutively phosphorylated by all c-KIT-activating mutations grown in the absence of IL-3.  Figure 1. Download figureOpen in new tabDownload powerpoint Figure 1. Imatinib mesylate resistant c-Kit mutations are sensitive to PKC412. (A) Schematic of the c-KIT protein indicating the relative location of structural and functional domains, as well as location of 14 c-KIT mutations evaluated. The JM delVV mutation occurs at V559V560. ▪ indicates amino terminal signal peptide. Other domains of c-KIT are indicated as follows: □, extracellular domain; TM, transmembrane domain; JM, juxtamembrane domain; TK1, nucleotide binding subdomain of split kinase domain; KI, kinase insert domain; and TK2, catalytic subdomain of split kinase domain. (B) Ba/F3-transforming c-KIT mutations are constitutively phosphorylated and phosphorylate Stat3 and Stat5. Blots from top to bottom: antiphosphotyrosine Western blot of Ba/F3 lysates immunoprecipitated with anti-c-KIT; anti-c-KIT Western blot of immunoprecipitates in top blot; anti-phospho-Stat3 Western blot of whole-cell lysates (WCLs) from IP in top blot; anti-Stat3 Western blot of same WCLs; anti-phospho-Stat5 Western blot of WCLs from IP in top blot; and anti-Stat5a Western blot of the same WCLs. (C) Representative growth curves of delTYD + RG, V560G, D816Y, and D816V transduced Ba/F3 cell lines. Plotted is the percentage ± SD of 3H-thymidine incorporation of drug-treated cells relative to no-drug controls. Cells were treated with imatinib mesylate (black) or PKC412 (red). Cells were grown in the absence of IL-3 or rhSCF. (D) Dose response of PKC412 inhibition of c-KIT, Stat5, and Stat3 phosphorylation. Shown are data from delTYD + RG, V560G, D816Y, and D816V transformed Ba/F3 cells. Blots are as in panel B. Cells were grown in the absence of IL-3 and the indicated concentration of PKC412 (nM) for 4 hours. (E) PKC412 does not inhibit IL-3-induced Stat5 phosphorylation. Blots from top to bottom: anti-phospho-Stat3 Western blot of WCLs from indicated cell lines with or without IL-3 (10 ng/mL) and PKC412 (250 nM/mL), for which Ba/F3 cells were starved of IL-3 and serum for 4 hours prior to addition of IL-3 and PKC412; anti-Stat3 Western blot of WCLs in top blot; anti-phospho-Stat5 Western blot of WCLs as in top blot; and anti-Stat5a Western blot of same WCLs. (F) Dose response of Stat5 phosphorylation to PKC412 in Ba/F3 cells. Blots are as for panel E. Ba/F3 cells were starved of IL-3 and FCS for 4 hours, then incubated with or without IL-3 (10 ng/mL) in the presence of the indicated concentration of PKC412 for 4 hours. The effect of imatinib mesylate or PKC412 on cell growth of c-KIT-expressing cell lines was evaluated in a 3H-thymidine incorporation assay (Table 1; Figure 1C; data not shown). Consistent with previous reports, D816V was resistant to imatinib mesylate (IC50, > 10 000 nM).16-19 D816Y was also observed to be resistant to imatinib mesylate (IC50, > 800 nM). Four mutations, delTYD + I, AYdup, R634W, and N822K, showed IC50s for imatinib mesylate similar to Ba/F3-WT-c-KIT + 20 ng/mL rhSCF (100-300 nM). As previously reported, V560G19 was hypersensitive to imatinib mesylate, as were the mutations delTYD + RG, V559D, and delVV (IC50s < 100 nM).  PKC412 inhibited growth of all c-KIT-transformed Ba/F3 lines, with IC50s segregating into 2 groups. The imatinib mesylate-resistant D816V and D816Y mutants, as well as delTYD + RG, V560G, R634W, and N822K, were more sensitive to PKC412 (IC50s, 33-95 nM) than was the wild-type receptor stimulated with rhSCF (IC50, 138 nM). The remaining mutations had higher IC50s for PKC412 (146-265 nM).  The level of tyrosine autophosphorylation of the imatinib mesylate-resistant D816V and D816Y c-KIT mutants, as well as phosphorylation of Stat3 and Stat5, was dose dependent on PKC412 over a wide concentration range (5-500nM) and correlated with inhibition of cell growth (Table 1; Figure 1D). Similar findings were observed for representative imatinib mesylate-sensitive extracellular (del-TYD + RG) and JM (V560G) mutants. Although Stat5 phosphorylation by D816V and D816Y was inhibited by PKC412 (Figure 1D-E), an increased level of Stat5 phosphorylation induced by stimulation with IL-3 induction was not inhibited in these cells (Figure 1E). IL-3 did not rescue PKC412 inhibition of phosphorylation of Stat3 (Figure 1E) and did not inhibit IL-3-induced Stat5 phosphorylation in WT Ba/F3 Cells (Figure 1E-F).  These data indicate that among the reported c-KIT mutations in human hematologic malignancies, 10 of 14 confer factor independent growth to Ba/F3 cells. There is variable sensitivity of these mutations to inhibition by imatinib mesylate or PKC412. Notably, however, the most common mutations D816V and D816Y are highly resistant to imatinib mesylate but sensitive to inhibition by PKC412. These findings suggest that PKC412 may be an effective therapeutic agent for treatment of patients with certain imatinib mesylate-resistant c-Kit mutations. 
3113||There is strong evidence that overtly inactivating mutations in RAD51C predispose to hereditary breast and ovarian cancer but the prevalence of such mutations, and whether they are associated with a particular clinical phenotype, remains unclear. Resolving these questions has important implications for the implementation of RAD51C into routine clinical genetic testing. Consequently, we have performed a large RAD51C mutation screen of hereditary breast and ovarian cancer families, and the first study of unselected patients diagnosed with ovarian cancer. Our data confirm a consistent but low frequency (2/335 families) of inactivating RAD51C mutations among families with a history of both breast and ovarian cancer and an absence of mutations among breast cancer only families (0/1,053 families). Our data also provide support for the designation of the missense variant p.Gly264Ser as a moderate penetrance allele. Hum Mutat 33:95–99, 2012. © 2011 Wiley Periodicals, Inc. Monoallelic mutations within either the BRCA1 or BRCA2 gene locus account for 30–50% of families with a strong family history of both breast and ovarian cancer. The recognition that biallelic BRCA2 mutations also gave rise to Fanconi Anemia (FA) highlighted the possibility that abrogation of other genes within this pathway may be associated with non-BRCA1 or -BRCA2 related familial breast and ovarian cancer. This proposal was confirmed when monoallelic mutations in both FANCJ (BRIP1) and FANCN (PALB2) were shown to confer susceptibility to breast and ovarian cancer [Howlett et al., 2002; Rahman et al., 2006; Seal et al., 2006]. FA is a rare, recessive chromosomal instability disorder, characterized by bone marrow failure, developmental defects, and cancer susceptibility that is caused by biallelic mutations in any one of 13 genes involved in the FA pathway. The FA pathway coordinates the repair of DNA interstrand crosslinks via nucleotide excision repair, translesion synthesis, and homologous recombination [Moldovan and D'Andrea, 2009].  Recently, the identification of a biallelic RAD51C (FANCO; MIM# 602774) mutation in a family with an FA-like disorder led to its examination in a large hereditary breast and ovarian cancer case–control candidate study [Meindl et al., 2010; Vaz et al., 2010]. Meindl et al. identified six independent pathogenic monoallelic mutations that included two frameshift insertions, two splice site mutations, and two missense mutations. Interestingly, these mutations were identified exclusively within the 480 families with breast and ovarian cancer (frequency 1.3%) but not among any of the 620 families with breast cancer only. In most subsequent studies, the mutation frequency has been found to be lower than 1.3%, with only three additional truncating mutations being identified in five families [by Romero et al. and Pelttari et al.] among more than 729 ovarian cancer families (with or without breast cancer) [Akbari et al., 2010; Pang et al., 2011; Pelttari et al., 2011; Romero et al., 2011; Silvestri et al., 2011; Wong et al., 2011; Zheng et al., 2010]. Despite the presence of breast cancer in 10 of the 15 RAD51C mutation positive families identified to date, analysis of more than 1,373 breast cancer only families (predominantly from high-risk families but also including a cohort of 97 unselected male breast cancers) by eight studies collectively has not identified any additional families with truncating RAD51C mutations. Therefore, while evidence of a causative role for RAD51C in breast and ovarian or ovarian only cancer families (HBOC) is convincing, albeit with low prevalence, its role in breast cancer only (HBC) families remains unclear.  To provide more definitive data on the incidence of RAD51C mutations in hereditary breast and ovarian families, we utilized high-resolution melt (HRM) analysis to screen for germline mutations in all coding exons of RAD51C in index cases from 1,388 non-BRCA1, non-BRCA2 high-risk Australian HBC and HBOC families, and 427 controls. In addition, the contribution of RAD51C in unselected ovarian cancer was examined through the analysis of germline DNA from an unselected cohort of 267 ovarian cancer patients.  The familial cohort included 909 individuals with verified personal and family histories of breast or ovarian cancer who were previously assessed at one of three Victorian Familial Cancer Centres (Peter MacCallum Cancer Centre, Victorian Clinical Genetics Services, or The Royal Melbourne Hospital). The remainder of the familial cohort was comprised of index cases from 479 multiple case breast cancer families obtained from the Kathleen Cunningham Foundation Consortium for Research into Familial Breast Cancer (kConFab). kConFab families are recruited through Familial Cancer Centres throughout Australia and New Zealand. All individuals were consented for genetic testing of the genetic causes of hereditary breast and ovarian cancer and subsequently tested negative for mutations in BRCA1 and BRCA2. This study was approved by the Peter MacCallum Cancer Centre Human Research Ethics Committee. In total, index cases from 1,388 families, including 335 with ovarian cancer, were examined in this study.  The unselected ovarian cancer cohort included 267 individuals with various histological subtypes of ovarian cancer (139 serous, 75 endometrioid, six clear cell, 37 mucinous, six granulosa cell tumors, three adenocarcinomas, and one mixed mullerian tumor). These samples were obtained from patients presenting to hospitals in the south of England, UK. Matched tumor DNA extracted from frozen tissue for 89 of these cases was also examined for somatic mutations.  Noncancer control DNA samples were obtained from kConFab (190 age- and ethnicity-matched best friend controls) and from the Princess Anne Hospital, UK (237 Caucasian female volunteers, as described previously) [Baxter et al., 2002].  In most cases, DNA for mutation screening underwent whole-genome amplification (WGA) using the Repli-G Phi-mediated amplification system (Qiagen, Hilden, Germany) prior to mutation analysis. Primers were designed using the program Primer3 to screen the entire coding sequence and exon–intron boundaries and anneal at 60°C (http://frodo.wi.mit.edu/primer3/). Eleven primer pairs were used to amplify the nine coding exons of RAD51C with amplicons ranging in size from 199 to 303 bp for HRM analysis. Primer sequences and PCR conditions are available on request. HRM analysis and DNA resequencing were performed as described previously [Gorringe et al., 2008]. Variant positions were determined with reference to the following GenBank reference sequences, NG_023199.1 (DNA), NM_058216.1 (mRNA), and NP_478123.1 (protein). Nucleotide numbering reflects cDNA numbering with +1 corresponding to the A of the ATG translation initiation codon in the reference sequence, according to HGVS guidelines (www.hgvs.org/mutnomen). The initiation codon is codon 1. All novel variants were verified by Sanger resequencing in non-WGA DNA. Where deleterious RAD51C mutations were identified in a family, available formalin-fixed, paraffin-embedded (FFPE) tumor tissues were assessed for loss of the wild-type allele and cosegregation of genetic variants was assessed by Sanger resequencing. Tumor cells were needle dissected from 10-μm FFPE sections to obtain high-purity (>80%) tumor DNA. DNA was extracted from FFPE tissue using a modified Qiagen protocol as described previously [Jacobs et al., 2007].  The following in silico prediction tools were used to assess the likely functional effect of the missense variants identified in this study: SIFT (http://sift.jcvi.org/), PANTHER (http://www.pantherdb.org/tools/csnpScoreForm.jsp), PolyPhen-2 (http://genetics.bwh.harvard.edu/pph2/), SNPs&Go (http://snps-and-go.biocomp.unibo.it/snps-and-go/), MutPred (http://mutpred.mutdb.org/), nsSNP Analyzer (http://snpanalyzer.uthsc.edu/), and SNAP (http://rostlab.org/services/snap/). Human Splicing Finder (HSF) was used to assess the effect of all nontruncating variants on splice sites (http://www.umd.be/HSF/). P-values were calculated using two-tailed Fisher's exact tests.  Analysis of 1,053 HBC and 335 HBOC families and 267 unselected ovarian cancer cases identified 12 novel heterozygous variants in RAD51C, three of which were protein truncating, six nonsynonymous, one synonymous, and two noncoding. Numerous dbSNPs and variants from previous studies were also identified. Table 1 provides a summary of all detected variants.  Table 1. Summary of Germline RAD51C Variants  	 	 	 	 	 	HBC/HBOC families (n = 1,388)c	 	 	 	   	 	 	 	 	 	BC	BC/OC	OC	 	 	 	  Variant type	Sitea	Nucleotide changeb	Protein changeb	dbSNP (132)	Detected in previous RAD51C studies	(n = 1,053)	(n = 314)	(n = 21)	 	Controlsd	In silico prediction scoree	HSF splice analysisf aEx, exon; IVS, intervening sequence. bVariant positions are reported in reference to GenBank reference sequences NG_023199.1 (DNA) NM_058216.1 (mRNA) and NP_478123.1 (protein). Nucleotide numbering reflects cDNA position according HGVS recommendations. cBreast cancer only family (BC), ovarian cancer only family (OC), breast and ovarian cancer family (BC/OC) dThe numbers of controls examined varied by exon, as indicated for each variant. eNumber of in silico tools that predicted the missense variant to be pathogenic/number of in silico tools used to assess the variant. fHuman Splicing Finder (HSF) was used to assess the affect of each variant on consensus splice motifs. gIn addition to the noncoding variants listed, dbSNPs rs12946397 (c.1–26C>T) and rs28363318 (c.904+34T>C) were detected at frequencies greater than 0.26 and 0.11, respectively. hMeindl et al. [2010], Akbari et al. [2010], Wong et al. [2011], Romero et al. [2011]. iMeindl et al. [2010] jMeindl et al. [2010], Pelttari et al. [2011]. kMeindl et al. [2010], Akbari et al. [2010], Zheng et al. [2010], Romero et al. [2011], Pelttari et al. [2011]. lZheng et al. [2010]. mRomero et al. [2011]. Truncating	Ex1	c.68_72dup	p.Val25CysfsX3	No	No	-	-	1	-	0/427	-	-  	Ex2	c.230delG	p.Gly77ValfsX24	No	No	-	-	-	1	0/427	-	-  	Ex2	c.397C>T	p.Gln133X	No	No	-	1	-	-	0/427	-	- Nonsynonymous	Ex2	c.154A>C	p.Ile52Leu	No	No	-	-	-	-	1/427	0/6	No  	Ex2	c.308_310delTCT	p.Phe103del	No	No	1	-	-	-	0/427	-	No  	Ex2	c.341G>T	p.Gly114Val	No	No	-	-	-	1	0/427	6/6	No  	Ex2	c.376G>A	p.Ala126Thr	rs61758784	Yesh	15	-	-	5	3/427	1/6	No  	Ex3	c.485G>A	p.Gly162Glu	rs35151472	No	3	1	-	-	0/190	6/7	No  	Ex3	c.506T>C	p.Val169Ala	No	Yesi	1	-	-	1	0/190	2/6	No  	Ex3	c.523G>A	p.Ala175Thr	No	No	1	-	-	-	0/190	2/6	No  	Ex3	c.533A>C	p.Gln178Pro	No	No	-	1	-	-	0/190	2/5	No  	Ex5	c.745C>T	p.Arg249Cys	rs28363311	No	1	-	-	-	0/427	5/7	No  	Ex5	c.784T>G	p.Leu262Val	No	No	1	-	-	1	0/427	2/6	Possible new donor site  	Ex5	c.790G>A	p.Gly264Ser	No	Yesj	8	2	-	8	1/427	1/6	No  	Ex6	c.859A>G	p.Thr287Ala	rs28363317	Yesk	14	5	-	3	0/190	3/6	No Synonymous	Ex1	c.87T>C	p.(=)	No	No	-	-	-	-	1/190	-	No  	Ex2	c.195A>G	p.(=)	rs45511291	Yesl	2	1	-	-	0/427	-	No Noncodingg	IVS3	c.571+64C>A	p.(=)	No	Yesl	-	-	-	2	0/190	-	No  	IVS3	c.572–17G>T	p.(=)	No	Yesm	2	-	-	-	1/190	-	No  	IVS8	c.1026+23G>A	p.(=)	No	No	-	-	-	-	2/190	-	No Two truncating mutations, a 5-bp duplication (c.68_72dup) resulting in frameshift and premature protein termination (p.Val25CysfsX3) and a nonsense substitution (c.397C>T, p.Gln133X), were identified among the 1,388 familial cases. Consistent with the previously reported deleterious mutations, both variants were identified in families with at least one report of ovarian cancer. A third truncating variant, a single base pair deletion (c.230delG) also leading to frameshift and premature protein termination (p.Gly77ValfsX24), was identified in a high-grade serous tumor among the 267 unselected ovarian cancer cases.  The p.Gln133X variant was detected in a family with an extensive history of breast and ovarian cancer, including three women diagnosed with both breast and ovarian cancer and a fourth female with bilateral breast cancer (Fig. 1A). Three colorectal cancers were also reported; both of the cases for which germline DNA was available were carriers. Genotyping additional relatives for the variant revealed striking cosegregation with disease in the family, with all three breast and ovarian cancer affected individuals carrying the mutation. Attempts to determine whether there was loss of the wild-type allele by Sanger resequencing were unsuccessful due to the poor quality DNA obtained from the formalin-fixed tissue.  Figure 1.  Figure 1.  Open in figure viewer RAD51C mutations in HBOC cohort. Pedigrees for families carrying the (A) p.Gln133X nonsense and (B) p.Val25CysfsX3 frameshift mutations. Cancer type and age in years (y) at diagnosis (if known) are indicated underneath the symbol for each affected individual. Mutation status is indicated by the amino acid variation or wt (wild type). Current age (or age of death) is shown for cancer-unaffected mutation carriers and children of mutation carriers. The first tested individual (proband) is indicated with an arrow. In the p.Gln133X family (A), ovarian cancers were reported as a malignant cystadenoma (grade 3) and a malignant papillary serous adenocarcinoma (grade unknown) in the women diagnosed at 53 and 58 years, respectively. In the p.Val25CysfsX3 family (B), an undifferentiated adenocarcinoma was reported in the proband, and a serous cystadenocarcinoma in her sibling. The p.Val25CysfsX3 variant was detected in a family with two reports of ovarian cancer but no breast cancer, although other cancer types are reported including cancers of unknown origin (Fig. 1B). No additional blood samples or tumor blocks could be accessed for segregation or loss of heterozygosity (LOH) analyses.  No family history information was available for the unselected ovarian cancer case carrying the p.Gly77ValfsX24 variant. However, this individual had metachronous breast cancer, suggesting that the variant may confer significant cancer risk. Moreover, analysis of the ovarian tumor DNA revealed loss of the wild-type allele indicating complete loss of RAD51C function within the tumor cells.  Among the 11 missense variants and one in-frame deletion identified, six have not previously been reported. Five of these variants were detected in cases (p.Phe103del, p.Gly114Val, p.Ala175Thr, p.Gln178Pro, p.Leu262Val) and one in a control (p.Ile52Leu). Seven in silico prediction tools were used to assess the functional relevance of the 11 missense variants. Three missense variants, p.Gly114Val, p.Gly162Glu (rs35151472), and p.Arg249Cys (rs28363311), were predicted to affect function by 6/6, 6/7, and 5/7 algorithms, respectively (Table 1 and Supp. Table S1). In-frame deletion p.Phe103del could not be assessed using these tools. In addition, analysis of all nontruncating variants using HSF indicated the possible introduction of a cryptic donor site caused by novel missense variant c.784T>G (p.Leu262Val). No other splice alterations were predicted.  Four missense variants (p.Ala126Thr [rs61758784], p.Val169Ala, p.Gly264Ser, and p.Thr287Ala [rs28363317]) have been detected in other recent RAD51C mutation studies. Three of these variants, p.Ala126Thr (rs61758784), p.Gly264Ser, and p.Thr287Ala, are overrepresented among cases in this study. Missense variant p.Gly264Ser was reported by Meindl et al. to be significantly overrepresented among breast and ovarian cancer families (OR 3.44, 95% CI 1.51–7.80) and moreover, was shown experimentally to exhibit reduced function. This variant is not significantly overrepresented in our familial cohort (P = 0.475, OR 3.094, 95% CI 0.3947–24.25) but it is significantly overrepresented in the unselected ovarian cancer cohort compared to controls (P = 0.0027, OR = 13.16, CI 1.636–105.9), supporting the previously identified association.  The only novel synonymous variant (c.87T>C) was detected in a singleton control sample.  As is the case for most of chromosome 17, the RAD51C locus (17q25.1) is frequently affected by LOH in ovarian tumors [Gorringe et al., 2009]. We were therefore interested to find out whether RAD51C may be a target of inactivation in tumor cells via somatic mutation of the remaining allele. Analysis of 89 matched unselected ovarian tumors did not reveal any somatic mutations, suggesting this is not a frequent event in ovarian cancer.  The recent report by Meindl et al. demonstrated that germline mutations in RAD51C are associated with an increased risk of breast and ovarian cancer. However, the rarity of overtly deleterious mutations in RAD51C has made it difficult to predict the proportion of HBOC families that can be explained by this gene. In addition, Meindl et al. observed that deleterious mutations were found primarily in families with a history of breast and ovarian cancer but the subsequent smaller studies have not been sufficiently powered or configured to validate this association. Clarification of these issues has important implications as to whether and how RAD51C genetic testing should be implemented in familial cancer clinics as well as for understanding the molecular biology of RAD51C-mediated breast and ovarian cancer. Consequently, we have undertaken the largest single study to date of the frequency of germline RAD51C mutations in breast and ovarian cancer families as well as in unselected ovarian cancers.  We have identified two novel truncating mutations in our cohort of 1,388 HBC and HBOC families with both mutations being identified among the subset of 334 families affected by ovarian cancer. The frequency of truncating mutations identified in families with ovarian cancers in our study was 0.6%, which is less than the 1.3% reported by Meindl et al. but is consistent with some of the more recent studies. This disparity is likely due to chance but could also be influenced by differences in cohort acquisition or variant detection methods. Despite the rarity of deleterious mutations, our data are consistent with the conclusion that RAD51C protein truncating mutations predominate in families with a history of ovarian cancer (with or without breast cancer) and such mutations in breast cancer only families are likely to be extremely rare. Interestingly, the colorectal cancers reported in two RAD51C mutation carriers in the p.Gln133X family (Fig. 1A) suggest that there could be other cancers associated with RAD51C mutations, as has been reported for FA gene PALB2 [Jones et al., 2009].  In contrast to the findings of Meindl et al., we did not observe a significant overrepresentation of missense variant p.Gly264Ser in our familial cohort compared to healthy controls but we did observe a significant association in our ovarian cancers. While the numbers are small and did not reach statistical significance, it is interesting to note that both we and Meindl et al. observed an overrepresentation of the p.Ala126Thr variant among breast cancer only families raising the possibility that this variant may confer a lower penetrance risk for ovarian cancer. In addition, in silico analyses identify four variants that may be pathogenic (p.Gly114Val, p.Gly162Glu, p.Arg249Cys, and p.Leu262Val). Interestingly, two of these variants are reported in dbSNP; however, we did not detect these in any of our controls nor have they been reported in 1000 genomes data (http://browser.1000genomes.org, 1000 Genomes release—May 8, 2011) or in previous RAD51C mutation studies suggesting that these are very rare alleles. We note that Pang et al. [2011] also identified two novel missense variants (p.Arg2Gly and p.Asp215Gly) that are predicted to be pathogenic. Since in silico predictions are inconclusive, functional studies in conjunction with segregation analyses will be required to determine whether any of these variants are pathogenic.  The proportion of unselected invasive ovarian cancers that are accounted for by pathogenic germline mutations in BRCA1 and BRCA2 is estimated to be 13.3% [Zhang et al., 2011]. Our study, which is the first to comprehensively investigate germline mutations in unselected ovarian cancers, suggests that a further small proportion of cases are due to truncating mutations in RAD51C. In addition, a much larger proportion may be attributable to RAD51C if the currently unclassified missense variants are established to be pathogenic.  Finally, we noted with interest that among six granulosa cell tumors screened, two harbored the p.Gly264Ser variants and another harbored the p.Ala126Thr variant. With such limited numbers, and considering the uncertain relevance of these variants, it is not possible to know whether this observation is significant but it warrants further investigation.  Overall, our findings are consistent with truncating RAD51C mutations being associated with an increased familial risk of ovarian cancer (especially in the context of breast cancer) but that the frequency of these mutations is low (<1%). It is noteworthy from a clinical testing perspective that two of three of the truncating mutations were identified in women with metachronous breast and ovarian cancer. In contrast to the exclusive association of overtly deleterious mutations with ovarian cancer predisposition, our data suggest that some RAD51C missense variants may also be associated with breast cancer only families. Larger studies are required to extend the phenotype–genotype correlation in regard to tumor spectrum and penetrance associated with RAD51C variants prior to introduction of this test into the clinical diagnostic arena.  Purpose  The aim of this study was to estimate the contribution of deleterious mutations in the RAD51B, RAD51C, and RAD51D genes to invasive epithelial ovarian cancer (EOC) in the population and in a screening trial of individuals at high risk of ovarian cancer.  Patients and Methods  The coding sequence and splice site boundaries of the three RAD51 genes were sequenced and analyzed in germline DNA from a case-control study of 3,429 patients with invasive EOC and 2,772 controls as well as in 2,000 unaffected women who were BRCA1/BRCA2 negative from the United Kingdom Familial Ovarian Cancer Screening Study (UK_FOCSS) after quality-control analysis.  Results  In the case-control study, we identified predicted deleterious mutations in 28 EOC cases (0.82%) compared with three controls (0.11%; P < .001). Mutations in EOC cases were more frequent in RAD51C (14 occurrences, 0.41%) and RAD51D (12 occurrences, 0.35%) than in RAD51B (two occurrences, 0.06%). RAD51C mutations were associated with an odds ratio of 5.2 (95% CI, 1.1 to 24; P = .035), and RAD51D mutations conferred an odds ratio of 12 (95% CI, 1.5 to 90; P = .019). We identified 13 RAD51 mutations (0.65%) in unaffected UK_FOCSS participants (RAD51C, n = 7; RAD51D, n = 5; and RAD51B, n = 1), which was a significantly greater rate than in controls (P < .001); furthermore, RAD51 mutation carriers were more likely than noncarriers to have a family history of ovarian cancer (P < .001).  Conclusion  These results confirm that RAD51C and RAD51D are moderate ovarian cancer susceptibility genes and suggest that they confer levels of risk of EOC that may warrant their use alongside BRCA1 and BRCA2 in routine clinical genetic testing.  Go to: INTRODUCTION Epithelial ovarian cancer (EOC) has a significant heritable component. A woman with a single first-degree relative diagnosed with ovarian cancer has a three-fold increased risk of the disease.1,2 Twin studies suggest that most of the familial clustering results from inherited genetic factors.3 High-penetrance mutations in BRCA1 and BRCA2 are associated with the majority of breast-ovarian cancer syndrome occurrences.4–6 The cumulative estimated risks of ovarian cancer averaged across all possible polygenic risk modifiers by age 70 years are 36% in BRCA1 carriers and 12% in BRCA2 carriers.7  Other ovarian cancer susceptibility genes include the mismatch repair genes MSH6, MSH2, and MLH1,8 which also are associated with colorectal and endometrial cancers. Several common low-penetrance susceptibility alleles conferring relative risks (RRs) of less than 1.5-fold have been found using genome-wide association studies.9–17 The known high-risk susceptibility genes account for approximately 40% of the excess familial risk of EOC,18 whereas rare moderate-risk variants and common low-risk variants contribute less than 5%.15 Identification of additional susceptibility genes that confer RRs greater than 2 could decrease mortality as a result of ovarian cancer through surgical intervention (eg, risk-reducing salpingo-oophorectomy [RRSO]) in at-risk individuals. Recent advances in high-throughput next-generation sequencing technologies have enabled the rapid, targeted analysis of multiple candidate genes in large populations and have recently identified some novel susceptibility genes for ovarian cancer, including RAD51C,19 RAD51D,20 and BRIP1.21 Existing data suggest that the population prevalence of germline mutations in these genes is low, but the published risk estimates (albeit on the basis of small sample sizes) suggest genetic testing of these genes may have clinical utility. RAD51D mutations were associated with a 6.3-fold increase in risk (95% CI, 2.9 to 14),20 whereas BRIP1 mutations were associated with an 8.1-fold increased risk of ovarian cancer (95% CI, 4.7 to 14).21  The aims of this study were to establish the prevalence and penetrance of deleterious mutations in the three interacting double-strand DNA break repair genes RAD51B, RAD51C, and RAD51D.  Go to: PATIENTS AND METHODS Study Participants  The 3,447 confirmed invasive EOC cases and 2,812 unaffected controls were from four population-based ovarian cancer case-control studies (AOC [Australian Ovarian Cancer Study], MAL [Malignant Ovarian Cancer Study], SEA [Studies of Epidemiology and Risk Factors in Cancer Heredity], and UKO [United Kingdom Ovarian Cancer Population Study]), one clinic-based case-control study (MAYO [Mayo Clinic Ovarian Cancer Study]), one familial ovarian cancer series of cases and matched controls from Poland (POC [Poland ovarian cancer study]), and two familial ovarian cancer registries from the United Kingdom and United States (UKR [United Kingdom Familial Ovarian Cancer Registry] and GRR [Gilda Radner Familial Ovarian Cancer Registry]). These studies have been previously described (Table 1 and Appendix Table A1, online only). Forty-three duplicate samples and four RAD51C mutation–positive controls were included for quality control.  Table 1. Table 1. Study Patient Cases Sequenced for RAD51B, RAD51C, and RAD51D After Quality-Control Analysis Also included were 2,000 unaffected participants enrolled onto the United Kingdom Familial Ovarian Cancer Screening Study (UK_FOCSS).22 Eligible participants were women age ≥ 35, with an estimated lifetime risk of ovarian cancer of ≥ 10% on the basis of a family history of ovarian and/or breast cancer and/or the presence of known predisposing germline gene mutations (BRCA1, BRCA2, and MMR genes) in the family. Volunteers were recruited between June 2002 and September 2010 from 42 United Kingdom regional centers. All participants were tested for BRCA1 and BRCA2 mutations, and carriers were excluded from this study.  All studies had approval from the appropriate ethics committee, and all study participants provided written, informed consent.  Sequencing Library Preparation and Sequencing  We used the 48.48 Fluidigm Access Arrays (Fluidigm, San Francisco, CA) for target sequence enrichment, as described previously8 and according to the manufacturer's protocol. The RAD51 genes were in a panel of 11 genes sequenced in SEA and MAYO and in a panel of six genes in the remaining studies. The results for the other genes have been reported previously8 or are unpublished. Fifty-six primer pairs were designed to cover the exons and splice sites of RAD51B, RAD51C, and RAD51D (Appendix Table A2, online only) with a combined sequencing target of 4 kb. The primer design achieved greater than 95% coverage of the target sequence. Sequencing libraries were quantified by using a KAPA library quantification kit (Kapa Biosystems, Boston, MA) with specific probes for the ends of the adapters according to the manufacturer's protocol. The sequence libraries were sequenced using single-end sequencing on the Illumina GAII (Illumina, San Diego, CA) or paired end sequencing on the Illumina HiScan (Illumina) or Illumina HiSeq 2000 (Illumina) according to the manufacturer's protocol. Each lane sequenced 384 barcoded samples.  Sequence Data Analysis  Sequenced reads were demultiplexed with standard Illumina software. We used the Burrows-Wheeler Aligner (http://bio-bwa.sourceforge.net/)23 for sequencing read alignment against the human genome reference sequence (UCSC hg19; University of California Santa Cruz Genome Reference Consortium; http://genome.ucsc.edu/cgi-bin/hgGateway). The Genome Analysis Toolkit (GATK; https://www.broadinstitute.org/gatk/)24 was used for base quality-score recalibration, local insertion/deletion (indel) realignment, and variant (substitution and indel) discovery. Variants were considered only if they satisfied the set of recommended GATK filters, as described in the GATK best practices guide. ANNOVAR (http://annovar.openbioinformatics.org/en/latest/)25 was used to annotate the sequence variation detected. We used PolyPhen-2 (http://genetics.bwh.harvard.edu/pph2/bgi.shtml),26 SIFT (http://sift.bii.a-star.edu.sg/),27 and Provean (http://provean.jcvi.org/protein_batch_submit.php?species=human)28 to predict the function of missense variants. We used MaxEntScan (http://genetics.bwh.harvard.edu/pph2/bgi.shtml)29 to predict the pathogenic potential of possible splicing variants in sequences from 3 base pairs (bp) in the exon to 20 bp in the intron for the 3′ acceptor sites and 3 bp in the exon and 6 bp in the intron for the 5′ donor sites. Variants with a MaxEntScan score that decreased by more than 40% compared with the consensus sequence were assumed to affect splicing.  The alternate allele frequency (Altfreq) for each variant detected in each sample was defined as the fraction of alternative allele reads compared with the total number of reads at that position. We applied thresholds for variant calling, as defined previously8: With a minimum read depth of 15, alternate allele heterozygotes were called if the depth was ≥ 500 and the Altfreq was ≥ 10%; if the depth ranged from 250 to less than 500 and the Altfreq was ≥ 15%; if the depth ranged from 30 to less than 250 and the Altfreq was ≥ 20%; or if the depth ranged from 15 to less than 30 and the Altfreq was ≥ 30%. Samples with fewer than 80% of the target bases covered at a read depth of ≥ 15 (40 controls and 18 cases) were excluded. We defined deleterious variants as those predicted to result in protein truncation (frameshift indels, consensus splice site substitutions, and nonsense substitutions) or those missense mutations that have been previously reported as deleterious on the basis of in vitro analysis19,30 or predicted by MaxEntScan to affect splicing.  Ninety percent of the target sequence bases had read depths ≥ 15. The coverage for the three genes is summarized in Appendix Table A2. Concordance for variants called in the 43 duplicate samples was 100%. Four RAD51C mutation–positive controls also were detected.  Mutation Validation  We visually inspected the sequence alignments for all of the called deleterious variants by using the Integrative Genomics Viewer (Broad Institute, Cambridge, MA; https://www.broadinstitute.org/igv/). We validated all deleterious variants by polymerase chain reaction amplification and Sanger sequencing.31  Statistical Methods  We tested for an association between deleterious mutations and ovarian cancer risk by using unconditional logistic regression adjusted for the country of origin (Australia, Denmark, Poland, the United Kingdom, and the United States). Odds ratios and associated 95% CIs also were calculated with data from the case-control studies that were not family based (AOC, MAL, MAYO, SEA, and UKO).  We estimated the cumulative risk of ovarian cancer with equation 1 by applying the estimated odds ratio (RR) to population incidence data for England from 201132:  equation image See the Data Supplement for a spreadsheet with calculations.  We identified multiple missense variants that have unknown functional effects on the protein. We excluded all missense variants that had a minor allele frequency (MAF) of greater than 1% from additional analyses, because large-scale genome-wide association studies have shown that the RR conferred by a common susceptibility allele are small (RR < 1.3) and thus not detectable by the smaller sample size of this targeted-sequencing study. The statistical power to detect single rare alleles by association, even if they confer larger risk (RR > 2), is still modest. Therefore, we used the rare admixture likelihood (RAML) burden test33 to test for an association on a gene-by-gene basis. The RAML test combines the data for multiple variants and allows for alleles associated with either an increased or a decreased risk. We classified variants with an MAF ≤ 1% into three groups: deleterious variants as defined previously (these were excluded from the RAML analyses); variants predicted to have a damaging effect on protein function by at least two of three prediction tools (SIFT [score ≤ 0.05], PolyPhen-2 [classified as probably damaging/damaging], and Provean [score ≤ −2.5]); and variants with probable benign effects. Only patients who had a call rate greater than 80% for missense variants and variants that had a call rate greater than 80% and genotype frequencies consistent with the Hardy-Weinberg equilibrium (P > 10−5) were included in these analyses.  Go to: RESULTS Deleterious RAD51B, RAD51C, and RAD51D Mutations in Ovarian Cancer Cases and Controls  Sequence data for the coding regions and splice site boundaries of RAD51B, RAD51C, and RAD51D were available for 3,429 invasive EOC cases and 2,772 controls after quality control (Table 1). We identified 135 unique variants, of which eight (5.9%) were frameshift indels, 10 (7.4%) were nonsense substitutions, five (3.7%) were predicted splice site alterations, and 113 (78%) were missense substitutions. Of the 113 missense variants, one (RAD51C 428A>G) was deleterious,30 105 had an MAF less than 1%, and seven (5.1%) had an MAF greater than 1%.  We identified deleterious mutations in two cases for RAD51B, 14 cases and two controls for RAD51C, and 12 cases and one control for RAD51D. Of these, 23 deleterious mutation carriers were identified in 3,135 cases (0.73%) unselected for family history (Table 2 and Appendix Table A3, online only). One case had two deleterious mutations close to each other and in cis (G217X and Q219X) in RAD51D. The prevalence of deleterious mutations was significantly higher (P < .001) in cases (28 of 3,429; 0.82%) than in controls (three of 2,772; 0.11%). Eight deleterious mutations were detected in more than one individual. Three of these (RAD51C 732delT and A428G and RAD51D C898T) were identified in a case and a control. Of the 29 predicted deleterious variants in cases, 22 (76%) were frameshift indels or nonsense variants, six (21%) were splice site substitutions, and one (3.4%) was a missense variant previously reported as deleterious.30  Table 2. Table 2. Mutation Carriers Identified in RAD51B, RAD51C, and RAD51D in Ovarian Cancer Patient Cases and Controls We also evaluated the prevalence of RAD51B, RAD51C, and RAD51D variants in 2,000 individuals from UK_FOCSS. We identified 149 unique variants, of which three (2.0%) were frameshift indels, three (2.0%) were nonsense substitutions, two (1.3%) were predicted splice site alterations, and 141 (95%) were missense substitutions. Thirteen participants carried one of the eight different deleterious mutations in one of these genes (one in RAD51B, seven in RAD51C, and five in RAD51D). The overall prevalence (0.65%) was significantly greater than that of the general population controls (P < .001; Table 3).  Table 3. Table 3. Characteristics of the United Kingdom Familial Ovarian Cancer Screening Study Mutation Carriers Ovarian Cancer Risks Associated With RAD51B, RAD51C, and RAD51D Mutations  The odds ratio (adjusted for country of origin) associated with a deleterious mutation in any of the three genes was 8.1 (95% CI, 2.4 to 27; P = .001) for all ovarian cancer subtypes and 9.3 (95% CI, 2.7 to 32; P < .001) for the serous subtype. Gene-specific odds ratios (adjusted for country of origin) for all ovarian cancer subtypes were 5.2 for RAD51C (95% CI, 1.1 to 24; P = .035) and 12 for RAD51D (95% CI, 1.5 to 90; P = .019). Gene-specific odds ratios for the serous subtype were 7.4 for RAD51C (95% CI, 1.6 to 35; P = .011) and 12 for RAD51D (95% CI, 1.5 to 97; P = .021). The estimated average cumulative risks of ovarian cancer by age 50 were 1.3% (95% CI, 0.3% to 6.0%) for RAD51C and 3.0% (95% CI, 0.4% to 21%) for RAD51D. The equivalent risks by age 70 were 5.2% (95% CI, 1.1% to 22%) for RAD51C and 12% (95% CI, 1.5% to 60%) for RAD51D.  Clinicopathologic Characteristics Associated With RAD51B, RAD51C, and RAD51D Mutations  The clinical and histopathologic characteristics of all patient cases are listed in Appendix Table A1. Mutation carriers were more likely than noncarriers to have high-grade serous versus other histologic subtypes (P = .046; Table 4). Eighteen percent of mutation carriers were diagnosed at ages 40 to 49 years, and no mutation carrier was diagnosed with ovarian cancer before age 40 years (Table 4). Carriers of a mutation in any of the RAD51 genes were more likely than noncarriers to have a family history of ovarian cancer, although this difference was not statistically significant (24% v 14%; P = .16 for all genes). The proportion of RAD51C mutation carriers with a family history was higher (36%; P = .021; Table 5). In UK_FOCSS participants, mutation carriers were also more likely than noncarriers to be associated with a family history of ovarian cancer (Table 3); 9 of 13 mutation carriers (69%) compared with 548 of 1,987 noncarriers (28%) had a family history comprising two or more ovarian cancer cases in first- or second-degree relatives (P < .001).  Table 4. Table 4. Mutation Status by Age at Disease Onset and Histologic Subtype in Patient Cases With Ovarian Cancer Table 5. Table 5. Mutation Status by First Degree of Family History of Breast and/or Ovarian Cancer in Patient Cases With Ovarian Cancer RAD51B, RAD51C, and RAD51D Missense Variants and Ovarian Cancer Risk  We used three bioinformatics tools (SIFT, PolyPhen-2, and Provean) to predict the effects on protein function of 112 missense variants. Thirty missense variants were classified as deleterious by all three tools, 12 missense variants by at least two of three tools, and 15 variants by one of three tools; 55 missense variants were predicted to be neutral by all three tools (Appendix Table A4). For the 38 missense variants with an MAF ≤ 1% and predicted by at least two of three tools to have a functional effect, we compared the relative burden in cases and controls for each gene with the RAML test.33 We found some evidence for an association of the rare missense variation in RAD51C with an increased risk of ovarian cancer for all ovarian cancer subtypes (RAML test P = .029), and the effect was stronger for the serous subtype (RAML test P < .001). We also found some evidence of an association of missense variants in RAD51D with an increased risk of serous ovarian cancer (P = .012). There was little evidence of an association of rare missense variants in RAD51B and RAD51D with all ovarian cancer subtypes or in RAD51B with serous ovarian cancer (P > .05).  Go to: DISCUSSION To our knowledge, this study is the largest population-based ovarian cancer study to date to estimate the prevalence of mutations in the RAD51B, RAD51C, and RAD51D genes. Overall, 0.81% of EOC cases had a mutation in one of these three genes compared with 0.11% in controls. Our data suggest that both RAD51C and RAD51D are ovarian cancer susceptibility genes; however, RAD51B mutations are unlikely to contribute substantially to ovarian cancer risk.  Several other studies have reported on the prevalence of germline genetic variations in these genes (Appendix Table A5). However, for most of these, the ascertainment of cases was complex: several sequenced an affected proband (either breast or ovarian cancer) from a family with multiple cases of breast and/or ovarian cancer. Six studies sequenced RAD51C in ovarian cancer cases unselected for family history,34–39 but only one of these carried out equivalent sequencing of controls.34 Three studies sequenced RAD51D in unselected ovarian cancer cases,36,40,41 but none of these sequenced the whole gene in controls. In these studies, the mutation frequency in cases ranged from 0.4% to 1.1% for RAD51C and 0.8% to 1.1% for RAD51D.  In this study, the mutation frequency in cases unselected for family history was 0.32% for RAD51C and 0.35% in RAD51D. These are likely to be underestimates of the true mutation frequencies. Our next-generation sequencing approach enabled rapid and high-throughput analysis of candidate genes in thousands of samples but did not provide complete coverage of all genes in all samples (mean coverage per sample, 90%). Also, we used polymerase chain reaction–based enrichment of candidate gene coding regions; any deleterious mutations occurring outside these regions (eg, large genomic deletions and rearrangements) would not have been detected. Finally, we did not include missense variants in our prevalence estimates, because we could not be certain of their pathogenicity in the absence of definitive functional assays. However, burden tests for RAD51C and RAD51D variants indicate that rare missense variants that are predicted to disrupt protein function are significantly more prevalent in cases than controls, which suggests that at least a proportion of these variants is deleterious.  High-grade serous ovarian cancer (HGSOC) is the most common ovarian cancer subtype, and mutations were more prevalent in patients with HGSOC (1.1%) than in other subtypes (0.49%). This finding, perhaps, is expected, because deficiency of double-strand DNA break repair by homologous recombination as a result of germline mutations in BRCA1 or BRCA2 also is associated with HGSOC.8,42  Although there are similarities in the functional mechanisms associated with the RAD51 genes and BRCA1/BRCA2, the genetic epidemiology suggests there are also differences. For example, BRCA1 and BRCA2 mutations confer risks of both breast and ovarian cancer, but there is little evidence from other studies that RAD51C or RAD51D mutations confer increased risks of breast cancer. The location of truncating mutations in BRCA1/BRCA2 is associated with variable risks of breast and ovarian cancer.43,44 All except two of the predicted truncating mutations identified in RAD51C were located between amino acid 143 and 319 in a functional domain in the C terminus of the protein (residues 79 to 376).45 This domain is important for forming the RAD51B-RAD51C-RAD51D-XRCC2 and RAD51C-XRCC3 complexes. Likewise, all of the deleterious mutations identified in RAD51D were clustered in the C-terminal region (residues 77 to 328), which affects binding to RAD51C and likely impairs double-strand DNA break repair45 (Fig 1).  Fig 1. Fig 1. Distribution of predicted deleterious variants in RAD51B, RAD51C, and RAD51D. The location of each mutation is shown in the exon structure of the coding sequence. Mutations occurring in multiple individuals are indicated with the number of carriers above ... Our RR estimate for RAD51D is similar to that reported previously by Loveday et al20 (6.3; 95% CI, 2.9 to 14) on the basis of the analysis of families with multiple cases of ovarian cancer. Our RR estimate for RAD51C is similar to those reported by Pelttari et al35 (6.3; 95% CI, 1.2 to 35) for unselected ovarian cancer. The wide CIs of risk estimates for both genes suggest that caution needs to be applied if the genes are used clinically for genetic risk prediction. In addition, the fact that 18% of ovarian cancers in women carrying RAD51C and RAD51D mutations occurred at younger than 50 years (Table 4) suggests that, if risk estimates were confirmed, offering premenopausal women the option of RRSO should be considered. If clinical testing for RAD51C and RAD51D was approved, women could undergo panel testing for multiple susceptibility genes, and carriers, along with their relatives, could be offered RRSO.  In summary, we estimate that RAD51B, RAD51C, and RAD51D are responsible for approximately one in every 90 high-grade serous EOC occurrences and one in every 120 EOC occurrences. In addition to the benefit of mutation testing of RAD51C and RAD51D for disease prevention, mutation carriers also may be responsive to treatment with poly(ADP-ribose) polymerase inhibitors, which results in synthetic lethality of cells that have mutant homologous recombination or double-strand DNA break repair. This treatment might improve progression-free survival among these patients. Hence, such testing may be useful in patient decision making.  Go to: Acknowledgment We thank all of the study participants who contributed to this study and all of the researchers, clinicians, and technical and administrative staff who made this work possible. In particular, we thank the clinical and scientific collaborators listed at http://www.aocstudy.org/; E. Wozniak, A. Ryan, J. Ford, and N. Balogun (United Kingdom Ovarian Cancer Population Study); C. Pye (United Kingdom Familial Ovarian Cancer Registry); Marie Mack, Craig Luccarini, Caroline Baynes, the SEARCH team, and Eastern Cancer Registration and Information Centre (SEARCH); and Source BioScience laboratories in the United Kingdom at which some of the sequencing was performed.  Go to: Glossary Terms allele:	an alternative form of a gene (in diploids, one member of a pair) that is located at a specific position on a specific chromosome. missense mutation:	a change (mutation) in one nucleotide that results in the coding of a different amino acid. penetrance:	the likelihood that a given gene mutation will produce disease. This likelihood is calculated by examining the proportion of people with the particular genetic mutation that show symptoms of disease. Go to: Appendix Table A1.  Characteristic	No. (%) of Patients by Study No. (%) of Total Patients (N = 3,429) AOC (n = 413)	GRR (n = 157)	MAL (n = 190)	MAYO (n = 912)	POC (n = 89)	SEA (n = 1,259)	UKR (n = 48)	UKO (n = 361) Mean (range) age at diagnosis, years	60.1 (23-79)	49.4 (21-83)	61.7 (38-80)	62.5 (23-91)	51.1 (21-77)	56.0 (19-74)	53.0 (24-77)	61.2 (25-90)	58.7 (19-91) Morphology									     High-grade serous	359 (87)	54 (34)	137 (72)	654 (72)	26 (29)	341 (27)	17 (35)	266 (74)	1,806 (53)     Low-grade serous	24 (5.8)	6 (3.8)	18 (9.5)	26 (2.9)	5 (5.6)	275 (22)	2 (4.2)	21 (5.8)	405 (12)     Serous	14 (3.4)	34 (22)	12 (6.3)	0	10 (11)	0	6 (13)	58 (16)	151 (4.4)     Endometrioid	3 (0.73)	19 (12)	13 (6.8)	110 (12)	13 (15)	214 (17)	5 (10)	6 (1.7)	383 (11)     Clear cell	3 (0.73)	12 (7.6)	6 (3.2)	55 (6.0)	1 (1.1)	144 (11)	2 (4.2)	2 (0.55)	225 (6.6)     Mucinous	2 (0.48)	8 (5.1)	2 (1.1)	25 (3.7)	9 (10)	116 (9.2)	3 (6.3)	1 (0.28)	166 (4.8)     Mixed	6 (1.5)	2 (1.3)	0	31 (3.4)	1 (1.1)	70 (5.6)	1 (2.1)	5 (1.4)	116 (3.4)     Other	1 (0.24)	21 (13)	0	11 (1.2)	24 (27)	79 (6.3)	11 (23)	2 (0.55)	152 (4.4)     Undifferentiated	1 (0.24)	1 (0.64)	2 (1.1)	0	0	20 (1.6)	1 (2.1)	0	25 (0.73)     Unknown	359 (87)	54 (34)	137 (72)	654 (72)	26 (29)	341 (27)	17 (35)	266 (74)	1,806 (53) Stage*									     1	17 (4.1)	0	10 (5.3)	141 (15)	3 (3.4)	442 (35)	2 (4.2)	27 (7.5)	642 (19)     2	35 (8.5)	0	31 (16)	51 (5.6)	2 (2.3)	115 (9.1)	2 (4.2)	71 (20)	307 (9.0)     3	359 (87)	0	149 (78)	709 (78)	9 (10)	431 (34)	9 (19)	244 (67)	1,910 (56)     Unknown	2 (0.48)	157 (100)	0	11 (1.2)	75 (84)	271 (22)	35 (73)	19 (5.3)	570 (17) Grade									     Low	28 (6.8)	18 (11)	42 (22)	128 (14)	12 (13)	411 (33)	7 (15)	24 (6.6)	670 (20)     High	370 (90)	74 (47)	135 (71)	754 (83)	41 (46)	670 (53)	28 (58)	275 (76)	2,347 (68)     Unknown	15 (3.6)	65 (41)	13 (6.8)	30 (3.3)	36 (40)	178 (14)	13 (27)	62 (17)	412 (15) Characteristics of the Patients With Ovarian Cancer  Abbreviations: AOC, Australian Ovarian Cancer Study; GRR, Gilda Radner Familial Ovarian Cancer Registry; MAL, Malignant Ovarian Cancer Study; MAYO, Mayo Clinic Ovarian Cancer Study; POC, Poland Ovarian Cancer Study; SEA, Studies of Epidemiology and Risk Factors in Cancer Heredity; UKO, United Kingdom Ovarian Cancer Population Study; UKR, United Kingdom Familial Ovarian Cancer Registry.  *Stages were defined as follows: 1, localized; 2, regional; and 3, distant. Table A2.  Gene	Accession No.	No. of Coding Exons	Total Coding Length (bp)*	No. of Amplicons Designed	% Coding Sequence* Covered by Design	Mean % Sequence Covered by Read Depth > 15 RAD51B	NM_133509	10	1,389	23	97	85 RAD51C	NM_058216	9	1,339	19	97	93 RAD51D	NM_002878	10	1,221	14	95	90 Sequencing Coverage by Gene  Abbreviation: bp, base pair.  *The sequence also contains 20 bp in the intron for the 3′ acceptor sites and 6 bp in the intron for the donor 5′ sites. Table A3.  Study and Patient Group	Gene	cDNA Change	Location	Protein Change	Predicted Function	Ref. Age, Years	Ovarian Cancer FH1*	Breast Cancer FH1*	Grade Group	Histology Group Control										     SEA	RAD51C	428A>G	Exon 3	Q143R	Missense	51	0	0		     SEA	RAD51C	732delT	Exon 5	I244fs	Frameshift deletion	56	0	0		     AOC	RAD51D	898C>T	Exon 9	R300X	Nonsense	49	0	1		 Patient case										     AOC	RAD51B	489T>G	Exon 6	Y163X	Nonsense	62			2	Serous HG     SEA	RAD51B	957G>C	Exon 9	Q319H	Splicing	61	0	0	2	Other     SEA	RAD51C	428A>G	Exon 3	Q143R	Missense	49	0	0	1	Serous LG     MAL	RAD51C	498delT	Exon 3	V166fs	Frameshift deletion	52	0	0	2	Serous HG     SEA	RAD51C	572-1G>T	Intron 3		Splicing	54	0	0	2	Serous HG     POC	RAD51C	577C>T	Exon 4	R193X	Nonsense	60				Other     POC	RAD51C	577C>T	Exon 4	R193X	Nonsense	41	1		2	Serous HG     AOC	RAD51C	653_654del	Exon 4	218_218del	Frameshift deletion	64	0	0	2	Serous HG     UKO	RAD51C	706-2A>G	Intron 4		Splicing	65	1	0	2	Serous HG     UKR	RAD51C	706-2A>G	Intron 4		Splicing	50	1		2	Serous HG     SEA	RAD51C	732delT	Exon 5	I244fs	Frameshift deletion	48	0	0	2	Serous HG     MAYO	RAD51C	774delT	Exon 5	R258fs	Frameshift deletion	55	0	1	2	Clear cell     POC	RAD51C	905-2delAG	Intron 6		Splicing	52	1			Endometrioid     AOC	RAD51C	955C>T	Exon 7	R319X	Nonsense	74	0	1	2	Serous HG     AOC	RAD51C	955C>T	Exon 7	R319X	Nonsense	40	0	1	2	Serous HG     SEA	RAD51C	97C>T	Exon 1	Q33X	Nonsense	61	0	0	2	Serous HG     UKR	RAD51D	478C>T	Exon 5	Q160X	Nonsense	56	1	0	2	Serous HG     MAL	RAD51D	564_567del	Exon 6	188_189del	Frameshift deletion	59			2	Serous HG     MAL	RAD51D	564_567del	Exon 6	188_189del	Frameshift deletion	76			2	Serous HG     SEA	RAD51D	564delT	Exon 6	T188fs	Frameshift deletion	59	0	0	2	Serous HG     SEA	RAD51D	576 + 1G>A	Intron 6		Splicing	66	0	0	2	Endometrioid     UKO	RAD51D	620C>A	Exon 7	S207X	Nonsense	59	0	0	2	Serous HG     SEA	RAD51D	623dupT	Exon 7	V208fs	Frameshift insertion	54	0	1	2	Serous HG     MAYO	RAD51D	655C>T/649G>T	Exon 7	G217X/Q219X	Nonsense	73	0	0	2	Serous HG     SEA	RAD51D	741_742insTG	Exon 9	T248_N249delinsX	Nonsense	56	0	0	2	Endometrioid     SEA	RAD51D	748delC	Exon 9	H250fs	Frameshift deletion	67	0	0	2	Serous HG     SEA	RAD51D	748delC	Exon 9	H250fs	Frameshift deletion	47	0	0	2	Serous HG     SEA	RAD51D	898C>T	Exon 9	R300X	Nonsense	62	0	0	2	Endometrioid View it in a separate window Predicted Deleterious Mutations Found in RAD51B, RAD51C, and RAD51D  Abbreviations: AOC, Australian Ovarian Cancer Study; GRR, Gilda Radner Familial Ovarian Cancer Registry; MAL, Malignant Ovarian Cancer Study; MAYO, Mayo Clinic Ovarian Cancer Study; POC, Poland Ovarian Cancer Study; SEA, Studies of Epidemiology and Risk Factors in Cancer Heredity; Serous HG, high-grade serous; Serous LG, low-grade serous; UKO, United Kingdom Ovarian Cancer Population Study; UKR, United Kingdom Familial Ovarian Cancer Registry.  *First degree of family history. Table A4.  Gene and Variant Type	Chromosome	Position	cDNA	Exon	Protein	SIFT*	PolyPhen-2†	Provean‡	Score§	No. of Controls‖	No. of Patient Cases¶ Common variant (MAF ≥ 1%; n = 7)											     RAD51B	14	68352648	515T>G	Exon 6	L172W	1	1	0	2	64	69     RAD51B	14	68353893	728A>G	Exon 7	K243R	1	1	0	2	57	82     RAD51B	14	69061259	1094C>G	Exon 11	P365R	0	1	0	1	119	148     RAD51C	17	56772522	376G>A	Exon 2	A126T	0	0	0	0	31	37     RAD51C	17	56798128	859A>G	Exon 6	T287A	1	1	1	3	44	63     RAD51D	17	33433487	494G>A	Exon 6	R165Q	0	0	0	0	536	780     RAD51D	17	33430313	698A>G	Exon 8	E233G	0	1	1	2	90	124 Potentially deleterious rare variant (n = 38)#											     RAD51B	14	68331751	347A>G	Exon 5	Q116R	1	1	1	3	0	1     RAD51B	14	68331826	422T>A	Exon 5	I141N	1	1	1	3	1	0     RAD51B	14	68331829	425A>G	Exon 5	D142G	1	1	1	3	1	0     RAD51B	14	68352608	475C>T	Exon 6	R159C	1	1	1	3	0	2     RAD51B	14	68352609	476G>A	Exon 6	R159H	1	1	1	3	0	1     RAD51B	14	68352686	553T>G	Exon 6	C185G	0	1	1	2	1	1     RAD51B	14	68353814	649A>G	Exon 7	R217G	1	1	1	3	0	1     RAD51B	14	68878170	883G>A	Exon 9	A295T	1	1	1	3	0	1     RAD51B	14	68878171	884C>T	Exon 9	A295V	1	0	1	2	1	0     RAD51C	17	56770081	77A>T	Exon 1	K26M	1	1	1	3	0	1     RAD51C	17	56770084	80T>C	Exon 1	L27P	1	1	1	3	0	1     RAD51C	17	56772417	271C>T	Exon 2	L91F	1	1	1	3	0	1     RAD51C	17	56772481	335G>T	Exon 2	G112V	1	1	1	3	0	1     RAD51C	17	56772540	394A>C	Exon 2	T132P	1	1	1	3	0	1     RAD51C	17	56772543	397C>A	Exon 2	Q133K	1	1	1	3	0	1     RAD51C	17	56774068	419T>G	Exon 3	V140G	1	1	1	3	0	1     RAD51C	17	56774134	485G>A	Exon 3	G162E	1	1	1	3	1	0     RAD51C	17	56774146	497T>G	Exon 3	V166G	1	0	1	2	0	1     RAD51C	17	56780662	677T>C	Exon 4	L226P	1	1	1	3	0	1     RAD51C	17	56787260	746G>A	Exon 5	R249H	0	1	1	2	1	0     RAD51C	17	56787349	835G>C	Exon 5	A279P	1	1	1	3	0	1     RAD51C	17	56809885	1006A>C	Exon 8	T336P	1	0	1	2	0	1     RAD51D	17	33446607	26G>C	Exon 1	C9S	1	0	1	2	2	5     RAD51D	17	33445598	185C>T	Exon 3	S62L	1	0	1	2	1	0     RAD51D	17	33445581	202G>A	Exon 3	G68S	1	1	1	3	0	1     RAD51D	17	33434138	349T>A	Exon 5	C117S	1	1	1	3	0	1     RAD51D	17	33434081	406G>C	Exon 5	D136H	1	1	1	3	0	1     RAD51D	17	33433490	491T>C	Exon 6	L164P	1	1	1	3	0	1     RAD51D	17	33433488	493C>T	Exon 6	R165W	1	1	1	3	1	0     RAD51D	17	33433448	533T>G	Exon 6	M178R	1	0	1	2	1	1     RAD51D	17	33430511	629C>T	Exon 7	A210V	1	1	1	3	0	2     RAD51D	17	33430487	653G>A	Exon7	G218D	1	1	1	3	0	1     RAD51D	17	33430296	715C>T	Exon 8	R239W	1	1	1	3	0	1     RAD51D	17	33428338	785C>T	Exon 9	P262L	1	1	1	3	0	1     RAD51D	17	33428330	793G>A	Exon 9	G265R	1	1	1	3	2	0     RAD51D	17	33428309	814C>T	Exon 9	P272S	1	1	1	3	1	0     RAD51D	17	33428300	823C>T	Exon 9	R275W	1	1	1	3	0	1     RAD51D	17	33428015	944G>A	Exon 10	G315E	1	0	1	2	1	0 Probably benign rare variant (n = 67)											     RAD51B	14	68290285	25G>A	Exon 2	V9M	0	0	0	0	1	0     RAD51B	14	68290324	64C>T	Exon 2	H22Y	0	0	0	0	0	1     RAD51B	14	68292196	100T>C	Exon 3	S34P	0	1	0	1	1	0     RAD51B	14	68292283	187A>G	Exon 3	K63E	0	0	0	0	1	1     RAD51B	14	68301803	205G>A	Exon 4	G69R	0	0	0	0	2	0     RAD51B	14	68301820	222G>T	Exon 4	R74S	0	0	1	1	1	0     RAD51B	14	68301824	226G>A	Exon 4	A76T	0	0	0	0	0	1     RAD51B	14	68301830	232T>C	Exon 4	F78L	0	0	0	0	0	1     RAD51B	14	68301863	265G>A	Exon 4	A89T	0	0	0	0	0	1     RAD51B	14	68301872	274G>A	Exon 4	E92K	0	0	0	0	1	1     RAD51B	14	68301894	296C>T	Exon 4	A99V	1	0	0	1	0	1     RAD51B	14	68331763	359T>C	Exon 5	M120T	0	0	0	0	1	0     RAD51B	14	68331840	436G>A	Exon 5	A146T	0	1	0	1	1	1     RAD51B	14	68352659	526A>G	Exon 6	K176E	1	0	0	1	1	0     RAD51B	14	68352672	539A>G	Exon 6	Y180C	0	0	0	0	20	39     RAD51B	14	68353784	619G>T	Exon 7	V207L	0	0	0	0	17	22     RAD51B	14	68353913	748T>G	Exon 7	S250A	0	0	0	0	0	2     RAD51B	14	68878147	860C>A	Exon9	S287Y	1	0	0	1	0	1     RAD51B	14	68878180	893A>G	Exon 9	N298S	0	1	0	1	0	1     RAD51B	14	68878224	937C>G	Exon 9	L313V	0	0	0	0	0	1     RAD51B	14	68934949	1018G>C	Exon 10	E340Q	0	0	0	0	2	0     RAD51B	14	68934959	1028T>C	Exon 10	V343A	0	0	0	0	0	1     RAD51B	14	69061225	1060C>G	Exon 11	Q354E	0	0	0	0	1	0     RAD51B	14	69061226	1061A>C	Exon 11	Q354P	0	0	0	0	1	0     RAD51B	14	69061228	1063G>A	Exon 11	A355T	0	0	0	0	13	21     RAD51C	17	56770011	7G>A	Exon 1	G3R	0	0	0	0	0	1     RAD51C	17	56770018	14C>T	Exon 1	T5M	1	0	0	1	1	0     RAD51C	17	56770036	32A>G	Exon 1	Q11R	0	0	0	0	0	1     RAD51C	17	56770131	127C>T	Exon 1	P43S	0	0	1	1	0	1     RAD51C	17	56772345	199G>A	Exon 2	E67K	0	0	0	0	0	1     RAD51C	17	56772359	213T>A	Exon 2	N71K	0	0	0	0	1	0     RAD51C	17	56772390	244C>A	Exon 2	H82N	0	0	0	0	0	1     RAD51C	17	56772398	252G>T	Exon 2	K84N	0	0	0	0	0	1     RAD51C	17	56772504	358A>G	Exon 2	T120A	0	0	0	0	1	0     RAD51C	17	56774057	408G>A	Exon 3	M136I	0	0	0	0	1	0     RAD51C	17	56774080	431T>C	Exon 3	I144T	0	0	1	1	1	0     RAD51C	17	56774142	493A>T	Exon 3	M165L	0	0	0	0	1	2     RAD51C	17	56774155	506T>C	Exon 3	V169A	0	0	0	0	1	0     RAD51C	17	56774158	509T>G	Exon 3	V170G	0	0	1	1	1	1     RAD51C	17	56774170	521C>G	Exon 3	T174S	0	0	0	0	0	1     RAD51C	17	56774214	565G>A	Exon 3	G189R	0	0	0	0	0	1     RAD51C	17	56780592	607A>G	Exon 4	N203D	0	0	0	0	0	1     RAD51C	17	56780605	620A>G	Exon 4	H207R	0	0	0	0	0	1     RAD51C	17	56787298	784T>G	Exon 5	L262V	0	0	0	0	1	4     RAD51C	17	56787304	790G>A	Exon 5	G264S	0	0	1	1	19	23     RAD51C	17	56798141	872A>T	Exon 6	D291V	0	0	0	0	1	0     RAD51C	17	56801448	952G>A	Exon 7	D318N	0	0	0	0	0	1     RAD51C	17	56801452	956G>A	Exon 7	R319Q	0	0	0	0	1	1     RAD51C	17	56811513	1061C>T	Exon 9	A354V	0	0	0	0	0	1     RAD51C	17	56811542	1090A>G	Exon 9	S364G	0	0	0	0	1	0     RAD51D	17	33446566	67C>T	Exon 1	H23Y	0	0	0	0	1	1     RAD51D	17	33446143	131G>A	Exon 2	G44D	0	0	0	0	0	1     RAD51D	17	33446143	131G>C	Exon 2	G44A	0	0	0	0	0	1     RAD51D	17	33445575	208G>A	Exon 3	D70N	0	0	1	1	0	1     RAD51D	17	33434132	355T>C	Exon 5	C119R	0	0	0	0	2	2     RAD51D	17	33434093	394G>A	Exon 5	V132I	1	0	0	1	0	2     RAD51D	17	33433451	530A>G	Exon 6	Q177R	0	0	0	0	2	0     RAD51D	17	33433447	534G>C	Exon 6	M178I	0	0	0	0	1	0     RAD51D	17	33433446	535C>G	Exon 6	L179V	0	0	0	0	0	1     RAD51D	17	33433413	568G>A	Exon 6	A190T	0	0	0	0	0	2     RAD51D	17	33428370	753A>G	Exon 9	I251M	0	0	0	0	0	1     RAD51D	17	33428279	844G>A	Exon 9	E282K	0	0	0	0	0	1     RAD51D	17	33428261	862G>C	Exon 9	G288R	0	0	0	0	0	1     RAD51D	17	33428251	872G>A	Exon 9	R291H	0	0	0	0	1	0     RAD51D	17	33428245	878C>T	Exon 9	A293V	0	0	0	0	1	0     RAD51D	17	33428037	922A>G	Exon 10	M308V	0	0	0	0	0	1     RAD51D	17	33428022	937A>G	Exon 10	T313A	0	0	0	0	1	0 View it in a separate window Catalog of Missense Mutations Found in RAD51B, RAD51C, and RAD51D  *SIFT: 0, tolerated; 1, not tolerated. †PolyPhen-2: 0, benign/possibly damaging; 1, probably damaging. ‡Provean: 0, neutral; 1, deleterious. §Score: number of algorithms (SIFT/PolyPhen-2/Provean) that predict deleterious effect of the missense variant. ‖No. of times the variant was identified in controls. ¶No. of times the variant was identified in controls. #At least two of three prediction algorithms predict deleterious effect on protein function. Table A5.  Study and Location by Gene	No. of Patients Analyzed No. (%) of RAD51 Mutations Identified Total	BC	BC/OC	OC	uOC	Controls*	Total	BC	BC/OC	OC	uOC	Controls* RAD51C												     Germany19	1,100	620	480	0	0	480 + 2,432†	6 (0.5)		6 (1.25)	0	0	0     Untied States (Zheng et al)‡	92	0	92	0	0	0	0	0	0	0	0	0     Canada (Akbari et al)‡	454	NS	NS	NS	0	0	0	NS	NS	NS	0	     Finland35	2,747	130 + 2,061†	139	8	409†	2,086†	8 (0.3)	0	2 (1.4)	2 (25)	4† (1.0)	2† (0.1)     Finland and Sweden38	1,704	1,105†	35	0	232 + 332†	871†	2 (0.1)	0	1 (2.8)	0	1 (0.4) + 0†	0†     United States (Clague et al)‡	286	133	34	119	0	0	0	0	0	0	0	0     Australia37	1,655	1,053	314	21	267	427	3 (0.2)	0	1 (0.3)	1 (4.8)	1 (0.4)	0     The Netherlands and Canada (De Leeneer et al)‡	351	0	239	112	0	0	0	0	0	0	0	0     Spain30	785	485	300	0	0	500	5 (0.6)	1 (0.2)	4 (1.3)	0	0	0     United States (Lu et al)‡	192	157	35	0	0	0	0	0	0	0	0	0     United Kingdom34	1,404	0	1,102	30	272	1,156	12 (0.9)	0	8 (0.7)	1 (3.3)	3 (1.1)	1 (0.09)     France (Coulet et al)‡	117	0	82	35	0	0	3 (2.6)	0	2 (2.4)	1 (2.9)	0	0     Germany (Schnurbein et al)‡	825	500	325	0	0	0	2 (0.3)	1 (0.2)	1 (0.3)	0	0	0     United States36	367	0	0	0	367	0	3 (0.82)	0	0	0	3 (0.82)	0     Spain (Blanco et al)‡	516	410	89	17	0	0	3 (0.6)	1 (0.24)	2 (2.2)	0	0	0     This study§	3,429	0	0	294	3,135	2,772	14 (0.41)	0	0	4 (1.4)	10 (0.32)	2 (0.07)     Total	16,024	6,654	3,266	636	5,014	10,724	61	3	27	9	22	5     Total fully sequenced				524	4,273	4,903				9 (0.017)	18 (0.004)	3 (0.0006) RAD51D												     United Kingdom20	1,648	737	911	0	0	1,060		0	8 (0.88)	0	0	1 (0.09)     Canada and Belgium (Osher et al)‖	175	0	175	0	0	0	1 (0.57)	0	1 (0.57)	0	0	0     Finland (Pelttari et al)‖		2,200	95 + 297		541†	1,287†			2		3 (0.55)	0     United Kingdom40	1,305	741	303	16	245	466	2	0	0	0	2 (0.82)	0     Spain (Gutierrez-Enriquez et al)‖	713	171	491	51						4 (0.81)		     United States36	367	0	0	0	367	0	4	0	0	0	4 (1.1)	0     This study§	3,429	0	0	294	3,135	2,772				1 (0.34)	11 (0.35)	1 (0.036)     Total fully sequenced				361	3,747	4,298				5 (1.4)	17 (0.45)	2 (0.046)  Germline mutations in a number of genes involved in the recombinational repair of DNA double-strand breaks are associated with predisposition to breast and ovarian cancer. RAD51C is essential for homologous recombination repair, and a biallelic missense mutation can cause a Fanconi anemia–like phenotype. In index cases from 1,100 German families with gynecological malignancies, we identified six monoallelic pathogenic mutations in RAD51C that confer an increased risk for breast and ovarian cancer. These include two frameshift-causing insertions, two splice-site mutations and two nonfunctional missense mutations. The mutations were found exclusively within 480 pedigrees with the occurrence of both breast and ovarian tumors (BC/OC; 1.3%) and not in 620 pedigrees with breast cancer only or in 2,912 healthy German controls. These results provide the first unambiguous evidence of highly penetrant mutations associated with human cancer in a RAD51 paralog and support the 'common disease, rare allele' hypothesis.  Subject terms: Breast cancer Genetic predisposition to disease Mutation Ovarian cancer At a glance Figures First | 1-3 of 4 | Last View all figures left RAD51C mutations in familial breast and ovarian cancer pedigrees. Figure 1 Functional analysis of the splice donor mutations 145+1G>T and 904+5G>T. Figure 2 Function of RAD51C missense mutations in Rad51c-deficient DT40 cells. Figure 3 Function of RAD51C missense mutations in human RAD51C-mutated fibroblasts. Figure 4 right Main Main• Methods• Accession codes• References• Acknowledgments• Author information• Supplementary information The breast cancer susceptibility genes BRCA1, BRCA2, ATM, CHEK2, BRIP1 and PALB2 are essential in the genomic stability of cells and have been functionally linked to the homologous recombination pathway of DNA repair1, 2. Biallelic mutations in BRCA2, PALB2 and BRIP1 are viable and cause a rare childhood chromosomal instability disorder, Fanconi anemia (FA), characterized by developmental abnormalities, bone marrow failure and predisposition to leukemia and other cancers3, 4. In an accompanying paper, we have identified a homozygous missense mutation (R258H) in RAD51C as the causal mutation in a family with three children severely affected by FA-typical birth defects5. Skin fibroblasts from the affected person showed cellular hypersensitivity to DNA cross-linking agents and had impaired RAD51 foci formation after DNA damage5. These features are typical hallmarks of FA cells with defects in BRCA2 (FANCD1)6 and PALB2 (FANCN)7, 8 and reflect the essential role of FA proteins in homologous recombination repair2, 3, 9. Here we have assessed whether monoallelic germline alterations in RAD51C confer susceptibility to breast or ovarian cancer, or both, by screening the RAD51C gene in 1,100 affected individuals from pedigrees with gynecological cancers that were negative for mutations in BRCA1 and BRCA2.  In total, we detected 14 germline sequence alterations in RAD51C in 1,100 unrelated affected women from pedigrees with hereditary breast cancer and BC/OC: two single–base pair insertions, two splice-site mutations and ten sequence alterations leading to single amino acid changes (Table 1). Three missense variants (A126T, G264S and T287A) were identified frequently in affected individuals from unrelated pedigrees and also in healthy German controls10; the remaining missense alterations were unique for the respective pedigree. Figure 1 shows the extended family trees for eight sequence alterations, with the individuals depicted being at least 30 years of age. As only the two insertions—both leading to frame shift and premature protein termination (insertion 224_225insA causing Y75XfsX0, Fig. 1a, and 525_526insC leading to C176LfsX26, Fig. 1b)—were clearly pathogenic, we characterized the other germline alterations by in vitro functional tests.  Figure 1: RAD51C mutations in familial breast and ovarian cancer pedigrees. RAD51C mutations in familial breast and ovarian cancer pedigrees. (a–h) Individuals with breast cancer (BC) are shown as filled circles, females with ovarian cancer (OC) as streaked circles; OP, surgery. Disease and age in years (y) at first diagnosis is given underneath the symbol, current age or age at death (+) above it. Other cancers diagnosed in the pedigrees are also shown (LC, lung cancer; KidC, kidney cancer; PanC, pancreatic cancer; CC, colon cancer; LAT, lower abdominal tumor; NHL, non-Hodgkin lymphoma; bil., bilateral). All affected individuals with breast or ovarian cancer not tested for germline mutations in RAD51C were deceased or refused testing. Carriers of RAD51C mutations are shown with their specific RAD51C mutation (as listed in Table 1), whereas individuals who tested negative for the mutation in the specific pedigree are depicted as wild-type (WT). In addition, LOH data (+ for loss of the WT allele, − for a retained WT allele) is shown for the individuals for whom formalin-fixed, paraffin-embedded (FFPE) tissue samples of the tumor(s) could be analyzed.  Full size image (64 KB) Figures/tables index Next Full table The splice donor mutation (145+1G>T) presents in a family with three sisters affected by breast or ovarian cancers (Fig. 1c) and disrupts the canonical GT dinucleotide. Comparison of the RAD51C splicing pattern in peripheral blood leukocytes from two heterozygous mutation carriers (Fig. 2a,b) revealed reduced expression of the normal RAD51C-001 and increased expression of the nonfunctional RAD51C-008 transcript, whereas levels of the nonfunctional RAD51C-009 transcript were unchanged compared to controls (transcripts and nomenclature according to the Ensembl genome browser). The latter two transcripts used alternative 5′ splice sites with intrinsic strengths of 17.4 and 16.1, respectively, as predicted by the HBond algorithm for 5′ splice sites11 and confirmed by sequencing of the splice junctions in the different RT-PCR products (Supplementary Fig. 1a). To prove that the normal RAD51C transcript was expressed solely from the wild-type allele in the heterozygous leukocytes, we introduced exon 1, intron 1 and exon 2 of the RAD51C gene into a splicing construct12 (Fig. 2c). RT-PCR analysis after transfection of HeLa cells with the wild-type splicing reporter construct revealed usage of the exon 1 splice donor comparable to normal controls (Fig. 2d). In contrast, the RT-PCR analysis of the 145+1G>T splicing reporter showed complete inactivation of this mutant 5′ splice site and increased transcript levels from the upstream proximal 5′ splice site. Finally, the pathogenic nature of this 5′ splice site mutation was demonstrated by the loss of the wild-type allele in the cancer tissue of the surviving subject with breast cancer in pedigree 1C (Supplementary Fig. 2a).  Figure 2: Functional analysis of the splice donor mutations 145+1G>T and 904+5G>T. Functional analysis of the splice donor mutations 145+1G>T and 904+5G>T. (a) Structure of RAD51C transcript 001 (Ensembl ID OTTHUMT00000280540) and the primers for RT-PCR. (b) Using primers located in exon 1 and exon 3, we performed RT-PCR analysis of RNA from PB mononuclear cells of two affected individuals with breast or ovarian cancer (subj. 1, subj. 2) harboring the 145+1G>T splice donor mutation. This revealed three alternative transcripts from exon 1: RAD51C-001 and the two nonfunctional alternatively spliced transcript isoforms RAD51C-008 (Ensembl ID OTTHUMT00000280547) and RAD51C-009 (Ensembl ID OTTHUMT00000280548), as predicted by the HBond splice donor algorithm and confirmed by sequencing of the PCR products (Supplementary Fig. 1a). (c) Schematic drawing of the splice donor sites (GT) in RAD51C exon 1 used in transcripts RAD51C-001, RAD51C-008 and RAD51C-009, respectively. (d) RT-PCR analysis of HeLa cells transfected with RAD51C minigene splicing constructs carrying either the wild-type or the 145+1G>T mutant 5′ splice site showed complete inactivation of this mutated 5′ splice site and confirmed the differences in splicing pattern between heterozygous mutation carriers and normal controls shown in b. The cells were co-transfected with growth hormone-1 (GH1) as a control. (e) RT-PCR analysis of RNA extracted from tumor samples from two carriers of the 905+5G>T mutation. Sequencing of the PCR products showed that these splice donor mutations led to exon 6 skipping (Supplementary Fig. 1b). (f) Schematic drawing of a three-exon splicing reporter containing RAD51C exon 6 with adjacent intronic sequences. (g) RT-PCR analysis of RNA from HeLa cells transfected with the minigene constructs revealed exclusion of exon 6 in the presence of the 905+5G>T mutation compared to the wild-type 5′ splice site.  Full size image (61 KB) Previous Figures/tables index Next The second splice site mutation (904+5G>T) also affected an evolutionarily conserved position and was predicted to greatly decrease the complementarity between the U1 small nuclear RNA and the 5′ splice site: the HBond score11 decreased from 15.8 to 10.1, a predictor of aberrant splicing. As cells carrying the germline mutation were not available (Fig. 1d), mRNA was isolated from paraffin-embedded tumor samples from two carriers of this mutation. As shown in Figure 2e, we were able to specifically amplify an RT-PCR product that lacked exon 6 in these carriers (Supplementary Fig. 1b) but not in control samples. For further confirmation, we introduced the RAD51C exon 6 with flanking 225- and 158-bp intronic sequences into a splicing reporter construct12 (Fig. 2f). Functional analysis in this heterologous context also demonstrated that the 904+5G>T mutation resulted in exclusion of exon 6, suggesting that the RAD51C exon 6 is recognized by exon definition (Fig. 2g). Finally, sequencing of DNA extracted from paraffin-embedded samples revealed that loss of the wild-type allele had occurred independently in the breast and the ovarian cancer tissues in two affected individuals from pedigree D (Supplementary Fig. 2c).  To initially screen whether the ten missense amino acid alterations change RAD51C protein function (Fig. 3), we used retroviral vectors13 to introduce the mutant human RAD51C proteins (Supplementary Fig. 3) into chicken DT40 cells in which the RAD51C ortholog had been disrupted14. Survival of cells expressing two missense alterations at highly conserved amino acids, G125V and L138F (Supplementary Fig. 4), was identical to the survival of control vector-transduced or untransduced ΔRad51c DT40 cells (Fig. 3a); the missense proteins therefore completely failed to complement the Rad51c mutant phenotype of these cells. In contrast, expression of the G3R, A126T, V169A and G264V missense RAD51C complementary DNAs corrected the mitomycin C (MMC) hypersensitivity of Rad51c mutant DT40 cells to levels achieved by expression of the wild-type RAD51C cDNA (Fig. 3a,c). Expression of the four missense alterations D159N, G264S, T287A and R366Q only partially restored the MMC sensitivity of ΔRad51c DT40 cells compared to the wild-type cDNA (Fig. 3b,c) indicating hypomorphic mutations with reduced protein activity.  Figure 3: Function of RAD51C missense mutations in Rad51c-deficient DT40 cells. Function of RAD51C missense mutations in Rad51c-deficient DT40 cells. (a) Examining the survival of Rad51c-deficient DT40 cells with the mutant RAD51C proteins allowed us to distinguish mutants with normal function (G3R, A126T, V169A and G264V) from nonfunctional true null mutants (G125V and L138F). Also depicted are the survival curves for nontransduced (no virus) cells as well as cells transduced with either the control virus (vector control) or the wild-type RAD51C cDNA (wild-type or WT). Data shown are means ± s.d. from four different experiments. (b) Survival of Rad51c-deficient DT40 cells with the human RAD51C proteins having intermediate activity (D159N, G264S, T287A and R366Q; n = 4). Controls are as in b. Data shown are means ± s.d. from four different experiments. (c) Protein blot on puromycin-resistant Rad51c-deficient DT40 cells expressing the wild-type and the missense proteins of the retroviral long terminal repeat promoter shows equal expression of the mutant proteins.  Full size image (92 KB) Previous Figures/tables index Next For further functional analysis of these missense mutations in human cells, we used the recently described RAD51C-mutated skin fibroblasts5. Assessing RAD51 foci15, 16, 17 in these cells after cross-linker exposure revealed that expression of the two mutations G125V and L138F did not restore normal RAD51 foci formation (Fig. 4), whereas RAD51C-mutated cells transduced with vectors expressing the remaining eight RAD51C missense variants were functionally indistinguishable from cells expressing the wild-type RAD51C cDNA.  Figure 4: Function of RAD51C missense mutations in human RAD51C-mutated fibroblasts. Function of RAD51C missense mutations in human RAD51C-mutated fibroblasts. We analyzed formation of RAD51 foci by immunofluorescent antibody staining in human RAD51C-mutated cells transduced with retroviral vectors that expressed each of the ten RAD51C missense alterations or the wild-type RAD51C cDNA. Shown are the percentages of cells (mean ± s.e.m.) with more than ten RAD51 foci after incubation for 24 h in 150 nM MMC, from three different experiments counted by two different people blinded for each condition. We assessed statistical significance by Student's t-test, applying SPSS software version 17.0; significance is indicated for G125V and L138F compared to the wild-type control.  Full size image (51 KB) Previous Figures/tables index In total, six germline alterations in RAD51C were classified as pathogenic: the two insertions, the two splice site mutations and the two missense alterations G125V and L138F. The corresponding pedigrees are shown in Figure 1a–f. One amino acid change (D159N) that was associated with reduced survival in DT40 cells, albeit leading to normal RAD51 foci formation when the missense protein was expressed in human RAD51C-mutated cells, was considered as an unclassified variant, unique in this pedigree affected by breast cancer only (Fig. 1g). Finally, despite intermediate complementation in DT40 cells, predictions by algorithms and amino acid conservation in RAD51C homologs, the R366Q variant (Fig. 1h) appeared unlikely to be pathogenic, as segregation was incomplete and there was no loss of heterozygosity (LOH) in the tumor tested.  We tested whether the two recurrent missense mutations G264S and T287A, showing reduced survival of DT40 cells and normal RAD51 foci formation, were associated with cancer. Both G264S and T287A had no association with cancer in 1,100 affected individuals compared to 2,912 healthy controls. However, the G264S variant showed some evidence of association with malignancies in the subgroup of BC/OC families (Table 1; odds ratio, 3.44; confidence interval, 1.51–7.80; P = 5.32 × 10−3). Further assessment in larger studies is required to confirm this association.  The overall frequency of a pathogenic mutation in RAD51C among investigated families is 0.55% (6 of 1,100). However, when analyzing the six pedigrees with clearly pathogenic mutations (Fig. 1a–f), we observed that all pedigrees presented with both breast and ovarian cancers—over different generations, in siblings or even as metachronous tumors. Thus, the six clearly pathogenic RAD51C mutations were all found within the 480 BC/OC pedigrees (1.3%).  In these six RAD51C-associated German BC/OC pedigrees, the mean age of onset at first diagnosis was 53 years (range 33–78) for breast cancer and 60 years (range 50–81) for ovarian cancer. This is higher than the mean ages of 40 and 46 years for German BRCA1- and BRCA2-associated breast cancer, respectively, although lower than the mean age of 63 years for sporadic breast cancer. For ovarian cancer, the mean age of onset in individuals carrying BRCA1 and BRCA2 mutations and the general population is 49, 58 and 68 years, respectively (R.K.S., A.M. and the German Consortium for Hereditary Breast and Ovarian Cancer (GC-HBOC), unpublished data). No occurrence of male breast cancer was noted in these families. In addition, the segregation pattern in these six families is striking: none of the tested healthy females over 70 years of age inherited the mutations (the unaffected obligate carriers of the L138F mutation in Fig. 1f and of the frameshift mutation 224_5insA in Fig. 1a had surgery with removal of ovaries and uterus owing to a lower abdominal tumor at 43 and 40 years of age, respectively), and all of the affected first-degree relatives who developed malignancies and could be subjected to mutation analysis turned out to be carriers. This pattern of apparently complete segregation in the RAD51C families differs from that of families carrying ATM, CHEK2, BRIP1 and PALB2 mutations1. The occurrence of both breast and ovarian cancers, and the high frequencies, markedly resembles the clinical presentations of people carrying BRCA1 and BRCA2 mutations1, 18. It is well established that the breast cancer histology in people with BRCA1 mutations shows an excess of ductal tumors with high mitotic count and negativity for hormone receptors and HER2/neu, compared to individuals with BRCA2 mutations or with sporadic breast cancers19, 20. Pathology reports were available from 11 cases of breast cancer associated with pedigrees shown in Figure 1a–f. Ten were classified as invasive and one as preinvasive ductal carcinomas. Only three of the ten invasive cancers presented with lymph node infiltration. Three cases were high-grade (G3) and eight cases were intermediate-grade (G2) tumors. Hormone receptor status was available for ten tumors: five were negative and five positive for the estrogen and progesterone receptors (ER and PR). Of these, seven showed a concordant status: three were negative for both ER and PR, and four were positive for both ER and PR. Three tumors harbored a discordant receptor status: two were ER negative and PR positive, and one was ER positive and PR negative. All six breast cancers with HER2/neu status had a negative score. Of those, five were either ER or PR positive and one was negative for both receptors. These results indicate that RAD51C-associated breast cancer is distinct from BRCA1-associated breast cancer and might be associated with more favorable histopathological features like those of BRCA2-associated breast cancer. Pathological reports were available for seven RAD51C-associated ovarian cancers, six of which presented as invasive serous and one as invasive endometrioidal adenocarciomas. Three ovarian cancers were classified as high-grade (G3) and four as intermediate-grade (G2) tumors. Despite the fact that five of the seven ovarian cancers presented as pT3 tumors, only two had lymph node involvement, again indicating distinct features compared to BRCA1-associated ovarian cancers, the majority of which are poorly differentiated invasive serous adenocarcinomas21.  Although RAD51C was identified in mammalian cells more than 10 years ago22, our findings on germline mutations in BC/OC families and the accompanying report on the identification of RAD51C as a new FA-like gene5 are, to our knowledge, the first clear links between mutations in RAD51C and human disease. According to the LOH in pedigrees shown in Figure 1a–f (Supplementary Fig. 2) and recent experiments with conditional knockouts in mice23, RAD51C functions as TP53-dependent tumor suppressor gene. The well-known association of genetic risk factors for breast and ovarian cancers with FA suggests that sequencing studies of FA genes and their protein interaction partners might reveal the existence of additional cancer susceptibility genes in the FA/BRCA pathway of homologous recombination repair24. In addition, the high penetrance of mutations impairing RAD51C function, and the causative link with the occurrence of gynecological cancers, justifies testing of other malignancies25 for alterations in RAD51C and its paralog. Ultimately, the identification of RAD51C as cancer susceptibility gene supports the 'common disease, rare allele' hypothesis26, suggesting that affected females with a strong history for breast and ovarian cancer, but negative for mutations in BRCA1, BRCA2 and also RAD51C, should be screened using exomic sequencing25.  Methods Main• Methods• Accession codes• References• Acknowledgments• Author information• Supplementary information Subjects, families and pedigrees. We recruited affected individuals from 1,100 German pedigrees with hereditary gynecological malignancies through a clinicogenetic counseling program at five centers (Cologne, Dresden, Düsseldorf, Munich and Ulm) from the GC-HBOC27, 28. Of these, 620 pedigrees fulfilled the criterion that at least three affected females with breast cancer but no ovarian cancers were present (breast cancer pedigrees). In 480 pedigrees, at least one case of breast and one ovarian cancer had occurred (BC/OC pedigrees)28. We checked that all affected individuals in this study did not carry pathogenic germline mutations in BRCA1 and BRCA2 using the PCR-based mutation-detection techniques dHPLC (or direct DNA sequencing, or both)27 and multiplex ligation-dependent probe amplification28. In total, 2,912 age-matched control samples from healthy women were collected in Northrhine-Westphalia or provided by Kooperative Gesundheitsforschung in der Region Augsburg10, 29, 30. We completely sequenced 480 samples and screened 2,432 samples with matrix-assisted laser desorption/ionization–time of flight (MALDI-TOF; see below). Informed consent was obtained from all peopleparticipating in the study, and the experiments were approved by the ethics committee of the University of Cologne on behalf of the GC-HBOC.  Direct sequencing and dHPLC. For the rapid and reliable identification of RAD51C mutations, we used two different approaches. We detected mutations by dHPLC (WAVE system, Transgenomic) or by direct DNA sequencing on ABI3100 sequencers (Applied Biosystems). Primer pairs used for the amplification of the nine exons of the RAD51C gene are shown in Supplementary Table 1. Appropriate dHPLC conditions for running temperatures and buffer gradients were established for each individual exon. ABI BigDye terminator chemistry (Applied Biosystems) was used for cycle sequencing. We confirmed all mutations detected by DHPLC by direct DNA sequencing.  Sequencing of RAD51C transcripts. We amplified RAD51C transcripts from peripheral blood mononuclear cells by RT-PCR with primers for RAD51C exon 1 and exon 3 and separated them on 6% polyacrylamide gels. RT-PCR products were extracted with elution buffer (0.5 M ammonium acetate, 10 mM magnesium acetate, 1 mM EDTA, 0.1% SDS), reamplified with the RT-PCR primers using 2.5 U Pwo DNA polymerase (Roche Molecular Biochemicals), gel-extracted (gel extraction kit, Qiagen) and directly sequenced.  MALDI-TOF and statistics. We used the homogeneous mass-extension process for producing primer extension products analyzed on a MALDI-TOF mass spectrometer (Sequenom MassArray system)31. Assays were designed with the SpectroDesigner software. Primer sequences are available upon request.  We calculated P values from standard χ2 tests on the basis of allele counts, and odds ratios using standard methods. All calculations were done using R 2.91.  RNA extraction. We isolated total RNA from paraffin-embedded tumor samples using the RNeasy FFPE kit (Qiagen), obtaining intact RNA molecules about 150 nucleotides long. We used PAXgene Blood RNA tubes for collection and stabilization of blood samples from subjects and isolated total RNA from blood samples with the PAXgene Blood RNA kit according to the manufacturer's instructions (PreAnalytiX, Qiagen).  Splicing analysis. We performed RT-PCR with total RNA extracted from blood samples derived from affected individuals. For analysis of the splicing pattern, before reverse transcription, 3 μg of total RNA was subjected to DNase I digestion with 10 U of DNase I (Roche Molecular Biochemicals). We reverse-transcribed 3 μl of the treated RNA samples with the SuperScript III RT-PCR System with Platinum Taq Polymerase (Invitrogen) using primer pairs specific for RAD51C exon 1 and exon 3, listed in Supplementary Table 1. To ensure a linear PCR amplification range allowing semiquantitative assessment of the spliced products, we performed PCR analysis with 28 cycles. PCR products were separated on 6% nondenaturing polyacrylamide gels, stained with ethidium bromide, visualized and quantified with the Lumi-Imager F1 (Roche Molecular Biochemicals) and directly sequenced after gel extraction.  Splicing reporter assays. For testing the 145+1G>T mutation, we amplified the subgenomic region spanning RAD51C exon 1, intron 1 and exon 2 from control DNA by PCR with primers listed in Supplementary Table 1 using Expand High-Fidelity DNA Polymerase (Roche Molecular Biochemicals). We cloned the PCR product into the pSVT7 expression vector32 and confirmed it by sequencing. We introduced the 5′ splice site mutation by PCR mutagenesis using the RAD51C intron 1 forward and reverse mutagenesis primers with the QuickChange XL Site-Directed Mutagenesis Kit (Stratagene). For functional analysis of the 904+5G>T mutation, we amplified the RAD51C exon 6, including the flanking intronic sequences, from genomic DNA by PCR with Expand High Fidelity DNA Polymerase and inserted it into the splicing reporter construct as described previously12. We inserted the mutation by PCR mutagenesis using the RAD51C intron 6 forward and reverse mutagenesis primers. Cell culture and transfection experiments were performed as previously described32. We isolated total RNA 30 h after transfection using the GenElute Mammalian Total RNA Miniprep kit (Sigma) and reverse-transcribed 200 ng of the DNase I (Roche Molecular Biochemicals)–treated RNA with the SuperScript III RT-PCR System with Platinum Taq Polymerase (Invitrogen) and vector-specific primers.  Loss-of-heterozygosity analysis. We extracted DNA from sections of paraffin-embedded tumor tissues (QIAamp DNA FFPE tissue kit, Qiagen) after macrodissection to ensure the amount of tumor cells > 80% as visualized in a hematoxylin and eosin–stained control section. We specifically amplified RAD51C DNA fragments using appropriate primer pairs listed in Supplementary Table 1, directly sequenced them with ABI sequencer 3130XL and compared them to sequencing results of heterozygous germline DNA.  Complementation of Rad51c-deficient DT40 cells. Rad51c-deficient DT40 cells14 were purchased from the Riken BRC Cell Bank (Tsukuba). The control vectors S11IP, expressing an IRES-pac cassette, and S11RCIP, additionally expressing the wild-type RAD51C cDNA from the same expression cassette (Supplementary Fig. 4), were constructed as described5. We introduced the subject-derived missense mutations in the RAD51C open reading frame using a Quick Mutagenesis kit (Stratagene) according to the manufacturer's instructions. Generation of stable oncoretroviral cell lines and transduction of the nonadherent ΔRad51c DT40 cells with retroviral supernatant were performed as previously described13, 33, 34. Transduced cells were selected in the presence of puromycin (Gibco/Invitrogen) for 4–5 d, exposed for 3 d to increasing concentrations of MMC and then assayed by flow cytometry for survival of cells; we used propidium iodide (Sigma-Aldrich) to discriminate live cells from dead cells as described34.  Protein expression of Rad51c missense mutants in ΔRad51c DT40 cells. We performed immunoblots with samples containing 50 μg of total protein on 4–12% NuPage Bis-Tris polyacrylamide gels (Invitrogen). Membranes were probed with mouse monoclonal anti-human RAD51C (1:1,000; ab55728 Abcam) or mouse monoclonal anti–β-actin (1:5,000; A2228 Sigma-Aldrich). We used a secondary horseradish peroxidase–linked sheep anti-mouse IgG (RPN4201 GE Healthcare) at a dilution of 1:10,000 and detected it by the chemiluminescence technique using the ECL system (Pierce, Thermo Fisher Scientific).  RAD51 foci immunofluorescence. For indirect immunofluorescence staining of RAD51 foci, we seeded cells onto coverslips (Nalgene NUNC) and incubated them the next day with 150 nM MMC (Medac) as described previously35. After 24 h, cells were fixed with 3.7% paraformaldehyde (Sigma-Aldrich) for 15 min at 20–25 °C and permeabilized with 0.5% (vol/vol) Triton X-100 for 5 min. After 30 min in blocking buffer (10% (wt/vol) BSA (PAA), 0.1% (vol/vol) NP-40 (Sigma-Aldrich)), cells were incubated at 4 °C with rabbit anti-RAD51 (PC130, Calbiochem) at 1:200 dilution for 45 min. Cells were washed three times in TBS (Invitrogen) and then incubated with a 1:500-diluted Texas Red–conjugated polyclonal anti-rabbit (Jackson Immunoresearch). After 45 min, cells were washed three times with TBS and the slides were mounted in ProLong Gold antifade reagent (Invitrogen) with 4,6-diamidino-2-phenylindole (DAPI, Sigma-Aldrich). We viewed specimens with an inverted microscope (Axiovert 200M, Zeiss) and fluorescence imaging workstation and acquired images at 20–25 °C with a Plan-Apochromat ×63, 1.4 numerical aperture oil immersion lens using a digital camera (AxioCam MRm, Zeiss). RAD51 foci were counted independently in three different experiments by two different people, blinded for each condition. Statistical analysis was performed using the SPSS software.  
3135||To characterize somatic alterations in colorectal carcinoma (CRC), we conducted genome-scale analysis of 276 samples, analyzing exome sequence, DNA copy number, promoter methylation, mRNA and microRNA expression. A subset (97) underwent low-depth-of-coverage whole-genome sequencing. 16% of CRC have hypermutation, three quarters of which have the expected high microsatellite instability (MSI), usually with hypermethylation and MLH1 silencing, but one quarter has somatic mismatch repair gene mutations. Excluding hypermutated cancers, colon and rectum cancers have remarkably similar patterns of genomic alteration. Twenty-four genes are significantly mutated. In addition to the expected APC, TP53, SMAD4, PIK3CA and KRAS mutations, we found frequent mutations in ARID1A, SOX9, and FAM123B/WTX. Recurrent copy number alterations include potentially drug-targetable amplifications of ERBB2 and newly discovered amplification of IGF2. Recurrent chromosomal translocations include fusion of NAV2 and WNT pathway member TCF7L1. Integrative analyses suggest new markers for aggressive CRC and important role for MYC-directed transcriptional activation and repression.  Go to: Background The Cancer Genome Atlas (TCGA) project plans to profile genomic changes in 20 different cancer types and has published results on two cancer types1,2. We now present results from multidimensional analyses of human colorectal cancer (CRC).  CRC is an important contributor to cancer mortality and morbidity. The distinction between colon and rectum is largely anatomical, but it impacts both surgical and radiotherapeutic management and it may impact prognosis. Most investigators divide CRC biologically into those with microsatellite instability (MSI) (located primarily in the right colon and frequently associated with the CpG island methylator phenotype (CIMP) and hyper-mutation) and those that are microsatellite-stable (MSS) but chromosomally unstable (CIN).  A rich history of investigations (for a review see3) has revealed several critical genes and pathways important to the initiation and progression of CRC3. These include the WNT, RAS-MAPK, PI3K, TGF-β, P53 and DNA mismatch repair pathways. Large-scale sequencing analyses4–6 have identified numerous recurrently mutated genes and a recurrent chromosomal translocation. Despite that background, we have not had a fully integrated view of the genetic and genomic changes and their significance for colorectal tumorigenesis. Further insight into those changes may enable deeper understanding of the pathophysiology of CRC and may identify potential therapeutic targets.  Go to: Results Tumor/normal pairs were analyzed by different platforms. The specific numbers of samples analyzed by each platform are shown in Supplementary Table 1.  Exome sequence analysis  To define the mutational spectrum, we performed exome capture DNA sequencing on 224 tumor/normal pairs (Supplementary Table 2 lists all mutations). Sequencing achieved >20X coverage of at least 80% of targeted exons. The somatic mutation rates varied considerably among the samples. Some had mutation rates <1/106 bases, whereas a few had mutations rates >100/106. We separated those cases (84%) with a mutation rate <8.24/106 (median number of non-synonymous mutations: 58) and those with mutations rates >12/106 (median number of mutations: 728), which we designated as hypermutated (Figure 1).  Figure 1 Figure 1 Mutation frequencies in human CRC To assess the basis for the strikingly different mutation rates, we evaluated microsatellite instability (MSI)7 and mutations in the DNA mismatch repair pathway8–10 genes MLH1, MLH3, MSH2, MSH3, MSH6 and PMS2. Among the 30 hypermutated tumors with a complete data set, 23 (77%) had high levels of MSI (MSI-H). Included were 19 with MLH1 methylation, 17 of which had high CpG island methylation phenotype (CIMP). By comparison, the remaining seven hypermutated tumors, including the six with the highest mutation rates, lacked MSI-H, CIMP or MLH1 methylation but usually had somatic mutations in one or more mismatch repair genes or Polε aberrations rarely seen in the non-hypermutated tumors (Figure 1).  Gene mutations  Overall, we identified 32 somatic recurrently mutated genes (defined by MutSig11 and manual curation) in the hypermutated and non-hypermutated cancers (Figure 1B). After removal of non-expressed genes, there were 15 and 17, respectively, in the hypermutated and non-hypermutated cancers (Figure 1B, see Supplementary Table 3 for complete list). Among the non-hypermutated tumors, the eight most frequently mutated genes were APC, TP53, KRAS, PIK3CA, FBXW7, SMAD4, TCF7L2 and NRAS. As expected, the mutated KRAS and NRAS genes usually had oncogenic codon 12/13 or 61 mutations, whereas the remaining genes had inactivating mutations. CTNNB1, SMAD2, FAM123B and SOX9 were also mutated frequently. FAM123B (WTX) is an X-linked negative regulator of WNT signaling12, and virtually all its mutations were loss-of-function. Mutations in SOX9, a gene important in cell differentiation in the intestinal stem cell niche13,14, have not been associated previously with human cancer, but all nine mutated alleles in the non-hypermutated CRCs were frameshift or nonsense mutations. Tumor suppressors ATM and ARID1A also had a disproportionately high number of frameshift or nonsense mutations. ARID1A mutations have recently been reported in CRC and many other cancers15,16.  In the hypermutated tumors, ACVR2A, APC, TGFBR2, MSH3, MSH6, SLC9A9 and TCF7L2 were frequent targets of mutation (Figure 1B), along with mostly BRAF V600E mutations. However, two genes that were frequently mutated in the non-hypermutated cancers were significantly less frequently mutated in hypermutated tumors: TP53 (60 vs 20%, p < 0.0001), and APC (81% vs 51%, p = 0.0023, both Fisher’s exact test). Other genes, including TGFBR2, were recurrently mutated in the hypermutated cancers, but not in the non-hypermutated samples. These findings suggest that hypermutated and non-hypermutated tumors progress through different sequences of genetic events.  As expected, hypermutated tumors with MLH1 silencing and MSI-H exhibited additional differences in mutational profile. When we specifically examined 28 genes with long mononucleotide repeats in their coding sequences, we found that the rate of frameshift mutation was 3.6-fold higher than the rate of such mutation in hypermutated tumors without MLH1 silencing, and 50-fold higher than in non-hypermethylated tumors (Supplementary Table 2).  Classification of tumors based on mutation rate and methylation pattern  As mentioned above, patients with colon and rectal tumors are managed differently17, and epidemiology also shows differences between the two17. An initial integrative analysis of MSI status, somatic copy number alterations (SCNAs), CIMP status and gene expression profiles of 132 colonic and 62 rectal tumors enabled us to examine possible biological differences between tumors in the two locations. Among the non-hypermutated tumors, however, the overall patterns of changes in copy number, CIMP, mRNA and miRNA were indistinguishable between colon and rectal carcinomas (Figure 2). Based on that result, we merged the two for all subsequent analyses.  Figure 2 Figure 2 Integrative analysis of genomic changes in 195 CRC tumors Unsupervised clustering of the promoter DNA methylation profiles of 236 colorectal tumors revealed four subgroups (Supplementary Methods; Supplementary Figure 1). Two of the clusters contained tumors with elevated rates of methylation and were classified as CIMP-high (CIMP-H) and CIMP-low (CIMP-L), as previously described18. The two non-CIMP clusters were predominantly from tumors that were non-hypermutated and derived from different anatomic locations. mRNA expression profiles separated the colorectal tumors into three distinct clusters (Supplementary Figure 2). One significantly overlapped with CIMP-H tumors (p=3×10−12) and was enriched with hypermutated tumors; the other two clusters did not correspond with any group in the methylation data. Analysis of miRNA expression by unsupervised clustering (Supplementary Figure 3) identified no clear distinctions between rectal cancers and non-hypermethylated colon cancers.  Chromosomal and sub-chromosomal changes  257 tumors were profiled for somatic copy-number alterations (SCNAs) with Affymetrix SNP 6.0 arrays. Of those tumors, 97 were also analyzed by low depth-of-coverage (low-pass) whole-genome sequencing (WGS). As expected, the hypermutated tumors had far fewer SCNAs (Figure 2). No difference was found between MSI and MSS hypermutated tumors (Supplementary Figure 4). We used the GISTIC algorithm19 to identify likely gene targets of focal alterations. There were several previously well-defined arm-level changes, including gains of 1q, 7p/q, 8p/q, 12q, 13q, 19q, and 20p/q6 (Supplementary Figure 4; Supplementary Table 4). Significantly deleted chromosome arms were 18p/q (including SMAD4) in 66% of the tumors and 17p/q (including TP53) in 56%. Also significantly deleted genes were 1p, 4q, 5q, 8p, 14q, 15q, 20p, and 22q.  We identified 28 recurrent deletion peaks (Supplementary Table 4; Supplementary Figure 4), including genes like FHIT, A2BP1 and WWOX with large genomic footprints located in potentially fragile sites of the genome, in near-diploid hypermutated tumors. Other focal deletions involved tumor suppressor genes such as SMAD4, APC, PTEN and SMAD3. A significant focal deletion of 10p25.2 spanned four genes, including TCF7L2, which was also frequently mutated in our dataset. A gene fusion between adjacent genes VTI1A and TCF7L2 through an interstitial deletion was found in 3% of CRCs and is required for survival of CRC cells bearing the translocation4.  There were 17 regions of significant focal amplification (Supplementary Table 4). Some of them were superimposed on broad gains of chromosome arms. Included were a peak at 13q12.13 near the peptidase gene USP12 and ~500kB distal to the CRC candidate oncogene CDK8; an adjacent peak at 13q12; a peak containing KLF5 at 13q22.1; and a peak at 20q13.12 adjacent to HNF4A. Peaks on chromosome 8 included 8p12 (which contains the histone methyl-transferase WHSC1L1, adjacent to FGFR1) and 8q24 (which contains MYC). An amplicon at 17q21.1, found in 4% of the tumors, contains seven genes, including the tyrosine kinase ERBB2. ERBB2 amplifications have been described in colon, breast and gastric/esophageal tumors, and breast and gastric cancers bearing these amplifications have been treated effectively with the anti-ERBB2 antibody trastuzumab20–22.  One of the most common focal amplifications, found in 7% of the tumors, is gain of a 100–150 kb region of chromosome arm 11p15.5. It contains the genes encoding insulin (INS), insulin-like growth factor 2 (IGF2), and tyrosine hydroxylase (TH), as well as miR-483, which is embedded within IGF2 (Figure 3a). We found elevated expression of IGF2 and miR-483 but not of INS and TH (Figure 3b–c). Immediately adjacent to the amplified region is ASCL2, a transcription factor active in specifying intestinal stem cell fate23. Although ASCL2 has been implicated as a target of amplification in CRC23–25, it was consistently outside the region of amplification and its expression was not correlated with copy-number changes. These observations suggest that IGF2 and miR-483 are candidate functional targets of 11p15.5 amplification. IGF2 overexpression through loss of imprinting has been implicated in the promotion of CRC26,27. MiR-483 may also play a role in CRC pathogenesis28.  Figure 3 Figure 3 Copy number changes and structural aberrations in CRC A subset of tumors (15%) without IGF2 amplification also had dramatically higher levels (as much as 100X) of IGF2 gene expression, an effect not attributable to methylation changes at the IGF2 promoter. To assess the context of IGF2 amplification/overexpression, we systematically looked for mutually exclusive genomic events using the MEMo method29. We found a pattern of near exclusivity (corrected p < 0.01) of IGF2 overexpression with genomic events known to activate the PI3-K pathway (mutations of PIK3CA/PIK3R1 or deletion/mutation of PTEN, Figure 3c, and Supplementary Table 5). The IRS2 gene, whose product links IGF1R, the receptor for IGF2, with PI3-K, is on chromosome 13, which is frequently gained in colorectal cancer. Those cases with the highest IRS2 expression were mutually exclusive of the cases with IGF2 overexpression (p= 0.04) and also lacked mutations in the PI3-K pathway (p= 0.0001)(Figure 3c). Those results strongly suggest that the IGF2/IGF1R/IRS2 axis signals to PI3-K in CRC and imply that therapeutic targeting of the pathway could act to block PI3-K activity in this subset of patients.  Translocations  To identify novel chromosomal translocations, we performed low-pass, paired-end, whole-genome sequencing on 97 tumors with matched normals. In each case we achieved sequence coverage of ~3–4X and a corresponding physical coverage of 7.5–10X. Despite the low genome coverage, we detected 250 candidate inter-chromosomal translocation events (range 0–10/tumor). Among those events, 212 had one or both breakpoints in an intergenic region, whereas the remaining 38 juxtaposed coding regions of two genes in putative fusion events, of which 18 were predicted to code for in-frame events (Supplementary Table 6). We found three separate cases in which the first two exons of the NAV2 gene on chromosome 11 are joined with the 3’ coding portion of TCF7L1 on chromosome 2 (Supplementary Figure 5). TCF7L1 encodes TCF3, a member of the TCF/LEF class of transcription factors that heterodimerize with nuclear β-catenin to enable β-catenin-mediated transcriptional regulation. Intriguingly, in all three cases, the predicted structure of the NAV2-TCF7L1 fusion protein lacks the TCF3 β-catenin binding domain. This translocation is similar to another recurrent translocation identified in CRC, a fusion in which the amino terminus of VTI1A is joined to TCF4 that is encoded by TCF7L2, deleted or mutated in 12% of non-hypermutated tumors and a homolog of TCF7L14. We also observed 21 cases of translocation involving TTC28 located on Chromosome 22 (Supplementary Table 6). In all cases the fusions predict inactivation of TTC28, which has been identified as a target of p53 and an inhibitor of tumor cell growth30. Eleven of the 19 (58%) gene-gene translocations are validated by either obtaining PCR products and in some case sequencing the junction fragments (Supplementary Figure 5).  Altered pathways in CRC  Integrated analysis of mutations, copy-number, and mRNA expression changes in 195 tumors with complete data enriched our understanding of how some well-defined pathways are deregulated. We grouped samples by hypermutation status and identified recurrent alterations in the WNT, MAPK, PI3K, TGF-β and p53 pathways (Figure 4, Supplementary Figure 6, Supplementary Table 1).  Figure 4 Figure 4 Diversity and frequency of genetic changes leading to deregulation of signaling pathways in CRC We found that the WNT signaling pathway was altered in 93% of all tumors, including biallelic inactivation of APC (Supplementary Table 7) or activating mutations of CTNNB1 in ~80% of cases. There were also mutations in SOX9 and mutations and deletions in TCF7L2, as well as the DKK family members and AXIN2, FBXW7 (Supplementary Figure 7), ARID1A and FAM123B/WTX (the latter a negative regulator of WNT/β-catenin signaling12 found mutated in Wilm’s tumor31). A few mutations in FAM123B/WTX have been described in colorectal cancer32. SOX9 has been suggested to play a role in cancer, but no mutations have previously been described. The WNT receptor Frizzled (FZD10) was overexpressed in ~17% of samples, in some instances at levels 100X normal. Altogether, we found 16 different altered WNT pathway genes, confirming the importance of that pathway in CRC. Interestingly, many of those alterations were found in tumors that harbor APC mutations, suggesting that multiple lesions affecting the WNT signaling pathway confer selective advantage.  Genetic alterations in the PI3K and RAS-MAPK pathways are common in CRC. In addition to IGF2 and IRS2 overexpression, we found mutually exclusive mutations in PIK3R1 and PIK3CA as well as deletions in PTEN in 2%, 15% and 4% of non-hypermutated tumors, respectively. We found that 55% of non-hypermutated tumors have alterations in KRAS, NRAS or BRAF, with a significant pattern of mutual exclusivity (Supplementary Figure 6, Supplementary Table 1). We also evaluated mutations in the ERBB family of receptors because of the translational relevance of such mutations. Mutations or amplifications in one of the four genes are present in 22/165 (13%) non-hypermutated and 16/30 (53%) hypermutated cases. Some of the mutations are listed in the COSMIC database33, suggesting a functional role. Intriguingly, recurrent V842I ERBB2 and V104M ERBB3 mutations were found in four and two non-hypermutated cases, respectively. Mutations and focal amplifications of ERBB2 (Supplementary Figure 6) should be evaluated as predictors of response to agents that target those receptors. We observed co-occurrence of alterations involving the RAS and PI3K pathways in a third of tumors (Figure 4; Fisher’s exact test p = 0.039). These results suggest that simultaneous inhibition of the RAS and PI3K pathways may be required to achieve therapeutic benefit.  The TGF-β signaling pathway is known to be deregulated in colorectal and other cancers34. We found genomic alterations in TGFBR1, TGFBR2, ACVR2A, ACVR1B, SMAD2, SMAD3 and SMAD4 in 27% of the non-hypermutated and 87% of the hypermutated tumors. We also evaluated the p53 pathway, finding alterations in TP53 in 59% of non-hypermutated cases (mostly biallelic, Supplementary Table 8) and alterations in ATM, a kinase that phosphorylates and activates p53 following DNA damage, in 7%. Alterations in those two genes showed a trend towards mutual exclusivity (p = 0.016) (Figure 4, Supplementary Figure 6, Supplementary Table 1).  We integrated copy number, gene expression, methylation and pathway data using the PARADIGM software platform35. The analysis revealed a number of novel characteristics of CRC (Figure 5A). For example, despite the diversity in anatomical origin or mutation levels, nearly 100% of these tumors have changes in MYC transcriptional targets, both those promoted by and those inhibited by MYC. These findings are consistent with patterns deduced from genetic alterations (Figure 4) and suggest an important role for MYC in the CRC. The analysis also identified several gene networks altered across all tumor samples and those with differential alterations in hypermutated vs. non-hypermutated samples (Supplementary Table 7, Supplemental Data on the TCGA publication webpage).  Figure 5 Figure 5 Integrative analyses of multiple data sets Since most of the tumors used in this study were derived from prospective collection, survival data are not available. However, the tumors can be classified as aggressive or non-aggressive on the basis of tumor stage, lymph node status, distant metastasis and vascular invasion at the time of surgery. We found numerous molecular signatures associated with tumor aggressiveness, a subset of which is shown in Figure 5B. They include specific focal amplifications and deletions, and altered gene expression levels, including those of SCN5A36, a reported regulator of colon cancer invasion (full list: Supplementary Tables 10–11). Association with tumor aggressiveness is also observed in altered expression of miRNAs and specific somatic mutations (APC, TP53, PIK3CA, BRAF, and FBXW7; Supplementary Figure 8B). Mutations in FBXW7 (38 cases) and distant metastasis (32 cases) never co-occurred (p = 0.0019). Interestingly, a number of genomic regions have multiple molecular associations with tumor aggressiveness that manifest as “clinically-related genomic hotspots”. Examples of this are the region 20q13.12, which includes a focal amplification and multiple genes correlating with tumor aggression, and the region 22q12.3, containing APOL637 (Supplementary Figures 8–9).  Go to: Discussion This comprehensive integrative analysis of 224 colorectal tumor/normal pairs provides a number of insights into the biology of CRC and identifies potential therapeutic targets. To identify possible biological differences in colon and rectum tumors we found, in the non-hypermutated tumors, irrespective of their anatomical origin, the same type of copy number, expression profile, DNA methylation and miRNA changes. Over 94% of them had a mutation in one or more members of the WNT signaling pathway, predominantly in APC. However, there were some differences between tumors from the right colon and the remaining sites. Hypermethylation was more common in the right colon, and three quarters of hypermutated samples came from the same site, although not all of them had MSI (Figure 2). Why most of the hypermutated samples come from the right colon and why there are two classes of tumors at this site is not known. The origins of the colon from embryonic midgut and hindgut may provide an explanation. Since the survival of patients with high MSI cancers are better and these cancers have hypermutation, mutation rate may be a better prognostic indicator.  Whole exome sequencing and integrative analysis of genomic data provided further insights into the pathways that are dysregulated in CRC. We found that 93% of non-hypermutated and 97% of hypermutated cases had deregulated WNT signaling pathway. Novel findings included recurrent mutations in FAM123B, ARID1A and SOX9 and very high levels of overexpression of the WNT ligand receptor Frizzled 10. To our knowledge, SOX9 has not previously been described as frequently mutated in any human cancer. SOX9 is transcriptionally repressed by WNT signaling, and the SOX9 protein has been shown to facilitate β-catenin degradation38. ARID1A is frequently mutated in gynecological cancers and has been shown to suppress Myc transcription39. Activation of WNT signaling and inactivation of the TGF-β signaling pathway are known to result in activation of MYC. Our mutational and integrative analyses emphasize the critical role of MYC in CRC. We also compared our results with other large-scale analyses6 and find many similarities and few differences in mutated genes (Supplementary Table 3).  Our integrated analysis revealed a diverse set of changes in TCF/LEF encoding genes suggesting additional roles for TCF/LEF factors in CRC beyond being passive partners for β-catenin.  Our data suggest a number of therapeutic approaches to CRC. Included are WNT signaling inhibitors and small-molecule β-catenin inhibitors that are showing initial promise40–42. We find that several proteins in the RTK/RAS and PI3K pathways including IGF2, IGFR, ERBB2, ERBB3, MEK, AKT and mTOR could be targets for inhibition.  Our analyses show that non-hypermutated adenocarcinomas of the colon and rectum are not distinguishable at the genomic level. However, tumors from the right/ascending colon were more likely to be hypermethylated and to have elevated mutation rates than were other CRCs. As has been recognized previously, activation of the WNT signaling pathway and inactivation of the TGF-β signaling pathway, resulting in increased activity of MYC, are nearly ubiquitous events in CRC. Genomic aberrations frequently target the MAPK and PI3-K pathways but less frequently target receptor tyrosine kinases. In conclusion, the data presented here provide an unprecedented resource for understanding this deadly disease and identifying possibilities for treating it in a targeted way.  Go to: Methods Summary Tumor and normal samples were processed by either of two Biospecimen Core Resources (BCRs), and aliquots of purified nucleic acids were shipped to the genome characterization and sequencing centers (Supplementary Methods). The BCRs provided sample sets in several different batches. To assess any batch effects we examined the mRNA expression, miRNA expression and DNA methylation data sets using a combination of cluster analysis, enhanced principal component analysis, and analysis of variance (Supplementary Methods). Although some differences among batches were detected, we did not correct them computationally because the differences were generally modest and because some of them may reflect biological phenomena (Supplementary Methods).  We used Affymetrix SNP 6.0 microarrays to detect copy-number alterations. A subset of samples was subjected to low pass (2–5X) whole genome sequencing (Illumina HiSeq), in part for detection of SCNA and chromosomal translocations43,44. Gene expression profiles were generated using Agilent microarrays and RNA-Seq. DNA methylation data were obtained using Illumina Infinium (HumanMethylation27) arrays. DNA sequencing of coding regions was performed by exome capture followed by sequencing on the SOLiD or Illumina HiSeq platforms. Details of the analytical methods used are described in Supplementary Methods.  This phase II trial investigated the safety and efficacy of two doses of bevacizumab, a monoclonal antibody to vascular endothelial growth factor, plus fluorouracil (FU)/leucovorin (LV) versus FU/LV alone in patients with metastatic colorectal cancer. Patients and Methods: One hundred four previously untreated patients with measurable metastatic colorectal cancer were randomly assigned to one of the following three treatment groups: 36 to FU (500 mg/m2)/LV (500 mg/m2) alone, 35 to FU/LV   low-dose bevacizumab (5 mg/kg every 2 weeks), and 33 to FU/LV   high-dose bevacizumab (10 mg/kg every 2 weeks). FU/LV was given weekly for the first 6 weeks of each 8-week cycle. Results: Compared with the FU/LV control arm, treatment with bevacizumab (at both dose levels) plus FU/LV resulted in higher response rates (control arm, 17%, 95% confidence interval [CI], 7% to 34%; low-dose arm, 40%, 95% CI, 24% to 58%; high-dose arm, 24%, 95% CI, 12% to 43%), longer median time to disease progression (control arm, 5.2 months, 95% CI, 3.5 to 5.6 months; low-dose arm, 9.0 months, 95% CI, 5.8 to 10.9 months; high-dose arm, 7.2 months, 95% CI, 3.8 to 9.2 months), and longer median survival (control arm, 13.8 months; 95% CI, 9.1 to 23.0 months; low-dose arm, 21.5 months, 95% CI, 17.3 to undetermined; high-dose arm, 16.1 months; 95% CI, 11.0 to 20.7 months). After cross-over, two of 22 patients had a partial response to bevacizumab alone. Thrombosis was the most significant adverse event and was fatal in one patient. Hypertension, proteinuria, and epistaxis were other potential safety concerns. Conclusion: The encouraging results of this randomized trial support further study of bevacizumab 5 mg/kg plus chemotherapy as first-line therapy for metastatic colorectal cancer. J Clin Oncol 21:60-65. © 2003 by American Society of Clinical Oncology. ONE NOVEL approach to the treatment of solid cancers involves therapeutic agents that inhibit vascularization of growing tumors. The evidence linking tumor growth and metastases with angiogenesis is compelling.1 In colorectal and breast cancers, the density of microvessels in histologic specimens is correlated with disease recurrence, metastases, and survival.2-10 Of the identified angiogenic factors, vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) is the most potent and specific and has been identified as a crucial regulator of both normal and pathologic angiogenesis, with increased expression being observed in many human tumor types.11 In colorectal cancer, increased VEGF expression correlates with invasiveness, vascular density, metastasis, recurrence, and prognosis.12-16 Furthermore, intense expression of VEGF mRNA is detected in human liver metastases from primary colon or rectal carcinomas, and expression of two VEGF receptors, Flt-1 and KDR, was upregulated in liver metastases compared with adjacent nontumorous liver.14 In mouse models, administration of anti-VEGF monoclonal antibodies that inhibit VEGF blocks the growth of human tumor xenografts and dramatically reduces the size and number of liver tumors in a mouse xenograft model of human colon cancer metastasis.11,14 In addition, the combination of anti-VEGF antibody and chemotherapy in nude mice injected with human cancer xenografts has an increased antitumor effect compared with antibody or chemotherapy treatment alone.17 Bevacizumab (Avastin, Genentech, South San Francisco, CA), a recombinant humanized monoclonal antibody to VEGF, is currently being investigated in a number of tumor types, including non–small-cell lung, breast, prostate, renal cell, and colorectal cancers. In phase I trials, bevacizumab was generally well tolerated and did not demonstrate dose-limiting toxicity or interactions with commonly used chemotherapy regimens.18,19 The goal of this trial was to investigate the safety, efficacy, and pharmacokinetics of bevacizumab plus fluorouracil (FU)/leucovorin (LV) as first-line therapy for metastatic colorectal cancer. PATIENTS AND METHODS Patient Eligibility Patients with histologically confirmed colorectal carcinoma and evidence of bi-dimensionally measurable disease with metastases more than 1 cm2 , and patients with an Eastern Cooperative Oncology Group (ECOG) performance status of 0 or 1 and a life expectancy of more than 3 months were eligible. Patients had to be at least 18 years of age. Exclusion criteria included prior chemotherapy (other than adjuvant fluoropyrimidines in combination with FU/LV and/or levamisole   12 months before day 0) and radiotherapy or major surgery within 28 days before day 0. Patients with serious nonhealing wounds, ulcers, or bone fractures or with clinically significant cardiovascular or peripheral vascular disease were excluded, as were those who had undergone a major surgical procedure within 28 days before day 0. Recent or current use of oral and From the Division of Hematology-Oncology, University of California Los Angeles, Los Angeles, Hematology/Oncology Clinic, Kaiser Permanente, Vallejo, Genentech Inc, South San Francisco, and Division of Hematology/ Oncology, University of California San Francisco, San Francisco, CA; Division of Hematology and Oncology, Duke University, Durham, NC; and Divisions of Medical Science and Population Science, Fox Chase Cancer Center, Philadelphia, PA. Submitted October 11, 2001; accepted September 10, 2002. Supported by Genentech, Inc, South San Francisco, CA. Address reprint requests to Fairooz Kabbinavar, MD, UCLA School of Medicine, Division of Hematology/Oncology, 10945 Le Conte Ave, Ste 2338J, Los Angeles, CA 90095; email: fkabbina@mednet.ucla.edu. © 2003 by American Society of Clinical Oncology. 0732-183X/03/2101-60/$20.00 60 Journal of Clinical Oncology, Vol 21, No 1 (January 1), 2003: pp 60-65 DOI: 10.1200/JCO.2003.10.066 Downloaded from ascopubs.org by Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Center on May 26, 2017 from 140.163.000.005 Copyright © 2017 American Society of Clinical Oncology. All rights reserved. parenteral anticoagulants (except for the maintenance of central lines) or aspirin was not allowed. Adequate hematologic, hepatic, and renal function was required. Pregnant or lactating women were excluded. Written informed consent was required. This study was approved by the institutional review boards of all participating centers and was conducted in accordance with the guidelines established by the United States Department of Health and Human Services. Study Design and Treatments Eligible patients were randomly assigned to one of the following three treatment arms: one control arm (FU/LV alone) and two bevacizumab plus FU/LV arms. All patients received FU/LV weekly for the first 6 weeks of an 8-week cycle according to the Roswell Park regimen20 (LV, 500 mg/m2 , by 2-hour intravenous [IV] infusion, once weekly for 6 weeks per cycle; FU, 500 mg/m2 by IV bolus [slow push] 1 hour after initiation of the LV infusion). Patients continued FU/LV in subsequent cycles until disease progression or for a total of six cycles, whichever occurred first. In addition to FU/LV, patients in the two experimental arms received bevacizumab (5 or 10 mg/kg) as a continuous 90-minute IV infusion every 2 weeks until disease progression or for up to 48 weeks, whichever occurred first. Bevacizumab infusion times could be shortened if the patient tolerated the infusion well (initially to 60 minutes and then to 30 minutes). Bevacizumab administration always followed chemotherapy administration. Patients in the control arm who experienced disease progression were given the option of receiving monotherapy with 10 mg/kg bevacizumab every 2 weeks. These cross-over patients underwent tumor assessments per protocol for the remainder of the treatment period or until disease progression after a minimum of four doses of bevacizumab. Patients randomly assigned to receive bevacizumab who demonstrated a complete or partial response or stable disease at the end of the treatment period were eligible to receive additional bevacizumab in an open-label extension study if their disease progressed within 6 months after their last bevacizumab dose in this study. Study Parameters Screening and baseline evaluations included assessments of ECOG performance status, laboratory tests (hematology, chemistry, electrolytes, urinalysis, and international normalization ratio of prothrombin time/activated partial thromboplastin time), and physical examinations. Baseline tumor assessments, with prospective identification of index lesions to be followed over the course of the study, included a chest x-ray, abdominal and pelvis computed tomography scans, and serum carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) measurement. During the treatment, tumor status was assessed at the completion of each 8-week cycle. Assessments continued every 8 weeks during the posttreatment period. The ECOG Tumor Response Criteria were used to evaluate responses and determine disease progression.21 The primary analyses of disease status were based on blinded assessments of an independent review facility. Responses were confirmed   4 weeks after initial documentation. Safety evaluations included physical examinations, laboratory tests (hematology, chemistry and electrolytes, and urinalysis), and ECOG performance status. Vital signs were monitored before, during, and after bevacizumab infusions (before chemotherapy for patients in the control arm). Patients were questioned regarding concomitant medication use, adverse events, and changes in menstrual cycles (if applicable). Patients who discontinued or completed the study were followed for survival information every 2 months until death or loss to follow-up. Statistical Considerations The primary efficacy end points for this study were time to disease progression and best (confirmed) tumor response rate (complete or partial response). Secondary efficacy end points included overall survival and duration of response. To increase the power for detecting a treatment effect, a retrospective efficacy analysis was conducted using data pooled from both bevacizumab arms. Time to disease progression, duration of response, and survival were evaluated using survival analysis techniques. The Kaplan-Meier method, log-rank test, and Cox proportional hazards model were used. A two-sided 2 test was used to compare tumor response in each bevacizumab arm with the control arm. RESULTS Patient Characteristics Table 1 shows that there were imbalances in demographic and baseline characteristics across the three treatment arms that could have affected clinical outcome; the largest were in the proportion of men, the distribution of ECOG performance status, the proportion of patients with liver/lung metastases, and the proportion of patients with low serum albumin at baseline. There was a trend toward less surgery in the bevacizumab arms. Duration of cancer was balanced across treatment arms. Table 1. Selected Demographics and Baseline Characteristics Characteristic Control (n  36) Bevacizumab 5 mg/kg (n  35) 10 mg/kg (n  33) Total (N  104) No. of Patients % No. of Patients % No. of Patients % No. of Patients % Sex Male 27 75 17 49 15 46 59 57 Female 9 25 18 51 18 54 45 43 ECOG performance status 0 22 61 21 60 18 54 61 59 1 14 39 14 40 14 42 42 40 2 00001311 Prior cancer therapy Adjuvant chemotherapy 8 22 5 14 7 21 20 19 Radiation therapy 5 14 5 14 5 15 15 14 Surgery 35 97 28 80 28 85 91 88 No. of metastatic sites 1 23 64 20 57 17 52 60 58 2 10 28 9 26 10 30 29 28   3 3 8 6 17 6 18 15 14 Sites of metastases Liver 25 69 29 83 27 82 81 78 Lung 8 22 14 40 12 36 34 33 Liver and lung 4 11 9 26 8 24 21 20 Baseline albumin  3 g/dL 2 6 6 17 5 15 13 13 BEVACIZUMAB   FU/LV IN COLORECTAL CANCER 61 Downloaded from ascopubs.org by Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Center on May 26, 2017 from 140.163.000.005 Copyright © 2017 American Society of Clinical Oncology. All rights reserved. Patient Disposition A total of 104 patients were randomly assigned to three treatment arms at 36 sites between June 29, 1998, and November 3, 1998 (Table 2). The median number of received doses and the cumulative dose of chemotherapy were highest in the 5-mg/kg arm. Of the 67 patients who were randomly assigned to one of the bevacizumab arms and received at least one dose of bevacizumab, 47 patients (70%) did not miss any bevacizumab infusions and 16 patients (24%) missed only one or two infusions. Of the 102 treated patients, 43 (42%) did not miss any chemotherapy infusions and 45 (44%) missed only one or two infusions. The distribution of missed chemotherapy infusions did not differ across treatment arms. Efficacy Results Time to progression. Estimates of time to progression and associated hazards ratios are listed in Table 3. A multivariate Cox model was fit by including variables first found to be associated with time to progression in a univariate model. Variables that were not significantly associated with time to progression were dropped. After adjustment for baseline albumin, additional variables were not significantly associated with time to progression in a multivariate model. After controlling for the effect of albumin on time to progression, there was a 61% reduction in the hazard of progressing in the 5-mg/kg arm (P .002) and a 46% reduction in the 10-mg/kg arm (P  .052) compared with the control arm. When the data for bevacizumabtreated patients were pooled, there was a 55% reduction in the hazard of progressing compared with the control arm (P  .003). Response rate. Estimates of response rate with 95% confi- dence intervals are listed in Table 4. Survival. Median survival was 13.8 months (range, 0.6 to 27.5  months) in the control arm, 21.5 months (range, 1.2 to 28.2  months) in the bevacizumab 5-mg/kg arm, and 16.1 months (range, 0.9 to 27.1  months) in the bevacizumab 10-mg/kg arm. At the 18-month time point, 37% of patients in the 5-mg/kg arm were alive. Even though survival time was censored for 46% of the patients in the 5-mg/kg arm, follow-up exceeded the median survival time of 21.5 months in these patients. The hazard of death was reduced by 37% in the 5-mg/kg arm compared with the control arm; it was approximately the same for the 10-mg/kg arm (hazard ratio, 1.17), the pooled bevacizumab-treated population (hazard ratio, 0.86), and the control arm (hazard ratio, 1.0; Cox proportional hazard regression analysis). Carcinoembryonic antigen. Of the 94 patients who had CEA measurements evaluated before treatment and at least once during treatment, 15 patients had baseline CEA levels of less than 3 ng/mL (the upper limit of the normal range for this test). Of the remaining 79 patients, only one (1.9%) of 53 patients who received bevacizumab experienced an increase of   50% in CEA compared with four (15%) of 26 control patients. Conversely, 13 (50%) of 26, 20 (74%) of 27, and 18 (69%) of 26 patients in the control, 5-mg/kg bevacizumab, and 10-mg/kg bevacizumab arms, respectively, experienced CEA decreases of   50%. Cross-over patients. Twenty-two patients (61%) in the control arm received single-agent bevacizumab at 10 mg/kg as cross-over therapy. For these 22 patients, the median duration of bevacizumab therapy was 2 months, with follow-up ranging from 1 day to 7 months. Two cross-over patients experienced a partial response, and seven patients had stable disease. The median time to progression for cross-over patients was 2 months, with follow-up ranging from 1 day to 5 months. Safety Results Adverse events. Fifty deaths (48%) were reported on study. Three patients died from a cause other than disease progression: Table 2. Patient Disposition No. of Control Patients Bevacizumab (no. of patients) Total No. of 5 mg/kg 10 mg/kg Patients Randomized 36 35 33 104 Treated 35 35 32 102 Completed six cycles of treatment 4 14 9 27 Completed the posttreatment follow-up period 2 12 4 18 Cross-over 22* *Twenty-two patients in the control arm received single-agent bevacizumab as cross-over therapy. Table 3. Time to Progression Assessment Control (n  36) Bevacizumab 5 mg/kg (n  35) 10 mg/kg (n  33) Pooled (n  68) No. of progressions* 26 22 23 45 Patients free of progression, % 28 37 30 34 Time to progression Median, months 5.2 9.0 7.2 7.4 Range, months 0.2-11.0  0.6 -11.5  0.7 -12.7 0.6 -12.7 Hazard ratio, unadjusted† — 0.46 0.66 0.54 95% Confidence interval 3.5-5.6 5.8-10.9 3.8-9.2 5.7-9.2 P, log-rank† — .005 .217 .013 NOTE.   denotes a censored value. *Time to progression was based on blinded independent review facility tumor assessments; investigator tumor assessments were used if an independent review facility assessment was not available. †Compared with the control arm. 62 KABBINAVAR ET AL Downloaded from ascopubs.org by Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Center on May 26, 2017 from 140.163.000.005 Copyright © 2017 American Society of Clinical Oncology. All rights reserved. mucositis/diarrhea/neutropenia (control arm), respiratory distress (5-mg/kg arm), and pulmonary embolism (10-mg/kg arm). More patients in the bevacizumab arms experienced at least one National Cancer Institute common toxicity criteria (version 1) grade 3 or 4 adverse event. The increase in incidence of grade 3 and 4 events seen in the bevacizumab arms compared with the control arm was statistically significant (P  .042; two-tailed Fisher’s exact test) but may be a result of patients in these arms being on study longer (hazard ratio for bevacizumab v control 1.15; P  .61). Table 5 lists adverse events of particular interest. The incidence and severity of adverse events known to be associated with FU/LV (diarrhea, leukopenia, and stomatitis) was as expected when bevacizumab was added to the regimen. Bevacizumab therapy was associated with fever, headache, rash, epistaxis, and chills; these events were generally mild to moderate in severity. Bleeding, hypertension, and thrombosis have been observed in other clinical trials of bevacizumab and occurred at an increased incidence in the bevacizumab arms in this trial. The most common type of bleeding in this study was transient epistaxis (lasting  5 minutes), reported in 11% of control patients, 46% of 5-mg/kg patients, and 53% of 10-mg/kg patients. Three patients in the 10-mg/kg arm had a grade 3 or 4 gastrointestinal hemorrhage; the relationship to therapy was unclear. The following is a list of all reported venous and arterial thrombotic adverse events: ● Control arm (before crossover; three events): retinal vein thrombosis (grade 4), cerebral ischemia (grade 1), and phlebitis (grade 1). ● 5-mg/kg arm (nine events): venous sclerosis (grade 2), port-a-cath thrombosis (grade 1), deep venous thrombosis (grade 3), deep venous thrombosis (grade 4), pulmonary embolus (grade 4), deep venous thrombosis (grade 3), superior mesenteric thrombosis (grade 3), deep venous thrombosis (grade 2), and left axillary/subclavian vein occlusion (grade 2). ● 10-mg/kg arm (four events): right arm phlebitis (grade 2), cerebral vascular accident (grade 3), pulmonary embolism (grade 5), and transient ischemic attack (grade 2). ● The number of patients with any adverse event of hypertension was as follows (with number of patients having a grade 3 or 4 given in parentheses): control arm, one patient (n  0); cross-over group, five patients (n  3); 5-mg/kg arm, four patients (n  3); and 10-mg/kg arm, nine patients (n  8). ● Of the 19 patients reported to have an adverse event of hypertension, nine had a preexisting history of hypertension. Sixteen of the 19 patients required oral antihypertensive therapy. One patient discontinued bevacizumab because of angina and hypertension. ● A total of 13 patients (12%) discontinued the study as the result of an adverse event related to either treatment or disease progression: two patients in the control arm, one cross-over patient, four patients in the 5-mg/kg arm, and six patients in the 10-mg/kg arm. Laboratory results. An excess of proteinuria was observed among patients treated with bevacizumab, as determined by routine dipstick analysis. Eight patients in the 5-mg/kg arm and nine patients in the 10-mg/kg arm either developed proteinuria or Table 4. Confirmed Response Rates Assessment Control (n  36) Bevacizumab 5 mg/kg (n  35) 10 mg/kg (n  33) Pooled (n  68) Response rate* No. 1 patients 6 14 8 22 % 17 40 24 32 95% CI 7-34 24-58 12-43 22-45 P, 2 † — .029 .434 .086 *Two patients who responded did not have an independent review facility assessment (one in the 5-mg/kg arm and one in the 10-mg/kg arm). For these two patients, investigator assessments were used in the independent review facility analysis. †Compared with the control arm. Table 5. Selected Adverse Events Adverse Events Control (N  35) Bevacizumab 5 mg/kg (N  35) 10 mg/kg (N  32) All Events Grade 3/4 All Events Grade 3/4 All Events Grade 3/4 No. of Patients % No. of Patients No. of Patients % No. of Patients No. of Patients % No. of Patients Any event 35 100 19 35 100 26 32 100 25 Diarrhea 29 83 13 32 91 10 24 75 10 Leukopenia 1 3 1 4 11 2 1 3 1 Stomatitis 6 17 0 8 23 0 6 19 0 Fever 4 11 0 13 37 0 11 34 1 Headache 5 14 0 11 31 0 12 38 1 Rash 7 20 0 16 46 1 11 34 0 Chills 1 3 0 5 14 0 5 16 0 Abdominal pain 19 54 1 16 46 3 15 47 4 Weight loss 8 23 0 5 14 1 3 9 0 GI hemorrhage 0 0 0 2 6 0 5 16 3 Epistaxis 4 11 0 16 46 0 17 53 0 Hypertension 1 3 0 4 11 3 9 28 8 Infection 7 20 0 14 40 0 8 25 1 Thrombotic events 3 9 1 9 26 5 4 13 2 NOTE. Grade is based on the National Cancer Institute common toxicity criteria, version 1. Abbreviation: GI, gastrointestinal. BEVACIZUMAB   FU/LV IN COLORECTAL CANCER 63 Downloaded from ascopubs.org by Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Center on May 26, 2017 from 140.163.000.005 Copyright © 2017 American Society of Clinical Oncology. All rights reserved. experienced worsening proteinuria while on study (compared with four patients in the control arm). No patient developed nephrotic syndrome. DISCUSSION This relatively small, randomized, phase II trial compared the safety and efficacy of bevacizumab (at two dose levels) plus FU/LV versus FU/LV alone as first-line therapy for metastatic colorectal cancer. The control regimen used of FU/LV has been one of the standard chemotherapy regimens in the first-line metastatic setting. There were imbalances in randomization, especially sex, ECOG performance status, and baseline serum albumin, that might have affected the results. More women were randomly assigned to the bevacizumab arms compared with the control arm, and the survival rate for women with colorectal cancer is higher than that for men.22-24 More patients in the 10-mg/kg arm had poor baseline performance status compared with the control arm, and more patients had low baseline albumin (related to performance status) in both bevacizumab arms compared with the control arm. Studies have shown that poor performance status and low albumin are associated with earlier mortality in patients with colorectal cancer.25 The results of univariate analyses supported the conclusion that low-baseline albumin in this study is correlated with both earlier disease progression and earlier mortality. Administration of bevacizumab at 5 mg/kg and 10 mg/kg every 2 weeks resulted in increases of 3.8 months (from 5.2 to 9.0 months; P  .005) and 2.0 months (from 5.2 to 7.2 months; P  .217), respectively, in the estimated median time to progression compared with FU/LV alone, based on blinded assessment by the independent review facility. A statistically significant increase in response rate was demonstrated for the 5-mg/kg arm compared with the control arm (40% v 17%, respectively; P  .029); the difference in response rate between the 10-mg/kg arm and the control arm was not statistically significant (24% v 17%, respectively; P  .434). Median survival was 21.5 months for the 5-mg/kg arm and 16.1 months for the 10-mg/kg arm, compared with 13.8 months for the control arm (P  .137 for the 5 mg/kg v control comparison and P  .582 for the 10 mg/kg v control comparison). A higher estimate of median survival was achieved with addition of bevacizumab therapy despite the fact that 22 patients in the control arm crossed over to receive bevacizumab. Two of 22 control patients who received single-agent bevacizumab as cross-over therapy showed a partial response. The reason why the lower dose of bevacizumab seemed to be more effective than the higher dose in this study is unclear, although there are at least three possible explanations. First, this was a relatively small study, and the differences between treatment arms may be a result of chance. Second, it is possible that imbalances in randomization resulted in more patients with poor prognostic factors in the high-dose arm. Third, it is possible that the lower dose is more effective than the higher dose. Studies have shown that the ability to reduce intratumor pressure and improve delivery of chemotherapy can result in greater efficacy than the ability to cause vascular collapse inside the tumor.26,27 It is possible that the 5-mg/kg dose resulted in improved delivery of chemotherapy as well as an antitumor effect, whereas the 10-mg/kg dose resulted in vascular collapse, limiting delivery of chemotherapy. A trial in non–small-cell lung cancer using different doses of bevacizumab than those used here does not provide any data to clarify this issue because the higher bevacizumab dose used in that trial (15 mg/kg) seemed to be more effective than a 7.5-mg/kg dose.28 A number of safety concerns were identified, although bevacizumab was generally well tolerated. The most clinically significant of these was thrombosis. Despite being a known complication of cancer therapy,29 thrombosis occurred more frequently with bevacizumab than with chemotherapy alone, was fatal in one patient, and resulted in bevacizumab discontinuation in three additional patients. An upcoming clinical trial will evaluate whether bevacizumab can be safely combined with low-dose warfarin to manage this issue. Other potential concerns included proteinuria, hypertension, epistaxis, headache, fever, and rash. Most of these events were either manageable (proteinuria and hypertension) or clinically insignificant (epistaxis, headache, fever, and rash). These preliminary results suggest that bevacizumab, in combination with FU/LV, increases response rate, prolongs time to progression, and prolongs survival compared with FU/LV alone in patients with metastatic colorectal cancer. Although there were imbalances in the random assignment of patients, correction for these imbalances seemed to strengthen the bevacizumab treatment effect. These data support further evaluation of the efficacy and safety of bevacizumab in metastatic colorectal cancer. Two phase III trials are ongoing. One trial will compare FU/LV/irinotecan (CPT-11) with either FU/LV/CPT-11/bevacizumab or FU/LV/bevacizumab in the first-line setting, followed by CPT-11 in the second-line setting. This design is based on data demonstrating that combining CPT-11 with FU/LV results in a statistically significant increase in survival (increases of 2.2 and 3.3 months), time to progression, and response rate compared with FU/LV alone30,31 and on its subsequent emergence as a new therapy for metastatic colorectal cancer. The second trial will compare FU/LV with FU/LV/bevacizumab in patients who are not optimal candidates for first-line CPT-11. An additional ECOG-sponsored trial (E3200) will study single-agent bevacizumab and bevacizumab plus FU/ LV/oxaliplatin in patients who have progressed after previous chemotherapy with FU/LV/CPT-11. REFE  
3176||Heterozygous mutations in the gene encoding hepatocyte nuclear factor 1-α (HNF-1α) are the cause of familial young-onset diabetes, also known as maturity-onset diabetes of the young (MODY)-3 (1). This monogenic β-cell diabetes is characterized by autosomal-dominant inheritance, early age of onset and a progressive β-cell failure resulting in increasing hyperglycemia. Patients with mutations in HNF-1α show also a decreased renal threshold for glucose re-absorption and increased sensitivity to sulfonylureas.  HNF-1α is a homeodomain-containing transcription factor expressed in liver, kidney, pancreas and gut (2). It regulates a large number of liver-specific genes such as those encoding albumin, α1-antitrypsin and β-fibrinogen, as well as pancreatic genes involved in glucose metabolism and transport, including those encoding pyruvate kinase and the glucose transporter GLUT2, and also regulates the insulin gene expression (3,4). Expression of other islet-enriched transcription factors such as HNF-4α, Pdx-1 and NeuroD1/Beta2 is altered in HNF-1α knockout mice, suggesting a complex interrelationship and hierarchical network of transcriptional elements in pancreatic β cells (4). Thus, in mouse and human pancreas, HNF-1α is a major regulator of HNF-4α, acting directly through a distinct essential cis element in the HNF-4α P2 promoter (5,6). HNF-1α contains three functional domains (Figure 1A): the N-terminal dimerization domain (residues 1–32), a C-terminal transactivation domain (residues 281–628) and the DNA binding domain, spanning residues 98–280. It binds to DNA as a homodimer or heterodimer with the structurally related HNF-1β transcription factor (7). More than 300 different MODY3-causing mutations have been found in both the coding sequence and promoter of HNF1A. These mutations include gene deletion, frame shift, missense, nonsense and splice site mutations in more than 700 families (8,9). Functional studies of a relatively small number of HNF-1α mutations, usually focused on their effects on expression of a single target gene, have shown that diabetes can result from loss-of-function or dominant-negative effects (8). The clinical phenotype of MODY3 is variable from one family to another and heterogeneous within each family (10). This variability has been explained by environmental and/or additional genetic factors (11,12). Additionally, the type and/or position of the mutation appear to modulate the age of diagnosis (9,13).  Figure 1 Figure 1 Characterization of mutation c-57-64delCACGCGGT;c-55G>C in the 5′ UTR of HNF1A. (A) Location of mutation c-57-64delCACGCGGT;c-55G>C in the 5′-UTR of the HNF1A gene and missense mutations in the HNF-1α protein. The ... In this work, we analyze the functional effect of six HNF-1α variants located at different gene positions that we have identified in an HNF-1α mutation screening among a group of patients with familial, young-onset diabetes. Two mutations are considered novel: c-57-64delCACGCGGT;c-55G>C, located in the 5′ untranslated region (5′UTR) of HNF1A, and p.Glu235Gly, located in the DNA binding domain. Other mutations, located in the DNA binding and transactivation domains, have been previously reported (p.Val133Met, p.Thr196Ala, p.Arg271Trp and p.Pro379Arg) (8,9). Here, we report the effect of the 5′UTR mutation on HNF1A expression as well as the differential effects of the missense mutations on the ability of HNF-1α to bind and activate a subset of target genes.  Go to: MATERIALS AND METHODS Patients and Mutation Screening The diabetic patients involved in this study were referred to our laboratory for a molecular diagnosis of monogenic diabetes. The probands of families P36 and P56 were referred to us by author MG, family P20 by author J-JG, family P30 by author SA, family P37 by author MD and family P52 by author V-MA. The clinical diagnosis was made using classical criteria (1). All families were of Spanish Caucasian descent except family P56, who was Hispanic. Informed consent was obtained from the subjects or their parents. The studies were performed according to the Declaration of Helsinki as revised in 2000 and approved by the corresponding ethical committees.  To screen for HNF-1α mutations, the exons, their flanking intron regions and the minimal promoter of the HNF1A gene were polymerase chain reaction (PCR) amplified, and their products were sequenced. The upstream and downstream primers used were as follows: exon 1, 5′-gcttggcctagtggggttttg-3′ and 5′-cctctaggctctcctgggag-3′; exon 2, 5′-tgggctccataactgctttc-3′ and 5′-ccagggaagatgcggggtag-3′; exon 3, 5′-agaatcaagg gcaaggtcag-3′ and 5′-gaccaaaccagcatgtttc-3′; exon 4, 5′-tcagaaccctccccttcatg-3′ and 5′-cacgtgtcccttgtccccac-3′; exon 5, 5′-caatg gagtttgaagtgctg-3′ and 5′-gccaaggaaagatgaggttg-3′; exon 6, 5′-agggagattctggag cagtc-3′ and 5′-cacccaggtgcccacccatc-3′; exon 7, 5′-cagctgattccctccccttc-3′ and 5′-atccattgacagccaacctc-3′; exon 8, 5′-gaggcctgggactagggctg-3′ and 5′-tctgt cactggccgagggag-3′; exon 9, 5′-cctgtgacagagcccctcac-3′ and 5′-ggacagcaacagaag gggtg-3′; exon 10, 5′-gtacccctagggaca ggcag-3′ and 5′-cccccaagcaggcagtacag-3′; and promoter, 5′-agcactgttcttggcacatg and 5′-ggcagacacaaaccaaactc-3′. Screening for the presence of novel mutations on a panel of 54 healthy control individuals was done by single-strand conformation polymorphism of PCR fragments under two conditions (14).  Site-Directed Mutagenesis and Construction of HNF-1α Mutants A construct encoding the mouse HNF-1α cDNA (pcDNA3-mHNF1A) was prepared by cloning a 2.2-Kb EcoRI-EcoRV fragment from pBJ5mHNF (15) into pcDNA3 (Invitrogen, Carlsbad, CA, USA).  To generate plasmid pGEX5.2-HNF1A(1–281), expressing GST-HNF-1α(1–281) fusion protein, a DNA fragment containing amino acids 1–281 of HNF-1α was amplified from pcDNA3-mHNF1A using oligonucleotides GST1AF: 5′-gggatccccatggtttctaagctg-3′ and GST1AR: 5′-gggatcctcacaacttgtgccggaag-3′ and inserted into the BamHI site of the polylinker of pGEX-5X-2 (GE Healthcare, Barcelona, Spain).  Mutations were introduced into the pcDNA3-mHNF1A or into the pGEX5.2-HNF1A(1–281) constructs by PCR using a kit (QuikChange II Site Directed Mutagenesis Kit; Stratagene, La Jolla, CA, USA). To generate missense mutations p.Val133Met, p.Thr196Ala, p.Glu235Gly, p.Arg271Trp and p.Pro379Arg (note that residue Pro379 corresponds to residue Pro378 in the mouse protein), the following oligonucleotides were used, respectively: 5′-ccagcgggagatggtggacaccacgggtc-3′, 5′-gagcccacaggcgatgagctcccagctaagaagg-3′, 5′-gaagagcgagagaccttggtggaggggtgtaatag-3′, 5′-ctacaactggtttgccaattggcgcaaggagg-3′ and 5′-gtcccctgccgcgggtcagcaccctg-3′. Constructs carrying mutations were checked by sequencing and digestion with SacI, MfeI and KpsI in case of mutants mHNF1A(T196A), mHNF1A(R271W) and mHNF1A(P378R), respectively.  Plasmids pGL3-1AP and pGL3-1APm (which contain the proximal promoter and, wild-type or mutant, human HNF1A 5′UTR, driving the luciferase gene) were generated by amplifying a DNA fragment containing bases from −504 to +9 of HNF1A (positions 211–723 of GenBank® accession number U73499) from genomic DNA of patient P37 with primers 1AP2F: 5′-tctcctgtctcagcatatg-3′ and 1A1-1R: 5′-cttctccagccaggtag-3′ and cloned into pGEMTeasy (Promega, Madi-son, WI, USA). After sequencing, the inserts were cut off with SmaI and SacI and introduced into pGL3basic (Promega).  Tissue Culture, Transient Transfections, Immunoblot and Luciferase Assays Cos7 and Min6 cells were grown as described elsewhere (16,17). Transient transfections were performed with lipofectAMINE Reagent (Invitrogen), in 80% confluent 12-well culture dishes, including the corresponding luciferase reporter construct, HNF1A expression vectors and pCMVβ (Clontech) to control for efficiency of transfection. The amounts of each plasmid are indicated in the figures. Luciferase activity was measured after 24 h in cell lysates using the Luciferase Assay System (Promega) and normalized for transfection efficiency by the β-galactosidase activity of pCMVβ. Transfection efficiency, measured by β-galactosidase staining with X-gal was in a range of 16–24% from experiment to experiment. Western blot analysis was carried out using the polyclonal antibody HNF-1α C19 (Santa Cruz Biotechnology, Santa Cruz, CA, USA).  Reporter plasmid pGL3-HNF4AP2 contains the human HNF-4α P2 promoter, which includes one HNF-1α binding site, cloned into the SmaI site of pGL3 basic (Promega). The HNF-4α P2 promoter was cloned from human genomic DNA with primers HNF4AP2F: 5′-gacacacccatagtttggag-3′ and HNF4AP2R: 5′-tcacgctgaccatggccaag-3′ amplifying bases −418 to +13 of the P2 promoter (bases 8036943 to 8037373 of the Homo sapien chromosome 20 genomic contig, reference assembly, GeneBank® accession number NT011362.9). Reporter plasmid pGL3-GLUT2 contains base pairs −1308 to +46 of the mouse GLUT2 promoter (18). Reporter plasmid β28-Luc contains three copies of the β-fibrinogen HNF1 binding site (15). Reporter plasmid pGL3-RIP, containing base pairs −872 to −169 of the rat insulin 2 gene promoter, was provided by Dr. A. Barberá (Institut d’investigations Biomediques August Pi i Sunyer [IDIBAPS], Barcelona, Spain).  Production of Recombinant Wild-Type and Mutant GST-HNF-1α(1–281) Fusion Proteins The Escherichia coli BL21 strain was transformed with the indicated pGEX5.2-HNF1A(1–281) plasmids and grown at 37°C to mid-log phase. Expression of fusion proteins was induced by adding isopropyl-β-D-thiogalactoside (IPTG) to a final concentration of 0.2 mmol/L, and cultures were incubated with orbital shaking for 16 h at 22°C. GST-HNF-1α(1–281) fusion proteins were purified from crude E. coli extracts by single-step affinity chromatography using glutathione-agarose beads (Sigma-Aldrich Chemie, GmbH, Steinheim, Germany), essentially as described by Galan et al. (19). Fusion proteins were stored at a concentration of about 1 mg/mL at −80°C with 30% glycerol. Protein concentrations were determined using the Bio-Rad Protein Assay (Bio-Rad Laboratories GmbH, Munich, Germany). GST-HNF-1α(1–281) purification resulted in a single band of approximately 56 kDa on Coomassie-stained sodium dodecyl sulfate–polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis (SDS-PAGE).  DNA Binding Studies Purified GST-fusion proteins or nuclear cell extracts were incubated with double-strand 32P-labeled oligonucleotides (1A: 5′-tcgacttggttaataattcaccagag-3′, based on the 21-mer primer described by Chi et al. [20], and 4AP2: 5′-tcgaagtgactggttactctt-taacgtatccac-3′, based on the oligonucleotide P2 described by Boj et al. [5]) containing high-affinity HNF-1α binding sites in a 15-μL reaction mixture containing 20 mmol/L HEPES buffer, pH 7.9, 40 mmol/L KCl, 1 mmol/L MgCl2, 0.1 mmol/L EGTA, 0.5 mmol/L DTT, 4% Ficoll and 1 μg poly(dIdC) at 25°C for 20 min. Supershift analysis was performed by incubating 0.2 μg of the polyclonal antibody HNF-1α C-19 with the nuclear extracts for 5 min on ice before adding the probe. The reaction mixture was loaded on a 6% nondenaturating polyacrylamide gel containing 0.25 × TBE buffer (23 mmol/L Tris-borate, 0.5 mmol/L EDTA) and run at 4°C. Nuclear extracts were prepared as described by Navas et al. (16) and the relative amounts of HNF-1α expressed proteins were determined by Western blotting. To determine relative binding affinity (Ka) and maximal binding (Bmax), mobility shift analysis was performed with increasing amounts of 32P-labeled oligonucleotides and set levels of HNF-1α proteins as indicated. To quantify the bound and free oligonucleotides, radioactive bands were analyzed with a Phosphorimager (Bio-Rad Laboratories GmbH). Specific counts were determined after subtracting the background, and the data were analyzed by the Scatchard method (21). Statistical significance was analyzed by the two-tailed Student t test.  Go to: RESULTS Identification of HNF1A Mutations in Patients with Young-Onset Familial Diabetes Probands from 28 independent diabetic families were screened for MODY3 mutations. Six of them carried HNF1A changes. The previously described p.Val133Met, p.Thr196Ala, p.Arg271Trp and p.Pro379Arg and the novel mutations p.Glu235Gly and c-57-64delCACGCGGT;c-55G>C were identified by DNA sequencing (Figure 1A and Table 1). The novel mutations cosegregated with diabetes in the available subjects in their respective families (Table 1) and were not found in 55 unrelated healthy control individuals, who showed normal conformers of single-strand conformation polymorphism compared with the probands (not shown).  Table 1 Table 1 Clinical characteristics of probands and HNF1A mutations. The available clinical and anthropometric data from the index patients carrying HNF1A changes are given in Table 1. Most of the patients studied as probands for genetic diagnosis had a clinical history of diabetes from at least two consecutive generations. Hyperglycemia values vary from one patient to another as well as hemoglobin (Hb)A1c and treatment at the moment of genetic study.  Effect of Mutation c-57-64delCACGCGGT;c-55G>C on the 5′ UTR of HNF1A Mutation c-57-64delCACGCGGT;c-55G>C is located within the 5′UTR of HNF1A (Figure 1A). To investigate whether this mutation had an effect on HNF1A expression, we prepared plasmids containing the luciferase reporter gene under the control of the minimal promoter, and wild-type or mutant, 5′UTR of HNF1A (bases c. −504 to +9) and transfected them into insulinoma Min6 cells. We found that this mutation results in an ~50% decrease in luciferase activity (Figure 1B), thus indicating that transcription of the HNF1A gene is impaired for this mutant allele.  Effect of HNF-1α Missense Mutations on Transcriptional Activation To characterize the functional consequences of missense mutations p.Val133Met, p.Thr196Ala, p.Glu235Gly, p.Arg271Trp and p.Pro379Arg, direct mutagenesis of the mouse cDNA was performed to prepare the mutants mHNF1A(V133M), mHNF1A(T196A), mHNF1A(E235G), mHNF1A(R271W) and mHNF1A(P378R), respectively. HNF-1α protein is highly conserved between the human and mouse species. The amino acid sequence homology is 94.6% for the entire protein and 99.5% for the DNA binding domain. With the exception of mutation Pro379Arg, which is located in the transactivation domain, all the other missense mutations are located in the DNA binding domain and involve amino acid residues strictly conserved between mouse and human. Pro379 is also conserved in the mouse protein, but its position is 378 because of the insertion of a His residue after position 359 in the human protein.  HNF-1α is an important regulator of gene expression in the β cell as well as in other tissues involved in glucose homeostasis such as the liver. To evaluate the effects of HNF-1α missense mutations, we compared the ability of the mutant proteins to activate transcription from a selected group of tissue-specific target promoters activated in liver (β-fibrinogen), in β-cells (HNF-4α P2, insulin) or in both (GLUT2). Additionally, we tested the effects of these mutations in two different cellular contexts: Min6, an insulinoma-derived cell line that expresses endogenous HNF-1α as well as some of the target genes whose promoters are used, and Cos7, which does not. Although Min6 cells are more comparable to the pancreatic β cells, some of the effects of the exogenous mutant proteins could be masked by the endogenous wild-type. This limitation does not apply to Cos7; however, in this case, the lack of some specific coactivators may also be limiting. The comparison of the results with both cell lines is useful to understand the effect of the HNF-1α mutations on transcriptional activation, and similar approaches have been used previously in the analysis of other MODY3 mutations (22).  Mutant and wild-type HNF-1α constructs were cotransfected in increasing amounts along with a set amount of reporter plasmids pGL3-GLUT2, pGL3-RIP, pGL3-HNF4AP2 or β28-Luc into Cos7 and Min6 cells. Stimulation of transcription triggered by activation of the respective promoters was measured by luciferase reporter gene activity. Figure 2A–G shows that wild-type HNF-1α activates the transcription of all reporter genes in both cell lines in a dose-dependent manner, from 2- to 20-fold. In all assays, we found that the activation of the reporter no longer increases with increasing amount of the wild-type expression vector DNA above the maximal value showed in the figure (not shown). Mutation p.Thr196Ala has no significant effect on the transactivation function of HNF-1α except a slight decrease, if any, on the GLUT2 promoter in Min6 cells (Figure 2E). Similar results were obtained with mutation p.Pro378Arg, except for the activation of the β28-luc reporter, which was reduced to about 50% in Cos7 cells (Figure 2B). In contrast, transcriptional activation by the mutant mHNF1A(R271W) was strongly impaired in the four reporters. Interestingly, mutations p.Val133Met and p.Glu235Gly had heterogeneous effects. Both mutant proteins behaved as the wild-type with respect to transactivation of the HNF4A P2 promoter (Figure 2C, G). However, they were defective in the transcriptional activation of the other promoters tested. The behavior of mHNF1A(V133M) was more variable. At low DNA concentrations, this mutant activated β-fibrinogen and insulin promoters at significant lower levels than the wild-type protein. However, when higher amounts of the expression vector were used in Cos7 cells, β28-luc and pGL3-RIP reporters were activated at the wild-type level (Figure 2B, D). On the other hand, when equal amounts of wild-type and mutant expression vectors were cotransfected into Cos7 cells, together with the reporter plasmid pGL3-GLUT2, no significant reduction of the wild-type activity was observed (Figure 2H). It is known that mutants of HNF-1α that are unable to bind DNA may have a dominant-negative effect through the formation of nonproductive heterodimers with the wild-type protein (8). We did not observe this effect, which is not unexpected, since these mutants still maintain some capacity to bind DNA. These results are consistent with a previous study showing that one of these mutations, p.Arg271Trp, does not show any dominant-negative effect on the rat albumin promoter in HeLa cells (23).  Figure 2 Figure 2 Transcriptional activity of mutants mHNF1(V133M), mHNF1(T196A), mHNF1(E235E), mHNF1(R271W) and mHNF1(P378R). Cos7 (A–D) and Min6 (E–G) cells were cotransfected with 250 of the reporter constructs pGL3-GLUT2, β28-Luc, pGL3-HNF4AP2 ... Effect of Missense Mutations on HNF-1α DNA Binding Because most of the missense mutations analyzed in this study are localized to the DNA binding domain (Figure 1A), we studied the ability of the mutant proteins to bind DNA. We purified GST-fusion proteins to the first 281 amino acids of HNF-1α [GST-1α(1–281)] containing the dimerization and DNA binding domains (Figure 3A). Using electrophoretic mobility shift assay (EMSA), we measured the DNA binding affinity of wild-type and mutant GST-fusion proteins. Binding site titration experiments were performed using probe 1A, which contains a consensus HNF-1 high-affinity binding site, to calculate the association constant (Ka) and maximal binding (Bmax) (Figure 3B). We found a clear correlation between the effect of these mutations on HNF-1α transactivation function and DNA binding. Mutation p.Arg271Trp produced the strongest effect on DNA binding and decreased both affinity and maximal binding by 3.6- and 2.5-fold, respectively. In contrast, the Ka and Bmax values of the fusion protein carrying mutation p.Thr196Ala did not differ significantly to that of the wild-type fusion protein. Finally, although mutations p.Val133Met and p.Glu235Gly did not affect Bmax, Ka was 3.9- and 2.1-fold higher, respectively.  Figure 3 Figure 3 (A) Schematic representation of the GST-fusion proteins containing mouse HNF-1α amino acids 1–281. DD, dimerization domain. DBD, DNA binding domain. Numbers indicate amino acid positions of the HNF-1α protein. (B) Binding site ... To confirm the results obtained with the GST fusion to the HNF-1α DNA binding domain, we carried out EMSA experiments with the full-length HNF-1α and mutant derivatives expressed in Cos7 cells. Additionally, and because these mutations appeared to have a differential effect on the transcriptional activation of pGL3-HNF4AP2 with respect to the other reporters tested, we used two high-affinity HNF-1 binding sites: the previously used 1A probe and the probe 4AP2, which contains the HNF-1α binding site found in the pancreatic P2 promoter of HNF-4α. We then compared the ability of wild-type and mutant HNF-1α proteins to interact with these two binding sites. Steady-state levels of wild-type and mutant proteins were similar, as shown by Western blot of nuclear extracts of Cos7 cells transfected with equal amounts of expression vectors (Figure 4A). In agreement with the transactivation assays, mutation p.Arg271Trp impaired HNF-1α binding to both DNA probes, whereas mutants mHNF1A(T196A) and mHNF1A(P378R) bound DNA as well as the wild-type protein (Figure 4B). Interestingly, DNA binding of the mutants mHNF1A(V133M) and mHNF1A(E235G) differed depending on the HNF-1 binding site used as probe. As expected from the GST-fusion experiments, binding to the 1A probe was impaired by both mutations. In contrast, binding of the wild-type and mutant proteins to the 4AP2 probe was not markedly different (Figure 4B). These results were confirmed by carrying out binding site titration experiments with full-length HNF-1α and mutant derivatives, from nuclear extracts. Ka values for the 1A probe did not differ much from that found using the GST- fusion proteins, thus confirming the effects produced by mutations p.Val133M, p.Glu235Gly and p.Arg271Trp (Table 2). Additionally, mutation p.Glu235Gly did not produce any effect on 4AP2 binding affinity, whereas mutant mHNF1A(V133M) produced only a slight effect. As expected, the greatest effect was observed for mutation p.Arg271Trp, which caused a 2.5-fold increase in the Ka value.  Figure 4 Figure 4 A Western blot analysis of nuclear extracts from Cos7 cells transfected with wild-type and HNF-1α variants. The 60-mm dishes of confluent cells were transfected with 10 μg of expression vectors using a modified calcium phosphate precipitation ... Table 2 Table 2 Affinity of HNF-1α wild-type and mutant proteins expressed in Cos7 for 1A and 4AP2 probes.a Go to: DISCUSSION Mutations in HNF1A are a common cause of monogenic diabetes characterized by a progressive deficiency in glucose-stimulated insulin secretion. Functional analysis of MODY3 mutations to identify the corresponding molecular defect might contribute to uncover the mechanisms of β-cell impairment in these diabetic patients. In this work, we characterized six different HNF1A variants found in patients diagnosed with familial, young-onset diabetes.  Mutation c-57-64delCACGCGGT;c-55G>C is located within the 5′UTR of HNF1A and was found in a family with a mild clinical phenotype. This mutation was previously reported as a rare polymorphism identified in a patient homozygous for the p.Arg54X mutation (8). However, this mutation cosegregates with diabetes in our patient family and was absent in 55 non-diabetic control subjects. The 5′UTR region of HNF1A, starting at position c-225, could be involved in transcription/translation processes or mRNA stability, as has been shown for other genes (24–26). Other MODY3 mutations have been previously identified in this region. In particular, the substitution c-62C>G, which is contained in the deleted region of our family, has been proposed to modify a Myc/Max binding site (8,27). Interestingly, the c-41-58 sequence is fully conserved among human, mouse and rat species, and the mutation found in family P37 modify three bases within that region. Our results suggest that this mutation affects the transcription of HNF1A in the β cell, although we cannot exclude other additional effects on the posttranscriptional regulation of this gene, nor define its importance with respect to the different mRNA isoforms (13).  The effects of missense mutations on HNF-1α transcriptional activity are heterogeneous and appear to depend on the reporter under study. Mutation p.Pro379Arg is located in a region of the transactivation domain of HNF-1α, which has been proposed to contribute to the transcriptional activity of HNF-1α in a gene- and cell type–dependent manner (28,29). Our results show that mutant mHNF1A(P378R) fails to fully transactivate in a promoter- and cell-specific manner, since it shows a specific reduction of the β-fibrinogen promoter transactivation when tested into Cos7 cells. Consistent with the localization of the mutated residue in the transactivation domain of HNF-1α, the mutant protein binds DNA as well as the wild-type. Thus, our results could be explained by an impairment of the interaction of the mutant protein with a specific coactivator in Cos7 cells. The lack of effect in Min6 cells could be due to the presence of endogenous HNF-1α, as previously proposed for other MODY3 mutations (22).  Mutations pVal133Met, p.Thr196Ala, p.Glu235Gly and p.Arg271Trp are all located in the DNA binding domain. The DNA binding domain of HNF-1α is a bipartite motif containing a Pit 1, Oct 1, and Oct 2, unc-86 (POU)-homeodomain (POUH), involved in DNA recognition, and a POU-specific domain (POUS) that cooperates with the POUH to enhance the binding affinity and specificity (Figure 1A) (20). Residue Arg271 is located in the third α-helix of the POUH domain and is highly conserved in many other homeodomains (30). This residue is required for the conformational stability of the homeodomain and for optimal DNA binding (30). Accordingly, mutation p.Arg271Trp decreased both affinity and maximal DNA binding and, consequently, impaired transactivation in all conditions tested here as well as previously (23). In contrast, mutation p.Thr196Ala does not appear to affect HNF-1α activity in our experimental conditions. The Thr196 residue is conserved in human, mouse, rat and chicken HNF-1α and is localized in the linker between POUS and POUH domains. The mHNF-1A(T196A) mutant shows normal DNA binding and trans-activation capacities, such as other missense mutations directed to this flexible interdomain (20). The apparent lack of effect of this mutation is not unexpected, since there is not a clear genotype/phenotype correlation in the P30 family. In particular, the sister of the patient, who was diagnosed at age 31 years, does not bear the p.Thr196Ala change (Table 1). However, this rare polymorphism, which does not appear to be a MODY3 mutation, might be a risk factor for developing diabetes, since it was not detected in 54 healthy subjects studied in our laboratory and has been reported in two other diabetic patients, including one where this change coexists with type 1 diabetes and overweight (9,31).  Notably, we found that the effect of mutations p.Val133Met and p.Glu235Gly on HNF-1α transactivity depends on the promoter tested. These residues are located in the third α-helix within the POUS and in the second α-helix within the POUH, respectively. Val133 is highly conserved among other POUS and its implication in protein stability has been suggested (20). An impaired protein stability of this mutant could explain the normal level of activation obtained with the β-fibrinogen and insulin promoters when higher amounts of DNA were transfected into Cos7 cells. However, this compensatory effect was not observed with the GLUT2 promoter or when MIN6 cells were used. Additionally, wild-type and mutant HNF-1α levels were similar in nuclear extracts of transfected Cos7 cells. In contrast, our results suggest that these two mutations affect DNA binding of HNF-1α. Although residue Val133 as well as Glu235 are not predicted to directly contact the DNA (20), DNA binding affinity of both mutants for the consensus 1A probe was clearly decreased, suggesting that this defect may be responsible for the reduced HNF-1α–dependent transactivation of most of our reporters. Strikingly, mutations p.Val133Met and p.Glu235Gly did not produce any significant defect in the transactivation of the P2 promoter of HNF-4α, which is the main functional promoter for this gene in the β cell (6). In agreement with these findings, DNA binding affinity of mHNF1A(E235G) to the 4AP2 probe was similar to that of the wild-type protein. Affinity of mHNF1A(V133M) for this probe was slightly decreased, but this effect was smaller than that observed with the consensus 1A binding site. The difference between the binding site sequence of 4AP2 (GTTACTCTTTAAC) and 1A (GTTAATAATTCAC) probes could be responsible for the differential effect of these two mutations on DNA binding affinity. Alternatively, adjacent sequences to the binding site might also contribute to this differential sensibility, as previously shown for the steroidogenic factor-1 (32).  Despite the common progressive β-cell function defect, which characterized the MODY3 phenotype, there is certain variability in the severity of its clinical expression in patients with respect to age of diagnosis, treatment requirements and development of complications. In particular, age of diagnosis has been shown to depend on the type of mutation and HNF-1α isoform affected as well as the presence of additional genetic modifiers (9,12,13). Besides these factors, the individual lifestyle is another important factor that may influence the evolution of the disease. In this regard, for example, it is worth noting the strict control on diet and pharmacological treatment exerted by patient P52 opposed to that exerted by patient P36. The results of our molecular study suggest that the differential effects on the regulation of specific target genes caused by the HNF-1α mutations could also contribute to the differences in the development of the clinical phenotype. HNF-1α is an important transcriptional regulator in liver and in pancreatic islets controlling tissue-specific transcriptional programs (33). In particular, HNF-1α is a major regulator of HNF-4α in pancreas, and there is evidence of a cross-regulatory feedback circuit between HNF-1α and HNF-4α in the β cell (34). Mutations in HNF4A are responsible for another form of monogenic diabetes, MODY1, which shares many clinical features with MODY3. Strikingly, some of the MODY3 missense mutations found in our diabetic patients do not appear to affect HNF4A expression. These results suggest that regulation of HNF4A expression by HNF-1α may not be the simplest explanation for the HNF-1α–deficient phenotype and that regulation of target genes other than HNF4A may also play an important role. Indeed, both HNF-1α and HNF-4α regulate synergistically common target genes involved in β-cell function (35). Considering the key role of HNF-4α in the β-cell function, we would expect that HNF1A mutations resulting in a decrease of HNF-4α expression will have a stronger impact on the regulation of common target genes, thus contributing in a major way to reduced insulin secretion and the progress of diabetes.  
3255|| Apoptosis is a form of programmed cell death that is controlled by aspartate-specific cysteine proteases called caspases. In the immune system, apoptosis counters the proliferation of lymphocytes to achieve a homeostatic balance, which allows potent responses to pathogens but avoids autoimmunity1, 2. The CD95 (Fas, Apo-1) receptor triggers lymphocyte apoptosis by recruiting Fas-associated death domain (FADD), caspase-8 and caspase-10 proteins into a death-inducing signalling complex3, 4. Heterozygous mutations in CD95, CD95 ligand or caspase-10 underlie most cases of autoimmune lymphoproliferative syndrome (ALPS), a human disorder that is characterized by defective lymphocyte apoptosis, lymphadenopathy, splenomegaly and autoimmunity5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14. Mutations in caspase-8 have not been described in ALPS, and homozygous caspase-8 deficiency causes embryonic lethality in mice. Here we describe a human kindred with an inherited genetic deficiency of caspase-8. Homozygous individuals manifest defective lymphocyte apoptosis and homeostasis but, unlike individuals affected with ALPS, also have defects in their activation of T lymphocytes, B lymphocytes and natural killer cells, which leads to immunodeficiency. Thus, caspase-8 deficiency in humans is compatible with normal development and shows that caspase-8 has a postnatal role in immune activation of naive lymphocytes.  Some individuals studied at the NIH under approved protocols manifest ALPS-related clinical features but do not have mutations in CD95, CD95 ligand or caspase-10 (ref. 15). Among them, we identified two siblings in family 66, a 12-yr-old female (patient 1) and an 11-yr-old male (patient 2), who showed lymphadenopathy, splenomegaly and defective CD95-induced apoptosis of peripheral blood lymphocytes (PBLs; Table 1 and Fig. 1a). Unlike typical individuals affected with ALPS, they had immunodeficiency characterized by recurrent sinopulmonary and herpes simplex virus (HSV) infections and poor responses to immunization (Table 1). The affected siblings were developmentally normal. The unaffected mother, father and sister were clinically well, although their PBLs showed partial defects in apoptosis mediated by CD95 (Fig. 1a and data not shown). Cells from patient 1 responded normally to the mitochondrial apoptosis inducers staurosporine, ceramide and etoposide (Fig. 1b).  Figure 1: Defective apoptosis and DISC analysis in family 66.Figure 1 : Defective apoptosis and DISC analysis in family 66. Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, or to obtain a text description, please contact npg@nature.com a, Activated PBLs from normal volunteers (NL), patient 1 (PT1), patient 2 (PT2), the sister (S) and mother (M) were stimulated with antibody to CD95 and analysed for cell loss. b, B cells transformed with the Epstein–Barr virus (EBV) were treated with staurosporine (1), etoposide (2), ceramide (3) or antibodies to CD95 (4) and analysed for cell loss. Filled bars represent normal control cells, open bars represent PT1 cells. c, DISC immunoprecipitates (IP) using antibodies to CD95 and whole-cell lysates (WCLs) from PBLs either treated (+) or untreated (-) with antibody to CD95 (APO-1.3) were blotted using antibody to CD95, FADD or caspase-8. d, Immunoblot showing amount of caspase-8 in PBL lysates. e, DISC immunoprecipitates from cells with or without anti-CD95 crosslinking were blotted with antibody to caspase-8 (top), and the corresponding lysates were blotted with antibody to caspase-3 (bottom). Cleavage products of caspase-8 and caspase-3 are marked by dots and an asterisk, respectively. Data are representative of four experiments.  High resolution image and legend (51K)  Table 1: Phenotype of kindred that are genetically deficient for caspase-8Table 1 - Phenotype of kindred that are genetically deficient for caspase-8 Full table   Biochemical analysis of the death-inducing signalling complex (DISC) showed normal CD95-induced FADD recruitment in all members of family 66 examined (Fig. 1c and data not shown). By contrast, the cellular abundance of caspase-8 and its recruitment to the DISC were decreased markedly in patient 1 and patient 2, but were normal in the mother (Fig. 1c, d, and data not shown). Neither caspase-8 nor the downstream effector caspase-3 underwent cleavage after Fas ligation, indicating that the DISC from patient 1 cells was not functional (Fig. 1e). We sequenced the complementary DNAs of CD95, CD95 ligand, caspase-10 and FADD from family members but found no mutations; however, we identified a homozygous C to T mutation in caspase-8 in both patient 1 and patient 2 that changed an arginine to a tryptophan at residue 248 in the p18 protease subunit (Fig. 2a).  Figure 2: Characterization of an inherited caspase-8 mutation.Figure 2 : Characterization of an inherited caspase-8 mutation. Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, or to obtain a text description, please contact npg@nature.com a, Caspase-8 protein showing the death effector domains (DED) and the enzyme subunits (p18 and p11). The location and predicted amino acid substitution of the mutation are indicated by the arrow. b, Pedigree of family 66. Patient 1 is indicated by the red arrow. c, Measurement of DEVD-AMC cleavage using GST fusion proteins of wild-type (wt, filled circles) or Arg248Trp mutant (mt, open circles) caspase-8. Inset, immunoblot for caspase-8 shows that nearly equivalent amounts of the two GST–caspase-8 fusion proteins were used in the assay. F.U., arbitrary fluorescence units. d, Jurkat I9.2 cells were transfected with vector (open circles), wild-type caspase-8 (filled squares) or Arg248Trp mutant caspase-8 (filled circles), treated with antibody to CD95, and assessed for cell loss. e, 293T cell lines were transfected with vector (top), or with CD8 fusions of wild-type (middle) or mutant Arg248Trp (bottom) caspase-8 along with a beta-galactosidase expression vector. The immunoblot of transfected cell lysates with antibody to caspase-8 shows similar expression of caspase-8 protein. Data are representative of three experiments.  High resolution image and legend (104K)  The asymptomatic mother, father and sister were heterozygous carriers of this mutation. We screened 13 extended family members and detected seven asymptomatic heterozygous carriers, but no additional homozygous or immunodeficient individuals. The pedigree revealed consanguinity (Fig. 2b). We did not find the mutation in DNA samples from 40 normal donors and 40 individuals affected with systemic lupus erythematosus, indicating that the Arg248Trp mutation is not a polymorphism. No additional caspase-8 mutations were found in 10 individuals with common variable immunodeficiency or 30 individuals with ALPS-like conditions (data not shown).  We examined the activity of the mutant enzyme. Using purified chimaeric proteins of wild-type or mutant caspase-8 protease fused to glutathione S-transferase (GST), we found that the mutant protein was unable to cleave the reporter substrate DEVD-AMC (Fig. 2c). In a cellular reconstitution assay using a caspase-8-deficient Jurkat cell line (I9.2) that fails to undergo apoptosis after CD95 crosslinking, expression constructs encoding wild-type caspase-8 restored CD95-induced apoptosis, but the mutant caspase-8 did not (ref. 16 and Fig. 2d). In an apoptosis assay in which fusion to the CD8 ectodomain spontaneously drives the multimerization of caspase-8 (ref. 17), the wild-type construct (CD8–C8wt) induced cell death, whereas the mutant construct (CD8–C8mt) was inactive (Fig. 2e). Densitometry showed that the abundance of mutant caspase-8 protein in the homozygotes was less than 5% of the wild-type amount, indicating that the mutant protein is unlikely to be partially functional or have allosteric regulatory effects. Thus, the Arg248Trp mutation reduces the stability of the caspase-8 protein and renders it enzymatically inactive.  The association between the homozygous caspase-8 mutation and immunodeficiency led us to study lymphocyte activation responses. We found interleukin-2 (IL-2) production was markedly defective when PBLs from individuals homozygous for the mutant caspase-8 were stimulated through the T-cell receptor (TCR; Fig. 3a). Notably, the heterozygous family members had a partial defect in IL-2 release. IL-2 production was rescued by stimulation with phorbol myristate acetate (PMA) and ionomycin, which bypass proximal TCR signalling and induce second messengers directly (Fig. 3b). We also found diminished T-cell proliferation responses to phytohaemagglutinin (PHA) in the two homozygotes, whereas the heterozygotes showed minimal proliferative defects (Fig. 3c). CD4- and CD8-postive T-cell populations from patients 1 and 2 showed calcium defects, indicating that the defect in activation affected both subsets of T cells (Fig. 3d and data not shown).  Figure 3: Defective immune cell responses in homozygous caspase-8 mutants.Figure 3 : Defective immune cell responses in homozygous caspase-8 mutants. Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, or to obtain a text description, please contact npg@nature.com a, IL-2 release after stimulation with antibodies to CD3 and CD28 (10 microg ml-1 each) for family members abbreviated as in Fig. 1. b, IL-2 release after stimulation with PMA and ionomycin. c, Stimulation index measured by thymidine incorporation after treatment with PHA. d, Calcium flux in CD4+ (top) or CD8+ (bottom) cells after TCR and CD28 stimulation. e, CD69 expression in purified NK cells after stimulation with antibodies to CD16 (left) or to 2B4 (right). f, Production of immunoglobulins by PBLs that were unstimulated (unstim) or stimulated with pokeweed mitogen (PWM; left) or by purified B cells that were stimulated with SAC and IL-2 for the indicated number of days (right). Data are representative of four experiments.  High resolution image and legend (110K)  We examined the influence of caspase-8 on surface activation markers after lymphocyte stimulation (Table 2). The basal surface expression of CD3, CD28 and CD95 was normal (data not shown); however, CD25 induction was markedly defective on both CD4- and CD8-positive T lymphocytes from patients 1 and 2. Induction defects were also observed for CD28, CD71, CD95, CD134, CD152 and MHC class II molecules, whereas induction of CD137 and downregulation of the TCR were not affected (Table 2 and data not shown). Cells from heterozygous family members also showed substantial defects in activation marker expression that were exacerbated by the caspase inhibitor zVAD-fmk (Table 2 and data not shown). By contrast, control experiments showed that lymphocytes from individuals with conventional ALPS and CD95 mutations did not have defective induction of surface activation molecules (data not shown). These results show that caspase-8 has a pivotal role in a proximal signalling event that is essential for a selected subset of TCR-induced responses.  Table 2: Fluorescence of surface markers after CD3/CD28 antibody stimulationTable 2 - Fluorescence of surface markers after CD3/CD28 antibody stimulation Full table   A prominent feature of human homozygous caspase-8 deficiency is severe infection by mucocutaneous HSV. Because defects in natural killer (NK) cells predispose to herpes virus infections, we examined signalling by the CD16 and 2B4 pathways in purified NK cells18, 19, 20. Activation of NK cells manifested by CD69 expression was induced by stimulating the cells with antibodies to CD16 or 2B4 in the control samples, but not in samples from patients 1 or 2 (Fig. 3e). Defective NK cell activation by 2B4 could be reconstituted in normal controls by pretreatment with zVAD-fmk (data not shown). The variable decreases in serum immunoglobulin concentrations in these individuals also prompted us to test their B-cell function. We found that PBLs stimulated with pokeweed mitogen (PWM), a T-cell-dependent mitogen, showed markedly decreased production of immunoglobulin-micro (IgM) and immunoglobulin-gamma (IgG) in patients 1 and 2, whereas the mother showed normal production of immunoglobulins (Fig. 3f). IgM release was also impaired when purified B cells from patients 1 and 2 were stimulated with the T-cell-independent mitogen Staphylococcus aureus Cowan I (SAC) plus exogenous IL-2 (Fig. 3f). Thus, immunodeficiency and the resultant opportunistic infections associated with homozygous caspase-8 mutation reflect pleiotropic defects that involve the functions of T, NK and B cells.  We validated the association of caspase-8 deficiency with defective lymphocyte activation by two approaches. First, we inactivated caspase-8 in normal human peripheral blood lymphocytes with RNA interference (RNAi) and antisense techniques. Using an electroporation apparatus (Nucleofector System, Amaxa) for efficient gene transfection of resting human PBLs, we introduced two different duplex RNAi ribonucleotides specific for caspase-8 and then stimulated the cells through the TCR complex21. Induction of CD69 and CD25 showed that RNAi primer pairs 2 and 3 substantially reduced the response to TCR stimulation as compared with nonspecific primers (Fig. 4a, b). Controls showed that the specific primer pairs reduced caspase-8 messenger RNA and decreased CD95-induced apoptosis (Fig. 4a, b, insets). In addition, transfection of caspase-8 antisense constructs impaired CD69 and CD25 induction as compared with vector controls, further showing that interfering with expression of the caspase-8 gene blocks activation responses (Fig. 4c).  Figure 4: Caspase-8 is required for lymphocyte activation.Figure 4 : Caspase-8 is required for lymphocyte activation. Unfortunately we are unable to provide accessible alternative text for this. If you require assistance to access this image, or to obtain a text description, please contact npg@nature.com a, Induction of the surface expression of CD69. Resting PBLs were transfected for 16 h with RNAi primers that were either nonspecific (NS) or specific for caspase-8 (primer pair 2 or 3), and were then stimulated with TCR and CD28 for 18 h. Inset shows that less caspase-8 mRNA is produced by RT–PCR with primer pair 3 (C8) than with the nonspecific primers (NS). b, Induction of the surface expression of CD25 analysed as in a. Inset shows a reduced percentage of cell loss after anti-CD95 antibody (500 ng ml-1) stimulation of HeLa cells transfected with primer pair 2 (2) or primer pair 3 (3), as compared with nonspecific primers (1). c, Flow cytometry of PBLs co-transfected with 2 microg of pEGFP and 5 microg of vector (Vct, black) or a caspase-8 antisense construct (C8as, red) and cultured for 72 h before treatment with control medium (thin curves) or TCR and CD28 stimulation (1 microg ml-1 each, thick curves) for 6–24 h. Expression of CD69 at 6 h (top) or CD25 at 24 h (bottom) is shown. Protein blots show less expression of caspase-8 in samples transfected with C8as as compared with controls; the results in a–c were reproduced with eight random blood donors. d, Flow cytometry analysis of the surface expression of CD25 by normal (NL) and patient 1 PBLs transfected with GFP control (left) or wild-type caspase-8–GFP fusion protein (right) and either stimulated with antibodies to CD3 and CD28 (blue line) or left unstimulated (red line). Black line indicates the positive gate used for quantification. e, Representation of the results shown in d. f, Calcium flux after stimulation with antibodies to CD3 and CD28 in PBLs from normal controls (green area) or from patient 1, transduced with either GFP control (red line) or caspase-8–GFP retrovirus (blue line). Data are representative of three experiments.  High resolution image and legend (74K)  Second, we transfected lymphocytes from patient 1 with an expression construct that encoded either a wild-type fusion protein of caspase-8 and green fluorescent protein (GFP) or GFP alone. Cells transfected with the GFP control did not show upregulation of CD25 expression after stimulation, but cells transfected with the wild-type caspase-8–GFP construct showed a threefold or greater induction of CD25 expression, comparable to normal controls (Fig. 4d, e). Introduction of a functional caspase-8 molecule by lentiviral gene transduction also rescued the impaired calcium response to TCR stimulation in cells from patient 1 (ref. 22 and Fig. 4f). We also found that the caspase-8-deficient I9.2 Jurkat line manifested defects in activation responses that could be corrected by retroviral expression of the wild-type caspase-8 gene (Supplementary Information). Together, these findings show that caspase-8 is necessary for proximal signalling events in lymphocytes.  Our analysis of individuals with inherited caspase-8 deficiency has shown that caspase-8 has a broad role in the activation of T, B and NK cells in addition to its function in conveying signals from death receptors to apoptosis effector mechanisms12, 13. Our results also explain how chemical caspase inhibitors interfere with T-cell proliferation12, 13, 14. Caspase-8 probably functions in lymphocyte activation independently of CD95, because individuals with type I ALPS and defects in CD95 do not have immunodeficiency, which makes it unlikely that this ligand–receptor pair is involved23. The immunodeficiency associated with defective caspase-8 also contrasts with the autoimmune phenotype of individuals with caspase-10 deficiency, despite the structural homology of these two enzymes11. Because mice that are deficient in caspase-8 show embryonic lethality, humans that lack caspase-8 function might not be expected to survive. Postnatal survival in humans may be due to the function of caspase-10, the closest paralogue of caspase-8 in humans. Caspase-10 has no known orthologue in mice but may compensate for caspase-8 (refs 3, 4). The phenotypes associated with caspase-8 and caspase-10 mutations in humans are based on limited genetic data, and studying more individuals with these disorders may define better the different consequences of these mutations. The defects in activation of T, NK and B cells suggest that there may be a common locus of action for caspase-8 in several lymphocyte signalling pathways that will be interesting to uncover. Caspase-8 may be a potentially useful target for a new class of anti-inflammatory or immunosuppressive therapeutics and there may be non-apoptotic signalling roles for caspases in cellular responses of non-immune organ systems. Hence, caspase-8 establishes a close link between the biochemical pathways of cellular activation and apoptosis that may shed light on the homeostatic regulation of these seemingly conflicting processes.  Top of page Methods Cellular preparations and analysis Individuals were studied under NIH-approved ALPS research protocols with informed consent. Wild-type (JA3) and caspase-8-deficient (I9.2) Jurkat cells were gifts from J. Blenis. The 293T cell line was obtained from ATCC. Peripheral blood T lymphocytes were separated on Ficoll gradients and stimulated first with 5 microg ml-1 of PHA (Sigma) for 3 d and then with 100 IU ml-1 IL-2. Apoptosis assays used 10–1,000 ng ml-1 antibodies to CD95 (APO-1.3, Kamiya), 0.1 microg ml-1 staurosporine, 10 microg ml-1 etoposide or 10 microM ceramide as described5, 24. We purified B cells using fluorescein isothiocyanate (FITC)-labelled antibodies to CD19, followed by positive selection with anti-FITC Microbeads (MACS). We prepared NK cells by negative selection using the NK Cell Isolation Kit (MACS). Immunoprecipitation and western blot analyses were carried out using antibodies to caspase-3 and FADD (Transduction Laboratories), CD95 (Kamiya) and caspase-8 (a gift from M. Peter). Sequence analysis, plasmids and mutagenesis We purified RNA using Trizol (Gibco-BRL) and carried out polymerase chain reaction with reverse transcription (RT–PCR) using the OneStep RT–PCR kit (Qiagen). Sequence analysis was done by dye primer chemistry (Amersham) on an ABI 377 automated sequencer and also by Cleveland Genomics. Bacterially expressed GST fusion proteins, full-length caspase-8 fused to GFP at the carboxy terminus for transfection studies, and CD8–caspase-8 constructs were prepared as described11, 17. We generated mutations using the QuickChange Site-Directed Mutagenesis kit (Stratagene). Biochemical and functional assays Purification of GST fusion proteins and caspase assays using DEVD-AMC have been described11. We transfected I9.2 cells with various constructs and a GFP control vector at a molar ratio of 3:1. After 18 h, cells were treated with antibody to CD95 and assayed for apoptosis. Semiconfluent 293T cells or HeLa cells (RNAi) were transfected using Fugene 6 (Roche) according to the manufacturer's instructions with 2 microg of caspase-8 constructs and 1 microg of a 3LacZ construct. Cells were then fixed and stained for beta-galactosidase as described17. To transfect resting PBLs, we mixed 5 microg of DNA containing the GFP fusion proteins with 100 microl of the human T-cell Nucleofector solution and then used this to resuspend 5 times 106 PBLs that had been freshly isolated using Ficoll. The PBL suspension was immediately electroporated by a Nucleofector instrument (Amaxa Biosystems). The transfected cells were added to 1 ml of complete RPMI-1640 medium for 24 h before being exposed to plate-bound anti-CD3 and anti-CD28 antibodies (each at 10 microg ml-1, Pharmingen) for 24 h. For RNAi analysis, primer pair 2 (5'-AATCACAGACTTTGGACAAAG-3' and 5'-AACTTTGTCCAAAGTCTGTGA-3', starting at nucleotide 653 from caspase-8 ATG), primer pair 3 (5'-AACTACCAGAAAGGTATACCT-3' and 5'-AAAGGTATACCTTTCTGGTAG-3', starting at nucleotide 1,090 from caspase-8 ATG) and nonspecific (NS) primers (5'-AACACGTAGCAGCTCGGATCG-3' and 5'-AACGATCCGAGCTGCTACGTG-3') were used in the Silencer siRNA construction kit (Ambion). The caspase-8 primers used in RT–PCR were FLICE Fr (5'- CCTTGGGAATATTGAGATTATATTCTCC-3') and FLICE Rev (5'-ATAGCACCATCAATCAGAAGGGAAGACAAG-3'). We generated the antisense construct by inserting the 498-base-pair EcoRI/XmaI caspase-8 cDNA fragment including the translation start site into a pEGFP-C1 vector (Clontech). The expression of CD25 and CD69 was determined by staining the surface of cells with the corresponding phycoerythrin-conjugated antibodies (Pharmingen). We analysed the data after gating on live GFP-positive cells.  Stimulation, cytokine measurements and proliferation assays Resting PBLs were stimulated for typically 24 h with 1 microg ml-1 anti-CD3 and 5 microg ml-1 anti-CD28 antibodies (Pharmingen) or with 5 microg ml-1 PHA. We stimulated NK cells with 50 microg ml-1 of either plate-bound anti-CD16 (3G8) or anti-2B4 (C1.7) antibodies (Pharmingen) for 24 h. B lymphocytes were stimulated with either 10 microg ml-1 pokeweed mitogen (Sigma) or 10% (v/v) of SAC cells (Calbiochem) and 200 IU ml-1 of IL-2. Surface molecules of interest were detected using phycoerythrin (PE)- and FITC-labelled antibodies (Pharmingen) by standard procedures, and analysed on a FACScan flow cytometer (Becton-Dickinson) using CellQuest (Applied Biosystems) and FlowJo (TreeStar) software. Concentrations of immunoglobulin in the supernatants of cells at days 7 and 13 were measured by R. Hornung at the Immunological Monitoring Laboratory of the National Cancer Institute. For stimulations with PMA and ionomycin, 10 ng ml-1 and 0.5 microg ml-1 were used, respectively. Where indicated, cells were pretreated for 36 h with 50 microM zVAD-fmk (Enzyme Systems Products). We measured IL-2 after 48 h of stimulation using the Quantikine Immunoassay Kit (R&D Systems). In proliferation assays, cells stimulated for 48 h with PHA and anti-CD28 antibody were pulsed with tritiated thymidine for 24 h and assessed by scintillation counting. Luciferase and calcium flux assays Jurkat T cells were transfected with 10 microg of an IL-2–Luc construct and 0.2 microg of a renilla construct as described25, stimulated with 20 microg ml-1 of plate-bound anti-CD3 and anti-CD28 antibodies for 24 h, and analysed with the Luciferase Assay System (Promega). To measure intracellular calcium, we loaded PBLs with 3 mM Indo-1 acetoxymethyl ester (Indo-1, Molecular Probes), incubated them at 37 °C and then stimulated them with 1 microg ml-1 of anti-CD3 and 5 microg ml-1 of anti-CD28 antibodies for about 6 min. The Indo-1 ratio of 395 nm/500 nm fluorescence emission was calculated by flow cytometry. Retroviral infections Lentiviral transduction of PBLs used plasmids that contained, in order, the HIV long terminal repeat (LTR), the caspase-8 coding sequence, an internal ribosome entry site (IRES) and GFP (HIV-LTR–caspase-8–IRES–GFP) or HIV-LTR–IRES–GFP, together with a packaging vector (Delta8.2) and a CMV–VSV-G construct (a gift from F. Candotti)22 or the kat system26. We transfected the lentiviral vectors into 293T cells to generate viral supernatants, which we then concentrated by spinning. 
